Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Matching  grants for capital construction and municipal infrastructure
made by the State of Oregon to  incorporated cities with a population not greater than 20,000
shall be  offered on the following terms, based on population according to the most recent
federal decennial census:
(a) Incorporated cities with a population not greater than 5,000 may be required to pro-
vide matching funds of not greater than:
(A) Three percent of the amount of a grant award of $100,000 or less.
(B) Five percent of the amount of a grant award greater than $100,000.
(b) Incorporated cities with  a population greater than 5,000 but not greater than 7,500
may be required to provide matching funds of not greater  than seven percent of the amount
of the grant award.
(c) Incorporated cities with a population greater than 7,500 but not greater than  10,000
may be required to provide matching funds of not greater than nine percent of the amount
of the grant award.
(d) Incorporated cities with  a population greater than 10,000 but not greater than 20,000
may be required to provide matching funds of  not greater than 12 percent of the amount of
the grant award.
(2) Incorporated  cities with a population not greater than 20,000 may use capital con-
struction and municipal infrastructure grant moneys  for all phases of a funded project in
addition to construction, including, but not limited to, engineering, planning and support.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4183