Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 837.374 is amended to read:
837.374. (1) Except  as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a person commits a Class A vi-
olation if the person possesses or controls  an unmanned aircraft system and recklessly causes the
unmanned aircraft system to:
(a) Direct a laser at an aircraft while the aircraft is in the air;
(b) Crash into an aircraft while the aircraft is in the air;
(c) Prevent the takeoff or landing of an aircraft; or
(d) Interfere with a [ wildfire suppression, ] law  enforcement , firefighting, search and rescue  or
emergency response effort.
(2) Except as provided in subsection  (3) of this section, a person commits a Class A misdemeanor
if the person possesses or controls  an unmanned aircraft system and knowingly or intentionally
causes the unmanned aircraft system to:
(a) Direct a laser at an aircraft while the aircraft is in the air;
(b) Crash into an aircraft while the aircraft is in the air;
(c) Prevent the takeoff or landing of an aircraft; or
(d) Interfere with a [ wildfire suppression, ] law  enforcement , firefighting, search and rescue or
emergency response effort.
(3) A person commits a Class A felony if  the person possesses or controls an unmanned aircraft
system and knowingly, intentionally or recklessly causes death or serious physical injury,  as defined
in ORS 161.015, to another person by causing the unmanned aircraft system to:
(a) Direct a laser at an aircraft while the aircraft is in the air;
(b) Crash into an aircraft while the aircraft is in the air; or
(c) Prevent the takeoff or landing of an aircraft.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section,  a person commits a Class A misdemeanor if
the person violates subsection (1) of this section and the person has one or more convictions under
subsection (1) of this section at the time of the offense.
(5) In addition to and not in lieu of any other sentence the court may impose, upon  a person’s
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1911
HB 3426
1
2
3
4
second or subsequent  conviction under this section, the court shall, at the time of sentencing, de-
clare the unmanned aircraft system used in  the offense to be contraband and order that the un-
manned aircraft system be forfeited.
[2]