Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 657.020 is amended to read:
657.020. (1) As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, “employing  unit”
means:
(a) Any individual or type of organization, including any partnership, association,  limited liabil-
ity company, limited liability partnership, trust, estate, joint stock company, insurance company  or
corporation, whether domestic or foreign, or the receiver,  trustee in bankruptcy, trustee, or suc-
cessor thereof, or the legal representative of a deceased person, [ who] that  has or had in its  employ
one or more individuals performing services for it within this state.
(b) This state, including every state officer,  board, commission, department, institution, branch
and agency of the state government.
(c) Any people’s utility district.
(d) Any political subdivision.
(e) Any Indian tribe or subdivision, subsidiary or business enterprise wholly owned by an  Indian
tribe.
(2) All individuals performing  services within this state for any employing unit that maintains
two or more separate establishments within this state are deemed to be  employed by a single em-
ploying unit for all [ the] purposes of this chapter, except that for the purposes  of this chapter each
of the various agencies, boards, commissions, departments, institutions and  political subdivisions of
this state shall be deemed separate employing units.
(3) For all purposes of this chapter, for any hour of work, an individual:
(a) Shall be considered to be employed solely by the employing unit:
(A) For which the individual performs services; and
(B) That has the right to direct and control  the individual’s performance of the services;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 232
HB 4005
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and
(b) May not be considered to be employed by more than one employing unit.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 657B.010 is amended to read:
657B.010. As used in this chapter:
(1) “Alternate base  year” means the last four completed calendar quarters preceding the benefit
year.
(2) “Average  weekly wage” means the amount calculated by the Employment Department as the
state average weekly covered wage under ORS 657.150 (4)(e) as determined not more than once  per
year.
(3) “Base year” means the first four of the last five  completed calendar quarters preceding the
benefit year.
(4) “Benefits” means family and medical leave insurance benefits.
(5)(a) “Benefit year” means, except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a period of
52 consecutive weeks beginning on the Sunday immediately preceding  the date on which family
leave, medical leave or safe leave commences.
(b) “Benefit year” means, in the event that the 52-week period described in paragraph (a) of  this
subsection  would  result in an overlap of any quarter of the base year of a previously filed valid
claim, a period of 53 consecutive weeks beginning on  the Sunday immediately preceding the date
on which family leave, medical leave or safe leave commences.
(6) “Child” means:
(a) A biological child, adopted child, stepchild or foster child of a covered individual  or of the
covered individual’s spouse or domestic partner;
(b) A person who is or was a legal ward of a covered individual or of the covered  individual’s
spouse or domestic partner; or
(c) A person who is or was in a relationship of in loco parentis  with a covered individual or
with the covered individual’s spouse or domestic partner.
(7) “Claimant” means an individual who has submitted an application or established  a claim for
benefits.
(8) “Contribution” or “contributions” means the money payments made by any  of the following
under ORS 657B.150:
(a) An employer;
(b) An employee;
(c) A self-employed individual;
(d) A tribal government; or
(e) An employee of a tribal government.
(9) “Covered individual” means  any one of the following who qualifies under ORS 657B.015 to
receive family and medical leave insurance benefits:
(a) An eligible employee;
(b) A self-employed individual; or
(c) An employee of a tribal government.
(10) “Domestic partner” means an individual joined in a domestic partnership.
(11) “Domestic partnership” has the meaning given that term in ORS 106.310.
(12) “Eligible employee” means:
(a)(A) An employee who has earned at least $1,000 in wages during the base year; or
(B) If an employee has not earned at least  $1,000 in wages during the base year, an employee
[2]
HB 4005
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
who has earned at least $1,000 in wages during the alternate base year; and
(b) An employee to whom paid family and medical leave insurance  benefits may be available
under ORS 657B.015.
(13) “Eligible employee’s average weekly wage” means an amount calculated by the Director  of
the Employment Department by  dividing the total wages earned by an eligible employee during the
base year by the number of weeks in the base year.
(14)(a) “Employee” means:
(A) An individual performing services for an employer for remuneration or under any  contract
of hire, written or oral, express or implied , under the employer’s direction and control .
(B) A home care worker as defined in ORS 410.600.
(b) “Employee” does not include:
(A) An independent contractor as defined in ORS 670.600.
(B) A participant in a work training program  administered under a state or federal assistance
program.
(C) A participant in a work-study program that provides students in secondary or postsecondary
educational institutions with employment opportunities for financial assistance or  vocational train-
ing.
(D) A railroad worker exempted under the federal Railroad Unemployment Insurance Act.
(E) A volunteer.
(F) A judge as defined in ORS 260.005.
(G) A member of the Legislative Assembly.
(H) A holder of public office as defined in ORS 260.005.
(15)(a) “Employer” means any person  that employs one or more employees working anywhere in
this state or any agent or employee of such person to whom the duties of the person  under this
chapter have been delegated.
(b) “Employer” includes:
(A) A political subdivision of this state or any county, city, district, authority or public  corpo-
ration, or any instrumentality of a county, city, district, authority or public corporation,  organized
and existing under law or charter;
(B) An individual;
(C) Any type of organization, corporation, partnership, limited liability company,  association,
trust, estate, joint stock company or insurance company;
(D) Any successor in interest to an entity described in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph;
(E) A trustee, trustee in bankruptcy or receiver; or
(F) A trustee or legal representative of a deceased person.
(c) “Employer” does not include the federal government or a tribal government.
(16) “Employment agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 658.005.
(17) “Family and medical leave insurance  benefits” means the wage replacement benefits that
are available to a covered individual under ORS 657B.050 or under the  terms of an employer plan
approved under ORS 657B.210, for family leave, medical leave or safe leave.
(18)(a) “Family leave” means leave from work taken by a covered individual:
(A) To care for and bond with a child during the first year after the child’s birth or during the
first year after the placement of the child through foster care or adoption; or
(B) To care for a family member with a serious health condition.
(b) “Family leave” does not mean:
[3]
HB 4005
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Leave described in ORS 659A.159 (1)(d);
(B) Leave described in ORS 659A.159 (1)(e); or
(C) Leave authorized under ORS 659A.093.
(19) “Family member” means:
(a) The spouse of a covered individual;
(b) A child of a covered individual or the child’s spouse or domestic partner;
(c) A parent of a covered individual or the parent’s spouse or domestic partner;
(d) A sibling or stepsibling of a  covered individual or the sibling’s or stepsibling’s spouse or
domestic partner;
(e) A grandparent of a covered individual or the grandparent’s spouse or domestic partner;
(f) A grandchild of a covered individual or the grandchild’s spouse or domestic partner;
(g) The domestic partner of a covered individual; or
(h) Any individual related by blood or affinity whose close association with a covered individual
is the equivalent of a family relationship.
(20) “Medical leave” means leave from work  taken by a covered individual that is made neces-
sary by the individual’s own serious health condition.
(21) “Parent” means:
(a) A biological parent, adoptive parent, stepparent or foster parent of a covered individual;
(b) A person who was a foster parent of a covered individual when  the covered individual was
a minor;
(c) A person designated  as the legal guardian of a covered individual at the time the covered
individual was a minor or required a legal guardian;
(d) A person with whom a covered individual was or is in a relationship of in loco parentis; or
(e) A parent of a covered individual’s spouse or domestic partner who meets a  description under
paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection.
(22) “Safe leave” means leave taken for any purpose described in ORS 659A.272.
(23) “Self-employed individual” means:
(a) An individual who  has self-employment income as defined in section 1402(b) of the Internal
Revenue Code as amended and in effect on December 31, 2022; or
(b) An independent contractor as defined in ORS 670.600.
(24) “Serious health condition” has the meaning given that term in ORS 659A.150.
(25) “Third party administrator” means a third party that enters into an agreement with  the
Director of the Employment Department to implement and administer the paid  family and medical
leave program established under this chapter.
(26) “Tribal government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 181A.940.
(27)(a) “Wages” has the meaning given that term in ORS 657.105.
(b) “Wages” does not mean contribution amounts paid to  the Paid Family and Medical Leave
Insurance Fund by an employer on behalf of an employee under ORS 657B.150 (5).
SECTION 3.
 ORS 657B.175 is amended to read:
657B.175. (1) An employee’s wages shall be used to make determinations under this chapter  if
the wages are earned for service that is:
(a) Localized within this state; or
(b) Not localized within any state, but some of the service is performed within this state and:
(A) The base of operations is in this state or, if there is no base of operations, the  place from
which the service is directed or controlled is in this state; or
[4]
HB 4005
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
(B) The base of operations or place from which the service is directed or controlled is  not in
any state in which some part of the service is performed, but the individual’s residence is in this
state.
(2) Service is localized within this state if it is:
(a) Performed entirely within this state; or
(b) Performed both within and outside this state, but the service performed outside this state  is
incidental to the employee’s service within this state.
(3) For all purposes of this chapter, for any  hour of work, an employee may not be con-
sidered to be employed by more than one employer.
SECTION 4.
(1)(a) If employer contribution amounts  were paid on behalf of an employer
described in ORS 657B.150 (4) with respect to employees for hours of work in which  the em-
ployees did not perform services for the paying entity, the paying entity may seek a  refund
for the amounts paid in the manner prescribed under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The paying entity may amend a combined quarterly report filed with  the Department
of Revenue under ORS 657B.150 detailing any  employer contribution amounts paid by the
entity on or after January 1, 2023.
(2)(a) If the department determines pursuant to  an amended combined quarterly report
submitted under subsection (1)(b) of this section that a refund is due to a paying entity for
employer contribution amounts paid on or after January 1, 2023,  the Director of the Em-
ployment Department shall issue a refund to the entity.
(b) The Director of the Employment Department may not allow or make a  refund to a
paying entity after three years from the date on which  the entity paid the contribution
amount.
SECTION 5. (1) Section 4  of this 2024 Act and the amendments to ORS 657.020, 657B.010
and 657B.175 by sections 1 to 3 of this 2024 Act become operative on January 1, 2024.
(2) The Employment Department may  take any action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the department to implement the
provisions of sections 1 to 4 of this 2024 Act on and after the operative date specified  in
subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 6. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[5]