Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 327.185 is amended to read:
327.185. (1) As used in this section, “eligible applicant” means any of the following entities:
(a) Common school districts and union high school districts.
(b) The Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program.
(c) Public charter schools [ that are not virtual public charter schools, as defined in  ORS 338.005,
and] that have a student population of which:
(A) At  least 35 percent of the student population is composed of students from the following
student groups:
(i) Economically disadvantaged, as described in ORS 327.180 (2)(b)(A);
(ii) Racial or ethnic groups that have historically experienced academic disparities, as described
in ORS 327.180 (2)(b)(B); or
(iii) Students with disabilities, as described in ORS 327.180 (2)(b)(C); and
(B) The percentage of the students  from student groups identified under subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph is greater than:
(i) The percentage of all students  in the school district who are economically disadvantaged, if
eligibility is determined based on the percentage of students who are economically disadvantaged;
(ii) The percentage of all students in the school district who are from  racial or ethnic groups
that have historically experienced academic disparities, if eligibility is determined based on the
percentage of students who are from those racial or ethnic groups; or
(iii) The percentage of all  students in the school district who are disabled, if eligibility is de-
termined based on the percentage of students who are disabled.
(2)(a) Eligible applicants may apply for a grant from  the Student Investment Account to receive
a distribution under ORS 327.190.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 338.155  (9), a public charter school that is not an eligible applicant
may not apply for a grant under this section.
(3) Prior to preparing a grant application, an eligible applicant must:
(a) If the eligible applicant is a school district, determine whether the school  district will allow
public charter schools sponsored by, or located within, the school district  to participate in the grant
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3390
SB 906
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
application and the grant agreement.
(b) If the eligible applicant is a public charter school, determine whether the  public charter
school intends to apply for a grant and provide notice of that intent to the school district in  which
the public charter school is located and to the Department of Education.
(4)(a) If an eligible applicant is a school district and  decides to include public charter schools
in the grant application and grant agreement, the school district must provide all  public charter
schools sponsored by, or located within, the school district the  opportunity to participate in the
grant application and grant agreement.
(b)(A) A public charter school is  not required to participate in the grant application and grant
agreement of a school district.
(B) If a public charter school does not participate  in a grant application and grant agreement
under this subsection:
(i) The ADMw of  the public charter school may not be used in the calculation of the school
district ADMw for grants distributed under ORS 327.195; and
(ii) The public charter school is not entitled to any  grant moneys distributed under ORS 327.195.
(C) If a public charter school participates in a grant application and grant agreement  under this
subsection:
(i) The public charter school and school district shall enter into an agreement  for the distrib-
ution of moneys or the provision of services, including any accountability  measures required of the
public charter school by the school district;
(ii) The ADMw of the  public charter school shall be used in the calculation of the school district
ADMw for grants distributed under ORS 327.195; and
(iii) The public charter school is entitled to any grant moneys or services provided for in  the
agreement entered into under this subparagraph.
(5)(a) For the purpose of preparing a grant application, an eligible applicant must determine:
(A) Which of the allowed uses identified in ORS 327.180 (3) the  eligible applicant will fund with
grant moneys; and
(B) Which of the eligible uses identified  under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph the eligible
applicant will designate to meeting student mental and behavioral health needs.
(b) An eligible  applicant shall make the determinations required under paragraph (a) of this
subsection by:
(A) Engaging in strategic planning; and
(B) Considering the recommendations of the Quality Education  Commission established under
ORS 327.500.
(6)(a) The strategic planning required under subsection (5) of this section must include:
(A) A completed needs assessment, as described in ORS 329.095;
(B) An analysis of the potential academic impact, both for the students of the  eligible applicant
and for student groups  identified in ORS 327.180 (2)(b), from the allowed uses that would be funded
by grant moneys; and
(C) The creation of budgets for the allowed uses that would be funded by grant moneys.
(b) The  strategic planning required under subsection (5) of this section must take into consid-
eration:
(A) Input  from the community of the eligible applicant, including school employees, students
from student groups identified in ORS 327.180 (2)(b) and parents of those students; and
(B) Data collected by the eligible applicant to enable the eligible applicant  to make equity-based
[2]
SB 906
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
decisions.
(7) Based on the strategic planning described in subsection (6) of this section, the eligible ap-
plicant shall develop  a four-year plan for the use of grant moneys. The plan must be updated every
two years and must:
(a) Identify which allowed uses identified in ORS 327.180 (3) will be funded with  grant moneys
and which of those uses will be designated to meet student mental and behavioral health needs.
(b) Describe how the allowed uses identified under paragraph (a)  of this subsection will be used
to:
(A) Meet students’ mental and behavioral health needs;
(B) Increase academic achievement for students of the eligible applicant; and
(C) Reduce academic disparities for student groups identified in ORS 327.180 (2)(b)  who are
served by the eligible  applicant, and identify which of those student groups will benefit from the
allowed uses that are being funded with grant moneys.
(c) Include the budgets for the allowed uses to be funded with grant moneys.
(d) Be approved by the governing body of the eligible applicant at an open meeting, following:
(A) Provision of the plan at the main office  of the eligible applicant and on the eligible
applicant’s website;
(B) Oral presentation of the plan by an administrator of the eligible  applicant to the governing
body of the eligible applicant; and
(C) Opportunity for the public to comment on the plan at an open meeting.
(e) Be a part of the local district continuous improvement plan described in ORS 329.095, if  the
eligible applicant is a school district.
(8) To apply for a grant, an eligible applicant must submit an  application every two years in a
format and according to timelines prescribed by  the Department of Education. The application must
include:
(a) A completed needs assessment, as described in ORS 329.095;
(b) The plan developed under subsection (7) of this section; and
(c) Budget estimates for  each of the allowed uses identified in the plan developed under sub-
section (7) of this section that will be funded by grant moneys.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 327.195 is amended to read:
327.195. (1)(a) Except as provided  by paragraph (d) of this subsection, the amount of a grant
awarded from the Student Investment Account = the grant recipient’s ADMw ×  (the  total amount
available for distribution as grants in each biennium ÷  the total ADMw of all grant recipients).
(b) For purposes of this subsection and except as provided by paragraph (c) of this  subsection,
ADMw equals:
(A) For school districts, the ADMw as calculated  under ORS 327.013, except that the additional
amount allowed for students who are in poverty  families, as determined under ORS 327.013
(1)(c)(A)(v)(I), shall be 0.5.
(B) For an  educational program under the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile
Detention Education Program, as provided in ORS 327.026.
(c) When calculating ADMw for a school district, the Department of  Education shall remove
from the calculation any amounts that are attributable to:
[(A) A virtual public charter school, as defined in ORS 338.005; ]
[(B)] (A) A public charter school that provided notice of the public charter school’s intent to
apply for a grant as an eligible applicant; and
[3]
SB 906
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
[(C)] (B) A public charter school sponsored by, or located  within, the school district that did
not participate in the grant application or grant agreement.
(d) The amount of a grant distributed under this  section may be adjusted by the department to
ensure that:
(A) A grant recipient does not receive any  moneys for uses that are not allowed uses under ORS
327.180 (3).
(B) A school district with an ADMw of 50 or less receives a minimum grant amount.
(2) The State Board of Education shall adopt  any rules necessary for the distribution of grants
under this section, including establishing:
(a) The minimum grant amounts under subsection (1)(d) of this section; and
(b) Any percentages and timelines for installment  payments and adjustments of those installment
payments.
(3) A grant recipient  shall deposit the grant moneys the grant recipient receives under this
section into a separate account and shall apply amounts in  that account as provided by the grant
agreement.
[4]