Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
RATE OF RETURN
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 757.
SECTION 2. A public utility that makes sales of electricity may not establish a rate for
any service performed, controlled or operated by the public utility in  this state, and related
to making sales of electricity,  that provides the public utility with a rate of return that ex-
ceeds 4.5 percent.
SECTION 3.  ORS 757.205 is amended to read:
757.205. [(1)] (1)(a) [ Every] Each  public utility shall file with the Public Utility Commission[ ,
within a time to be fixed by the commission, ] schedules [ which shall be ] that are  open to public in-
spection, showing all  rates, tolls and charges [ which it ] that the public utility  has established and
[which] that are in force at the time for any service performed by [ it within ] the  public utility  in
this state, or for any service [ in connection therewith ] related to a  service performed by the
public utility in this state,  or for any service  performed by any public utility controlled or  oper-
ated by [ it] the public utility.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of  this subsection, the commission shall deter-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 912
SB 909
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mine by rule or order the date on which schedules must be filed under paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(c) A public utility  that makes sales of electricity shall file all schedules with the com-
mission once per year on July 1.
(2) [ Every] Each public utility shall file with and  as part of every [ such] schedule [ all] filed
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section the  rules and regulations  that in any manner affect the
rates charged or to be charged for [ any] a service. [ Every] Each  public utility shall also file with
the commission  copies of interstate rate schedules and rules and regulations issued by [ it] the public
utility or to which [ it] the public utility is a party.
(3) [ Where] If a schedule of joint rates  or charges is or may be in force between two or more
public utilities, [ such schedules shall in like manner be printed and ] the schedule must be  filed with
the commission as described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section .
SECTION 4.
 ORS 757.210 is amended to read:
757.210. (1)(a) Whenever any public utility files with the  Public Utility Commission any rate or
schedule of rates stating or establishing a new rate or  schedule of rates or increasing an existing
rate or schedule of rates, the  commission may, either upon written complaint or upon the
commission’s own initiative, after reasonable notice, conduct a hearing to determine whether  the
rate or schedule is fair, just and reasonable. Upon written complaint filed by  the public utility,
its customers  or customers or any other proper party,  the commission shall conduct the hearing
[upon written complaint  filed by the utility, its customer or customers, or any other proper party ] within
60 days of  the  public utility’s filing .[; provided that no ] A hearing does not  need to be held if the
particular rate change is the result of an automatic adjustment clause. At the hearing the public
utility [ shall bear ] bears the burden of showing that the rate or schedule of rates proposed to be
established or increased  or changed is fair, just and reasonable. The commission may not authorize
a rate or schedule of rates that is not fair, just and reasonable.
(b) In lieu of  the requirement that a hearing conducted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection be held within 60 days of a public utility’s filing,  for any public utility that makes
sales of electricity, a hearing conducted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection must
be held on or before June 30 of the calendar year subsequent to the calendar  year in which
the public utility filed the rate or schedule of rates.
[(b)] (c) As used  in this subsection, “automatic adjustment clause” means a provision of a rate
schedule that provides for rate increases or decreases  or both, without prior hearing, reflecting in-
creases or decreases or both in costs  incurred, taxes paid to units of government or revenues earned
by a public utility , and that is subject to review by the commission at least once every two years.
(2)(a) Subsection (1) of this  section does not apply to rate changes under an approved alternative
form of regulation plan, including a resource rate plan under ORS 757.212.
(b) Any alternative form of regulation  plan shall include provisions to ensure that the plan op-
erates in the interests of  public utility customers and the public generally and results  in rates that
are just and reasonable and  may include provisions establishing a reasonable range for rate of re-
turn on investment. In approving  a plan, the commission shall, at a minimum, consider whether the
plan:
(A) Promotes increased efficiencies and cost control;
(B) Is consistent with least-cost resources acquisition policies;
(C) Yields rates that are consistent with those that would be obtained following application  of
ORS 757.269;
[2]
SB 909
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(D) Is consistent with maintenance of safe, adequate and reliable service; and
(E) Is beneficial to public utility customers generally, for example, by minimizing public utility
rates.
(c) Prior to implementing a rate change under an alternative  form of regulation plan, the
public utility shall present a report that  demonstrates the calculation of any proposed rate
change at a public meeting of the commission.
[(c)] (d) As used in this subsection, “alternative  form of regulation plan” means a plan adopted
by the commission upon petition by a public utility, after notice and an opportunity for  a hearing,
that sets rates and revenues and a method for changes in rates  and revenues using alternatives to
cost-of-service rate regulation.
[(d) Prior to implementing a rate change under an alternative form of  regulation plan, the utility
shall present a report  that demonstrates the calculation of any proposed rate change at a public meeting
of the commission. ]
(3) Except as provided in ORS 757.212, the commission,  at any time, may order a public utility
to appear and  establish that any, or all, of its rates in a plan authorized under subsection (2) of this
section are in conformity with the plan and are just and reasonable. Except as provided in  ORS
757.212, [such] rates in a plan authorized under subsection (2) of this section , and the alternative
form of regulation  plan under which the rates are set, [ also shall be ] are subject to complaint under
ORS 756.500.
(4) Periodically, but not less often than every two years after the implementation of a plan  re-
ferred to in subsection  (2) of this section, the commission shall submit a report to the Legislative
Assembly that shows the impact of the plan on rates paid by public utility customers.
(5) The commission and staff may consult at any time with,  and provide technical assistance to,
public utilities, their customers[ ,] and  other interested parties on matters relevant to  public utility
rates and charges. If a hearing  is held with respect to a rate change, the commission’s decisions
shall be based on the record made at the hearing.
SECTION 5.
The amendments to ORS 757.205 and 757.210 by sections 3 and 4 of this 2017
Act apply to rates and schedules filed with  the Public Utility Commission on or after the
effective date of this 2017 Act.
PUBLIC PURPOSE CHARGE
SECTION 6.  ORS 757.612 is amended to read:
757.612. (1) There is established an annual public purpose  expenditure standard for electric
companies  and  Oregon Community Power to fund new cost-effective local energy conservation, new
market transformation efforts, the above-market costs of new renewable energy resources and  new
low-income weatherization. The public purpose expenditure standard shall be funded  by the public
purpose charge described in subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) Beginning on the date an electric company or Oregon  Community Power offers direct ac-
cess to [ its] retail electricity consumers, except residential electricity consumers, the electric com-
pany or Oregon Community  Power shall collect a public purpose charge from all of the retail
electricity consumers located within [ its] the electric company’s or  Oregon Community Power’s
service area until  January 1, 2026. Except as provided in [ paragraph (b) ] paragraphs (b) and (c)
of this subsection, the public purpose charge shall  be equal to [ three] 1.5 percent of the total re-
venues collected by the electric company, Oregon Community Power or the  electricity service sup-
[3]
SB 909
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
plier from [ its] retail electricity consumers for electricity services, distribution  services , ancillary
services,  metering  and billing, transition charges and other types of costs included in electric rates
on July 23, 1999.
(b) For an aluminum plant that averages  more than 100 average megawatts of electricity use
per year, [ beginning on March 1, 2002, ] the electric company or Oregon Community Power [ whose],
whichever serves territory  that  abuts the greatest  percentage of the site of the aluminum plant ,
shall collect from the aluminum company , subject to paragraph (c) of this subsection,  a public
purpose charge equal to one percent of the total revenue  from the sale of electricity [ services ] to the
aluminum plant [ from any source ].
(c) A public purpose  charge collected under this subsection may not exceed the public
purpose charge collected by the electric company, Oregon Community Power  or the elec-
tricity service supplier from the retail electricity consumer for the 2015 calendar year.
(3)(a) The Public Utility  Commission shall establish rules implementing the provisions of this
section relating to electric companies and Oregon Community Power.
(b) [ Subject to paragraph (e) ] Except as provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection, funds
collected [ by an electric company or Oregon Community Power ] through public purpose charges  un-
der subsection (2) of this section  shall be allocated as follows:
(A) Sixty-three percent for new cost-effective local energy  conservation[ ,] and new market
transformation efforts.
(B) Nineteen percent for the above-market costs of constructing and operating new  renewable
energy resources with a nominal electric generating capacity, as defined in ORS 469.300,  of 20
megawatts or less.
(C) Thirteen percent for new low-income weatherization.
(D) Five percent  [ shall be transferred to ] for deposit in  the Housing and Community Services
Department Electricity Public  Purpose Charge Fund established by ORS 456.587 (1) [ and used ] for
the purpose of providing grants as described in ORS 458.625 (2).
(c) The costs of administering subsections (1) to (6) of this section for  an electric company or
Oregon Community Power  shall be paid out of the funds collected through public purpose charges.
The commission may require [ that] an electric company or  Oregon Community Power to direct funds
collected through public  purpose charges to [ the] state agencies responsible for implementing sub-
sections  (1)  to (6) of this section in order to pay the costs of [ administering such responsibilities ]
implementation.
(d) The commission  shall direct the manner in which public purpose charges are collected and
spent by an electric company or Oregon Community  Power and may require an electric company
or Oregon Community Power to expend funds through  competitive bids or other means designed to
encourage competition, except that funds dedicated for new low-income weatherization shall be  di-
rected to the Housing and Community Services Department [ as provided in subsection (7)  of this
section] for purposes related to new low-income weatherization . The commission  [may also direct
that] may also require  funds collected [ by an electric company or Oregon Community Power ] through
public purpose charges to be paid to  a nongovernmental entity for investment in public purposes
described in subsection (1) of this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection:
(A) If an electric company collected the funds, at least 80 percent of the funds allocated for
new cost-effective local energy  conservation shall be spent  within the service area of the electric
company [ that collected the funds ]; or
(B) If Oregon Community  Power collected the funds, at least 80 percent of the funds allocated
[4]
SB 909
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
for new cost-effective local energy  conservation shall be spent within the service area  of Oregon
Community Power.
(e)(A) The first  10 percent of [ the] funds collected [ annually] each year by an electric company
or Oregon Community Power under subsection (2)  of this section shall be distributed to school dis-
tricts that are located in the service territory of the electric company or Oregon  Community Power.
The funds shall be distributed to  individual school districts according to the weighted average daily
membership (ADMw) of  each school district for the prior fiscal year as calculated under ORS
327.013. The commission shall establish by rule a methodology for distributing a  proportionate share
of funds under this paragraph to school districts that are only partially located in  the service ter-
ritory of the electric company or Oregon Community Power.
(B) A school district that receives funds under this paragraph shall use the funds  first to pay
for energy audits for schools located within the school district. A  school district may not expend
additional funds received under this  paragraph on a school [ facility] until an energy audit has been
completed for that school  [facility]. To the extent practicable, a school district shall coordinate with
the State Department  of Energy and incorporate federal funding in complying with this paragraph.
Following completion of an energy audit for an individual school, the school district  may expend
funds received under this paragraph to implement the energy audit. Once an energy audit has been
conducted  and  completely implemented for each school within the school district, the school district
may expend funds received under this paragraph for any of the following purposes:
(i) Conducting additional energy audits. A school district shall conduct an energy audit  prior
to expending funds on any other purpose authorized under this paragraph unless the  school district
has performed an energy audit within the three years immediately prior to receiving the funds.
(ii) [ Weatherization ] Weatherizing school district facilities  and upgrading  the energy effi-
ciency of school district facilities.
(iii) Energy conservation education programs.
(iv) Purchasing electricity from [ environmentally focused ] sources that protect the environ-
ment. [and]
(v) Investing in renewable energy resources.
(f) The commission may not establish a different public purpose charge than the  public purpose
charge described in subsection (2) of this section.
(g) If the commission [ directs] requires funds collected through public purpose charges to be
paid to a nongovernmental entity, the  entity , pursuant to an agreement entered into or renewed
between the commission and the entity  [ shall]:
(A) Shall include on the entity’s board of directors an  ex officio member designated by the
commission, who shall also serve on the entity’s nominating committee for filling board vacancies.
(B) Shall require the entity’s officers and directors  to provide an annual disclosure of economic
interest to be filed with the commission on or prior to April  15 of each calendar year for public
review in a form similar to the statement  of economic interest required for public officials under
ORS 244.060.
(C) Shall require the entity’s officers and directors to declare actual and potential conflicts of
interest at  regular meetings of the entity’s governing body when such conflicts arise[ ,] and shall
require an  officer or director to abstain from participating in any discussion or [ vote] voting on any
item where that officer or director has an actual conflict of interest. For the purposes of this sub-
paragraph, “actual conflict of interest” and “potential conflict of interest” have  the meanings given
those terms in ORS 244.020.
[5]
SB 909
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(D) May not pay an officer, director or  employee of the entity an annual salary that ex-
ceeds the Governor’s annual salary for the preceding calendar year.
(E) May not, in any calendar year,  provide an officer, director or employee of the entity
benefits or any form of compensation in addition to the officer’s, director’s  or employee’s
salary the aggregate value of which is an amount that  exceeds 25 percent of the officer’s,
director’s or employee’s annual salary.
[(D)] (F) Annually, shall  arrange for an independent auditor to audit the entity’s financial
statements [ annually,] and shall direct the auditor to  file an audit opinion with the commission for
public review.
[(E)] (G) Annually,  shall file with the commission [ annually] the entity’s budget, action plan and
quarterly and annual reports for public review.
[(F)] (H) At least once every five years, shall contract for an independent management evalu-
ation to review the entity’s operations, efficiency and effectiveness[ ,] and shall direct the independ-
ent reviewer to file a report with the commission for public review.
(h) The commission may remove from the board of directors of a nongovernmental entity  an of-
ficer or director who fails to provide  an annual disclosure of economic interest  as described in
paragraph (g)(B) of this subsection,  or who fails to  declare an actual or potential  conflict of
interest[,] as described in  paragraph [ (g)(B) and (C) ] (g)(C) of this subsection, [ in connection with ]
if the failure is connected to  the allocation  or expenditure of funds collected through public pur-
pose charges and [ directed] paid to the entity.
(4)(a) An electric company that satisfies its obligations under this section [ shall have ]:
(A) Has  no further obligation to invest in new cost-effective local energy  conservation, new
market transformation or  new low-income weatherization or to provide a commercial energy con-
servation services program ; and
(B) Is not subject to ORS 469.631 to 469.645 and 469.860 to 469.900.
(b) Oregon Community Power, for any period during which Oregon Community  Power collects
a public purpose charge under subsection (2) of this section:
(A) [ Shall have ] Has no [ other] further obligation to invest in new cost-effective local energy
conservation, new market transformation or new low-income weatherization or to  provide a com-
mercial energy conservation services program; and
(B) Is not subject to ORS 469.631 to 469.645 and 469.860 to 469.900.
(5)(a) A retail electricity consumer that uses more  than one average megawatt of electricity at
any site in the prior year shall receive a credit  against public purpose charges billed by an electric
company or Oregon Community Power for that site. The amount of the credit  shall be equal to the
total amount of qualifying expenditures for new cost-effective local  energy conservation, not to
exceed 68 percent of the annual public purpose charges, and the above-market costs  [ of purchases ]
of new renewable energy  resources incurred by the retail electricity consumer, not to exceed 19
percent of the  annual public purpose charges, less administration costs incurred under this para-
graph and paragraphs (b) and (c) of  this subsection. The credit may not exceed, on an  annual
basis, the lesser of:
(A) The amount of the retail electricity consumer’s qualifying expenditures; or
(B) The portion of the public purpose charge billed to the retail electricity consumer  that is
dedicated to new  cost-effective local  energy conservation, new  market transformation or the
above-market costs of new renewable energy resources.
(b) To obtain a credit under paragraph (a) of  this subsection, a retail electricity consumer shall
[6]
SB 909
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
file with the State Department of Energy a description of the  proposed conservation project or new
renewable energy resource and a declaration that the retail electricity consumer  plans to incur the
qualifying expenditure. The  State Department of Energy shall issue a notice of precertification
within 30 days of receipt of the filing, if such filing is consistent with paragraph (a) of  this sub-
section. The credit may be taken after a retail electricity consumer provides to the State  Depart-
ment of  Energy  a letter from a certified public accountant [ to the State Department of Energy ]
verifying that the precertified qualifying expenditure has been made.
(c) Credits earned by a retail electricity consumer  as a result of qualifying expenditures that
are not used in one year may be carried forward for use in subsequent years.
(d)(A) A retail electricity consumer that uses more than one average megawatt of electricity  at
any site in the prior year may request that the State  Department of Energy hire an independent
auditor to assess the potential for conservation investments at the site.  If the independent auditor
determines there is  no available conservation measure at the site that would have a simple payback
of one to 10 years, the retail electricity consumer shall be relieved of 54 percent of its payment
obligation for public purpose charges related to the site. If the independent  auditor determines that
there are potential conservation measures available  at the site, the retail electricity consumer shall
be entitled to a credit against public purpose charges related to the site equal to 54  percent of the
public purpose charges less the estimated cost of available conservation measures.
(B) A retail electricity consumer shall be entitled each year to  the credit described in this
[subsection] paragraph unless  a subsequent independent audit determines that new conservation
investment opportunities are available. The State Department  of Energy may require that a new
independent audit be performed on the  site to determine whether new conservation measures are
available, provided that the independent audits [ shall] occur no more than once every two years.
(C) The retail electricity consumer shall pay the cost of the independent audits  described in this
[subsection] paragraph.
(6) Electric utilities and retail electricity consumers shall  receive a fair and reasonable credit
for the public purpose expenditures of  their energy suppliers. The State Department of Energy shall
adopt rules to determine eligible expenditures and the [ methodology] method by which such  credits
are accounted for and used. The  [ rules] State Department of Energy  also shall adopt methods to
account for eligible public purpose expenditures made through consortia or collaborative projects.
(7)(a) In addition to the public purpose charge  provided under subsection (2) of this section, an
electric company or Oregon Community Power  shall collect funds for low-income electric bill pay-
ment assistance in an amount [ determined] established under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The commission shall establish the amount to be  collected by each electric company in cal-
endar year 2008 from  retail electricity consumers served by the company, and the rates to be
charged to retail electricity consumers served by  the company, so that the total anticipated col-
lection for low-income electric bill  payment assistance by all electric companies in calendar year
2008 is $15  million. In calendar year 2009 and subsequent calendar years, the commission may not
change the rates established for retail electricity consumers, but the total amount collected  in a
calendar year for low-income electric bill payment assistance may vary  based on electricity usage
by retail electricity consumers and changes in the number of retail electricity  consumers in this
state. In no event shall a retail electricity consumer be required to  pay more than $500 per month
per site for low-income electric bill payment assistance.
(c) Funds collected [ by] through the  low-income electric bill payment assistance charge shall
be paid into the Housing and Community Services Department Low-Income  Electric Bill Payment
[7]
SB 909
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Assistance Fund established by ORS 456.587 (2). Moneys  deposited in the fund under this paragraph
shall be used by the Housing and  Community Services Department solely for [ the purpose of
funding] purposes related to  low-income electric bill payment assistance[ .] and  for  the Housing
and Community Services  Department’s cost of administering  this subsection . [ shall be paid out of
funds collected by the  low-income electric bill payment assistance charge. Moneys deposited in the fund
under this paragraph shall be expended solely for low-income electric bill payment assistance. ] Funds
collected [ from] by an  electric company or Oregon Community Power under this subsection  shall
be expended in the service area of the electric  company or Oregon Community Power from which
the funds are collected.
(d)(A) The Housing and Community  Services Department shall determine the manner in which
funds collected under this subsection will be allocated  by the Housing and Community Services
Department to energy assistance program providers for the purpose of providing low-income  bill
payment [ and crisis ] assistance.
(B) The Housing and Community Services  Department , in consultation with electric com-
panies, shall investigate and may implement  alternative delivery models [ in consultation with electric
companies] to effectively  reduce service disconnections and related costs to retail electricity con-
sumers and electric utilities.
(C) Priority assistance shall  be directed to low-income electricity consumers who are in danger
of having their electricity service disconnected.
(D) The Housing and Community Services  Department shall maintain  records and provide
those records upon request to an  electric company, Oregon Community Power and the Citizens’
Utility Board established under ORS chapter  774 on a quarterly basis. Records maintained must
include the numbers of low-income electricity consumers served, the  average amounts paid to low-
income electricity consumers  and the [ type] types of assistance provided to low-income elec-
tricity consumers . Electric companies and Oregon Community  Power shall, if requested, provide
the Housing and Community Services  Department with aggregate data relating to  low-income
electricity consumers served on a quarterly basis to support program development.
(e) Interest on moneys deposited in  the Housing and Community Services Department Low-
Income Electric Bill Payment Assistance Fund established by ORS 456.587 (2) may  be used to pro-
vide bill payment  [ and crisis ] assistance to electricity consumers whose primary source of heat is
not electricity.
(f) Notwithstanding  ORS 757.310, the commission may allow an electric company or Oregon
Community Power to provide  reduced rates or other  bill payment [ or crisis ] assistance or low-income
program assistance to a low-income household eligible for assistance under the federal Low Income
Home Energy Assistance Act of 1981, as amended and in effect on July 23, 1999.
(8) For purposes of this section, “retail electricity consumers” includes any direct service  in-
dustrial consumer that purchases electricity without purchasing distribution services from the  elec-
tric  utility.
(9) For purposes of this section, [ amounts] funds collected  by Oregon Community Power through
public purpose charges are not considered moneys received from electric utility operations.
SECTION 7.
The amendments to ORS 757.612 (3) by  section 6 of this 2017 Act apply to
agreements entered into  or renewed between the Public Utility Commission and nongovern-
mental entities on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
REMOVAL OF KLAMATH RIVER DAMS
[8]
SB 909
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 8. As used in this section and sections 9 and 10 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Customer” means a retail electricity customer of PacifiCorp that is located in  this
state.
(2) “Klamath River dam” means the J.C. Boyle Dam located  in Oregon, the Copco 1 Dam
located in California, the Copco 2 Dam located in California or the  Iron Gate Dam located in
California.
SECTION 9. ORS 757.732, 757.734, 757.736, 757.738, 757.740, 757.742 and 757.744 are repealed
on January 1, 2018, if the physical act of removing  a Klamath River dam has not begun on
or before December 31, 2017.
SECTION 10. (1) If the physical act of removing a  Klamath River dam has not begun on
or before December 31, 2017:
(a) On January 1, 2018, each trust account established by the Public  Utility Commission
under ORS 757.738 is abolished.
(b) All moneys in each trust account established by the commission under ORS  757.738
are transferred to the General Fund and are available for general governmental purposes.
(c) PacifiCorp shall credit the electric bill of each customer from which PacifiCorp col-
lected a surcharge pursuant to ORS 757.736 in an amount that  equals the total amount paid
by the customer to PacifiCorp as a surcharge  pursuant to ORS 757.736, plus four percent of
the total amount paid by the customer to  PacifiCorp as a surcharge pursuant to ORS 757.736.
(2) The commission shall adopt by rule a schedule  by which PacifiCorp must credit elec-
tric bills as described in subsection (1)(c) of this section. The schedule adopted under  this
subsection must require PacifiCorp to fully credit electric bills as described in subsection
(1)(c) of this section no later than January 1, 2019.
SUPERFUND SITES
SECTION 11.
Section 12 of this  2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 757.
SECTION 12. The Public Utility Commission may not  approve any rate schedule estab-
lished by a public utility that makes sales of electricity if the public utility is proposing to
use moneys  collected pursuant to the imposition of those rates for the purpose of remediat-
ing land listed pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 9605 as a national priority  for responding to the release
of hazardous substances, pollutants and contaminants on land.
NONCOMPETITION AGREEMENTS
SECTION 13.
Section 14 of this  2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 756.
SECTION 14. (1) For purposes described in ORS 653.295 (1)(c)(B), each  Public Utility
Commissioner and each employee of the Public  Utility Commission must enter into a non-
competition agreement with this state under which the commissioner or employee  may not
be subsequently employed by a public utility that makes sales of electricity.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by subsection (3) of  this section, a noncompetition
agreement entered into under  this section must comport with the standards and processes
set forth in ORS 653.295.
(3) The  term of a noncompetition agreement entered into under this section must be two
years.
[9]
SB 909
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
SECTION 15. Section 14 of this 2017 Act applies to Public  Utility Commissioners ap-
pointed on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act and employees of the  Public Utility
Commission hired on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
UNIT CAPTIONS
SECTION 16. The unit captions used in this 2017 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 17. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[10]