Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Staffing at Correctional Facilities is established.
(2) The task force consists of 12 members appointed as follows:
(a) The Governor shall appoint eight members as follows:
(A) Three law enforcement officers who are represented by a union;
(B) Three senior law enforcement officers who are  not represented by the union de-
scribed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph; and
(C) Two supervisors of a correctional facility.
(b) The President of the  Senate shall appoint two members from among the members of
the Senate, one from the majority party and one from the minority party.
(c) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall  appoint two members from among
the members of the House of Representatives, one from the majority party and one  from the
minority party.
(3) The task force shall review and make recommendations on the following:
(a) Rehiring on a  part-time basis retired corrections officers, as defined in ORS 181A.355.
(b) Staff safety at correctional facilities.
(c) Reducing use of overtime by corrections officers.
(d) Enhancing recruitment and retention operations for corrections officers.
(e) Requiring the Department  of Public Safety Standards and Training to provide paid
professional development and training services to corrections officers.
(f) Identifying options to receive reimbursement from local governments for the cost of
training corrections officers who are hired by the local government.
(g) Establishing a career  pathway for corrections officers to receive education and
training to become peace officers, as defined in ORS 420.905.
(4) The task force may consult with experts, hear testimony  from affected persons and
collect data and information necessary to carry out the task force’s duties.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1743
HB 2312
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
(5) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for  the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by  the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a report in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245, and may
include recommendations for legislation, to an interim committee of  the Legislative Assem-
bly related to the judiciary no later than December 15, 2026.
(12) The Department of Corrections shall provide staff support to the task force.
(13) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force  are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]