Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 316.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Child care expenses” has the meaning given that term in ORS 315.262.
(b) “Qualifying child” has the meaning given that  term in section 152(c) of the Internal
Revenue Code.
(2) There shall be subtracted  from federal taxable income any amount of child care ex-
penses paid by a taxpayer for care of a qualifying child during the tax year.
(3) A subtraction may not be allowed under this section for any amount that for the  tax
year is:
(a) Allowed as a credit under ORS 315.262; or
(b) Taken into account as a deduction on the taxpayer’s federal income tax return.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies to amounts paid in tax years beginning  on
or after January 1, 2025, and before January 1, 2031.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1013