Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on California’s Knox-Keene Health  Care Service Plan Act
of 1975 is established.
(2) The task force consists of seven members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate  shall appoint three members from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint four members  from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(3) The task  force shall study the provisions of California’s Knox-Keene Health Care
Service Plan Act of 1975 to determine the appropriateness and feasibility of adopting  any of
the provisions in this state.
(4) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(5) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the members
of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force may presession file legislation in the  manner provided in ORS 171.130
for interim committees. All legislation recommended by official action  of the task force must
indicate that it is introduced at the request of the task force.
(11) The task force shall report to the Legislative  Assembly in the manner provided in
ORS 192.245 at any time  within 30 days after its final meeting or at a time the President and
Speaker designate.
(12) The  Legislative Administrator may employ persons necessary for the performance
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1003
HB 2663
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
of the functions of the task force. The Legislative Administrator shall fix  the duties and
amounts of compensation of these employees. The task force  shall use the services of con-
tinuing legislative staff, without employing additional persons, to the greatest  extent practi-
cable.
(13) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to  confidentiality, to furnish the information and advice the members of the
task force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2017 Act is repealed on December 31, 2018.
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]