Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Electromagnetic Weapons is established.
(2) The Attorney General shall appoint to the task force 11 members  who are experts in
one or more of the following fields:
(a) Electromagnetic weaponry;
(b) Criminal justice; and
(c) Mental health.
(3) The task force  shall investigate usage of electromagnetic weapons in this state and
identify any gaps in the laws of this state regarding the usage  of these devices and potential
revisions to the laws of this state that would address those gaps.
(4) The task force may  make recommendations for legislation designed to ensure that the
laws of this state effectively regulate the usage of electromagnetic weapons.
(5) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the members
of the task force.
(7) The Attorney General shall select one member of the task force  to serve as chair-
person and another to serve as vice chairperson, for the terms and with the duties  and
powers necessary for the performance  of the functions of the offices as the Attorney General
determines.
(8) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the Attorney  General shall make an appointment
to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a report in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245, and may
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4184
HB 3756
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the  Legislative As-
sembly related to the judiciary no later than December 1, 2026.
(12) Members of the task  force serve as volunteers on the task force and, unless they
are qualified members, as defined in ORS 292.495,  are not entitled to compensation or re-
imbursement for expenses.
(13) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
(14) As used in this section, “electromagnetic weapon” means  a device that does, or that
was designed to, emit or radiate an electronic or electromagnetic  pulse, current, beam, sig-
nal or microwave intended to cause harm to others or cause damage to, destroy  or disrupt
any electronic or telecommunications system or device, including, but not limited to, a
computer, computer network or computer system.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
[2]