Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2026  Act is added to and made a part of sections 1 to 6,
chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding section 1 (2)(a) and (c) and (4)(a), chapter 25, Oregon Laws
2023, but otherwise subject to sections 1 to 6, chapter 25, Oregon  Laws 2023, the Oregon
Business Development Department and the Governor may award grants and  make loans
from moneys in the Oregon Fostering Innovation Strength at  Home and CHIPS Fund estab-
lished under section 6, chapter 25,  Oregon Laws 2023, to businesses that have not applied for
federal semiconductor financial assistance but that meet the definition of a covered entity.
SECTION 3.  Section 1, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023, as amended by section 6, chapter  89,
Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) As used in sections 1 to 6, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023:
(a) “Covered entity”  [ has the meaning given that term by 15 U.S.C. 4651(2) ] means a private
entity, a consortium of private entities or a consortium of nonprofit, public and private  en-
tities with a demonstrated  ability to substantially finance, construct, expand or modernize
a facility relating to fabrication, assembly, testing, advanced packaging, production or  re-
search and development for targeted industries, materials used for manufacturing  in tar-
geted industries or manufacturing equipment for targeted industries .
(b) “Covered incentive” has the meaning given that term by 15 U.S.C. 4651(3).
(c) “Federal semiconductor financial assistance” means assistance available under the  program
established pursuant to 15 U.S.C.  4652(a)(1) or 15 U.S.C. 4656(c) for financial assistance to the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 122
HB 4104
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
semiconductor industry.
(d) “Program grants and loans” means grants awarded and loans made under the program  de-
veloped by the Oregon Business Development Department pursuant to this section.
(e) “Targeted industry” means industries identified  by the Oregon Business Development
Department as providing the  State of Oregon with the best opportunities for growth, inno-
vation, high wages, competitiveness and statewide prosperity, including but  not limited to
metals and machinery, business services, food and beverages, forestry and wood  products,
high technology, bioscience and outdoor gear and apparel.
(2)(a) The Oregon Business Development Department shall  develop a program to award grants
and make loans from moneys in the Oregon Fostering Innovation Strength at Home and  CHIPS
Fund established under section 6, chapter 25,  Oregon Laws 2023, to businesses applying for federal
semiconductor financial assistance.
(b)(A) The  program shall be administered by the department and the Governor as set forth in
this section.
(B) Notwithstanding the  duties and powers conferred respectively on the department and the
Governor under sections 1 to 6, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023, the department and the Governor
may consult each other with respect to any duty or power so conferred.
(c) It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly that program grants and loans  be treated by the
United States Secretary of Commerce as covered incentives for purposes of the  federal semicon-
ductor financial assistance program.
(3)(a) Program grant and loan proceeds may be used solely for:
[(A) If a business’s application  for federal semiconductor financial assistance is approved, activities
undertaken in connection with the federal semiconductor financial assistance program; and ]
[(B) Regardless  of whether a business’s application for federal semiconductor financial assistance
is approved: ]
(A) If a business applies  for federal semiconductor financial assistance and is approved,
activities undertaken in connection with the  federal semiconductor financial assistance pro-
gram; and
(B) Regardless of whether a business applies for federal semiconductor  financial assist-
ance or is approved:
(i) The development of a site for a  semiconductor or other [ advanced manufacturing facility ]
targeted industry investment , including, but not limited to, the acquisition and aggregation  of
land;
(ii) Research and development with respect to semiconductors or [ advanced manufacturing] tar-
geted industries; or
(iii) Partnering with  institutions of higher education, including, but not limited to, historically
Black colleges and universities,  career technical training institutions, regional collaborative groups,
local  workforce  development boards as defined in ORS 660.300, programs funded through the federal
Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (P.L. 113-128)  and apprenticeship programs registered
with the State Apprenticeship and Training Council for the purpose of workforce development and
the creation of training, registered apprenticeship and internship opportunities, with respect  to
semiconductors or [ advanced manufacturing] targeted industries.
(b) Contractors and subcontractors on construction  projects funded by program grant or loan
proceeds must pay for such projects a rate of wage that meets or exceeds the greater of:
(A) The prevailing rate of wage for workers in each trade or occupation in each locality as de-
[2]
HB 4104
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
termined by the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries under ORS 279C.815; or
(B) The prevailing rate of wage as determined by the United States Secretary  of Labor under
the Davis-Bacon Act (40 U.S.C. 3141 et seq.).
(4)(a) A business that is a covered entity may apply to the department under section 2, chapter
25, Oregon Laws 2023, for a program grant or loan.
(b)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, program grants  and loans may
not be awarded or made to any applicant in an amount greater than $50 million.
(B) The Governor may  approve a program grant or loan under section 3, chapter 25, Oregon
Laws 2023, in an amount greater than $50 million only after having given the Legislative  Assembly
at least 30 calendar days’ notice of the amount of  the program grant or loan the Governor intends
to approve.
(c)(A) Program loans:
(i) May be made for a term not to exceed 10 years, as negotiated by the  business and, in con-
sultation with the Governor, the department; and
(ii) Except as provided in section 5 (3), chapter 25, Oregon Laws  2023, shall be made at a zero
rate of interest.
(B) All amounts received by the department in repayment of a program  loan shall be transferred
to the  Oregon Fostering Innovation Strength at Home and  CHIPS Fund established under section
6, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023.
(d) Proceeds from a program grant  or loan may be distributed in a single payment or in multiple,
conditional payments, as specified in the program grant or loan agreement.
(e)(A) Except as provided in paragraph (f) of this subsection, for  every $1 million in program
grant or loan proceeds received, the recipient  business must, over the period of the grant or loan
agreement, generate at least:
(i) If the term of the agreement  is not more than five years, $1.25 million in state and local re-
venue; or
(ii) If the term of the  agreement is more than five years, $1.5 million in state and local revenue.
(B) The department and the recipient business may specify in the program grant  or loan agree-
ment what the term “revenue” includes.
(f) In lieu of the requirement under paragraph (e) of this subsection, a recipient  business may
instead commit to the creation of new jobs in Oregon:
(A) At least 65 percent of which are permanent, full-time positions; and
(B) That pay on average  at least the average median income for the region of this state in which
the services will be performed.
[(g)(A) In addition to program grants and loans, an application assistance grant, in an amount  not
to exceed  $50,000, may be awarded to a business whose application is approved under section 3, chapter
25, Oregon Laws 2023, for the costs of preparing and submitting the business’s application  for federal
semiconductor financial assistance. ]
[(B) Application assistance grants may be  made from moneys in the fund or from any other source
of funding available for such purpose to the department or the Governor. ]
[(5) Program grants receiving federal semiconductor financial assistance under 15 U.S.C. 4656(c)
are exempt from: ]
[(a) Subsection (4)(e) and (f) of this section; ]
[(b) Section 2 (1)(b)(G), chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023; and ]
[(c) Section 5 (1)(a)(C), chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023. ]
[3]
HB 4104
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 4.
 Section 2, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1)(a) The Oregon Business Development Department shall prescribe an application pro-
cess, including forms and  deadlines, by which businesses may apply under this section for program
grants and loans.
(b) At a minimum, the application form must require the applicant business to:
[(A) Establish its eligibility to be treated by  the United States Secretary of Commerce as a covered
entity;]
[(B) Include its statement of interest or draft application for federal semiconductor financial as-
sistance;]
[(C)] (A) [ Explain] Execute an affidavit attesting  how  the applicant business plans to comply
with all applicable federal and state  employment, labor and environmental standards;
[(D)] (B) Explain how the proposed activities of  the applicant business will promote the expan-
sion and long-term economic  viability of the [ semiconductor] applicable targeted industry in Oregon,
including research and development, manufacturing and  other critical links in the [ semiconductor]
supply chain;
[(E)] (C) State the amount of program grant or loan proceeds sought under this  section along
with a detailed description of the proposed expenditure of the proceeds;
[(F) If the application includes a request for an  application assistance grant, state the amount of
the application assistance grant sought  and demonstrate the applicant business’s need for the applica-
tion assistance grant; ]
[(G)] (D)  Explain how the applicant business will  meet the requirements under section 1 (4)(e)
or (f) , chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023 [of this 2023 Act ], setting forth at a minimum such information
as:
(i) For state and local revenue, the kinds, amounts and timing of the revenue to  be generated;
or
(ii) For job creation, [ such information as ] the  number, job descriptions, weekly hours, pay scale
and locations of the proposed jobs;
[(H)] (E)  Include any other information that the department or the Governor considers neces-
sary or important for review of the application; and
[(I)] (F)  Sign the application through an authorized director, officer, employee or agent under
penalties for false swearing.
(2)(a) Upon  request, the department may consult with an applicant business about the business’s
application, before or after submission.
(b) An applicant business  may amend and resubmit its application at any time within the appli-
cation period.
(3) Trade secrets, as defined in ORS 646.461,  that are submitted to the department as part of an
application under this section shall be exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478 until
January 1, [ 2027] 2030.
SECTION 5.
 Section 3, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1)(a) The Oregon  Business Development Department and the Governor shall review all
timely and complete applications for program grants and loans, with such distribution  of duties and
powers as the department and the Governor may arrange.
(b) Within 90 days following receipt of an application, the department and the Governor shall:
(A) Approve the application;
(B) Approve the application for a program grant or loan[ , or application assistance grant, ] in  an
[4]
HB 4104
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
amount other than the amount requested; or
(C) Reject the entire application [ or only the request for an application assistance grant ].
[(c) For a program grant or loan in an amount greater than $50 million, the Governor shall provide
notice to the Legislative Assembly in accordance with section 1 (4)(b)(B) of this 2023 Act. ]
[(d)] (c) The decisions made with respect to an application are not subject to appeal.
(2) In approving applications and setting program grant and loan amounts, the  department and
the Governor shall give preference to:
[(a) Projects that  will promote the expansion and long-term economic viability of the semiconductor
industry in Oregon, including research and development, manufacturing and other critical links in the
semiconductor supply chain; ]
[(b) Projects that will promote and extend Oregon’s leadership in the field of technology; ]
(a) Projects that will promote the expansion and long-term economic viability of  semi-
conductors and targeted industries in Oregon, including  research and development, manu-
facturing and supply chains;
(b) Projects that will promote and extend  Oregon in the fields of technology and manu-
facturing;
(c) Projects that will attract manufacturing jobs to Oregon;
(d) Projects that will  secure supply in Oregon for [ critical sectors of the state economy ] semi-
conductors or targeted industries ;
(e) Projects that reflect an applicant business’s  established relationship, or commitment to build
a relationship, with organizations focused on developing a diverse workforce pipeline;
(f) Applicant businesses that have at least [ 10] five full-time employees in Oregon;
(g) Applicant  businesses that have formed partnerships for the purpose of workforce develop-
ment or the creation of training, registered apprenticeship or internship opportunities; and
[(h)(A) Applicant businesses that commit  to generating a greater amount of state and local revenue
in accordance with section 1 (4)(e) of this 2023 Act; or ]
[(B) Applicant businesses that commit to creating a higher percentage of  new permanent full-time
jobs in accordance with section 1 (4)(f) of this 2023 Act; ]
[(i) Applications that propose projects described in 15 U.S.C. 4652(a)(2)(B)(i) that  will incorporate
significant participation by businesses owned by members of underrepresented communities  and eco-
nomically disadvantaged individuals; and ]
[(j)] (h) Applications that, taken together, represent regional diversity in Oregon.
(3)(a) As soon as practicable after making decisions under subsection (1) of  this section, the
department shall:
(A) Notify the applicant business of the decision and the reasons for the decision; and
(B) For an approved application, offer to the applicant business a program grant or  loan agree-
ment [and, if applicable, an application assistance grant ].
(b) Upon entering into a program grant or loan agreement with the applicant business,  the de-
partment shall  distribute to the business from the Oregon Fostering Innovation Strength at Home
and CHIPS Fund established under section 6 , chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023,  [of this 2023 Act ] the
amount set forth in the agreement.
(4)(a) If a business that has entered into an agreement pursuant  to this section changes owner-
ship during the  term of the agreement, the department and the Governor may allow the continued
use of the program grant or loan proceeds provided the business enters into a  new agreement with
the department that commits  the business to continuing the project as proposed in the application
[5]
HB 4104
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
approved under this section.
(b) In the new  agreement, the department may agree to minor changes in the terms of the ori-
ginal agreement that the department and the Governor [ considers] consider reasonable in the cir-
cumstances and faithful to the purpose for which the business’s application was approved.
SECTION 6.
 Section 4, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  (1) At least once every six months following the date on  which a business enters into
a program grant or loan agreement with the Oregon Business Development Department under sec-
tion 3 , chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023  [ of this  2023 Act ], for as long as the agreement is in effect,
the business shall report to the department the following:
(a) The status of the business’s application for federal semiconductor financial assistance;
(b) Progress on the project  to construct, expand or modernize the facility for which the grant
was awarded or the  loan made, including, but not limited to, the acquisition or aggregation of land
and the status of the permits required for the project;
(c)(A) State and local revenue generated in accordance  with section 1 (4)(e) , chapter 25,
Oregon Laws 2023  [ of this 2023 Act ], setting forth at a minimum  the kinds, amounts and timing of
the revenue generated, as well as of any proposed revenue yet to be generated; or
(B) The number of jobs created in accordance with section 1 (4)(f) , chapter 25, Oregon Laws
2023, [ of this 2023 Act ] and the job descriptions, weekly hours, pay scale and  locations of the jobs,
as well as of jobs yet to be created;
(d) Any research and development work conducted with  respect to semiconductors or [ advanced
manufacturing] targeted industries;
(e) Any  partnerships the business has engaged in with institutions of higher education or re-
gional workforce programs for the purpose  of workforce development and the creation of training,
registered apprenticeship and internship opportunities;
(f) The status of any other  consideration for which the business’s application was given prefer-
ence under section 3 (2) , chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023  [ of this 2023 Act ];
(g) The economic impact of the project on businesses in  this state, including, but not limited to,
the impact on supply chains;
(h) The economic and environmental impact of the project on communities in this state; and
(i) Any other information required by the department or the Governor.
(2) Not later  than March 15 and September 15 of each year in which any program grant or loan
agreement remains  in effect, the department shall submit to the Oregon Business Development
Commission established under ORS 285A.040 a report summarizing the  semiannual information re-
ceived from businesses pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Not later than September 15 of  each year in which any program grant or loan agreement
remains in effect, the department shall submit, in the manner required under ORS 192.245,  a report
summarizing the information received from businesses pursuant to subsection (1) of  this section, to
the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to economic development.
SECTION 7.
 Section 5, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  (1)(a) A business that received a program grant or loan[ , including an application  as-
sistance grant, ] shall become liable for immediate repayment of the full amount of the grant  or the
outstanding principal amount of the loan, if:
(A) The business has not begun, on or  before January 1, [ 2027] 2030, the process of applying for
permits required for the project for which the grant was awarded or the loan made;
(B) The project changes substantially from the project for which  the business’s application was
[6]
HB 4104
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
approved such that the project would not have been eligible for the program grant or loan;
(C) On  or before the earlier of a date, if any, specified in the program grant or loan agreement
or January 1, [ 2033] 2036:
(i) The business has not generated state and local revenue in accordance with section 1 (4)(e) ,
chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023  [ of this 2023 Act ]; or
(ii) The  business has not created new permanent full-time jobs in accordance with section 1
(4)(f), chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023  [ of this 2023 Act ];
(D) The business has not complied  with all environmental standards applicable to the project
under law or has not cured its noncompliance within a  reasonable time, as determined by the
Oregon Business Development Department or the Governor; or
(E) The business has not complied with all labor standards  applicable to the project under law
or the program grant or  loan agreement or has not cured its noncompliance within a reasonable
time, as determined by the department or the Governor.
(b) If a project is suspended for a reason beyond the control of the business, as determined  by
the department or the Governor, the amount to be repaid shall be in proportion to the  percentage
of the project that has not been completed at the time of suspension.
(2) Any and all amounts required to be repaid under this section shall be considered to  be liq-
uidated and delinquent, and the Oregon Business  Development Department shall assign such
amounts to the Department of Revenue for collection as provided in ORS 293.250.
(3) If the Oregon Business Development Department or the Governor discovers  that a business
willfully made a false statement or misrepresentation, or willfully failed to report a material  fact,
to obtain  a program grant or loan[ , or an application assistance grant, ] under sections 1 to 6 ,
chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023  [ of this 2023 Act ], the Oregon Business Development Department
may add to the amount the business is obligated to repay a penalty not to  exceed 20 percent of the
principal amount of the program grant or loan so obtained, plus any applicable interest  and fees
associated with the Department of Revenue’s costs of collection.
(4) Subject  to ORS 293.250, all amounts repaid to the Oregon Business Development Department
or the Department of Revenue under this section, including award amounts, penalties, interest,  fees
and any other charges, shall be  transferred to the Oregon  Fostering Innovation Strength at
Home and CHIPS Fund established under section 6 , chapter  25, Oregon Laws 2023  [ of this 2023
Act].
SECTION 8.
 Section 6, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023, as amended by section 5, chapter 81,
Oregon Laws 2024, and section 7, chapter 89, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  (1) The Oregon Fostering Innovation Strength  at Home and  CHIPS Fund is estab-
lished in the  State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the
Oregon  Fostering Innovation Strength at Home and  CHIPS Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts  appropriated or otherwise transferred or credited to the fund by the Legislative
Assembly;
(b) Earnings received on moneys in the fund; and
(c) Other moneys, or proceeds of property, from any public or private  source that are trans-
ferred, donated or otherwise credited to the fund.
(3) Moneys in the  Oregon Fostering Innovation Strength at Home and  CHIPS Fund are
continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Development Department for the  following pur-
poses:
[7]
HB 4104
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Paying the  actual costs incurred by the department in developing and administering sections
1 to 6, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023;
(b) Carrying out the provisions of sections 1 to 6, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023;
(c) Transferring moneys to the Semiconductor Talent Sustaining  Fund established under section
2, chapter 89, Oregon Laws 2024  [ of this 2024 Act ]; and
(d) Transferring moneys to the CHIPS Child Care Fund established under [ section 3 of this  2024
Act] ORS 329A.743 for the purpose of carrying out [ section 2 of this 2024 Act ] ORS 329A.740.
[(4) Moneys in the Oregon CHIPS Fund on June 30, 2023,  shall be retained in the fund, and used
for the purposes set forth in subsection (3) of this section, until June 30, 2025. ]
[(5) Any moneys remaining in the Oregon CHIPS Fund on June 30, 2025,  shall be transferred to
the General Fund. ]
SECTION 9.
 ORS 329A.743, as amended by section 3a, chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
329A.743. (1) The CHIPS Child Care  Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the CHIPS Child Care Fund shall be credited
to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously  appropriated to the Oregon Business Development De-
partment for the following purposes:
(a) Paying the actual  costs incurred by the department to develop and administer this section
and ORS 329A.740; and
(b) Carrying out this section and ORS 329A.740, including  transferring moneys to the Bureau
of Labor and Industries to develop and administer the program described in ORS 329A.740.
(3) The Oregon Business Development Department may transfer moneys  deposited in the fund
to the Child Care Infrastructure Fund established under ORS 329A.725. Moneys transferred under
this subsection shall be used by the department to provide  financial assistance under ORS 329A.727
for the purposes of increasing child  care infrastructure in geographic areas in this state
where semiconductor or other targeted industry facilities are presently located  or scheduled
to be constructed under sections 1 to 6, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023 .
(4) The Oregon Business Development Department shall administer the CHIPS Child  Care Fund
in consultation with the Bureau of Labor and Industries.
(5) The fund shall consist of moneys credited to the fund, including:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Moneys transferred to the fund by the Oregon Business Development Department;
(c) Moneys transferred from  the Oregon Fostering Innovation Strength at Home and
CHIPS Fund established in section 6, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023;
[(c)] (d) Moneys contributed to the CHIPS Child Care  Fund by businesses that receive a pro-
gram grant or loan under section 3, chapter 25, Oregon Laws  2023, [ and] or  federal semiconductor
financial assistance, as defined in section 1, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023;
[(d)] (e) Earnings on moneys in the fund;
[(e)] (f) Moneys received from the federal or state government; and
[(f)] (g) Moneys from any other public or private source.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 329A.743,  as amended by section 3a, chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2024, and
section 9 of this 2026 Act, is amended to read:
329A.743. (1) The CHIPS Child Care  Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the CHIPS Child Care Fund shall be credited
[8]
HB 4104
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously  appropriated to the Oregon Business Development De-
partment for the following purposes:
(a) Paying the actual  costs incurred by the department to develop and administer this section
and ORS 329A.740; and
(b) Carrying out this section and ORS 329A.740, including  transferring moneys to the Bureau
of Labor and Industries to develop and administer the program described in ORS 329A.740.
(3) The Oregon Business Development Department may transfer moneys  deposited in the fund
to the Child Care Infrastructure Fund established under ORS 329A.725. Moneys transferred under
this subsection shall be used by the department to provide  financial assistance under ORS 329A.727
[for the purposes of increasing child care infrastructure in geographic areas in this state where semi-
conductor or other targeted industry facilities are presently  located or scheduled to be constructed un-
der sections 1 to 6, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023 ].
(4) The Oregon Business Development Department shall administer the CHIPS Child  Care Fund
in consultation with the Bureau of Labor and Industries.
(5) The fund shall consist of moneys credited to the fund, including:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Moneys transferred to the fund by the Oregon Business Development Department;
[(c) Moneys transferred from the Oregon Fostering Innovation Strength at Home  and CHIPS Fund
established in section 6, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023; ]
[(d) Moneys contributed to the  CHIPS Child Care Fund by businesses that receive a program grant
or loan under section 3, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023,  or federal semiconductor financial assistance,
as defined in section 1, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023; ]
[(e)] (c) Earnings on moneys in the fund;
[(f)] (d) Moneys received from the federal or state government; and
[(g)] (e) Moneys from any other public or private source.
SECTION 11.
The amendments to ORS 329A.743 by section 10 of  this 2026 Act become
operative on January 1, 2036.
SECTION 12. Section 10, chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2024, is repealed.
SECTION 13.  Section 7, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  [ Sections 1 to 6 of this 2023 Act are repealed on January 2, 2033. ]
(1) Section 1, chapter 25, Oregon  Laws 2023, as amended by section 6, chapter 89, Oregon
Laws 2024, and section 3 of this 2026 Act, is repealed on January 2, 2036.
(2) Section 1a, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023, is repealed on January 2, 2036.
(3) Section 2, chapter 25,  Oregon Laws 2023, as amended by section 4 of this 2026 Act, is
repealed on January 2, 2036.
(4) Section 3, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023, as amended by section 5 of  this 2026 Act, is
repealed on January 2, 2036.
(5) Section 4, chapter 25,  Oregon Laws 2023, as amended by section 6 of this 2026 Act, is
repealed on January 2, 2036.
(6) Section 5, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023, as amended by section 7 of  this 2026 Act, is
repealed on January 2, 2036.
(7) Section 6, chapter 25, Oregon  Laws 2023, as amended by section 5, chapter 81, Oregon
Laws 2024, section 7, chapter 89, Oregon Laws 2024,  and section 8 of this 2026 Act, is repealed
on January 2, 2036.
[9]
HB 4104
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
(8) Section 2 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2036.
SECTION 14.
Section 2 of this 2026 Act  and the amendments to sections 1, 2, 3, 4, 5 and
6, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023, by sections 3 to 8 of this 2026 Act  apply to applications for
grants and loans filed  under section 2, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023, on or after the effective
date of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 15. (1) The amendments to section 6, chapter 25, Oregon  Laws 2023, by section
8 of this 2026 Act are intended to  change the name of the “Oregon CHIPS Fund” to the
“Oregon Fostering Innovation Strength at Home and CHIPS Fund.”
(2) For the purpose of  harmonizing and clarifying statutory law, the Legislative Counsel
may substitute for words designating the “Oregon CHIPS Fund,”  wherever they occur in
statutory law, other words designating the “Oregon  Fostering Innovation Strength at Home
and CHIPS Fund.”
SECTION 16. (1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, and except  as
provided in  subsection (2) of this section, the amount of $  is established for the
biennium ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses by the Oregon
Business Development Department from the Oregon  Fostering Innovation Strength at Home
and CHIPS Fund established under section 6, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023.
(2) The limitation established under subsection (1) of this section  does not include
expenditures of moneys in the Oregon Fostering Innovation Strength at Home  and CHIPS
Fund that are obligated as of June 30, 2025, for existing  projects authorized under sections
1 to 6, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2023.
SECTION 17. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[10]