Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any authorization  to issue general obligation
bonds under ORS 286A.035, in the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, the State  Treasurer shall
issue general obligation bonds authorized under Article XI, section 7, of the Oregon Consti-
tution, in an amount that produces $75,000,000 of net proceeds  for the Hood River-White
Salmon Bridge replacement project, plus an amount estimated by the State Treasurer to pay
bond-related costs.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1582
HB 2184
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any authorization  to issue general obligation
bonds under ORS 286A.035, in the biennium beginning July 1, 2027, the State  Treasurer shall
issue general obligation bonds authorized under Article XI, section 7, of the Oregon Consti-
tution, in an amount that produces $30,000,000 of net proceeds  for the Hood River-White
Salmon Bridge replacement project, plus an amount estimated by the State Treasurer to pay
bond-related costs.
[2]