Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision shall  study changes
to procedures for the early medical release  of adults in custody. The board shall submit a
report in  the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legis-
lation, to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary no
later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2882