Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding any other law, if a state agency is directed or authorized
to provide moneys to a county to be used,  in whole or in part, for a capital construction
project, the state agency may not provide the moneys unless  the county attests, in a manner
described in subsection (2) of this  section, that the county will remain a county within the
State of Oregon:
(a) If the moneys to be provided are the proceeds of bonds,  until the maturity of the
bonds; or
(b) If the moneys to be provided are not the proceeds of bonds, for 40 years.
(2) The attestation required under subsection (1) of this section may be made by:
(a) A notarized letter signed by a majority of the  members of the governing board of the
county; or
(b) The passage of a resolution.
(3) The requirements of this section  are in addition to any other requirements imposed
by law in connection with state funding to counties.
(4) As used in this section, “capital construction”  means the construction, modification,
replacement, repair, remodeling or renovation of a structure,  or addition to a structure, that
is expected to have a useful life of more than one year.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1776