Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 90.300 is amended to read:
90.300. (1) As used in this section, “security deposit” includes any last month’s rent deposit.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise  provided in  subsections (4), (5) and (8) of  this section, a landlord
may require a tenant to pay a security deposit. [ The landlord shall provide the tenant with a receipt
for any security deposit the tenant pays. ]
(b) The landlord shall hold a security deposit or prepaid rent for the tenant who is a  party to
the rental agreement.
(c) The landlord shall deposit and maintain the security deposit paid by  the tenant di-
rectly into  a federally insured account that earns interest and is separate from all other
funds.
(d) The landlord shall provide the tenant with a receipt for any security deposit  the ten-
ant pays. The receipt must state the amount of the security deposit  and the financial insti-
tution in which the security deposit is held.
(e) A tenant’s claim to the security deposit or prepaid rent is  prior to the claim of a creditor
of the landlord, including a trustee in bankruptcy.
[(b)] (f)  Except as provided  in ORS 86.782 (10), the holder of the landlord’s interest in the
premises at the time the tenancy terminates is responsible to the tenant  for any security deposit or
prepaid rent and is bound by this section.
(3) A written rental agreement, if any, must list a security deposit paid by a  tenant or required
by a landlord.
(4) A landlord may not charge a tenant a pet security deposit for  keeping a service animal or
companion animal that a tenant with a disability requires as  a reasonable accommodation under fair
housing laws.
(5)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this  subsection, a landlord may not change the rental
agreement to require the tenant to pay a new  or increased security deposit during the first year
after the tenancy has  begun. Subject to subsection (4) of this section, the landlord may require an
additional deposit if the landlord and tenant agree to modify the terms and conditions of the rental
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3274
HB 3366
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
agreement to permit a pet or for other cause and the additional deposit relates to the  modification.
This paragraph does not prevent a landlord from collecting a security deposit that  an initial rental
agreement provided for but that remained unpaid at the time the tenancy began.
(b) If a landlord  requires a new or increased security deposit after the first year of the tenancy,
the landlord shall allow the tenant at least three months to pay the new or increased deposit.
(6) The landlord may claim all or part of the security deposit only if the  landlord required the
security deposit for any or all of the purposes specified in subsection (7) of this section.
(7)(a) The landlord may claim from the security deposit only the amount reasonably necessary:
(A) To remedy the tenant’s defaults in the performance  of the rental agreement including, but
not limited to, unpaid rent; and
(B) To repair damages to  the premises caused by the tenant, not including ordinary wear and
tear.
(b) A landlord is not required to repair damage caused by the tenant in order for  the landlord
to claim against the deposit  for the cost to make the repair. Any labor costs the landlord assesses
under this subsection for cleaning or repairs must be based on  a reasonable hourly rate. The land-
lord may charge a reasonable hourly rate for  the landlord’s own performance of cleaning or repair
work.
(c) Defaults and damages for which a landlord may recover under  this subsection include, but
are not limited to:
(A) Carpet cleaning, other than the use of a common vacuum cleaner, if:
(i) The cleaning is performed by use of  a machine specifically designed for cleaning or
shampooing carpets;
(ii) The carpet was cleaned or replaced after the  previous tenancy or the most recent significant
use of the carpet and before the tenant took possession; and
(iii) The written rental agreement provides that the  landlord may deduct the cost of carpet
cleaning regardless of whether the tenant cleans  the carpet before the tenant delivers possession
as described in ORS 90.147.
(B) Loss of use of the dwelling unit  during the performance of necessary cleaning or repairs for
which the tenant is responsible under this subsection if the cleaning or repairs  are performed in a
timely manner.
(8) A landlord may not require a tenant to pay or to forfeit a security deposit or  prepaid rent
to the landlord for the tenant’s failure to  maintain a tenancy for a minimum number of months in
a month-to-month tenancy.
(9) The landlord must apply any last month’s rent deposit to the rent due  for the last month of
the tenancy:
(a) When either the landlord or the tenant  gives to the other a notice of termination, pursuant
to this chapter, other than a notice of termination under ORS 90.394;
(b) When the landlord and tenant agree to terminate the tenancy; or
(c) When the tenancy terminates in accordance with the provisions of a  written rental agree-
ment for a term tenancy.
(10) A  landlord shall account for and refund as provided in subsections (12) to (14) of this section
any portion of a last month’s rent deposit the landlord does not apply as  provided under subsection
(9) of this section. Unless the tenant and landlord agree otherwise, the  tenant may not require the
landlord to apply a last month’s rent deposit to rent due for any period other than the last  month
of the tenancy. A last  month’s rent deposit does not limit the amount of rent charged unless a
[2]
HB 3366
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
written rental agreement provides otherwise.
(11) When the tenancy terminates, a landlord shall account for and refund to the tenant, in the
same manner this section requires for security deposits, the unused balance  of any prepaid rent the
landlord has not previously refunded  to the tenant under ORS 90.380 and 105.120 (5)(b) or any other
provision of this chapter. The landlord may claim from the remaining prepaid rent only the amount
reasonably necessary to pay the tenant’s unpaid rent.
(12) In order to claim all or part of any  prepaid rent or security deposit, within 31 days after
the tenancy terminates and the tenant  delivers possession the landlord shall give to the tenant a
written accounting that states specifically the basis or  bases of the claim. The landlord shall give
a separate accounting for security deposits and for prepaid rent.
(13)(a) The landlord shall return to the tenant the security deposit or prepaid rent or the por-
tion of the security deposit or prepaid  rent that the landlord does not claim in the manner provided
by subsections (11) and (12) of this section not later than 31  days after the tenancy terminates and
the tenant delivers possession to the landlord.
(b) The  landlord shall include with the returned security deposit or portion of the secu-
rity deposit an amount equal to any accrued interest on the security deposit.
(14) The landlord shall give the written  accounting required under subsection (12) of this section
or shall return the security deposit or prepaid rent as required  by subsection (13) of this section by
personal delivery or by first class mail.
(15) If a security deposit or  prepaid rent secures a tenancy for a space for a manufactured
dwelling or floating home the tenant owns and occupies, whether  or not in a facility, and the
dwelling or home  is abandoned as described in ORS 90.425 (2) or 90.675 (2), the 31-day period de-
scribed in subsections (12) and (13) of this section commences on the earliest of:
(a) Waiver of the abandoned property process under ORS 90.425 (26) or 90.675 (23);
(b) Removal of the manufactured dwelling or floating home from the rented space;
(c) Destruction or other disposition  of the manufactured dwelling or floating home under ORS
90.425 (10)(b) or 90.675 (10)(b); or
(d) Sale of the manufactured dwelling or floating home pursuant to ORS 90.425 (10)(a) or  90.675
(10)(a).
(16) If the landlord fails to comply  with subsection (13) of this section or if the landlord in bad
faith fails to return all or any portion of any prepaid rent or security deposit due to the  tenant
under this chapter  or the rental agreement, the tenant may recover the money due in an amount
equal to twice the amount:
(a) Withheld without a written accounting under subsection (12) of this section; or
(b) Withheld in bad faith.
(17)(a) A security deposit or prepaid rent in the possession  of the landlord is not garnishable
property, as provided in ORS 18.618.
(b) If a landlord delivers  a security deposit or prepaid rent to a garnishor in violation of ORS
18.618 (1)(b), the landlord that delivered  the security deposit or prepaid rent to the garnishor shall
allow the tenant at least 30 days after a copy of  the garnishee response required by ORS 18.680 is
delivered  to  the tenant under ORS 18.690 to restore the security deposit or prepaid rent. If the
tenant fails to restore  a security deposit or prepaid rent under the provisions of this paragraph be-
fore the tenancy terminates, and the landlord retains no security  deposit or prepaid rent from the
tenant after the garnishment, the landlord is  not required to refund or account for the security de-
posit or prepaid rent under subsection (11) of this section.
[3]
HB 3366
1
2
3
4
5
(18) This section does not preclude  the landlord or tenant from recovering other damages under
this chapter.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 90.300 by section 1 of this 2017 Act apply to security
deposits paid by tenants on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
[4]