Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Covered entity” has the meaning given that term in 42 U.S.C. 256b(a)(4).
(b) “Manufacturer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 646A.689.
(c) “340B drug” means a drug that has been subject to an offer  of a reduced price by a
manufacturer pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 256b and is purchased by a covered entity.
(d) “Utilization review” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.001.
(2) A manufacturer or third party on behalf of a manufacturer may not:
(a) Deny, restrict, prohibit or otherwise interfere directly  or indirectly with the acquisi-
tion of a 340B drug, delivery of a 340B drug to  or dispensation of a 340B drug by a pharmacy
that has contracted with a covered entity to receive  and dispense 340B drugs on behalf of the
covered entity in this state unless the  acquisition delivery or dispensation is prohibited by
the United states Department of Health and Human Services.
(b) Require, either directly or indirectly, a covered entity to submit a claim or utilization
review data as a condition for the  acquisition of a 340B drug by, delivery of a 340B drug to
or dispensation of a 340B drug by a pharmacy that has contracted with  a covered entity to
receive and dispense 340B  drugs on behalf of the covered entity in this state unless the
claims or utilization review data submission is required by the  United States Department of
Health and Human Services.
SECTION 2.
In addition to any other  penalty provided by law, the State Board of Phar-
macy may impose a civil penalty, in the manner provided in  ORS 183.745, not to exceed $5,000
per day on a manufacturer for each violation of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1148