Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall study the issue of liquor agent
compensation for distillery tasting room sales, and shall report recommendations to the
Legislative Assembly on or before September 1, 2020.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2019 Act is repealed on December 1, 2020.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1191