Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 468B.525 is amended to read:
468B.525. (1) The Seismic Risk Mitigation Fund is established  in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by  the Seismic Risk Mitigation Fund shall be
credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Seismic Risk Mitigation Fund shall consist of:
(a) Money appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Fees deposited in the fund under ORS 468B.513;
(c) Moneys transferred to the fund from the federal or state government; or
(d) Gifts, grants and donations received from any source.
(3) [All] Moneys  in the Seismic Risk Mitigation Fund are continuously appropriated to the De-
partment of Environmental Quality for the purposes [ of] described in  subsection (4) of this sec-
tion, except:
(a) Fees deposited in the fund  under ORS 468B.513 are continuously appropriated to the
department solely for the purpose of reviewing seismic risk mitigation implementation plans
submitted under ORS 468B.513 and seismic risk assessments submitted under ORS 468B.510; and
(b) Moneys made available by the federal government specifically for the purposes  de-
scribed in ORS 468B.513 (2)(k) are continuously appropriated to the department  solely for the
purpose of  providing grants  or other financial assistance to owners or operators of bulk oils or
liquid fuels terminals under ORS 468B.513 (2)(k).
(4) Moneys in  the Seismic Risk Mitigation Fund, other than moneys described in sub-
section (3) of this section, are continuously appropriated to  the department for the purposes
of supporting activities carried out by state and  local government agencies, businesses or
individuals to plan and prepare for the  consequences of an earthquake, which may include
but need not be limited to:
(a) Providing grants or other financial assistance for planning  and preparedness efforts
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2469
HB 2151
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
related to fires that could  be caused by oil or liquid fuels spilled as the result of an earth-
quake;
(b) Providing grants or other financial assistance to support earthquake emergency re-
sponse and evacuation route planning; and
(c) Transfer to the Oregon Department of Emergency Management to support earth-
quake early detection and alert activities.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]