Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force  on Licensed Health Care Services in Oregon Schools is
established.
(2) The task force consists of 13 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint one  member from among the members of
the Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from among
the members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Director of the Department of Education shall appoint 11 members as follows:
(A) Five members who represent licensed  health care providers, are employed by schools
or who have expertise in the delivery of health care services in schools and who are:
(i) An occupational therapist licensed under ORS 675.210 to 675.340;
(ii) A physical therapist licensed under ORS 688.010 to 688.201;
(iii) A speech-language pathologist licensed under ORS chapter 681;
(iv) A registered nurse licensed under ORS 678.010 to 678.410; and
(v) A qualified mental health professional;
(B) Five members representing health professional regulatory boards  that regulate li-
censed health care providers who are employed in schools, school districts or education ser-
vice districts to provide health care services and who are:
(i) An occupational therapist licensed under ORS 675.210 to 675.340;
(ii) A physical therapist licensed under ORS 688.010 to 688.201;
(iii) A speech-language pathologist licensed under ORS chapter 681;
(iv) A registered nurse licensed under ORS 678.010 to 678.410; and
(v) A qualified mental health professional; and
(C) One member who  represents the Department of Education and who has knowledge
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1120
HB 2423
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of or experience with health care services provided by schools, school districts  and education
service districts.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Examine the scope of practice for each type of licensed  health care provider who is
employed by a school,  school district or education service district to provide health care
services;
(b) Examine current policies and procedures  adopted by schools, school districts and ed-
ucation service  districts regarding the employment duties for the licensed health care pro-
viders described in paragraph (a) of this subsection in relation to the scope of practice for
the licensed health care providers;
(c) Establish criteria to determine when the policies  and procedures described in this
subsection are inconsistent with  the scopes of practice for licensed health care providers
described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(d) Provide recommendations for ensuring the policies and procedures described in  this
subsection and the employment duties  for licensed health care providers described in para-
graph (a) of this subsection are consistent with the scopes of practice for the licensed  health
care providers;
(e) Provide  recommendations to health professional licensing boards regarding the
adoption of rules that support the practice of the health professions in school settings; and
(f) Examine electronic health records systems, or characteristics of  electronic health
records systems, that a school, school district or education service district could adopt to:
(A) Enable licensed health care providers described in paragraph (a) of  this subsection
to document, as required  by their licenses, the provision of health care services and maintain
health-related information records for students;
(B) Use standardized health care language  and data points and established standards of
confidentiality, security and privacy provided by the federal Health Insurance Portability  and
Accountability Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-191) and the federal  Family Educational Rights and Pri-
vacy Act (20 U.S.C. 1232g); and
(C) Ensure interoperability with other software used  in school settings in order to sup-
port coordination and continuity of care, and efficient billing of the state medical assistance
program.
(4) The task force  may recommend legislation and changes to Department of Education
rules.
(5) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for  the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by  the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to an interim committee  of the Legislative
[2]
HB 2423
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
Assembly related to education no later than September 15, 2026.
(12) The department shall provide staff support to the task force.
(13) Members of  the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]