Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Pension obligation bond” means a bond issued under ORS 238.692 to 238.698.
(b) “School district” means  a common or union high school district, an education service
district or a community college district.
(2) Before a school district may enter into a funds diversion agreement  under ORS
238.698, the school district must:
(a) Submit to the Department of Education information regarding  all pension obligation
bonds of the school district;
(b) Certify to the  department that, on an annual basis, anticipated moneys payable from
the State of Oregon are sufficient  to pay debt service on all pension obligation bonds of the
school district, including bonds for which the funds diversion agreement is proposed; and
(c) Receive approval from  the department to enter into the proposed funds diversion
agreement.
(3) The department may approve the proposed funds diversion agreement only if:
(a) The department determines that  the annual debt service on all pension obligation
bonds of the school district, including bonds for  which the funds diversion agreement is
proposed, averaged over the remaining life of  the bonds, is no greater than 25 percent of the
total amount of state school moneys that the department anticipates will  be available to the
school district in the current fiscal year; or
(b) The department determines  that state school moneys anticipated to be available to
the school district constitute less than  25 percent of the total anticipated funding for the
school district in the current fiscal year.
(4) The State Treasurer  shall provide to the department any data that is necessary or
useful in making the determinations described in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The department may adopt rules necessary to  carry out the provisions of this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 84
HB 4017
1
2
3
4
5
6
SECTION 2. (1) Section 1 of this 2018 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2020.
(2) The Department  of Education may take any action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the department  to exercise, on
and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all the duties, func-
tions and powers conferred on the department by section 1 of this 2018 Act.
[2]