Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The DUII Task Force is established.
(2) The task force consists of eight members appointed as follows:
(a) The Governor shall appoint the following members who have knowledge of  either the
criminal system  or the drug and alcohol treatment system as they relate to individuals
prosecuted for driving while under the influence of intoxicants:
(A) A representative of the Oregon Health Authority;
(B) A representative of the community corrections program within  the Department of
Corrections;
(C) A prosecuting attorney;
(D) A defense attorney;
(E) A substance use treatment provider;
(F) An alcohol and drug screening specialist; and
(G) A representative of the Department of Transportation.
(b) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall appoint one judge.
(3) The task force shall review and make recommendations on the following:
(a) The state’s driving while under the influence of intoxicants  screening and treatment
system.
(b) The state agency or agencies that currently oversee  different elements of the driving
while under the influence system.
(c) The state agency or agencies that  may be best suited to oversee alcohol and drug
screening specialists and other elements  of the driving while under the influence system in
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 469
SB 848
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the future.
(d) The standards, regulations or  requirements that should apply to alcohol and drug
screening specialists.
(e) Evidence-based practices that should be included or required in drug and alcohol
treatment for individuals prosecuted for driving while under the influence of intoxicants.
(f) How to address conflicts that  arise between court proceedings of driving while under
the influence of intoxicants cases and federal health information privacy laws.
(4) The task force may consult with experts, hear testimony  from affected persons and
collect data and information necessary to carry out the task force’s duties.
(5) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the members
of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a report in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245, and may
include recommendations for legislation, to an interim committee of  the Legislative Assem-
bly related to the judiciary no later than June 30, 2026.
(12) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide staff support to the task force.
(13) Members of the task force are not entitled to  compensation or reimbursement for
expenses and serve as volunteers on the task force.
(14) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3.  ORS 813.270 is amended to read:
813.270. The Intoxicated Driver Program Fund is  created to consist of moneys placed in the fund
under ORS 813.030 and 813.240 or as otherwise provided  by law and of gifts and grants made to the
fund for  carrying out the purposes of the fund. The moneys in the fund may be used only for the
following purposes:
(1) To  pay for providing treatment for individuals who enter diversion agreements under ORS
813.200 and who are found to be indigent. Payment for  treatment under this subsection may include
treatment for problem drinking, alcoholism or drug dependency. Payment shall be made  as provided
by the Director  of the Oregon Health Authority by rule to agencies or organizations providing
treatment.
(2) To pay for evaluation as provided by law of programs used for diversion agreements.
(3) To pay the cost of administration of the fund by the Oregon Health Authority.
(4) To pay for materials, resources and training supplied by the authority to  those persons, or-
ganizations or agencies performing the screening interviews or providing education or treatment to
persons under diversion agreements.
[2]
SB 848
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
(5) To pay for providing  treatment programs required under ORS 813.020 and treatment or in-
formation programs required under ORS 471.432 for individuals who are found to be indigent.
(6) To pay  for special services required to enable a person with a disability, or a person whose
proficiency in the use of English is limited because of the person’s national  origin, to participate in
treatment programs that are used for  diversion agreements under ORS 813.200 or are required under
ORS 813.020. This subsection applies:
(a) Whether or not the person is indigent; and
(b) Only to special services required solely because of  the person’s disability or limited profi-
ciency in the use of English.
(7) To  pay for screenings and driving while under the influence of intoxicants education
programs for indigent defendants.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 813.233 is amended to read:
813.233. In lieu of completing a  treatment program in this state as a part of completing the
conditions of a  driving while under the influence of intoxicants diversion agreement in this state,
the court may allow a defendant who is  [ a] not a resident of Oregon or who is a member of the
Armed Forces of the United  States, the reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United
States or the National Guard and who is serving on active duty to participate in a comparable
treatment program conducted by or authorized by a government entity in another jurisdiction.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]