Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Eelgrass Resources is established.
(2) The task force consists of at least 19 members who shall be appointed by  the Director
of the Department of Land Conservation and Development as follows:
(a) Two members to represent conservation groups;
(b) Two members to represent the seafood and aquaculture industries;
(c) At least two members to represent academic institutions  and estuarine or eelgrass
researchers;
(d) One member to represent local governments;
(e) One member to represent restoration practitioners;
(f) Two members to represent estuary partnerships, including  the South Slough National
Estuarine Research Reserve;
(g) One member to represent ports;
(h) One member to represent the angler or recreational fishing community;
(i) One member to represent the coastal tourism industry;
(j) One member to represent Oregon Sea Grant;
(k) At least one member to represent the Department of  Land Conservation and Devel-
opment;
(L) At least one member to represent the State Department of Fish and Wildlife;
(m) At least one member to represent the Department of State Lands;
(n) At least one member to represent the Department of Environmental Quality; and
(o) At least one member to represent the State Department of Agriculture.
(3) In addition to the members appointed under subsection (2) of this section:
(a) The Director of the Department of Land Conservation and Development  shall invite
one member from each  of the nine federally recognized Indian tribes in this state to serve
as members of the task force, as willing and able to participate.
(b) The director may appoint up to five additional members with experience in:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3260
HB 3580
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Conducting eelgrass research or restoration or managing eelgrass resources; or
(B) Land use, geographic information system (GIS) and estuary planning.
(4) The task force shall carry out the duties described in section 2 of this 2025 Act  in
accordance with section 3 of this 2025 Act.
(5) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the members
of the task force.
(7) The  director shall select one member of the task force to serve as chairperson and
another to serve as vice chairperson, with the duties and powers necessary for the  per-
formance of the functions of the offices as the director determines.
(8) If there is a  vacancy for any cause, the director shall make an appointment to become
immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11)(a) The task force  shall submit a progress report in the manner provided by ORS
192.245 to the  legislative committees or interim legislative committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to natural resources no later than September 15, 2026.
(b) The task force shall submit a final report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to
the legislative committees or interim  legislative committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to  natural resources no later than September 15, 2027. The report shall include the
findings and recommendations of the  task force described in section 2 of this 2025 Act and
may include recommendations for legislation.
(12) The Department of Land Conservation and  Development shall provide staff support
to the task force.
(13) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
The Task Force on Eelgrass Resources shall:
(1) Identify relevant data sources and develop a strategy to  conduct an assessment of the
current and historic extent of eelgrass resources in this state’s estuaries.
(2) Develop recommendations for  statewide targets for the protection, conservation and
enhancement of eelgrass resources by  2040, informed by the best available scientific infor-
mation and current and future  predictions of habitat suitability. The targets must be
commensurate with the level of observed and anticipated eelgrass habitat decline  and aim
to achieve net ecological gain of eelgrass resources and habitat function.
(3) Develop actions  and recommendations that the state and local governments should
undertake to maintain existing eelgrass beds and address eelgrass decline.
(4) Examine the existing regulatory framework for eelgrass resource  management across
state agencies, including monitoring, leasing and enforcement authorities, to identify  ineffi-
ciencies and barriers to meeting the conservation and restoration targets  developed under
subsection (2) of this section.
(5) Make policy and regulatory  recommendations to achieve the statewide targets devel-
[2]
HB 3580
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
oped under subsection (2) of this section, including, but not limited to, recommendations for:
(a) The withdrawal of critical areas from leasing;
(b) Establishing targeted provisions for estuarine planning;
(c) Improving the evaluation of projects that may disturb eelgrass habitat;
(d) Shellfish growing or harvesting conditions;
(e) Supporting activities that enhance eelgrass; and
(f) Actions needed to mitigate negative impacts on eelgrass.
(6) Evaluate and make recommendations  for needed actions and coordination between
agencies to address water quality impacts on eelgrass.
(7) Consult with restoration practitioners to:
(a) Assess barriers  in state policies or permitting for eelgrass conservation and en-
hancement activities; and
(b) Identify opportunities to  streamline restoration permitting processes to enable
large-scale habitat enhancement, incentivize private projects and enhance workforce capacity
to support habitat enhancement and restoration activities.
(8) Develop recommendations for clarifying and revising the roles of agencies to effec-
tively manage eelgrass resources and maintain existing eelgrass,  improve monitoring and
mapping, enforce permit conditions and  achieve the statewide targets developed under sub-
section (2) of this section.
(9) Develop recommendations to incentivize eelgrass projects conducted  by nongovern-
mental organizations, community groups, tribal  governments and other stakeholders con-
sistent with the statewide targets developed under subsection (2) of this section.
(10) Assess  the capacity and constraints of existing monitoring and mapping programs
for eelgrass and make recommendations on  technical improvements that could improve
mapping frequency, data quality and  quantity and public access to data and allow agencies
to develop estimates of carbon stocks and track progress in meeting the  statewide targets
developed under subsection (2) of this section.
(11) Develop a research agenda to answer key questions needed to  conserve and enhance
eelgrass and eliminate stressors.
(12) Solicit recommendations from state  agencies on any other topic related to eelgrass
and estuary management, research,  mapping and monitoring, mitigation, state policy,
enforcement, agency coordination, stressors and restoration.
(13) Develop cost estimates for implementing recommended  actions described in this
section and identify potential sources of funding.
SECTION 3.
In carrying out the duties described in section 2 of this 2025 Act, the  Task
Force on Eelgrass Resources shall:
(1) Consult with communities, industries, businesses and other  stakeholders impacted by
eelgrass habitat loss and the policy proposals and recommendations of the task force.
(2) Consult with federally recognized tribes in this state on the  cultural and ecological
importance of eelgrass meadows.
(3) As far is as practicable, consult  and collaborate with relevant federal government
agencies.
(4) Consult and collaborate with  the Oregon Climate Action Commission and any other
relevant state agencies.
SECTION 4. Sections 1 to 3 of this 2025 Act are repealed on December 31, 2027.
[3]
HB 3580
1
2
3
4
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]