Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of State Police shall study ways to expedite forensic
testing of controlled substances, with a focus on expediting testing to determine whether
controlled substances were the cause of or otherwise involved in the death of a person.
(2) The department shall provide  the results of the study, including any recommended
legislative changes, in a report to the appropriate interim committees of the  Legislative As-
sembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than January 31, 2026.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3917