Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 658.705 is amended to read:
658.705. As used in ORS 658.705 to 658.850:
(1) “Applicant”  means an individual who proposes to operate a farmworker camp and who is
applying for a camp operator indorsement under ORS 658.730.
(2) “Bureau” means the Bureau of Labor and Industries.
(3) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries.
(4) “Department” means the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(5) “Director” means the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(6) “Farm labor contractor” has the same meaning as that provided in ORS 658.405.
(7)(a) “Farmworker camp” means any place or area of land  where sleeping places, manufactured
structures or other housing is  provided  as a term or condition of employment  by a farmer, farm
labor contractor, employer or any other person in connection with the  recruitment or employment
of workers to work  on a seasonal or temporary basis  in the production and harvesting of farm
crops or in the reforestation of lands, as described in ORS 658.405.
(b) “Farmworker camp” does not [ include] mean:
[(a)] (A) A single, isolated dwelling occupied solely by members of  the same family, or by five
or fewer unrelated individuals; or
[(b)] (B) A hotel or motel which  provides housing with the same characteristics on a commercial
basis to the general  public on the same terms and conditions as housing is provided to such workers.
(8) “Farmworker camp operator” means any person who operates a farmworker camp.
(9) “Indorsee” means a farm labor contractor licensed under ORS 658.410 who has obtained a
camp indorsement under ORS 658.730.
(10)(a) “Seasonal or temporary basis” means a period of time that is for  a limited,
short-term or fixed duration.
(b) “Seasonal or temporary basis” does not mean a period of time that is year-round  or
of permanent duration.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1214