Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Early Learning and Care shall study the impact on
student parents  and working parents of the waitlist to participate in the Employment Re-
lated Day Care subsidy program established under ORS 329A.500. The study must:
(a) Develop a viable proposal and timeline to change the name of the Employment Related
Day Care subsidy program to the Oregon Child Care Affordability Program.
(b) Identify existing and new strategies and  policies to expand outreach efforts to student
parents to increase the representation of student parents  in the program to a minimum of
20 percent of the entire program caseload.
(c) Identify existing and new  strategies and policies to expand outreach efforts to work-
ing parents to increase the representation of working parents in  the program to a minimum
of 50 percent of the entire program caseload.
(d) Determine the number  of families whose participation in the program is based on
each eligibility criteria and the percentage that each eligibility criteria represents of the total
program caseload.
(e) Determine the number of families in the program whose  children are in contracted
slots.
(2) The department shall submit  a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to child care no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1553