Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 192.610 is amended to read:
192.610. As used in ORS 192.610 to 192.705:
(1) “Convening” means:
(a) Gathering in a physical location;
(b) Using electronic, video or telephonic technology to  be able to communicate
contemporaneously among participants;
(c) Using serial electronic written communication among participants; or
(d) Using an intermediary to communicate among participants.
(2) “Decision” means any determination, action,  vote or final disposition upon a motion, pro-
posal, resolution, order, ordinance or measure on which a vote of a governing body is required, at
any meeting at which a quorum is present.
(3) “Deliberation” means discussion or communication  that is part of a decision-making process.
(4) “Executive session” means any meeting or part of a meeting  of a governing body which is
closed to certain persons for deliberation on certain matters.
(5) “Governing body” means the  members of any public body which consists of two or more
members, with the authority to make  decisions for or recommendations to a public body on policy
or administration.
(6) “Public body” means the state, any regional council, county, city or district, or any municipal
or public corporation, or any board, department, commission, council, bureau,  committee or sub-
committee or advisory group or any other agency thereof.
(7)(a) “Meeting” means the convening of a governing body of a public body  for which a quorum
is required in order to make a decision or to deliberate toward a decision on any matter.
(b) “Meeting”  does not include any on-site inspection of any project or program or the attend-
ance of members of a governing  body at any national, regional or state association to which the
public body or the members belong.
(8) “Work session” means a meeting held for  the purpose of either presenting informa-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2713
HB 3887
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tion to a  governing body to prepare the governing body for a regular or special meeting, or
to allow the governing body to engage in preliminary discussions or deliberations.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 192.630 is amended to read:
192.630. (1) All meetings , including work sessions,  of the governing body  of a public body shall
be open to  the public and all persons shall be permitted to attend any meeting except as otherwise
provided by ORS 192.610 to 192.705.
(2) A quorum of a governing body may not meet in private for the  purpose of deciding on or
deliberating toward a decision on any matter except as otherwise provided by ORS 192.610  to
192.705.
(3) A governing body may not hold a meeting at any place where discrimination  on the basis
of race, color, creed,  sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age or disability is
practiced.  However,  the fact that organizations with restricted membership hold meetings at the
place does not restrict its use by a public  body if use of the place by a restricted membership or-
ganization is not the primary purpose of the place or its predominant use.
(4)(a) Meetings of the governing body of a public body shall be held:
(A) Within the geographic boundaries over which the public body has jurisdiction;
(B) At the administrative headquarters of the public body;
(C) At the nearest practical location; or
(D) If the public body is a state, county, city or special district entity, within Indian  country of
a federally recognized Oregon Indian tribe that is within  the geographic boundaries of this state.
For purposes  of this subparagraph, “Indian country” has the meaning given that term in 18 U.S.C.
1151.
(b) Training sessions may  be held outside the jurisdiction as long as no deliberations toward a
decision are involved.
(c) A joint meeting of two or more governing bodies or of one or more governing bodies and the
elected officials of one or more federally recognized Oregon  Indian tribes shall be held within the
geographic boundaries over which one of  the participating public bodies or one of the Oregon Indian
tribes has jurisdiction or at the nearest practical location.
(d) Meetings may be  held in locations other than those described in this subsection in the event
of an actual emergency necessitating immediate action.
(5)(a) It is discrimination on the basis of disability for a governing  body of a public body to meet
in a place inaccessible to persons  with disabilities, or, upon request of a person who is deaf or hard
of hearing,  to fail to make a good faith effort to have an interpreter for persons who are deaf or
hard of hearing provided at a regularly scheduled meeting. The sole remedy for  discrimination on
the basis of disability shall be as provided in ORS 192.680.
(b) The person requesting the interpreter shall give the governing body at least 48 hours’ notice
of the request for an interpreter, shall provide the name of the requester,  sign language preference
and any other relevant information the governing body may request.
(c) If a meeting is held upon less than 48 hours’ notice, reasonable effort shall  be made to have
an interpreter present, but the  requirement for an interpreter does not apply to emergency meetings.
(d) If  certification of interpreters occurs under state or federal law, the Oregon Health Author-
ity or other state or local agency shall try to refer only  certified interpreters to governing bodies
for purposes of this subsection.
(e) As used in this  subsection, “good faith effort” includes, but is not limited to, contacting the
department or other state or local agency that maintains a list of qualified interpreters and  ar-
[2]
HB 3887
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
ranging for the referral of one or more qualified interpreters to provide interpreter services.
(6) Meetings of  a governing body must provide for a public comment period of reasonable
duration at every public meeting, except for work  sessions as defined in ORS 192.610 or
meetings as described in ORS 192.660.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 192.640 is amended to read:
192.640. (1) The governing body of a public body shall provide for  and give public notice, rea-
sonably calculated to give actual notice to interested persons including news  media which have re-
quested notice, of  the time and place for holding regular meetings. The notice shall also include a
list of the principal subjects anticipated to be considered at the meeting, but this  requirement shall
not limit the ability of a governing body to  consider additional subjects.  A governing body may
not vote on any matter before the body unless the notice includes a public comment period.
(2) If an executive session only will be held,  the notice shall be given to the members of the
governing body, to the general public and to news media which have  requested notice, stating the
specific provision of law authorizing the executive session.
(3) No special meeting shall be held without at least 24 hours’ notice to the members of  the
governing body, the news media which have requested  notice and the general public. In case of an
actual emergency, a meeting may be held upon such notice as is  appropriate to the circumstances,
but the minutes for such a meeting shall describe the emergency justifying less than  24 hours’ no-
tice.
[3]