Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 135.805 to
135.873.
SECTION 2. (1) When a district attorney fulfills  the duty to disclose material under ORS
135.815 to a defendant with court-appointed counsel by providing  a copy of the material to
the defendant,  the district attorney shall calculate the cost of creating and providing the
copy.
(2) The district attorney shall submit a  written request for reimbursement for the cost
of creating and providing copies of discovery material described in  subsection (1) of this
section to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services. The request shall include the
case number and a description of the discovery material provided.
(3) The department shall reimburse a  district attorney who submits a request under
subsection (2) of this section  for the cost of creating and providing copies of discovery ma-
terial from funds appropriated to the department for that purpose.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $ , for distribution to district
attorneys for the cost of creating and providing copies of discovery  materials under section
2 of this 2023 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3022