Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon  Department of Emergency Management shall create and
maintain a registry of persons who are able and  willing to provide services related to emer-
gency response. The registry may include:
(a) Current or former first responders;
(b) Persons experienced in construction or other skilled trades; and
(c) Other persons that  the department determines are able to assist in emergency re-
sponse.
(2) As a condition of inclusion on the registry, the department may require:
(a) Evidence of relevant qualifications;
(b) Training related to emergency response, including incident management  or command;
and
(c) Criminal background checks.
(3) The registry must include, for each person:
(a) The person’s name and contact information;
(b) The physical location where the person is based;
(c) Specialized training or skills related to emergency response that the person has; and
(d) A description of vehicles or equipment that the person is willing to permit use of  for
emergency response.
(4) The registry must be accessible to emergency management  agencies and emergency
program managers described in ORS 401.305. The department may make the registry ac-
cessible to any other  persons or entities if the department determines that providing such
access will enhance public safety.
(5) The department shall establish  procedures for communicating with emergency man-
agement agencies or  other appropriate entities for the purposes of gathering information for
the registry and regularly updating the information.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3165
HB 2700
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
(6) The department  shall consult with the following state agencies in creating and main-
taining the registry:
(a) The Department of Public Safety Standards and Training;
(b) The Oregon Health Authority; and
(c) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(7) The Oregon Department of Emergency Management may adopt rules necessary  for
the administration of this section.
[2]