Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Subject  to the availability of funding as described under subsection (5)
of this section, the State Department of Energy shall conduct a study and make a report that
addresses the following subjects as related to nuclear energy:
(a)(A) The different sizes and technologies of advanced nuclear reactors;
(B) The inherent safety features of advanced nuclear reactors; and
(C) Terminology that is recommended for referencing in statute  or regulation the dif-
ferent sizes and technologies of advanced nuclear reactors;
(b) The feasibility of constructing advanced nuclear reactor power plants, including  small
or micro reactors, in Oregon, including:
(A) Timing for developing nuclear energy projects;
(B) Life cycle costs of developing nuclear energy projects  compared to other energy
sources;
(C) Risks to health and the environment throughout the life cycle of  a nuclear energy
project;
(D) Measures for overcoming challenges to developing nuclear energy projects; and
(E) Government and industry support necessary for developing nuclear energy projects;
(c) How the use of nuclear energy may or may not support current energy systems, in-
cluding the ability of the electric grid to meet load requirements under  existing transmission
constraints;
(d) How the use of nuclear energy may or may not  support the development or
Zecarbonization of high-energy use industries in Oregon, including through the  use of nu-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 309
HB 4046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
clear process heat for industrial applications;
(e) The potential contributions of nuclear energy to support  economic growth and
workforce development for Oregon communities;
(f) Safety of advanced nuclear reactors;
(g) A description of the type and characteristics of  the nuclear waste that is produced
by currently operating nuclear energy generation sources in  the United States and advanced
nuclear reactors, and the ability to safely and legally manage the nuclear waste  of the type
produced from nuclear energy generation, including:
(A) Existing methods, locations and safety  records in the United States for the storage
of nuclear waste from nuclear energy generation;
(B) Economic costs of disposing of nuclear waste; and
(C) Existing Oregon state and federal legal pathways for the recycling,  reprocessing,
disposal and temporary and long-term storage of nuclear waste, and any  pending or proposed
changes to existing pathways through legislation, regulation, policy directive or litigation;
(h) Reliability of nuclear energy;
(i) Financing, ownership models and other pathways for making nuclear energy viable
and cost-effective;
(j) The long-term outlook for advanced  nuclear energy development in the United States,
including small and micro reactors;
(k) Existing statutes or  rules that may need to be modified, or new rules that may need
to be adopted, to enable:
(A) The Energy Facility Siting Council to effectively undertake a  siting process for ad-
vanced nuclear reactors in Oregon; and
(B) The State Department  of Energy to effectively oversee the storage and management
of nuclear waste generated by advanced nuclear reactors;
(L) The anticipated application of state and local land use  requirements to the siting of
a demonstration project, and any potential  gaps in or opportunities for clarifications or
modifications to  state or local land use requirements necessary to clarify the application of
state and local land use requirements to a demonstration project; and
(m) Existing statutes applicable to the Public Utility Commission and rules  and orders
of the Public Utility Commission that may be applicable to the development of  an advanced
nuclear reactor in Oregon.
(2) The department shall conduct the study in consultation with the following  state
agencies and organizations:
(a) The Public Utility Commission;
(b) The Pacific Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council;
(c) The Department of Land Conservation and Development; and
(d) Oregon State University.
(3)(a) In developing the study, the department shall engage with the federally  recognized
Indian tribes located in this state, relevant state agencies and stakeholders.
(b) Engagement with the Indian  tribes must include direct written contact with the tribal
government of each Indian tribe. The department and each  tribal government shall reach
an agreement on a reasonable amount of time for the tribal  government to respond and
provide input on the study.
(c) As determined through tribal consultation,  the study and report must explicitly con-
[2]
HB 4046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
sider potential impacts of and opportunities for nuclear energy development in  Oregon with
relation to tribes and tribal treaty rights, first foods and cultural resources.
(4) The department shall submit the report required under this section in  the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and  may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim
committees or committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to energy no later than Feb-
ruary 15, 2027.
(5)(a) The department shall carry out its duties under this section:
(A) Contingent on the availability of moneys from  federal, private or other public
sources, as described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, to  fund the department’s work in
carrying out its duties under this section;
(B) Utilizing available resources, such as existing resources from the federal Department
of Energy National Laboratories and studies completed by other states; and
(C) In a financially prudent and expedient manner.
(b) The department may accept, for  purposes of conducting the study and making the
report required by this section, contributions of  moneys and assistance from the United
States government or its agencies  or from any other source, public or private, and agree to
conditions placed on the moneys not inconsistent with the duties described in this section.
The department shall deposit any moneys the department accepts into the Nuclear Energy
Study Fund, established under section 2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 2.
The Nuclear Energy Study Fund is established in the State Treasury, sepa-
rate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Nuclear Energy Study Fund
shall be credited to the fund. All moneys in the Nuclear Energy Study Fund  are continuously
appropriated to the State Department  of Energy for the purposes of carrying out the duties
described in section 1 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this 2026 Act are repealed on January 2, 2028.
(2) Any moneys remaining in  the Nuclear Energy Study Fund on January 2, 2028, that
are unexpended, unobligated and not subject to any conditions shall revert to the General
Fund.
SECTION 4.
This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]