Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
When smoke from a wildfire  on federal lands causes damages to a person
engaged in wine grape growing, as defined in ORS 576.850, the Attorney General shall take
all actions within  the Attorney General’s power to assist the person in recovering damages
from the federal government.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3468