Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2020 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 316.
SECTION 2. (1) There shall be added to federal taxable income for Oregon tax purposes
any gain that is excluded from federal taxable income under section 1400Z-2 of the  Internal
Revenue Code for the tax year.
(2) Any amount added  to federal taxable income for Oregon tax purposes under sub-
section (1) of this section that  under section 1400Z of the Internal Revenue Code is tempo-
rarily deferred gain may thereafter be subtracted from federal taxable income for Oregon tax
purposes for the year in which the amount is includible in federal taxable income under
section 1400Z-2(b) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) Any adjustment in  basis of opportunity zone property allowed under section 1400Z of
the Internal Revenue Code for federal tax purposes shall be disregarded for Oregon tax pur-
poses.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2020 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 317.
SECTION 4. (1) There shall be added to federal taxable income for Oregon tax purposes
any gain that is excluded from federal taxable income under section 1400Z-2 of the  Internal
Revenue Code for the tax year.
(2) Any amount added  to federal taxable income for Oregon tax purposes under sub-
section (1) of this section that  under section 1400Z of the Internal Revenue Code is tempo-
rarily deferred gain may thereafter be subtracted from federal taxable income for Oregon tax
purposes for the year in which the amount is includible in federal taxable income under
section 1400Z-2(b) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) Any adjustment in  basis of opportunity zone property allowed under section 1400Z of
the Internal Revenue Code for federal tax purposes shall be disregarded for Oregon tax pur-
poses.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 250
HB 4010
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
SECTION 5.
Sections 2 and 4 of this 2020  Act apply to tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2020.
SECTION 6. (1) The Legislative Revenue Officer shall study the operation and effective-
ness of the federal opportunity zone program.
(2) In conducting the study required by subsection (1) of this section, the officer shall
consult with members of the Legislative Assembly and with individuals representing the fol-
lowing:
(a) Labor organizations;
(b) Private equity concerns;
(c) Tax policy advocates;
(d) Tax practitioners;
(e) Community development organizations; and
(f) Local governments.
(3) The officer shall report findings to an interim committee of the  Legislative Assembly
related to revenue in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 no later than November  1, 2020.
The report may  include any recommendations, if appropriate, by the officer for legislation
intended to achieve  partial reconnection of Oregon statutes to the federal opportunity zone
program.
SECTION 7.
This 2020 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2020
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]