Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 336.059 is amended to read:
336.059. (1) Each school district board shall adopt a child sexual abuse and child human traf-
ficking prevention  [ instructional program ] curriculum for students in kindergarten through grade
12.
(2) School districts must include in the program:
(a) Developmentally appropriate, culturally sensitive , trauma informed and evidence-based in-
struction for each grade level;
(b) [ A minimum of four instructional sessions ] An instructional  lesson offered a minimum of
four times  per school year, with each year’s instruction building on the previous  year’s instruction;
(c) Age-appropriate curriculum including role-playing, discussion, activities and books and dis-
cussions of best  practices  to educate students regarding child sexual abuse and child human
trafficking prevention;
(d) Instruction providing  students with the knowledge and tools to communicate incidents of
sexual abuse  and child human trafficking ;
(e) Instruction regarding “safe touch,” “unsafe touch,” “safe secrets,” [ “unsafe secrets,”  ] “un-
safe secrets” and “grooming”  and how to escape  and report a sexual abuse  or child human
trafficking situation;
(f) Techniques to recognize  child sexual abuse  and child human trafficking , skills to reduce
vulnerability and encouragement to report child sexual abuse  and child human trafficking ;
(g) Discussions of the role of technology in  child sexual abuse and child human traffick-
ing and how to recognize materials related to child  sexual abuse and child human trafficking;
[(g)] (h) An evaluation component with measurable outcomes;
[(h)] (i) A professional training component for administrators,  teachers and other school per-
sonnel regarding :
(A) Communicating child sexual abuse and child human trafficking  prevention  techniques to
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4330
HB 3622
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
students[,];
(B) Understanding the  effects of child sexual abuse and child human trafficking  on
children[ ,]; and
(C) Making and receiving child sexual abuse and child human trafficking  reports and disclo-
sures and mandated reporting; and
[(i)] (j) A parental  involvement component to inform parents about child sexual abuse and child
human trafficking topics, including characteristics of offenders, “grooming”  behaviors and how to
discuss child sexual abuse and child human trafficking  prevention with children.
(3) Program instruction may be delivered by instructors  including teachers, school counselors
and outside agency prevention educators, provided the instructors  have knowledge of and training
in child sexual  abuse and child human trafficking  prevention.  Instructors who are experienced
in providing instruction on child sexual abuse and child human trafficking are encouraged
to train new instructors.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 336.059 by section 1 of this 2025  Act first apply to
the 2025-2026 school year.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]