Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000,  for the purpose of funding the grant program
related to establishments that operate under a program of state inspection,  as described in
ORS 619.042.
SECTION 2.
(1) The State Department of Agriculture shall  establish by rule a grant
program for the purpose of funding:
(a) Upgrades to establishments that are expected to operate under a program of  state
inspection authorized by ORS 619.042;
(b) Construction of new establishments that are expected to operate under a program of
state inspection authorized by ORS 619.042; and
(c) Expansion of  establishments that operate under a program of federal inspection and
plan to increase processing of meat from animals raised in Oregon.
(2) In administering the program, the department:
(a) Shall develop criteria for awarding a grant and a process for applying for a grant;
(b) Shall preferentially award grants to support establishments that prioritize seasonally
feasible processing of animals raised in Oregon; and
(c) May  require a recipient of a grant to report to the department on the use of grant
funds.
(3) A recipient of a  grant may use grant funds for costs related to the activities described
in subsection (1) of this section,  such as costs of technical assistance and the purchase of
equipment.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1848
SB 363
1
2
on July 1, 2025.
[2]