Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of  Education shall administer a pilot program to in-
crease the number of public school students served by school social workers.
(2) Under the  pilot program, the department shall distribute moneys to school districts
to:
(a) Hire new school social workers;
(b) Increase the working hours of existing school social workers; or
(c) Enable existing personnel to earn a  license as a school social worker and become
employed by the school district as a school social worker.
(3) A  school district may participate in the pilot program if the school district submits
an application demonstrating how the school  district will use grant moneys to increase the
number of students who  are served by a school social worker as described in subsection (2)
of this section.
(4)(a) A school district  that participates in the pilot program must annually submit in-
formation to the department about how the increase in school social workers affected:
(A) Student attendance rates;
(B) Reported incidences of acts of harassment, intimidation  or bullying or acts of
cyberbullying, as defined in ORS 339.351;
(C) The morale of students and teachers; and
(D) Any other elements of the school system, including students or families.
(b) The department shall submit an annual report to an interim committee of the Legis-
lative Assembly related to education no later than October  15 of each year. The report must
summarize the information received under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(5) The State  Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the administration
of the pilot program.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2019 Act is repealed on June 30, 2024.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, out of the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3152
HB 2940
1
2
3
4
5
6
General Fund, the  amount of $20,000,000, which must be expended for the pilot program de-
scribed in section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
[2]