Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
CHILD-CARING AGENCIES
SECTION 1.
 ORS 418.240 is amended to read:
418.240. (1) All child-caring agencies shall obtain from the Department of Human Services  a li-
cense, certificate or  other authorization to provide care or services to children under ORS 418.205
to 418.327, 418.470, 418.475 or 418.950  to 418.970. The criteria for issuance, renewal, suspension or
revocation of, or for placing conditions on, a license, certificate or authorization under this  section
must:
(a) Be set forth in rules adopted by the department;
(b) Include the full compliance requirements set forth in subsection (2) of this section; and
(c) Include, but are not limited to, the following:
(A) The fitness of the child-caring agency.
(B) The employment of capable, trained or experienced staff  that meet minimum staffing re-
quirements.
(C) Sufficient financial backing to ensure effective operations.
(D) The probability of permanence in the child-caring agency.
(E) The care and services provided to the children served will  be in their best interests and that
of society.
(F) That the  child-caring agency is or will be in compliance with the standards of care and
treatment established in rules adopted by the department.
(2)(a) The department may not issue or renew a license, certificate or other authorization to  a
child-caring agency unless the department finds the agency is or will be in full  compliance with all
of the following:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 238
HB 4042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) The agency ensures child and family rights.
(B) The agency complies with abuse reporting and investigation requirements.
(C) The agency engages in and applies appropriate behavior management techniques.
(D) The agency provides adequate furnishings and personal items for children.
(E) The agency provides appropriate food services.
(F) The agency ensures the safety of children.
(G) The agency utilizes approved procedures and protocols for use  of medications for children
receiving care or services from the agency.
(H) The agency or the  agency’s employees or agents have not engaged in financial mismanage-
ment.
(I) The agency fully and timely corrects  violations and maintains standards in accordance with
any plan of correction imposed by the department.
(J) The agency provides access as required under ORS 418.305 to a child or  the agency’s prem-
ises to the department or the department’s employees, investigators, court appointed  special advo-
cates, attorneys for a child or other authorized persons or entities.
(K) The agency provides the department with true copies of records  relating to incidents in-
volving the restraint or involuntary  seclusion of children in care as required under ORS 418.526 (2).
(b) The department may  suspend, revoke or place conditions on a license, certificate or author-
ization of a child-caring agency if the department finds  the agency is not in full compliance with any
one or more of the full compliance requirements listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) The department must take immediate steps to suspend , [ or] revoke or place conditions on
the license,  certificate or other authorization of a child-caring agency, if any of the following are
found to exist:
(A) There has been the death of a child as a result  of abuse or neglect on the part of the agency
or any of the agency’s employees or agents.
(B) There has  been sexual or physical abuse or neglect of a child in the agency’s care or custody
that was known to the agency and the agency did  not take immediate steps to report the abuse or
neglect and to ensure the child’s safety.
(C) The agency failed to cooperate  fully with any local, state or federal regulatory entity’s in-
vestigation of the agency or the agency’s operations or employees.
(D) The agency failed to provide financial statements as required under ORS 418.255.
(d) If any of the circumstances described in paragraph (c) of this subsection exists, the depart-
ment may immediately place conditions on the license, certificate or authorization of the child-caring
agency prior to a hearing if, consistent with ORS 183.430, the department finds there  is a serious
danger to the public health or safety and sets forth specific reasons for such findings.
(e) It is grounds to deny issuance or renewal, suspend, revoke or place conditions  on a license,
certificate or other authorization  if the department becomes aware that a child-caring agency, or the
owner or  operator of the agency, has been found by other state or federal entities to have engaged
in financial, civil or criminal misconduct.
(3)(a) If the Director of Human Services has taken action under subsection (2)(c) of this  section
to suspend or revoke a license, certificate or other authorization, the  notice of intent to suspend or
revoke may be rescinded  if the director determines that the concerns regarding the health and
safety of the children in the child-caring agency’s care or  custody have been ameliorated and any
conditions placed on the license, certificate or other authorization of the  child-caring agency have
been resolved.
[2]
HB 4042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Fourteen days before rescinding a notice of intent to suspend or revoke,  the Director of
Human Services must provide written notice regarding the  intent to rescind to the Governor. The
notice of intent to  rescind is a public record and open for inspection by any person without order
of a court. The notice of intent to rescind must include the following information:
(A) The circumstances that led to the notice of intent to suspend or revoke;
(B) The actions taken by the child-caring agency, the Department of Human Services,  the At-
torney General, the Oregon Youth Authority and the Oregon Health Authority in  response to the
circumstances leading to the notice of intent to suspend or revoke;
(C) Any penalties, fees or charges made or levied against the child-caring agency; and
(D) A complete description of changes  that were made at the child-caring agency and the rea-
sons for the determination that the concerns regarding the health and safety  of children in the
child-caring agency’s care or custody have been ameliorated or that any conditions placed on the
license, certificate or other authorization of the child-caring agency have been resolved.
(c) In making a decision to  rescind a notice of intent to suspend or revoke under this subsection,
the decision must be based solely on the health and safety of the children served by  the child-caring
agency. Systemwide capacity of the child welfare system may not  be considered as an element of the
decision.
(d) For three years after a notice of intent to suspend  or revoke is rescinded under this sub-
section, the child-caring agency must apply for  a renewal of the child-caring agency’s license, cer-
tificate or other authorization on an annual basis.
(e) The department must provide the following with  copies of a notice of intent to rescind within
five business days of issuing the notice:
(A) The Governor; and
(B) The committees of the Legislative Assembly relating to child welfare.
(4) The department may immediately place  conditions on any license, certificate or authorization
issued under this section, including but not limited to placing full or partial restrictions  on admis-
sion of children, temporary suspension, limitation of  operations subject to an intent to revoke and
limitation of operations subject to correction of violations as specified in a plan of correction im-
posed by the department. The department  shall immediately notify any state or governmental agency
or unit that has  a contract with the child-caring agency to provide care or services to a child, and
the governing board, trustees, owners, managers, operators or other appropriate authorities respon-
sible for the child-caring agency,  of conditions placed by the department on the child-caring agency’s
license, certificate or authorization under this section.
(5) If applicable, an applicant shall submit written proof  of compliance with the notification re-
quirements in ORS 336.575.
(6) The department may not charge a  fee for inspections leading to decisions regarding, and is-
suance of, licenses, certifications or authorizations under this  section, but may impose fees to cover
costs of related inspections done for the department by other governmental agencies.
(7) Except as provided  in subsection (3) of this section, a license, certificate or authorization
issued by the department  under this section shall be valid for a period of two years, unless sus-
pended or revoked sooner by the department. However, the  department at any time may require
amendments to an existing license, certificate or authorization to  accommodate changes in the fac-
tors upon which the issuance was based.
(8) When a condition exists that seriously endangers  or places at risk the health, safety or
welfare of a child who is receiving care or services at a child-caring agency:
[3]
HB 4042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The director shall issue an interim emergency order without notice, or with reasonable no-
tice under the circumstances,  requiring the agency to correct the conditions and ensure the safety
of children in the care  of the agency. The interim emergency order shall remain in force until a final
order, after a hearing, has been entered in accordance with ORS chapter 183.
(b) The director may commence an action to enjoin operation of a child-caring agency:
(A) If the agency is being operated without a valid license, certificate  or other authorization
issued under this section; or
(B) If the agency fails to comply with a plan of correction imposed  by the department or to
correct conditions not in conformity with standards as set out in an order issued under paragraph
(a) of this subsection, within the time specified in the order.
(9) If the director, the director’s designee or the department becomes  aware through any means
that a child-caring agency,  or an owner, operator or employee of a child-caring agency, is the sub-
ject of an investigation by  another state agency, law enforcement agency or federal agency, the di-
rector or director’s designee shall take immediate steps  to cause an investigation to take place into
the circumstances surrounding the investigation  and whether there is a threat to a child, or whether
a child is at  risk, at the child-caring agency. Upon determination of the level of threat or risk to
children at the agency, the director shall  take appropriate steps to protect and ensure the health,
safety and welfare of children as necessary under the circumstances. Failure to  comply with the
requirements of this subsection constitutes grounds for a charge of official misconduct  in the second
degree under ORS 162.405.
(10) If the Department of Justice or Bureau of Labor and Industries commences an  investigation
of a child-caring agency or an owner,  operator or employee of a child-caring agency, the Department
of Justice or  Bureau of Labor and Industries shall notify, inform and regularly update the director,
the director’s designee or such other personnel in the Department of Human  Services designated to
receive such information regarding the investigation. The director  and the department shall imme-
diately undertake the responsive action required by  subsection (9) of this section upon receiving
such notification. Interference with, discouragement of or impediment to the receipt of  the notifica-
tion, information and updates required under this subsection constitutes official  misconduct in the
second degree under ORS 162.405.
(11) The Department of Human Services shall adopt  rules to implement the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 418.519 is amended to read:
418.519. As used in ORS 418.519 to 418.532:
(1) “Certified foster home” means a foster home subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645.
(2) “Chemical restraint” means a drug or medication that is administered to a child in care  to
control behavior or restrict freedom of movement.
(3) “Child-caring agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.205.
(4) “Child in care” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.257.
(5) “Children’s emergency safety  intervention specialist” means a qualified mental health pro-
fessional licensed to order, monitor and  evaluate the use of seclusion and restraint in accredited and
certified facilities that provide intensive mental health  treatment services to individuals under 21
years of age.
(6) “Developmental disabilities residential facility”  has the meaning given that term in ORS
418.257.
(7)(a) “Involuntary seclusion” means the confinement of a child  in care alone in a room or an
[4]
HB 4042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
enclosed space from which the child in care is prevented from leaving by any means.
(b) “Involuntary seclusion” does  not include age-appropriate discipline, including, but not limited
to, time-out if the time-out is in a setting from which the child in care is not prevented from leaving
by any means.
(8)(a) “Mechanical restraint” means a device used  to restrict the movement of a child in care
or the movement or normal function of a portion of the body of a child in care.
(b) “Mechanical restraint” does not include a vehicle  safety restraint when used as in-
tended during the transport of a child in care in a moving vehicle.
(9) “Proctor foster  home” means a foster home certified by a child-caring agency under ORS
418.248.
(10) “Program” means:
(a) A child-caring agency;
(b) A proctor foster home; or
(c) A developmental disabilities residential  facility that is a residential training home or facility
licensed under ORS 443.415 to serve children under 18 years of age.
(11) “Prone restraint” means a  restraint in which a child in care is held face down on the floor.
(12) “Reportable injury” means any type of injury to a child in  care, including but not limited
to rug burns,  fractures, sprains, bruising, pain, soft tissue injury, punctures, scratches, concussions,
abrasions, dizziness, loss of consciousness, loss of vision, visual disturbance or death.
(13) “Restraint” means  the physical restriction of a child in care’s actions or movements by
holding the child in care or using pressure or other means.
(14) “Secure adolescent inpatient  treatment program” means a child-caring agency that is an
intensive treatment services program, as described by the Oregon Health Authority by rule, that
provides inpatient psychiatric stabilization  and treatment services to individuals under 21 years of
age who require a secure intensive treatment setting.
(15) “Secure children’s inpatient treatment program” means a child-caring agency that is  an in-
tensive treatment services program, as described by the authority by rule, that provides inpatient
psychiatric stabilization and treatment services to children under  14 years of age who require a
secure intensive treatment setting.
(16) “Serious bodily injury” means any significant impairment of the physical condition of  an
individual, as determined by qualified medical personnel, whether self-inflicted or  inflicted by some-
one else.
(17) “Supine restraint” means a restraint in which a child in care is held face up on the floor.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 418.529 is amended to read:
418.529. (1)(a)  The Department of Human Services shall adopt by rule training standards and
certification requirements regarding the placement of a child in  care in a restraint or involuntary
seclusion, consistent with this section.
(b) The department shall designate [ two or  three ] nationally recognized providers of crisis
intervention training that meet the department’s training  standards and whose certifications issued
upon completion of the training programs the department will recognize as  satisfying the
department’s certification requirements.
(2) The department’s rules under this section must:
(a) Ensure consistency of training and professional development across all programs;
(b) Require the teaching of techniques for nonviolent crisis intervention that do  not require re-
straint;
[5]
HB 4042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Focus on de-escalation  and trauma-informed behavioral support as the core of a training
program;
(d) Offer options for certification in skills that do not include the use of  restraint to improve
agency-wide safety, culture and trauma-informed practices;
(e) Prioritize the reduction or elimination of the use of restraint and involuntary seclusion;
(f) Ensure that any physical intervention skills taught  are trauma-informed, age-appropriate and
developmentally appropriate for children in care, reduce  the risk of physical or emotional harm and
are consistent with all state and federal laws;
(g) Include training to identify the physical, psychological  and emotional risks for children and
program staff related to the use of restraint and involuntary seclusion;
(h) Ensure fidelity of training through the publication of consistent training  materials and re-
sources for certified instructors and certified program staff;
(i) Include requirements for instructor training and certification; and
(j) Require  regular, ongoing support to certified instructors, including quality control, monitor-
ing of outcomes and provision of information regarding networks  for professional collaboration and
support.
(3) The department’s rules must require that training instructors:
(a) Be certified to conduct the type of training the instructor is providing;
(b) Complete a minimum of 26 hours of initial education with a focus on de-escalation, nonviolent
intervention  and  methods consistent with the department’s rules for the use of [physical
intervention] restraint;
(c) Complete a minimum of 12 hours of continuing education every two years;
(d) Be recertified at least once every two years; and
(e) Demonstrate written and physical competency before receiving  certification or recertif-
ication.
(4) The department’s rules must provide that  an individual who places a child in care in a pro-
gram in a restraint must be certified in the use of  the specific type of restraint used. The
department’s rules must describe the minimum certification requirements, including:
(a) Completion of a minimum of 12 hours  of initial training in person from an instructor certified
as provided in subsection (3) of this section, including at least six hours of training in positive  be-
havior support, nonviolent  crisis intervention and other methods of nonphysical intervention to
support children in care in crisis;
(b) Annual continuing education with a certified instructor; and
(c) Demonstration of a mastery of the training program material both in writing and  by physical
competency before receiving certification.
(5) A certification issued under this section:
(a) Must be personal to the individual certified by the training provider;
(b) May be valid for no more than two years without recertification;
(c) Must require annual continuing education to maintain;
(d) Must require additional training to renew the certification;
(e) Must be portable between employers; and
(f) Must include:
(A) The dates during which the certification is current;
(B) The types of restraint in which the individual is certified, if any;
(C) The types of training the individual is certified to conduct, if any;
[6]
HB 4042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(D) Any special endorsements earned by the individual;
(E) The level of training; and
(F) The name of the certified instructor who conducted the  training and administered the as-
sessment of proficiency.
(6) An individual whose certification is consistent with the department’s  rules under this section
shall maintain the documentation of the certification and make that documentation available to  the
department upon request.
PLACEMENT DECISIONS
SECTION 4.
Out-of-state placement of Indian children.  (1) Notwithstanding ORS 418.321
or 418.322, if there is reason to know, as described  in ORS 419B.636, that a child is an Indian
child, the Department of Human Services may place the child in an out-of-state placement
without requiring the placement to be licensed by or under contract with  the department or
to be a qualified residential treatment program if:
(a) The placement complies with the placement preferences under ORS 419B.654; and
(b)(A) The  out-of-state placement is a youth regional treatment center operated or
funded by the Indian Health Service and serves the needs of Indian children or youth; or
(B) The Indian child’s  tribe has affirmatively requested that the child be placed in the
out-of-state placement.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “Indian child” has the meaning given that term in ORS 419B.603.
(b) “Qualified residential treatment program” means a program described  in ORS 418.323.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 418.322 is amended to read:
418.322. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Congregate care residential setting” means any setting that cares for  more than one child
or ward and is not a setting described in ORS 418.205 (2)(c)(A), (C), (D), (E) , [ or] (F) or (G) or (10).
(b) “Sex trafficking”  means the recruitment, harboring, transportation, provision, obtaining, pa-
tronizing or soliciting of a person under 18 years of age for the purpose  of a commercial sex act,
as defined in ORS 163.266, or  the recruitment, harboring, transportation, provision or obtaining of
a person over 18 years of age using force, fraud or coercion for the purpose of a commercial sex
act, as defined in ORS 163.266.
(2) The Department of Human Services  may place a child or ward in a congregate care resi-
dential setting only if the setting is:
(a) A child-caring agency, as defined in  ORS 418.205, a hospital, as defined in ORS 442.015, or
a rural hospital, as defined in ORS 442.470; and
(b) A qualified residential treatment program described in ORS 418.323.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the department may place a  child or ward in
a child-caring agency that is not a qualified residential treatment program if:
(a) The child-caring agency is providing prenatal, postpartum or  parenting supports to the child
or ward.
(b) The child  or ward is placed in an independent residence facility described in ORS 418.475
that is licensed by the department as a child-caring agency.
(c) The  child or ward is, or is at risk of becoming, a victim of sex trafficking and the child-caring
agency is providing high-quality residential care and supportive services to the child or ward.
[7]
HB 4042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) The Oregon Health Authority has approved the [ placement as medically necessary ] services
or treatment  and the child-caring agency:
(A) Is a residential care facility;
(B) Is licensed by the  authority and maintains site-specific accreditation from a nationally re-
cognized organization to provide psychiatric treatment to children; and
(C) Has an active provider agreement with the Oregon Medicaid program.
(e) The child-caring agency is an  adolescent residential drug and alcohol treatment program li-
censed or certified by the State of Oregon to provide  residential care, and the court has approved,
or approval is pending for, the placement  in the child-caring agency of each child or ward over
whom the department retains jurisdiction.
(f) The placement with the child-caring agency  is for the purpose of placing the child or ward
in a proctor foster home.
(g) The child-caring agency is a residential care facility licensed by the department that provides
short-term assessment and stabilization services.
(h) The child-caring agency is a shelter-care home, as defined in ORS 418.470, that  provides
short-term assessment and stabilization services.
(i) The child-caring agency is a homeless, runaway or transitional living shelter licensed  by the
department that provides short-term assessment and stabilization services.
(j) The ward  is 18 years of age or older and the child-caring agency is a residential treatment
facility or a residential home licensed or certified by the department or the Oregon Health Author-
ity.
(k) The responsible Medicaid entity has approved the services or treatment.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the department may place a child
or ward in a congregate care residential setting that is not a child-caring agency or a  quali-
fied residential treatment  program if the congregate care residential setting is an adult set-
ting licensed by the department  or authority and provides services or treatment that are
medically necessary and medically appropriate for the child or ward.
[(4)] (5)(a)  The department may not place a  child or ward in a residential care facility or
shelter-care home described in subsection (3)(g) or (h) of this section:
[(a)] (A)  For more than 60  consecutive days or 90 cumulative days in a 12-month period , unless
the limits for the duration of the placement are extended as provided  in paragraph (b) of this
subsection; or
[(b)] (B)  If the  residential care facility or shelter-care home also serves youths or adjudicated
youths served by the county juvenile department or adjudicated  youths committed to the custody
of the Oregon Youth Authority by the court.
(b) The department, by  rule, may extend the limits for the duration of placement of a
child or ward under paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) As requested by the child or ward; or
(B) By up to 30 consecutive or 30 cumulative days in a 12-month  period if the department
determines that the extension is in the best interest of the child or ward.
[(5)] (6)  The department may not place a child or ward in a homeless, runaway or transitional
living shelter described in subsection (3)(i) of this section for more  than 60 consecutive or 90 cu-
mulative days in any 12-month period.
[(6)] (7)  Calculations of the number of days a child or ward is placed in a  shelter-care home
under subsection (3)(h) of this section or a homeless, runaway or transitional living shelter  under
[8]
HB 4042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
subsection (3)(i) of this section exclude the  days the child or ward is in the shelter-care home or
shelter if the child or ward:
(a) Accessed the shelter-care home or shelter without the support or direction of the department;
and
(b) Is homeless or a runaway, as defined by the department by rule.
[(7)(a)] (8)(a)  Nothing in this section prohibits the Oregon Youth Authority from placing an  ad-
judicated youth committed to its custody in a placement that is not a qualified residential  treatment
program.
(b) Nothing in this section prohibits the Oregon Youth Authority or a  county juvenile depart-
ment from placing an adjudicated  youth or a youth served by the Oregon Youth Authority or the
county juvenile department in shelter care or detention under ORS chapter 419C.
(9)(a) All approvals of the exceptions  described in subsections (3)(k) and (5)(b) of this
section must be made by the director of the division of the  department that administers the
state child welfare program or the director’s designee. In  addition, the exceptions under
subsection (3)(k) of this section must also be  approved by the director of the division of the
authority that administers the state medical assistance program or the director’s designee.
(b) The department and the authority shall collaborate to establish rules  for the approval
process under this subsection.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 6.
The unit and section captions used in this 2026 Act are provided only for the
convenience of the reader and do not become part of  the statutory law of this state or ex-
press any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2026 Act.
[9]