Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Each post-secondary institution of education  that receives state moneys
shall make available to the public, on the website  of the institution, all budgets and expen-
ditures made by the institution, all vendors used  by the institution and all contracts entered
into by the institution.
(2) The information required to be listed on the website of an institution under subsection
(1) of this section shall include:
(a) An annual  budget that includes anticipated revenues and expenditures for each ad-
ministrative unit;
(b) A report comparing the annual budget with actual  expenditures that shows the
budget, actual revenue and expense transactions, revenue and expense encumbrances  and
budget balance information for each administrative unit;
(c) A budgeted salary report that shows the  name, title, classifications, full-time equiv-
alent percentage, annual salary and funding sources for each full-time and  part-time em-
ployee at the institution;
(d) A declaration of whether each listed expenditure has  contributed to diversity, equity
and inclusion, social justice, sustainability or any similar commitment;
(e) Discrete sections that collate all individual  expenditures for each of the categories
of diversity, equity and inclusion, social justice, sustainability or any  similar commitment,
and that set forth the aggregate expenditures of the institution as a whole, and the aggregate
expenditures of each administrative unit, for each of the categories;
(f) A transaction register that contains a complete record of  all moneys expended by the
institution and:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1322
SB 761
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) For each expenditure lists:
(i) The transaction amount;
(ii) The name of the payee;
(iii) The identification number of the transaction; and
(iv) A description of the expenditure, including the source of funds, a category  title, and
an object title for the expenditure;
(B) Includes all reimbursements for expenditures;
(C) Includes an entry for salary, wages or other compensation paid  to each individual
employee; and
(D) Is accompanied by a complete explanation of any codes or acronyms used to  identify
a payee or an expenditure; and
(g) Month-end financial statements that  show the current status of project budgets,
expenditures, commitments and balances.
(3) Social security numbers and any information that is expressly prohibited  from public
disclosure by federal or state law or regulation  must be redacted from any posting required
by this section.
(4) The information posted on the website of the institution must:
(a) Be accessible from the home page of the  institution’s website by use of not more than
three links;
(b) Be searchable by keywords and phrases;
(c) Be accessible to the public without requiring registration  or the use of a user name,
password or another user identification;
(d) Be updated on  a regular basis to present expenditure data for the current fiscal year;
and
(e) Retain expenditure data until 10 years of expenditure data are available, after which
the website shall retain at least the most recent 10 years of expenditure data.
(5) As used in this section, “administrative units”  means all schools, departments, of-
fices, programs and other administrative  subdivisions of a post-secondary institution of ed-
ucation.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Legislative Assembly may disapprove  any individual expenditure by
a public university listed in ORS 352.002 that is required to be posted on the  website of the
public university under section 1 of this 2023 Act. A public university may not make an ex-
penditure that the Legislative Assembly has disapproved under this subsection.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission by  rule shall adopt disciplinary
sanctions that must be:
(a) Adopted by each public university listed in ORS 352.002; and
(b) Applied against any employee at a public university who substantially interferes with
or prevents a public university from complying with a directive from  the Legislative As-
sembly under this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) Each post-secondary institution of education  that receives state moneys
shall:
(a) Inform students of the expected total cost of attending the institution;
(b) Accept responsibility for five percent of federally funded student  loans, including ac-
crued interest, defaulted on by students enrolled at  the institution who did not enroll in re-
medial classes while at the institution; and
[2]
SB 761
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Accept responsibility for 10 percent of federally funded student loans, including  ac-
crued interest, defaulted on by students enrolled at  the institution who enrolled in remedial
classes while at the institution.
(2) As used in this section, “remedial classes” means below-college-level courses  and
training in reading, writing and math that provide the competencies  necessary for a student
to succeed in college-level coursework.
SECTION 4.
(1) Each post-secondary  institution of education that receives state moneys
shall:
(a)(A) Calculate the percentage of the institution’s  total nonhospital expenditures that
the institution devotes to full-time faculty instruction; and
(B) Make  the information calculated under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph publicly
available on the website of the institution; and
(b) Dedicate at least 35 percent of the  institution’s nonhospital expenditures to full-time
faculty instruction.
(2) The information required to be calculated and  made publicly available under sub-
section (1)(a) of this section must:
(a) Be accessible from the home page of the  institution’s website by use of not more than
three links;
(b) Be searchable by keywords and phrases; and
(c) Be accessible to the public without requiring  registration or the use of a user name,
password or another user identification.
(3) As used in this section, “instruction”:
(a) Means faculty salary  and benefits of the colleges, schools, departments and other in-
structional divisions of the institution for academic credit activities; and
(b) Does not include academic administration,  community education, departmental re-
search, financial aid, general administration, institutional  support, noncredit activities,
overhead, preparatory and adult  basic education, public service, remedial education, re-
search, service-learning, student services or tutorial instruction.
SECTION 5.
(1) Each time a post-secondary institution of education  that receives state
moneys receives a gift from, or enters into a contract with, a foreign source, the value  of
which is $10,000 or more, considered alone or in combination with all other  gifts from or
contracts with that foreign  source within a calendar year, the institution shall post infor-
mation regarding the gift or contract prominently on the website  of the institution. The in-
formation required to be posted on the website under this subsection must include:
(a) The name of the foreign source, including the name of a foreign government agency;
(b) The purpose of the gift or contract;
(c) The full text of the gift or contract; and
(d) The full text of any conditions attached to the gift or contract.
(2) The information required to be posted on the website of the institution under  sub-
section (1) of this section:
(a) Must:
(A) Be accessible from the home page of the institution’s website by use of not more than
three links;
(B) Be searchable by keywords and phrases; and
(C) Be accessible to  the public without requiring registration or the use of a user name,
[3]
SB 761
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
password or another user identification;
(b) Applies to gifts made by foreign individuals, foreign organizations,  foreign states and
registered foreign agents;
(c) Applies to gifts conveyed from a foreign source to a post-secondary institution of ed-
ucation by means of an intermediary individual or entity; and
(d) Applies to in-kind gifts, with  the value of any in-kind gift counting towards the $10,000
threshold described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3)(a) Each public university listed in ORS 352.002 shall annually provide a report  to the
Higher Education  Coordinating Commission that lists each gift or contract the public uni-
versity was required to display on the website of  the public university under subsection (1)
of this section.
(b) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission  shall post on the website of the
commission a database of all  information the commission receives from public universities
under this section. The information posted on the commission’s website  under this para-
graph must:
(A) Be accessible from the home  page of the commission’s website by use of not more
than three links;
(B) Be searchable by keywords and phrases; and
(C) Be accessible to the public without requiring registration or the use of  a user name,
password or another user identification.
SECTION 6.
If any provision of sections 1 to 5 of this 2023 Act, or the application  of any
provision of sections 1 to 5 of this 2023 Act, to any person or circumstance, is held to  be
invalid, the remainder of sections 1 to 5 of this 2023 Act and the application of  the provisions
of sections 1 to 5 of this 2023 Act shall remain in effect to the degree possible.
[4]