Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) This section applies to any county during the  period in which the county
is listed as being at higher risk of financial distress in an audit report of the financial  con-
dition of counties issued by the Secretary of State.
(2)(a) The assessor and tax collector of each county shall make an annual determination
of the actual costs to the county of assessing property and collecting property taxes.
(b) The governing body of the  county shall include the costs in the annual budget of the
county.
(3) The tax collector shall withhold from the property tax  collection distribution made
pursuant to ORS 311.390 (1) an amount equal  to the amount of costs determined under sub-
section (2) of this section, after deducting the following amounts:
(a) All  funds received from the County Assessment Function Funding Assistance Account
under ORS 294.178; and
(b) All amounts  levied by taxing districts for the payment of bonded indebtedness plus
interest.
(4)(a) After determining the amount  of costs under subsection (2) of this section, the tax
collector shall apportion the costs among  the taxing districts in the county in proportion to
each district’s share of total county property  tax collections, including property tax col-
lections retained by the county.
(b) Costs  apportioned to a taxing district may not exceed two percent of the taxing
district’s distribution that is not bonded indebtedness plus interest.
(5) Moneys withheld by the tax collector under this section may be deposited  in an ac-
count of the county other than the unsegregated tax collections account.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2019 Act applies to property tax years beginning on or  after
July 1, 2020.
SECTION 3.  ORS 311.390 is amended to read:
311.390. (1)(a) When the tax collector receives the assessor’s certificate pursuant to ORS 311.115,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1105
HB 2359
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the tax collector shall  prepare and file with the county treasurer a percentage schedule of the ratio
of taxes on property, as defined in ORS 310.140,  and other amounts to be collected, after reductions
necessary to comply with section 11b, Article XI of the Oregon Constitution, after making adjust-
ments in accordance with ORS 311.105 (1)(c), for each governmental unit as shown in such  certif-
icate, compared to the total of each of those amounts.
(b) If a  tax supervising and conservation commission has submitted to the tax collector a list
of municipal corporations subject to proration and the amounts prorated under ORS 294.632, before
the tax collector calculates the ratio of  taxes on property under this subsection, the tax collector
shall deduct the amounts submitted by  the tax supervising and conservation commission from the
amounts scheduled for distribution under this section for  municipal corporations subject to the ju-
risdiction of the tax supervising and conservation commission. The amount deducted from the  dis-
tribution to the municipal corporations shall be added to the amount distributed to the county.
(c) The schedule shall be approved by the county accountant, if one exists in the  county, or by
the county clerk before filing. Except  as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
distribution of collections by the tax collector shall  be made on the basis of the ratios computed
pursuant to this section. The ratios computed pursuant to this section for a given  fiscal year shall
be used for the distribution of all  taxes on property or penalties that have been imposed, collected
and received for that fiscal year, regardless of the actual  date of receipt, except for moneys retained
by a county to  pay bankruptcy costs under ORS 311.484  and the amount withheld by a tax col-
lector under section 1 of this 2019  Act . Interest earned on moneys in the unsegregated tax col-
lections account shall be distributed according to  the ratio applicable to the year in which the
moneys are distributed.
(2) If, after the  ratios are computed pursuant to this section, the amount of a levy or other tax
on property is changed, or a levy or other tax on property is filed  with the assessor pursuant to
ORS 310.060 that had not been included in the tax distribution schedule for that year, the  tax col-
lector shall revise the percentages provided in subsection (1)  of this section to reflect the corrected
or added levy or tax and shall adjust the amounts previously distributed  and to be distributed
thereafter to reflect the revision in percentages.
(3) If, in the opinion of the tax collector, it is not feasible to make the revisions described  in
subsection (2) of this section, the  tax collector shall treat the amount of the change in levy or tax
or the additional levy or tax as a separate tax collection and segregate the moneys  collected for the
particular  district  or districts in the periodic statement of tax collections given to the county
treasurer pursuant to ORS 311.395.
(4) If the percentage schedule is  revised, a copy shall be filed with the county treasurer after
approval by the county accountant, if one exists in the county, or by the county clerk.
(5) If, after the ratios are computed under this section, a levy or tax is changed or a levy or tax
is filed with  the assessor pursuant to ORS 310.060, that was not included in the tax distribution
schedule for that year, future distributions of interest shall  be based on the revised percentages that
reflect the corrected or added levy or tax. No  adjustments shall be made for previously distributed
interest.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 311.395 is amended to read:
311.395. (1) The tax collector shall make statements of the exact amounts of property tax moneys
in cash and warrants collected as follows:
(a) For the  period beginning on the first Monday following the last Friday in October through
the last Friday in  November, the tax collector shall make weekly statements of those taxes that are
[2]
HB 2359
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
collected for the current tax year.
(b) For the period beginning the first  Monday following the last Friday of November through the
last Friday of October of the  ensuing year, the tax collector shall make quarterly statements of
those taxes that are collected for the current tax year.
(c) The tax collector shall make quarterly statements of taxes collected for prior years.
(d) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection, if the  balance in the unsegregated
tax collection account as of the close of any month for any tax year  (the current tax year or any
prior tax year) exceeds $10,000 or if requested  by any taxing district, and if weekly statements are
not required, then  the tax collector shall make a statement for the period since the last statement
for the tax year.
(e) If  the processing of tax payments for the current tax year received or postmarked on or be-
fore the November 15 due date (or if the due date is extended  under ORS 311.507, the due date
pursuant to the extension) is not substantially completed  as of the last Friday in November, the tax
collector shall continue to make weekly statements  until the end of a week when the processing is
substantially completed.
(2)(a) Each statement shall be of taxes collected during the weekly, monthly, quarterly  or other
period for which the statement is required.
(b) The statements prepared under subsection (1) of this section shall specify the tax years  for
which the payments of taxes were made.
(c) A copy of each statement shall be filed with the county clerk and a copy shall be  filed with
the county treasurer no later than  the fifth business day after the last business day of the period
for which the statement is prepared. A copy of each statement shall be retained in  the office of the
tax collector.
(3) For the purposes of this section, property tax moneys are collected when:
(a) Payment is made in person at the office of the tax collector;
(b) The tax collector receives tax moneys or notice of tax moneys collected by a financial  in-
stitution or other collection agency;
(c) The tax collector receives payment or notice of payment of tax moneys by the state; or
(d) The tax collector has posted a payment that arrived by mail in the county mail receptacle.
(4) Each statement required under subsections (1) and (2) of this  section shall separately state
the amount deposited into the property tax bankruptcy account  under ORS 311.484 and the amount
determined under section 1 of this 2019 Act  for the period covered by the statement.
(5) The statements required under subsections (1)  and (2) of this section may be made more often
and for  shorter periods if the tax collector so desires but one of the statements so filed shall cover
a period coinciding with  the last business day of the particular calendar month or quarter during
the period.
(6) The county treasurer shall credit  the total amount of moneys set out in the statements pre-
pared under subsections (1) and (2) of this  section, except for the amount deposited into the property
tax bankruptcy account under ORS  311.484 and the amount determined under section 1 of this
2019 Act, to the several funds for which the moneys were respectively received in  accordance with
the schedule provided in ORS 311.390. The county treasurer shall keep the  moneys and warrants
received from the tax collector in their respective funds.
(7) Within five business days of  receiving a statement required by subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, the county treasurer shall distribute the  amount of money set out in the statement, except
for the amount deposited into the property tax bankruptcy account under ORS  311.484  and the
[3]
HB 2359
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
amount determined under section 1 of this 2019 Act , to the several  taxing units according to the
ratios provided in ORS 311.390. The county treasurer shall  distribute interest earned on moneys in
the unsegregated tax collections  account at least as often as the treasurer receives a statement from
the tax collector under subsection (1)(b) or (d) of  this section. When statements are received under
subsection  (1)(a)  of this section, the county treasurer shall distribute interest at least once a calen-
dar month.
SECTION 5.  ORS 311.658 is amended to read:
311.658. (1) Each of the several counties shall collect and pay over as  required by law the
amount apportioned as provided under ORS 311.657 and 311.375 and this section.
(2) The state shall be considered a  taxing district for purposes of ORS 311.105. However, the
state shall not be included in any distribution of moneys (in lieu of  tax or otherwise) that are re-
quired to be apportioned among and offset  against the levy of one or more particular districts, but
only in the distribution of those tax moneys that are used to reduce the amount of  taxes extended
on the roll and collected by the tax collector.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 311.385, property tax moneys collected pursuant to  a state levy shall
not be deposited to the unsegregated tax collections account under ORS 311.385 but shall be de-
posited in the county treasury and distributed as provided under ORS 311.375.
(4) The  state shall not be included in the percentage distribution schedule under ORS 311.390
and shall not be considered a taxing district for purposes of section 1 of this 2019 Act .
(5) It shall not be necessary to change the values  of the particular descriptions of property as-
sessed in  each of the several counties on the assessment rolls on account of a state levy of ad
valorem property tax.
(6) No deduction or abatement shall be made from  the apportionment of any county because of
the delinquency of any taxpayer, or error or omission  in the assessment roll or for any other reason.
(7) In exercising its supervisory powers under ORS 306.115 (1), the Department  of Revenue may
adopt rules  governing the certification, apportionment, transmission of transcript, extension, offset,
collection and distribution of the state tax  levy. The Department of Revenue and the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services shall develop  procedures for informing the State Treasurer of
the condition  of any general obligation bond fund program and any state levy anticipated or made
under this section.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 311.385 is amended to read:
311.385. (1) The tax collector shall deposit all property tax moneys  with the county treasurer
no later than:
(a) One business day after:
(A) Payment of the moneys is made in person at the office of the tax collector; or
(B) The tax collector receives moneys collected by  a financial institution or other collection
agency; or
(b) Thirty calendar days after the payment arrives by mail in the county mail receptacle.
(2) The tax collector shall take a receipt for all moneys deposited with the county treasurer.
(3) Property tax moneys shall not be deposited in any account other  than the unsegregated tax
collections account, except as provided  in ORS 311.370, 311.484 and 311.508 and section 1 of this
2019 Act .
(4) No later than one business day after  receiving notice of collection of tax moneys by a fi-
nancial institution or other  collection agency, the tax collector shall notify the county treasurer of
the collection of those tax moneys.
[4]
HB 2359
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
(5) Except as provided in ORS 311.370, 311.484 and 311.508  and section 1  of this 2019 Act , the
county treasurer shall deposit all property tax moneys to an account  in the records of the county
treasurer designated as the  unsegregated tax collections account. Only those moneys that will be
distributed under ORS 311.390 and interest earned from the investment of those  moneys shall be
deposited to the unsegregated tax collections account.
(6) As used in this section, “property tax moneys”  includes all ad valorem taxes and all taxes
on property, as defined in ORS 310.140, and all other amounts specifically authorized by law to be
included on the assessment and tax roll, that are certified for collection under ORS 310.060 or  other
law and any interest on those taxes.
SECTION 7.
The amendments to ORS 311.385, 311.390,  311.395 and 311.658 by sections 3
to 6 of this 2019 Act apply to property tax years beginning on or after July 1, 2020.
SECTION 8. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[5]