Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “safe entry point” means an entry  to a school
building that is visually monitored  by an employee of the school district or education service
district.
(2) The Department of Education shall develop and  administer a grant program under
which the department distributes moneys from the Safe Entry Grant Fund established in
section 2 of this 2019 Act to school districts and education service  districts to create safe
entry points. As a condition of receiving a grant under  the program, grant recipients must
agree to  create a single safe entry point to each school building and convert all other existing
entry points to exit-only points.
(3) The State  Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the administration
of the grant program.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Safe Entry Grant  Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned on the moneys in the Safe  Entry Grant
Fund must be deposited in the fund. The Safe Entry Grant Fund consists of moneys deposited
in the fund under section 3 of this 2019 Act and may include fees, revenues or other  income
deposited into the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the  Department of Education for
the purposes described in section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at the request  of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the State Board
of Education, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant  to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $___ in net proceeds for the  purposes de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount  estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds  of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Department of Education for deposit in the Safe Entry Grant Fund established under  section
2 of this 2019 Act to be used for the purposes set forth in section 2 of this 2019 Act.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will create  jobs,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3489
HB 3241
1
2
3
4
5
further economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding that
improving safety and security in schools will further the aims and  increase the efficacy of
public education.
[2]