Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
REPORTING ON RACIAL DISPARITIES IN HOMEOWNERSHIP
SECTION 1.
(1) On or before September 15 of each even-numbered year, the Housing and
Community Services Department, in coordination with the Department  of Land Conservation
and Development and the Department of Consumer and Business Services, shall provide a
report to the appropriate interim committees of the Legislative Assembly in  the manner
provided in ORS 192.245 on:
(a) Measurable changes in disparities in homeownership by communities of color in this
state;  and
(b) Progress made on the recommendations of the Joint Task  Force on Addressing Racial
Disparities in Home Ownership under section 4, chapter 506, Oregon Laws 2021.
(2) The Housing and  Community Services Department may contract with the Fair Hous-
ing Council of Oregon or other nonprofits to collect or analyze data to  complete the report
requirements under subsection (1)(a) of this section.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2035.
DOWN PAYMENT ASSISTANCE
SECTION 3. (1) On or before December 31, 2024, the Housing  and Community Services
Department shall review  its policies and rules related to programs administered by the de-
partment that provide down payment assistance to lower income individuals  and shall take
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3867-1
HB 3488
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
any available steps, including rulemaking, to remove  barriers to accessing down payment
assistance for individuals without a Social Security number who have an individual taxpayer
identification number.
(2) On or before June 30, 2024,  the department shall provide a report to the Oregon
Housing Stability Council on its findings, actions, progress and future plans with regard to
implementing subsection (1) of this section.
ASSISTING HOMEOWNERSHIP ORGANIZATIONS
SECTION 4.
The Housing and Community Services Department, in coordination with
culturally responsive or culturally specific organizations, as those  terms are defined in ORS
456.005, within this state that support homeownership, shall:
(1) On or before December 31, 2025:
(a) Convene one or more peer learning and networking  events for housing counselors and
other persons who support homeownership programs; and
(b) Convene one or more  virtual training programs to support housing counselors and
other persons who support homeownership programs; and
(2) On or before June 30, 2024:
(a) Conduct an evaluation of various programs, applications, platforms and  software used
by homeownership programs and develop recommendations  for programs to streamline
evaluation and reporting procedures; and
(b) Provide a report  to the Oregon Housing Stability Council on the evaluation required
under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 5.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for  the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $200,000, to perform the actions required
under section 4 of this 2023 Act.
HOMEOWNER FINANCIAL LITERACY
SECTION 6. Sections 7 and 8 of this 2023 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 458.600
to 458.665.
SECTION 7. The Housing and Community Services Department, in consultation with the
Department of  Consumer and Business Services and the Bureau of Labor and Industries,
shall:
(1) By rule, develop and  periodically update a financial literacy pamphlet that will help
individuals make informed decisions about  personal finances and homeownership, including
information on individualized prepurchase education  and counseling programs and home
purchaser assistance programs.
(2) Translate the financial literacy pamphlet into the five  most commonly spoken lan-
guages in this state other than English.
(3) Distribute the financial literacy pamphlet  to mortgage brokers and mortgage bankers
in this state.
SECTION 8. (1) On or before September 15, 2025, the Housing and Community Services
Department, in consultation with the Department of  Consumer and Business Services, shall:
[2]
HB 3488
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Inventory and evaluate existing  national, state and local materials and curriculums
for:
(A) Prepurchase financial literacy education for home purchasers; and
(B) Financial literacy for existing homeowners, including  homeowners who need assist-
ance retaining their home or are at risk of foreclosure;
(b) Adopt by rule the financial literacy  pamphlet required under section 7 of this 2023
Act based on  the inventory and evaluation of materials under paragraph (a) of this sub-
section; and
(c) Develop a collection of  financial literacy education best practices and develop new
materials for use by the Housing and Community Services Department and  to be made pub-
licly available for financial educational purposes.
(2) In inventorying and evaluating materials under subsection (1)(a) of  this section, the
department shall include materials that:
(a) Directly relate to purchasing a home, including how to  establish good credit, the im-
portance of savings, budgeting and investing;
(b) Include information on down payment assistance, individual development  accounts
and other mortgage and homeownership assistance;
(c) Are accessible, culturally and geographically relevant and easy to adapt  and imple-
ment; and
(d) Are  provided in the five most commonly spoken languages in Oregon, other than
English.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 458.655 is amended to read:
458.655. (1) The Home Ownership Assistance Account is administered by the Housing and  Com-
munity Services Department to expand this state’s  supply of homeownership housing for families and
individuals with income at or below area median  income, including persons over 65 years of age,
persons of color, indigenous persons, members of federally recognized Indian  tribes, persons with
disabilities, veterans and agricultural workers. An  amount equal to 25 percent of moneys deposited
in the account pursuant  to ORS 294.187 is dedicated for expenditure to expand this state’s supply
of homeownership housing for veterans and families of veterans. The Oregon  Housing Stability
Council shall have a policy of distributing funds statewide while concentrating  funds in those areas
of this state with the greatest need, as determined by the council. The  council’s policy of distribut-
ing funds may differ from the distribution policy for the Housing Development and  Guarantee Ac-
count.
(2) Funds in the Home Ownership Assistance Account must be used for:
(a) Grants to organizations that provide down payment assistance;
(b) Grants to organizations that both sponsor and  manage homeownership programs for house-
holds with income at or below area median income; [ or]
(c) Grants and technical assistance to organizations that, in working with  households with in-
come at or  below area median income, assist persons of color in obtaining homeownership under
ORS 458.658[.]; or
(d) Developing and promoting the financial literacy pamphlet under section  7 of this 2023
Act.
(3) The council shall develop a policy for disbursing grants or technical  assistance under sub-
section (2) of this section for any or all of the following purposes:
(a) To  aid homeownership programs for households with income at or below area median income,
[3]
HB 3488
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
including program administration, providing assistance with down payment costs, or providing
homeownership training and qualification services or any  combination thereof. Funds in the Home
Ownership Assistance Account may not be used by an organization to pay for its  general operations
that do not support homeownership.
(b) To match public and private moneys available  from other sources to provide homeownership
assistance for households with income at or below area median income.
(c) To administer the Home Ownership Assistance Account as provided  for in the legislatively
approved  budget,  as that term is defined in ORS 291.002, for the Housing and Community Services
Department.
(4) The council, in developing policy under subsection (3) of  this section, shall give preference
in making grants to those entities that propose to:
(a) Ensure long-term affordability  and opportunities for generational wealth building, including
through loan forgiveness or shared equity;
(b) Ensure the longest  use for the units as homeownership housing units for households with
income at or below  area median income, such as by including some form of equity recapture, land
trust or shared equity provisions, as determined by the council;
(c) Include services for  occupants and proposed occupants of housing including homeownership
training, mortgage qualification service and financial literacy; and
(d) Support a comprehensive strategy to reverse the decreasing rates  of homeownership among
persons of color, giving priority to activities that support and  incorporate best practices or demon-
strate proven success in increasing homeownership for persons of color  or receive grants or tech-
nical assistance under ORS 458.658.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 86A.169 is amended to read:
86A.169. Prior to the closing of any mortgage loan  or any mortgage banking loan, the mortgage
banker or mortgage broker shall supply the borrower with :
(1) A disclosure as required by the  real estate lending provisions of 15 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. and
Regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Part 226[.]; and
(2) The financial literacy pamphlet developed under section 7 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 86A.198 is amended to read:
86A.198. (1) A mortgage banker, a mortgage broker or a mortgage loan originator shall  provide
in writing the materials identified in subsection (2) of this section  to a borrower if the mortgage
banker, mortgage broker or mortgage loan originator:
(a) Communicates or causes to be communicated an advertisement in a language other  than
English or otherwise solicits business in a language other than English; and
(b) Offers to negotiate or make, or negotiates or makes, a residential mortgage  transaction in
the course of which a substantial portion of the communication with the borrower that is related
to the transaction takes place in the language other than English that was  used to communicate the
advertisement or make the solicitation.
(2) A mortgage banker, mortgage broker or mortgage loan originator that takes an action de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section  shall provide the following materials to the borrower in
English and in the language other than English in which a substantial portion  of the communication
that is related to the transaction takes place:
(a) A good faith estimate required under the Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act, 12  U.S.C.
2601 et seq., and under Regulation X, 24 C.F.R. part 3500, as enacted  or promulgated on January
1, 2010;
[4]
HB 3488
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
(b) The  disclosures related to the transaction that are required under the Truth in Lending Act,
15 U.S.C. 1601 et seq., and under  Regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. part 226, as enacted or promulgated on
January 1, 2010; [ and]
(c) A  statement notifying the borrower that loan documents associated with the transaction will
be in English and advising the borrower to obtain  appropriate assistance with any necessary
translations[ .]; and
(d) The financial literacy pamphlet developed under section 7 of this 2023 Act.
(3) The Director  of the Department of Consumer and Business Services shall develop and dis-
tribute translated versions of the materials identified in subsection [ (2)] (2)(a) to (c)  of this section
in the three languages other than English that are most commonly spoken in this state.
SECTION 12.
The amendments to ORS 86A.169 and 86A.198 by sections 10  and 11 of this
2023 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
UNIT CAPTIONS
SECTION 13. The unit captions used in this 2023 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
[5]