Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, in consultation with
the Department of Land Conservation and  Development and the Housing and Community
Services Department, shall provide 12 grants, with one for each region as described in ORS
285A.116 (1), to establish a regional housing coordinator for each region.
(2) A regional housing coordinator shall partner and consult with local governments, de-
velopers, financiers, the Department of Land Conservation and Development, the  Housing
and Community Services Department, other relevant  state agencies and other interested
partners to enable local governments throughout the region to encourage  the development
of needed housing as defined in ORS 197.303 by:
(a) Bridging any information gaps;
(b) Identifying and securing needed resources;
(c) Connecting producers of needed housing with consumers of needed housing; and
(d) Working with representatives  of historically underrepresented groups to overcome
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2044
HB 3174
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
community-specific barriers to obtaining housing.
(3) Grants under this section may be awarded to  cities or counties within the region or,
with the support of cities and counties within a region, to a  council of governments as de-
fined in ORS 294.900 or to a partnership among local governments.
(4) A partnership among local governments is eligible for grants  under this section only
if all participating governments have executed agreements memorializing their partnership.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, in consultation with
the Department of Land Conservation and Development and Housing  and Community Ser-
vices Department, shall provide grants to cities or counties or, with the  support of cities and
counties within a region,  to a council of governments as defined in ORS 294.900 or to a
partnership among local governments.
(2) Grants under this section must be used to support the administration, planning,  per-
mitting, land use approval, public works, building code, inspecting and compliance needs of
the city to review and approve needed housing development.
(3) A recipient receiving a grant under this section shall agree to:
(a) Regardless of population, provide the Housing and  Community Services Department
with the report described in ORS 456.586 (4); and
(b) Within two years of receiving the grant:
(A) If the applicant is a city with an  approved housing production strategy under ORS
197.290, implement one or more components of the strategy; or
(B) If the  applicant does not have an approved housing production strategy, take other
steps to address housing deficiencies identified in the city’s most recent  housing capacity
analysis.
(4) A partnership among governments is  eligible for grants under this section only if all
participating governments have:
(a) Executed agreements memorializing their partnership; and
(b) Adopted resolutions declaring a commitment to use  the grant to facilitate the devel-
opment of needed housing.
SECTION 3.
Grants under section 2 of this 2023 Act must be awarded based on:
(1) The number of residential building permits approved within  the jurisdiction of the
applicant in the most recent two-year period for which data is available  under ORS 456.586
(4); or
(2) If data under  subsection (1) of this section is unavailable, the most recently calculated
estimated needed housing as defined in ORS 197.303.
SECTION 4. The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall provide grants in
equal amounts to the Association of Oregon Counties  and the League of Oregon Cities for
the purposes of:
(1) In consultation with the Department of  Land Conservation and Development, coordi-
nating with each other to create a statewide education program designed  to explain Oregon’s
unique land use  system, as well as the causes of Oregon’s housing crisis and the potential
solutions to it, for delivery to the governing body and staff of local governments; and
(2) Each recruiting and hiring a state housing liaison, who shall:
(a) Serve as a conduit of information among  the state housing liaison’s respective local
government members, housing coordinators, state  agencies, the regional solutions centers
described in ORS 284.754, the Governor’s office and the Legislative Assembly  on matters re-
[2]
HB 3174
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
lated to housing production; and
(b) Encourage the development of needed  housing by facilitating communication, coordi-
nating activities and maintaining  mutually beneficial relationships among the persons de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 5.
(1) On or before July 1 of each year:
(a) Recipients of grants under section 1 of this 2023 Act shall submit a report to the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services describing the steps regional housing coordi-
nators took to encourage the development of needed housing;
(b) Recipients of grants under section 2 of this 2023 Act shall submit a report to the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services and the Department of Land  Conservation
and Development on  the activities funded by the grant, including the types of tasks staff
performed and the number of housing permits facilitated; and
(c) Recipients  of grants under section 4 of this 2023 Act shall submit a report to the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services describing the education programs and the
activities of the state housing liaisons.
(2) On or before December 31  of each year, the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services shall compile the reports received by the  department under this section and trans-
mit the reports to an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly relating to housing.
SECTION 6.
Section 5 of this 2023 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2024.
SECTION 7.  If House Bill 2889 becomes law, section 3 of this 2023 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  Grants under section  2 of this 2023 Act must be awarded based on[ :] the housing pro-
duction targets, as described in section 4, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House
Bill 2889), within the jurisdiction of the applicant.
[(1) The  number of residential building permits approved within the jurisdiction of the applicant
in the most recent two-year period for which data is available under ORS 456.586 (4); or ]
[(2) If data under subsection (1) of this section is unavailable, the most recently calculated esti-
mated needed housing as defined in ORS 197.303. ]
SECTION 8. If House Bill 2889 becomes law, the amendments to section 3 of this 2023
Act by section 7 of this 2023 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 9. The division of  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services that
serves as the office of economic analysis, in consultation with the Department of Land Con-
servation and Development and Housing and Community Services Department, shall:
(1) Develop a survey of local governments’ use of staff time that is required to produce
housing, including the time spent to process  appeals of quasi-judicial or legislative decisions
of the local government related  to housing and to review housing permits, building in-
spections for housing, needed comprehensive plan revisions or amendments  to land use reg-
ulations related to housing required by changes to law,  and adoption of conditional use
permits for housing; and
(2) On or before September 15 of each year,  conduct the survey, collect survey results
and provide a report to an appropriate interim  committee of the Legislative Assembly in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245 on the office’s summary and analysis of the  survey and any
other data collected or used in the analysis.
SECTION 10.
Sections 1 to 5 and 9 of this 2023 Act are repealed on January 2, 2034.
SECTION 11.  If House Bill 2889 becomes law, section 10 of this 2023 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 10. (1) Sections 1 , 2, 4, [to] 5 and 9 of this 2023 Act are repealed on January 2, 2034.
[3]
HB 3174
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
(2) Section 3, as amended by section 7 of this 2023 Act, is repealed on January 2, 2034.
SECTION 11.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund:
(1) The amount of $3,600,000, to provide grants under section 1 of this 2023 Act.
(2) The amount of $45,000,000, to provide grants under section 2 of this 2023 Act.
(3) The amount of $500,000, to provide grants under section 4 (1) of this 2023 Act.
(4) The amount of $600,000, to provide grants under section 4 (2) of this 2023 Act.
(5) The amount of $100,000, to  perform the analysis and provide the report required under
section 9 of this 2023 Act.
(6) The amount of $250,000, to administer grants and reports under sections 1 to 5 of this
2023 Act.
SECTION 12.
This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]