Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in  this section, “behavioral health care facility” includes any of
the following that primarily provide care or treatment to individuals with behavioral health
disorders:
(a) Residential treatment facilities as defined in ORS 443.400;
(b) Secure residential treatment facilities as described in ORS 443.465;
(c) Health care facilities as defined in ORS 442.015;
(d) Sobering facilities, detoxification centers and halfway houses as  those terms are de-
fined in ORS 430.306; or
(e) Other facilities prescribed by rule by the Oregon Health Authority.
(2) A behavioral health care facility must have in place a safety plan to ensure  the safety
of the employees of the facility from harm caused by clients of the facility. A safety plan:
(a) May include staff training in  mental health awareness, substance use and addiction,
crisis intervention and de-escalation, patient acuity assessments or trauma-informed care;
(b) Must include safe staffing ratios for employees in each department of the facility  who
engage directly with clients;
(c) Must take into account client acuity; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 14
SB 1594
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) May include but is not limited to:
(A) Proper internal communication procedures;
(B) Procedures restricting  access to high-risk areas such as roofs or balconies and lim-
iting the access of clients to objects that  could be used to injure oneself or others such as
knives, sharp glass, scissors or certain types of medication; or
(C) Procedures restricting client access to staff.
(3) A facility’s  management must submit the safety plan to the authority by September
1 and every two years thereafter.
(4) If any employee of a behavioral health  care facility is included within a collective
bargaining unit, the management of the behavioral health care facility shall:
(a) Provide the management’s proposed safety plan to and solicit feedback  from the labor
organization that is the exclusive representative of the collective bargaining unit.
(b) Give the exclusive representative of the collective bargaining unit  60 days from re-
ceipt of the proposed safety plan to provide feedback.
(c) Submit the final safety plan to the exclusive representative of  the collective bargain-
ing unit to submit to the employees within the collective bargaining unit for  approval by a
majority vote. The collective bargaining unit must approve or reject the safety  plan no later
than 30 days after receipt of the plan from management.
(5) If a collective bargaining unit fails to approve a safety plan by a majority  vote, the
exclusive representative of the collective bargaining unit  may submit an alternative safety
plan no later than 60 days after the  date the plan was rejected. The management of the be-
havioral health care facility shall submit to the authority the final  safety plan proposed by
the management and the alternative safety plan proposed by  the exclusive representative of
the collective bargaining unit. The authority may modify the  management’s final safety plan
based on the feedback from the exclusive representative  of the collective bargaining unit or
based on best practices.
(6) If the  management of the facility fails to submit a safety plan or submits a safety plan
to the authority 90 days  or more after the September 1 deadline, the employees within the
collective bargaining unit may develop and adopt a safety plan for the facility.
(7)(a) The authority shall maintain a process for a behavioral health care  facility staff
person or an exclusive representative of the staff person’s collective bargaining  unit to sub-
mit a  complaint to the authority through the authority’s website, anonymously if the
complainant so chooses, alleging a violation of the facility’s safety plan.
(b) No later than 14  days after receiving a complaint, the authority shall send a copy of
the complaint to the exclusive representative, if any, of the complainant’s or complainants’
collective bargaining unit.
(c) No later than 30 days after receiving a  complaint of a violation of a facility’s safety
plan, the authority shall open an investigation of the facility and provide  a notice of the in-
vestigation to the facility, the complainant or the complainants and the exclusive represen-
tative, if any, of the complainant  or complainants. The notice must include a summary of the
complaint that does not include a complainant’s name or the specific date, shift or  unit, but
does include the calendar week, in which the complaint arose.
(d) No later than 90 days after opening the investigation,  the authority shall conclude the
investigation and provide a written report on the complaint to the facility, the complainant
or complainants and the exclusive representative, if any, of the complainant or complainants.
[2]
SB 1594
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
The report:
(A) Shall include a summary of the complaint;
(B) Shall include the nature of the alleged violation or violations;
(C) Shall include the authority’s findings and factual bases for the findings;
(D) Shall include any other information  the authority determines is appropriate to in-
clude in the report; and
(E) May not include the name of  any complainant, the name of any patient or the names
of any individuals that the authority interviewed in investigating the complaint.
(e) If the authority issues a warning or imposes one or more civil  penalties based on the
report described in paragraph (d) of this subsection, the  authority shall provide a notice of
the civil penalty to the facility, the complainant  or complainants and the exclusive repre-
sentative, if any, of the complainant or  complainants. The notice must comply with ORS
183.415 and 183.745.
(f) In determining whether to impose a civil penalty under section  2 of this 2024 Act, the
authority shall consider all relevant evidence, including but not limited  to witness testimony,
written documents and the observations of the investigator.
(8) The authority shall maintain  a database of all safety plans and make them available
to the public.
(9) The authority shall track any trends of violations in behavioral health care facilities
that are  found by the Occupational Safety and Health Division of the Department of Con-
sumer and Business Services to identify root causes of incidents and develop harm reduction
strategies.  The  authority shall periodically report on its findings under this subsection and
make its reports publicly available.
(10) The authority may audit a behavioral health care facility for the purpose of  ensuring
that the facility meets rules and standards for the safety of behavioral health care facility
staff.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall impose a civil penalty in  accordance
with ORS 183.745 on a behavioral health care facility, as defined in section 1 of this 2024 Act,
that demonstrates a pattern of failing to comply with section 1 of this 2024 Act.
(2) If the management  of a facility fails to submit a safety plan to the authority by the
September 1 deadline, the authority may impose a civil penalty of:
(a) $250 for submitting a safety plan to the authority 30 to 59 days  after the September
1 deadline;
(b) $500 for submitting a safety plan  to authority 60 to 89 days after the September 1
deadline; and
(c) $750 for submitting a safety plan 90 days or more after the September 1 deadline.
(3) If the management of a facility fails to submit  a safety plan to the authority more
than 90 days after  the September 1 deadline, the penalties shall increase by $250 every 30
days unless the employees of the facility are in a collective bargaining unit and the bargain-
ing unit adopts a safety plan for the facility in accordance with section 1 (6) of this 2024 Act.
(4) If a behavioral health care facility fails to comply with an element of the facility’s
safety plan, the authority shall issue  a warning for the first violation and may impose a civil
penalty of:
(a) $250 for the second violation;
(b) $500 for the third violation; and
[3]
SB 1594
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
(c) $1000 for the fourth and each subsequent violation.
SECTION 3.
(1) The United We Heal Medicaid Payment Program is established in the
Oregon Health Authority.  The goal of the program is to increase the available behavioral
health care workforce in this state. The authority shall provide payments to  employers of
behavioral health care providers to enable the employers to  offer the providers enhanced
apprenticeship and training programs and opportunities.
(2) The authority shall prescribe by rule eligibility criteria for  receiving the payments
consistent with the goal of the program expressed in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) To  participate in the program, an employer must enter into a memorandum of
understanding with the authority specifying how the payments will  be used. The authority
shall terminate payments if the employer fails to abide by or violates the terms  of the
memorandum of understanding. An employer may request a contested case proceeding to
challenge a termination.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $4,700,000, which may be expended  for carrying out section 3 of this
2024 Act.
[4]