Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 426.005 is amended to read:
426.005. (1) As used in ORS 426.005 to 426.390, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) “Community mental health program director” means the director of an entity that  provides
the services described in ORS 430.630 (3) to (5).
(b) “Dangerous to self or others” means likely to  inflict serious physical harm upon self
or another person within the next 30 days.
[(b)] (c)  “Director of the facility” means a  superintendent of a state mental hospital, the chief
of psychiatric services in a community hospital or the  person in charge of treatment and rehabili-
tation programs at other treatment facilities.
[(c)] (d)  “Facility” means a state  mental hospital, community hospital, residential facility,
detoxification center, day treatment facility  or such other facility as the authority determines suit-
able that provides diagnosis and evaluation, medical  care, detoxification, social services or rehabil-
itation to persons who  are in custody during a prehearing period of detention or who have been
committed to the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 426.130.
[(d)] (e)  “Licensed independent practitioner” means:
(A) A physician, as defined in ORS 677.010;
(B) A nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 and  authorized to write prescriptions under
ORS 678.390; or
(C) A naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685.
[(e)] (f)  “Nonhospital facility” means any facility, other than a hospital, that is  approved by the
authority to provide adequate security, psychiatric, nursing and other services to persons under ORS
426.232 or 426.233.
[(f)] (g)  “Person with mental illness” means a  person who, because of a mental disorder, is one
or more of the following:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 181
HB 4074
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Dangerous to self or others.
(B) Unable to provide  for basic personal needs that are necessary to avoid serious physical harm
in the near future, and is not receiving such care as is necessary to avoid such harm.
(C) A person:
(i) With a chronic mental illness, as defined in ORS 426.495;
(ii) Who, within  the previous three years, has twice been placed in a hospital or approved in-
patient facility by the authority or the Department of Human Services under ORS 426.060;
(iii) Who is exhibiting symptoms or behavior substantially similar to  those that preceded and led
to one or more of the hospitalizations or inpatient placements referred to  in sub-subparagraph (ii)
of this subparagraph; and
(iv) Who, unless treated, will continue, to a reasonable  medical probability, to physically or
mentally deteriorate so that  the person will become a person described under either subparagraph
(A) or (B) of this paragraph or both.
[(g)] (h)  “Prehearing period of detention” means a period  of time calculated from the initiation
of custody during which a person may be detained under ORS 426.228, 426.231, 426.232 or 426.233.
(2) Whenever a community mental health program director, director of the  facility, superinten-
dent of a state hospital or administrator of a facility is  referred to, the reference includes any
designee such person has designated to act on the person’s behalf in the exercise of duties.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 426.130 is amended to read:
426.130. (1) After hearing all of the evidence, and reviewing the findings  of the examiners, the
court shall determine whether the person has a  mental illness and is in need of treatment.  In de-
termining whether a person has a mental illness based on the person being dangerous to self
or others, the court:
(a) May consider, but is not limited to considering, the following:
(A) The person’s threat or attempt to commit suicide  or inflict serious physical harm
upon self.
(B) The person’s threat to inflict serious physical harm upon another person, if:
(i) The threat is followed by  any action that a reasonable person would believe is intended
to carry out the threat; and
(ii) The threat would place a reasonable person in  fear of imminent serious physical
harm.
(C) The person’s attempt to inflict serious physical harm upon another person,  if the
attempt would place a reasonable person in fear of imminent serious physical harm.
(D) Any past behavior by the person that  resulted in physical harm to self or physical
harm to another person.
(b) Shall consider, at  a minimum, when assessing the relevance of the person’s past be-
havior, how recently  the past behavior occurred and the frequency and severity and the past
behavior.
(2) If, in the opinion of the court, the person:
(a) Is a person with mental illness based upon clear and convincing evidence, the court:
(A) Shall order the release of the person and dismiss the case if:
(i) The person is willing and able to participate in treatment on a voluntary basis; and
(ii) The court finds that the person will probably do so.
(B) May order conditional release  under this subparagraph subject to the qualifications and re-
quirements under ORS 426.125. If the court orders conditional release under this subparagraph, the
[2]
HB 4074
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
court shall establish a period of commitment for the conditional release.
(C) May order commitment of the person with mental illness to  the Oregon Health Authority for
treatment if, in the opinion of the court, subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph is  not in the best
interest of the person. If the court orders commitment under this subparagraph:
(i) The court shall establish a period of commitment.
(ii) The authority may place the committed person in  outpatient commitment under ORS 426.127.
(D) Shall order that the person be prohibited from purchasing or possessing a firearm  if, in the
opinion of the court, there is a reasonable likelihood the person [ would constitute a danger ] is dan-
gerous to  self or others or to the community at large as a result of the person’s mental or psycho-
logical state as demonstrated by past behavior or participation in incidents  involving unlawful
violence or threats of unlawful violence, or by reason of a single incident  of extreme, violent, un-
lawful conduct. When a court  makes an order under this subparagraph, the court shall cause a copy
of the order to be delivered to the sheriff of the county who will enter the information into the Law
Enforcement Data System.
(b) Is not a person with mental illness, the court shall release the person from custody if the
person has been detained under ORS 426.070, 426.180, 426.228, 426.232 or 426.233 and:
(A) Dismiss the case; or
(B) Order the person to participate in assisted outpatient treatment in  accordance with ORS
426.133. The court may continue the proceeding for no more than seven  days to allow time for the
community mental health program director to develop the person’s assisted outpatient  treatment
plan.
[(2)] (3)  A court that orders a  conditional release, a commitment or assisted outpatient treat-
ment under this section shall establish a period of  commitment or treatment for the person subject
to the order. Any period of commitment ordered for commitment  or conditional release under this
section shall be for a period of time not to exceed 180 days. A  period of assisted outpatient treat-
ment shall be for a period of time not to exceed 12 months.
[(3)] (4)  If the commitment  proceeding was initiated under ORS 426.070 (1)(a) and if the notice
included a request under ORS 426.070 (2)(d)(B), the court shall notify the  two persons of the court’s
determination under [ subsection (1) of ] this section.
[(4)] (5)  If the court finds that the person is a person with mental illness and either orders
commitment under subsection [ (1)(a)(B)] (2)(a)(B)  or (C) of this section or enters an order under
subsection  [ (1)(a)(D)] (2)(a)(D)  of this section, the court shall notify the person that the person is
prohibited from purchasing or  possessing a firearm under state and federal law unless the person
obtains relief from the prohibition from the Psychiatric Security  Review Board under ORS 166.273
or under federal law.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 426.070 is amended to read:
426.070. (1) Any of the following may initiate commitment procedures under this section by giv-
ing the notice described under subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Two persons;
(b) The local health officer; or
(c) Any magistrate or any judge of a  court of a federally recognized Indian tribe located in this
state.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, the notice must comply with the following:
(a) It must be in writing under oath;
(b) It must  be given to the community mental health program director or a designee of the di-
[3]
HB 4074
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
rector in the county where the person alleged to have a mental illness resides;
(c) It must state that a person within  the county other than the person giving the notice is a
person with mental illness and is in need of treatment, care or custody;
(d) If the commitment proceeding is initiated by two persons under subsection (1)(a) of this sec-
tion, it may include a request that the court notify the two persons:
(A) Of the issuance or nonissuance of a warrant under this section; or
(B) Of the court’s determination under ORS 426.130 [ (1)]; and
(e) If the notice contains a request under paragraph (d) of  this subsection, it must also include
the addresses of the two persons making the request.
(3) Upon receipt of a notice under subsections (1) and (2) of this section or  when notified by a
circuit court that the court  received notice under ORS 426.234, the community mental health pro-
gram director, or designee of the director, shall:
(a) Immediately notify  the judge of the court having jurisdiction for that county under ORS
426.060 of the notification described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(b) Immediately notify the Oregon Health Authority if  commitment is proposed because the
person appears to be a person with mental illness, as defined in ORS 426.005 [ (1)(f)(C)] (1)(g)(C) .
When such notice is received, the authority may verify, to the extent known  by the authority,
whether or not the  person meets the criteria described in ORS 426.005 [ (1)(f)(C)(i)] (1)(g)(C)(i) and
(ii) and so inform the community mental health program director or designee of the director.
(c) Initiate an investigation under ORS 426.074 to determine whether  there is probable cause to
believe that the person is in fact a person with mental illness.
(4) Upon completion, a recommendation based upon the investigation  report under ORS 426.074
shall be promptly submitted  to the court. If the community mental health program director deter-
mines that probable cause does  not exist to believe that a person released from detention under ORS
426.234 (2)(c) or (3)(b) is a person  with mental illness, the community mental health program director
may recommend assisted outpatient treatment in accordance with ORS 426.133.
(5) When the court receives notice under subsection (3) of this section:
(a) If the court, following the investigation, concludes  that there is probable cause to believe
that the person investigated is a person  with mental illness, it shall, through the issuance of a ci-
tation as provided in ORS 426.090, cause the person to be  brought before it at a time and place as
it may direct, for a hearing under ORS 426.095 to determine whether the person is a  person with
mental illness. The person shall be given the opportunity to  appear voluntarily at the hearing unless
the person fails to appear or unless the person is detained pursuant to  paragraph (b) of this sub-
section.
(b)(A) If the court  finds that there is probable cause to believe that failure to take the person
into custody pending the investigation or hearing would pose serious harm or danger to the  person
or to others, the court  may issue a warrant of detention to the community mental health program
director or designee or the sheriff of the county or designee directing the director, sheriff  or a
designee to take the person alleged to have a mental illness into custody and produce  the person
at the time and place stated in the warrant.
(B) At the time the person is taken into custody, the person shall be informed  by the community
mental health program director, the sheriff or a designee of the following:
(i) The person’s rights with regard to representation by or appointment of  counsel as described
in ORS 426.100;
(ii) The warning under ORS 426.123; and
[4]
HB 4074
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(iii) The person’s right, if the  community mental health program director, sheriff or designee
reasonably suspects that the person is a foreign national, to  communicate with an official from the
consulate of the person’s country. A community mental health program director, sheriff or  designee
is not civilly or criminally liable for failure  to provide the information required by this sub-
subparagraph. Failure  to provide the information required by this sub-subparagraph does not in itself
constitute grounds for the exclusion of evidence that would otherwise be  admissible in a proceeding.
(C) The court may make any orders for the care and custody of  the person prior to the hearing
as it considers necessary.
(c) If the notice includes a request under  subsection (2)(d)(A) of this section, the court shall
notify the two persons of the issuance or nonissuance of a warrant under this subsection.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 426.074 is amended to read:
426.074. The following is applicable to an investigation initiated  by a community mental health
program director, or a designee of the director, as part of commitment procedures under ORS
426.070 and 426.228 to 426.235:
(1) If the person alleged to have a mental illness  is held in custody before the hearing the in-
vestigation shall be completed at  least 24 hours before the hearing under ORS 426.095, otherwise the
investigation shall comply with the following time schedule:
(a) If the person  can be located, the investigator shall contact the person within three judicial
days from the date the  community mental health program director or a designee receives a notice
under ORS 426.070 alleging that the person has a mental illness and is in need of treatment.
(b) Within 15 days from the date the community mental health program director or  a designee
receives a notice under ORS 426.070, one of the following shall occur:
(A) The investigation shall be completed and submitted to the court.
(B) An application for extension shall be  made to the court under paragraph (c) of this sub-
section.
(c) The community mental health program director, a designee or the investigator  may file for
an extension of the time under paragraph (b) of this subsection only if one of the following occurs:
(A) A treatment  option less restrictive than involuntary inpatient commitment is actively being
pursued.
(B) The person alleged to have a mental illness cannot be located.
(d) A court may grant an extension under paragraph (c)  of this subsection for a time and upon
the terms and conditions the court considers appropriate.
(2) This subsection establishes a nonexclusive list of provisions applicable to the content of the
investigation, as follows:
(a) The investigation conducted should, where appropriate, include an interview or  examination
of the person alleged to have a mental illness in the home of  the person or other place familiar to
the person.
(b) Whether or  not the person consents, the investigation should include interviews with any
individuals that the investigator has  probable cause to believe have pertinent information regarding
the investigation. If the person objects to the contact with any individual, the objection shall be
noted in the investigator’s report.
(c) The investigator shall be allowed access to licensed independent practitioners, nurses or so-
cial workers and to medical  records compiled during the current involuntary prehearing period of
detention to determine probable cause and to develop alternatives to commitment.  If commitment is
proposed because the person appears to be a person with mental illness as defined in ORS  426.005
[5]
HB 4074
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(1)(f)(C)] (1)(g)(C) , the investigator shall be allowed access to  medical records necessary to verify
the existence of criteria described in ORS 426.005  [(1)(f)(C)] (1)(g)(C). The investigator shall include
pertinent parts of the medical record in the investigation report. Records and  communications de-
scribed in this paragraph and related communications are not privileged under ORS 40.230, 40.235,
40.240 or 40.250.
(3) A copy of the investigation report shall be  provided as soon as possible, but in no event later
than 24 hours prior to the hearing, to the person and to the person’s counsel. Copies shall likewise
be provided to counsel assisting the court, to the examiners and to the court  for use in questioning
witnesses.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 426.133 is amended to read:
426.133. (1) As  used in ORS 426.005 to 426.390, “assisted outpatient treatment” may not be con-
strued to be a commitment under ORS 426.130 and does not include taking a person  into custody
or the forced medication of a person.
(2) A court may issue an order requiring  a person to participate in assisted outpatient treatment
if the court finds that the person:
(a)(A) Is 18 years of age or older;
(B) Has a mental disorder;
(C) Will not obtain treatment in the community voluntarily; and
(D) Is unable to make an informed decision to seek or to comply with voluntary treatment; and
(b) As a result of being a person described in paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) Is incapable of surviving safely in the community without treatment; and
(B) Requires treatment to prevent  a deterioration in the person’s condition that will predictably
result in the person becoming a person with mental illness.
(3) In determining whether to issue the order  under subsection (2) of this section, the court shall
consider, but is not limited to considering, the following factors:
(a) The person’s ability to access finances in order to get food or medicine.
(b) The person’s ability to obtain treatment for the person’s medical condition.
(c) The person’s ability to access necessary resources in the community without assistance.
(d) The degree to which there are risks to the person’s safety.
(e) The likelihood that the person will decompensate without immediate care or treatment.
(f) The person’s previous attempts to inflict physical injury on self or others.
(g) The person’s history of mental health treatment in the community.
(h) The person’s patterns of decompensation in the past.
(i) The person’s risk of being victimized or harmed by others.
(j) The person’s access to the means to inflict harm on self or others.
(4) The community mental  health program director may recommend to the court a treatment
plan for a person participating in assisted outpatient treatment. The court may adopt the plan  as
recommended or with modifications.
(5) As part of the order under subsection (2) of this section, the  court may prohibit the person
from purchasing or possessing a firearm  during the period of assisted outpatient treatment if, in the
opinion of the court, there is a reasonable likelihood the person [ would constitute a danger ] is dan-
gerous to self or others or to the community at large as a result of the person’s mental or  psycho-
logical state, as demonstrated by past behavior  or participation in incidents involving unlawful
violence or threats of unlawful  violence, or by reason of a single incident of extreme, violent, un-
lawful conduct. When a court adds a firearm prohibition to an order  under subsection (2) of this
[6]
HB 4074
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section, the court shall cause a  copy of the order to be delivered to the sheriff of the county, who
shall enter the information into the Law Enforcement Data System.
(6) The court retains jurisdiction over the person until the earlier of the end of the  period of
the assisted outpatient treatment established under ORS  426.130 [(2)] (3) or until the court finds that
the person no longer meets the criteria in subsection (2) of this section.
(7) This section does not:
(a) Prevent a court from appointing a guardian ad litem to act for the person; or
(b) Require a community mental health program to  provide treatment or services to, or super-
vision of, the person:
(A) If the county lacks sufficient funds for such purposes; or
(B) In the case of a county that has declined  to operate or contract for a community mental
health program, if the  public agency or private corporation that contracts with the Oregon Health
Authority to provide the program, as described in ORS 430.640,  lacks sufficient funds for such pur-
poses.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 426.160 is amended to read:
426.160. (1) The court having jurisdiction over any  proceeding conducted pursuant to ORS
426.005, 426.060 to 426.170, 426.217, 426.228, 426.255 to 426.292, 426.300 to  426.309, 426.385, 426.395,
426.701 and 426.702 may not disclose any part of the record of the proceeding or commitment  to any
person except:
(a) The court shall, pursuant  to rules adopted by the Department of State Police, transmit the
minimum information necessary, as defined in ORS  181A.290, to the Department of State Police for
persons described in ORS 181A.290 (1)(a) or (b) to enable the department to access and maintain the
information and transmit the information to the federal government as required under federal law;
(b) As provided in ORS 426.070 (5)(c), 426.130 [ (3)] (4) or 426.170;
(c) On request of the person subject to the proceeding;
(d) On  request of the person’s legal representative or the attorney for the person or the state;
or
(e) Pursuant to court order.
(2) In any proceeding described in  subsection (1) of this section that is before the Supreme Court
or the Court of Appeals,  the limitations on disclosure imposed by this section apply to the appellate
court record and to the trial court record while it  is in the appellate court’s custody. The appellate
court may disclose information from the  trial or appellate court record in a decision, as defined in
ORS 19.450, provided that the court uses initials, an alias or some other convention for protecting
against public disclosure the identity of the person subject to the proceeding.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 426.180 is amended to read:
426.180. (1) ORS 426.180 to 426.210 apply  to the commitment of an individual in Indian country
if a federally recognized Indian tribe that has Indian country located within this state chooses to
exercise the tribe’s authority over the commitment.
(2) As used in this section and  ORS 426.200 and 426.210, “hospital” means a hospital that is li-
censed under ORS chapter 441, other than an institution listed in ORS 426.010.
(3) If the court of a tribe having jurisdiction over an individual issues  an order finding that the
individual is dangerous  to self or [ to any other person ] others  and is in need of immediate care,
custody or treatment for mental illness, a person may  request that the individual be taken by a
tribal police officer or other peace officer  to a hospital or nonhospital facility by submitting to the
officer a certified copy of the order and an affidavit that includes:
[7]
HB 4074
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The name and address of the nearest relative or legal guardian of the individual; and
(b) A medical history completed by one of the following,  who may not be related to the indi-
vidual by blood or marriage:
(A) The tribe’s mental health authority,  if the tribe has entered into an agreement with the state
pursuant to ORS 430.630 (9)(a)(B);
(B) A qualified mental health professional; or
(C) A licensed independent practitioner.
(4) Upon receipt of the  order and affidavit described in subsection (3) of this section, the tribal
police officer or other peace officer shall immediately transport the individual to a hospital or a
nonhospital facility and present the  individual to the hospital or nonhospital facility accompanied
by the court order and affidavit.
(5) The director of the hospital or nonhospital facility may refuse to admit the individual if a
licensed independent practitioner,  after reviewing the documents accompanying the individual, is not
satisfied that an emergency exists  or that the individual is dangerous to self or others and is in need
of immediate care, custody or treatment for mental illness.
(6) If  the hospital or nonhospital facility admits the individual, the director or a licensed inde-
pendent practitioner shall notify the community mental health  program director for the area and the
circuit court with jurisdiction in the area  where the facility is located. Upon receipt of the notice,
the community mental health program  director shall initiate commitment proceedings in accordance
with ORS 426.070.
(7) If an individual  is admitted to a hospital or nonhospital facility under this section, any li-
censed independent practitioner who is treating the individual  shall give the individual the warning
under ORS 426.123.
(8) This section may be applied as  provided by agreement with the governing body of the res-
ervation. Payment of costs for a commitment made under this section shall  be as provided under
ORS 426.250.
(9) The director of  the hospital or nonhospital facility or licensed independent practitioner shall
notify the appropriate tribe regarding all actions taken under ORS 426.180 to 426.210  no later than
24 hours after  the action is taken, except for information protected from disclosure by state or fed-
eral law.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 426.225 is amended to read:
426.225. (1) If any person who has been committed to the Oregon Health Authority under ORS
426.127 or 426.130 [ (1)(a)(B)] (2)(a)(B)  or (C) requests, during this period of commitment, voluntary
admission to a state  hospital, the superintendent shall cause the person to be examined immediately
by a licensed independent practitioner. If the licensed independent practitioner finds the person  to
be in  need of immediate care or treatment for mental illness, the person shall be voluntarily admit-
ted.
(2) If any person who has been committed  to the authority under ORS 426.127 or 426.130
[(1)(a)(B)] (2)(a)(B)  or  (C) requests, during this period of commitment, voluntary admission to a fa-
cility approved by the  authority, the administrator of the facility shall cause the person to be ex-
amined immediately by  a licensed independent practitioner. If the licensed independent practitioner
finds the person to be in need of immediate care  or treatment for mental illness, and the authority
grants approval, the person shall be voluntarily admitted.
SECTION 9.  ORS 426.228 is amended to read:
426.228. (1) A peace officer may take into custody a  person who the officer has probable cause
[8]
HB 4074
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to believe  is dangerous to self or [ to any other person ] others  and is in need of immediate care,
custody or treatment for mental illness. As directed by  the community mental health program di-
rector, a peace officer shall remove a person  taken into custody under this section to the nearest
hospital or  nonhospital facility approved by the Oregon Health Authority. The officer shall prepare
a written report and deliver it to  the licensed independent practitioner who is treating the person.
The report shall state:
(a) The reason for custody;
(b) The date, time and place the person was taken into custody; and
(c) The name of the community mental health program director  and a telephone number where
the director may be reached at all times.
(2) A peace  officer shall take a person into custody when the community mental health program
director, pursuant to ORS 426.233, notifies the peace officer that the  director has probable cause to
believe that the person is imminently dangerous to self or [ to any other person ] others . As  directed
by the community mental health program director, the peace officer shall remove the person to a
hospital or nonhospital facility approved by the  authority. The community mental health program
director shall prepare a written report that the peace officer  shall deliver to the licensed inde-
pendent practitioner who is treating the person. The report shall state:
(a) The reason for custody;
(b) The date, time and place the person was taken into custody; and
(c) The name of the community mental health program director  and a telephone number where
the director may be reached at all times.
(3) If more than one hour will be required to transport the person to the hospital or  nonhospital
facility from the location where the person was  taken into custody, the peace officer shall obtain,
if possible, a certificate  from a licensed independent practitioner stating that the travel will not be
detrimental to the person’s physical health and that the person is dangerous to  self or [ to any other
person] others  and is in need of immediate care or treatment  for mental illness. The licensed inde-
pendent practitioner shall have personally  examined the person within 24 hours prior to signing the
certificate.
(4) When a peace officer  or other authorized individual, acting under this section, delivers a
person to a hospital or nonhospital facility, a licensed independent practitioner  shall examine the
person immediately. If the licensed independent practitioner finds  the person to be in need of
emergency care or treatment for mental illness, the licensed independent practitioner shall  proceed
under ORS 426.232, otherwise the person may not be retained in  custody. If the person is to be re-
leased from custody, the peace officer or the community  mental health program director shall return
the person to the place where the person was taken into custody  unless the person declines that
service.
(5) A  peace officer may transfer a person in custody under this section to the custody of an in-
dividual authorized by the community mental health program director under ORS 426.233 (3). The
peace officer may meet the authorized individual at any  location that is in accordance with ORS
426.140 to effect the transfer. When transferring a person in custody  to an authorized individual, the
peace officer shall deliver the report required under subsections (1) and  (2) of this section to the
authorized individual.
(6) An individual authorized under ORS 426.233 (3) shall take  a person into custody when di-
rected to do so by a peace officer or by a community mental health program director under  ORS
426.233.
[9]
HB 4074
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(7) An individual authorized under ORS 426.233 (3) shall perform the duties of the peace officer
or the community mental health program director required by this section  and ORS 426.233 if the
peace officer or the director has not already done so.
(8) An individual authorized under ORS 426.233 (3) may transfer a person in custody under this
section to the custody of another individual  authorized under ORS 426.233 (3) or a peace officer. The
individual transferring custody may meet another authorized individual or a peace officer  at any
location that is in accordance with ORS 426.140 to effect the transfer.
(9)(a) When a  peace officer takes a person into custody under this section, and the peace officer
reasonably suspects that the person is a foreign national, the peace  officer shall inform the person
of the person’s right to communicate with an official from the consulate of the person’s country.
(b) A peace officer is not civilly or criminally liable for failure to provide the information re-
quired by this subsection. Failure to provide the information required by this subsection does  not
in itself constitute grounds for the  exclusion of evidence that would otherwise be admissible in a
proceeding.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 426.231 is amended to read:
426.231. (1) A licensed independent practitioner may hold  a person for transportation to a
treatment facility for up to 12  hours in a health care facility licensed under ORS chapter 441 and
approved by the Oregon Health Authority if:
(a) The licensed  independent practitioner believes the person is dangerous to self or [ to any
other person ] others  and is in need of emergency care or treatment for mental illness;
(b) The licensed independent practitioner is not  related to the person by blood or marriage; and
(c) A licensed  independent practitioner with admitting privileges at the receiving facility con-
sents to the transporting.
(2) Before  transporting the person, the licensed independent practitioner shall prepare a written
statement that:
(a) The licensed independent  practitioner has examined the person within the preceding 12
hours;
(b) A licensed independent practitioner with admitting privileges at the receiving facility  has
consented to the transporting of the person for examination and admission if appropriate; and
(c) The licensed independent practitioner believes the person is dangerous to self or [ to any other
person] others  and is in need of emergency care or treatment for mental illness.
(3) The written statement required by subsection (2)  of this section authorizes a peace officer,
an individual authorized  under ORS 426.233 or the designee of a community mental health program
director to transport a person to the treatment facility indicated on the statement.
SECTION 11.  ORS 426.232 is amended to read:
426.232. (1) If a licensed independent practitioner believes a person who is brought to a hospital
or nonhospital facility by  a peace officer under ORS 426.228 or by an individual authorized under
ORS 426.233, or  believes a person who is at a hospital or nonhospital facility, is dangerous to self
or [ to any other person ] others  and is in need of emergency care or treatment  for mental illness,
and the licensed independent practitioner is not related to the person  by blood or marriage, the li-
censed independent practitioner may do one of the following:
(a) Detain the person and cause the person to be admitted  or, if the person is already admitted,
cause the person to be retained in a hospital where the licensed independent practitioner has ad-
mitting privileges or is on staff.
(b) Approve the person for emergency care or treatment at  a nonhospital facility approved by
[10]
HB 4074
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the authority.
(2) When approving a person for emergency care or treatment at  a nonhospital facility under
this section, the licensed independent practitioner shall notify immediately the  community mental
health program director in the  county where the person was taken into custody and maintain the
person, if the person is being  held at a hospital, for as long as is feasible given the needs of the
person for mental or physical health or safety.  However, under no circumstances may the person
be held for longer than five judicial days.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 426.233 is amended to read:
426.233. (1)(a) A community mental health  program director operating under ORS 430.610 to
430.695 or a designee of the director may take one of the actions listed in  paragraph (b) of this
subsection  when  the community mental health program director or designee has probable cause to
believe a person:
(A) Is dangerous to  self or [ to any other person ] others and is in need of immediate care, custody
or treatment for mental illness; or
(B)(i) Is a person with mental illness placed on conditional release under ORS 426.125, outpatient
commitment under ORS 426.127 or trial visit under ORS 426.273; and
(ii) Is dangerous to self or [ to any other person ] others or is unable to provide for basic personal
needs and is not receiving the care that is necessary for  health and safety and is in need of imme-
diate care, custody or treatment for mental illness.
(b) The community mental health program director or designee under  the circumstances set out
in paragraph (a) of this subsection may:
(A) Notify a peace officer to take the person into custody and direct the officer  to remove the
person to a hospital or nonhospital facility approved by the Oregon Health Authority;
(B) Authorize  involuntary admission of, or, if already admitted, cause to be involuntarily re-
tained in a nonhospital  facility approved by the authority, a person approved for care or treatment
at a nonhospital facility by a licensed independent practitioner under ORS 426.232;
(C) Notify  an individual authorized under subsection (3) of this section to take the person into
custody and direct the authorized individual to remove the person in custody to a  hospital or non-
hospital facility approved by the authority;
(D) Direct an individual authorized under subsection (3) of this section to transport  a person in
custody from a hospital or a nonhospital  facility approved by the authority to another hospital or
nonhospital facility approved by the authority as provided under ORS 426.235; or
(E) Direct an individual authorized under subsection (3) of this section to transport a person  in
custody from a facility approved by the  authority to another facility approved by the authority as
provided under ORS 426.060.
(2) A designee under subsection (1) of  this section must meet the standards established by rule
of the authority and be approved by the community mental health program director before assuming
the authority permitted under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The  community mental health program director may authorize any individual to provide
custody and secure transportation services for a person in custody under ORS 426.228. In author-
izing an individual  under this subsection, the community mental health program director shall grant
the individual the authority to do the following:
(a) Accept custody from a peace officer of a person in custody under ORS 426.228;
(b) Take custody of a person  upon notification by the community mental health program director
under the provisions of this section;
[11]
HB 4074
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Remove a person in custody to an approved hospital or nonhospital facility as directed  by
the community mental health program director;
(d) Transfer a person in custody to  another individual authorized under this subsection or a
peace officer;
(e) Transfer a person in custody from a hospital  or nonhospital facility to another hospital fa-
cility or nonhospital facility when directed to do  so by the community mental health program di-
rector; and
(f) Retain a person in custody at the approved  hospital or nonhospital facility until a licensed
independent practitioner makes a determination under ORS 426.232.
(4) An individual authorized under subsection (3) of this section must meet the standards estab-
lished by rule of the authority and be approved by the community  mental health program director
before assuming the authority granted under this section.
(5) The costs of transporting a person under ORS 426.060, 426.228 or 426.235 by an individual
authorized under subsection (3) of this section shall be the responsibility of  the community mental
health program in  the county in which the authorized individual is directed by a peace officer or a
community mental health program director to take custody of a person and to transport the person
to a facility approved by the authority, but the community mental health  program shall not be re-
sponsible for costs that exceed the amount provided by the state for that transportation. An indi-
vidual authorized to act under subsection (3) of this section shall charge the cost of emergency
medical transportation to, and collect  that cost from, the person, third party payers or other legally
or financially responsible individuals or entities in the same manner that costs for the transportation
of other persons are charged and collected.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 426.234 is amended to read:
426.234. (1) At the time a person alleged to have a mental illness is admitted to  or retained in
a hospital or nonhospital facility under ORS 426.232  or 426.233, a licensed independent practitioner,
nurse or qualified mental health professional at the hospital or nonhospital facility shall:
(a) Inform the person of the person’s right to  representation by or appointment of counsel as
described in ORS 426.100;
(b) Give the person the warning under ORS 426.123;
(c) Immediately examine the person;
(d) Set forth, in writing, the condition of the person and the need  for emergency care or treat-
ment; and
(e) If the licensed  independent practitioner, nurse or qualified mental health professional rea-
sonably suspects that the person is a foreign national, inform the person  of the person’s right to
communicate with an official from the consulate of  the person’s country. A licensed independent
practitioner, nurse or qualified  mental health professional is not civilly or criminally liable for fail-
ure to provide the  information required by this paragraph. Failure to provide the information re-
quired by this paragraph does not in  itself constitute grounds for the exclusion of evidence that
would otherwise be admissible in a proceeding.
(2)(a) At the time the person is admitted to or retained in a hospital under ORS  426.232, the li-
censed independent practitioner shall contact the community mental health program director of  the
county in which the person resides, if the county of residence is different from the  county in which
the hospital  is located. The community mental health program director may request that the licensed
independent practitioner notify the circuit court in the county in which the person resides. If  the
community mental health program director does not  make the request, the licensed independent
[12]
HB 4074
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
practitioner shall notify,  immediately and in writing, the circuit court in the county in which the
person is hospitalized.
(b) At the time the person is admitted to a hospital  under ORS 426.232 after being brought to
the hospital by a peace officer under ORS 426.228, the licensed independent practitioner shall  con-
tact the community mental health program director  of the county in which the person is hospital-
ized. The community mental  health program director of the county in which the person is
hospitalized may request that the licensed independent practitioner notify the circuit court in the
county in which the person is hospitalized. If the community mental  health program director does
not make the request, the licensed independent practitioner shall notify, immediately and in writing,
the circuit court in the county in which the person was taken into custody.
(c) If, at any time prior to the hearing under ORS 426.070 to 426.130, the licensed independent
practitioner responsible for a person  admitted or retained under ORS 426.232 determines that the
person is  not dangerous to self or [ to any other person ] others  and is not in need of emergency care
or treatment for mental illness, the licensed independent practitioner  may release the person from
the detention authorized by ORS 426.232. The  licensed independent practitioner shall immediately
notify the circuit court notified under this subsection and the  community mental health program
director of the person’s release from detention.
(3)(a) At the time the person is admitted to or retained in a  nonhospital facility under ORS
426.233, the community mental health program director in the county where  the person was taken
into custody shall contact the community mental health program director  of the county in which the
person resides, if the county of residence is different from the county  in which the person was taken
into custody. The community mental health  program director of the county in which the person re-
sides may request  that the community mental health program director of the county in which the
person was taken into custody notify the circuit court in the county  where the person resides.
Otherwise, the community mental health program director of the county in which the  person was
taken into custody shall notify, immediately  and in writing, the circuit court in the county in which
the person was taken into custody.
(b) If, at any time prior to the hearing under  ORS 426.070 to 426.130, a community mental health
program director,  after consultation with a licensed independent practitioner, determines that a
person admitted or retained under ORS 426.233 is  not dangerous to self or [ to any other person ]
others and is not in need of immediate care, custody or treatment for  mental illness, the community
mental health  program director may release the person from detention. The community mental
health program director shall immediately notify  the circuit court originally notified under para-
graph (a) of this subsection of the person’s release from detention.
(4) When the judge of the circuit court  receives notice under subsection (2) or (3) of this section,
the judge immediately shall  commence proceedings under ORS 426.070 to 426.130. In a county having
a population of 100,000 or more, and when feasible in a county  with a lesser population, the com-
munity mental health program director or  designee who directs the peace officer or other authorized
individual to take a person into custody under ORS 426.233 shall  not also conduct the investigation
as provided for under ORS 426.074. Except when a person is being held under ORS 426.237  (1)(b), a
person shall  not be held under ORS 426.232 or 426.233 for more than five judicial days without a
hearing being held under ORS 426.070 to 426.130.
(5) When the judge of the circuit court receives  notice under subsection (2)(c) or (3)(b) of this
section that a person  has been released, and unless the court receives the recommendation required
by ORS 426.070 (4), the judge shall dismiss the case no later than 14 days after  the date the person
[13]
HB 4074
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
was initially detained.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 430.399 is amended to read:
430.399. (1) Any person who is intoxicated or under the influence  of controlled substances in a
public place may be sent home or taken to a sobering facility or to a treatment facility by a police
officer. If the person is incapacitated,  the person shall be taken by the police officer to an appro-
priate treatment facility or sobering facility. If the health of the person appears to be in immediate
danger, or the  police officer has reasonable cause to believe the person is dangerous to self or [ to
any other person ] others, as defined in ORS 426.005 , the person shall be taken  by the police officer
to an appropriate treatment facility or  sobering facility. A person shall be deemed incapacitated
when in the opinion of the police  officer the person is unable to make a rational decision as to ac-
ceptance of assistance.
(2) When a  person is taken to a treatment facility, the director of the treatment facility shall
determine whether the person shall be admitted  as a patient, referred to another treatment facility
or a  sobering facility or denied referral or admission. If the person is incapacitated or the health
of the person appears  to be in immediate danger, or if the director has reasonable cause to believe
the person is dangerous to self or [ to any other person ] others,  as defined in ORS 426.005 , the
person must be admitted.  The person shall be discharged within 48 hours unless the person has ap-
plied for voluntary admission to the treatment facility.
(3) When a person is taken to a  sobering facility, the staff of the sobering facility shall, con-
sistent with the facility’s comprehensive written policies and  procedures, determine whether or not
the person shall be admitted into the sobering facility. A person who  is admitted shall be discharged
from the sobering facility within 24 hours.
(4) In the absence of any  appropriate treatment facility or sobering facility, or if a sobering fa-
cility determines that a person should not be admitted to  the sobering facility, an intoxicated person
or a person under  the influence of controlled substances who would otherwise be taken by the police
officer to a treatment facility or sobering facility may be taken to the  city or county jail where the
person may be  held until no longer intoxicated, under the influence of controlled substances or in-
capacitated.
(5) An intoxicated person or person under  the influence of controlled substances, when taken
into custody by the police officer for a criminal offense, shall immediately be taken to  the nearest
appropriate treatment facility when the condition of the person requires emergency  medical treat-
ment.
(6) The records of a person at a treatment  facility or sobering facility may not, without the
person’s consent,  be revealed to any person other than the director and staff of the treatment fa-
cility or sobering facility. A person’s request that no disclosure be made  of admission to a treatment
facility or sobering facility shall  be honored unless the person is incapacitated or disclosure of ad-
mission is required by ORS 430.397.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 163.738 is amended to read:
163.738. (1)(a) A  citation shall notify the respondent of a circuit court hearing where the re-
spondent shall appear at the place and time set forth in the citation. The citation shall contain:
(A) The name of the court at which the respondent is to appear;
(B) The name of the respondent;
(C) A copy of the stalking complaint;
(D) The date, time and place at which the citation was issued;
(E) The name of the law enforcement officer who issued the citation;
[14]
HB 4074
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(F) The time, date and place at which the respondent is to appear in court;
(G) Notice to the respondent that failure to appear at the  time, date and place set forth in the
citation shall result in the respondent’s arrest and entry of a court’s stalking protective order; and
(H) Notice to the respondent of potential  liability under federal law for the possession or pur-
chase of firearms or firearm ammunition and for other acts prohibited by 18 U.S.C. 2261 to 2262.
(b) The officer shall notify the petitioner in writing of the place and time set for the hearing.
(2)(a) The hearing shall be held as  indicated in the citation. At the hearing, the petitioner may
appear in person or by telephonic appearance.  The respondent shall be given the opportunity to
show cause why a court’s stalking protective order  should not be entered. The hearing may be
continued for up to 30 days. The court may enter:
(A) A temporary stalking protective order pending further proceedings; or
(B) A  court’s stalking protective order if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence
that:
(i) The person intentionally, knowingly or recklessly engages in repeated  and unwanted contact
with the  other person or a member of that person’s immediate family or household thereby alarming
or coercing the other person;
(ii) It is objectively reasonable for a person in the victim’s situation to have been alarmed  or
coerced by the contact; and
(iii) The repeated and unwanted contact  causes the victim reasonable apprehension regarding
the personal safety of the victim or a member of the victim’s immediate family or household.
(b) In the order, the court shall specify the conduct from which the  respondent is to refrain,
which may include all contact listed in ORS  163.730 and any attempt to make contact listed in ORS
163.730. The order is of unlimited  duration unless limited by law. If the respondent was provided
notice and an opportunity to be heard, the court  shall also include in the order, when appropriate,
terms and findings sufficient under 18 U.S.C.  922 (d)(8) and (g)(8) to affect the respondent’s ability
to possess firearms and ammunition or engage in activities involving firearms.
(3) The circuit court may enter an order under this section against a  minor respondent without
appointment of a guardian ad litem.
(4) If the respondent fails to appear at the time, date and place  specified in the citation, the
circuit court shall issue a  warrant of arrest as provided in ORS 133.110 in order to ensure the ap-
pearance of the respondent at court and shall enter a court’s stalking protective order.
(5) The circuit court may also order the respondent to undergo mental health evaluation  and,
if indicated by the evaluation, treatment. If the respondent is without sufficient resources to obtain
the evaluation or treatment,  or both, the court shall refer the respondent to the mental health
agency designated by the community mental health director for evaluation or treatment, or both.
(6) If the circuit court, the mental health evaluator  or any other persons have probable cause
to believe that the respondent is dangerous to self or others , as defined in ORS 426.005,  or is un-
able to provide for basic personal needs, the court shall initiate commitment procedures as provided
in ORS 426.070 or 426.180.
(7) A law enforcement officer shall report the results of  any investigation arising from a com-
plaint under ORS 163.744 to the  district attorney within three days after presentation of the com-
plaint.
(8) Except for purposes of impeachment, a statement made by the respondent at a hearing  under
this section may not be used as evidence in a prosecution for stalking as  defined in ORS 163.732 or
for violating a court’s stalking protective order as defined in ORS 163.750.
[15]
HB 4074
1
2
3
4
5
SECTION 16.
The amendments to ORS  163.738, 426.005, 426.070, 426.074, 426.130, 426.133,
426.160, 426.180, 426.225, 426.228, 426.231, 426.232, 426.233, 426.234  and 430.399 by sections 1 to
15 of this 2024 Act apply to individuals  who are taken into custody by a treatment facility
or law enforcement on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
[16]