Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) At least 75 percent of the total number of credit  hours offered during
an academic year by a public institution of higher education must  be taught by full-time
employees of the institution.
(2) Not  later than September 1 of each year, each institution shall provide to the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission:
(a) The percentage of the total number of credit hours offered during the  previous aca-
demic year that were taught by full-time employees of the institution; and
(b) The course names and total number of courses offered for credit hours  during the
previous academic year that were and were not taught by full-time employees of the insti-
tution.
(3) The commission shall submit an annual report to the Legislative Assembly not  later
than December 31 of each year, in the manner prescribed  by ORS 192.245, reporting on the
level of compliance with this section by each institution during the previous academic year.
(4) As used in this section, “public institution of higher education” means:
(a) A public university listed in ORS 352.002; and
(b) A community college operated under ORS chapter 341.
SECTION 2.
(1) Except as provided  in subsection (2) of this section, section 1 of this 2025
Act first applies to the 2027-2028 academic year.
(2) Not later than September 1, 2027, each public institution of higher education shall
provide the Higher Education Coordinating Commission with the information  required under
section 1 (2) of this 2025 Act.
(3) Not later than December  31, 2027, the commission shall provide the Legislative As-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2212
HB 2841
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
sembly with the report required under section 1 (3) of this 2025 Act.
(4) As used in this section,  “public institution of higher education” has the meaning given
that term in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) During the 2026-2027 academic year, at least 65 percent of the  total
number of credit hours offered during an academic year by a public institution of  higher
education must be taught by full-time employees of the institution.
(2) As used in this section,  “public institution of higher education” has the meaning given
that term in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. Section 3 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
[2]