Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The E-Oregon Task Force is established.
(2) The task force consists of 17 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of  the Senate shall appoint two nonvoting members from among
members of the Senate, one from the majority caucus and one from a minority caucus.
(b) The Speaker of the House  of Representatives shall appoint two nonvoting members
from among members of the House of Representatives, one from the majority caucus  and
one from a minority caucus.
(c) The Governor shall appoint 12 members as follows:
(A) One member who represents the Governor;
(B) The Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, or a designee of
the director;
(C) The Director of the Department of Consumer  and Business Services, or a designee
of the director;
(D) One member who represents large businesses that are headquartered in or have sig-
nificant operations in this state;
(E) One member who represents established businesses of an intermediate size that are
headquartered in or have significant operations in this state;
(F) One member who represents small businesses in this state;
(G) The executive director of the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission, or a
designee of the executive director;
(H) One member who represents a labor organization in this state;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4666
HB 3931
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(I) One member who represents a county government in this state;
(J) One member who represents a city government in this state;
(K) One member who  represents students who attend an institution of higher education
in this state; and
(L) One member with significant experience in information technology and web portal
construction and maintenance.
(e) The Secretary of  State shall appoint one member to represent the Secretary of State.
(3) The task force  shall study and evaluate potential solutions and methods for creating
a coordinated electronic portal or portals that create a common pathway for residents of this
state to apply for and receive  licenses, registrations, certifications, identification cards and
other credentials or permits necessary for engaging in business or other common trans-
actions in this state. The identified solution must:
(a) Organize and reduce the  complexity of interactions with state and local agencies that
are now required to engage in business or undertake  many common tasks that require offi-
cial permission;
(b) Group similar or related tasks into straightforward and streamlined procedures; and
(c) Protect and enhance information security and privacy where appropriate.
(4) The task force may:
(a) Examine and evaluate available web-based solutions  and electronic technology needed
to establish the system described in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Evaluate systems established in other states for the same purpose;
(c) Require state agencies and local  governments to submit information about the vari-
ous permits and credentials required to engage in business in or  under the jurisdiction of the
agency or local government;
(d) Solicit and hear testimony;
(e) Invite other persons with relevant responsibilities, expertise or knowledge to  join the
task force  or attend task force meetings, if a majority of the task force votes to extend an
invitation and if the Governor approves the invitation; and
(f) Engage in any other activity reasonably necessary  to carry out the purposes identified
in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) A  majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority  of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The Governor shall select one member of the task  force to serve as chairperson and
another to serve  as vice chairperson, for the terms and with the duties and powers necessary
for the performance of the functions of the offices as the Governor determines.
(8) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to an interim committee  of the Legislative
Assembly related to government operations no later than December 15, 2026.
[2]
HB 3931
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
(12) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall provide staff  support to the
task force.
(13) Members of  the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative Assembly serve
as volunteers  on the task force and, unless they are qualified members, as defined in ORS
292.495, are not entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses.
(15)(a) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
(b) All state agencies  that issue permits, licenses, registrations, certifications or iden-
tification cards or credentials shall compile a listing or catalog  of all such documents or
permits and forward the listing or compilation to the task force  within 90 days after the task
force issues a request to the agency for a listing or catalog.
(16) All appointments to  the task force made under subsection (1) of this section must
be completed by 90 days after adjournment sine die of the 2025  session of the Eighty-third
Legislative Assembly.
(17) The  task force shall have its first meeting on or before 91 days after adjournment
sine die of the 2025 session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]