Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “addiction medicine service” includes, but is  not
limited to, one or more of the following services if the billing code for the service  indicates
that it is a service related to addiction or substance use disorder:
(a) Outpatient care;
(b) Initial or subsequent hospital inpatient or observation care,  including admission and
discharge services;
(c) Emergency department evaluation and management; and
(d) The following Current Procedural Terminology codes:
(A) H0001;
(B) H0002;
(C) H0004;
(D) H0005;
(E) H0010;
(F) H0011;
(G) H0012;
(H) H0015;
(I) H0018;
(J) H0019;
(K) H0038;
(L) H0048;
(M) H2011;
(N) H2036;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2288
HB 2270
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(O) T1006; and
(P) T1016.
(2) No later than January 1, 2026, the  Oregon Health Authority shall increase by 30 per-
cent the reimbursement rates paid as of the effective date of  this 2025 Act for addiction
medicine services that are provided by:
(a) A physician who  practices addiction medicine as a subspecialty and who is certified
by the American Board of Preventive Medicine or the American Board of Psychiatry and
Neurology, regardless of whether the physician also provides physical health services;
(b) No more than ten  of the certified nurse practitioners or physician associates super-
vised by each physician described in paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
(c) A certified  nurse practitioner or a physician associate who works in the same physical
location as  the certified nurse practitioner’s or physician associate’s supervising physician
described in paragraph (a) of  this subsection, if the certified nurse practitioner or physician
associate works 16 or more hours per week at the location.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on July 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. (1) The Task Force on Addiction Medicine Reimbursement Rates is  estab-
lished.
(2) The task force consists of 13 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint two members from  among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives  shall appoint two members from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint nine members as follows:
(A) Three members who are physicians who practice addiction medicine or addiction
psychiatry as a subspecialty and are  certified by the American Board of Preventive Medicine
or the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology;
(B) Two members who are program directors or clinical supervisors  who are certified by
the Mental Health and Addiction Certification Board of Oregon;
(C) Two members who are traditional health workers or certified recovery mentors; and
(D) Two members who have lived experience with substance use disorder.
(3) The task force shall examine:
(a) Whether additional Current  Procedural Terminology codes should be added to the list
of addiction medicine services for which the Oregon Health Authority is  required under
section 1 of this 2025 Act to increase reimbursement rates;
(b) How to define eligible billing codes;
(c) How to reimburse medically monitored outpatient care  and medically monitored in-
tensive outpatient care;
(d) Whether to increase billing for Current Procedural Terminology codes other than
H0020 for services provided at opioid treatment programs;
(e) Provider  and health care administrator awareness of rate increases and technical
support services available to optimize billing;
(f) Whether to recommend to the Legislative Assembly  an annual rate increase based on
the cost of living; and
(g) How to ensure that coordinated care organizations reimburse for addiction medicine
services at rates that are no less than the fee-for-service reimbursement rates established
[2]
HB 2270
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
by the Oregon Health Authority.
(4) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for  the
transaction of business.
(5) Official action by  the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to an interim committee  of the Legislative
Assembly related to health care no later than December 15, 2026.
(11) The  Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission shall provide staff support to the task
force.
(12) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force  are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(13) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(14) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 4.
Section 3 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 5.  ORS 430.223 is amended to read:
430.223. (1) For purposes of this section, “program” means a state, local or tribal alcohol and
drug abuse prevention and treatment program.
(2) The  Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission established under ORS 430.221 shall develop a
comprehensive addiction, prevention, treatment and recovery plan for this state. The plan must in-
clude, but is not limited to, recommendations regarding:
(a) Capacity, type and utilization of programs;
(b) Methods to assess the effectiveness and performance of programs;
(c) The best use of existing programs;
(d) Budget policy priorities for participating state agencies;
(e) Standards for licensing programs;
(f) Minimum standards for contracting for, providing and coordinating alcohol and drug abuse
prevention and treatment services among programs that use federal, private or state funds adminis-
tered by the state; and
(g) The most effective and efficient use of participating state agency  resources to support pro-
grams.
(3) All participating state agencies shall:
(a) Meet with the commission on a quarterly basis to review and  report on each agency’s
progress on implementing the plan; and
[3]
HB 2270
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
(b) Report to the commission, in the manner  prescribed by the commission, each agency’s pro-
cess and outcome measures established under the plan.
(4) The commission shall review and update the  plan no later than July 1 of each even-numbered
year and shall produce and publish  a report on the metrics and other indicators of progress in
achieving the goals of the plan.
(5) The commission may:
(a) Conduct studies related to the duties of the commission in collaboration  with other state
agencies;
(b) Apply for and receive gifts and grants for public and private sources; and
(c) Use funds received by the commission to carry out the purposes of ORS 430.220  and 430.221
and this section.
(6) All participating state agencies and local agencies shall assist the commission  in developing
the comprehensive addiction, prevention, treatment and recovery plan.
(7) The  commission shall annually review the reimbursement rates paid for addiction
medicine services by the state medical assistance program to ensure that the  rates are suf-
ficient to enlist the  number of providers that are needed to meet the needs of medical as-
sistance recipients for addiction medicine services.
(8) No later than September 1 of each year, the commission shall report to the  Legisla-
tive Assembly, in the manner described in ORS 192.245, the findings of the  commission from
the review described in subsection (7) of this section and any recommendations for increases
in the reimbursement rates.
(9) No later than July 1 of the year following the submission  of the report described in
subsection (8) of this section, the Oregon Health Authority shall review and  revise, if nec-
essary, the reimbursement rates paid by  the state medical assistance program for addiction
medicine services.
[(7)] (10) The commission may adopt rules to carry out its duties under this section.
SECTION 6.
(1) The amendments to ORS 430.223 by section 5  of this 2025 Act become
operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Alcohol and Drug Policy  Commission may take any action before the operative
date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the  commission to
exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section,  all of the
duties, functions and powers conferred on the commission by the amendments to ORS 430.223
by section 5 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]