Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall establish a program to award grants
to schools in Oregon for the purpose of providing child care services before and  after school
hours.
(2) The department shall prioritize awarding grants to schools in school districts with:
(a) High rates of poverty;
(b) An inadequate supply of child care providers;
(c) High rates of children with special education needs; or
(d) High rates of student homelessness.
(3) Before issuing a grant under this  section, the department shall enter into a grant
agreement with the recipient. The agreement must require:
(a) The school to  provide a minimum matching contribution of 15 percent of the total
grant award for the provision of child care services.
(b) The school to provide to the department  the information necessary for the production
of the report described in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The department shall submit a report on the successes and challenges  of the grant
program established under this section in the manner  provided by ORS 192.245, and may in-
clude recommendations for  legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assem-
bly related to child care no later than June 30, 2027. The report must address:
(a) The names of the schools that received a grant.
(b) The amount of the grant that each school received.
(c) The number of children each school served with the grant.
(d) The impact of the child care services provided with the  grant on student attendance
and grades.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on June 30, 2028.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3687
HB 3162
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, to administer  and award grants under section 1 of
this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]