Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Secretary of State shall conduct an audit  of expenditures or obli-
gations made by the State Forestry Department that were funded with:
(a) The $2.885  million of lottery moneys allocated to the department for the 2013-2015
biennium under section 12, chapter  785, Oregon Laws 2013, for the Eastern Oregon Forest
Collaboration; and
(b) The $5 million of lottery moneys allocated to  the department for the 2015-2017
biennium under section 13, chapter 811, Oregon Laws 2015, for federal forest restoration.
(2) The Secretary of State shall attempt to obtain,  either directly or through the de-
partment, in addition to any records of the department, any information available from the
United States Forest Service or the United States  Bureau of Land Management pertaining
to department expenditures or obligations of moneys described in  subsection (1) of this sec-
tion.
(3) In conducting an audit under this section, in addition to requiring an accounting of
moneys described in subsection (1) of this section, the Secretary of State shall attempt to:
(a) List and describe the projects that were  developed, planned or implemented with the
moneys;
(b) Calculate the number of acres treated or restored by each project fully  or partially
funded with the moneys;
(c) Calculate, for each project fully or  partially funded with the moneys, the
merchantable timber volume offered for sale  that resulted from the project and the effect
of the department funding on that volume;
(d) Calculate, for each project fully or partially funded  with the moneys, the number and
type of jobs created by the project and the effect of  the department funding on those number
and type of jobs created; and
(e) Describe with specificity  the expenditures by category for each project or parts of a
project fully or partially funded with the moneys, including but not limited to  the categories
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 999
SB 435
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
of meetings, employee-related costs and forest resource harvesting supply costs, and  the
portion of those categorized expenses funded with the described moneys.
(4) The  Secretary of State shall report the results of the audit required by this section,
and any information obtained under subsection (2) or (3) of this section,  to the Legislative
Assembly no later than February 5, 2018.
SECTION 2. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
[2]