Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 2. The Oregon Health Authority and  coordinated care organizations shall re-
imburse the cost of a clinically validated blood pressure cuff  prescribed to allow a medical
assistance recipient to self-monitor the recipient’s blood pressure.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3583