Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Commission on Indian Services shall study tribes in this state. The
commission shall submit findings and  recommendations for legislation to an interim com-
mittee of the Legislative Assembly related to the  judiciary not later than December 31, 2019.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2019 Act is repealed on January 2, 2020.
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1420