Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall pay  to each
residential or  nonresidential landlord whose tenant has vacated the premises on or after
April 1, 2020,  an amount equal to the rent that became due by the tenant on or after April
1, 2020, and on or before September 30, 2020, and that  was not repaid by the tenant, minus
the greater of:
(a) The security deposit and prepaid rent collected by the landlord; or
(b) One month’s rent.
(2) The department shall prescribe how a  landlord may apply for and receive payment
under this section.
(3) A landlord may not receive a payment under this  section unless the landlord agrees
to, in an amount equal to the payment:
(a) Transfer to the department any claims for the  unpaid nonpayment balance that the
landlord has against a tenant; and
(b) Repay to the department any amount the landlord later receives from the tenant or
on the tenant’s behalf.
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding ORS 458.600 to 458.665, the Housing and Community Ser-
vices Department may use moneys within the Oregon Housing Fund, or any  account made
a part  of the fund under ORS 458.620, to administer and to make payments under section 1
of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for  the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $___,  to administer and make payments un-
der section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2022.
SECTION 5. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 823
HB 2729
1
[2]