Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Business Development Department shall  conduct a study of
manufacturing in Oregon. The department shall submit a report of the  study to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to economic development in the  manner
provided under ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3408