Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $250,000 for distribution to the Association
of Oregon Counties, for use by the association to contract with  an independent third-party
organization that will provide technical assistance and information  to landowners to assist
the landowners in complying with local, state  and federal regulatory and other requirements
that relate to planning, designing,  monitoring and engaging in the replacement or repair of
tide gates with an opening size of four feet or smaller.
SECTION 2. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1971