Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 7 of this 2025 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
735.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 2 to 7 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Affiliate” means a person  that controls, is controlled by or is under common control
with another person.
(2) “Control” means direct or indirect possession of the power to manage,  or direct the
management of, a person and the person’s policies, whether  through an ownership interest,
by contract or otherwise.
(3) “Health care cost sharing arrangement” means an  agreement between a resident and
a subject entity in which:
(a) The subject entity may require the resident to declare or profess a defined set  of
ethical or religious beliefs as a condition of entering into the agreement;
(b) The subject entity provides the resident with a list or  schedule of medical services for
which the subject entity pledges to pay all or a portion of the costs that a resident incurs
in obtaining the medical services to:
(A) The medical provider that rendered the medical services, or an affiliate of the medical
provider; or
(B) The resident, as a reimbursement; and
(c) The subject entity pays the costs primarily from fees, premiums  or other compen-
sation that the subject entity collects from other individuals who also have membership  in
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1295
HB 2268
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or access to the arrangement on a basis that is substantially similar  to the basis on which
the resident has a membership in or access to the arrangement.
(4) “Nationwide Multistate Licensing  System” means a system that the Conference of
State Bank Supervisors and the American Association  of Residential Mortgage Regulators,
or assignees of the  Conference of State Bank Supervisors or the American Association of
Residential Mortgage Regulators, develop and maintain for participating  state agencies to
use in licensing and registering mortgage loan originators, as defined in ORS  86A.200, and
other persons that provide nondepository financial services.
(5) “Registrant” means a  subject entity that the Director of the Department of Consumer
and Business Services registered under this section.
(6) “Resident” means a natural person who resides in this state.
(7)(a) “Subject entity” means a person that, in exchange for a fee,  premium, commission,
due or other monetary  compensation, offers to a resident of this state a membership in, or
access to, a health care cost sharing arrangement.
(b) “Subject entity” does not include a person that has a certificate of authority.
SECTION 3.
(1) A subject entity may not advertise, solicit, market, sell  or offer a health
care cost sharing arrangement in this state or  enter into a health care cost sharing ar-
rangement with a resident unless the subject entity is a registrant.
(2)(a) The Director of the Department of Consumer  and Business Services by rule shall
prescribe a form and  format for, and the contents of, an application for registration. The
rules, at a minimum, must specify that an application requires:
(A) The applicant’s name, telephone number, electronic mail address and website address,
and the street address of  both the applicant’s principal office and the applicant’s principal
business location in this state;
(B) The  name, street address and telephone number of the applicant’s registered agent
or a person that is an agent of the applicant for service of process;
(C) All assumed business names the applicant uses;
(D) The names and fingerprints of each of the person’s directors, officers, members  or
managers for the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services to conduct
a criminal background check through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System;
(E) A bond or irrevocable letter of credit in the sum of  $25,000 executed by the applicant
as obligor and to the State of Oregon and drawn on a corporate surety or financial institu-
tion, as defined in ORS 706.008, that is authorized to transact business in this state; and
(F) A registration fee in an amount the director specifies by rule.
(b) The director,  consistent with the requirements of this section, may register appli-
cants under this section by means of an agreement with  the Nationwide Multistate Licensing
System and may,  by rule, conform the practices, procedures and information the Department
of Consumer and Business Services uses to register applicants to the requirements  of the
Nationwide Multistate Licensing System.
(3) The director may refuse to register  an applicant under this section if the director
determines that the applicant:
(a) Submitted a false statement on the application for registration;
(b) Violated sections 2 to 6 of this 2025 Act or  a rule the director adopted under sections
2 to 6 of this 2025 Act;
(c) Failed to pay a required registration  fee or filing fee or failed to submit a required
[2]
HB 2268
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
bond or irrevocable letter of credit;
(d) Engaged in dishonest, fraudulent or illegal practices or conduct in any  business or
profession; or
(e) Was convicted of  a felony or misdemeanor, an essential element of which was fraud
or deceit.
SECTION 4.
(1) Each year not later than January 31, a subject  entity shall file with the
Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services, in a form and  format that
the director specifies by rule, a report that:
(a) Updates and  corrects any information that the subject entity submitted in an initial
application for registration under section 3 of this 2025 Act, if  the subject entity registered
with the director  and if the information changed in the 12 months preceding the date of the
subject entity’s report;
(b) Lists the number  of residents with whom the subject entity has an active health care
cost sharing arrangement;
(c) Lists the number  of individuals outside this state with whom the subject entity has
an active health care cost sharing arrangement;
(d) States the total amount of fees, premiums, commissions, dues  or other monetary
compensation the subject entity collected from residents in  the 12 months preceding the date
of the report;
(e) States the total amount the subject entity paid as  claims under health care cost
sharing arrangements with residents;
(f) States the percentage of the amount  described in paragraph (d) of this subsection that
the amount described in paragraph (e) of this subsection represents;
(g) States the  sum that the subject entity holds as a reserve against claims from resi-
dents and from all individuals with which the  subject entity has a health care cost sharing
arrangement;
(h) Includes copies of all scripts,  brochures, catalogs, circulars, printed or electronic
advertisements or other materials the subject entity used in marketing  health care cost
sharing arrangements in this state;
(i) Lists all criminal convictions of any of the subject entity’s directors,  members, offi-
cers or managers in the 12 months preceding the date of the report or states  in a sworn
affidavit that no convictions occurred;
(j) Lists all administrative enforcement or other administrative actions  against the sub-
ject entity by agencies of other jurisdictions in the 12 months preceding the date of the re-
port or states in a sworn affidavit that no actions occurred;
(k) Includes a  summary of an annual audit of the subject entity’s operations and financial
condition;
(L) Acknowledges that the contents  of the report are a public document that is subject
to disclosure on the website of the Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(m) States over the signature of a director, officer, member or manager of the subject
entity that to the best of the signatory’s knowledge the report is accurate; and
(n) Includes a filing  fee in an amount the Director of the Department of Consumer and
Business Services specifies by rule.
(2) A subject entity shall file the report described in subsection (1) of  this section in a
format that allows for the director to post all or a portion of the contents of  the report on
[3]
HB 2268
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the Department of Consumer and Business  Services website. The director may specify addi-
tional requirements for the format of the report and a method of filing.
(3) The department shall post a copy of each report a subject entity files under this sec-
tion for public access on the department’s website and shall include with the report:
(a) A summary of complaints the department received against  the subject entity and the
resolution of each complaint;
(b) A  summary of any administrative actions the department has taken against the sub-
ject entity and the outcome or resolution of each action; and
(c) Any other information  the department deems useful to disclose to the public to pro-
mote transparency with respect to the subject entity’s operations and financial condition.
(4) A registrant each year shall certify  to the director that the bond the registrant sub-
mitted under section 3 of this 2025 Act is  current, valid and remains at the amount required
under section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
(1)(a) A subject entity or a person that advertises, solicits,  markets, sells
or offers a  health care cost sharing arrangement on behalf of a subject entity, as an affiliate
of a subject entity or as an employee or agent of a subject entity in  all advertising, solicita-
tions and marketing communications with residents shall clearly,  prominently and conspic-
uously:
(A) State that the subject entity is not an insurer, that a  health care cost sharing ar-
rangement with the subject entity is not health insurance  and that the subject entity need
not pay a resident’s cost of medical services except as expressly provided in  an executed
contract to which the resident and the subject entity are parties and signatories; and
(B) List medical services that the subject entity does not include in the subject entity’s
health care cost sharing arrangement but that are commonly included  in health insurance
coverage, such as exclusions  for reproductive health services, treatment of sexually trans-
mitted diseases, medications for HIV or AIDS or gender-affirming care.
(b) A statement or list is clear, prominent and conspicuous if the statement or list is:
(A) On an  electronic page or printed document that is separate from all other commu-
nications the subject entity has with the resident;
(B) In a  typeface that is larger, in all capital letters, in boldface or italics or in a different
color, or that is  otherwise noticeably different from other text in a printed or electronic
document; or
(C) At a volume that is louder than  preceding or following statements or is preceded with
a sound or signal that invites attention, if the statement or list is communicated orally.
(2) Not less than 60 days before a change becomes effective, a subject  entity shall notify
each resident with whom the subject entity has a health care  cost sharing arrangement of
any change to:
(a) The schedule of medical services that the health care cost sharing  arrangement cov-
ers;
(b) An amount that the subject entity will pay for a medical service;
(c) The percentage or portion of the costs of the medical services for which the  subject
entity will pay;
(d) The subject entity’s solvency or financial stability, to the extent  that the subject en-
tity is aware of or can anticipate the change; and
(e) Operations that significantly affect the subject entity’s provision of payments or other
[4]
HB 2268
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
benefits to or on behalf of residents.
SECTION 6.
(1) Each year not later than January 31,  a person that advertises, solicits,
markets, sells or offers a health care cost sharing arrangement on behalf of  a subject entity,
as an affiliate of a subject entity or as an employee  or agent of a subject entity, shall report
to the Department of Consumer and Business Services, on a form in a format and with
contents that the department specifies by rule:
(a) The commission rate, percentage of  sales or other compensation the person receives
for sales of health care cost sharing arrangements to residents; and
(b) The number of health care cost  sharing arrangements the person sold to residents in
the 12 months preceding the date of the report.
(2)(a) A  subject entity or a person described in subsection (1) of this section, before en-
tering into a health care cost sharing arrangement with a resident, shall assess a  resident’s
eligibility or assist the resident in assessing the resident’s eligibility  for coverage under the
Oregon Health Plan or under a qualified health plan, as defined in 42 U.S.C. 18021(a), as in
effect on  the effective date of this 2025 Act, that is offered on a health insurance exchange
that is under the supervision of the Director of the Oregon Health Authority under  ORS
chapter 741 or  that otherwise qualifies as an American Health Benefit Exchange under 42
U.S.C. 18031, as in effect on the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(b) An  assessment under paragraph (a) of this subsection must compare the costs, cov-
erage, limitations, exclusions and benefits of a health insurance  plan with similar or equiv-
alent costs, coverage, limitations,  exclusions and benefits under the health care cost sharing
arrangement the person is  advertising, soliciting, marketing, selling or offering to the resi-
dent.
(3) An  insurer or a person that has an insurance producer license the Director of the
Department of Consumer and Business Services issued under ORS 744.062  may not advertise,
solicit, market, sell or offer a health care cost sharing arrangement  to a resident or enter
into a health care cost sharing arrangement with a resident.
SECTION 7.
(1) A subject entity or a person described in section 6  (1) of this 2025 Act
that violates a provision of sections 2 to 6 of this 2025 Act engages in an unlawful trade
practice under ORS 646.607.
(2)(a) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services may  revoke a
registrant’s registration if the director determines that the  registrant has violated a pro-
vision of sections  2 to 6 of this 2025 Act. The director shall notify the registrant of the
director’s determination in an order that provides an opportunity for  a hearing under ORS
183.413 to 183.470.
(b) In addition to revoking a registrant’s registration under paragraph (a) of  this sub-
section, the director may assess a civil  penalty against the registrant in an amount that does
not exceed $5,000 for each violation. The director  shall assess the civil penalty in accordance
with ORS 183.745.
(3)(a) An insurer’s violation of section 6 (3) of this 2025 Act is an unfair or  deceptive act
or practice in the transaction of insurance that is injurious to the insurance-buying public
under ORS  746.240. The director may enforce this paragraph as the director deems appro-
priate under ORS 731.256.
(b) The director may place an insurance producer  on probation, may suspend, revoke or
refuse to issue or renew an insurance producer license or  may take any other action au-
[5]
HB 2268
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
thorized under ORS 744.074 if the director determines that an insurance  producer violated
section 6 (3) of this 2025 Act.
(4) The director, or a person that suffered an ascertainable loss of  money or property as
a result of a registrant’s violation of sections 2 to 6 of this 2025  Act has a right of action
against the  bond the registrant submitted to the director under section 3 of this 2025 Act.
The director’s right of action exists without the  necessity of assignment and the director
may bring the action on behalf of a  resident as a claim of restitution for the resident’s loss
of money or property.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 646.607 is amended to read:
646.607. A person engages in an unlawful  trade practice if in the course of the person’s business,
vocation or occupation the person:
(1) Employs any unconscionable  tactic in connection with selling, renting or disposing of real
estate, goods or services, or collecting or enforcing an obligation.
(2) Fails to deliver all or  any portion of real estate, goods or services as promised, and at a
customer’s request, fails to refund money that the customer gave to the person to purchase the
undelivered real estate, goods or services and that the person does not retain pursuant to  any right,
claim or defense  the person may assert in good faith. This subsection does not create a warranty
obligation and does not apply  to a dispute over the quality of real estate, goods or services delivered
to a customer.
(3) Violates ORS 401.965 (2).
(4) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.725 to 646A.750.
(5) Violates ORS 646A.530.
(6) Employs a collection practice that is unlawful under ORS 646.639.
(7) Is a beneficiary that violates ORS 86.726 (1)(a) or (2), 86.729 (4) or 86.732 (1) or (2).
(8) Violates ORS 646A.093.
(9) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.600 to 646A.628.
(10) Violates ORS 646A.808 (2).
(11) Violates ORS 336.184.
(12) Publishes on a website related to the person’s business, or in a consumer agreement  related
to a consumer transaction, a statement or representation of fact in which the person asserts  that
the person, in  a particular manner or for particular purposes, will use, disclose, collect, maintain,
delete or dispose of information that the person requests, requires or  receives from a consumer and
the person uses, discloses, collects, maintains, deletes or disposes of  the information in a manner
that is materially inconsistent with the person’s statement or representation.
(13) Violates ORS 646A.813 (2).
(14) Violates ORS 137.930 (1).
(15) Violates a provision of sections 2 to 6 of  this 2025 Act, except that an insurer that
is subject to regulation under the Insurance Code or  a person that violates section 6 (3) of
this 2025 Act does not engage in an unlawful trade practice under this section.
SECTION 9.
Sections 2 to 7 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS  646.607 by sec-
tion 8 of this 2025 Act apply to health care cost sharing arrangements  that a person adver-
tises, solicits, markets, sells or offers to a resident, or to a  health care cost sharing
arrangement into which a person enters with a resident, on  or after the operative date
specified in section 10 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 10. (1) Sections 2 to 7 of this  2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 646.607 by
[6]
HB 2268
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
section 8 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Director of  the Department of Consumer and Business Services may adopt rules
and take any  other action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section
that is necessary to enable the director  to undertake and exercise, on and after the date
specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers  conferred
on the director by sections 2 to 7 of this 2025 Act  and the amendments to ORS 646.607 by
section 8 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 11.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[7]