Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 215.
SECTION 2. (1) Notwithstanding any other limitations on the siting  of dwellings under
this chapter or under any land use regulation applicable to the tract, the owner of a tract
outside an urban growth boundary may  site a family dwelling unit as provided in this section.
(2) A family dwelling unit allowed under this section must:
(a) Be a newly constructed single-family dwelling or newly sited manufactured dwelling;
(b) Be owned by an individual who resides in a single-family dwelling sited on the tract;
(c) Comply with all applicable laws and regulations  relating to sanitation and wastewater
disposal and treatment;
(d) Comply with the construction provisions of section  R327 of the Oregon Residential
Specialty Code if the tract is in an area identified as  a high hazard zone on an adopted map
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 74
HB 4046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of wildfire hazard zones described in ORS 477.490;
(e) Comply with county land use regulations that ensure that:
(A) The new dwelling has adequate setbacks from adjacent lands zoned for  resource use;
(B) The new dwelling has adequate access for firefighting equipment, safe  evacuation and
staged evacuation areas; and
(C) If the new dwelling is within a wildland-urban interface on an adopted map of  wildfire
hazard zones under ORS 477.027 and 477.490, the dwelling complies with any requirements for
defensible space established by a local government pursuant to ORS 476.392; and
(f) Be sited:
(A) Not within an urban reserve as defined in ORS 197A.230;
(B) On a tract on which no existing  dwelling is subject to an order declaring it a nuisance
or any pending action under ORS 105.550 to 105.600; and
(C) Not within an area in which new or existing ground  water uses under ORS 537.545
(1)(b) or (d)  have been restricted by the Water Resources Commission if the water supply
source for the new dwelling or associated lands or gardens will be a water well.
(3) If  the family dwelling unit will be sited in a high hazard zone under an adopted map
under ORS 477.490, the dwelling must comply with any applicable minimum defensible space
requirements for wildfire risk reduction established by the Department of the  State Fire
Marshal under ORS 476.392 and any applicable local requirements for defensible space es-
tablished by a local government pursuant to ORS 476.392.
(4) A county may not allow a family dwelling unit established under this  section to be
used for:
(a) A vacation occupancy, as defined in ORS 90.100, for any person; or
(b) Except as provided  in subsections (5) and (6) of this section, occupancy by any person
who is not the owner’s:
(A) Parent;
(B) Stepparent or parent’s domestic partner, as described in ORS 106.310;
(C) Sibling or sibling’s spouse or domestic partner;
(D) Child or child’s spouse or domestic partner;
(E) Spouse or domestic partner;
(F) Spouse’s or domestic partner’s child or that child’s spouse or domestic partner;
(G) Grandchild; or
(H) Grandparent.
(5) For a period of 18  months following the date that a family member of the owner
moves out of a dwelling established  under this section, the owner may use the dwelling for
a residential tenancy for a tenant other than a family member  of the owner. Following that
period, the dwelling may not be occupied except by a family member of the owner or as al-
lowed under subsection (4) of this section.
(6) Limitations under subsection (2)(b) of this section do not apply to a  purchaser of the
tract following the establishment of a dwelling under this section.
(7) For a dwelling established under this section, a county  may not approve a subdivision,
partition or other division of  the tract so that an existing single-family dwelling is situated
on a different tract than the established dwelling.
(8) A county may approve the conversion of a  family dwelling unit to a permissible non-
residential use.
[2]
HB 4046
1
2
3
SECTION 3.
This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]