Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority  shall study the progress of and investment
opportunities in the following:
(a) The social worker licensing exam fee voucher and licensing fee waiver program;
(b) The bonus and housing stipend grant program;
(c) The behavioral health workforce initiative loan repayment program;
(d) The tuition assistance and graduate stipend program;
(e) The mental health and addiction counselor board agreement;
(f) The clinical supervision grant program established under ORS 675.658;
(g) The peer delivered services workforce capacity  grant established in compliance with
ORS 675.655 (2)(a);
(h) The culturally specific and culturally responsive behavioral  health services programs
described in ORS 430.274;
(i) The next steps for the work group described in section 1, chapter 493,  Oregon Laws
2023; and
(j) Opportunities within the authority to  build sustained staffing support for the behav-
ioral health workforce team.
(2) The  authority shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may
include recommendations for  legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative As-
sembly related to health care no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall  study the progress
of and investment opportunities in the grant program established under ORS  660.350, and
opportunities for expansion into the following behavioral health specialties:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 560
SB 142
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
(a) Certified addiction counselors;
(b) Qualified mental health associates; and
(c) Peer support specialists and other behavioral  health occupations that serve individ-
uals enrolled in the medical assistance program and  uninsured individuals who utilize com-
munity mental health programs, federally  qualified health centers and local public health
authorities for mental health purposes.
(2) The  commission shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to health care no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 3.
Sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2027.
[2]