Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall study the possibil-
ity of the state funding the salaries of deputy district attorneys. The department shall submit
a report in the manner provided  by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for leg-
islation, to the interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to the judiciary no
later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2591