Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Inhalant” has the meaning given that term in ORS 433.835.
(b) “Vaporizing  detection device” means a device capable of detecting vapor created from
an instrument used to vaporize an inhalant.
(2) Each school district shall:
(a) Ensure  that a vaporizing detection device is installed in all student bathrooms and
common areas at each high  school in the district that has a student enrollment that is
greater than 1,000.
(b) Establish written policies and rules regarding  disciplinary action for students who
are, by means of a vaporizing  detection device or otherwise, discovered to be vaporizing an
inhalant. A school district’s  policies and rules established under this paragraph may not in-
clude suspension or expulsion.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3358