Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of  this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 197.
SECTION 2. (1) On or  before June 30, 2027, the Land Conservation and Development
Commission shall amend the statewide land use planning  goal relating to “citizen involve-
ment” as provided in this section.
(2) The commission shall adopt the goal  amendment by rule following the procedural and
substantive requirements in ORS 183.325 to 183.410. ORS 197.230, 197.235, 197.240  and 197.245
do not apply to this goal amendment.
(3) The  Department of Land Conservation and Development shall appoint an advisory
committee under ORS 183.333 consisting of 17 individuals, as follows:
(a) One member representing the department;
(b) One member, selected by the Governor, representing the Governor’s  Racial Justice
Council;
(c) One member from an organization focused on land use planning issues;
(d) One member from an organization focused on racial justice issues;
(e) One member from an organization focused on environmental justice issues;
(f) One member from an Oregon chapter of a land use planning association;
(g) One member from an organization focused on public participation or  with expertise
in public participation processes;
(h) One member from  a federally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon with extensive expe-
rience with land use  planning and Oregon Indian tribes and a deep understanding of rural
and urban tribal populations;
(i) Three members from a land use planning division of a city, including:
(A) One city with a population of more than 25,000;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1153
HB 2950
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) One city with a population of at least 10,000 and not more than 25,000; and
(C) One city with a population of less than 10,000;
(j) Three members from a land use planning division of a county, including:
(A) One county with a population of more than 250,000;
(B) One county with a population of at least 100,000 and not more than 250,000; and
(C) One county with a population of less than 100,000; and
(k) Three members of the public,  including at least one from a rural area and at least
one from, or with direct ties to, an underserved population.
(4) The meetings of  the advisory committee must consist of no fewer than 10 meetings
that are made virtually open to the public and provide opportunities for oral and  written
public comments.
(5) In adopting  the goal amendment, the department and advisory committee shall give
consideration to addressing issues of:
(a) Exclusive or outdated language in the existing goal;
(b) Adopting implementation standards;
(c) Overcoming barriers to public  participation related to time constraints, geography,
technology, language or other processes that reduce access to public participation;
(d) Diversity, equity and inclusion;
(e) Outreach and education;
(f) Racial justice; and
(g) Environmental and climate justice.
(6) The amended goal is effective 30 days after adoption.
(7) The amended goal shall include a renaming of  the goal to reflect, to the greatest ex-
tent possible, the broadest and most inclusive public engagement and  participation in land
use planning and decision-making processes by all  members of the community, including
environmental justice communities, as defined in ORS 182.535.
(8) In addition to adopting the amended goal under this  section, the advisory committee
shall assist the department with the reports under  section 4 of this 2025 Act. The advisory
committee shall hold at least one public hearing, as described in  subsection (4) of this sec-
tion, to solicit public feedback on the interim report.
(9) The commission or department  may request the assistance of any state agency, public
or private organization, including federal agencies, other states  and universities, in the
amendment and adoption of the goal.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding ORS 197.250, state agencies and local  governments shall
amend their comprehensive plans, land use regulations,  zoning ordinances, rules, plans and
programs to comply with the changes  to the statewide land use planning goals under section
2 of this 2025 Act on or before the date:
(1) 180 days after the adoption of the changes for state agencies, for cities with  a popu-
lation of more than 25,000 and for counties with a population of more than 250,000.
(2) 270 days after the adoption of the changes for cities with a population  of at least
10,000 and not more than 25,000 and for counties with a population of at least 100,000 and  not
more than 250,000.
(3) 540 days after the adoption of the changes for cities with  a population of less than
10,000 and for counties with a population of less than 100,000.
SECTION 4. (1) The Department of Land Conservation and Development, with the as-
[2]
HB 2950
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
sistance of  the advisory committee and public participation under section 2 of this 2025 Act,
shall study and develop recommendations for the public participation process that the Land
Conservation and Development Commission uses to amend, implement and review land use
goals under ORS 197.158, 197.160, 197.165, 197.175,  197.225, 197.230, 197.235, 197.240 and 197.245.
(2) The department shall submit reports on the study in the manner  provided by ORS
192.245, and may  include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to land use including:
(a) An interim report no later than August 1, 2026; and
(b) A final report no later than December 31, 2026.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]