Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
ORS 180.805, 180.810, 181A.820, 181A.822, 181A.823, 181A.826, 181A.827,
181A.828 and 181A.829 are repealed.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3393