Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
OREGON STRATEGIC RESILIENCE SUSTAINABILITY COMMISSION
(Establishment; Appointment; Term; Confirmation; Per Diem)
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Strategic Resilience Sustainability Commission is established.
(2) The commission consists of seven members appointed by the Governor.
(3) The term of office of each member of the  commission is four years, but a member
serves at the pleasure of the Governor. Before the expiration of the term  of a member, the
Governor shall appoint a successor whose term  begins on January 1 next following. A
member is eligible for reappointment. If there is a vacancy for any cause,  the Governor shall
make an appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(4) The appointment of each member of the commission is subject to confirmation by the
Senate in the manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
(5) A member of the commission is entitled  to compensation and expenses as provided in
ORS 292.495.
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding the term of  office specified by section 1 of this 2025 Act,
of the members first appointed to the  Oregon  Strategic  Resilience Sustainability Commis-
sion:
(1) One shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2027.
(2) Two shall serve for terms ending January 1, 2028.
(3) Two shall serve for terms ending January 1, 2029.
(4) Two shall serve for terms ending January 1, 2030.
(Qualification of Members)
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1095
HB 3310
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 3.
The members of  the Oregon Strategic Resilience Sustainability Commission
must be residents of  this state who are well informed in issues regarding agriculture, fishing,
food processing, retail food sales or other business sectors  the Governor deems critical to
developing a foodstuff supply system that will be sustainable  following a major seismic event.
(Officers of Commission; Quorum; Meetings)
SECTION 4. (1) The Oregon Strategic Resilience  Sustainability Commission shall select
one of its members as  chairperson and another as vice chairperson, for terms and with du-
ties and powers necessary for the performance of the  functions of the offices as the com-
mission determines.
(2) A majority of  the members of the commission constitutes a quorum for the trans-
action of business.
(3) The commission shall meet  at times and places specified by the call of the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the commission.
(Employees)
SECTION 5. (1) The Oregon Strategic Resilience Sustainability Commission shall appoint
a director to serve at the pleasure of the commission.
(2) The designation of the director must be  by written order, filed with the Secretary of
State.
(3) Subject to any applicable provisions of ORS chapter 240, the director shall  appoint all
subordinate officers and  employees of the commission, prescribe their duties and fix their
compensation.
(Authority to Adopt Rules)
SECTION 6. In accordance with applicable provisions of ORS chapter  183, the Oregon
Strategic Resilience Sustainability Commission may adopt  rules necessary for the adminis-
tration of the laws that the commission is charged with administering.
(Oaths; Witnesses; Subpoenas)
SECTION 7. The Oregon Strategic Resilience Sustainability Commission and  the director
and authorized representatives of the commission may administer oaths,  take depositions
and issue subpoenas to compel the  attendance of witnesses and the production of documents
or other written information necessary  to carry out the provisions of sections 1 to 9 of this
2025 Act. If any person fails to comply with a subpoena  issued under this section or refuses
to testify on matters  on which the person lawfully may be interrogated, the procedure set
out in ORS 183.440 shall be followed to compel obedience.
(Advisory and Technical Committees)
SECTION 8. (1) The Oregon Strategic Resilience  Sustainability Commission may establish
[2]
HB 3310
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
any advisory or  technical committee the commission considers necessary to aid and advise
the commission in the performance of its functions. The committees may be  continuing or
temporary committees.  The commission shall determine the representation, membership,
terms and organization of the committees and shall appoint the members of the committees.
(2) Members of the committees are not entitled  to compensation but, in the discretion
of the commission, may be reimbursed  from funds available to the commission for actual and
necessary travel and other expenses incurred by the members in the performance of  official
duties in the manner and amount provided in ORS 292.495.
OREGON STRATEGIC CARBON REDUCTION GRANTS
SECTION 9.
(1) The Oregon Strategic Resilience Sustainability Commission shall develop
and administer a program  to provide grants for increasing the amount, availability and se-
curity of regional foodstuff supplies. The  commission shall design the program to include,
but not necessarily be limited to:
(a) Establishing an Oregon Strategic Resiliency Self-Sufficiency Region, consisting of  a
300-mile diameter circle having a center near the geographic  center of this state, as the
production area for measuring the self-sufficiency of this state in foodstuff production;
(b) Establishing and administering a grant program  to encourage increased regional
production of all foodstuffs consumed within this state;
(c) Expanding regional foodstuff processing capacities including, but  not limited to, ex-
pansion achieved through grants and other targeted strategic investments to meet the
foodstuff production needs of this state;
(d) Establishing and administering a grant  program that provides grants to at-risk
foodstuff retailers to ensure the continued availability of critical foodstuffs in  vulnerable
areas of this state, all as defined by the commission; and
(e) Establishing partnerships to secure the best use of newly available foodstuff resources
when those resources  are not needed for responding to a major seismic event, including but
not limited to partnerships with  local and regional nonprofit organizations and public and
private enterprises.
(2) The commission shall establish grant schedules for purposes of subsection (1)(b)  and
(c) of this section that are based on the reduction in carbon emissions  achieved through the
delivery of regionally produced foodstuffs to supply regional markets.
SECTION 10.
The Oregon Strategic Resilience Sustainability Commission shall establish
and administer the program described in section 9 of this 2025 Act with the goal of achieving
on or before December 31, 2037:
(1) Identification of  the Oregon Strategic Resiliency Self-Sufficiency Region described in
section 9 (1)(a) of this 2025 Act;
(2) Regional production of 50 percent of all foodstuffs consumed within this state;
(3) Expansion of foodstuff processing facilities within the Oregon Strategic  Resiliency
Self-Sufficiency Region sufficient to process  all regionally produced foodstuffs consumed
within this state;
(4) The making of targeted strategic investments to develop regional foodstuff resources
sufficient to meet this state’s  anticipated foodstuff production needs following a major seis-
mic event;
[3]
HB 3310
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
(5) Arrangements for the payment of  grants to at-risk foodstuff retailers sufficient to
ensure the continued availability of  critical foodstuffs in vulnerable areas of this state as
described in section 9 (1)(d) of this 2025 Act; and
(6) Establishment of sufficient partnerships to secure the best use of newly  available
foodstuff resources when those resources are not needed for responding to a major seismic
event, including but not limited to partnerships with local and regional nonprofit organiza-
tions and public and private enterprises.
SECTION 11.
Section 10 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2038.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 12. The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
[4]