Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
TAX ON INHALANT-FORM NICOTINE
AND INHALANT DELIVERY SYSTEMS
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 12 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Consumer” means a person who  purchases an inhalant delivery system or inhalant-
form nicotine in this state for the person’s use or consumption, or for any purpose  other
than reselling the inhalant delivery system or inhalant-form nicotine to another person.
(2) “Inhalant delivery system” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431A.175.
(3) “Inhalant-form nicotine” means nicotine that:
(a) Is in a form that allows the nicotine to be delivered into a person’s  respiratory sys-
tem;
(b) Is inhaled for the purpose of delivering the  nicotine into a person’s respiratory sys-
tem; and
(c)(A) Is not approved by, or emitted by  a device approved by, the United States Food and
Drug Administration for a therapeutic purpose; or
(B) If approved by, or emitted by a device approved by,  the United States Food and Drug
Administration for a therapeutic purpose, is not marketed and sold solely for that purpose.
(4) “Inhalant wholesaler” means a person that:
(a) Holds inhalant-form nicotine or inhalant delivery systems for sale in this state to any
person; or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4509
HB 3467
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Makes the first sale of inhalant-form nicotine or an inhalant delivery system in this
state.
(5) “Nicotine retailer”  means a person that is engaged in the business of selling or oth-
erwise dispensing inhalant-form nicotine to consumers. The term also includes the operators
of or recipients of  revenue from all places such as smoke shops, cigar stores and vending
machines, where inhalant-form nicotine is made or stored for ultimate sale to consumers.
(6) “Sale” means any transfer, exchange or barter, in any manner or by  any means, for
a consideration, and includes all sales made by any  person. It includes a gift by a person
engaged in the business of selling inhalant-form nicotine,  for advertising, as a means of
evading the provisions of sections 1 to 12 of this 2017 Act, or for any other purpose.
(7) “Taxpayer” includes a nicotine retailer or other person required to  collect a tax im-
posed under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(8) “Untaxed inhalant  delivery system” means an inhalant delivery system for which the
tax required under section 2 of this 2017 Act has not been paid.
(9) “Wholesale price” means the price paid for an inhalant delivery system  by a nicotine
retailer at the point of first sale in this state.
SECTION 2.
(1)(a) A tax is hereby imposed upon the retail sale  of inhalant-form nicotine
in this state. The tax  imposed under this section is a direct tax on the consumer, for which
payment upon retail sale is required.  The tax shall be collected at the point of sale of
inhalant-form nicotine by a nicotine retailer at the time at which the retail sale occurs.
(b) The tax imposed under this subsection shall be imposed at the rate of 5  cents on each
container of inhalant-form nicotine with a volume of two milliliters or less.
(2)(a) A tax  is hereby imposed upon the wholesale sale of inhalant delivery systems and
inhalant-form nicotine. The tax shall be collected from  a nicotine retailer or consumer at the
point of first sale in this state.
(b) The tax imposed under this subsection shall be imposed at the rate of 10 cents  on
each:
(A) Container of inhalant-form nicotine with a volume greater than two milliliters; and
(B) Inhalant delivery system.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by the Department  of Revenue by rule, the amount of
the tax shall be separately  stated on an invoice, receipt or other similar document that the
inhalant wholesaler or nicotine retailer provides to the purchaser or  consumer at the time
at which the sale occurs.
(4) A person  may not knowingly sell, purchase, install, transfer or possess electronic
devices or software programs for the purposes of:
(a) Hiding or removing records of wholesale or retail  sales of inhalant delivery systems
or inhalant-form nicotine; or
(b) Falsifying records of wholesale  or retail sales of inhalant delivery systems or
inhalant-form nicotine.
(5) A nicotine retailer may not offer inhalant-form nicotine at no charge if the retail  sale
of the inhalant-form nicotine is made in conjunction with the retail sale of any other item.
SECTION 3.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in sections 1 to 12  of this 2017 Act, the tax
imposed upon the purchaser or consumer under section 2 of  this 2017 Act shall be collected
at the point of sale and remitted by each wholesale or retail seller of inhalant delivery sys-
tems or inhalant-form nicotine that engages in  the wholesale or retail sale of inhalant de-
[2]
HB 3467
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
livery systems or inhalant-form nicotine. The tax is a tax  upon the inhalant wholesaler or
nicotine retailer that is required to collect  the tax, and the inhalant wholesaler or nicotine
retailer is a taxpayer.
(2) The inhalant  wholesaler or nicotine retailer shall file a return with the Department
of Revenue on or before the last day of January, April, July and October of  each year for the
previous calendar quarter.
(3) The inhalant wholesaler or nicotine retailer  shall pay the tax to the department in the
form and manner prescribed by the  department, but not later than with each quarterly re-
turn, without regard to an extension granted under subsection (5) of this section.
(4) Inhalant wholesalers or nicotine retailers shall file the returns required under  this
section regardless of whether any tax is owed.
(5) For good cause, the department may  extend the time for filing a return under this
section. The extension may be  granted at any time if a written request is filed with the de-
partment during or prior to the period for which the extension may be granted. The depart-
ment may not grant an extension of more than 30 days.
(6) Interest shall be added at the rate  established under ORS 305.220 for each month, or
fraction of a month, from the time the return was originally required to  be filed to the time
of payment.
(7) If an inhalant wholesaler or a nicotine retailer fails to file a return or pay the  tax as
required by this section, the department shall impose a  penalty in the manner provided in
ORS 314.400.
(8) Except as provided in subsections (9) and (10)  of this section, the period prescribed
for the department to  allow or make a refund of any overpayment of tax paid under sections
1 to 12 of this 2017 Act is as provided in ORS 314.415.
(9)(a) The department shall first apply any  overpayment of tax by an inhalant wholesaler
or a nicotine retailer to any tax imposed under sections 1 to 12  of this 2017 Act that is owed
by the inhalant wholesaler or nicotine retailer.
(b) If after any offset against any delinquent  amount the overpayment of tax remains
greater than $1,000, the remaining refund shall be  applied as a credit against the next sub-
sequent calendar quarter as an estimated payment.
(10) The department may not make a refund of, or credit, any overpayment  of tax under
sections 1 to 12 of this 2017 Act that was credited to the account of an inhalant wholesaler
or a nicotine retailer under subsection (9)(b) of this section if the return for that tax period
is not filed within three years after the due date of that return.
SECTION 4.
(1) Every person who collects any  amount under section 3 of this 2017 Act
shall hold the same in trust for the State of Oregon and for the payment thereof to the  De-
partment of Revenue in the manner and at the time provided in section 3 of this 2017 Act.
(2) At any time an inhalant wholesaler or a nicotine retailer fails to  remit any amount
collected, the department may enforce collection by the issuance  of a distraint warrant for
the collection of the delinquent amount and all penalties, interest and collection charges ac-
crued thereon. The warrant shall be issued, recorded and proceeded  upon in the same man-
ner and shall have the same force and effect as is prescribed with respect to warrants for
the collection of delinquent income taxes.
(3)(a) In  the case of an inhalant wholesaler or a nicotine retailer that is assessed pursu-
ant to the provisions of  ORS 305.265 (12) and 314.407 (1), the department may issue a notice
[3]
HB 3467
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of liability to any officer, employee or member of the inhalant wholesaler or nicotine retailer
within three years from the time  of assessment. Within 30 days from the date the notice of
liability is mailed to the officer, employee or member, the  officer, employee or member shall
pay the assessment, plus penalties  and interest, or advise the department in writing of ob-
jections to the liability  and, if desired, request a conference. A conference shall be governed
by the provisions of ORS 305.265 pertaining to a conference  requested from a notice of defi-
ciency.
(b) After  a conference or, if no conference is requested, a determination of the issues
considering the written objections, the department shall mail the officer,  employee or mem-
ber a conference  letter affirming, canceling or adjusting the notice of liability. Within 90 days
from the date the conference letter is mailed  to the officer, employee or member, the officer,
employee or member shall pay the assessment, plus penalties and interest, or appeal  to the
Oregon Tax Court in the manner provided for an appeal from a notice of assessment.
(c) If the department does not receive  payment or written objection to the notice of li-
ability within 30 days after the notice of liability was mailed, the notice of liability  becomes
final. In that event, the officer, employee or member may appeal the notice of liability to  the
tax court within 90 days after it became final in the manner  provided for an appeal from a
notice of assessment.
(4)(a) In the case of a failure  to file a return on the due date, governed by the provisions
of ORS 305.265 (10) and 314.400, the department, in addition to  any action described in the
provisions of ORS 305.265 (10) and 314.400, may  send notices of determination and assessment
to any officer, employee or member any time within three  years after the assessment. The
time of  assessment against the officer, employee or member is 30 days after the date the
notice of determination and assessment  is mailed. Within 30 days from the date the notice
of determination and assessment is mailed to  the officer, employee or member, the officer,
employee or member shall pay the assessment,  plus penalties and interest, or advise the
department in writing of objections to the assessment and,  if desired, request a conference.
A conference shall be governed by the provisions of ORS 305.265 pertaining  to a conference
requested from a notice of deficiency.
(b) After  a conference or, if no conference is requested, a determination of the issues
considering the written objections, the department shall mail the officer,  employee or mem-
ber a  conference letter affirming, canceling or adjusting the notice of determination and as-
sessment. Within 90 days from the date the conference  letter is mailed to the officer,
employee or member, the officer, employee or member shall pay the assessment,  plus pen-
alties and interest, or appeal in the manner provided for an appeal from a notice of assess-
ment.
(c) If the department does not receive payment or written  objection to the notice of de-
termination and assessment within 30 days after the notice of determination and assessment
was mailed, the notice of determination and assessment becomes  final. In that event, the
officer, employee or member may appeal the notice of determination  and assessment to the
tax court within 90 days after it became final in the manner  provided for an appeal from a
notice of assessment.
(5)(a) More than one officer or employee of a corporation may be  held jointly and se-
verally liable for payment of taxes.
(b) Notwithstanding the confidentiality provisions of section 11 of this 2017 Act,  if more
[4]
HB 3467
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
than one officer or employee of a corporation may be held  jointly and severally liable for
payment of taxes, the department may  require any or all of the officers, members or em-
ployees who may be  held liable to appear before the department for a joint determination of
liability. The department shall notify each officer, member or employee of the time  and place
set for the determination of liability.
(c) Each person notified of a joint determination under this subsection shall appear and
present such information as is necessary to establish that person’s liability or nonliability
for payment  of taxes to the department. If a person who was notified fails to appear, the
department shall make its determination on the  basis of all the information and evidence
presented. The department’s determination is binding on all persons  notified and required to
appear under this subsection.
(d)(A) If an appeal is taken to the tax court pursuant to section 11 of this 2017 Act  by
any person determined to be liable for unpaid taxes under this subsection, each person re-
quired to appear before the department under this subsection shall be  impleaded by the
plaintiff. The department may implead any officer, employee  or member who may be held
jointly and severally liable for the payment of taxes. Each  person impleaded under this par-
agraph shall be made a party to the action  before the tax court and shall make available to
the tax court the information that was presented before the department, as well as  other
information that may be presented to the tax court.
(B) The tax court  may determine that one or more persons impleaded under this para-
graph are liable for  unpaid taxes without regard to any earlier determination by the depart-
ment that an impleaded person was not liable for unpaid taxes.
(C) If a person required to appear before the tax court under this subsection fails  or re-
fuses to appear or bring such information in part or in whole, or is outside the jurisdiction
of the tax court, the tax court shall make its determination on  the basis of all the evidence
introduced. Notwithstanding section  11 of this 2017 Act, the evidence constitutes a public
record and shall be available  to the parties and the tax court. The determination of the tax
court is binding on all persons made parties to the action under this subsection.
(e) This section may not be construed to preclude a determination by the department or
the tax  court that more than one officer, employee or member is jointly and severally liable
for unpaid taxes.
SECTION 5.
(1) An inhalant wholesaler or a nicotine retailer shall keep receipts, invoices
and other pertinent records related to wholesale and retail sales of  inhalant delivery systems
and inhalant-form nicotine in the form  required by the Department of Revenue. Each record
shall be preserved for five years from the time to which the record relates, or for  as long
as the inhalant wholesaler  or nicotine retailer retains the inhalant delivery systems or
inhalant-form nicotine to which the  record relates, whichever is later. During the retention
period and at any time prior to the destruction of records, the  department may give written
notice to the inhalant wholesaler or nicotine retailer not to destroy records  described in the
notice without written permission of the department. Notwithstanding any  other provision
of law, the  department shall preserve reports and returns filed with the department for at
least five years.
(2) The department or its authorized representative, upon  oral or written demand, may
make examinations of the books,  papers, records and equipment of persons making wholesale
or retail sales of inhalant delivery systems or inhalant-form nicotine and any other investi-
[5]
HB 3467
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
gations the department deems necessary to carry out  the provisions of sections 1 to 12 of
this 2017 Act.
SECTION 6. (1) The Department of Revenue has authority, by order or subpoena  to be
served with the same force and effect  and in the same manner as a subpoena is served in a
civil action in the circuit court, or the Oregon Tax Court, to require the  production at any
time and place the department designates of any books, papers, accounts or other informa-
tion necessary to carry out sections 1 to 12 of this 2017  Act. The department may require
the attendance of any person having knowledge in the premises,  and may take testimony and
require proof material for the information, with power to administer oaths to the person.
(2) If a person fails to comply with a subpoena or order of the department  or to produce
or permit the examination or inspection of any books, papers, records  and equipment perti-
nent to an investigation or inquiry under sections 1 to 12 of this 2017 Act, or to  testify to
any matter regarding which the person is lawfully interrogated, the department may apply
to the Oregon  Tax Court or to the circuit court of the county in which the person resides
or where the person is located for an order to  the person to attend and testify, or otherwise
to comply with the demand or request of the department. The department  shall apply to the
court by ex parte motion, upon which the court shall  make an order requiring the person
against whom the motion is directed to comply with the request or  demand of the depart-
ment within 10 days after the service of the order,  or within the additional time granted by
the court, or to justify the failure within that time. The order shall be served upon  the per-
son to whom it is  directed in the manner required by this state for service of process, which
service is required to confer jurisdiction upon the court. Failure to obey any order issued
by the court under this section is contempt of court. The remedy provided  by this section is
in addition to other remedies, civil or criminal, existing under the  tax laws or other laws of
this state.
SECTION 7.
Except as otherwise provided in sections 1 to  12 of this 2017 Act, a person
aggrieved by an act or determination of  the Department of Revenue or its authorized agent
under sections 1 to 12 of this 2017 Act may appeal, within 90 days after the act  or determi-
nation, to the Oregon Tax Court in the manner provided in  ORS 305.404 to 305.560. These
appeal rights are the exclusive remedy available  to determine the person’s liability for the
tax imposed under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 8. (1)(a) When an amount represented  by a nicotine retailer at retail to a
consumer as constituting the tax imposed under section 2 of this  2017 Act is computed upon
an amount  that is not taxable or is in excess of the taxable amount and is actually paid by
the consumer to the nicotine retailer, the excess tax paid shall be returned by  the nicotine
retailer to the consumer upon written notification by  the Department of Revenue or the
consumer.
(b) The written notification must contain  information necessary to determine the validity
of the consumer’s claim.
(2) If the nicotine retailer does not return the excess tax within 60 days after mailing  of
the written notification required  under subsection (1) of this section, the consumer may ap-
peal to the department for a  refund of the amount of the excess tax, in the manner and
within the time allowed under rules adopted by the department.
(3) If excess tax is returned to the consumer by the department, the department may
issue a notice of deficiency for the excess tax to the nicotine retailer in the manner  provided
[6]
HB 3467
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under ORS 305.265.
SECTION 9. For the purpose of compensating nicotine retailers for expenses incurred  in
collecting the tax imposed under section 2 of this 2017 Act, each nicotine retailer is permitted
to deduct and retain two percent of the amount of taxes that  are collected by the nicotine
retailer from all retail sales of inhalant-form nicotine conducted by the nicotine retailer.
SECTION 10. The Department of Revenue shall administer and enforce  sections 1 to 12
of this 2017 Act. The department is authorized to establish rules and procedures  for the im-
plementation and enforcement of sections 1 to 12 of this 2017 Act that are consistent  with
sections 1 to  12 of this 2017 Act and that the department considers necessary and appropriate
to administer and enforce sections 1 to 12 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 11. Except as  otherwise provided in sections 1 to 12 of this 2017 Act or where
the context requires otherwise, the provisions of ORS chapters 305 and 314 as to  the audit
and examination of returns, periods of limitation, determination of and notices  of deficien-
cies, assessments, collections, liens, delinquencies, claims for refund  and refunds, confer-
ences, appeals to the Oregon Tax Court, stays of collection pending  appeal, confidentiality
of returns and the penalties relative thereto, and the procedures relating thereto, apply to
the determinations of taxes, penalties and interest under sections 1 to 12 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 12.
(1) All moneys received by the Department of Revenue  under sections 1 to
12 of  this 2017 Act shall be deposited in the State Treasury and credited to a suspense ac-
count established under ORS 293.445. The department  may pay expenses for the adminis-
tration and enforcement of sections 1 to  12 of this 2017 Act out of moneys received from the
tax imposed under section 2 of this 2017 Act. Amounts necessary to pay administrative  and
enforcement expenses are continuously appropriated to the department from the suspense
account.
(2) After the payment of administrative and enforcement expenses and  refunds or credits
arising from erroneous  overpayments, the department shall transfer the balance of the
moneys received by the  department under this section to the Mental Health Services Fund
established in section 13 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 13.
The Mental Health  Services Fund is established in the State Treasury sep-
arate and apart from the  General Fund. The Mental Health Services Fund consists of moneys
transferred to the  fund by the Department of Revenue under section 12 of this 2017 Act.
Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority  to be used
to pay for behavioral health treatment and other services for residents of this  state who
have mental illness or substance abuse disorders.
RECONCILIATION OF ADDRESSES OF MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
RECIPIENTS WITH NATIONAL CHANGE OF ADDRESS PRODUCT
SECTION 14. At regular intervals of not less than six months, the Oregon Health Au-
thority shall reconcile the addresses  listed for individuals receiving medical assistance with
the National Change of Address product licensed by the United States Postal Service to  de-
termine if any recipients of  medical assistance have moved out of this state. If the recon-
ciliation shows that a recipient of medical assistance has  moved out of this state, the
authority shall immediately take appropriate actions to terminate the recipient’s  medical
assistance.
[7]
HB 3467
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
EXEMPTION OF VAPOR SHOPS FROM
OREGON INDOOR CLEAN AIR ACT
SECTION 15.  ORS 433.835 is amended to read:
433.835. As used in ORS 433.835 to 433.875:
(1) “Cigar bar” means a business that:
(a) Has on-site sales of cigars as defined in ORS 323.500;
(b) Has a humidor on the premises;
(c) Allows the smoking of cigars on  the premises but prohibits the smoking, aerosolizing or
vaporizing of other inhalants on the premises;
(d) Has been issued and operates under a full  on-premises sales license issued under ORS
471.175;
(e) Prohibits  persons under 21 years of age from entering the premises and posts notice of the
prohibition;
(f) Does not offer video lottery games as authorized under ORS 461.217;
(g) Has a maximum seating capacity of 40 persons;
(h) Has a  ventilation system that exhausts smoke from the business and is designed and termi-
nated in accordance with the state building code standards  for the occupancy classification in use;
and
(i) Requires all employees to read and sign a document that explains the dangers of exposure
to secondhand smoke.
(2) “Inhalant” means nicotine, a cannabinoid or any other substance that:
(a) Is in  a form that allows the nicotine, cannabinoid or substance to be delivered into a person’s
respiratory system;
(b) Is inhaled for the purpose of delivering the nicotine, cannabinoid or other substance into  a
person’s respiratory system; and
(c)(A) Is not approved by,  or emitted by a device approved by, the United States Food and Drug
Administration for a therapeutic purpose; or
(B) If approved by, or emitted by a  device approved by, the United States Food and Drug Ad-
ministration for a therapeutic purpose, is not marketed and sold solely for that purpose.
(3) “Inhalant delivery system” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431A.175.
[(3)(a)] (4)(a)  “Place of employment” means an enclosed area under the control of a public or
private employer, including work areas, employee lounges, vehicles that  are operated in the course
of an employer’s business and  that are not operated exclusively by one employee, rest rooms, con-
ference rooms, classrooms, cafeterias, hallways, meeting rooms, elevators and stairways.
(b) “Place of employment” does not include a private residence unless it is  used as a child care
facility as defined in ORS 329A.250  or a facility providing adult day care as defined in ORS 410.490.
[(4)] (5) “Public place” means an enclosed area open to the public.
[(5)] (6)  “Smoke shop” means a business that is certified with the Oregon  Health Authority as
a smoke shop pursuant to the rules adopted under ORS 433.847.
[(6)] (7)  “Smoking instrument” means any cigar, cigarette, pipe or other  instrument used to
smoke tobacco, marijuana or any other inhalant.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 433.847 is amended to read:
433.847. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules  establishing a certification system
for smoke shops. [ In adopting such rules, the authority shall  prohibit the smoking, aerosolizing or
[8]
HB 3467
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vaporizing of inhalants that are not tobacco products in smoke shops. ]
(2) The authority shall issue a smoke shop certification to a business that:
(a)(A) Is primarily engaged in the sale, for off-premises consumption  or use, of tobacco products
and smoking instruments used to smoke tobacco products  or  inhalants or inhalant delivery sys-
tems, with at least 75 percent of the gross revenues of the business resulting from such sales;
(B) Prohibits persons under 18 years of age from entering the premises;
(C) Does not offer video lottery games as authorized under ORS 461.217, social gaming or betting
on the premises;
(D) Does not sell or offer food or beverages and does not  sell, offer or allow on-premises con-
sumption of alcoholic beverages;
(E) Is a stand-alone business with no other businesses or residential  property attached to the
premises;
(F) Has a maximum seating capacity of four persons; and
(G) Allows the smoking of  tobacco product samples or the vaporizing or aerosolizing of
inhalants only for the purpose of making retail purchase decisions;
(b) On December 31, 2008:
(A) Met the requirements of paragraph (a)(A) to (D) of this subsection; and
(B)(i) Was a stand-alone business with no other businesses or residential property attached; or
(ii) Had a ventilation system that  exhausted smoke and vapor from the business and was de-
signed and terminated in  accordance with the state building code standards for the occupancy
classification in use; or
(c)(A) Was certified as a smoke shop under ORS 433.835, as in effect  immediately before June
30, 2011, by the authority on or before December 31, 2012; and
(B) Allows  the smoking of cigarettes only if at least 75 percent of the gross revenues of the
business results from the sale of cigarettes.
(3) A smoke shop certified under subsection (2)(b)  of this section must renew the smoke shop
certification every five years by demonstrating  to the satisfaction of the authority that the smoke
shop:
(a)(A) Meets the requirements of subsection (2)(a)(A) to (D) of this section; and
(B)(i) Is a stand-alone business with no other businesses or residential property attached; or
(ii) Has a ventilation system  that exhausts smoke  and vapor from the business and is designed
and terminated in  accordance with the state building code standards for the occupancy classification
in use; and
(b) Allows the smoking of cigarettes or the vaporizing or aerosolizing of inhalants only if at
least 75 percent of the gross revenues of the business results from the sale of cigarettes.
(4) A smoke shop certified under subsection (2)(c)  of this section must renew the smoke shop
certification every five years by demonstrating to the satisfaction of  the authority that the smoke
shop:
(a) Meets the requirements of ORS 433.835, as in effect immediately before June 30, 2011; and
(b) Allows the smoking of cigarettes only if at least 75 percent of the  gross revenues of the
business results from the sale of cigarettes.
(5) The owner of a smoke shop certified under subsection (2)(b) or (c) of  this section may
transfer the certification with ownership of the smoke shop if the transfer is  made in accordance
with rules adopted by the authority.
(6) A smoke shop certified under subsection (2)(b) of this section may continue to be  certified
[9]
HB 3467
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in a new location under subsection (2)(b) of this section if:
(a)(A) The new location occupies no more than 3,500 square feet; or
(B) If the old location occupied more than 3,500 square feet, the  new location occupies no more
than 110 percent of the space occupied by the old location; and
(b) The smoke shop as operated in the new location:
(A) Meets the requirements of subsection (2)(a)(A) to (D) of this section;
(B)(i) Is a stand-alone business with no other businesses or residential property attached; or
(ii) Has a ventilation system  that exhausts smoke  and vapor from the business and is designed
and terminated in  accordance with the state building code standards for the occupancy classification
in use; and
(C) Allows the smoking of cigarettes or the  vaporizing or aerosolizing of inhalants only if
at least 75 percent of the gross revenues of the business results from the sale of cigarettes.
(7) A smoke shop certified under subsection (2)(c) of this section may continue to be certified
in a new location under subsection (2)(c) of this section if:
(a)(A) The new location occupies no more than 3,500 square feet; or
(B) If the old location occupied more than 3,500 square feet, the  new location occupies no more
than 110 percent of the space occupied by the old location; and
(b) The smoke shop as operated in the new location:
(A) Meets the requirements of ORS 433.835, as in effect immediately before June 30, 2011; and
(B) Allows  the smoking of cigarettes only if at least 75 percent of the gross revenues of the
business results from the sale of cigarettes.
(8) Rules adopted under this section must provide that,  in order to obtain a smoke shop certi-
fication, a business must agree to allow the authority to make  unannounced inspections of the
business to determine compliance with ORS 433.835 to 433.875.
FUNDING FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
SECTION 17.
The Oregon Health Authority shall terminate  payments of the administra-
tive expense portion of the  hospital reimbursement adjustment made to coordinated care
organizations out  of moneys in the Hospital Quality Assurance Fund established in section
9, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003.
SECTION 18. Section 17 of this 2017 Act applies to payments of the administrative ex-
pense portion of the hospital reimbursement adjustment made to coordinated care  organ-
izations on and after July 1, 2017. The Oregon Health Authority  may recover from
coordinated care  organizations payments for the administrative expense portion of the hos-
pital reimbursement adjustment made on and after July 1, 2017.
SECTION 19. (1) From the unexpended balance of  the Health Insurance Exchange Fund
established in ORS 741.102, $12 million is transferred to the Oregon Health  Authority Fund
established in ORS 413.101.
(2) From the unexpended balance of the Hospital Quality Assurance Fund established in
section 9, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, $72 million  is transferred to the Oregon Health
Authority Fund.
(3) From the unexpended balance  of the Health Care Trust Fund established in ORS
293.540, on:
(a) January 1, 2018, $25 million is transferred to the Oregon Health Authority Fund.
[10]
HB 3467
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) January 1, 2019, $25 million is transferred to the Oregon Health Authority Fund.
(4) Any moneys remaining in the Oregon Medical  Insurance Pool Account established in
ORS 735.612 on the effective date of this 2017  Act are transferred to the Oregon Health Au-
thority Fund.
(5) All moneys transferred to the Oregon Health  Authority Fund under this section shall
be used by the Oregon Health Authority to provide medical assistance  under ORS chapter
414.
SECTION 20.
If the actual  decrease in the medical assistance caseload on the operative
date of this section specified in section 42 of this 2017 Act is  greater than the decrease in the
medical assistance caseload  projected by the Oregon Health Authority as of June 30, 2017,
up to $85 million  of the difference between the actual caseload savings and the projected
caseload savings are transferred to the Oregon Health Authority Fund established in ORS
413.101.
SECTION 21.
(1) No later than December 1,  2017, the Oregon Health Authority shall
submit for approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services  an amendment to the
Medicaid state plan to permit the hospital assessment under section 2, chapter  736, Oregon
Laws 2003, to be imposed at the rate of six percent.
(2) No later than December 15, 2017, the authority  shall report to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to health the  status of the amendment to the Medicaid
state plan described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 22. Section 1, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, as amended  by section 34, chapter 792,
Oregon Laws 2009, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  As used in sections 1 to 9, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003:
(1) “Charity care” means costs for providing inpatient or outpatient care services free of  charge
or at a  reduced charge because of the indigence or lack of health insurance of the patient receiving
the care services.
(2) “Contractual adjustments” means the  difference between the amounts charged based on the
hospital’s full established charges and the amount received or due from the payor.
(3) “Health district hospital” means a hospital created  by a health district under ORS
440.315 to 440.410.
[(3)] (4)(a) “Hospital” [ has the meaning given that term in ORS  442.015] means a hospital li-
censed under ORS chapter 441 .
(b) “Hospital” does not include :
(A) Special inpatient care facilities ;
(B) Hospitals that provide only psychiatric care;
(C) Hospitals providing care to children at no charge; and
(D) Public hospitals.
[(4)] (5) “Net revenue”:
(a) Means the total amount of charges for inpatient or outpatient care provided by the  hospital
to patients, less charity care, bad debts and contractual adjustments;
(b) Does not include revenue derived from sources other  than inpatient or outpatient operations,
including but not limited to interest and guest meals; and
(c) Does not include any revenue that is taken into account in computing a long term care  fa-
cility assessment under sections 15 to 22,  24 and 29,  chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003.
[(5) “Waivered hospital”  means a type A or type B hospital, as described in ORS 442.470, a hos-
[11]
HB 3467
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
pital that provides only psychiatric care or a hospital identified by the Department of Human  Services
as appropriate for inclusion in the application described  in section 4, chapter 736, Oregon Laws
2003.]
(6) “Type A hospital” has the meaning given that term in ORS 442.470.
(7) “Type B hospital” has the meaning given that term in ORS 442.470.
SECTION 23.
 Section 2, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, as amended by  section 1, chapter 780,
Oregon Laws 2007, section 51, chapter 828, Oregon  Laws 2009, section 17, chapter 867, Oregon Laws
2009, section 2, chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2013, and section 1, chapter 16, Oregon Laws  2015, is
amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) An assessment is imposed on the net revenue of  each hospital in this state [ that is
not a waivered hospital ]. Except as provided in  subsection (2) of this section, the assessment
shall be imposed at a rate [ determined by the Director of the Oregon Health Authority  by rule that is
the director’s best estimate of the rate needed to fund the services and costs identified in  section 9,
chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003 ] of 5.5 percent . [ The rate of assessment shall be imposed on the net
revenue of each hospital subject to assessment. The director shall consult with  representatives of hos-
pitals before setting the assessment. ]
(2)(a) The director may impose  a rate lower than 5.5 percent on type A hospitals, type
B hospitals and health district hospitals to  take into account the hospital’s financial position.
(b) If the director reduces  the rate of assessment under this subsection, the director may
increase the assessment imposed under subsection (1) of this section  to 5.7 percent for hos-
pitals other than type A hospitals, type B hospitals and health district hospitals.
[(2)] (3) The assessment shall be reported on a form  prescribed by the Oregon Health Authority
and shall contain  the information required to be reported by the authority. The assessment form
shall be filed with  the authority on or before the 75th day following the end of the calendar quarter
for which the assessment is being reported. Except as provided in subsection [ (6)] (5) of  this section,
the hospital shall pay the assessment at the time  the hospital files the assessment report. The pay-
ment shall accompany the report.
[(3)(a) To the extent permitted by federal law, aggregate assessments  imposed under this section
may not exceed the total of the following amounts received by the hospitals that  are reimbursed by
Medicare based on diagnostic related groups: ]
[(A) 30 percent of payments made to the hospitals on a  fee-for-service basis by the authority for
inpatient hospital services; ]
[(B) 41 percent of payments made  to the hospitals on a fee-for-service basis by the authority for
outpatient hospital services; and ]
[(C) Payments made to the hospitals using a payment  methodology established by the authority that
advances the goals of the Oregon Integrated and Coordinated Health Care Delivery System  described
in ORS 414.620 (3). ]
[(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  aggregate assessments imposed on or after
July 1, 2015, may exceed the total of the amounts described in  paragraph (a) of this subsection to the
extent necessary  to compensate for any reduction of funding in the legislatively adopted budget for
hospital services under ORS 414.631, 414.651 and 414.688 to 414.745. ]
(4) [ Notwithstanding subsection (3) of  this section, ] A hospital is not guaranteed that any addi-
tional moneys paid to the hospital in the form of payments for services shall equal or exceed the
amount of the assessment paid by the hospital.
[(5) Hospitals operated by the United States Department of  Veterans Affairs and pediatric specialty
[12]
HB 3467
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
hospitals providing  care to children at no charge are exempt from the assessment imposed under this
section.]
[(6)(a)] (5)(a) The authority shall develop a schedule  for collection of the assessment for the
calendar quarter ending September 30, [ 2019] 2021, that will result in the collection occurring be-
tween December 15, [ 2019] 2021, and the time all Medicaid cost  settlements are finalized for that
calendar quarter.
(b) The authority shall prescribe by rule criteria for late payment of assessments.
SECTION 24.
 Section 3, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, as amended by  section 3, chapter 608,
Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  [ (1)] Notwithstanding section 2, chapter  736, Oregon Laws 2003, the Director of the
Oregon Health Authority shall reduce the rate of assessment imposed under section 2,  chapter 736,
Oregon Laws 2003, to the maximum rate allowed  under federal law if the reduction is required to
comply with federal law.
[(2) If federal law requires a reduction in the rate of assessments, the director shall, after  consult-
ing with representatives of the hospitals that  are subject to the assessments, first reduce the distribution
of moneys described in section 9 (2)(d), chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, by a corresponding amount. ]
SECTION 25.  Section 7, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, as amended by  section 5, chapter 608,
Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  The Oregon Health  Authority may audit the records of any hospital in this state to de-
termine compliance with sections 1 to 9, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003[ , and section 1 of this  2013
Act]. The authority may audit records at any time for a period of five years following  the date an
assessment is due to be reported and paid under section 2, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003.
SECTION 26.  Section 9, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, as amended by  section 2, chapter 757,
Oregon Laws 2005, section 2, chapter 780, Oregon Laws  2007, section 53, chapter 828, Oregon Laws
2009, section 19, chapter 867, Oregon  Laws 2009, section 59, chapter 602, Oregon Laws 2011, and
section 7, chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  (1) The Hospital Quality Assurance Fund  is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Hospital Quality Assurance Fund shall
be credited to the Hospital Quality Assurance Fund.
(2) Amounts in the Hospital  Quality Assurance Fund are continuously appropriated to the
Oregon Health Authority for the purpose of:
(a) Paying refunds due under section 6, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003;
(b) Funding [ services under ORS 414.631, 414.651 and 414.688  to 414.750 ] medical assistance
under ORS chapter 414 , including  but not limited to increasing reimbursement rates for inpatient
and outpatient hospital services [ under ORS 414.631, 414.651 and 414.688 to 414.750 ];
(c) Making payments described in section 2 (3)(a)(C), chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003;
(d) Making  distributions, as described in section 1 (4) , chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2013  [ of this
2013 Act ], of an amount of moneys equal to the federal financial participation received from  one
percentage point of the rate assessed under section 2, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003; [ and]
(e) Making qualified directed payments to coordinated  care organizations to be used to
provide to type A hospitals, type B hospitals and health  district hospitals additional re-
imbursement that:
(A) Is based on the utilization and delivery of services;
(B) Is expended equally, using the same terms of performance for all type A hospitals
and type B hospitals;
[13]
HB 3467
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Is expected to advance at least one of the goals of the state’s quality strategy;
(D) Is evaluated on the degree to which the payments advance at least one of the goals
of the state’s quality strategy;
(E) Does not require a hospital  to enter into an intergovernmental transfer agreement;
and
(F) Is not renewed automatically; and
[(e)] (f) Paying administrative costs incurred by the authority to administer [ section 1 of this 2013
Act and ] the assessments imposed under section 2, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003.
(3) [Except for assessments  imposed pursuant to section 2 (3)(b), chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, ]
The authority may not use moneys from the Hospital Quality  Assurance Fund to supplant, directly
or indirectly, other moneys made available to fund services described in subsection  (2) of this sec-
tion.
SECTION 27.
 Section 9, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, as amended by  section 2, chapter 757,
Oregon Laws 2005, section 2, chapter 780, Oregon Laws  2007, section 53, chapter 828, Oregon Laws
2009, section 19, chapter 867, Oregon Laws 2009, section 59, chapter 602, Oregon Laws 2011,  section
7, chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2013, and section 26 of this 2017 Act, is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  (1) The Hospital Quality Assurance Fund  is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Hospital Quality Assurance Fund shall
be credited to the Hospital Quality Assurance Fund.
(2) Amounts in the Hospital Quality Assurance Fund are  continuously appropriated to the
Oregon Health Authority for the purpose of:
(a) Paying refunds due under section 6, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003;
(b) Funding medical assistance under ORS chapter 414, including but  not limited to increasing
reimbursement rates for inpatient and outpatient hospital services;
[(c) Making payments described in section 2 (3)(a)(C), chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003; ]
[(d) Making distributions,  as described in section 1 (4), chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2013, of an
amount of moneys equal to the federal financial  participation received from one percentage point of the
rate assessed under section 2, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003; ]
[(e)] (c)  Making qualified directed payments to coordinated care organizations to be used  to
provide  to  type A hospitals, type B hospitals and health district hospitals additional reimbursement
that:
(A) Is based on the utilization and delivery of services;
(B) Is expended equally, using the same terms of performance  for all type A hospitals and type
B hospitals;
(C) Is expected to advance at least one of the goals of the state’s quality strategy;
(D) Is evaluated on the degree to which the payments advance at least one of  the goals of the
state’s quality strategy;
(E) Does not require a hospital to enter into an intergovernmental transfer agreement; and
(F) Is not renewed automatically; and
[(f)] (d)  Paying administrative costs incurred by the authority to  administer the assessments
imposed under section 2, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003.
(3) The authority may not use moneys from the Hospital Quality Assurance  Fund to supplant,
directly or indirectly, other moneys made available to fund services described in subsection (2) of
this section.
SECTION 28.
 Section 10, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, as amended  by section 3, chapter 780,
[14]
HB 3467
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Oregon Laws 2007, section 20, chapter 867, Oregon Laws  2009, section 8, chapter 608, Oregon Laws
2013, and section 2, chapter 16, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 10.  Sections 1 to 9, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, apply to  net revenues earned by hos-
pitals during a period beginning October 1, 2015, and ending the earlier of  September 30, [ 2019]
2021, or the date on which the assessment no longer qualifies for federal financial participation un-
der Title XIX or XXI of the Social Security Act.
SECTION 29. Section 12, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, as amended  by section 4, chapter 780,
Oregon Laws 2007, section 21, chapter 867, Oregon Laws  2009, section 9, chapter 608, Oregon Laws
2013, and section 3, chapter 16, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 12.  Sections  1 to 9, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, [ and section 1, chapter 608, Oregon
Laws 2013,] are repealed on January 2, [ 2024] 2026.
SECTION 30. Section 13, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, as amended  by section 5, chapter 780,
Oregon Laws 2007, section 22, chapter 867, Oregon  Laws 2009, section 10, chapter 608, Oregon Laws
2013, and section 4, chapter 16, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 13.  Nothing in the repeal of sections 1 to 9, chapter 736, Oregon Laws  2003, [ and section
1, chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2013, ] by section 12, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003,  affects the impo-
sition and collection of a hospital  assessment under sections 1 to 9, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003,
for a calendar quarter beginning before September 30, [ 2019] 2021.
SECTION 31. Section 14, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, as amended  by section 6, chapter 780,
Oregon Laws 2007, section 23, chapter 867, Oregon Laws 2009, and section 5,  chapter 16, Oregon
Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 14.  Any moneys remaining in the Hospital Quality Assurance  Fund on December 31,
[2023] 2025, are transferred to the General Fund.
SECTION 32.  Section 15, chapter 389, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 15.  Section 1, chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2013, as amended by section 6,  chapter 16, Oregon
Laws 2015, and section 13 , [ of this 2015 Act ] chapter 389, Oregon Laws 2015 , is repealed on [ Sep-
tember 30, 2019 ] July 1, 2018 .
SECTION 33.  ORS 323.031 is amended to read:
323.031. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 323.030 (2)  and in addition to and not in lieu of any other tax,
every distributor shall pay a tax upon distributions of cigarettes at the rate  of [ 30]  mills
for the distribution of each cigarette in this state.
(2) Any cigarette for which a tax has once been imposed under ORS  323.005 to 323.482 may not
be subject upon a subsequent distribution to the taxes imposed by ORS 323.005 to 323.482.
SECTION 34.  ORS 323.457 is amended to read:
323.457. (1) Moneys received under ORS 323.031 shall be paid over to the  State Treasurer to be
held in a suspense account established under ORS 293.445. After the payment of refunds:
(a) [ 29.37/30]  of the moneys shall be credited to the Oregon Health [ Plan] Authority
Fund established under ORS [ 414.109] 413.101;
(b) [ 0.14/30]  of the moneys are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services for distribution to the cities of this state;
(c) [ 0.14/30]  of the moneys are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services for distribution to the counties of this state;
(d) [ 0.14/30]  of the moneys are continuously appropriated to the Department of  Trans-
portation to be distributed and  transferred to the Elderly and Disabled Special Transportation Fund
established under ORS 391.800; and
[15]
HB 3467
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) [ 0.21/30]  of the  moneys shall be credited to the Tobacco Use Reduction Account
established under ORS 431A.153.
(2)(a) Moneys distributed to cities and counties under  this section shall be distributed to each
city or county using the proportions used for distributions made under ORS 323.455.
(b) Moneys shall be  distributed to cities, counties and the Elderly and Disabled Special Trans-
portation Fund at the same time moneys are distributed to cities,  counties and the Elderly and
Disabled Special Transportation Fund under ORS 323.455.
SECTION 35. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other tax, for the privilege of
holding or storing cigarettes for sale, use or consumption, a floor tax  is imposed upon every
dealer at the rate of  mills  for each cigarette in the possession of or under the con-
trol of the dealer in this state at 12:01 a.m. on January 1, 2018.
(2) The  tax imposed by this section is due and payable on or before January 20, 2018. Any
amount of tax that is  not paid within the time required shall bear interest at the rate es-
tablished under ORS 305.220 per month, or fraction of  a month, from the date on which the
tax is due to be paid, until paid.
(3) By January 20, 2018, every dealer must file a report with the Department of  Revenue
in such form as the department may prescribe. The report  must state the number of ciga-
rettes in the possession of or under the  control of the dealer in this state at 12:01 a.m. on
January 1, 2018, and the amount of tax due. Each  report must be accompanied by a remit-
tance payable to the department for the amount of tax due.
(4) As used in this section, “dealer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 323.010.
SECTION 36.
Notwithstanding ORS 323.030 (3), for the  privilege of distributing cigarettes
as a distributor, as defined in ORS  323.015, and for holding or storing cigarettes for sale, use
or consumption,  a floor tax and cigarette adjustment indicia tax is imposed upon every dis-
tributor in the amount of $  for each Oregon cigarette tax stamp bearing the  desig-
nation “25,” and in the amount of $  for each Oregon cigarette tax stamp bearing  the
designation “20,” that is affixed to any package of cigarettes in the possession of or  under
the control of the distributor at 12:01 a.m. on January 1, 2018.
SECTION 37. (1) Every distributor, as defined in ORS 323.015, must take an  inventory as
of 12:01 a.m. on January 1, 2018, of all packages of cigarettes  to which are affixed Oregon
cigarette tax stamps and of all unaffixed Oregon cigarette tax  stamps in the possession of
or under the control of the distributor.
(2) Every distributor must file a report with the Department of Revenue  by January 20,
2018, in such form as the department may prescribe, showing:
(a) The number of  Oregon cigarette tax stamps, with the designations of the stamps, that
were affixed to packages  of cigarettes in the possession of or under the control of the dis-
tributor at 12:01 a.m. on January 1, 2018; and
(b) The number of unaffixed Oregon  cigarette tax stamps, with the designations of the
stamps, that were in the possession of or under the control of the distributor  at 12:01 a.m.
on January 1, 2018.
(3) The amount of tax required to  be paid with respect to the affixed Oregon cigarette
tax stamps shall be computed pursuant to section  36 of this 2017 Act and remitted with the
distributor’s report. Any amount of tax not paid within  the time specified for the filing of
the report shall bear interest at the rate  established under ORS 305.220 per month, or frac-
tion of a month, from the due date of the report until paid.
[16]
HB 3467
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
SECTION 38. All moneys received by the Department of Revenue from the taxes imposed
by sections 35 and 36 of this 2017 Act shall be paid over to the State Treasurer to be  held in
a suspense account established under ORS 293.445. After payment of  refunds, the balance
shall be credited to the General Fund.
SECTION 39. The amendments to ORS 323.031 and 323.457 by sections 33 and 34 of  this
2017 Act apply to distributions of cigarettes occurring on or after January 1, 2018.
SECTION 40. (1) No later than February 1, 2018, the Oregon Health Authority shall report
to the Joint Committee on Ways and Means of the Legislative Assembly all of  the following:
(a) The amount of moneys transferred to  the authority by the Oregon Health and Science
University and hospitals created by health districts as intergovernmental transfers.
(b) Assessments collected under  section 2, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, as amended
by section  1, chapter 780, Oregon Laws 2007, section 51, chapter 828, Oregon Laws 2009, sec-
tion 17, chapter 867, Oregon  Laws 2009, section 2, chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2013, section 1,
chapter 16, Oregon Laws 2015, and section 23 of this 2017 Act.
(c) The amount of moneys  paid into the Health Care Trust Fund established in ORS
293.540 on or after July 1, 2017.
(d) The amount of  moneys in the suspense account resulting from the amendments to
ORS 323.031 and 323.457 by sections 33 and 34 of this 2017 Act.
(2) If the authority fails to report as required by subsection (1)  of this section, the un-
expended balances of moneys transferred, collected or paid from the sources described in
subsection (1) of this section on  or after July 1, 2018, shall be transferred back to the funds
and accounts from which the moneys were transferred.
OPERATIVE DATES AND APPLICABILITY PROVISIONS
SECTION 41.
Sections 1 to  12 of this 2017 Act apply to inhalant-form nicotine and
inhalant delivery systems sold on or after January 1, 2018.
SECTION 42. (1) Section 20 of this 2017 Act becomes operative on June 30, 2018.
(2) The amendments to sections 3, 7 and 9,  chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, as amended
by sections 24, 25 and 27 of this 2017 Act, become operative on July 1, 2018.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 43. The unit  captions used in this 2017 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 44. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[17]