Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Business Development Department shall conduct a study  of the
clean technology sector in Oregon. The department shall submit a report of its findings to
the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related  to economic development in the
manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 345