Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Ocean Science Trust, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  out of the
General Fund, the  following amounts, to be deposited in the Oregon Ocean Science Fund and
expended for the following purposes:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3975
HB 3786
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
(1) $1,000,000 to provide competitive grants  for ocean acidification and hypoxia research
to address risks and vulnerabilities that threaten Oregon’s economy and ecosystems.
(2) $1,000,000 to provide competitive grants for sandy beach and dune ecosystem  research
to inform management strategies to address coastal erosion.
(3) $1,000,000 to provide competitive grants for nearshore data  collection to understand
changing ocean conditions and effects on species and ecosystems.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]