Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,
for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000
for distribution to the Crescent Sanitary District for the  purpose of upgrading the district
sewer system.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3996