Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Any person who has been deprived  of any rights, privileges or immunities
secured by the Oregon Constitution or laws of this state by  a person acting under color of
law, statute, ordinance  or rule of this state or of any local government, as defined in ORS
174.116, may bring a civil action for economic and noneconomic damages,  as defined in ORS
31.705, and for injunctive or other equitable relief.
(2)(a) The  court shall award reasonable attorney fees and costs to a prevailing plaintiff
in an action under this section.
(b) The court may award reasonable attorney fees and costs to a prevailing defendant in
an action under this section if the court determines  that the plaintiff’s claim under this
section was frivolous, unreasonable or without foundation.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2681