Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 162.247 is amended to read:
162.247. (1) A  person commits the crime of interfering with a peace officer or parole and pro-
bation officer if the person,  knowing that another person is a peace officer or a parole and probation
officer as defined in ORS 181A.355[ ,]:
(a) Intentionally [ or knowingly ] acts in a manner that prevents, or attempts to prevent, [ the] a
peace officer or  parole and probation officer from performing the lawful duties of the officer with
regards to another person ; or [ a criminal investigation ]
(b) Refuses to obey a lawful order by the peace officer or parole and probation officer .
(2) Interfering with a peace officer or parole and probation officer is a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) This section does not apply in situations in which the person is engaging in :
(a) Activity that would constitute resisting arrest under ORS 162.315; or
(b) Passive resistance.
[(4) A person  may not be arrested or charged under this section if the person is arrested or charged
for another offense based on the same conduct. ]
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 162.247 by section 1 of this 2025 Act  apply to con-
duct constituting  or alleged to constitute an offense under ORS 162.247 occurring on or after
the effective date of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4347