Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Office of Quality Assurance is established as an  independent office
within the Judicial Department.
(2) The office shall adopt rules for:
(a) Implementing a statewide randomized audit  schedule for the circuit courts that in-
cludes at least five unannounced  audits of noncriminal proceedings in each circuit court each
year.
(b) Reporting to the Chief Justice of the  Supreme Court on the quality of court pro-
ceedings for noncriminal proceedings in the circuit courts.
(c) Reporting instances of judicial bias or egregious behavior observed during  an audit
to the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court and the Commission  on Judicial Fitness and Dis-
ability within 10 business days after the incident occurred.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2488