Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS  181A.355 to
181A.689.
SECTION 2. The training required under ORS 181A.410 to obtain certification  as a public
safety officer armed with a firearm must include two hours of training in  nonlethal tech-
niques for each hour of training in lethal techniques.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4233