Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Revenue Officer shall conduct a study of the interdependence
of the state and local  tax systems in Oregon. Not later than September 15, 2026, the officer
shall submit a report  of the findings of the study, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245,
to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to revenue, and shall include
recommendations for legislation in the report.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2176