Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Emergency communications system” has the meaning given  that term in ORS
403.105.
(b) “9-1-1 jurisdiction” has the meaning given that term in ORS 403.105.
(c) “Public safety answering point” has the meaning given that term in ORS 403.105.
(2) The Oregon Department of Emergency Management  shall administer a program to
provide grants,  from the Public Safety Answering Point Consolidation Fund established under
section 2 of this 2025 Act, in support of projects to consolidate and modernize or  upgrade
public safety answering points.
(3)(a) 9-1-1  jurisdictions may apply for grants under the program. An application must
include, at a minimum:
(A) A plan for consolidating two or more public safety answering points into  a single
public safety answering point; and
(B) A plan for modernizing or upgrading software or hardware.
(b) Plans must specify that all equipment acquired  for radio infrastructure will support
interoperable two-way digital radio standards or be capable of being upgraded to support such
standards.
(c) Plans may rely on or include information previously collected  or plans previously de-
veloped by a 9-1-1 jurisdiction.
(4)(a) The department shall approve a grant application if:
(A) The department determines  that the project described in the application will improve
the efficiency of the emergency communications system;
(B) The department determines that 9-1-1 system  modernization or upgrades and radio
infrastructure modernization or upgrades described in the application are either in compli-
ance with applicable provisions of the Oregon Statewide Communication Interoperability Plan
described in ORS 403.455 or capable of being modernized or upgraded to bring them  into
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3505
HB 3259
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
compliance; and
(C) The application has been presented to  the following entities for review and comment:
(i) The official within the department  with primary responsibility for the emergency
communications system; and
(ii) Any relevant advisory committees established under ORS 403.120.
(b) The  department may approve applications for a maximum of two projects per
biennium, notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection. The  department shall review and
approve applications in the order in which they are received.
(5) The  department may provide additional grants of up to $500,000 for modernizing or
upgrading software or hardware  to 9-1-1 jurisdictions whose grant applications are approved
under this section. To be eligible for an additional grant under this subsection, a  9-1-1 juris-
diction must commit an amount of at least $150,000 to the modernization or upgrade.
(6) Grants under the program may not exceed, per project:
(a) $25,000 for costs related to developing consolidation plans; and
(b) $50,000 for technical support to implement consolidation plans.
(7) On or  before December 1 of each year, the department shall report on the status of
the grant program described in this section to the  interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to emergency preparedness.
(8) The department shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of  this section, including
rules governing the form and process for grant applications.
SECTION 2.
The Public Safety Answering Point Consolidation  Fund is established in the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General  Fund. The Public Safety Answering
Point Consolidation Fund consists  of moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or trans-
ferred to  the fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise. Moneys in the fund are con-
tinuously appropriated to the Oregon Department of  Emergency Management to carry out
the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2045.
(2) Any moneys remaining in the Public  Safety Answering Point Consolidation Fund es-
tablished under section 2 of this 2025 Act on the date  specified in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion that are unexpended, unobligated and not subject  to any conditions shall revert to the
General Fund.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated to the Oregon Department of Emergency Manage-
ment, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of
$ , for deposit in the Public Safety Answering  Point Consolidation Fund established
under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
[2]