Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act:
(1) “Enrolled student” means a student  who is a resident of this state and who is enrolled
in the voucher program established by sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act.
(2) “Low-performing school” means a school that is in the bottom 10 percent of schools
of this state, as identified by  the Department of Education based on consideration of relevant
performance measures, including regular attendance  rates, third-grade reading proficiency
rate, ninth-grade on-track rates, on-time graduation rate and five-year completion rate, as
those terms are defined in ORS 327.190.
(3) “Parent” means a resident of this state who is a parent or legal guardian  of a student
who is seeking to enroll, or is already enrolled, in the voucher program  established by
sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act.
(4) “Qualified expenses” means the following expenses of an enrolled student:
(a) Tuition, fees, textbooks and other  required course materials at a private school that
provides a course of study  usually taught in kindergarten through grade 12 in the public
schools;
(b) Tuition for instruction provided  by a private teacher, as described in ORS 339.030
(1)(d), including the costs for any course materials;
(c) The costs for any course materials incurred by a parent  for providing instruction as
described in ORS 339.030 (1)(e);
(d) Tutoring services provided by a person licensed by the Teacher Standards and  Prac-
tices Commission or a person licensed or accredited by any state, regional  or national ac-
creditation organization;
(e) Tuition, fees, textbooks or  required course materials for a private online learning
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1307
SB 516
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
program; and
(f) Fees for management of an individual account established under the voucher program
established by sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act.
(5) “Statewide average  distribution” means an amount determined by the Department of
Education each school year that equals the average per student  distribution of the State
School Fund as general purpose grants for all school districts in this state.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Department of Education shall  develop a voucher program for stu-
dents from low-performing schools.
(2) Each school year, the department shall:
(a) Identify the bottom 10 percent of schools of this state, based on consideration of rel-
evant performance measures, including  regular attendance rates, third-grade reading profi-
ciency rate, ninth-grade on-track rates, on-time  graduation rate and five-year completion
rate, as those terms are defined in ORS 327.190.
(b) Notify the parents of the students  who attend the bottom 10 percent of schools of this
state of the voucher program established under sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act.
(3)(a) A parent may enroll or reenroll a student in the program by  submitting an appli-
cation to the Department of Education  on the form required by the department by April 1.
The student must be a resident of this state who has not completed high school  and who
meets the qualifications of paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection.
(b) In the case of  a parent seeking enrollment for a student, the student must be in the
attendance boundaries of a school that  the Department of Education has identified as a
low-performing school.
(c) In the case of a parent seeking reenrollment for a student,  the student must have
participated in the program during the  previous school year. Any changes in a school’s sta-
tus as a low-performing school  do not affect the student’s eligibility to reenroll in subsequent
school years.
(d) Enrollment in the program is valid for  one school year only and a parent must
reenroll the student in the program for each subsequent school year.
(4) The Department of Education shall enroll or reenroll the student in the  program
upon:
(a) Finding that the student meets the qualifications described in subsection (3) of this
section; and
(b) Receiving acknowledgment from the  parent that the parent accepts the terms of
participation in the program, including:
(A) Restrictions on the use of moneys received under  the program for qualified expenses
only; and
(B) The requirement that the student:
(i) Receive at least an education  in English, mathematics, social studies and science; and
(ii) Comply with the requirements specified in ORS 339.035 (3) to (5).
(5) An enrolled student may not be required to attend public full-time  schools, as pro-
vided by ORS 339.030, but may receive part-time instruction at a public school  and must pay
tuition for that instruction.
(6)(a) Upon enrolling or reenrolling a student in the  program, the department shall notify
the State Treasurer of the enrollment or reenrollment.
(b) The State Treasurer shall ensure that an account  is established for each enrolled
[2]
SB 516
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
student as described in section 3 of this 2021 Act. The State Treasurer shall notify  the de-
partment after the State Treasurer:
(A) Verifies that  an account already was established for the enrolled student if the en-
rolled student has participated in the program in a previous year; or
(B) Establishes  an account for an enrolled student who does not already have an estab-
lished account.
(c) Upon receiving a notice  as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, the depart-
ment shall, for each student enrolled:
(A) Transfer to an account established for the student under section 3  of this 2021 Act
an amount that equals 90 percent of the statewide average distribution.
(B) Transfer to the school district  in which the student is a resident an amount that
equals five percent of the statewide average distribution.
(C) Transfer to the Department of Education  Voucher Account established by section 4
of this 2021 Act an amount that equals four percent of the statewide average distribution.
(D) Transfer to the Treasurer Voucher Account established by section 5 of this 2021  Act
an amount that equals one percent of the statewide average distribution.
(7) A school  or any other provider of services purchased pursuant to the program may
not share  with or refund or rebate to the parent or enrolled student in any manner any
moneys received through the program.
(8) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the  implementation
of this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) For each enrolled student in  the voucher program established by sections
1 to 6  of this 2021 Act, the State Treasurer shall ensure that an individual account is estab-
lished. The parent of the enrolled student has the right to withdraw funds from the account
only for the benefit of the enrolled student and only for qualified expenses.
(2) Separate records and reports are  required for each account established as provided
by this section. The  State Treasurer shall ensure that, no less frequently than annually, a
report on the account is made available to the parent.
(3) The State Treasurer may contract  with a financial institution to manage accounts
established as provided by this section with the supervision of the State Treasurer.
(4) Moneys in an account established as provided by this section:
(a) May not be assigned, pledged or otherwise used to secure or obtain a loan  or other
advancement.
(b) Are exempt from garnishment and may not  be subject to execution, attachment or
any other process or to the operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law.
(c) Are not considered income for tax purposes.
(5) For the purpose of ensuring that moneys in an individual  account are used only for
qualified expenses, the Department of Education shall:
(a) Ensure that an annual audit is made of each account; and
(b) Establish a toll-free telephone line that is available to members of  the public to
anonymously report any fraudulent use of moneys from an account.
(6) A parent, an enrolled student or a provider of services  purchased pursuant to the
program may be disqualified from program participation if the person is found to have  com-
mitted an intentional program violation consisting of any misrepresentation or other act that
materially violates a law or rule governing  the program. The department may remove any
[3]
SB 516
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
parent or enrolled  student from eligibility for participating in the program and shall notify
the State Treasurer. A parent may appeal the department’s decision pursuant to the con-
tested case process described in ORS chapter 183.
(7) Individual account information, including names, addresses, telephone numbers and
other personal identification information,  is confidential and must be maintained as confi-
dential unless the person who provides the information, or is  the subject of the information,
expressly agrees in writing that the information may be disclosed.
(8) An enrolled  student’s account shall be closed and any remaining funds shall be de-
posited in the State School Fund after a period of  four years after the student no longer
meets the qualifications described in section 2 (3) of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Department  of Education Voucher Account is established in the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General  Fund. Interest earned by the account
shall be credited to the account. All moneys credited to  the account are continuously ap-
propriated to the Department of Education for the payment of expenses  of the department
under sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act.
(2) The Department of Education Voucher Account consists of:
(a) Moneys transferred as provided by section 2 (6)(c)(C) of this 2021 Act;
(b) Moneys appropriated to the account by the Legislative Assembly; and
(c) Any other moneys from state or federal sources.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Treasurer Voucher Account is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the account shall be cred-
ited to the account. All  moneys credited to the account are continuously appropriated to the
State Treasurer for the payment of expenses of  the State Treasurer under sections 1 to 6
of this 2021 Act.
(2) The Treasurer Voucher Account consists of:
(a) Moneys transferred as provided by section 2 (6)(c)(D) of this 2021 Act;
(b) Moneys appropriated to the account by the Legislative Assembly; and
(c) Any other moneys from state or federal sources.
SECTION 6.
(1) As used in this section,  “participating school” means a private school
that provides  instruction to an enrolled student in a course of study usually taught in
kindergarten through grade 12 in the public schools.
(2) Nothing in sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act:
(a) Permits a state or federal government agency  to exercise control or supervision over
any participating school, private teacher, parent or legal guardian.
(b) Makes a participating school, private teacher, parent or legal guardian an  agent of
the state or federal government.
(c)(A) Requires a participating school to change the creed with which the  school is affil-
iated, or  to change its practices, admission policy or curriculum, in order to accept enrolled
students who pay tuition or fees as provided by sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act.
(B) Requires a private teacher to change the teacher’s creed, practices or curriculum  in
order to accept  enrolled students who pay tuition or fees as provided by sections 1 to 6 of
this 2021 Act.
(C) Requires a parent or legal  guardian to change the parent’s or guardian’s creed,
practices or curriculum.
(3) In any legal proceeding challenging the application of  sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act
[4]
SB 516
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to a participating school, private teacher, parent  or legal guardian, the state bears the bur-
den of establishing that the law or  rule is necessary and does not impose any undue burden
on a participating school, private teacher, parent or legal guardian.
SECTION 7.
(1) Sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act become operative January 1, 2022.
(2) The State Board of Education, Department of Education and State Treasurer may
take any action before the operative  date specified in subsection (1) of this section to ensure
that students first be  allowed to participate in the voucher program established by sections
1 to 6 of this 2021 Act during the 2022-2023 school year.
SECTION 8. Section 9 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 327.
SECTION 9. (1) The Oregon Voucher Account is established within the State School
Fund.
(2) The account shall  consist of any moneys transferred as provided by ORS 327.008 and
any other state or federal moneys available for the  purposes of the voucher program estab-
lished by sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act.
(3) Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the Department of Education
for the purpose of making transfers under section 2 (6)(c) of this 2021 Act.
(4) If the  amount available in the account is not adequate to meet costs, the Department
of Education shall submit a revised budget to the Legislative Assembly or, if  the Legislative
Assembly is not in session, to the Emergency Board.
SECTION 10.  ORS 327.008 is amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
(b) The Department of Education, on behalf  of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from public and private sources  for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State School Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by  the Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred from  the Fund for Student Success, moneys transferred from the Education Sta-
bility Fund and the Oregon Marijuana  Account and moneys received as provided in paragraph (b)
of this subsection.
(d) The  State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to 327.077, 327.095, 327.099,  327.101, 327.125, 327.137, 327.348, 336.575,
336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961 and sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act .
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each school  district a State School
Fund grant, consisting  of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a facility grant
and a transportation grant and a high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue, computed as pro-
vided in ORS 327.011 and 327.013.
(3) For the first school  year after a public charter school ceases to operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of termination or nonrenewal of a  charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund to each school district that had sponsored  a public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount equal  to the school district’s general purpose grant per extended
ADMw multiplied by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year.
(4) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each education  service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All  figures used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund shall be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
[5]
SB 516
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) Numbers of students in average  daily membership used in the distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) A school district may  not use the portion of the State School Fund grant that is attributable
to the facility grant for capital construction costs.
(8) The total amount of the State School Fund that is distributed as facility  grants may not ex-
ceed $7 million in any biennium. If  the total amount to be distributed as facility grants exceeds this
limitation, the Department of Education shall prorate the amount of funds available for  facility
grants among those school districts that qualified for a facility grant. If the total amount to be  dis-
tributed as facility grants does not  exceed this limitation, any remaining amounts shall be expended
for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities as provided in ORS 326.125 (1).
(9) Each biennium, the Department of  Education may expend from the State School Fund no
more than $6 million for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities under ORS 326.125 (2)
to (6).
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education  shall transfer to the Pediatric Nursing Fa-
cility Account established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs of educational
services provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(11) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer the amount of  $55 million from
the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
(12)(a) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $39.5 million from  the State
School Fund to the Educator Advancement Fund established under ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The total  amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by $6 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school districts  from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by $16.75 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education service  districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by $16.75 million.
(c) For each biennium, the  amounts identified in this subsection shall be adjusted by the same
percentage  by  which the instructions furnished to state agencies by the Governor under ORS 291.204
direct the state agencies to adjust their agency budget requests for special payments under ORS
291.216 (6)(a)(C).
(13) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Statewide English  Language Learner Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
(14) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from the  State
School  Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this  section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide administration of and support for the development  of talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration  of a program to increase the number of speech-language
pathologists and speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.394 to 348.406.
(17) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $2 million from  the State School
[6]
SB 516
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Fund for  deposit to the Healthy School Facilities Fund established under ORS 332.337.
Notwithstanding  ORS  332.337, the department may expend moneys received in the Healthy School
Facilities Fund under this subsection only as grants for costs associated with testing for  elevated
levels of lead in water used for drinking or food preparation.
(18) Each fiscal year, the Department  of Education shall transfer to the Oregon Voucher
Account established in section  9 of this 2021 Act the amount necessary to make the transfers
required by section 2 (6)(c) of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 11.
(1) The  amendments to ORS 327.008 by section 10 of this 2021 Act become
operative July 1, 2022.
(2) The amendments to ORS 327.008 by section 10 of this 2021 Act apply to State School
Fund distributions commencing with the 2022-2023 school year distributions.
SECTION 12.  ORS 339.030 is amended to read:
339.030. (1) In the following  cases, children may not be required to attend public full-time
schools:
(a) Children  being taught in a private or parochial school in the courses of study usually taught
in kindergarten through grade 12 in the public schools and in  attendance for a period equivalent to
that required of children attending public schools in the 1994-1995 school year.
(b) Children proving to the satisfaction of the district school board that they have  acquired
equivalent knowledge to that  acquired in the courses of study taught in kindergarten through grade
12 in the public schools.
(c) Children who have received a high school diploma or a modified diploma.
(d) Children being taught for a period equivalent to that  required of children attending public
schools by a private teacher the courses of study usually taught in kindergarten through grade  12
in the public school.
(e) Children being educated in the children’s home by a parent or legal guardian.
(f) Children who are considered  to be taught by a parent or legal guardian because of
participation in the voucher program established by sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act.
[(f)] (g) Children whose sixth birthday occurred on or before September 1  immediately preceding
the beginning of the current  school year if the parent or legal guardian of the child notified in
writing the school district of which the child  is a resident that the parent or legal guardian will
delay enrolling the child in a public full-time school for only one school year for  the purpose of
better meeting the child’s needs for cognitive, social or physical development, as determined by the
parent or legal guardian.
[(g)] (h) Children who are present in the United States on a  nonimmigrant visa and who are
attending a private, accredited English language learner program in preparation  for attending a
private high school or college.
[(h)] (i) Children excluded from attendance as provided by law.
(2) The State Board of Education and the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by rule
shall establish procedures whereby, on a semiannual basis,  an exemption from compulsory attend-
ance may be granted to the parent or legal guardian  of any child 16 or 17 years of age who is
lawfully employed full-time or who is lawfully  employed part-time and enrolled in school, a commu-
nity college or an alternative education program as defined  in ORS 336.615. An exemption also may
be granted to any child  who is an emancipated minor or who has initiated the procedure for
emancipation under ORS 419B.550 to 419B.558.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 339.505 is amended to read:
[7]
SB 516
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
339.505. (1) For purposes of the student accounting system required by ORS 339.515, the  follow-
ing definitions shall be used:
(a) “Graduate” means an individual who has:
(A) Not reached 21 years of age or whose 21st birthday occurs during the current school year;
(B) Met all state requirements and local requirements for attendance, competence and units of
credit for high school; and
(C) Received one of the following:
(i) A high school diploma issued by a school district or a public charter school.
(ii) A high school diploma issued by an authorized community college.
(iii) A modified diploma issued by a school district or a public charter school.
(iv) An extended diploma issued by a school district or a public charter school.
(v) An alternative certificate issued by a school district or a public charter school.
(b) “School dropout” means an individual who:
(A) Has enrolled for the current school  year, or was enrolled in the previous school year and
did not attend during the current school year;
(B) Is not a high school graduate;
(C) Has not received a certificate for passing an approved high school equivalency test such  as
the General Educational Development (GED) test; and
(D) Has withdrawn from school.
(c) “School dropout” does not include a student described by at least one of the following:
(A) A student who has transferred to another educational system or institution that leads to
graduation and the  school district has received a written request for the transfer of the student’s
records or transcripts.
(B) A student who is deceased.
(C) A student who is participating in home instruction paid for by the district.
(D) A student who is being taught by a private teacher, parent or legal guardian pursuant  to
ORS 339.030 (1)(d) , [ or] (e)  or (f) .
(E) A student who is participating  in a Department of Education approved public or private
education program, an alternative education program  as defined in ORS 336.615 or a hospital edu-
cation program, or is residing in a Department of Human Services or an Oregon Health  Authority
facility.
(F) A student who is temporarily  residing in a shelter care program certified by the Oregon
Youth Authority or in a juvenile detention facility.
(G) A student who is enrolled in a foreign exchange program.
(H) A student who is temporarily absent from school because of suspension, a  family emergency,
or severe health or medical problems that prohibit the student from attending school.
(I) A student who has received a certificate for passing an approved high school equivalency test
such as the General Educational Development (GED) test.
(2) The State Board of Education shall prescribe by rule when  an unexplained absence becomes
withdrawal, when a student is considered enrolled  in school, acceptable alternative education pro-
grams under ORS 336.615 to  336.665 and the standards for excused absences for purposes of ORS
339.065 for family emergencies and health and medical problems.
SECTION 14.
(1) A person commits voucher  account fraud if the person knowingly ob-
tains, by means of a false statement or representation, by impersonation  or by other
fraudulent device, any of the following:
[8]
SB 516
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
(a) Assistance or service in violation of sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act;
(b) Assistance or service that is greater than that allowed under sections  1 to 6 of this
2021 Act; or
(c) Assistance or  service that is not a qualified expense as defined in section 1 of this 2021
Act.
(2) Any action that is considered an act of voucher account fraud  under this section is
an act of theft by deception under ORS 164.085 and is punishable as an  act of theft by de-
ception.
SECTION 15.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[9]