Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS chapter 468B.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, and except  as required
by federal law, the Environmental Quality Commission and the Department of Environmental
Quality may not require, in any  permit for the discharge of wastes into surface water from
a municipally owned treatment works:
(1) That the difference between the temperature of the  discharge and the temperature
of the surface water where the discharge occurs be greater than five degrees Fahrenheit.
(2) That the level of any pollutant other than heat  be lower than the average annual level
of that pollutant for the surface water where the discharge occurs.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4719