Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The provisions of the Counseling Compact are as follows:
COUNSELING COMPACT
SECTION 1. PURPOSE
The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate  the interstate practice of licensed profes-
sional counselors with the goal of improving public access to professional  counseling ser-
vices. The practice of  professional counseling occurs in the state where the client is located
at the time of  the counseling services. This Compact preserves the regulatory authority of
states to protect public health and safety through the current system of state licensure.
This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
A. Increase public access to professional counseling services  by providing for the mutual
recognition of other member state licenses;
B. Enhance the states’ ability to protect the public’s health and safety;
C. Encourage the cooperation of member  states in regulating multistate practice for li-
censed professional counselors;
D. Support spouses of relocating active duty military personnel;
E. Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative  and disciplinary information among
member states;
F. Allow for the use of telehealth technology  to facilitate increased access to professional
counseling services;
G. Support the uniformity of professional counseling licensure requirements  throughout
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 667
HB 3351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the states to promote public safety and public health benefits;
H. Invest all member states with the authority  to hold a licensed professional counselor
accountable for meeting all state practice laws in the state  in which the client is located at
the time care is rendered through the mutual recognition of member state licenses;
I. Eliminate the necessity for licenses in multiple states; and
J. Provide opportunities for interstate practice by  licensed professional counselors who
meet uniform licensure requirements.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, the  following definitions shall
apply:
A. “Active duty military” means full-time duty status  in the active uniformed services
of the United States, including members  of the National Guard and Reserve on active duty
orders pursuant to 10 U.S.C. chapters 1209 and 1211.
B. “Adverse action” means  any administrative, civil, equitable or criminal action per-
mitted by a state’s laws which  is imposed by a licensing board or another authority against
a licensed professional counselor, including actions against an individual’s license or privilege
to practice such as revocation, suspension, probation or monitoring of the licensee, limita-
tion on the licensee’s  practice or any other encumbrance on licensure affecting a licensed
professional counselor’s authorization to practice, including issuance of a cease and  desist
action.
C. “Alternative program” means a nondisciplinary monitoring or  practice remediation
process approved by a professional counseling  licensing board to address impaired practi-
tioners.
D. “Continuing competence/education”  means a requirement, as a condition of license
renewal, to provide evidence of participation in, or completion of, educational and profes-
sional activities relevant to a practice or an area of work.
E. “Counseling Compact Commission” or “Commission” means the national  administra-
tive body whose membership consists of all states that have enacted this Compact.
F. “Current significant investigative information” means:
1. Investigative information that a licensing board,  after a preliminary inquiry that in-
cludes notification and an  opportunity for the licensed professional counselor to respond if
required by state  law, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would in-
dicate more than a minor infraction; or
2. Investigative information that indicates that the licensed professional counselor re-
presents an immediate threat to public health and safety regardless  of whether the licensed
professional counselor has been notified and had an opportunity to respond.
G. “Data system” means a  repository of information about licensees, including but not
limited to, continuing  education, examination, licensure, investigative, privilege-to-practice
and adverse action information.
H. “Encumbered license” means a license in which  an adverse action restricts the prac-
tice of  licensed professional counseling by the licensee and said adverse action has been re-
ported to the National Practitioner Data Bank (NPDB).
I. “Encumbrance” means a revocation or suspension of, or any limitation  on, the full and
unrestricted practice of licensed professional counseling by a licensing board.
J. “Executive committee” means a group of directors elected or appointed to act  on be-
[2]
HB 3351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
half of, and within the powers granted to them by, the Commission.
K. “Home state” means the member state that is the licensee’s primary state of resi-
dence.
L. “Impaired practitioner” means an individual who has a condition that may impair their
ability to practice as a licensed professional counselor without some type  of intervention,
including, but not limited to, alcohol and drug  dependence, mental health impairment and
neurological or physical impairments.
M. “Investigative information” means information, records and documents  received or
generated by a professional counseling licensing board pursuant to an investigation.
N. “Jurisprudence requirement,” if required by a member state, means the  assessment
of an individual’s knowledge of the laws and rules governing the practice of professional
counseling in a state.
O. “Licensed professional counselor” means a  counselor licensed by a member state, re-
gardless of the title used by that state, to independently assess, diagnose and  treat behav-
ioral health conditions.
P. “Licensee” means an individual who currently holds an authorization from  a state to
practice as a licensed professional counselor.
Q. “Licensing board” means the agency of a state, or equivalent, that is responsible for
the licensing and regulation of licensed professional counselors.
R. “Member state” means a state that has enacted this Compact.
S. “Privilege to practice”  means a legal authorization, which is equivalent to a license,
permitting the practice of professional counseling in a remote state.
T. “Professional counseling” means the assessment, diagnosis and treatment of behav-
ioral health conditions by a licensed professional counselor.
U. “Remote state” means a member state other than the home state  where a licensee is
exercising or seeking to exercise the privilege to practice.
V. “Rule” means a regulation promulgated by the Commission that has the force of law,
subject to Section 11 (B)(2) of this Compact.
W. “Single-state license” means a licensed professional counselor license  issued by a
member state that authorizes practice only within the  issuing state and does not include a
privilege to practice in any other member state.
X. “State” means any state, commonwealth, district or territory of the United  States
that regulates the practice of professional counseling.
Y. “Telehealth” means the application of telecommunication technology to  deliver pro-
fessional counseling services remotely to assess,  diagnose and treat behavioral health con-
ditions.
Z. “Unencumbered license” means a license  that authorizes a licensed professional
counselor to engage in the full and unrestricted practice of professional counseling.
SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THIS COMPACT
A. To participate in this Compact, a state must currently:
1. License and regulate licensed professional counselors;
2.a. Subject to subparagraph  b of this paragraph, require licensees to pass a nationally
recognized exam approved by the Commission;
b. The Oregon Board of Licensed Professional Counselors  and Therapists may approve
one or more nationally recognized exams for purposes of meeting the requirements of this
[3]
HB 3351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Compact. A licensee is required to pass an exam only if the exam is approved by the board;
3. Require licensees to have a 60 semester-hour, or  90 quarter-hour, master’s degree in
counseling or 60 semester-hours, or 90 quarter-hours,  of graduate course work including the
following topic areas:
a. Professional counseling orientation and ethical practice;
b. Social and cultural diversity;
c. Human growth and development;
d. Career development;
e. Counseling and helping relationships;
f. Group counseling and group work;
g. Diagnosis and treatment, assessment and testing;
h. Research and program evaluation; and
i. Other areas as determined by the Commission;
4. Require licensees to complete a supervised post-graduate professional  experience as
defined by the Commission and approved by the board; and
5. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating  complaints about licensees.
B. A member state shall:
1. Participate fully in the Commission’s data  system, including using the Commission’s
unique identifier as defined in the rules of the Commission;
2. Notify the Commission, in compliance  with the terms of this Compact and rules, of any
adverse action or the availability of investigative information regarding a licensee;
3. Implement or utilize procedures for considering the criminal history records  of appli-
cants for an initial privilege to practice. These procedures shall include the  submission of
fingerprints or other biometric-based information by  applicants for the purpose of obtaining
an applicant’s criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau  of Investigation
and the agency responsible for  retaining that state’s criminal records. A criminal records
check requested by the board and performed in accordance with ORS 181A.195  meets the
requirements of this paragraph;
a. A member state must fully implement a  criminal background check requirement,
within a time frame established by rule, by  receiving the results of the Federal Bureau of
Investigation record search and shall use the results in making licensure decisions;
b. Communication between a member state and the Commission and  among member
states regarding the verification of eligibility for  licensure through this Compact may not
include any information received from the Federal Bureau of Investigation relating  to a
federal criminal records check performed by a member  state under Public Law 92-544 or ORS
181A.195;
4. Subject to  Section 11 (B)(2) of this Compact, comply with the rules of the Commission;
5. Require an applicant to obtain  or retain a license in the home state and meet the home
state’s qualifications for licensure or renewal of  licensure, as well as all other applicable
state laws;
6. Grant the privilege to practice to a licensee holding a valid unencumbered license in
another member state in accordance with the terms of this Compact and rules; and
7. Provide for the attendance of the  state’s commissioner to the Counseling Compact
Commission meetings.
C. Member states may charge a fee for granting the privilege to practice.
[4]
HB 3351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
D. Individuals not residing in a member state  shall continue to be able to apply for a
member state’s  single-state license as provided under the laws of each member state. How-
ever, the single-state license granted to  these individuals shall not be recognized as granting
a privilege to practice professional counseling in any other member state.
E. Nothing in this Compact  shall affect the requirements established by a member state
for the issuance of a single-state license.
F. A license issued to a licensed professional  counselor by a home state to a resident of
that state shall be  recognized by each member state as authorizing a licensed professional
counselor to practice professional counseling, under a  privilege to practice, in each member
state.
SECTION 4. PRIVILEGE TO PRACTICE
A. To exercise the  privilege to practice under the terms and provisions of this Compact,
the licensee shall:
1. Hold a license in the home state;
2. Have a valid United States Social Security number or National Practitioner Identifier
number;
3. Be eligible for a privilege to practice in  any member state in accordance with Section
4 (D), (G) and (H) of this Compact;
4. Have not had any encumbrance or restriction against any license or privilege to prac-
tice within the previous two years;
5. Notify the Commission that the licensee is seeking the privilege to practice within a
remote state;
6. Pay any applicable fees, including any state fee, for the privilege to practice;
7. Meet any  continuing competence/education requirements established by the home
state;
8. Meet any jurisprudence requirements established  by the remote state in which the
licensee is seeking a privilege to practice; and
9. Report to the Commission any adverse action or other encumbrance  or restriction on
a license taken by any nonmember state within 30 days from the date the action is taken.
B. The privilege to practice is valid until the expiration date of  the home state license.
The licensee must comply with the requirements of Section 4 (A) of this Compact to maintain
the privilege to practice in the remote state.
C. A licensee providing professional  counseling in a remote state under the privilege to
practice shall adhere to the laws and regulations of the remote state.
D. A licensee providing professional  counseling services in a remote state is subject to
that state’s regulatory authority. A remote  state may, in accordance with due process and
that state’s laws, remove a licensee’s  privilege to practice in the remote state for a specific
period of time, impose fines and take any other  necessary actions to protect the health and
safety of its citizens. The licensee may be ineligible for a privilege to practice in  any member
state until the specific time for removal has passed and all fines are paid.
E. If a home state license is encumbered, the licensee shall lose  the privilege to practice
in any remote state until the following occur:
1. The home state license is no longer encumbered; and
2. The licensee has not  had any encumbrance or restriction against any license or privi-
lege to practice within the previous two years.
[5]
HB 3351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
F. Once an encumbered license in the home state  is restored to good standing, the
licensee must meet the requirements of Section  4 (A) of this Compact to obtain a privilege
to practice in any remote state.
G. If a  licensee’s privilege to practice in any remote state is removed, the individual may
lose the privilege to practice in all other remote states until the following occur:
1. The specific period of time for which the privilege to practice  was removed has ended;
2. All fines have been paid; and
3. The licensee has not  had any encumbrance or restriction against any license or privi-
lege to practice within the previous two years.
H. Once the requirements of Section 4 (G) of this Compact  have been met, the licensee
must meet the requirements in Section  4 (A) of this Compact to obtain a privilege to practice
in a remote state.
SECTION 5. OBTAINING A NEW  HOME STATE LICENSE BASED ON A PRIVILEGE
TO PRACTICE
A. A licensed professional counselor  may hold a home state license which allows for a
privilege to practice in other member states in only one member state at a time.
B. If a licensed professional counselor changes their  primary state of residence by mov-
ing between two member states:
1. The licensed  professional counselor shall file an application for obtaining a new home
state license based on a privilege to practice, pay all applicable fees  and notify the current
and new home state in accordance with applicable rules adopted by the Commission.
2. Upon receipt of an application for obtaining a new home state license by  virtue of a
privilege to practice, the new home state shall verify that  the licensed professional counselor
meets the pertinent criteria  outlined in Section 4 of this Compact via the data system,
without need for primary source verification except for:
a. A Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint-based  criminal background check if not
previously performed or updated pursuant to applicable rules adopted by  the Commission in
accordance with Public Law 92-544 or ORS 181A.195;
b. Other criminal background checks as required by the new home state; and
c. Completion of any requisite jurisprudence requirements of the new home state.
3. The former home state shall convert the former home state license  into a privilege to
practice once the new home state has activated the  new home state license in accordance
with applicable rules adopted by the Commission.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of  this Compact, if the licensed professional
counselor cannot meet the criteria in Section 4 of  this Compact, the new home state may
apply its requirements for issuing a new single-state license.
5. The licensed professional counselor shall pay all applicable fees to  the new home state
in order to be issued a new home state license.
C. If a licensed professional counselor changes their primary state  of residence by mov-
ing from a member state to  a nonmember state, or from a nonmember state to a member
state, the state criteria shall apply for issuance of a single-state license in the new state.
D. Nothing in this Compact shall  interfere with a licensee’s ability to hold a single-state
license in multiple states. However, for the purposes of this  Compact, a licensee shall have
only one home state license.
E. Nothing in this Compact  shall affect the requirements established by a member state
[6]
HB 3351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
for the issuance of a single-state license.
SECTION 6. ACTIVE DUTY MILITARY PERSONNEL OR THEIR SPOUSE
An active duty military personnel, or their spouse, shall designate a  home state where
the individual has a current license in good standing. The individual may retain the home
state designation during  the period the service member is on active duty. Subsequent to
designating a home state, the individual shall only change  their home state through appli-
cation for  licensure in a new state, or through the process outlined in Section 5 of this
Compact.
SECTION 7. COMPACT PRIVILEGE TO PRACTICE TELEHEALTH
A. Member states shall recognize the  right of a licensed professional counselor, licensed
by a home state in accordance with Section 3 of this Compact and under rules of the  Com-
mission, to practice professional  counseling in any member state via telehealth under a
privilege to practice as provided in this Compact and rules of the Commission.
B. A licensee providing professional counseling services in a remote state under the
privilege to practice shall adhere to the laws and regulations of the remote state.
SECTION 8. ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. In addition to  the other powers conferred by state law, a remote state shall have the
authority, in accordance with existing state due process law, to:
1. Take adverse action against  a licensed professional counselor’s privilege to practice
within that member state; and
2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that  require the attendance and
testimony of witnesses as well as the production of evidence. Subject to  ORS 24.500,
subpoenas issued by a licensing board in a member  state for the attendance and testimony
of witnesses or the production of evidence from another member  state shall be enforced in
the latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction according to the practice  and proce-
dure of that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it. The  issu-
ing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage  and other fees required by
the service statutes of the state in which the witnesses or evidence are located.
3. Only the home state shall have the power to take adverse action against a  licensed
professional counselor’s license issued by the home state.
B. For purposes of taking adverse action, the home state  shall give the same priority and
effect to reported conduct  received from a member state as it would if the conduct had oc-
curred within the home state. In so doing, the home state shall apply its own state  laws to
determine appropriate action.
C. The home state shall complete any pending investigations of a licensed professional
counselor who changes their  primary state of residence during the course of the investi-
gations. The home state shall also have the authority  to take appropriate action and shall
promptly report the conclusions of the investigations to the administrator of the data  sys-
tem. The administrator of the data system shall promptly notify  the new home state of any
adverse actions.
D. A member state,  if otherwise permitted by state law, may recover from the affected
licensed professional counselor the costs of investigations  and dispositions of cases resulting
from any adverse action taken against that licensed professional counselor.
E. A member state may take adverse action based on the  factual findings of the remote
state, provided that the member state follows its own procedures for taking  the adverse
[7]
HB 3351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
action.
F. Joint Investigations
1. In addition to the authority granted to a member state  by its respective professional
counseling practice act or other applicable state law, any member state may participate  with
other member states in joint investigations of licensees.
2. Subject to ORS 676.177, member states shall  share any investigative, litigation or
compliance materials in furtherance of any joint  or individual investigation initiated under
this Compact.
G. If adverse action is taken by the home state against the license of a  licensed profes-
sional counselor, the licensed professional counselor’s  privilege to practice in all other
member states shall be deactivated until all encumbrances have been  removed from the
home state license. All home state disciplinary orders that  impose adverse action against the
license of a licensed professional counselor shall  include a statement that the licensed pro-
fessional counselor’s privilege to practice is deactivated in  all member states during the
pendency of the order.
H. If a member state takes  adverse action, it shall promptly notify the administrator of
the data system. The administrator of the data system shall promptly notify the  home state
of any adverse actions by remote states.
I. Nothing in this Compact shall override a member state’s decision  that participation in
an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse action.
SECTION 9. ESTABLISHMENT OF COUNSELING COMPACT COMMISSION
A. The Compact member  states hereby create and establish a joint public agency known
as the Counseling Compact Commission:
1. The Commission is an instrumentality of the Compact member states.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the Commission shall be brought
solely and exclusively in a court  of competent jurisdiction where the principal offices of the
Commission are located. The Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to  the
extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings.
3. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity.
B. Membership, Voting and Meetings
1. Each member state shall have and be limited to  one delegate selected by that member
state’s licensing board.
2. The delegate shall be either:
a. A current member of the licensing board at the time of appointment, who  is a licensed
professional counselor or public member; or
b. An administrator of the licensing board.
3. Any delegate may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the law of  the
state from which the delegate is appointed.
4. The member state licensing board shall fill any vacancy  occurring on the Commission
within 60 days.
5. Each delegate shall be  entitled to one vote with regard to the promulgation of rules
and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate  in the business
and affairs of the Commission.
6. A delegate shall vote in person or by such  other means as provided in the bylaws. The
bylaws may provide for delegates’ participation in meetings by telephone or other means  of
[8]
HB 3351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
communication.
7. The Commission  shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional
meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws.
8. The Commission  shall by rule establish a term of office for delegates and may by rule
establish term limits.
C. The Commission shall have the following powers  and duties, except that an action
undertaken by the Commission is binding on the State of Oregon  only if the Oregon Board
of Licensed Professional Counselors and Therapists approves by rule the action undertaken:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Establish bylaws, to which the State of Oregon is subject only  insofar as the board
approves by rule bylaws established under this paragraph;
3. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
4. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this Compact and
the bylaws;
5. Promulgate rules which, subject to Section 11 (B)(2)  of this Compact, shall be binding
to the extent and in the manner provided for in this Compact;
6. Bring and  prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the Commission,
provided that the standing of any state  licensing board to sue or be sued under applicable law
shall not be affected;
7. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
8. Borrow, accept or contract  for services of personnel, including, but not limited to,
employees of a member state;
9. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define  duties, grant to
employees and officers appropriate authority to  carry out the purposes of this Compact and
establish the Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating  to conflicts of interest,
qualifications of personnel and other related personnel matters;
10. Accept any and all appropriate donations and grants of  money, equipment, supplies,
materials and services, and to  receive, utilize and dispose of the same, provided that at all
times the Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest;
11. Lease, purchase or accept appropriate gifts  or donations of, or otherwise own, hold,
improve or use any property, real,  personal or mixed, provided that at all times the Com-
mission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety;
12. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon or otherwise dispose of  any
property, real, personal or mixed;
13. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
14. Borrow money;
15. Appoint committees,  including standing committees composed of members, state
regulators, state legislators or their representatives and consumer  representatives and such
other interested persons as may be designated in this Compact and the bylaws;
16. Provide and receive information from,  and cooperate with, law enforcement agencies;
17. Establish and elect an executive committee; and
18. Perform such other  functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the
purposes of this  Compact consistent with the state regulation of professional counseling
licensure and practice.
D. The Executive Committee
[9]
HB 3351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
1. The  executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the Commission ac-
cording to the terms of this Compact.
2. The executive committee shall be composed of up to 11 members:
a. Seven voting members who are elected by the Commission from the current  member-
ship of the Commission; and
b. Up to four  ex officio, nonvoting members from four recognized national professional
counselor organizations.
c. The ex officio members will be selected by their respective organizations.
3. The Commission may remove any member of the executive  committee as provided in
the bylaws.
4. The executive committee shall meet at least annually.
5. The executive committee shall have the following duties and responsibilities:
a. Recommend to the entire Commission changes to the rules or bylaws,  changes to this
Compact legislation, fees paid by Compact member states  such as annual dues and any
Compact Commission fee charged to licensees for the privilege to practice;
b. Ensure Compact  administration services are appropriately provided, contractual or
otherwise;
c. Prepare and recommend the budget;
d. Maintain financial records on behalf of the Commission;
e. Monitor Compact compliance of member states and provide compliance reports  to the
Commission;
f. Establish additional committees as necessary; and
g. Other duties as provided in rules or bylaws.
E. Meetings of the Commission
1. All meetings shall be open to the public and public notice of meetings shall be given
in the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in  Section 11 of this Com-
pact.
2. The Commission or the  executive committee or other committees of the Commission
may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting if the Commission or executive  committee or
other committees of the Commission must discuss:
a. Noncompliance of a member state with its obligations under this Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or  other matters, practices or procedures
related to specific employees  or other matters related to the Commission’s internal person-
nel practices and procedures;
c. Current, threatened or reasonably anticipated litigation;
d. Negotiation of contracts  for the purchase, lease or sale of goods, services or real es-
tate;
e. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
f. Disclosure  of trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged
or confidential;
g. Disclosure of information of a personal nature when disclosure would constitute a
clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
h. Disclosure of investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
i. Disclosure of information related to any investigative reports prepared  by or on behalf
of or for the use of the Commission or another committee charged with responsibility of in-
[10]
HB 3351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vestigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to this Compact; or
j. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or member state statute.
3. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is  closed pursuant to this provision, the
Commission’s legal counsel or designee  shall certify that the meeting may be closed and shall
reference each relevant exempting provision.
4. The Commission shall keep minutes  that fully and clearly describe all matters dis-
cussed in a meeting and shall  provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the
reasons therefor, including a description  of the views expressed. All documents considered
in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents
of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority vote of the
Commission or an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
F. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission  shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of
its establishment, organization and ongoing activities.
2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate  revenue sources, donations and
grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services.
3.a. The Commission may levy and collect an  annual assessment from each member state
or impose fees on other parties to cover the cost of  the operations and activities of the
Commission and its staff, which  must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual
budget as approved  each year for which revenue is not provided by other sources. The ag-
gregate annual assessment  amount shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined
by the Commission, which shall  promulgate a rule binding upon all member states subject
to Section 11 (B)(2) of this Compact.
b. An assessment levied, or any other financial obligation imposed, under  this Compact
is effective against the State of Oregon only to the extent  that moneys necessary to pay the
assessment or meet the financial obligation have been deposited in the Counseling Compact
Account established under section 4 of this 2025 Act.
4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of  any kind prior to securing the funds
adequate to meet the same, nor shall the  Commission pledge the credit of any of the member
states, except by and with the authority of the member state.
5. The Commission shall keep  accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The
receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall  be subject to the audit and accounting
procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements  of funds
handled by the Commission shall be audited  yearly by a certified or licensed public account-
ant, and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the  annual report
of the Commission.
G. Qualified Immunity, Defense and Indemnification
1. The members,  officers, executive director, employees and representatives of the Com-
mission shall be immune from suit and liability,  either personally or in their official capacity,
for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other  civil liability
caused by or arising  out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that
the person against whom the claim is made had a  reasonable basis for believing occurred,
within the scope of Commission employment, duties or  responsibilities, provided that nothing
in this paragraph shall  be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any
damage, loss, injury or liability caused by the intentional or willful  or wanton misconduct
[11]
HB 3351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of that person.
2. The Commission  shall defend any member, officer, executive director, employee or
representative of the Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising  out
of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is made
had a  reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment,
duties or responsibilities, provided that nothing herein shall  be construed to prohibit that
person from  retaining their own counsel, and provided further that the actual or alleged act,
error or omission did not result from that person’s intentional  or willful or wanton miscon-
duct.
3. The  Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer, executive di-
rector, employee or representative of the Commission for  the amount of any settlement or
judgment obtained against  that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or
omission that occurred within the scope of Commission  employment, duties or responsibil-
ities, or that such person had a  reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act,
error or omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.
SECTION 10. DATA SYSTEM
A. The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance,  operation and utili-
zation of a coordinated database and reporting system containing licensure, adverse  action
and investigative information on all licensees in member states.
B. Subject to ORS 676.177, but notwithstanding  any other provision of state law to the
contrary, a member state shall submit a uniform data set to the  data system on all individ-
uals to whom this Compact  is applicable as required by the rules of the Commission, in-
cluding:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse actions against a license or privilege to practice;
4. Nonconfidential information related to alternative program participation;
5. Any denial of application for licensure and the reason for such denial;
6. Current significant investigative information; and
7. Other information that may facilitate the administration of  this Compact, as deter-
mined by the rules of the Commission, subject to Section 11 (B)(2) of this Compact.
C. Investigative information pertaining to a licensee  in any member state will only be
available to other member states.
D. The Commission shall promptly notify all member  states of any adverse action taken
against a licensee or an individual applying for a  license. Adverse action information per-
taining to a licensee in any member state will be available to any other member state.
E. Member states contributing information to the  data system may designate informa-
tion that may not be  shared with the public without the express permission of the contrib-
uting state.
F. Any information submitted to the data system that is  subsequently required to be
expunged by the laws of the member state  contributing the information shall be removed
from the data system.
[12]
HB 3351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 11. RULEMAKING
A. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order  to effectively and effi-
ciently achieve the purpose of  this Compact. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event the
Commission exercises its rulemaking authority in a manner that is  beyond the scope of the
purposes of  this Compact, or the powers granted hereunder, then such an action by the
Commission shall be invalid and have no force or effect.
B.1. The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the  criteria set
forth in this Section and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall  become
binding as of the date specified in each proposed rule or amendment, except that a rule be-
comes binding on the State of Oregon on  the date specified by the Oregon Board of Licensed
Professional Counselors and Therapists.
2. Notwithstanding paragraph 1 of this subsection, the board shall review the  rules of the
Commission. The board may approve and adopt the rules of the Commission as  rules of the
board. The State of Oregon is subject to a rule of the Commission only if the  rule of the
Commission is adopted by the board.
C. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule by  enactment of
a statute or resolution  in the same manner used to adopt this Compact within four years
of the date of adoption of the rule, then such rule shall have no further force and effect in
any member state.
D. Proposed rules or amendments to the rules shall  be adopted at a regular or special
meeting of the Commission.
E. Prior to promulgation and  adoption of a proposed final rule or rules by the Commis-
sion, and at least 30 days in advance of  the meeting at which the proposed rule will be con-
sidered and voted upon, the Commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission or another publicly accessible platform; and
2. On the website of each member state professional counseling licensing board or  an-
other publicly accessible platform or the publication in which each  state would otherwise
publish proposed rules.
F. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
1. The proposed time, date and  location of the meeting in which the proposed rule will
be considered and voted upon;
2. The text of the proposed rule or amendment and the reason for the proposed rule;
3. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and
4. The manner in which interested persons may submit  notice to the Commission of their
intention to attend the public hearing and any written comments.
G. Prior to adoption of  a proposed rule, the Commission shall allow persons to submit
written data, facts, opinions and arguments, which shall be made available to the public.
H. The Commission shall grant an opportunity for a public hearing before it  adopts a
proposed rule or amendment if a hearing is requested by:
1. At least 25 persons;
2. A state or federal governmental subdivision or agency; or
3. An association having at least 25 members.
I. If a hearing is held on the proposed rule or amendment, the Commission shall  publish
the place, time and date of the scheduled public  hearing. If the hearing is held via electronic
means, the Commission shall publish the mechanism for access to the electronic hearing.
[13]
HB 3351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
1. All persons wishing to be  heard at the hearing shall notify the executive director of
the Commission or another designated  member in writing of their desire to appear and tes-
tify at the hearing not less than five business days before  the scheduled date of the hearing.
2. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing  each person who wishes to com-
ment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing.
3. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording will be made available on  re-
quest.
4. Nothing in this Section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each
proposed rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Commission at  hearings re-
quired by this Section.
J. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of business on the  scheduled
hearing date if the hearing was not held, the Commission shall consider all written  and oral
comments received.
K. If no written notice of  intent to attend the public hearing by interested parties is re-
ceived, the Commission may proceed with promulgation of the  proposed rule without a public
hearing.
L. The Commission shall,  by majority vote of all members, take final action on the pro-
posed rule and shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking
record and the full text of the rule.
M. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may  consider and
adopt an emergency  rule without prior notice, opportunity for comment or hearing, provided
that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in this Compact and in this Section shall be
retroactively applied to the emergency rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event  later
than 90 days after the effective date of  the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an
emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or member state funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative  rule that is established by
federal law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
N. The Commission or an  authorized committee of the Commission may direct revisions
to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors,
errors in format, errors  in consistency or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions
shall be posted on the  website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge
by any person for  a period of 30 days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on
grounds that  the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made
in writing and delivered to the chair of the Commission prior to the end of the notice period.
If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect  without further action. If the revision
is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the Commission.
SECTION 12. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight
1. The  executive, legislative and judicial branches of state government in each member
state shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to  effectuate
this Compact’s purposes and intent. The provisions of this Compact and,  subject to Section
11 (B)(2) of this Compact, the rules  promulgated hereunder, shall have standing as statutory
[14]
HB 3351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
law.
2. All courts shall take judicial notice of this Compact and  the rules in any judicial or
administrative proceeding in a member state  pertaining to the subject matter of this Com-
pact which may affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the Commission.
3. The Commission shall  be entitled to receive service of process in any such proceeding
and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to  provide
service of  process to the Commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the Com-
mission, this Compact or the rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance and Termination
1. If  the Commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the performance
of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or the rules, the Commission shall:
a. Provide written notice to  the defaulting state and other member states of the nature
of the default, the proposed means of curing the  default and any other action to be taken
by the Commission; and
b. Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.
C. If a  state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be terminated
from this Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority  of the member states, and all
rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this Compact may  be terminated on the effective
date of termination. A cure of  the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations
or liabilities incurred during the period of default,  except that the State of Oregon’s obli-
gations or liabilities may not exceed the maximum amount  allowed by the Oregon Constitu-
tion.
D. Termination of membership in this Compact shall be  imposed only after all other
means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend  or terminate
shall be given by the Commission to the governor of  the defaulting state, the majority and
minority leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature and each of the member states.
E. A state that has been terminated is responsible for all  assessments, obligations and
liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination,  including obligations that ex-
tend beyond the effective date of termination,  except that the State of Oregon’s assessment,
obligations and liabilities may not exceed the maximum amount allowed  by the Oregon Con-
stitution.
F. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a  state that is found to be in de-
fault or that has been terminated  from this Compact, unless agreed upon in writing between
the Commission and the defaulting state.
G. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Commission  by petitioning the
United States District Court for the District  of Columbia or the federal district where the
Commission has its principal offices.  The prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of
such litigation,  including reasonable attorney fees, except that the costs incurred by the
State of Oregon may not exceed the maximum amount allowed by the Oregon Constitution.
H. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a member state, the Commission shall attempt  to resolve disputes
related to this Compact that arise among member states and between member and  non-
member states.
2. The Commission shall promulgate  a rule providing for both mediation and binding
dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate, to  which the State of Oregon is subject only
[15]
HB 3351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
insofar as the rule of the Commission is adopted by the Oregon  Board of Licensed Profes-
sional Counselors and Therapists by rule.
I. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its  discretion, shall enforce the pro-
visions and rules of this Compact.
2. By majority vote, the Commission may  initiate legal action in the United States Dis-
trict Court for the District of Columbia  or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices against a  member state in default to enforce compliance with the provisions
of this Compact and its rules  and bylaws. The relief sought may include injunctive relief. In
the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the  prevailing member shall be awarded all costs
of such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees, except that the State of Oregon’s  costs
under this paragraph may not exceed the maximum allowed by the Oregon Constitution.
3. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the  Commission. The
Commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law, except that
the Commission may not pursue remedies against the State of Oregon that are not allowed
by Oregon state law.
SECTION 13. DATE OF IMPLEMENTATION  OF THE COUNSELING COMPACT COM-
MISSION AND ASSOCIATED RULES, WITHDRAWAL AND AMENDMENT
A. This Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the Compact  statute is en-
acted into law in the 10th member  state. The provisions, which become effective at that
time, shall be limited to the powers granted to the  Commission relating to assembly and the
promulgation of rules. Thereafter, the Commission shall meet and exercise rulemaking pow-
ers necessary to the implementation and administration of this Compact.
B. Any state that joins this Compact  subsequent to the Commission’s initial adoption of
the rules shall be subject to the rules  as they exist on the date on which this Compact be-
comes law in that state, subject  to Section 11 (B)(2) of this Compact. Any rule that has been
previously adopted by the Commission  shall have the full force and effect of law on the day
this Compact becomes law in that state.
C. Any member state may withdraw from  this Compact by enacting a statute repealing
the same.
1. A member state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until six  months after enactment
of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect  the continuing requirement of the withdrawing state’s
professional counseling licensing board to comply with the investigative and adverse action
reporting requirements of this Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
D. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any
professional counseling licensure agreement or other cooperative  arrangement between a
member state and a nonmember state that does  not conflict with the provisions of this
Compact.
E. This Compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to  this Compact
shall become effective and binding upon any  member state until it is enacted into the laws
of all member states.
SECTION 14. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the  purposes thereof. The
provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any phrase,  clause, sentence or provision
[16]
HB 3351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of this Compact is declared to be  contrary to the constitution of any member state or of the
United States or  the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance
is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability thereof  to
any government, agency, person or  circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this Com-
pact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any member state, this Compact shall re-
main in full force and effect as to the remaining member states and  in full force and effect
as to the member state affected as to all severable matters.
SECTION 15. BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS
A. A licensee providing professional counseling services in a remote state under  the
privilege to practice shall adhere to the laws and regulations, including  scope of practice, of
the remote state.
B. Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of  a member state that is
not inconsistent with this Compact.
C. Except as provided in this  Compact, any laws in a member state in conflict with this
Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
D.1. Any lawful actions  of the Commission, including all rules and bylaws properly
promulgated by the Commission, are binding upon the member states, subject to paragraph
2 of this subsection.
2. The Oregon Board of Licensed Professional Counselors and Therapists shall review  the
rules and bylaws of the Commission. The board may approve and adopt the rules  and bylaws
of the Commission as rules of  the board. The State of Oregon is subject to a rule or bylaw
of the Commission only if the rule or bylaw of the Commission is adopted by the board.
E. All  permissible agreements between the Commission and the member states are
binding in accordance with their terms.
F. In  the event any provision of this Compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed
on the legislature of any member state, the provision shall be ineffective to the extent  of the
conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that member state.
SECTION 2. The Legislative Assembly of the State of Oregon hereby ratifies the Coun-
seling Compact set forth in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 675.715 to
675.835.
SECTION 4. (1) There is established, within the Oregon Board of  Licensed Professional
Counselors and Therapists Account, the Counseling Compact Account. All moneys  received
by the Oregon Board of Licensed Professional Counselors and Therapists  under the Coun-
seling Compact set forth in  section 1 of this 2025 Act shall be paid into the General Fund in
the State Treasury and deposited in the Counseling Compact Account. Subject to  subsection
(2) of this section, the moneys  in the account are continuously appropriated to the board for
the purpose of  meeting financial obligations imposed on the State of Oregon as a result of
this state’s participation in the compact.
(2) At no time may the Counseling Compact  Account contain more than $50,000. Any
moneys in excess of $50,000 shall be transferred to the Oregon Board of Licensed Professional
Counselors and Therapists Account established under ORS 675.805.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 675.805 is amended to read:
[17]
HB 3351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
675.805. Subject to section 4 of this  2025 Act,  all moneys received by the Oregon Board of
Licensed Professional Counselors and Therapists under ORS  675.715 to 675.835 shall be paid into the
General Fund in the State Treasury and placed to the credit of  the Oregon Board of Licensed Pro-
fessional  Counselors  and Therapists Account, which is hereby established. Such moneys are appro-
priated continuously to the board and shall be used only for the  administration and enforcement of
ORS 675.172, 675.715 to 675.835, 676.850 and 676.866.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 675.825 is amended to read:
675.825. (1) A person may not:
(a) Attempt to obtain or obtain a license or license renewal by bribery  or fraudulent represen-
tation.
(b) Engage in or purport to the  public to be engaged in the practice of professional counseling
under the title “licensed professional counselor” unless the person is a licensee.
(c) Engage in or purport  to the public to be engaged in the practice of marriage and family
therapy under the title of “licensed marriage and family therapist” unless the person is a licensee.
(d) Engage in the practice of professional counseling or marriage and family therapy unless:
(A) The person is a licensee, registered associate  or graduate student pursuing a graduate de-
gree in counseling or marriage and family therapy; or
(B) The person is exempted from the licensing  requirements of ORS 675.715 to 675.835 by sub-
section (3) of this section.
(e) Provide counseling or therapy services of a psychotherapeutic nature if  the person’s license
to practice as  a professional counselor or as a marriage and family therapist has been revoked by
the Oregon Board of Licensed Professional Counselors and Therapists because the  person engaged
in sexual activity with a client.
(2) A  licensed psychologist whose license, or a regulated social worker whose authorization to
practice regulated social work, was issued prior to October 1, 1991, may use the title “marriage and
family therapist.”
(3) The licensing requirements of ORS 675.715 to 675.835 do not apply to a person who is:
(a) Licensed, certified, registered or similarly regulated under the laws of this state and who  is
performing duties  within the authorized scope of practice of the license, certification, registration
or regulation.
(b) A recognized member of the clergy, provided that the person is acting  in the person’s
ministerial capacity.
(c) Employed by a local, state or federal  agency, a public university listed in ORS 352.002 or any
agency licensed or certified by the state to provide mental health  or health services, if the person’s
activities constituting professional counseling  or marriage and family therapy are performed within
the scope of the person’s employment.
(d) Authorized to provide addiction treatment services under rules  of the Department of Human
Services.
(e) Authorized to practice pursuant to  privilege to practice as defined in section 1 of this
2025 Act.
(4) Nothing in ORS 675.715 to 675.835 limits or prevents the practice  of a person’s profession
or restricts a person from providing counseling services or  services related to marriage and family
if the person:
(a) Does not meet the requirements of ORS 675.715 (1)(b); or
(b) Does not practice:
[18]
HB 3351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Marriage and family therapy as defined in ORS 675.705 (7)(a); or
(B) Professional counseling as defined in ORS 675.705 (8)(a).
(5) Each violation of this section is a separate violation.
(6) The board may levy a civil penalty not to exceed $2,500 for each separate violation of  this
section.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 676.177 is amended to read:
676.177. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS 676.165 to 676.180 and  except as pro-
vided in subsection (5) of this section, a health professional regulatory board, upon a determination
by the board that  it possesses otherwise confidential information that reasonably relates to the
regulatory or enforcement function of another public entity, may disclose that  information to the
other public entity.
(2) Any public  entity that receives information pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall
agree to take  all reasonable steps to maintain the confidentiality of the information, except that the
public entity may use or disclose  the information to the extent necessary to carry out the regulatory
or enforcement functions of the public entity.
(3) For purposes of this section, “public entity” means:
(a) A board or agency of this state, or a board or agency of another  state with regulatory or
enforcement functions similar to the  functions of a health professional regulatory board of this state;
(b) A district attorney;
(c) The Department of Justice;
(d) A state or local public body of this state that licenses, franchises  or provides emergency
medical services; or
(e) A law enforcement agency of this state, another state or the federal government.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (3) of this section[ ,]:
(a) The Oregon Board of Physical Therapy may disclose information described in  subsection (1)
of this section to the Physical Therapy Compact Commission [ established] described in ORS 688.240.
(b) Except  as prohibited by subsection (5) of this section, the Oregon Board of Licensed
Professional Counselors and Therapists may disclose information  described in subsection (1)
of this section to the Counseling Compact Commission  described in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(5) A health professional regulatory board may not disclose the information  described in sub-
section (1) of this section to another public entity if the information relates  to the provision of or
referral for reproductive or gender-affirming health care services.
SECTION 8.
Notwithstanding section 3, subsection A, paragraphs 2 to 4, of the  Coun-
seling Compact set forth in section 1 of this 2025 Act, the Oregon Board of Licensed Profes-
sional Counselors and Therapists may adopt by rule  standards for education, supervised
clinical experience and examinations. The board may apply the standards  described in this
section in order to:
(1) Renew a license issued by the board  under ORS 675.715 to 675.835 that the board is-
sued prior to the operative date specified in section 10 of this 2025 Act;
(2) Issue a reciprocal license under ORS 675.735; or
(3) Reissue a license pursuant to ORS 675.725 (5).
SECTION 9.
(1) The amendments to ORS 675.805 by  section 5 of this 2025 Act apply to
moneys received by the Oregon Board of Licensed  Professional Counselors and Therapists
on or after the operative date specified in section 10 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 675.825 by section 6 of this 2025 Act apply to individuals au-
[19]
HB 3351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
thorized to practice by privilege to practice on or  after the operative date specified in section
10 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The amendments to ORS 676.177 by section 7 of this 2025 Act apply to information
disclosed on or after the operative date specified in section 10 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 10.
(1) Sections 1 to 4 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 675.805,
675.825 and 676.177 by sections 5 to 7 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2028.
(2) The Oregon  Board of Licensed Professional Counselors and Therapists may take any
action before the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary
to enable the board to exercise, on or after the operative date specified in subsection (1)  of
this section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the board by  sections 1 to
4 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 675.805, 675.825 and 676.177 by sections 5 to 7
of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 11.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[20]