Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Hotel” or “inn” has the meaning given those terms in ORS 699.005.
(b) “Human trafficking”  means conduct constituting an offense under ORS 163.263,
163.264 or 163.266.
(c) “Human trafficking victim” means a  person who is subjected to human trafficking
regardless of whether the perpetrator of  the human trafficking is identified, apprehended,
prosecuted or convicted.
(2) No later than January 1, 2027, the Department  of Justice shall establish the Oregon
Hotels Against Human Trafficking Training Program.  The purpose of the program is to de-
velop a model training on recognizing, preventing and reporting human trafficking.
(3) The department shall make the model training available on  the department’s website
for a person acting on behalf of a hotel  or inn to use in providing training to employees of
a hotel or inn who the person determines are likely  to come into contact with potential hu-
man trafficking victims and any other employees the  person determines should attend the
training.
SECTION 2.
 Section 1 of this 2025 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Hotel” or “inn” has the meaning given those terms in ORS 699.005.
(b) “Human trafficking” means conduct  constituting an offense under ORS 163.263, 163.264 or
163.266.
(c) “Human trafficking victim”  means a person who is subjected to human trafficking regardless
of whether  the perpetrator of the human trafficking is identified, apprehended, prosecuted or con-
victed.
(2) [No later  than January 1, 2027, ] The Department of Justice shall establish the Oregon Hotels
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2237
HB 2194
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Against Human Trafficking Training Program.  The purpose of the program is to develop a model
training on recognizing, preventing and reporting human trafficking.
(3) The department shall make the model training available on the department’s website  for a
person acting on behalf of a hotel or inn  to use in providing training to employees of a hotel or inn
who the person determines are likely to come into contact with potential human  trafficking victims
and any other employees the person determines should attend the training.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to section 1 of this 2025 Act by section 2 of this 2025 Act
become operative on January 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. Section 5 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 315.
SECTION 5. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Hotel” or “inn” has the meaning given those terms in ORS 699.005.
(b) “Human trafficking” means conduct constituting an offense under  ORS 163.263,
163.264 or 163.266.
(c) “Human trafficking training program” means the human trafficking  training program
developed by the Department of Justice under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(d) “Human trafficking victim” means a person  who is subjected to human trafficking
regardless of whether the perpetrator of the  human trafficking is identified, apprehended,
prosecuted or convicted.
(2) A credit against taxes that are otherwise due under ORS  chapter 316 or, if the tax-
payer is a corporation, under ORS chapter 317  or 318, is allowed to a taxpayer who estab-
lishes and implements a human trafficking  training program in accordance with section 1
of this 2025 Act.
(3) The credit allowed under this section shall be equal  to 12 percent of the taxpayer’s
expenses to establish and implement the human trafficking training program  described in
subsection (2) of this section.
(4) For each tax year for which a credit is claimed under this  section, the taxpayer shall
maintain records sufficient to prove  the taxpayer’s eligibility for the credit allowed under
this section. A taxpayer shall maintain  the records required under this subsection for at
least five years.
(5) The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the tax  liability of the taxpayer
for the tax year.
(6) Any tax credit otherwise allowable under this section that is not  used by the taxpayer
in a particular tax year may be carried forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax  liability
for the next succeeding tax  year. Any credit remaining unused in the next succeeding tax
year may be carried forward and used in the second succeeding tax year, and likewise any
credit not used in that second succeeding tax year may be  carried forward and used in the
third succeeding tax year, but may not be carried forward for any tax year thereafter.
(7) A nonresident taxpayer shall be allowed the credit under this section. The  credit shall
be computed in the same manner and be subject to the same  limitations as the credit
granted to a resident taxpayer. However, the credit shall  be prorated using the proportion
provided in ORS 316.117.
(8) If a change in the  taxable year of the taxpayer occurs as described in ORS 314.085,
or if the Department of Revenue  terminates the taxpayer’s taxable year under ORS 314.440,
the credit allowed by  this section shall be prorated or computed in a manner consistent with
ORS 314.085.
[2]
HB 2194
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(9) If a change  in the status of a taxpayer from resident to nonresident or from nonres-
ident to resident occurs, the credit  allowed by this section shall be determined in a manner
consistent with ORS 316.117.
(10) Spouses in a marriage  who file separate returns for a taxable year may each claim
a share of the tax credit that would have  been allowed on a joint return in proportion to the
adjusted gross income of each.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 314.772 is amended to read:
314.772. (1) Except  as provided in ORS 314.766 (5)(b), the tax credits allowed or allowable to a
C corporation for purposes  of ORS chapter 317 or 318 shall not be allowed to an S corporation. The
business tax credits  allowed or allowable for purposes of ORS chapter 316 shall be allowed or are
allowable to the shareholders of the S corporation.
(2) In determining the tax imposed under ORS chapter 316, as provided under ORS 314.763, on
income of the shareholder of an S corporation, there shall be taken into account  the shareholder’s
pro rata share of  business tax credit (or item thereof) that would be allowed to the corporation (but
for subsection (1) of this section) or recapture or recovery thereof.  The credit (or item thereof), re-
capture or recovery shall be passed through to shareholders in pro rata shares as determined in the
manner prescribed under section 1377(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) The character of any  item included in a shareholder’s pro rata share under subsection (2)
of this section shall be determined as if such item were realized  directly from the source from which
realized by the corporation, or incurred in the same manner as incurred by the corporation.
(4) If the shareholder is a nonresident and there is a requirement applicable  for the business tax
credit that in the case of a  nonresident the credit be allowed in the proportion provided in ORS
316.117, then that provision shall apply to the nonresident shareholder.
(5) As used in this section, “business tax credit”  means the following credits: ORS 315.104
(forestation and reforestation), ORS 315.124 (small forest option), ORS 315.133 (agricultural overtime
pay), ORS 315.138 (fish screening, by-pass devices, fishways),  ORS 315.141 (biomass production for
biofuel), ORS  315.156 (crop gleaning), ORS 315.164 and 315.169 (agriculture workforce housing), ORS
315.176 (bovine manure), ORS 315.204 (dependent care assistance), ORS 315.208 (dependent care fa-
cilities), ORS 315.213 (contributions for child  care), ORS 315.237 (employee and dependent scholar-
ships), ORS 315.271 (individual development accounts), ORS 315.283 (affordable housing  sales), ORS
315.304 (pollution control facility), ORS 315.326 (renewable energy  development contributions), ORS
315.331 (energy conservation projects), ORS 315.336 (transportation projects),  ORS 315.341
(renewable energy resource equipment manufacturing facilities), ORS 315.354  and 469B.151 (energy
conservation facilities), ORS 315.506 (tribal taxes on reservation enterprise zones  and reservation
partnership zones), ORS 315.507 (electronic commerce), ORS 315.514 (film production development
contributions), ORS 315.518 (semiconductors), ORS 315.523 (employee  training programs), ORS
315.533 (low income community jobs  initiative), ORS 315.593 (short line railroads), ORS 315.640
(university venture development funds), ORS 315.643 (Opportunity Grant Fund contributions), ORS
315.675 (Trust for Cultural Development Account contributions), ORS 317.097 (loans for affordable
housing), ORS 317.124 (long  term enterprise zone facilities), ORS 317.147 (loans for agriculture
workforce housing), ORS 317.152  (qualified research expenses) and ORS 317.154 (alternative qualified
research expenses) and section 9, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2013 (alternative fuel vehicle  contribu-
tions), and section 5 of this 2025 Act (human trafficking training program) .
SECTION 7.
 ORS 318.031 is amended to read:
318.031. It being the intention of the Legislative Assembly that this chapter and ORS chapter
[3]
HB 2194
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
317 shall be administered as uniformly as  possible (allowance being made for the difference in im-
position of the taxes), ORS 305.140  and 305.150, ORS chapter 314 and the following sections are in-
corporated into and made a part of this chapter: ORS 315.104, 315.124, 315.133, 315.141,  315.156,
315.176, 315.204, 315.208, 315.213, 315.283, 315.304, 315.326, 315.331, 315.336, 315.506, 315.507, 315.523,
315.533, 315.593 and 315.643 and section 5 of this 2025 Act  (all only  to the extent applicable to a
corporation) and ORS chapter 317.
SECTION 8.
Section 5 of this 2025  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2027, and before January 1, 2033.
SECTION 9. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]