Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 458.650 is amended to read:
458.650. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department  shall administer the Emergency
Housing Account to assist homeless individuals and individuals who  are at risk of becoming
homeless, through means including the emergency housing assistance program and the state
homeless assistance program. Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a) of this section,  the state homeless
assistance program shall  serve individuals experiencing homelessness, especially unsheltered
homelessness, without respect to income.
(2) The Oregon Housing Stability Council shall develop a policy for the use of  program funds
with the advice of:
(a) Persons who have experienced housing instability;
(b) Tribes;
(c) The Community Action Partnership of Oregon;
(d) Continuums of care, as defined in 24 C.F.R. part 578;
(e) Local governments;
(f) Nonprofit organizations;
(g) Homeless services providers;
(h) Culturally specific organizations;
(i) Housing providers;
(j) Veterans’ services organizations; and
(k) Other entities identified by the department by rule.
(3) The policy under subsection (2) of this section shall  direct that program funds shall be used:
(a) To provide to low and very low income individuals, including but not  limited to individuals
more than 65 years of age, persons with disabilities, agricultural workers and Native Americans:
(A) Emergency shelters and attendant services;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1226
SB 496
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Transitional housing services designed to assist individuals to make  the transition from
homelessness to permanent housing and economic independence;
(C) Supportive housing  services to enable individuals to continue living in their own homes or
to provide in-home services for such individuals for whom suitable programs do not exist  in their
geographic area;
(D) Programs that provide emergency payment of home payments, rents or utilities; [ or]
(E) Support for the individuals’ pets, including pet food, shelter, supplies  and basic
veterinary services; or
[(E)] (F)  Some or all of the needs described in subparagraphs (A)  to [ (D)] (E) of this paragraph.
(b) To align with federal strategies and resources that are available to  prevent and end
homelessness, including the requirement of providing culturally responsive services and  using
evidence-based and emerging  practices effective in ending homelessness, including practices unique
to rural communities.
(4)(a) The council shall require as a condition of awarding a grant that  the organization dem-
onstrate to the satisfaction of the council that the organization:
(A) Has the capacity to deliver any service proposed by the organization;
(B) Is a culturally responsive organization or is engaged in a process to become  a culturally
responsive organization;
(C) Engages with culturally specific organizations; and
(D) Supports local homelessness system planning efforts.
(b) The council shall require that  an organization receiving funds to provide individuals
with pet assistance described in subsection (3)(a)(E) of  this section operate or provide fund-
ing to operate an emergency or domestic violence shelter that:
(A) Has rules of conduct and responsibility regarding pets and their owners;
(B) Provides crates or kenneling either onsite or offsite that is easily accessible to  the
pet owners;
(C) Provides food for both individuals staying at the shelter and their pets; and
(D) Offers veterinary services, onsite or offsite, including vaccination,  behavioral support
and spaying and neutering.
[(b)] (c)  Any  funds granted under this section may not be used to replace existing funds. Funds
granted under this section may be used to supplement existing  funds. An organization may use funds
to support existing programs or to establish new programs.
(5) The department may expend funds from the account for:
(a) The administration of the account as provided for in  the legislatively approved budget, as
that term is defined in ORS 291.002, for the department in support  of directing a statewide policy
on homelessness that ensures use of  evidence-based and emerging practices, service equity in fund-
ing and local planning processes.
(b) The development of technical assistance and training resources for  organizations developing
and operating emergency shelters as defined in ORS 197.782 and transitional housing accommo-
dations as described in ORS 197.746.
(6) The department shall utilize outcome-oriented contracting processes  and evidence-based and
emerging practices for account program  funds, including evidence-based and emerging practices for
serving rural communities.
(7) Twenty-five percent  of moneys deposited in the account pursuant to ORS 294.187 are dedi-
cated to the emergency housing assistance program for assistance to veterans who are homeless or
[2]
SB 496
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
at risk of becoming homeless.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $6,000,000, for deposit into the Emergency
Housing Account to provide grants to organizations described in ORS 458.650 (4)(b).
SECTION 3. (1) An organization described in ORS 458.650  (4)(b) that receives a grant
from the Emergency Housing Account shall submit a report to the Housing  and Community
Services Department on or before August 1, 2024, that includes:
(a) A description of the activities undertaken by the organization using the grant;
(b) A statement showing the costs of each activity under paragraph (a) of this subsection;
and
(c) An assessment of the effectiveness of the  program grants under ORS 458.650 and any
recommendations for improving the program.
(2) On  or before September 15, 2024, the department shall provide a report to an appro-
priate interim committee of the Legislative Assembly  in the manner provided in ORS 192.245
summarizing the information collected in the reports under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 4.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[3]