Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 468B.050 is amended to read:
468B.050. (1) Except as provided in  ORS 468B.053 or 468B.215, without holding a permit from the
Director of the Department of Environmental Quality or the  State Department of Agriculture, which
permit shall specify applicable effluent limitations, a person may not:
(a) Discharge any wastes into the waters of the state from  any industrial or commercial estab-
lishment or activity or any disposal system.
(b) Construct, install, modify or operate any disposal system  or part thereof or any extension
or addition thereto.
(c) Increase in volume or strength any wastes  in excess of the permissive discharges specified
under an existing permit.
(d) Construct, install, operate or conduct  any industrial, commercial, confined animal feeding
operation or other  establishment or activity or any extension or modification thereof or addition
thereto, the operation or conduct of which would cause an increase in the discharge of wastes into
the waters of the state or which  would otherwise alter the physical, chemical or biological proper-
ties of any waters of the state in any manner not already lawfully authorized.
(e) Construct or use any new outlet for the discharge of any wastes into the waters  of the state.
(2) The Department of  Environmental Quality or the State Department of Agriculture may issue
a permit under this section as an individual, general or watershed permit. A permit may be  issued
to a class of persons using the procedures for issuance of an order or for the adoption of  a rule.
Notwithstanding the definition of “order”  or “rule” provided in ORS 183.310, in issuing a general
or watershed permit by order  pursuant to this section, the State Department of Agriculture or De-
partment of Environmental Quality:
(a) Is not required to direct the order to a named person or named persons; and
(b) May  include in the order agency directives, standards, regulations and statements of general
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2079
SB 80
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
applicability that implement, interpret or prescribe law or policy.
(3) When deciding whether to issue a permit to a confined animal feeding  operation under this
section,  the  Department of Environmental Quality or the State Department of Agriculture shall
consider any relevant determination by the Water  Resources Department pursuant to ORS 468B.216
(2).
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the Department of Environmental  Quality or
the State Department of Agriculture may  not issue a [ general] NPDES or WPCF permit to a [ new
large] confined animal feeding operation that:
(a) Is located in a ground water management area declared under ORS 468B.180; and
[(b) Applies manure, litter, wastewater or processed waste to land  within the ground water man-
agement area. ]
(b) Is a new large confined animal feeding operation, an expanding large confined  animal
feeding operation or an expanding confined animal feeding  operation that is expanding oper-
ational size into the largest tier described in ORS 561.255 (2).
(5) Subsection  (4) of this section does not apply to the issuance of water quality permits to
regulate stormwater.
(6) The  State Department of Agriculture or the Department of Environmental Quality may define
“confined animal feeding operation” by rule for purposes of implementing this section.
(7) As used in this section:
(a) “Expanding confined animal feeding operation,”  “expanding large confined animal
feeding operation” and  “new large confined animal feeding operation” [ has the meaning  given that
term] have the meanings given those terms  in ORS 468B.215.
(b) “NPDES” and “WPCF” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 561.255.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]