Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 327.013 is amended to read:
327.013. The State School Fund distributions for school districts include the following grants:
(1) General Purpose Grant = Funding Percentage 
×  Target Grant ×  District  extended ADMw.
For the purpose of the calculation made under this subsection:
(a) The funding percentage shall be calculated by  the Superintendent of Public Instruction to
distribute as nearly as practicable the total sum of money available for distribution.
(b) Target Grant = Statewide Target per ADMw Grant + Teacher Experience  Factor. For the
purpose of the calculation made under this paragraph:
(A) Statewide Target per ADMw Grant = $4,500.
(B) Teacher Experience Factor  = $25 
×  {District average teacher experience − statewide av-
erage teacher experience}. As used in this  subparagraph, “average teacher experience” means the
average,  in  years, of teaching experience of licensed teachers as reported to the Department of Ed-
ucation.
(c) District extended ADMw = ADMw or ADMw of the  prior year, whichever is greater. The
calculation of the district extended ADMw must be made as provided  by ORS 338.155 if a public
charter school is located in the school district. For the purpose of this paragraph:
(A) Weighted average daily membership or ADMw = average  daily membership + an additional
amount computed as follows:
(i) 1.0 for each  student in average daily membership eligible for special education as a child with
a disability under ORS 343.035, which may  not exceed [ 11] 13 percent of the district’s ADM without
review and approval by the Department of Education. Children with disabilities  eligible for special
education in adult local correctional facilities,  as defined in ORS 169.005, or adult regional
correctional facilities, as defined in ORS 169.620, may not be included in the  calculation made under
this sub-subparagraph.
(ii) 0.5 for each student in average daily membership eligible for and  enrolled in an English
language learner program under ORS 336.079.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1022
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(iii) 0.2 for each student in average daily membership enrolled in a union high school  district
or in an area of  a unified school district where the district is only responsible for educating students
in grades 9 through 12 in that area.
(iv) −0.1  for each student in average daily membership enrolled in an elementary district oper-
ating kindergarten through grade six  or kindergarten through grade eight or in an area of a unified
school district where the district is only responsible  for educating students in kindergarten through
grade eight.
(v) 0.25 times the sum of the following:
(I) The number of students who are in average  daily membership and who are also in poverty
families, as determined by the Department  of Education based on rules adopted by the State Board
of Education that  incorporate poverty data published by the United States Census Bureau, student
data provided by school districts and other data identified by the board;
(II) The number of children in foster homes in the district as determined by the  report of the
Department of Human Services to the United  States Department of Education, “Annual Statistical
Report on Children in Foster Homes and Children in Families Receiving AFDC  Payments in Excess
of the Poverty Income Level,” or its successor, for October 31 of the  year prior to the year of dis-
tribution; and
(III) The number of children in the district  in state-recognized facilities for neglected and de-
linquent children, based on information  from the Department of Human Services for October 31 of
the year prior to the year of distribution.
(vi) The  amount determined under ORS 327.077 for each remote small elementary school and for
each small high school in the district.
(B) All numbers of children used  for the computation in this paragraph must reflect any district
consolidations that have occurred since the numbers were compiled.
(C) The total additional  weight that shall be assigned to any student in average daily member-
ship in a district, exclusive of students described  in subparagraph (A)(v) and (vi) of this paragraph,
may not exceed 2.0.
(2) High cost disabilities grant  = the total amount received by a school district under ORS
327.348 for providing special education and related services to resident pupils with disabilities.
(3)(a) Transportation grant equals:
(A) 70 percent of approved transportation  costs for those school districts ranked below the 80th
percentile under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(B) 80 percent of approved transportation costs for those school districts ranked in or  above the
80th percentile but below the 90th percentile under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(C) 90 percent of approved transportation costs for those school districts ranked in or  above the
90th percentile under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall rank  school districts based on the ap-
proved transportation costs per ADM of each school district, ranking the school district with  the
highest approved transportation costs per ADM at the top of the order.
(4)(a) Facility Grant = 8 percent of total construction costs of new school buildings.
(b) A  school district shall receive a Facility Grant in the distribution year that a new school
building is first used.
(c) As used in this subsection:
(A) “New school building” includes new school buildings, structures  added onto existing school
buildings and  premanufactured structures added to a school district if those buildings or structures
[2]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
are to be used for instructing students.
(B) “Construction costs” does not include costs for land acquisition.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 327.008 is amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
(b) The Department of Education, on behalf  of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from public and private sources  for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State School Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by  the Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred from the Education Stability Fund and the Oregon Marijuana Account and
moneys received as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(d) The State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for  the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to 327.077,  327.095, 327.099, 327.101, 327.125, 327.137, 327.348, 336.575,
336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961 and sections 1 to 3, chapter 735, Oregon Laws
2013.
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each school  district a State School
Fund grant, consisting of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a  facility grant
and a transportation grant and a high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue, computed as pro-
vided in ORS 327.011 and 327.013.
(3) For the first school year after a public charter school ceases to  operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of  termination or nonrenewal of a charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund to  each school district that had sponsored a public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount equal to the school district’s  general purpose grant per extended
ADMw multiplied by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year.
(4) There shall be  apportioned from the State School Fund to each education service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All figures used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund shall  be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in average daily membership used in  the distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) A school district may  not use the portion of the State School Fund grant that is attributable
to the facility grant for capital construction costs.
(8) The total amount of  the State School Fund that is distributed as facility grants may not ex-
ceed $9 million in any biennium. If  the total amount to be distributed as facility grants exceeds this
limitation, the  Department of Education shall prorate the amount of funds available for facility
grants among  those school districts that qualified for a facility grant. If the total amount to be dis-
tributed as facility grants does not  exceed this limitation, any remaining amounts shall be expended
for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities as provided in ORS 326.125 (1).
(9) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend from  the State School Fund no
more than $6 million for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities under ORS 326.125 (2)
to (6).
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education  shall transfer to the Pediatric Nursing Fa-
cility Account established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs of educational
services provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(11) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer the  amount of [ $35] $36 million
[3]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
from the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
(12)(a) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $33 million from the State
School Fund to the Network of Quality Teaching and Learning Fund established under  ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The total  amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by $5 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school districts  from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by $14 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education service  districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by $14 million.
(c) For each biennium, the amounts identified in  paragraph (b)(B) and (C) of this subsection shall
be adjusted by the same percentage  by which the amount appropriated to the State School Fund for
that biennium is increased or decreased compared with the preceding biennium, as  determined by
the Department of Education after consultation with the Legislative Fiscal Officer.
(13) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Statewide English  Language Learner Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
(14) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from the  State
School  Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this  section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide administration of and support for the development  of talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration  of a program to increase the number of speech-language
pathologists and speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.394 to 348.406.
(17) Each fiscal year, the  Department of Education shall transfer the amount of $2.5 million from
the State School Fund to the Small School District Supplement Fund established in section 3, chap-
ter 735, Oregon Laws 2013.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 327.008, as amended by section 22, chapter 639, Oregon  Laws 2017, and sec-
tion 5, chapter 700, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
(b) The Department of Education, on behalf  of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from  public and private sources for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State School  Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred from the Education Stability Fund and the Oregon Marijuana Account and
moneys received as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(d) The  State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to 327.077, 327.095, 327.099,  327.101, 327.125, 327.137, 327.348, 336.575,
336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961 and sections 1 to 3, chapter 735, Oregon Laws
2013.
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each school  district a State School
Fund grant, consisting  of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a facility grant
[4]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and a transportation grant and a high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue, computed as pro-
vided in ORS 327.011 and 327.013.
(3) For the first school  year after a public charter school ceases to operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of termination or nonrenewal of a  charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund to each school district that had sponsored  a public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount equal  to the school district’s general purpose grant per extended
ADMw multiplied by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year.
(4) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each education  service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All  figures used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund shall be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in average  daily membership used in the distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) A school district may  not use the portion of the State School Fund grant that is attributable
to the facility grant for capital construction costs.
(8) The total amount of the State School Fund that is distributed as facility  grants may not ex-
ceed $7 million in any biennium. If  the total amount to be distributed as facility grants exceeds this
limitation, the Department of Education shall prorate the amount of funds available for  facility
grants among those school districts that qualified for a facility grant. If the total amount to be  dis-
tributed as facility grants does not  exceed this limitation, any remaining amounts shall be expended
for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities as provided in ORS 326.125 (1).
(9) Each biennium, the Department of  Education may expend from the State School Fund no
more than $6 million for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities under ORS 326.125 (2)
to (6).
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education  shall transfer to the Pediatric Nursing Fa-
cility Account established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs of educational
services provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(11) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer the  amount of [ $35] $36 million
from the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
(12)(a) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $39.5 million from  the State
School Fund to the Educator Advancement Fund established under ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The total  amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by $6 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school districts  from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by $16.75 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education service  districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by $16.75 million.
(c) For each biennium, the  amounts identified in this subsection shall be adjusted by the same
percentage  by  which the instructions furnished to state agencies by the Governor under ORS 291.204
direct the state agencies to adjust their agency budget requests for special payments under ORS
291.216 (6)(a)(C).
(13) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Statewide English  Language Learner Program Account established under ORS
[5]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
327.344.
(14) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from the  State
School  Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this  section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide administration of and support for the development  of talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration  of a program to increase the number of speech-language
pathologists and speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.394 to 348.406.
(17) Each fiscal year, the  Department of Education shall transfer the amount of $2.5 million from
the State School Fund to the Small School District Supplement Fund established in section 3, chap-
ter 735, Oregon Laws 2013.
(18) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $2 million from  the State School
Fund for  deposit to the Healthy School Facilities Fund established under ORS 332.337.
Notwithstanding  ORS  332.337, the department may expend moneys received in the Healthy School
Facilities Fund under this subsection only as grants for costs associated with testing for  elevated
levels of lead in water used for drinking or food preparation.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 327.008, as amended by section 7, chapter  735, Oregon Laws 2013, section 7,
chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2014, section 2, chapter 68, Oregon Laws 2015,  section 38, chapter 245,
Oregon Laws 2015, section 2, chapter 555, Oregon Laws  2015, section 11, chapter 604, Oregon Laws
2015, section 2, chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2015, section 8, chapter 783, Oregon Laws  2015, sections
22 and 23, chapter 639, Oregon Laws 2017, sections 5 and 6, chapter 700, Oregon Laws 2017, and
section 34, chapter 725, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
(b) The Department of Education, on behalf  of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from  public and private sources for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State School  Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred from the Education Stability Fund and the Oregon Marijuana Account and
moneys received as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(d) The  State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to 327.077, 327.095, 327.099,  327.101, 327.125, 327.137, 327.348, 336.575,
336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961.
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each school  district a State School
Fund grant, consisting  of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a facility grant
and a transportation grant and a high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue, computed as pro-
vided in ORS 327.011 and 327.013.
(3) For the first school  year after a public charter school ceases to operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of termination or nonrenewal of a  charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund to each school district that had sponsored  a public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount equal  to the school district’s general purpose grant per extended
ADMw multiplied by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year.
[6]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each education  service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All  figures used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund shall be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in average  daily membership used in the distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) A school district may  not use the portion of the State School Fund grant that is attributable
to the facility grant for capital construction costs.
(8) The total amount of  the State School Fund that is distributed as facility grants may not ex-
ceed $7 million in any biennium. If  the total amount to be distributed as facility grants exceeds this
limitation, the  Department of Education shall prorate the amount of funds available for facility
grants among  those school districts that qualified for a facility grant. If the total amount to be dis-
tributed as facility grants does not  exceed this limitation, any remaining amounts shall be expended
for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities as provided in ORS 326.125 (1).
(9) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend from  the State School Fund no
more than $6 million for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities under ORS 326.125 (2)
to (6).
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education  shall transfer to the Pediatric Nursing Fa-
cility Account established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs of educational
services provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(11) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer the  amount of [ $35] $36 million
from the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
(12)(a) Each biennium,  the Department of Education shall transfer $39.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Educator Advancement Fund established under ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The total  amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by $6 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school districts  from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by $16.75 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education service  districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by $16.75 million.
(c) For each biennium, the amounts identified in this subsection shall be  adjusted by the same
percentage  by  which the instructions furnished to state agencies by the Governor under ORS 291.204
direct the state agencies to adjust their agency budget requests for special payments under ORS
291.216 (6)(a)(C).
(13) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Statewide English Language Learner  Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
(14) Each  fiscal year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from the State
School  Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this section and  ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of  Education may expend up to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide administration  of and support for the development of talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
[7]
HB 2676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
(16) Each biennium, the Department of  Education may expend up to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration of a program to increase  the number of speech-language
pathologists and speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.394 to 348.406.
(17) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $2 million from  the State School
Fund for deposit to the Healthy School Facilities Fund established under ORS  332.337.
Notwithstanding ORS 332.337, the department may expend moneys received in the Healthy  School
Facilities  Fund  under this subsection only as grants for costs associated with testing for elevated
levels of lead in water used for drinking or food preparation.
SECTION 5. The amendments to ORS 327.008 and 327.013  by sections 1 to 4 of this 2019
Act apply to State School Fund distributions commencing with the 2019-2020 distributions.
SECTION 6. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
[8]