Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 321.017 is amended to read:
321.017. (1) In addition to the taxes levied under ORS 321.015 (1) to  (4), there hereby is levied
a privilege tax upon taxpayers on  the harvesting of all merchantable forest products harvested on
forestlands in the amount provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The rate of tax levied in subsection  (1) of this section shall be established annually at the
beginning of each calendar year by the  board of directors of the Oregon Forest Resources Institute,
at a rate not to exceed 75 cents per thousand feet,  board measure, adjusted annually for inflation
since 1991 based on the [ Consumer Price Index  (Portland area -- all items) ] Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers, West Region,  as published by the Bureau  of Labor Statistics of the
United States Department of Labor [ for the Portland, Oregon, area ].
(3) The tax shall be measured by and be  applicable to each per thousand feet, board measure,
and such shall be subject to  and determined by the procedures and provisions of ORS 321.015 (5)
and (6).
(4) The tax levied by subsection (1) of this section  shall be due and payable to the Department
of Revenue  in the manner and procedure, including penalties and interest, as set forth for the col-
lection of the privilege tax in ORS 321.005 to 321.185.
(5) The revenue from the tax levied by  subsection (1) of this section shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer who shall deposit it in a suspense account established  under ORS 321.145 (1). After
payment of refunds, which  shall be paid in the same manner as other forest products harvest tax
refunds are paid in ORS 321.145 (2), the  balance of the additional tax imposed under subsection (1)
of this section shall be deposited as follows:
(a) Sixty percent  in the Wildfire Suppression Fund created under section 2 of this 2019
Act; and
(b) Forty percent  in the Oregon Forest Resources Institute Fund created under  ORS
526.675.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2521
HB 3080
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 2. The Wildfire Suppression Fund is created in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously  appropriated to
the State Forester for:
(1) Paying, or contributing to the payment of, emergency fire suppression costs.
(2) Providing funds for the purchase of emergency  fire suppression costs insurance under
ORS 477.775.
(3) Acquiring and placing centrally managed fire suppression resources  for statewide use.
(4) Acquiring fast-mobilizing, short-term contingency resources to be used based on pre-
dictions of severe fire weather, widespread lightning events or serious resource shortage  due
to a heavy fire season in this state,  in the western region of the United States or nationally.
(5) Enhancing forest protection  district resources in cases where land productivity or
other economic factors seriously limit the ability of the State Forester to perform fire pro-
tection responsibilities.
(6) Mitigating forest patrol assessment rates  in cases where land productivity or other
economic factors seriously  limit the ability of the owners of forestlands in the forest pro-
tection district to comply with ORS 477.210 (1).
SECTION 3.
 ORS 477.760 is amended to read:
477.760. (1) The reserve base of  the Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund is $22.5 million. On
or about the last day of February of each year the Emergency Fire Cost Committee shall  meet and
determine the unencumbered balance of the fund as of the preceding February 16.
(2) In order to maintain the  reserve base of the fund at $22.5 million, the Emergency Fire Cost
Committee may  request and the State Treasurer may approve transfers to the fund in accordance
with ORS 293.205 to  293.225, if the moneys in this fund fall below the reserve base, whether or not
there are sufficient moneys in the fund to pay the obligations  of the fund. Repayment of any such
transfers shall be made from moneys paid into the fund  pursuant to ORS 321.015 (2), 477.277 and
477.880 and from such other moneys as may be credited to the fund therefor.
(3) If the committee determines that the moneys in the fund exceed:
(a) The reserve base,  and that no repayment obligations are outstanding from transfers made
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section,  then the Department of Revenue shall reduce the portion
of the  taxes described in ORS 321.015 (2)  that are levied for purposes  of transfer to the fund
by 50 percent for  the following calendar year and the surcharge for each improved lot or parcel
described in ORS 477.277 and the  assessments described in ORS 477.880 shall be reduced by 50
percent for the following fiscal year.
(b) $30 million, and that no repayment obligations are outstanding from transfers made  pursuant
to subsection (2)  of this section, then the Department of Revenue may not collect the taxes described
in ORS 321.015 (2) for the following calendar year and  the surcharge for each improved lot or parcel
described in ORS 477.277 and the  assessments described in ORS 477.880 may not be collected until
the calendar year  or fiscal year following the determination of the committee that the unencumbered
balance in the fund is less than or equal to $22.5 million.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the funds referred to in subsection (2) of
this section are inadequate to cover repayment of transfers from the State Treasurer or from  other
sources, the State Forester shall  increase the following taxes, assessments and charges in an amount
adequate to ensure repayment of the transfers, and any interest  accrued thereon, allowing for con-
tingencies in valuation, assessment and collection:
(A) The harvest tax referred to in ORS 321.015 (2).
[2]
HB 3080
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) The surcharge on developed lots referred to in ORS 477.277.
(C) The minimum assessment referred to in ORS 477.295.
(D) The acreage assessments referred to in ORS 477.880 (2).
(b) The increases  to taxes, assessments and charges shall be apportioned based upon the
proportionate levels of revenues received from each source  by the Oregon Forest Land Protection
Fund. Any such increases shall be computed on or before January  1 of each year, and shall be based
upon revenues received during the previous four quarters. Any such increases shall be made in  the
appropriate calendar or fiscal year following that in which the requested transfers  from the State
Treasurer or from other sources are made.  Notwithstanding ORS 321.152 (4), the full amount
derived from an increase in the harvest tax  referred to in ORS 321.015 (2) pursuant to this
subsection shall be transferred to the Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund created  under
ORS 477.750.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 477.777 is amended to read:
477.777. (1) As part of the preparation of  the agency request budget submitted to the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services pursuant to ORS 291.208 for the State Forestry  Department,
the State Forester shall prepare, in addition to any amounts budgeted  for forest protection districts
pursuant to ORS 477.205 to 477.281, a request for a General Fund appropriation for  the following
purposes:
(a) Providing funds for the purchase  of emergency fire suppression costs insurance under ORS
477.775.
(b) Acquiring and placing centrally managed fire suppression resources for statewide use.
(c) Acquiring fast-mobilizing, short-term contingency resources to be used based on  predictions
of severe fire weather, widespread  lightning events or serious resource shortage due to a heavy fire
season in this state, in the western region of the United States or nationally.
(d) Enhancing forest protection district resources in cases where land  productivity or other
economic factors seriously limit the ability of the forester to perform fire protection  responsibilities.
(e) Mitigating forest patrol assessment rates in cases where land productivity  or other economic
factors seriously limit the ability of the owners of forestlands in the forest protection  district to
comply with ORS 477.210 (1).
(2) The State Forester  [ shall utilize critical discretion in the expenditure of the ] may expend
funds provided to the State Forestry Department pursuant to the separate request required under
subsection (1) of this section only if, and  to the extent that, available moneys in the Wildfire
Suppression Fund created under section 2 of this 2019 Act are insufficient for  the
expenditure.
(3) The State Forester shall  report to the Emergency Board, each year, after the close of the fire
season, on:
(a) The nature and severity of the fire season;
(b) The moneys expended on fire suppression;
(c) The balance remaining from the biennial appropriation; and
(d) Any matters arising  out of the fire season that may require attention or warrant future
consideration by the board or the Legislative Assembly.
(4) When reporting the nature and severity of the fire season under subsection (3) of this section,
for each fire consuming 1,000 or more acres, the State Forester shall provide  information regarding
the resulting losses on private lands of timber,  buildings, fencing and livestock and of grazing land
capacity if the land is expected to be unavailable for two or more grazing seasons.
[3]
HB 3080
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 5.  ORS 477.281 is amended to read:
477.281. (1) The obligation of an owner of timberland or  grazing land for payment of assessments
and taxes for fire protection of forestland is limited to:
(a) The payment of  moneys pursuant to ORS 321.015 (2), 477.277, 477.295, 477.760 (4) and 477.880
to maintain the Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund  created under ORS  477.750 and the Wildfire
Suppression Fund created under section 2 of this 2019 Act ; and
(b) The payment of forest protection  district assessments pursuant to ORS 477.060 and 477.205
to 477.281.
(2) As used in this section, “obligation of an owner of  timberland or grazing land for payment
of assessments and taxes for  fire protection of forestland” does not include the duties or obligations
of the  owner under ORS 477.066, 477.068 or 477.120 or the obligations of an owner of land included
in a rural fire protection district pursuant to ORS 478.010.
SECTION 6.  ORS 321.005 is amended to read:
321.005. As used in ORS 321.005 to  321.185, 321.560 to 321.600 and 477.440 to 477.460, unless the
context requires otherwise:
[(1) “Board” means the State Board of Forestry. ]
[(2) “Protected  forestlands” means those lands which are protected from the starting or spread of
fire thereon or therefrom by: ]
[(a) The State Forester, with the approval of the board; ]
[(b) The United States of America through contract with the State Forester; ]
[(c) Any forest protective agency under contract with the State Forester or  the board pursuant to
ORS 477.406; or ]
[(d) Any forest protective agency, described in paragraph (c)  of this subsection, under an agreement
with the United States  of America wherein such agency agrees to protect specific federal forestlands
and, in return, the United States of America agrees to protect specific lands of such agency. ]
[(3) “Department” means the Department of Revenue. ]
[(4) “Committee” means the Emergency Fire Cost Committee. ]
[(5) “Forestland” means any land producing forest products. ]
(1) “Consumer Price  Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region” means the Consumer
Price Index for All  Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items) as published by the Bureau
of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
[(6)] (2) “Forest products” means products from harvested timber[ , but does  not include ] other
than products from short rotation fiber  grown under agricultural conditions as described in ORS
321.267 (3) or 321.824 (3), western juniper or products from harvested western juniper.
(3) “Forestland” means any land producing forest products.
[(7)] (4) “Harvest” means the point at which timber that  has been cut, severed, or removed for
purposes of sale or use is first measured in the ordinary course of business as  determined by refer-
ence to common practice in the timber industry.
[(8)] (5) “Merchantable stand of  timber” means any stand on forestlands containing living or
dead timber [ which] that is being or can be harvested.
(6) “Owner of timber” means any  individual or combination of individuals, partnership,
firm, corporation or association of whatever nature holding title  to harvested timber by
virtue of:
(a) An instrument of conveyance;
(b) The harvesting of the timber; or
[4]
HB 3080
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
(c) The harvesting of the timber and payment therefor.
[(9) “Taxpayer” means the owner of timber at time of harvest. ]
[(10)] (7) “Taxes” means the taxes provided for in ORS 321.015.
[(11) “Owner of  timber” means any individual or combination of individuals, partnership, firm,
corporation or association of whatever nature holding title to harvested timber by virtue of: ]
[(a) An instrument of conveyance; ]
[(b) The harvesting of the timber; or ]
[(c) The harvesting of the timber and payment therefor. ]
(8) “Taxpayer” means the owner of timber at time of harvest.
[(12)] (9) “Timber” means all logs [ which] that can be measured in board feet  and other forest
products as determined by Department of Revenue rule.
SECTION 7. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[5]