Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “wildlife conflict species”:
(a) Means all species of  wild cats, bears, weasels, raccoons, skunks, opossums, beavers,
porcupines, rabbits, eagles, hawks, vultures, owls and wild canines other than wolves.
(b) Does not mean wolves, deer or elk.
(2) The State Department of Agriculture shall establish  by rule a grant program for the
purpose of facilitating nonlethal deterrence of wildlife conflict species by farmers  and
ranchers.
(3) In administering the program, the department:
(a) Shall develop criteria for receiving a grant and a process for applying for a grant.
(b) Shall require a recipient of a grant to report to the department on  the use of the
grant funds and whether nonlethal deterrence was effective.
(c) May award a grant to a nonprofit entity, a county that has an established  program
for nonlethal deterrence of wildlife conflict species or a person engaged  in farming or
ranching, including a person who raises, keeps or  produces animals or crops for noncom-
mercial purposes.
(d) May not award a grant  to compensate for loss of livestock, as defined in ORS 609.125.
(4) Projects supported by a grant may include, but need not be limited to:
(a) Acquiring and keeping  a guard dog or other animal that deters a wildlife conflict
species.
(b) Building or enhancing fencing to prevent entrance  by a wildlife conflict species inside
the fencing.
(c) Acquiring or constructing birthing sheds  for livestock, as defined in ORS 609.125,
visual or acoustic scare devices or flow devices such as beaver pond levelers.
(d) Capturing a member of a wildlife conflict species in a nonlethal trap  and releasing the
live member of the  wildlife conflict species in another area, with prior approval from the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1073
HB 2689
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
department.
(5) The department shall annually review the grant program to assess to what  extent the
purpose described in subsection (2) of this section is  being achieved. The department shall
modify the process for  awarding grants as necessary to better achieve the purpose described
in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Wildlife Conflict Species Nonlethal Deterrence Fund is established
in the State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the
Wildlife Conflict Species Nonlethal Deterrence Fund shall be  credited to the fund. All moneys
in the fund are continuously appropriated  to the State Department of Agriculture for the
purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2021 Act.
(2) The fund shall consist of all moneys credited to the fund, including moneys  appropri-
ated or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to the State Department of Agriculture,  for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $______ for deposit
into the Wildlife Conflict Species Nonlethal Deterrence Fund established in  section 2 of this
2021 Act for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this 2021 Act are repealed on January 2, 2027.
(2) Any moneys remaining in the Wildlife Conflict  Species Nonlethal Deterrence Fund
that are unexpended and unobligated on the date of the repeal specified in subsection (1)  of
this section shall revert to the General Fund.
SECTION 5. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]