Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 427.191 is amended to read:
427.191. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Agency” means an agency or provider of agency with  choice services, as defined in
ORS 427.181, that hires, trains and supervises direct support professionals using  state funds re-
ceived from the Department of Human Services.
(b) “Attendant care  services” means services provided directly to an individual with a disability
to assist with activities of daily living, instrumental activities of daily living and  health-related
tasks.
(c) “Authorized hours” means the number of hours approved in an individualized  service
plan, as defined in ORS 427.101, for attendant care services.
[(c)] (d) “Child” means an individual under 18 years of age who:
(A) Has a developmental or intellectual disability; or
(B) Meets  the eligibility criteria to receive services under the Medically Fragile (Hospital)
Model Waiver or the Medically Involved Children’s Waiver approved  by the Centers for Medicare
and Medicaid Services under 42 U.S.C. 1396n(c).
[(d)] (e) “Client” means an individual who receives attendant care services.
[(e)] (f) “Client child” means a child who  receives attendant care services from the child’s par-
ent.
[(f)] (g) “Developmental disability services” has the meaning given that term in ORS 427.101.
[(g)] (h) “Direct support professional” means  an individual who is hired, employed, trained, paid
and supervised by an agency to provide attendant care services to a client of the agency.
[(h)] (i) “Nonparent caregiver” means a direct support professional, personal support worker or
similar provider who is paid to provide attendant care services to clients who are not  the provider’s
children.
[(i)] (j) “Parent” includes a:
(A) Natural or adoptive parent of a child;
(B) Stepparent of a child; and
(C) Legal guardian of a child.
[(j)(A) ] (k)(A) “Parent provider” means a parent who is paid to provide attendant  care services
to the parent’s minor child.
(B) “Parent provider” does not include  a parent who is paid to provide attendant care services
to [ a child ] an individual, related to the parent,  who is 18 years of age or older.
[(k)(A) ] (L)(A) “Personal support worker” means an individual who  is employed by a client or
the client’s representative and paid to provide attendant care services to the client.
(B) “Personal support worker” does not include a direct support professional.
[(L)] (m) “State plan” means Oregon’s state plan for medical assistance,  described in 42 U.S.C.
1396a, approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
[(m)] (n) “Very high behavioral needs” means a minor child’s extraordinary needs for  support
due to the child’s behavioral condition as indicated by a  federally approved functional needs as-
sessment adopted by the department that assigns the child to the highest service level.
[(n)] (o) “Very high medical needs” means a minor child’s extraordinary needs for support due
to the child’s medical condition as indicated by a federally approved  functional needs assessment
[2]
SB 538
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
adopted by the department that assigns the child to the highest service level.
(2) Subject to rules adopted under subsection  [(8)] (11) of this section[ ,] and to section 2, chapter
367, Oregon Laws 2023, [ and to available funding, ] the department shall administer  a program to
compensate parents to provide attendant care services to the parents’  children who have been as-
sessed by the department to have very high medical or very high behavioral needs.
(3) To be eligible for the program described in this section:
(a)(A) A parent provider  must be employed by an agency [ and not by the child or the other parent
of the child ]; and
[(b)] (B) The parent provider may not be paid to  provide attendant care services to the client
child by an agency that is owned by the parent, the  child or any family member or for which the
parent or other family member serves in  any administrative or leadership capacity, including as a
member of a board of directors; [ and] or
(b)(A) Another parent, and not the parent provider, must be the employer of record  for
the client child; or
(B) The parent provider must assign an alternative legal representative for the  client
child to make  decisions about or manage the development and implementation of the client
child’s individual support plan. The assignment must:
(i) Be on a form prescribed by the department; and
(ii) Clearly state that the assignment is limited to decisions regarding  the development
and implementation of the client child’s individual support plan  and does not limit the au-
thority of the parent provider  to make decisions for the client child with respect to health
care, education or religious training.
[(c)] (4) [ The] An agency employing [ the] a parent provider to provide  attendant care services
to [ the] a client child:
[(A)] (a) May not employ a parent provider as an independent contractor;  and
[(B)] (b) Shall pay  parent providers overtime at the same rate and under the same circumstances
as direct support professionals who are not parent providers[ ;].
[(C)] (5) Except  as authorized by the department by rule, [ may not pay providers of attendant care
services, including parent providers, ] a parent provider may not be paid:
(a) To provide services  to a minor child during school hours unless the minor child is tempo-
rarily at home recovering from surgery  or illness and the temporary absence from school is recom-
mended by the child’s health care provider; [ and] or
[(D)] (b) [May not pay  providers of attendant care services, including parent providers, ] To provide
services to a minor child during school hours due to the determination  of a school district or due
to the choice of a parent of the client child to:
[(i)] (A) Have the child  regularly attend school less than the number of school hours attended
by students without disabilities who are in the same grade and the  same school district as the client
child;
[(ii)] (B) Homeschool the client child; or
[(iii)] (C) Enroll  the client child in a private school that offers fewer school hours than the
school hours offered by the local public school to the majority of students  in the same grade as the
client  child.
[(4)] (6) Subsection [ (3)(c)(D)] (5)(b) of this section does not  prohibit a school district or other
entity from compensating parents of students with disabilities for providing  support for educational
activities that would otherwise be the responsibility of the school district.
[3]
SB 538
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(5)] (7) A  parent provider, during the hours that the parent provider is paid to provide one-on-
one attendant care services to the client child:
(a) May not be responsible for a vulnerable adult who requires physical care and monitoring;
(b) May not be responsible for the care of a child,  other than the client child, who is under 10
years of age  and shall have another caregiver immediately available at all times to attend to the
needs of the child; and
(c) Unless they  are included as a goal or service in the child’s individual support plan and re-
lated to the child’s disability-related support needs, may not perform  tasks that are not for the pri-
mary benefit of the client child, including but not limited to:
(A) Grocery shopping for the household;
(B) Housekeeping not required for the disability-related support needs of the client child;
(C) Remote work or operation of a home business; or
(D) Transporting individuals other than the client child to or from activities or appointments.
[(6) If  required by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the department may require a
parent provider to assign an alternative legal representative for  the client child to make decisions about
or manage the development and implementation of the client child’s individual support plan. The as-
signment:]
[(a) Must be on a form prescribed by the department; and ]
[(b) Must clearly state that the assignment is limited to decisions  regarding the development and
implementation of  the child’s individual support plan and does not limit the authority of the parent
provider to make decisions for the client child with respect  to health care, education or religious
training.]
(8) The  number of authorized hours that a parent provider may be paid to provide at-
tendant care services under the program described in this  section may not be limited except
by:
(a) The choice of the parent provider or the parent provider’s  inability to provide the
care;
(b) An agency that employs the parent provider;
(c) Any applicable collective bargaining agreement; or
(d) The client child.
(9) A nonparent caregiver  may be paid using funding available through the state’s Com-
munity First Choice Option under 42 U.S.C. 1396n(k).
[(7)] (10) A parent  provider is subject to the requirements of mandatory reporting of abuse under
ORS 124.060 and 419B.010, 24 hours per day, seven days per week.
[(8)] (11) The department shall adopt rules for the program described in this section using an
advisory committee appointed under ORS 183.333 that represents the  interests of parents, children
with developmental or intellectual disabilities, adults with  disabilities, agencies, organizations of
direct support professionals  and personal support workers and organizations that advocate for per-
sons with disabilities. The rules must include all of the following:
(a) Strategies  to safeguard nonparent caregivers and avoid the displacement of nonparent
caregivers by parent providers;
(b) Requirements for  agencies to demonstrate consistent efforts to recruit, train and retain
nonparent caregivers;
(c) Training requirements for:
(A) Parent  providers regarding federal and state administrative rules regulating home-based and
[4]
SB 538
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
community-based services, including the impact of the rules on parent-child  relationships with re-
spect to discipline, supervision, physical intervention  and self-determination of client children during
the hours that the parent provider is being paid to provide attendant care services;
(B) Client children  to learn to advocate for themselves with respect to choosing and managing
direct  support  professionals or personal support workers  before and after reaching 18 years of
age; and
(C) Community developmental disability programs related to the employment of parent providers,
including on how to support families to manage issues concerning  conflicts of interest, provider
recruitment and retention and the empowerment of the client child to have a meaningful  voice in
the selection of the client child’s direct support professionals  or personal support workers ;
(d) A process for a client child to object  to the hiring of any caregiver, including the child’s
parent, or to raise concerns about a provider’s caregiving;
(e) Procedures to ensure that the program described in this section is implemented consistently
and equitably throughout this state;
(f) A requirement  that any appeal related to the requirements of or benefits under the program
is the sole responsibility of the central office staff of the department; and
(g) Other requirements that the department deems necessary to carry out the provisions of  this
section.
[(9)] (12) The department may adopt rules necessary to  manage the cost, size and growth rate
of the program described in this section that are necessary to protect the eligibility for  and levels
of services under programs serving  individuals receiving developmental disability services provided
for in the  state plan, [ including the development of ] except by developing criteria to limit the num-
ber of children eligible to participate in the program.
[(10)] (13) Annually, the department shall report to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related  to human services or, if the Legislative Assembly is in session, to the committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to human  services, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, up-
dates on the program described in this section, including:
(a) The number of client children receiving attendant care services, the number  of children re-
ceiving the services from parent providers and the number  of children receiving the services from
nonparent caregivers;
(b) The number of hours of attendant care  services provided by parent providers and number
of hours of attendant care services provided by nonparent caregivers;
(c) A comparison of the cost per child of providing attendant care services  by parent providers
under the program with the cost per child of providing attendant care services by  nonparent
caregivers; and
(d) A report on the adequacy  of the direct care workforce in this state to provide services to
all children with developmental disability services who are eligible for attendant care services.
(14) Any moneys appropriated to the department by the Legislative Assembly  for the
purpose of compensating parent providers or  for the staffing necessary for compensating
parent providers under this section may not be used by the department  for any other pur-
pose.
SECTION 2.
 Section 2, chapter 367, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) Except as provided in section 4 [ of this 2023 Act ], chapter 367, Oregon Laws 2023,
the Department of Human Services may not administer the program described in  [ section 1 of this
2023 Act ] ORS 427.191 without the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services’ approval of a
[5]
SB 538
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
[new] waiver or amendments to an existing waiver  or without other arrangements with the Cen-
ters for Medicare and Medicaid Services to receive federal financial  participation in the costs of the
program during a state of emergency or a public health emergency.  No later than January 1, 2026,
the department shall pursue federal financial participation by means of any  available federal
authority, including but not limited to a waiver or an amendment to  a waiver under section
1915(c) of the Social Security Act or a waiver under section 1115 of the Social Security Act.
(2) The department may not administer a program that pays a parent to provide attendant  care
or personal care services  to the parent’s minor child, including but not limited to the program de-
scribed in [ section 1 of this 2023 Act ] ORS 427.191, using General Fund moneys that are not matched
by federal Medicaid funds.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[6]