Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,544,500 for distribution to  the City of St.
Helens to continue  the feasibility evaluation, initiate permitting and site characterization
efforts,  and conduct proof of concept analyses for the City of St. Helens central waterfront
redevelopment and Portland Harbor cleanup support project.
SECTION 2. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3453