Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 247.017 is amended to read:
247.017. (1) The Secretary of State shall by rule establish a schedule by  which the Department
of Transportation and the State Department of Fish and Wildlife  shall provide to the secretary
electronic  records  containing the legal name, age, residence and citizenship information for, and the
electronic signature of, each person who meets qualifications identified by the secretary by rule.
(2) Upon receiving the electronic record for, and electronic signature of, a  person described in
subsection (1) of this section, the Secretary of  State shall provide the information to the county
clerk of the county in which the person may  be registered as an elector. The secretary or county
clerk shall notify each person of the process to:
(a) Decline being registered as an elector.
(b) Adopt a political party affiliation.
(3) If a person notified under subsection (2)  of this section does not decline to be registered as
an elector within 21 calendar days after the Secretary of State or county  clerk issues the notifica-
tion, the person’s electronic record and electronic signature submitted under  subsection (1) of this
section will constitute a completed registration card for the person for  purposes of this chapter. The
person shall be registered to  vote if the county clerk determines that the person is qualified to vote
under Article II, section 2, of the Oregon Constitution, and the person is not  already registered to
vote.
(4) A county clerk may not send a ballot  to, or add to an elector registration list, a person who
meets eligibility requirements until at least 21 calendar days after the Secretary of State or  county
clerk provided notification to the person as described in subsection (2) of this section.
(5) In addition to providing electronic records to the  Secretary of State under subsection (1) of
this section, the Department of  Transportation and the State Department of Fish and Wildlife
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3880
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
may by rule develop, and require the availability or use of, any form or application  the department
determines is necessary to ensure compliance with the voter registration  provisions of the National
Voter Registration Act of 1993 (P.L. 103-31).
(6) The Secretary of State shall adopt rules required to implement  subsections (1) to (4) of this
section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 247.002, as amended by section 3, chapter 492, Oregon Laws 2023,  is amended
to read:
247.002. As used in this chapter:
(1) “County clerk” means the county clerk or the county official in charge of elections.
(2) “Elector” means an individual qualified to vote under Article II, section 2, Oregon  Consti-
tution.
(3) “Registration card” means:
(a) A state voter registration card approved by the Secretary of State under ORS 247.171;
(b) A federal voter registration application form prescribed  by the Federal Election Commission
pursuant to the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (P.L. 103-31);
(c) An electronic record containing an individual’s legal name, age, residence and  citizenship
information and electronic signature submitted to the Department of Transportation or the  State
Department of Fish and Wildlife in the manner described in ORS 247.017; or
(d) An electronic record containing an individual’s legal name, age, residence and citizenship
information submitted to the Oregon Health Authority in the manner described in ORS 247.018.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 247.012, as amended by section 4, chapter 492, Oregon Laws 2023,  is amended
to read:
247.012. (1) A qualified person may register to vote or update a registration to vote by:
(a) Delivering by mail, having a person deliver or otherwise delivering  a completed registration
card to any county clerk, the Secretary of State, any office of the Department of Transportation or
any designated voter registration agency as described in ORS 247.208;
(b) Personally delivering, or having a person deliver, the card  to an official designated by a
county clerk under subsection (7) of this section;
(c) Submitting the person’s legal name, age, residence and citizenship information  and electronic
signature to the Department of Transportation  or the State Department of Fish and Wildlife ;
(d) Submitting  the person’s legal name, age, residence and citizenship information to the Oregon
Health Authority for use in the Oregon Health Plan; or
(e) Completing a  registration card using the electronic voter registration system described in
ORS 247.019.
(2) If a registration card is mailed or delivered to:
(a) Any person other than a county clerk or the Secretary of State, the  person shall forward the
card to a county clerk or the Secretary of State not later  than the fifth day after receiving the card;
or
(b) The Secretary of State or a county clerk for a county other  than the county in which the
person applying for registration  resides, the Secretary of State or county clerk shall forward the
card to the county clerk for the county in which the person  resides not later than the fifth day after
receiving the card.
(3) Registration of a qualified person occurs:
(a) When a legible, accurate and  complete registration card is received in the office of any
county clerk, the Office of the Secretary of  State, an office of the Department of Transportation, a
[2]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
designated voter registration agency under ORS 247.208  or at a location designated by a county
clerk under subsection (7) of this section;
(b) On the date a registration  card is postmarked if the card is received after the 21st day im-
mediately preceding an election but is  postmarked not later than the 21st day immediately preceding
the election and is addressed to an office of any county  clerk, the Office of the Secretary of State,
an office of the Department  of Transportation or any designated voter registration agency as de-
scribed in ORS 247.208; or
(c) In  the case of a registration card missing a date of birth, containing an incomplete date of
birth or containing an unintentional scrivener’s error that is supplied or corrected as described  in
subsection (4) or (6) of this section, on the date that registration would  have occurred if the regis-
tration card had not been missing the date of birth, contained  an incomplete date of birth or con-
tained the scrivener’s error.
(4)(a)(A) Except as provided in ORS 247.125, if a registration card is  legible, accurate and con-
tains, at  a minimum, the registrant’s name, residence address, date of birth and signature, the county
clerk shall register the person.
(B) The county clerk  shall register a person pursuant to ORS 247.018, regardless of whether the
person’s registration card contains a signature, if the person’s registration card is  legible, accurate
and contains, at a minimum, the registrant’s name, residence address and date of birth.
(b) If the information required under paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection is missing  from the
registration card or the date of birth is incomplete,  or if the signature of a person described in
paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection has not been submitted, the county  clerk shall attempt to obtain
the missing or incomplete information from all sources available to  the county clerk, including but
not limited to current and previous  addresses and phone numbers of the registrant. The county clerk
may also  supply the registrant’s date of birth from any previous registration of the registrant. If the
missing or incomplete information cannot be obtained from sources  available to the county clerk,
the county clerk  shall use reasonable efforts to contact the registrant by phone, mail and electronic
mail to obtain the missing or incomplete information.
(5) If a registration card meets  the requirements of subsection (4) of this section but is missing
an indication of political party affiliation, the registrant  shall be considered not affiliated with any
political party. This subsection does not apply if an elector is updating a registration.
(6) If a registration card contains an unintentional scrivener’s error,  the county clerk may at-
tempt to contact the person to correct the error.
(7) A county clerk may appoint officials to accept registration of persons at designated locations.
The appointments and locations shall be in writing and filed in the office of the county clerk. The
county clerk shall be responsible for the performance of duties by those appointed.
(8) A registration card received and accepted under this  section shall be considered an active
registration.
(9) A registration may be updated at any time.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 247.014, as amended by section 6, chapter 492, Oregon Laws 2023,  is amended
to read:
247.014. In implementing ORS 247.012, 247.017, 247.018 and 247.171, the Department of Trans-
portation , [ and] the Oregon Health Authority  and the State Department  of Fish and Wildlife
shall take steps reasonably necessary to allow transfer of voter  registration information by elec-
tronic or magnetic medium.
SECTION 5. (1) The amendments to ORS 247.002, 247.012, 247.014  and 247.017 by sections
[3]
SB 1046
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
1 to 4 of this 2025 Act become operative on June 1, 2027.
(2) The Secretary of State, the  State Department of Fish and Wildlife and the county
clerks may  take any action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion that is necessary for the Secretary of State, the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife
and the county clerks to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection  (1)
of this section, all of the  duties, functions and powers conferred on the Secretary of State,
the State Department of Fish  and Wildlife and the county clerks by the amendments to ORS
247.002, 247.012, 247.014 and 247.017 by sections 1 to 4 of this 2025 Act.
[4]