Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Transportation is authorized to enter into agreements
with other  jurisdictions related to mutual planning for improved passenger rail service, in-
cluding ultra-high-speed ground  transportation, within the Cascades Rail Corridor. Any
agreement related to ultra-high-speed ground  transportation in this state must include pro-
viding service to Eugene. The department may adopt rules  necessary to implement any
agreement established under this section.
(2) The department may not  expend in any biennium more than 50 percent, or $1 million,
whichever is less,  of the moneys available to the department for passenger rail service, on
ultra-high-speed ground transportation.
SECTION 2. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2896
HB 2691
1
2
3
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]