Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 315.
SECTION 2. (1) A resident or nonresident individual shall be  allowed a credit against the
taxes otherwise due under  ORS chapter 316 for fees required in order to become licensed as
a substitute teacher.
(2) The credit allowed under this section:
(a) Shall be in the amount of any fees required for licensing as a substitute teacher in
this state and paid by the taxpayer during the  tax year to the Teacher Standards and Prac-
tices Commission or a comparable regulatory body.
(b) Shall be claimed on a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue  that contains
the information required by the department.
(c) May not exceed the  tax liability of the taxpayer and may not be carried forward to
another tax year.
(3) A nonresident shall be  allowed the credit under this section in the proportion provided
in ORS 316.117. If a change in the status of a taxpayer  from resident to nonresident or from
nonresident to resident occurs, the credit  allowed by this section shall be determined in a
manner consistent with ORS 316.117.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1732