Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 205.320 is amended to read:
205.320. (1) In every county there shall be  charged and collected in advance by the county clerk,
for the benefit of the county, the following fees, and no more, for the following purposes and  ser-
vices:
(a) For filing and making entry when required by law of any instrument required  or permitted
by law to be filed, when it is not recorded, $5 for each page.
(b) For filing and making  entry of the assignment or satisfaction of any filed, but not recorded,
instrument, $5 for each page.
(c) For each official certificate, [ $3.75] $5.
(d)(A) For recording any instrument  required or permitted by law to be recorded, $10 for the
first page and $5 for each  additional page[ , but the minimum fee shall not be less than $5 ]. As used
in this subparagraph, “page” means one side  of a sheet 14 inches, or less, long and 8-1/2 inches, or
less, wide.
(B) For supplying to private parties copies of  records or files, including by electronic delivery
of images,  not more than [ $3.75] $5 for locating a record requested by the party and 25 cents for
each page. As used in this subparagraph, “page” means  one side of a sheet 14 inches, or less, long
and 8-1/2 inches, or less, wide.
(C) For each official certificate, [ $3.75] $5.
(e) For taking an affidavit for and making  and issuing a marriage license and registering the
return of the license, or for taking an  affidavit for and registering a Declaration of Domestic Part-
nership, [ $25] $35.
(f) For solemnizing a marriage under ORS 106.120, $117. This paragraph  does not require that
the county clerk charge a fee for solemnizing a marriage after normal working hours or  on Satur-
days or legal holidays. This paragraph does not prohibit a county clerk  from charging and accepting
a personal payment for solemnizing a marriage if otherwise authorized by ORS 106.120.
(g) For taking and certifying acknowledgment or  proof of execution of any instrument, the fee
established in the schedule adopted by the Secretary of State under ORS 194.400.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2018
HB 3383
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
(h) For issuing any license required by law, other than a marriage or liquor license, and for
which no fee is otherwise provided by law, $5.
(i) For any service the clerk may be required or authorized  to perform and for which no fee is
provided by law, such fees as may favorably compare with those established by  this section for
similar services and as may be established  by order or rule of the county court or board of county
commissioners.
(j) For  recording any instrument under ORS 205.130 (2), as required by ordinance pursuant to
ORS 203.148.
(k) In addition to and not in lieu of the fees charged under paragraph (d)  of this subsection, for
each additional municipal assessment lien recorded under ORS 93.643, $5.
(L) In addition to and not in lieu of the fees charged  under paragraph (d) of this subsection, for
each additional assignment, release or satisfaction of any recorded instrument, $5.
(m) In addition to and not in lieu  of the fees charged under paragraph (d) of this subsection, for
each additional transaction described under ORS 205.236, $5.
(n) In addition to and not in lieu of the fees charged under paragraph (d)  of this subsection, for
each additional lien recorded under ORS 311.675, $5.
(o) For preparing and recording the certificate under ORS 517.280, $20 or such other fee  that
is established by the county governing body.
(p) In addition to and not in lieu of the fees charged under paragraph (d) of  this subsection, for
each additional claim listed on an affidavit of annual compliance under ORS 517.210, $5.
(q) In addition to and not in lieu of the fees charged under paragraph (d) of  this subsection, for
each additional name listed on a cooperative contract under ORS 62.360 (2) or for  recording the
termination of a cooperative contract under ORS 62.360 (4), $5.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law, five percent of any fee or  tax that is not collected for the
benefit of the county clerk shall be deducted from the fee or tax. The moneys deducted shall  be
expended for acquiring storage and  retrieval systems, payment of expenses incurred in collecting the
fee or tax and maintaining and restoring records as authorized by the county clerk.  Moneys col-
lected under this subsection  shall be deposited in a county clerk records fund established by the
county governing body. No moneys shall be deducted under this subsection from:
(a) Fees collected for the Domestic Violence Fund under ORS 106.045.
(b) Fees collected for conciliation services under ORS 107.615.
(c) Real estate transfer taxes enacted prior to January 1, 1998.
(d) Fees collected under ORS 205.323 for the Oregon Land Information System Fund.
(e) Fees collected under  ORS 205.323 (1)(c) for the housing-related programs listed in ORS
294.187 (2)(b).
SECTION 2.
 ORS 205.327 is amended to read:
205.327. When an instrument required or permitted by law to be recorded is  presented to a
county clerk for recording, if the instrument does not comply  with the requirements of ORS 205.232
or 205.234, the county clerk shall record the instrument, but shall charge  and collect in advance a
penalty of [ $20] $30. The penalty authorized  and collected under this section is in addition to and
not in lieu of the fees charged under ORS 205.320 for recording the instrument.
[2]