Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1)(a) There is established  under the authority of the State Land Board the
Office of the State Prosecutor. The board shall, by a vote of a  majority of the members of
the board, appoint  a person to serve as the State Prosecutor. At the time of the appoint-
ment, the appointee must have been admitted to practice in the Supreme Court of Oregon.
(b) The State Prosecutor serves at the pleasure of  the board and may be removed by the
board for good cause,  or without cause with 60 days’ advance notice of removal. If there is
a vacancy for any reason, the board shall make an appointment within 60 days.
(c) The State Prosecutor shall be compensated at a rate equivalent to that  of a district
attorney and shall be reimbursed for all reasonable travel  and other expenses incurred in the
performance of official duties.
(2) The State Prosecutor may take full  charge of any investigation or prosecution of a
violation of law in which the circuit court has jurisdiction that occurs in a city with a pop-
ulation that exceeds 300,000.
(3) The State Prosecutor may:
(a) Hire deputy state prosecutors and investigators to carry out the duties of the office;
(b) Prescribe the qualifications and duties of persons hired by the State Prosecutor; and
(c) Fix the compensation, including reasonable travel and other expenses  incurred in the
performance of official duties, of persons hired by the State Prosecutor.
(4) When acting under this section, the State  Prosecutor shall have all the powers of a
district attorney, including the power to issue or cause to be issued  subpoenas or other
process. The State Prosecutor may, with  or without the concurrence of the district attor-
ney, direct a grand  jury to convene for investigation and consideration of criminal matters.
The State  Prosecutor may take full charge of the presentation of evidence to the grand jury,
and may issue subpoenas,  prepare indictments and perform all other functions to the same
extent as the district attorney.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Land Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, out of the General
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 797
HB 2415
1
2
3
4
Fund, the amount of $
, for the purposes of funding  the Office of the State
Prosecutor established by section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on December 31, 2029.
[2]