Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Fish and Wildlife  Commission shall establish a program that
awards $5 for each taking of a smallmouth bass in the Coquille River.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Fish and Wildlife Commission, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended  for establishing the
program described in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2028