Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Water Resources Department shall establish a pilot program  to de-
termine the feasibility of making Columbia River water available in critical  ground water
areas of the Umatilla River  Basin to reduce depletion of, and allow recovery of, underground
aquifers.
(2) To the extent practicable, the department shall make Columbia River water available
for the pilot program by promoting, expediting and providing support  and assistance for
conservation projects and  efforts by holders of existing Columbia River water rights.
Notwithstanding ORS 537.470 (3), any conserved water that is allocated to the state shall, for
the duration of the pilot program, be  used solely for pilot program purposes. A holder of an
existing Columbia River water right  may lease conserved water described in this subsection
that is allocated to the holder under ORS 537.470 to the department for a period that  does
not exceed the duration of the pilot program.  The leasing of conserved water to the depart-
ment under this section is a  beneficial use of the water by the holder and may not be con-
sidered nonuse for purposes of abandonment or forfeiture of the water right.
(3) The department shall identify the critical ground water areas of the  Umatilla River
Basin that are accessible by existing water pumping infrastructure. The  department shall
offer to provide holders of water rights in accessible critical  ground water areas with
Columbia River water conserved under subsection (2) of this section in  exchange for the
holders appropriating a reduced amount of ground water under the water rights. The de-
partment may not require a holder  of a water right in a critical ground water area to par-
ticipate in the program or require that participating holder to reduce appropriation of ground
water by an amount that exceeds the amount of Columbia River water supplied to the  holder
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3200
HB 2819
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
under the pilot  program. A reduction in ground water appropriation under this subsection
is a beneficial use  of the ground water by the holder of the water right and may not be
considered nonuse for purposes of abandonment or forfeiture of the  water right. The de-
partment may not allow ground water that is unappropriated pursuant to an exchange  under
this subsection to be put to other use.
(4) The  department shall monitor changes in aquifer levels in critical ground water areas
where appropriation of ground water has been reduced under the pilot program.  The de-
partment may conduct additional monitoring that the department considers appropriate  for
determining the effect of the pilot program.
SECTION 2. The Water Resources Department shall report to an  interim committee of
the Legislative Assembly relating to natural resources, in the manner provided under ORS
192.245, no later than September 15th each year  regarding the pilot program required under
section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3.
Section 1 of this 2019 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 4. Section 2 of this 2019 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $500,000, which may be expended by the department for  grants
to Umatilla County  and Morrow County for the purpose of activities related to the imple-
mentation and operation  of the department pilot program required under section 1 of this
2019 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
[2]