Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS chapter 279B.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Common off-the-shelf software” means a  predeveloped software product or service
that is commercially available for  a broad user base, has a standardized set of features and
does not otherwise require  extensive customization for use on most common information
technology platforms or in most common information technology environments.
(b) “Information technology marketplace portal” means a  structured and curated digital
catalog from which a contracting agency can identify, select,  purchase and obtain or receive
delivery of common off-the-shelf software and other standardized  information technology
products and services at predetermined prices and discounts.
(2) A contracting agency shall purchase  common off-the-shelf software, or other infor-
mation technology products or services that do not require extensive customization to meet
the contracting agency’s specifications, from an  information technology marketplace portal
if:
(a) The State Chief Information Officer has preapproved  the information technology
marketplace portal for use under subsection (3) of this section;
(b) The contracting agency’s  specifications for the information technology do not require
extensive customization;
(c) The price, applicable discounts, time of delivery or other terms and conditions  related
to the purchase are more  favorable to the contracting agency than other purchase methods
would be; and
(d) The total  value of the purchase does not exceed a cap that the State Chief Informa-
tion Officer specifies by rule.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4069
SB 1088
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
(3) The State  Chief Information Officer shall select by means of a competitive process,
and preapprove for use by  contracting agencies, one or more information technology mar-
ketplace portals that the State Chief Information  Officer determines will provide the best
value to the state. An information technology marketplace portal that the State Chief In-
formation Officer selects and preapproves must, at a minimum, offer:
(a) Software, data and services that  contracting agencies require for common business
tasks;
(b) Products and services from  both the person that provides and maintains the infor-
mation technology marketplace portal and, on an equal  basis and without favor or discrimi-
nation, from third parties, including third parties that are headquartered in, have a  principal
place of business in or are otherwise based in this state;
(c) Competitive pricing and a sufficiently large and wide range of products  or services
necessary to meet the needs of contracting agencies in this  state, including software, soft-
ware as a service, professional services, large datasets, machine learning algorithms and
images;
(d) Extensive capability for searching and filtering by price, features, vendor  or product
name, platform, feature set, compliance standard and other appropriate selection criteria;
(e) Transactional capability for  immediate purchases that allows for accepting purchase
orders, negotiated contracts and a variety of payment instruments;
(f) A high level of security and  confidentiality and an ability to view and verify the use
of security protocols that apply to searches and purchases; and
(g) Any other features the State Chief Information Officer specifies by rule.
(4) A contracting agency’s purchase by means of an information  technology marketplace
portal under subsection (2) of this  section is not subject to the provisions of ORS 279B.055,
279B.060, 279B.070 or 279B.075.
SECTION 3.
The State Chief Information Officer shall conclude  the competitive process
described in section 2 (3) of this 2025 Act not later than December 31,  2026, and shall approve
an information technology marketplace portal for contracting agencies to  use not later than
January 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]