Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 33.410 is amended to read:
33.410. (1) Application for change of name of  a person may be heard and determined by the
probate court or, if the circuit court is not the probate court, the circuit court if  its jurisdiction has
been extended to include  this section pursuant to ORS 3.275 of the county in which the person re-
sides. The court shall grant the  change of name [ shall be granted by the court ] unless the court
finds that the change is not consistent with the public interest.
(2) If an applicant for change of name has been convicted of a felony or a  Class A
misdemeanor or the highest level misdemeanor in another jurisdiction, the  court shall de-
termine whether the change of name  is consistent with the public interest according to the
standards and procedures set forth in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2. (1) An applicant for change of name under ORS 33.410 who  has been con-
victed of  a felony or a Class A misdemeanor or the highest level misdemeanor in another
jurisdiction shall serve the application on the prosecuting attorney for the jurisdiction of the
conviction. The prosecuting attorney shall make a reasonable attempt to  notify any victims
related to the conviction. The  court may not hear the application for change of name sooner
than 30 days after the date of service on the prosecuting attorney under this section.
(2) A court may not grant a change of name under ORS 33.410  to an applicant who has
been convicted of a felony or a Class A misdemeanor or  the highest level misdemeanor in
another jurisdiction unless:
(a) The court has reviewed the criminal background of the applicant; and
(b) The applicant proves by clear  and convincing evidence that the change of name is
necessary.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 432.235 is amended to read:
432.235. (1) A vital record  registered under this chapter must be amended or corrected in ac-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 628
HB 2309
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cordance with this section or rules adopted by the State Registrar of the Center for Health Statistics
for the purpose of protecting the integrity and accuracy of vital records.
(2)(a) A vital record that is amended or corrected under this  section shall indicate that it has
been amended or corrected, except as otherwise provided in this section or  by rule of the state
registrar.
(b) The state registrar shall keep and maintain:
(A) Documentation that identifies the evidence upon which an amendment or correction is based;
(B) The date of the amendment or correction; and
(C) The  identity of the individual authorized by the Center for Health Statistics that made the
amendment or correction.
(3)(a) Upon the request of an applicant who is 18  years of age or older or an emancipated minor,
or if the  applicant is not 18 years of age or older or an emancipated minor, upon the request of an
applicant’s parent, legal guardian or legal representative, the  state registrar shall amend a record
of live birth that occurred in this state to change the name of the applicant if[ :]
[(A)] the state registrar receives a certified copy of an order from a  court of competent juris-
diction changing the name of the applicant[ ; or ]
[(B) The state registrar receives a request,  on a form prescribed by the state registrar, from the
applicant to change the name that includes: ]
[(i) Documentation sufficient, as prescribed by the state registrar by  rule, to allow the state
registrar to confirm the identity of the applicant and identify the correct record of live birth to  be
amended; and]
[(ii) A statement signed by the  applicant in which the applicant attests, as prescribed by the state
registrar by rule, to making the request for the purpose of affirming the applicant’s gender identity ].
(b) Upon request, the state registrar shall amend a record of live birth that  occurred in this
state to change the sex of an  applicant if the applicant is 18 years of age or older or an emancipated
minor, or if the applicant is not 18 years of age or older or an emancipated minor, the  applicant’s
parent, legal guardian or legal representative makes the request, and if:
(A) The state registrar receives a certified copy of  an order from a court of competent juris-
diction changing the sex of the applicant; or
(B) The state registrar receives a request, on a form prescribed by the state  registrar, from the
applicant to change the sex that includes:
(i) Documentation sufficient, as prescribed by the state registrar by  rule, to allow the state
registrar to confirm the identity of the applicant  and identify the correct record of live birth to be
amended;
(ii) A statement signed by the applicant in which the applicant attests, as prescribed by the state
registrar by rule, to making the request for  the purpose of affirming the applicant’s gender identity;
and
(iii) Any other documentation as required by the state registrar by rule.
(4)(a) When an applicant to amend a vital record does not  submit the minimum documentation
required to make  an amendment, or when the state registrar has cause to question the validity or
adequacy of an application to amend a  vital record, the state registrar, in the state registrar’s dis-
cretion, may refuse to amend the vital record. If the state registrar refuses to amend  a vital record
under this subsection, the state registrar shall:
(A) Enter an order denying the amendment and stating the reasons for the denial; and
(B) Advise the applicant of the applicant’s right to appeal the order under ORS 183.484.
[2]
HB 2309
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
(b) The state registrar may  not amend a record of live birth to change [ the name of an applicant
under subsection (3)(a)(B) or ] the sex of  an applicant under subsection (3)(b)(B) of this section more
than once.
(5) When an amendment is made to a record of marriage or a  record of domestic partnership
by the county clerk  or other county official who issues marriage licenses and registers domestic
partnerships, or when an amendment  changes the name, date of birth or birthplace of a party to a
judgment or final  order of a dissolution of marriage or dissolution of domestic partnership by a court
of competent jurisdiction, copies  of the amendment must be forwarded to the state registrar and the
state registrar shall amend the related record.
(6) If a judgment or final order of dissolution  of marriage or dissolution of domestic partnership
is set aside by a court of competent jurisdiction, a copy of the notice setting aside the judgment  or
order must be forwarded to the state registrar and the state registrar  shall void the related record.
SECTION 4.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 33.410 by  section 1
of this 2025 Act apply to applications for change  of name filed on or after the effective date
of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. The amendments  to ORS 432.235 by section 3 of this 2025 Act apply to re-
quests to amend a record of live birth made on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[3]