Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As  used in this section, “telecommunications tower” includes a personal
wireless service facility, a broadcast communications facility and other technological com-
munications facilities.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 526.194, the State  Board of Forestry shall lease lands owned or
managed by the board or the State  Forestry Department in Clatsop County and Tillamook
County for the installation, maintenance and operation of telecommunications towers at  the
rate of $1,500 per lease per year.
(3) Moneys derived from a lease under this section shall be  paid and credited as described
in ORS 526.194.
(4) The board shall adopt  rules to implement this section, including rules governing the
placement of the telecommunications towers.
SECTION 2.
 Section 1 of this 2025 Act is amended to read:
(1) As used in this section, “telecommunications tower” includes a personal wireless  service fa-
cility, a broadcast communications facility and other technological communications facilities.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 526.194,  the State Board of Forestry shall lease lands owned or man-
aged by the board or  the State Forestry Department in Clatsop County and Tillamook County for
the installation, maintenance and operation of telecommunications towers at [ the rate of $1,500 per
lease per year ] rates that are consistent with rates for leasing land in a federal  forest for the
installation, maintenance and operation of a telecommunications tower .
(3) Moneys derived from a lease under this section shall be paid and credited as described in
ORS 526.194.
(4) The board shall adopt rules to implement  this section, including rules governing the place-
ment of the telecommunications towers.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1259
HB 3251
1
2
3
4
5
SECTION 3.
The amendments to section 1 of this 2025 Act by section 2 of this 2025  Act
become operative on January 2, 2036.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]