Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “adversely impacted school district” means a
school district for which the average daily membership, as  defined in ORS 327.006, decreased
by 25 percent or more as compared to the  2019-2020 school year as the result of wildfires in
2020.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 327.013, the ADMw for an  adversely impacted school district
shall equal the greater of:
(a) The school district’s ADMw; or
(b) The school district’s ADMw for the 2019-2020 school year.
(3) The provisions of subsection (2) of  this section apply whenever ADMw is calculated
under ORS 327.013 for the purpose of distributing state moneys to school  districts, including
distributions of the State School Fund and the Fund for Student Success.
SECTION 2.
(1) Section 1 of this 2021 Act applies to distributions of the State School
Fund and the Fund for Student Success commencing with the 2020-2021 distributions.
(2) The Department of Education shall  adjust the distributions to a school district to
reflect any differences between distributions  made before the effective date of this 2021 Act
and the amount calculated for distributions as provided by section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on July 1, 2023.
SECTION 4. The repeal of  section 1 of this 2021 Act by section 3 of this 2021 Act applies
to distributions of  the State School Fund and the Fund for Student Success commencing with
the 2023-2024 distributions.
SECTION 5. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3067