Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 468A.490 is amended to read:
468A.490. (1) There is established  within the State Treasury a fund known as the Residential
Solid Fuel Heating Air Quality Improvement Fund, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) All moneys appropriated  or received as gifts or grants for the purposes of this section shall
be credited to the Residential Solid Fuel Heating Air Quality Improvement Fund.
(3) The State Treasurer may invest and reinvest the moneys in the fund as provided in  ORS
293.701 to 293.857. Interest from the moneys deposited  in the fund and earnings from investment of
the moneys in the fund shall accrue to the fund.
(4) All moneys in  the fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of Environmental
Quality to:
(a) Pay all costs incurred by the  department for evaluating projects and programs, including
projects and programs proposed by local communities  or qualifying organizations, for project man-
agement and oversight of funds awarded for projects  and programs selected in accordance with this
section and for documenting the benefit to air quality from such projects;
(b) Fund the program established under subsection (5) of this section;
(c) Fund activities to enhance enforcement of ORS 468A.460 to 468A.515;
(d) Fund public education programs related to compliance with ORS 468A.460 to 468A.515; and
(e) Fund public education programs related to the benefits of the  use of solid fuel burning de-
vices certified pursuant to ORS 468A.460 to 468A.515.
(5) The department shall use moneys available under subsection (4) of this section  to establish
a program designed to reduce  the emission of air contaminants by providing grants, loans , rebates
or other subsidies for the replacement or removal of solid fuel burning devices  that were not certi-
fied by  the department pursuant to ORS 468A.465. In addition to any other requirements established
by rules adopted by the Environmental Quality Commission, the program shall provide that:
(a) All forms  of new high-efficiency, low air contaminant-emitting heating systems are allowed,
except vent-free heating appliances;
(b) Any solid fuel burning device removed under the program must be destroyed;
(c) Any replacement device selected under the program must  be installed in conformance with
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 980
HB 2124
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
building code requirements and the manufacturer’s specifications including but not limited to  vent-
ing specifications; and
(d) To be eligible, program participants shall participate  in any home energy audit program
provided at no  charge to the homeowner and shall obtain all information available regarding subsi-
dies for cost-effective weatherization. The department  shall make the information required in this
subsection readily available to program participants.
(6) The department may enter into an agreement with a local government or a regional author-
ity in order to implement the program established under subsection (5) of this section.
[2]