Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 458.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Eligible entity” means a local government, local housing authority, nonprofit organ-
ization, federally recognized Indian tribe in this state, regional or  statewide nonprofit hous-
ing assistance organization or community action agency.
(b) “Grant program recipient” means an eligible entity that has been awarded  a grant
from the Housing and Community Services Department under this section.
(c) “Nonprofit organization”  means an organization or group of organizations that is de-
scribed in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue  Code and is exempt from income tax
under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(d) “Repair and rehabilitation” includes actions that:
(A) Maximize energy efficiency of residences;
(B) Extend the usable life of the residences; or
(C) Improve the health and safety of the occupants of the residences.
(e)(A) “Residence” means a single-family  residence owned by, and occupied as the pri-
mary residence of, an  individual who is a member of a household with an income at or below
area median income.
(B) “Residence” includes a site-built home, manufactured home, permanently fixed  resi-
dential trailer or condominium unit.
(2) The Housing and Community Services Department shall distribute grants to eligible
entities for homeownership assistance programs that provide  financial assistance for the
repair and rehabilitation of residences.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2148
SB 276
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
(3) To be  eligible to receive grants from the department, an eligible entity must establish
that it:
(a) Is operating, or will operate, a homeownership assistance program;
(b) Has the capacity to administer grant funds received under this section; and
(c) Is able to comply with the requirements of all state and federal laws, rules and reg-
ulations.
(4)(a) The department may establish  the nature and extent of the repair and rehabili-
tation that may be funded by eligible entities under this section.
(b) The  department may give preference to eligible entities that market services to
communities of color.
(5) Upon being awarded a grant under this section, the  grant program recipient shall
enter into an agreement with the department that contains provisions that:
(a) Indicate the purposes for which the grant funds may be used;
(b) Permit the department to conduct audits and monitoring of the grant program re-
cipient regarding the purposes for which grant funds have been used; and
(c) Require the grant program recipient to report on or before August 15,  2022, regarding
the use of funds and any other information specified by the department.
SECTION 3.
Community action  agencies receiving moneys under section 6 of this 2021
Act shall report to the Housing and Community Services  Department on or before August
15, 2022, regarding the use of funds and any other information specified by the department.
SECTION 4. No later than September 15,  2022, the Housing and Community Services
Department shall provide a report to  an appropriate interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 on the  grant program described in
section 2 of this 2021 Act, including the  amounts expended and information reported by grant
program recipients and community action agencies.
SECTION 5. Sections 2 to 4 of this 2021 Act are repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 6. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, out of the General Fund:
(a) $2,000,000 for awarding and administering grants under section 2 of this 2021 Act; and
(b) $2,000,000 for distribution to community action agencies with the advice of  the Com-
munity Action Partnership of Oregon  to provide loans, grants or other financial assistance
to income-eligible households for the repair and rehabilitation of their residences as de-
scribed in section 2 of  this 2021 Act and for administering the distribution of moneys under
this paragraph.
(2) The department may specify that  some or all of the moneys distributed to the com-
munity action agencies under subsection (1)(b) of this section must  supplement programs or
expenditures that are funded by federal, state or local weatherization programs.
SECTION 7.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]