Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 181A.010 to
181A.350.
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of State Police shall establish public exchange stations
at such places as the Superintendent of State  Police considers advisable to allow for the
transfer of children between one  parent or guardian and another parent or guardian and
transfer of personal property. The public exchange stations shall:
(a) Be monitored by a camera providing complete visual  coverage of the area. The video
produced by the camera shall be stored by the department for at least  30 days and is a public
record as defined in ORS 192.005.
(b) Have sufficient signage alerting the public to the station and informing the public that
the area is monitored by video that can be requested pursuant to a public records request.
(c) Be available for access by the public 24 hours per day each day of the year.
(2) The department may charge fees for a public record request of the video  coverage as
authorized in ORS  192.324, except a request involving the exchange of children may not be
denied for failure to pay.
(3) The department shall ensure that the  equipment remains in working order and the
station is accessible to the public.
(4) The department shall make rules to implement the requirements of this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 574