Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2019, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $350,000 for distribution to the University of
Oregon for the purposes of providing and expanding educational  programs in Oregon
correctional facilities.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2019, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $150,000 for distribution to Blue Mountain
Community College for the purposes of providing and expanding  educational programs in
Oregon correctional facilities.
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3458