Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 537.743 is amended to read:
537.743. (1) The Water Resources Department shall establish a program for the purpose of re-
placing, repairing or deepening domestic  personal use wells that are affected by declining ground
water levels resulting from  overallocation of ground water within the [ Greater Harney Valley
Groundwater Area of Concern ] Harney Basin Groundwater Management Area .
(2) In administering the program, the department:
(a) May enter into contracts, intergovernmental agreements or other arrangements  with public
or private entities in order to work collaboratively  to undertake the actions described in paragraph
(b) of this subsection;
(b) May award grants for  costs related to the replacement, repair or deepening of the wells or
pay the cost of direct services of  a water well constructor licensed under ORS 537.747 to perform
work needed to replace, repair or deepen the wells;
(c) Shall develop a process for applying for a grant or payment;
(d) May require a grantee or  recipient of a payment to report to the department on the use of
the funds;
(e) Shall biennially review the program and  report to the Water Resources Commission on pro-
gram implementation and outcomes to assess to what extent  the purpose described in subsection (1)
of this section is being achieved; and
(f) Shall, based on the report, modify the program as necessary to better  achieve the purpose
described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) A grant or payment described in subsection (2)(b) of this section may provide:
(a) Up to 75 percent of the  total cost of replacing, repairing or deepening the well, not to exceed
$10,000 per well for replacement, repair or deepening; and
(b) If determined by the department  to be necessary as part of replacing a well, up to $3,500 for
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4168
HB 3800
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the cost of abandoning the replaced well.
(4) In reviewing applications for a grant or payment, the department shall:
(a) Prioritize  grants or payments for wells owned by or serving persons of lower or moderate
income;
(b) Prioritize  grants or payments for wells based on the severity of changes and declines in
ground water, as determined by the department; and
(c) Consider other criteria determined by the department to be appropriate.
(5) To be eligible for funding, wells must:
(a) Be domestic personal  use wells affected by declining ground water levels within the [ Greater
Harney Valley Groundwater Area of Concern ] Harney Basin Groundwater Management Area ;
(b) Have served domestic personal use at a residence existing as of April 15, 2016; and
(c) Meet other criteria determined by the department.
(6) If replacement of a well is funded in  whole or in part under the program, the replaced well
must be abandoned.
(7) The Water Resources Commission may adopt rules to  implement the program. The commis-
sion shall,  for purposes of the program, adopt by rule a definition for the term [ “Greater Harney
Valley Groundwater Area of Concern”  or maintain in rule a definition for the term that the commission
adopted before September 25, 2021. ] “Harney Basin Groundwater Management Area.”
SECTION 2.
(1) As used in this section, “Harney Basin Groundwater Management  Area”
has the meaning given that term in rule pursuant to ORS 537.743.
(2) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of ORS chapters 536, 537, 538, 539 and  540, for
rights to use ground water within the Harney Basin Groundwater Management Area,  the
Water Resources Department may:
(a) Modify the rate and duty of a  certificated right to use ground water to reflect historic
beneficial use using a minimum of a five-year rolling average of the use within  a subarea
established by rule, provided that the modified duty does not  exceed the duty in the certif-
icated water right.
(b) Decline to  accept applications for new rights to use ground water to irrigate land in
the subarea described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) Require measurement and reporting for existing rights  to use ground water and
specify acceptable methods for the measurements and the frequency of the reports.
(d) Deny requested extensions for developing rights to use ground water.
(e) Specify in rules the department’s considerations and criteria for  processing transfer
applications pursuant to ORS chapter 540 that relate to ground water.
(3) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of ORS chapters 536, 537, 538, 539 and  540, for
rights to use ground water within the Harney Basin Groundwater Management Area,  the
department shall:
(a) Develop and implement a program for identifying and curtailing unauthorized use  of
ground water.
(b) Develop and implement a program for identifying  and canceling rights to use ground
water that are subject to cancellation under ORS 540.631.
(c) Adopt rules to establish an adaptive ground water management plan and program that
include:
(A) Objectives and metrics of success for managing ground water.
(B) Monitoring and data collection activities.
[2]
HB 3800
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
(C) Annual data analysis and reporting of trends in the levels of ground water and esti-
mates of the use of ground water.
(D) Milestones for evaluating the effectiveness of the department’s management  of
ground water.
(E) Adjustments to management of ground water to achieve the  department’s objectives
for managing ground water.
(F) Plans to create and update a Harney Basin ground water study model.
(G) Criteria for proceeding  with a contested case proceeding for designated critical
ground water areas pursuant to ORS 537.730.
(H) Criteria for removing designations of  critical ground water areas described in ORS
537.730.
(I) Review of the stockwatering exemption described in ORS 537.545 (1)(a).
(d) Establish a ground water advisory committee that meets at least once per year to
evaluate the effectiveness of the department’s management of ground water and  advise on
the management.
(e) Adopt rules to establish a mitigation program  that allows the department to process
new applications to use  ground water for purposes other than irrigation by reducing the
amount of water used under existing rights to use ground water.
[3]