Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Higher Education Coordinating Commission, in  coordination with public
universities listed in ORS 352.002  and community colleges operated under ORS chapter 341,
shall conduct a study to determine the appropriate rate of return the State  of Oregon should
receive for each patent that is  obtained as a result of public moneys provided to a public
university or community college. The commission shall submit a report in the  manner pro-
vided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related to education no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3143