Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 320.305 is amended to read:
320.305. (1)(a) A tax of [ 1.5] 3  percent  is imposed on any consideration charged for the sale,
service or furnishing of transient lodging.
(b)(A) The tax must be  computed on the total retail price, including all charges other than taxes,
paid by a person for occupancy of the transient lodging.
(B) The  total retail price paid by a person for occupancy of transient lodging that is part of a
travel package may be determined by reasonable and verifiable standards from books and records
kept in the ordinary course of the transient lodging tax collector’s business.
(2) The tax imposed under this section  becomes due when the occupancy of the transient lodging
with respect to which the tax is imposed ends.
(3)(a) The tax shall be collected by the transient  lodging provider or transient lodging interme-
diary that collects the consideration charged for  occupancy of the transient lodging, or a transient
lodging intermediary described in ORS 320.300 (12)(c), as applicable.
(b) The transient  lodging tax collector may withhold a collection reimbursement charge of five
percent of the amount collected under this subsection.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2584
HB 3159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) The tax imposed under this section is in addition to and not in lieu of  any local transient
lodging  tax.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 320.335 is amended to read:
320.335. All moneys received by the Department of Revenue pursuant to ORS 320.305 to 320.340,
and interest thereon, shall be paid to the State Treasurer  to be held in a suspense account estab-
lished under ORS 293.445. After the payment of refunds:
(1) Moneys necessary to reimburse the Department of Revenue for the actual costs incurred  by
the department in administering the state transient lodging  tax, not to exceed two percent of state
transient lodging tax collections, are continuously appropriated to the department; and
(2) [ The balance  of the moneys received ] Moneys received from the state transient lodging
tax imposed under ORS 320.305 at a  rate equal to 1.5 percent shall be transferred to the account
of the Oregon Tourism  Commission established under ORS 284.131. The moneys transferred under
this subsection are continuously appropriated to the [ Oregon Tourism Commission ] commission  for
the purposes set forth in ORS 284.131.
(3) Moneys received from the state transient lodging tax imposed under ORS  320.305 at
a rate in excess of 1.5 percent shall be transferred to the subaccount  of the Fish and Wildlife
Account established under ORS 496.303 (13). The moneys transferred  under this subsection
are continuously  appropriated to the department for the purposes set forth in ORS 496.303
(13).
SECTION 3.  ORS 496.303, as amended by section 8, chapter 56, Oregon Laws 2022, is  amended
to read:
496.303. (1) The Fish  and Wildlife Account is established in the State Treasury, separate and
distinct from the General Fund. All moneys  in the account are continuously appropriated to the
State Fish and Wildlife Commission. The Fish and Wildlife  Account shall consist of the moneys in
its various subaccounts and any moneys  transferred to the account by the Legislative Assembly.
Unless otherwise specified by law, interest earnings on moneys in the account shall be paid into  the
State Treasury and credited to the State Wildlife Fund.
(2)(a) The Fish Screening  Subaccount is established in the Fish and Wildlife Account. The sub-
account shall consist of:
(A) All penalties recovered under ORS 536.900 to 536.920.
(B) All moneys received pursuant to ORS 498.306.
(C) All gifts, grants  and other moneys from whatever source that may be used to carry out the
provisions of ORS 498.306.
(D) All moneys received from the sale of angling licenses dedicated by ORS 497.124.
(b) All moneys in the subaccount shall be used to carry out  the provisions of ORS 315.138,
498.306 and 509.620. However, moneys received from the sale of angling licenses  dedicated by ORS
497.124 shall be expended only to carry out the provisions of  law relating to the screening of water
diversions.
(3) The Fish Endowment Subaccount is established  in the Fish and Wildlife Account. The sub-
account shall consist of transfers of moneys authorized  by the Legislative Assembly from the State
Wildlife Fund and gifts  and grants of moneys from whatever source for the purpose of paying the
expense of maintaining fish hatcheries operated by the department.
(4) The Migratory Waterfowl Subaccount is established in the Fish and  Wildlife Account. All
moneys received by  the commission from the sale of art works and prints related to the migratory
waterfowl stamps shall be deposited in the subaccount. Moneys in the subaccount  may be expended
[2]
HB 3159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
only for activities that promote the propagation, conservation and recreational uses of migratory
waterfowl and for activities related to the design, production, issuance and arrangements  for sale
of the migratory waterfowl stamps and related art works and prints. Expenditures of moneys  in the
subaccount may be made within this state, in other  states or in foreign countries, in such amounts
as the commission determines appropriate.  Expenditures in other states and foreign countries shall
be on  such terms and conditions as the commission determines will benefit most directly the mi-
gratory waterfowl resources of this state.
(5) The Halibut Research Subaccount is established in the Fish and Wildlife Account.  Based on
the annual number of recreational halibut  anglers, a portion of the moneys derived from the sale
of the salmon, steelhead trout, sturgeon and halibut tag pursuant to ORS 497.121 shall be credited
to the subaccount. Moneys in  the subaccount may be expended only for halibut population studies
and other research.
(6) The Upland Bird Subaccount is  established in the Fish and Wildlife Account. All moneys
received by the State Fish and Wildlife  Commission from the sale of upland bird stamps, from the
sale of any art  works and prints related to the upland bird stamps and from private hunting preserve
permit fees shall be deposited in the subaccount. Moneys in the subaccount may be expended only
for promoting the propagation and conservation of upland  birds and the acquisition, development,
management, enhancement, sale or exchange of  upland bird habitat, and for activities related to the
design, production, issuance and arrangements for sale of the upland bird stamps  and related art
works and prints. Expenditures of moneys in the subaccount shall be made for the benefit of pro-
grams within this state  in such amounts and at such times as the commission determines appropriate
to most directly benefit the upland bird resources of the state.
(7) The Access  and Habitat Board Subaccount is established in the Fish and Wildlife Account.
The subaccount shall consist of moneys transferred to the subaccount  pursuant to ORS 496.242.
Moneys in the subaccount may be used for the purposes specified in ORS 496.242.
(8) The Marine Shellfish Subaccount is established in the Fish  and Wildlife Account. Interest
earnings on moneys in the subaccount shall  be credited to the subaccount. All moneys received by
the commission from the sale of resident  and nonresident shellfish licenses pursuant to ORS 497.121
shall be  deposited in the subaccount. Moneys in the subaccount shall be used for the protection and
enhancement of shellfish for recreational purposes,  including shellfish sanitation costs and the cost
of enforcement of wildlife laws pertaining to the  taking of shellfish. The State Fish and Wildlife
Director,  or  a designee, the Director of Agriculture, or a designee, and the Superintendent of State
Police, or a designee, shall  jointly make a recommendation to the Governor for inclusion in the
Governor’s budget beginning July 1 of each odd-numbered year.
(9)(a) The Mountain Sheep Subaccount is established in  the Fish and Wildlife Account, consist-
ing of moneys collected under ORS 497.112 (2)(a) to (c).
(b) All moneys in  the subaccount shall be used for the propagation and conservation of mountain
sheep, for research, development, management, enhancement and sale or  exchange of mountain
sheep habitat and for programs within the state that in the discretion of the commission most di-
rectly benefit mountain sheep resources of this state.
(10)(a) The Antelope Subaccount is  established in the Fish and Wildlife Account, consisting of
moneys collected under ORS 497.112 (2)(a) to (c).
(b) All moneys in the subaccount shall be  used for the propagation and conservation of antelope,
for research, development,  management, enhancement and sale or exchange of antelope habitat and
for programs within the state that in the discretion of the commission most  directly benefit antelope
[3]
HB 3159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
resources of this state.
(11)(a) The Mountain Goat Subaccount is established in  the Fish and Wildlife Account, consist-
ing of moneys collected under ORS 497.112 (2)(a) to (c).
(b) All moneys in  the subaccount shall be used for the propagation and conservation of mountain
goats for research, development, management, enhancement  and sale or exchange of mountain goat
habitat and for programs within the state that in the discretion of  the commission most directly
benefit mountain goat resources of this state.
(12) The commission shall keep  a record of all moneys deposited in the Fish and Wildlife Ac-
count. The record shall indicate  by separate cumulative accounts the sources from which the mon-
eys are derived and the individual activity or programs against which each withdrawal is charged.
(13) The [ Oregon Conservation Strategy ] Recovering Oregon’s Wildlife Fund  Subaccount is
established in the Fish and Wildlife Account.
(a) The subaccount shall consist of:
(A) All moneys received by the commission from the  sale of habitat conservation stamps,
prints and art works under ORS 496.571.
(B) All moneys received by the Department of Revenue under ORS 320.335 (3).
(C) Moneys appropriated to the State Department of Fish  and Wildlife for deposit in the
subaccount or otherwise transferred to the subaccount.
(D) Any gifts, grants, contributions or other donations for  use as described in paragraph
(c) of  this subsection that are received by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife from
any public or private source and  caused to be deposited in the subaccount or otherwise
transferred to the subaccount.
(b) Interest earnings on moneys in the subaccount shall be credited to the subaccount.
(c) Moneys in the subaccount shall be used:
(A) To promote, implement,  revise or enhance the policies in the “Oregon Conservation
Strategy,” 2016, and the “Oregon Nearshore Strategy,” 2016, or any subsequent  iterations of
those policies, as determined by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife; and
(B) To satisfy the nonfederal fund matching requirements for a conservation or restora-
tion program  designed to recover and manage the species in greatest need of conservation
and the habitats essential to conservation of those species,  as determined by the State De-
partment of Fish and Wildlife.
(d) Moneys in the  subaccount may be used for activities related to the design, production,
issuance and arrangement for sale of the habitat conservation stamps, prints and art works
under ORS 496.571.
[All moneys received by the commission from the sale of habitat  conservation stamps and from the
sale of any art works and prints  related to the habitat conservation stamp shall be deposited in the
subaccount. Moneys in the subaccount may be expended  only to promote and implement habitat and
species restoration,  enhancement and viewing activities identified in the “Oregon Conservation
Strategy,” 2006, by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, and for activities  related to the design,
production, issuance and arrangements for sale of the habitat conservation  stamps and related art
works and prints. ]
(14)(a) The Rogue-South Coast  Research and Monitoring Subaccount is established in the Fish
and Wildlife Account, consisting of moneys collected under ORS 497.121 (1)(r) and (s).
(b) All moneys in the subaccount shall be used for research and monitoring  that is consistent
with the Rogue-South Coast Multi-Species Conservation  and Management Plan the commission
[4]
HB 3159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
adopted in December 2021, as subsequently amended by the commission.
(c) The commission may amend the plan as needed.
(d) The commission shall make the  current version of the plan publicly available on a website
of the commission or of the State Department of Fish and Wildlife.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 496.571 is amended to read:
496.571. (1) The State Fish and Wildlife Commission may  issue an annual habitat conservation
stamp. The fee for the stamp may not exceed $50.
(2) The commission shall arrange, by contest  or other appropriate means, for the selection of the
design of the annual habitat conservation stamp authorized by subsection (1) of  this section and for
the production and sale of the stamps.
(3) The commission may produce the number of stamps the commission considers  appropriate
and may make stamps available for the creation of  art prints and other related art works and may
arrange for the sale of stamps, prints and art works to persons desiring to purchase those items.
(4) In carrying out its duties, functions and powers with  regard to the habitat conservation
stamp, the commission may contract for the performance of those duties,  functions and powers. The
contract  may  include, among other matters, provisions for advance payment or reimbursement for
services performed pursuant to the contract. All costs and expenses incurred pursuant  to this sec-
tion shall be  paid from the [ Oregon Conservation Strategy ] Recovering Oregon’s Wildlife Fund
Subaccount established under ORS 496.303.
SECTION 5. The amendments to ORS 320.305 and 320.335 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2023
Act apply to consideration charged on or after January 1, 2024, for the sale, service or fur-
nishing of transient lodging.
SECTION 6.
This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[5]