Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 1 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 475.752 to
475.980.
SECTION 2. (1) It is unlawful for a person to knowingly or  intentionally use a controlled
substance in an  enclosed space that is open to the public in a manner that endangers another
person.
(2)(a) Violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, violation of this  section is a Class
C felony if the person has a prior conviction under this section at the time of the offense.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 216