Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 475C.726, as amended by section  1, chapter 15, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended
to read:
475C.726. (1) As used in this section,  “U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index” means the U.S.
City Average Consumer Price  Index for All Urban Consumers (All Items) as published by the Bureau
of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(2) There is  established the Oregon Marijuana Account, separate and distinct from the General
Fund. The account consists of moneys transferred to the account under ORS 475C.734.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly the amount of moneys available  in the
Oregon Marijuana Account.
(b)(A) After setting aside  sufficient funds to reimburse the department for costs incurred
in the  administration of the account and before making other transfers of moneys required
by this section, the department shall transfer  to the cities and counties of this state, in ad-
dition to the moneys described in paragraph (c) of this subsection, 11 percent of  the moneys
in the account in the manner described in paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(B) After making the transfer described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and  before
making any other transfers of moneys required  by this section, the department shall transfer quar-
terly to the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund all moneys in the Oregon  Marijuana Ac-
count in excess of $11,250,000.
[(B)] (C) The department shall annually adjust the  limitation in subparagraph [ (A)] (B) of this
paragraph. The department shall multiply  $11,250,000 by the percentage, if any, by which the
monthly averaged U.S. City Average Consumer Price  Index for the 12 consecutive months ending
August 31 of the prior calendar year exceeds the monthly index for the  fourth quarter of the cal-
endar year 2020, and shall add  that product to $11,250,000. Any increase in the limitation shall apply
beginning with transfers made  in July of each year, based upon receipts in the second calendar
quarter of each year.
(c) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, and after making the transfer of moneys required
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2303
HB 2089
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
by paragraph (b) of this subsection, the department shall transfer quarterly [ 20] 60 percent of the
moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account as follows:
(A) [ Ten] Thirty percent of the moneys  in the account must be transferred to the cities of this
state in the following shares:
(i) [ Seventy-five] Forty percent of the [ 10] 30 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect
the population of each city of this state that is not  exempt from this paragraph pursuant to sub-
section (4)(a) of this section compared  to the population of all cities of this state that are not exempt
from this paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section, as determined by  Portland State
University under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the  date immediately preceding the date of the transfer;
[and]
(ii) [ Twenty-five] Thirty percent of the  [10] 30 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect
the number of  licenses held pursuant to ORS 475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093 and 475C.097 on the last
business day of the calendar quarter preceding  the date of the transfer for premises located in each
city compared to the number  of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093 and
475C.097 on  the last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in
cities;  and
(iii) Thirty  percent of the 30 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the vol-
ume of marijuana produced, processed and sold at wholesale and retail  at premises licensed
pursuant to ORS 475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093 and 475C.097 between the first  business day of
the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer and  the last business day of the
calendar quarter preceding the date  of the transfer on premises located in each city com-
pared to the volume of  marijuana produced, processed and sold at wholesale and retail at
premises licensed pursuant to ORS 475C.065,  475C.085, 475C.093 and 475C.097 between the first
business day of  the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer and the last business
day of that calendar quarter at all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) [ Ten] Thirty percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the
following shares:
(i) Fifty percent of the [ 10] 30 percent  must be transferred in shares that reflect the total com-
mercially available area of  all grow canopies associated with marijuana producer licenses held
pursuant to ORS 475C.065 on the last business day of the calendar quarter  preceding the date of the
transfer for all premises located in each county compared to the total  commercially available area
of all grow canopies associated with  marijuana producer licenses held pursuant to ORS 475C.065 on
the last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent of the [ 10] 30 percent must be transferred in shares  that reflect the number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475C.085, 475C.093 and 475C.097 on the last business day of the
calendar quarter preceding the date  of the transfer for premises located in each county compared
to the number of licenses held  pursuant to ORS 475C.085, 475C.093 and 475C.097 on the last business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
(d) After making the transfer of moneys required by [ paragraph (b) ] paragraphs (b) and (c)  of
this subsection, [ 80 percent of ] the  remaining moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account must be used
solely for purposes for which moneys in the State  Police Account established under ORS
181A.020 may be used.  [ as follows: ]
[(A) Forty  percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which moneys
in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used; ]
[(B) Twenty percent of the moneys in the account must be  used solely for mental health treatment
[2]
HB 2089
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment; ]
[(C) Fifteen  percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which moneys
in the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020 may be used; and ]
[(D) Five percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes  related to alcohol
and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services. ]
(4)(a) A city that has an ordinance  prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS  475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097 is required is not eligible to
receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(c)(A) of this section.
(b) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which  issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475C.065  is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
subsection (3)(c)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475C.085, 475C.093 or  475C.097 is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(c)(B)(ii) of this section.
(d)(A) Paragraphs (b)  and (c) of this subsection do not apply to a county ordinance adopted on
or after January 1, 2018, that prohibits the establishment of a premises for  which a license under
ORS 475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097 is required but allows in the unincorporated area of
the county the continued  operation of an existing premises for which a license under ORS 475C.065,
475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097 is required.
(B) A county that adopts an ordinance described in subparagraph (A) of  this paragraph shall
certify the adoption of the ordinance under subsection (6) of this section.
(5)(a) A city or county that is ineligible under subsection (4) of this section to  receive a transfer
of moneys  from the Oregon Marijuana Account during a given quarter but has received a transfer
of moneys for that quarter shall return the amount transferred to the Department of Revenue,  with
interest as described  under paragraph (f) of this subsection. An ineligible city or county may vol-
untarily transfer the moneys to the Department of Revenue immediately upon receipt of the ineligi-
ble transfer.
(b) If the Director of the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services determines that a city
or county received a transfer of moneys under subsection (3)(c) of this section but was ineligible  to
receive that transfer under subsection (4) of this section, the director  shall provide notice to the
ineligible city or county and order the city or county to return the amount received to  the Depart-
ment of Revenue, with interest as  described under paragraph (f) of this subsection. A city or county
may appeal the order within 30 days of the date of  the order under the procedures for a contested
case under ORS chapter 183.
(c) As soon as the order under paragraph  (b) of this subsection becomes final, the director shall
notify the Department of Revenue and the ineligible city or county. Upon  notification, the Depart-
ment of Revenue immediately shall proceed to collect the amount stated in the notice.
(d) The Department of Revenue shall have the  benefit of all laws of the state pertaining to the
collection of income and  excise taxes and may proceed to collect the amounts described in the no-
tice under paragraph (c) of this subsection. An assessment of tax is not necessary and  the collection
described in this subsection is not precluded by any statute of limitations.
(e) If a city or county is subject to  an order to return moneys from an ineligible transfer, the
city or county shall  be denied any further relief in connection with the ineligible transfer on or after
the date that the order becomes final.
(f) Interest under this section shall accrue at  the rate established in ORS 305.220 beginning on
[3]
HB 2089
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(g) Both the moneys and  the interest collected from or returned by an ineligible city or county
shall be redistributed to the cities or counties that were eligible to  receive a transfer under sub-
section (3)(c) of this section on the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(6)(a) Not later than July 1 of each year, each city  and county in this state shall certify with
the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services whether the city or county has an ordinance
prohibiting the establishment of a premises for  which issuance of a license under ORS 475C.065,
475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097 is required and whether the county has an ordinance described  in
subsection (4)(d) of this section. The certification shall be made  concurrently with the certifications
under ORS 221.770, in  a form and manner prescribed by the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services.
(b) If a city fails to comply with this subsection, the city is not eligible to receive transfers  of
moneys under subsection  (3)(c)(A) of this section. If a county fails to comply with this subsection,
the county is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(c)(B) of this section.
(c) A city or county that repeals an ordinance as provided  in ORS 475C.457 shall file an updated
certification with the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services in a form and manner pre-
scribed by the department, noting the effective date of  the change. A city or county that repeals an
ordinance as provided in ORS 475C.457 is  eligible to receive quarterly transfers of moneys under
this section for quarters where the repeal is effective for the entire quarter  and the updated certi-
fication was filed at least 30 days before the date of transfer.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 327.008 is amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
(b) The Department of Education, on behalf  of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from  public and private sources for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State School  Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred from the Fund for Student Success, moneys transferred from the  Education Sta-
bility Fund  [ and the Oregon Marijuana Account ] and moneys received as provided in paragraph (b)
of this subsection.
(d) The State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for  the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to  327.077, 327.095, 327.099, 327.101, 327.125, 327.137, 327.348, 327.356 to
327.359, 336.575, 336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961.
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each school  district a State School
Fund grant, consisting of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a  facility grant
and a transportation grant and a high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue, computed as pro-
vided in ORS 327.011 and 327.013.
(3) For the first school year after a public charter school ceases to  operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of  termination or nonrenewal of a charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund to  each school district that had sponsored a public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount equal to the school district’s  general purpose grant per extended
ADMw multiplied by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year.
(4) There shall be  apportioned from the State School Fund to each education service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All figures used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund shall  be
[4]
HB 2089
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in average daily membership used in  the distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) A school district may  not use the portion of the State School Fund grant that is attributable
to the facility grant for capital construction costs.
(8) The total amount of  the State School Fund that is distributed as facility grants may not ex-
ceed $3 million in any biennium. If  the total amount to be distributed as facility grants exceeds this
limitation, the  Department of Education shall prorate the amount of funds available for facility
grants among  those school districts that qualified for a facility grant. If the total amount to be dis-
tributed as facility grants does not  exceed this limitation, any remaining amounts shall be expended
for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities as provided in ORS 326.125 (1).
(9) Each biennium, the Department of  Education may expend from the State School Fund no
more than $10 million for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities under ORS 326.125 (2)
to (7).
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education  shall transfer to the Pediatric Nursing Fa-
cility Account established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs of educational
services provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(11) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer the amount of  $55 million from
the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
(12)(a) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $39.5 million from  the State
School Fund to the Educator Advancement Fund established under ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The total  amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by $6 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school districts  from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by $16.75 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education service  districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by $16.75 million.
(c) For each biennium, the  amounts identified in this subsection shall be adjusted by the same
percentage  by  which the instructions furnished to state agencies by the Governor under ORS 291.204
direct the state agencies to adjust their agency budget requests for special payments under ORS
291.216 (6)(a)(C).
(13) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Statewide English  Language Learner Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
(14) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from the  State
School  Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this  section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide administration of and support for the development  of talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration  of a program to increase the number of speech-language
pathologists and speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.394 to 348.406.
[5]
HB 2089
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
(17) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $2 million from  the State School
Fund for  deposit to the Healthy School Facilities Fund established under ORS 332.337.
Notwithstanding  ORS  332.337, the department may expend moneys received in the Healthy School
Facilities Fund under this subsection only as grants for costs associated with testing for  elevated
levels of lead in water used for drinking or food preparation.
(18) Each biennium, the Department  of Education shall transfer an amount not to exceed
$5,595,000 for the purpose  of making tampons and sanitary pads available as provided by ORS
326.545.
(19) Each fiscal year, the  Department of Education shall transfer the amount of $2.5 million from
the State School Fund to the Small School District Supplement Fund established in ORS 327.359.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 327.008 and 475C.726 by sections  1 and 2 of this 2023
Act apply to distributions from the Oregon Marijuana Account occurring  on and after the
operative date specified in section 4 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) The amendments to ORS 327.008 and 475C.726 by sections 1 and 2  of this
2023 Act become operative on January 1, 2024.
(2) The Department  of Revenue may take any action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of  this section that is necessary to enable the department to exercise, on
and after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties,
functions and powers conferred on the department by the amendments to ORS 327.008 and
475C.726 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5.
This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[6]