Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Transportation shall study the feasibility and utility
of constructing bridges across the Columbia River by extending State Route 127,  beginning
where it intersects with State Highway 30,  and continuing across the Columbia River and
connecting with Interstate 5. To more effectively and efficiently accomplish the  goals in the
study, the department shall examine  utilizing public and private partnerships, including en-
tering into agreements using the Oregon Innovative  Partnerships Program, described in ORS
367.800, 367.804 and 367.806.
(2) The  department shall submit a report of findings to the Joint Committee on Trans-
portation in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4697