Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 291.201 to
291.222.
SECTION 2.  (1) As used in this section, “zero-based budgeting” means budgeting  that
begins with the assumption that initial funding amounts  for each component of a budget are
zero and that contains justification for each proposed expenditure.
(2) It is the  policy of the state to use zero-based budgeting in developing biennial budget
plans.
(3) Agency request  budgets that are filed by or prepared for a state agency under ORS
291.208 must contain the following information:
(a) A description of activities that the agency performs  and a justification for the exist-
ence of each activity by reference to statute or other legal authority;
(b) For  each activity, a quantitative estimate of any adverse impacts that could reason-
ably be expected if the  activity were discontinued, together with a full description of the
methods by which the adverse impact is estimated;
(c) For each activity, an itemized account  of expenditures that would be required to
maintain the activity at the minimum level of service required by the statutory or other legal
authority, together with a concise statement of the  quantity and quality of service required
at that minimum level;
(d) For  each activity, an itemized account of expenditures required to maintain the ac-
tivity at the current level of service, together with a concise  statement of the quantity and
quality of service being provided; and
(e) A ranking of all activities that shows the relative  contribution of each activity to the
overall goals and purposes of the agency at the current level of service.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2019 Act applies  to agency request budgets prepared for
biennia beginning on or after July 1, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 933