Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) To support essential agricultural research, for every donation of $10,000
or more that is made directly to the Oregon State  University Foundation for the express
purpose of supporting agricultural research  with an emphasis on cereal grains, the State of
Oregon shall, to the  extent moneys are available, separately contribute 50 percent of the
amount of the donation to the foundation. The total amount of moneys contributed by  the
State of Oregon under this section may not exceed $3,000,000 per biennium.
(2) An individual or  entity may make a direct donation of $10,000 or more to the Oregon
State University Foundation for the purposes of  this section through a series of donations.
The State  of Oregon may not make a 50 percent matching contribution under subsection (1)
of this section until the total amount of moneys donated by a specific individual  or entity to
the foundation is $10,000 or more.
(3)(a) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall enter  into an agreement with
the Oregon State University Foundation to establish:
(A) The method and  timing by which the foundation shall inform the commission of the
total number and amount of  donations that qualify for a state match under this section; and
(B) Methods for the commission to ensure  the accuracy of information reported under
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(b) The commission may adopt rules to implement this subsection.
SECTION 2.
Not later than October 1 of each year, the Oregon State  University Foun-
dation shall submit a report, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, to the  State Treasurer
and the Oregon Wheat Commission. The report required under this  section shall detail the
use of moneys received by the foundation from donations and state moneys described in
section 1 of this 2025 Act during the preceding fiscal year and must include a financial
summary and review of the results of expenditures made by the  foundation using moneys
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1228
SB 768
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
described in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,000,000, for allocation to  the Oregon State
University Foundation for the purpose of making contributions in the manner  described in
section 1 of this 2025 Act.
[2]