Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  State Parks and Recreation Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
out of the General Fund,  the amount of $1,000,000, to continue to develop the Oregon Coast
Trail.
SECTION 2.  Section 28, chapter 491, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 28.  (1) Each  biennium, in cooperation with the Department of Transportation, the State
Parks and  Recreation Department shall allocate, for bicycle and pedestrian transportation projects
to meet recreation and transportation needs, up to $4 million of lottery revenues designated  for
outdoor recreation improvement projects.
(2) Each biennium, the State Parks and  Recreation Department shall allocate one-half of the
funding described in subsection (1) of this section for  the purpose of providing grants for bicycle and
pedestrian transportation projects through local and regional grant programs.
(3) Each biennium, the State Parks and Recreation  Department shall allocate one-half of the
funding described in subsection (1) of this section for the purpose of funding bicycle and pedestrian
transportation projects on signature, scenic  or recreation trails within the State of Oregon.  Not
more than $1,000,000 of the funding allocated under this subsection  shall be directed toward
qualifying projects, if available, to  develop, maintain or work toward completion of the
Oregon Coast Trail.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3672