Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “trophy trout” means a trout  that is at least 14
inches long or that weighs approximately one pound or more.
(2) The  State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall establish a program to purchase
trophy trout from private aquaculture facilities.
(3) In implementing the program, the department shall:
(a) Annually  purchase 500,000 pounds of trophy trout produced by private aquaculture
facilities.
(b) Enter into purchase contracts with in-state  private aquaculture facilities for a dura-
tion of at least one year but not more than  five years, as decided by the private aquaculture
facilities.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(b) of this section,  the department may purchase tro-
phy trout from out-of-state private aquaculture facilities if in-state private aquaculture  fa-
cilities are unable to provide  sufficient trophy trout and the department provides in-state
private aquaculture facilities  with reasonable notice of the department’s intent to purchase
trophy trout from out-of-state private aquaculture facilities.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2031.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3031