Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The  State Department of Energy, in cooperation with the Department
of Environmental Quality and the Department of Land Conservation and  Development, shall
develop an action plan, to  be known as the Statewide Geographic Diversity of Fueling
Stations for Disaster Reserves Priority Action Plan.
(2) The action plan shall be based on the 2024 Oregon Energy Security  Plan, and any
subsequent updates to the security plan, and include:
(a) Strategies to increase the geographic diversity  of liquid fuel storage by region in
Oregon;
(b) Strategies to improve statewide liquid  fuel reserves to support response and recovery
activities; and
(c) A prioritized list of locations for  expanding storage capacity at existing fuel storage
sites or developing fuel storage capacity at sites where there is not currently fuel storage.
(3) The action plan must take into account:
(a) Any negative impacts on the environmental health  of communities in areas identified
for new or expanded fuel storage capacity; and
(b) The potential for reliance on fossil fuels to decline and the impact on the action  plan
resulting from that decline.
(4) Upon completion of the action  plan, the State Department of Energy may, subject to
available funding, take any actions within  the authority of the department necessary to im-
plement the action plan.
(5) The department shall review and update the action  plan no less than once every five
years.
SECTION 2.
The State Department of Energy shall submit the action plan developed un-
der section 1 of this 2025 Act in a report to the interim committees of the  Legislative As-
sembly related to energy, in the  manner provided under ORS 192.245, no later than
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2822
HB 2152
1
2
3
4
5
September 15, 2026. The report may include recommendations for legislation necessary  to
implement the action plan.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]