Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 7 of this 2025  Act are added to and made a part of ORS 278.315
to 278.415.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section and sections 3, 4, 5 and 6 of this 2025 Act:
(a) “Insurer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 731.106.
(b) “Policy” has the meaning given that term in ORS 731.122.
(c) “Reinsurance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 731.126.
(d) “Subject property”  means crops, forage and livestock and buildings, structures or
equipment used in agricultural operations, as defined in ORS 467.120.
(e) “Wildlife” means all animal species over which the  State Fish and Wildlife Commis-
sion has  jurisdiction, including game mammals, as defined in ORS 496.004, and fur-bearing
animals, as defined in ORS 496.004.
(2) The Oregon Department of  Administrative Services shall establish a program to pro-
vide reinsurance against the risk of economic  loss for insurers that issue policies of insur-
ance against damage or loss  to subject property from the activities of wildlife. In establishing
the program, the Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall:
(a) Accept risks only from  ceding insurers that the Department of Consumer and Busi-
ness Services has authorized to transact insurance in this state in a property or casualty line
of insurance that is appropriate for covering damage or loss to subject property from the
activities of wildlife.
(b) Consult the  Department of Consumer and Business Services with respect to the ade-
quacy of a ceding insurer’s capital, surplus and reserves before assuming a  risk from the
ceding insurer.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4629
HB 3834
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Specify a maximum  amount of coverage for all reinsurance policies the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services issues,  setting the maximum for each policy at an
amount that:
(A) Provides adequate protection for ceding insurers and incentives for ceding insurers
to issue policies of insurance  against damage or loss to subject property from the activities
of wildlife; and
(B) Protects and continues the soundness and solvency of the  Wildlife Damage Reinsur-
ance Fund established in section 3 of this 2025 Act.
(d) Otherwise comports with applicable provisions of the Insurance Code with  respect to
reinsurance and with sound principles of insurance.
(3) In order to create incentives for insurers  to provide coverage for damage or loss to
subject property,  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall set as a priority
issuing policies of reinsurance under this section in  locations and in insurance markets in
this state in which coverage for damage or loss to subject property from the activities  of
wildlife is inadequate.
(4) This section does not give an insurer a right to obtain reinsurance from the  Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services if the department determines that the insurer does
not have authority to transact insurance in this state, is  inadequately capitalized, is finan-
cially unsound or otherwise uninsurable or if the department  determines that providing re-
insurance for the insurer is otherwise  inconsistent with sound principles of insurance or the
actuarial soundness of the Wildlife Damage Reinsurance Fund.
SECTION 3.
(1) There is established the Wildlife  Damage Reinsurance Fund within the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from  the General Fund, which the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services shall use for the purpose of  reinsuring insurers that issue policies
that cover the risk of damage or loss to subject property from the activities  of wildlife. The
moneys in the Wildlife Damage Reinsurance Fund may be invested as provided in ORS 293.701
to 293.857 in investment  funds, as defined in ORS 293.701. Interest the fund earns must be
credited to the fund.
(2) To  provide appropriate accountability, the Wildlife Damage Reinsurance Fund must
be administratively separated from other funds that the department administers and into
which the department deposits premiums and other moneys and from which  the department
pays claims that are not the reinsurance described in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The  State Treasurer shall set aside and credit to the Wildlife Damage Reinsurance
Fund all moneys the department  receives as payment of premium, as appropriations or from
other sources that are dedicated specifically for use in the reinsurance described in section
2 of this 2025 Act. The moneys in the Wildlife Damage Reinsurance Fund are  continuously
appropriated to the department to carry out the purposes set forth  in section 2 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Legislative Assembly  intends that the Wildlife Damage Reinsurance
Fund established in section 3 of this 2025 Act operate on an  actuarially sound basis and that
the rates and charges for policies of reinsurance reflect this policy.
(2) In any year when the moneys in the  Wildlife Damage Reinsurance Fund are not suf-
ficient to keep the fund or any of the fund’s components actuarially sound  and to make all
payments required under  applicable law, moneys may be advanced from other funds in the
State Treasury under the provisions of ORS 293.205 to 293.225. The  Joint Committee on Ways
[2]
HB 3834
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
and Means of the Legislative Assembly, if the Legislative Assembly is in  session, or the
Emergency Board, if the Legislative Assembly is not in  session, must approve any advance
to the Wildlife Damage Reinsurance Fund before the advance occurs.
(3) Moneys advanced to the Wildlife Damage Reinsurance Fund as provided in this section
must be repaid from the Wildlife Damage Reinsurance  Fund in annual installments, with
interest as provided in ORS 293.220. The Oregon Department of  Administrative Services shall
fix the amount of the installments at an amount that can  reasonably be expected to liquidate
the indebtedness of the Wildlife Damage Reinsurance Fund in not more than 10 years.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Wildlife  Damage Reinsurance Fund established in section 3 of this
2025 Act is a trust  fund exclusively for the uses and purposes specified in section 2 of this
2025 Act, except that this provision does not amend or impair the force or effect of  section
3 of this 2025 Act or any other law of this state that specifically authorizes investing  moneys
from the fund.
(2) Subject to the right  of the State of Oregon to direct legislatively the disposition of
any surplus in excess  of reserves and surplus deemed actuarially necessary according to re-
cognized insurance  principles, and necessary in addition thereto to assure continued fiscal
soundness of the Wildlife Damage Reinsurance Fund, the State of Oregon declares that the
state has no proprietary interest in the Wildlife Damage Reinsurance Fund.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may set aside, from
interest and other income received through  investment of the Wildlife Damage Reinsurance
Fund established in section 3 of this 2025 Act, that part of the income that the department
considers necessary to establish and maintain in the fund one  or more reserve accounts. The
department shall maintain and use the reserve accounts to offset gains and losses of invested
capital.
(2) The department may set aside such other  reserves within the Wildlife Damage Rein-
surance Fund as the department deems necessary to:
(a) Pay the administrative expenses and related expenses the  department incurs in
transacting insurance under section 2 of this 2025 Act; and
(b) Ensure the actuarial soundness of the fund.
SECTION 7.
The Oregon Department  of Administrative Services shall annually report, in
the manner prescribed in ORS 192.245, to committees or  interim committees of the Legisla-
tive Assembly related to insurance on:
(1) Activities under the program described in section 2 of  this 2025 Act since the previous
report under this section.
(2) Expenditures from the Wildlife  Damage Reinsurance Fund described in section 3 of
this 2025 Act since the previous report under this section.
SECTION 8. There is appropriated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $  for
deposit in the Wildlife Damage Reinsurance Fund established by section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 9. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]