Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 366.506 is amended to read:
366.506. (1) Once every two years,  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall
conduct a highway cost allocation study. The purpose of the study is to determine:
(a) The proportionate share that the  users of each class of vehicle should pay for the costs of
maintenance, operation and improvement of the highways, roads and streets in the state; and
(b) Whether the users of each class are paying that share.
(2) Each study must include:
(a) An examination of the most recent study  period for which actual data are available for the
purpose of determining the accuracy of the most recently published study results; and
(b) An examination of the prospective study  period based on projected data for the purpose de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The department may use any study design the department determines will best accomplish
the purposes stated in  subsection (1) of this section. In designing the study, the department may
make decisions that include, but are not limited to, the methodology to be used for the study,  what
constitutes a class of vehicle for purposes of  collection of data under subsections (1) to (5) of this
section and the nature and scope of costs that will be included in the study.
(4) The department may appoint a study review team to participate in the study required  by
subsection (1) of this section. The team may perform any functions assigned by  the department, in-
cluding, but not limited to, consulting on the design of the study.
(5) A report on  the results of the study shall be submitted to the legislative revenue committees
and the Joint Committee on Transportation by January 31 of each odd-numbered year.
(6) The Legislative Assembly shall use the report described in subsection (5) of  this section to
determine whether adjustments to revenue sources described  in Article IX, section 3a (3), of the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4693
SB 3
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
Oregon Constitution, are needed in order to carry out the purposes  of Article IX, section 3a (3), of
the Oregon Constitution. If such adjustments  are needed, the Legislative Assembly shall enact
whatever measures are necessary to make the adjustments.
(7)(a) On or after September 1 of  each odd-numbered year, notwithstanding the weight-
mile tax rates described under ORS 825.476, the department shall, by rule,  decrease the rates
in an amount to achieve equity between light and heavy vehicle classes, if:
(A) The highway cost allocation report  indicates that the equity ratio for the heavy ve-
hicle class is greater than one; and
(B) The Legislative Assembly has  not enacted whatever measures are necessary to make
the adjustments needed to carry out the purposes of Article IX, section 3a (3), of the  Oregon
Constitution, within 120 days of the Joint Committee on Transportation receiving the  report
under subsection (5) of this section.
(b) On or after September 1 of each odd-numbered year, notwithstanding the fuel tax
rates described under ORS 319.020 (1)(b) and 319.530 (1), the  department shall, by rule, de-
crease the rates in an amount to achieve equity between light and heavy vehicle classes, if:
(A) The highway cost allocation  report indicates that the equity ratio for the light vehicle
class is greater than one; and
(B) The Legislative Assembly has  not enacted whatever measures are necessary to make
the adjustments needed to carry out the purposes of Article IX, section 3a (3), of the  Oregon
Constitution, within 120 days of the Joint Committee on Transportation receiving the  report
under subsection (5) of this section.
(8) The department shall repeal an administrative rule decreasing tax rates adopted
pursuant to subsection (7) of this section if the department  determines that, after the rule
was adopted, the Legislative Assembly adjusted revenue sources described in Article  IX,
section 3a (3), of the Oregon Constitution, to carry out the purposes of Article IX, section
3a (3), of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]