Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that it is  the policy of this state
to encourage sustainable economic growth with a reduction of  Oregon personal income tax
rates, a reduction of Oregon corporate excise and  income taxes and an increase in the
Oregon earned income credit, all funded by a tax on fuel suppliers and utilities under sections
2 to 6 of this 2019 Act,  based on the amount of carbon dioxide equivalent emitted through
the combustion of carbon-based fuel that is sold by fuel suppliers to consumers  in this state
or that is used to produce carbon-generated electricity supplied by a utility to  consumers in
this state.
SECTION 2.
As used in sections 2 to 6 of this 2019 Act:
(1) “Carbon-based fuel” means coal, natural gas, petroleum products and any  other
product used for fuel that contains carbon  and emits greenhouse gases when combusted.
“Carbon-based fuel” does not include any product  used for fuel that is from a resource that
is less than 1,000 years old in its natural state.
(2) “Carbon dioxide equivalent” means the  amount of carbon dioxide by weight that would
produce the same global warming impact as a given weight of another greenhouse gas.
(3) “Carbon-generated electricity” means electric  energy that is produced using a
carbon-based fuel.
(4) “Consumer price  index” means the U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index for All
Urban Consumers for All Items, as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics  of the United
States Department of Labor.
(5) “Fuel supplier” means a person that sells carbon-based fuel to consumers.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1327
SB 902
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) “Greenhouse gas” means carbon dioxide,  methane, nitrous oxide, hydrofluorocarbons,
perfluorocarbons, sulfur hexafluoride and nitrogen trifluoride.
(7) “Utility” means a public utility operating under ORS chapter  757, a people’s utility
district operating under  ORS chapter 261, a municipal utility operating under ORS chapter
225 or any other entity that supplies carbon-generated electricity to consumers.
SECTION 3. (1) A tax is imposed on each fuel supplier and  utility assessed per metric ton
of carbon dioxide equivalent emitted through combustion of a carbon-based fuel that is:
(a) Sold by a fuel supplier to consumers in this state; or
(b) Used to produce carbon-generated electricity that is supplied by  a utility to consum-
ers in this state.
(2) The tax under subsection (1) of this section shall be imposed at a rate of:
(a) $15 per metric ton of carbon dioxide  equivalent emitted through combustion of a
carbon-based fuel sold or used during the tax year beginning on July 1, 2020.
(b) $25 per metric ton of carbon  dioxide equivalent emitted through combustion of a
carbon-based fuel sold or used during the tax year beginning on July 1, 2021.
(c) For carbon dioxide equivalent emitted through combustion of a carbon-based fuel  sold
or used during the tax year beginning on July 1, 2022 and for subsequent tax years,  $25 plus
an annual increase of  three and one-half percent per tax year, plus inflation as measured
using the consumer price index for the most recent year for which  data is available each
year beginning July 1st, but not to exceed a rate of $100 per metric ton in 2019 dollars.
(3) Notwithstanding the  rate designated under subsection (2) of this section, the amount
of tax imposed on oil or natural  gas under this section may not exceed six percent of the
market value of oil or natural gas that is described in Article IX, section  3b, of the Oregon
Constitution. If the total of all taxes imposed by  all laws on oil or natural gas described in
Article IX, section 3b, of the Oregon Constitution,  exceeds six percent of the market value
of the oil or natural gas, the amount that is in excess because of taxes imposed by  the laws
of this state, other than the tax imposed by this section, shall be refunded to the taxpayer.
(4) The Department of Revenue shall calculate the tax  liability of a fuel supplier or utility
by multiplying the rate designated in subsection (2) of this section  by the total amount of
carbon dioxide equivalent emitted through combustion of carbon-based fuels that are:
(a) Sold by the fuel supplier to consumers in this state in the previous calendar year; or
(b) Used to produce carbon-generated electricity supplied by the utility to  consumers in
this state in the previous calendar year.
(5)(a) If a utility is unable to provide the information required for  the calculation under
subsection (4) of this section, the Department of  Revenue shall calculate the utility’s tax li-
ability by multiplying the rate designated in subsection (2) of this section by the product of
the average amount of carbon dioxide equivalent emitted in the production of one kilowatt
of electricity supplied by the  utility and the total number of kilowatts of electricity supplied
by the utility to consumers in this state.
(b) The State Department of Energy shall calculate  the average amount of carbon dioxide
emitted in the  production of one kilowatt of electricity supplied by the utility based upon the
proportion that each carbon-based  fuel constitutes of the total amount of carbon-based fuel
used in the generation of the electricity by the  utility and the amount of carbon dioxide
emitted in the production of one kilowatt of electricity for each carbon-based fuel. Each year,
the State Department of Energy shall recalculate  and report to the Department of Revenue
[2]
SB 902
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the average amount of carbon dioxide equivalent emitted in the production of one kilowatt
of electricity supplied by the utility to take into account  any changes in the relative pro-
portion of carbon-based fuels used in the generation of the electricity by the utility.
(6) The Department of Revenue and the  State Department of Energy may adopt any rules
necessary for the calculation of tax liability and the collection of the  tax imposed under this
section.
(7) The tax imposed under this section does not apply to:
(a) Carbon dioxide equivalent emissions  from carbon-based fuel or carbon-generated
electricity that the state is prohibited from taxing under the  Constitution or laws of the
United States or the Constitution or laws of the State of Oregon.
(b) Any fuel supplier or utility that is administered by a federal agency.
(c) Any carbon-based fuel or carbon-generated electricity that is transported through
this state, or produced in this state, but not consumed in this state.
SECTION 4.
(1) Every fuel supplier and utility required to pay the tax imposed under
section 3 of this 2019 Act  shall file a report with the Department of Revenue on or before
April 1 of each year.
(2) The report filed by a fuel supplier under this section shall include:
(a) The total amount of each carbon-based fuel sold by the fuel supplier to  consumers in
this state in the previous calendar year;
(b) The market value of  and any taxes paid for any oil or natural gas that is described
in Article IX, section 3b, of the Oregon  Constitution, and sold by the fuel supplier to con-
sumers in this state in the previous calendar year; and
(c) Any other information required by the department by rule.
(3) The report filed by a utility under this section shall include:
(a) The total amount of each carbon-based fuel used to produce  the carbon-generated
electricity supplied by the utility to consumers in this state in the previous calendar year;
(b) The market value of and any taxes paid for any oil or natural  gas that is described
in Article IX, section 3b,  of the Oregon Constitution, and used to produce carbon-generated
electricity supplied by  the utility to consumers in this state in the previous calendar year;
and
(c) Any other information required by the department by rule.
(4) If a  utility is unable to provide the information required under subsection (3) of this
section, the utility shall report:
(a) To the State  Department of Energy the information required by the department by
rule to make the calculations under section 3 (5) of this 2019 Act; and
(b) To the Department of Revenue the total number of kilowatts of electricity generated
using carbon-based fuel and supplied by the utility to consumers in this state in the previous
calendar year.
(5) Each fuel supplier and utility shall keep  records, render statements, make returns
and comply with rules adopted by the Department of Revenue and the State Department of
Energy related to the tax imposed under section 3 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 5.
(1) On or before June 1 of each year, the Department of  Revenue shall send
to each fuel  supplier and utility an assessment that identifies the tax liability of the fuel
supplier or  utility for the previous calendar year for the tax imposed under section 3 of this
2019 Act.
[3]
SB 902
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) On  or before July 1 of each year, each fuel supplier and utility that receives an as-
sessment under subsection (1) of this section shall pay the amount of the  tax liability to the
department.
(3) If the amount paid by the fuel supplier or utility under  subsection (2) of this section
exceeds the amount of tax payable,  the department shall refund the amount of the excess
with interest at  the rate established under ORS 305.220 for each month or fraction of a
month from the date of payment of the  excess until the date of the refund. A refund is not
available to a fuel  supplier or utility that fails to claim the refund within two years after the
due date for the filing of the return with respect to which the claim for refund relates.
(4) If a fuel supplier or utility fails to pay the tax assessed against it under subsection
(1) of this section, the department may enforce collection by the  issuance of a distraint
warrant for the collection of the delinquent amount and all  penalties, interest and collection
charges. The warrant shall be issued, docketed and proceeded upon in the same  manner and
shall have the same force and effect as is prescribed with respect to warrants for the col-
lection of delinquent income taxes.
SECTION 6.
Moneys received by the Department of Revenue pursuant  to the tax imposed
under section 3 of this 2019 Act shall be deposited in a suspense account created pursuant
to ORS 293.445. Moneys in that account shall be distributed as follows:
(1) All moneys collected that constitute  revenues described in Article IX, section 3a, of
the Oregon Constitution, shall be transferred to the State Highway Fund.
(2) All moneys collected that  constitute revenues described in Article VIII, section 2
(1)(g), of the Oregon Constitution, shall be deposited in the Common School Fund.
(3) All moneys collected from sources not described  in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section, minus any amounts the Department of Revenue or State  Department of Energy may
collect to cover  costs incurred by the Department of Revenue or State Department of Energy
in the administration of the tax and  after deducting refunds, shall be paid over to the State
Treasurer and held in the General  Fund as miscellaneous receipts available generally to meet
any expense or obligation of the State of Oregon lawfully incurred.
(4) A working balance of unreceipted revenue  from the tax imposed under section 3 of
this 2019 Act may be retained for the payment of  refunds, but such working balance shall
not at the close of any fiscal year exceed the sum of $
.
(5) Moneys are continuously appropriated to the Department of Revenue  to make the
refunds authorized under this section and section 5 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 7. Except as  otherwise provided in sections 2 to 6 of this 2019 Act, or where
context requires otherwise, the provisions of ORS chapters 305, 314  and 316 as to the audit
and examination of  returns, periods of limitation, determination of and notices of deficien-
cies, assessments, collections, liens,  delinquencies, claims for refund and refunds, confer-
ences, appeals to  the Oregon Tax Court, stays of collection pending appeal, confidentiality
of returns and the penalties relative thereto, and the procedures relating thereto, apply to
the determinations of taxes, penalties and interest under sections 2 to 6 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 8.
For the purpose of first calculating the tax liability of fuel suppliers  and
utilities under section 3 of this  2019 Act, the State Department of Energy shall determine the
amount of  carbon dioxide equivalent by weight emitted by combustion of each carbon-based
fuel and report those determinations to the Department of Revenue.
SECTION 9. (1) In addition  to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
[4]
SB 902
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
priated to the Department of Revenue, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $ , which  may be expended for the purpose of funding
the first year of administration of the tax imposed under section 3 of this 2019 Act.
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to the
State Department of Energy, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of  the General
Fund, the amount of $ , which may be expended for the purpose of assisting the De-
partment of Revenue in administering the first year of the tax imposed under  section 3 of
this 2019 Act.
SECTION 10.  ORS 316.037 is amended to read:
316.037. (1)(a) A tax is imposed for each taxable year  on the entire taxable income of every
resident of this state. The amount of the tax shall be determined in accordance with the following
table:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
If taxable income is: The tax is:
Not over $2,000  5%  of
taxable
income
Over $2,000 but not
over $5,000  [ $100 plus 7% ]
of the excess
over $2,000
Over $5,000 but not
over $125,000  [ $310 plus 9% ]
of the excess
over $5,000
Over $125,000  [ $11,110 plus 9.9% ]
of the excess
over $125,000
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(b) For tax  years beginning in each calendar year, the Department of Revenue shall adopt a
table that shall apply in lieu of the table contained in paragraph (a) of this subsection, as follows:
(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (D) of this paragraph,  the minimum and maximum dollar
amounts for each bracket for which a tax is imposed shall be increased by  the cost-of-living adjust-
ment for the calendar year.
(B) The rate applicable to any rate bracket as adjusted under subparagraph (A)  of this para-
graph [ shall] may  not be changed.
(C) The amounts setting forth the tax, to the extent necessary to reflect the adjustments in the
rate brackets, shall be adjusted.
(D) The rate [ brackets] bracket  applicable to taxable income in excess of  $125,000 may not be
[5]
SB 902
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
adjusted.
(c) For purposes of paragraph  (b) of this subsection, the cost-of-living adjustment for any calen-
dar year is the percentage (if any) by  which the monthly averaged U.S. City Average Consumer
Price Index for the 12 consecutive months ending August 31 of the prior calendar year exceeds the
monthly averaged index for the second quarter of the calendar year [ 1992] 2019.
(d) As used in this subsection, “U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index” means the U.S.  City
Average Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (All  Items) as published by the Bureau of
Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(e) If any increase determined under paragraph (b) of this subsection is not a multiple  of $50,
the increase shall be rounded to the next lower multiple of $50.
(2) A tax is imposed for each taxable year upon  the entire taxable income of every part-year
resident of this state. The amount of  the tax shall be computed under subsection (1) of this section
as if the part-year resident  were a full-year resident and shall be multiplied by the ratio provided
under ORS 316.117 to determine the tax on income derived from sources within this state.
(3) A tax  is imposed for each taxable year on the taxable income of every full-year nonresident
that is derived from sources within this state. The amount of the tax  shall be determined in ac-
cordance with the table set forth in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 13.
(1) Sections 2 to 6 of this 2019 Act apply to carbon  dioxide emissions from
the combustion of carbon-based fuel sold to consumers  in this state or used to produce
carbon-generated electricity that is supplied to consumers in this state on  or after January
1, 2019.
(2) The amendments to ORS 316.037 by section 10 of this  2019 Act apply to tax years be-
ginning on or after January 1, 2019.
SECTION 14. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[6]