Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Definitions. As used in sections 1 to 17 of this 2019 Act:
(1) “Average weekly wage” means the  amount calculated by the Employment Department
as the state average weekly covered wage under ORS 657.150 (4)(d) as determined not more
than once per year.
(2) “Base year” means the first four of the last  five completed calendar quarters pre-
ceding the benefit year.
(3) “Benefit year” means the 12-month period  beginning on the first day of the week in
which a covered individual’s period of family leave or medical leave commences.
(4) “Covered individual” means any  of the following who receives paid family and medical
leave insurance benefits:
(a) An eligible employee; or
(b) An unemployed individual who is  not receiving unemployment insurance benefits un-
der ORS chapter 657.
(5) “Eligible employee” means an employee who has worked at least 820 hours  for any
employer in this state during the base year.
(6) “Eligible employee’s average wage” means an amount determined  by the Director of
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4261
HB 3385
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the Department  of Consumer and Business Services on the basis of an eligible employee’s
average wages per week during the base year.
(7)(a) “Employee” means an individual employed for  remuneration or under any contract
of hire, written or oral, express or implied, by an employer.
(b) “Employee” does not include:
(A) An independent contractor as defined in ORS 670.600.
(B) A participant in a work training program administered under a state  or federal as-
sistance program.
(C) A  participant in a work-study program that provides students in secondary or
postsecondary educational institutions with employment opportunities  for financial assist-
ance or vocational training.
(D) A railroad worker exempted under the  federal Railroad Unemployment Insurance
Act.
(E) A volunteer.
(8)(a) “Employer” means any person  that employs one or more employees working any-
where in this state, a political  subdivision of the state or any county, city, district, authority,
public corporation or entity,  or any instrumentality of a county, city, district, authority,
public corporation or entity, organized and existing under law or charter.
(b) “Employer” does not include the federal government or a tribal government.
(9) “Family and medical leave insurance benefits” means the insurance  benefits provided
under the terms of a plan developed under section 3 or 6 of this 2019 Act.
(10) “Family leave” means leave taken by an employee from work:
(a) To care  for and bond with an infant or a newly adopted child or newly placed foster
child under 18  years of age, during the first year after the infant’s birth or the child’s
adoption or placement.
(b) To care for a family member with a serious health condition.
(c) For military family leave described under ORS 659A.090 to 659A.099.
(11) “Family member” has the meaning given that term in ORS 659A.150.
(12) “Medical leave” means a period of leave taken  by an employee from work because
the employee is unable to perform work due to a serious health condition.
(13) “Serious health condition” has the meaning given that term in ORS 659A.150.
SECTION 2.
Oregon Paid Family  and Medical Leave Board. (1) The Oregon Paid Family
and Medical Leave Board is  established in the Department of Consumer and Business Ser-
vices. The board consists of nine members as follows:
(a) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services or the  designee
of the director.
(b) The following members appointed by the Governor:
(A) A representative of employers that employ 100 or more employees.
(B) A representative of employers that employ fewer than 10 employees.
(C) A representative of employees.
(D) A representative from the field of private insurance  who has expertise in absence
management, including expertise assessing employee productivity and absenteeism.
(E) A representative from the field of private insurance who has  expertise in disability
insurance.
(F) A member of the public.
[2]
HB 3385
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) A member of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate to be a  nonvoting
advisory member of the board.
(d) A member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives to be a nonvoting advisory member of the board.
(2) Members of the board appointed by the Governor must  be confirmed by the Senate
in the manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
(3) The term of office of each member of the board appointed  by the Governor is four
years, but a member appointed by the Governor serves at  the pleasure of the Governor and
is eligible for reappointment. If there is a vacancy for any  cause, the Governor shall make
an appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(4) Each legislative member serves at the pleasure of the appointing  authority and may
serve as long as the member  remains in the chamber of the Legislative Assembly from which
the member was appointed.
(5) The director or the designee appointed to the board under subsection  (1) of this sec-
tion shall serve as chairperson of the board.
(6) A majority of the voting  members of the board constitutes a quorum for the trans-
action of business.
(7) The department shall provide staff support to the board.
SECTION 3.
Powers and duties of the Oregon Paid Family and Medical Leave  Board. (1)
The Oregon Paid Family and Medical Leave Board shall:
(a) Develop an employee-financed paid family and  medical leave plan that uses existing
insurance products that are available in the insurance marketplace to provide family and
medical leave insurance benefits that are payable as a percentage of an eligible employee’s
average wage provided that the employee:
(A) Files an application for family and medical leave insurance benefits; and
(B) Contributes an amount  determined by the Oregon Paid Family and Medical Leave
Board to the Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund established under section 10 of
this 2019 Act during the base year prior to filing an application.
(b) Conduct a labor market, cost-benefit and legal analysis of the plan.
(2) The board shall have the following powers:
(a) To establish, implement and maintain the plan developed under this section.
(b) To adopt rules for the general administration of the plan.
(c) To collect application,  account or administrative fees to defray the costs of adminis-
tering the plan.
(d) To make and enter into contracts, agreements or arrangements, and  to retain, em-
ploy and contract for, any of the following considered necessary or desirable  for carrying out
the purposes set forth in sections 1 to 17 of this 2019 Act:
(A) Insurance products that have diverse risk pooling requirements.
(B) Services of private  and public financial institutions, depositories, consultants and
third-party plan administrators.
(C) Research, technical and other services.
(D) Services of other state agencies to assist the board in its duties.
(e) To evaluate the  need for, and procure as needed, pooled, private insurance of the plan.
(f) To establish the initial rate at which an eligible employee shall contribute to  the plan
to finance the costs of paying family and medical leave insurance  benefits, provided that the
[3]
HB 3385
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
rate does not exceed 0.4 percent of the employee’s wages.
(g) To establish the  amount of family and medical leave insurance benefits that an eligi-
ble employee qualifies for based on the amount  of wages earned by the eligible employee
during the base year that are equal  to or less than a percentage, determined by the board,
of the average weekly wage.
(h) To review on an annual basis the amount of contributions  collected from eligible
employees and calculate an adjustment to the rate  at which an employee contributes to the
plan based on:
(A) The amount of an eligible employee’s average  wage that is equal to or less than an
amount determined by the board; or
(B) An increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for All  Urban Consumers, West
Region (All Items), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States  De-
partment of Labor.
(i) To develop and implement an outreach plan to gain input and disseminate information
regarding the plan in general.
SECTION 4. Requirements for the Oregon Paid Family and Medical Leave Plan. Except
as otherwise provided under section 6 of this 2019  Act, the plan developed by the Oregon Paid
Family and Medical Leave Board under section 3 of this 2019 Act must:
(1) Require an eligible employee to contribute to the Paid Family and Medical Leave In-
surance Fund established under section 10 of this 2019 Act  through payroll deductions at a
rate determined by the board under section 3 of this 2019 Act.
(2) Require employers,  regardless of the number of employees employed by the employer,
to collect employee contributions  to the plan as payroll deductions to be deposited in the Paid
Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund established under section 10 of this 2019 Act.
(3) Provide for automatic enrollment of eligible employees in the plan.
(4) Whenever possible, use existing employer and public infrastructure to facilitate con-
tributions to the plan, recordkeeping and outreach.
(5) Permit but may not require employer contributions to the plan.
(6) Require the maintenance of separate  records and accounting for each eligible em-
ployee who qualifies for family and medical leave insurance benefits under the plan.
(7) Provide family and medical leave insurance benefits that are payable to a covered in-
dividual who:
(a) Takes family leave; or
(b) Takes medical leave.
(8) Permit a covered individual to qualify for family and medical leave benefits  for up to:
(a) Six weeks of medical leave; and
(b) Twelve weeks of family leave.
(9) Provide family and medical leave insurance benefits  for leave that is taken by a cov-
ered individual in increments that are equivalent to the regular scheduled work  shift that
an employer requires the individual to work.
(10) Require that the first payment  of benefits must be made to a covered individual
within two weeks  after the individual commences leave and that subsequent payments must
be made every two weeks.
(11) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, prohibit  an employer from re-
quiring a covered individual to take more leave than the covered individual requests.
[4]
HB 3385
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(12) Allow a covered individual to take less leave than is available to the individual under
the plan.
(13) Permit an eligible employee who changes jobs to retain the  employee’s status as an
eligible employee and retain any family and  medical leave insurance benefits accrued by the
employee as long as the employee is not employed by an employer outside this state.
SECTION 5. Rules for the Oregon Paid  Family and Medical Leave Plan. Not later than
September 1, 2020, the Oregon Paid Family and Medical Leave Board shall adopt rules that:
(1) Establish the  process for automatic enrollment of eligible employees in the plan de-
veloped under section 3 of this 2019 Act.
(2) Establish the process by  which employers shall withhold employee contributions to
the plan developed under section 3 of this 2019 Act as payroll deductions  and remit the con-
tributions to the  Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund established under section
10 of this 2019 Act.
(3) Establish the process for an eligible employee to receive family  and medical leave in-
surance benefits under the plan developed under section 3 of this 2019 Act.
(4) Require employers that employ 25 or more employees to:
(a) Restore an eligible employee who has returned to work to the position of employment
held by the employee when the employee’s leave commenced  if that position still exists,
without regard to whether the employer filled the position with a  replacement worker during
the period of leave taken pursuant to the plan developed under section 3 of this  2019 Act; or
(b) Restore  the eligible employee to any available equivalent position with equivalent
employment benefits, pay and other terms and conditions of employment, if the position  held
by the employee at the time the leave commenced no longer exists.
(5) Require an employer to maintain, for  the duration of a period of family leave or
medical leave, any health care benefits to which  an eligible employee was entitled prior to
taking such leave, as if the employee had continued in employment  continuously from the
date the employee commenced the leave until the date the family and medical leave  insur-
ance benefits terminate.
(6) Prohibit retaliation or discrimination against  an individual with respect to hire or
tenure or any other term or condition of  employment because the individual has inquired
about family or medical leave benefits or filed an application for benefits.
(7) Establish penalties for  the payment or overpayment of family and medical leave in-
surance benefits as a result of fraud, misrepresentation or  willful nondisclosure on the part
of an employee.
(8) Establish a process  for employers to apply for approval of an employer-offered plan
described under section 6 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 6.
Equivalent employer plans. (1) An employer may apply to the Oregon Paid
Family and Medical Leave Board for  approval of an employer-offered plan that provides
family and medical  leave insurance benefits to eligible employees. An employer shall apply
for approval in the manner prescribed by the board by rule.
(2) The board shall approve  an employer plan that meets all of the following require-
ments:
(a) The plan is made available to all eligible employees who are employed by the employer.
(b) The benefits afforded to the employees who are covered under the employer  plan are
equal to or  greater than the amount of benefits, including duration of leave, that an eligible
[5]
HB 3385
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
employee would qualify for under the family  and medical leave plan developed by the board
under section 3 of this 2019 Act.
(c) The plan requires employers that employ 25 or more employees to restore  an em-
ployee who takes family leave or medical leave to the position of employment held by  the
employee when the employee’s leave commenced, if that  position still exists, or if the posi-
tion no longer  exists, to restore the employee to any available equivalent position with
equivalent employment benefits, pay and other terms and conditions of employment.
(d) The plan  requires the employer to maintain, for the duration of a period of family
leave or medical leave, any health care benefits to which an eligible  employee was entitled
prior to  taking such leave, as if the employee had continued in employment continuously
from the date the employee commenced the leave until the date the family and  medical leave
insurance benefits terminate.
(3) An employer may assume  all or a part of the cost of a plan approved under this sec-
tion.
(4) An  employer may deduct employee contributions from the wages of an eligible em-
ployee to finance the costs of the plan, provided that  the contribution amounts do not exceed
the contribution amount the eligible employee would pay under the  plan developed under
section 3 of this 2019 Act.
(5) An employer that  offers a plan that has been approved by the board under this section
shall be deemed to have satisfied the requirements under section 4 of this 2019 Act.
(6) At any time that an eligible employee separates employment with an employer  that
offers a plan under this section, the employee is automatically  considered to be enrolled in
the plan developed under section 3 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 7. Enforcement and confidentiality. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 183.635,  the Di-
rector of  the Department of Consumer and Business Services shall establish a system for
enforcement and appeal of contested cases involving family and  medical leave insurance
benefit claims under ORS chapter 183.  In establishing the system, the director may utilize
any and all procedures and appeals mechanisms.
(2) The  director shall implement procedures to ensure confidentiality of all information
related to any claims filed or appeals taken to the maximum extent  permitted by applicable
laws.
(3) All information in the records of the Department of  Consumer and Business Services
pertaining to the administration of sections 1 to 17 of this 2019 Act:
(a) Is confidential and for the exclusive use and  information of the director in adminis-
tering sections 1 to 17 of this 2019 Act;
(b) May not be used in any court  action or in any proceeding pending in the court unless
the director or the State of Oregon is a party to the action or proceeding or unless the action
or proceeding concerns the establishment, enforcement  or modification of a support obli-
gation and support services are being provided by the Division of Child  Support of the De-
partment of Justice or the district attorney pursuant to ORS 25.080; and
(c) Is exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(4) At the discretion of  the director and subject to an interagency agreement, the direc-
tor may disclose information  to a public official in the performance of the public official’s
official duties administering or enforcing laws within  the public official’s authority and to
an agent or contractor of a public official. The public official shall agree to assume respon-
[6]
HB 3385
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sibility for misuse of the information by the public official’s agent or contractor.
(5) At the  discretion of the director, the director may disclose information to a contrac-
tor pursuant to  a contract for actuarial services. The contractor may disclose the informa-
tion to an agent of the contractor and shall  agree to assume responsibility for misuse of the
information by the agent of the contractor.
SECTION 8. Coordination of leave. Family or medical leave  taken under sections 1 to 17
of this 2019 Act  must be taken concurrently with any leave that may be taken by an em-
ployee who is eligible for leave under ORS 659A.150 to 659A.186 or under the federal Family
and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (P.L. 103-3) for the same or similar purposes.
SECTION 9. Collective bargaining agreements. (1) Sections 1 to 17 of this 2019 Act do not
diminish an employer’s  obligation to comply with a collective bargaining agreement, an em-
ployer policy or local, state or federal law.
(2) An eligible employee’s right to  family and medical leave insurance benefits under
sections 1 to 17 of  this 2019 Act may not be waived in or diminished by a collective bargaining
agreement entered into or renewed, or an employee policy adopted or  retained, after the ef-
fective date of this 2019 Act.
(3) Nothing in sections  1 to 17 of this 2019 Act requires the reopening or renegotiation
of a collective bargaining agreement, prior to the  date of expiration of the collective bar-
gaining agreement, entered into before the effective date of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 10. Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund. (1) The Paid Family and
Medical Leave Insurance Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct
from the General Fund. The Paid Family and Medical Leave Insurance Fund is declared to
be a trust fund for the uses and purposes set forth in sections 1 to 17 of this 2019 Act.
(2) The fund consists of moneys deposited in the fund from employee  contributions in the
manner prescribed by the Oregon Paid Family and Medical Leave Board pursuant  to section
3 of this 2019 Act and may include fees, revenue or other income deposited in the fund.
(3)(a) The fund shall  be used solely in the payment of benefits under sections 1 to 17 of
this 2019 Act and the payment of administrative costs and expenses that the Oregon Paid
Family and Medical Leave Board incurs in carrying out the duties  of the board under
sections 1 to 17 of this 2019 Act.
(b) The benefits shall be payable from the fund only to the extent that the contributions
and moneys collected are available.
(4) Interest earned by the fund shall be credited to the fund. All moneys in  the fund are
continuously appropriated to the Department of Consumer and Business Services  for the
purposes of carrying out the duties of the board under sections 1 to 17 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 11.
Prerequisites to establishment of Oregon Paid Family and Medical  Leave
Plan. Before establishing a plan developed under section  3 of this 2019 Act, the Oregon Paid
Family and Medical Leave Board shall:
(1) Conduct a labor market, cost-benefit and legal analysis to determine:
(a) The feasibility of the plan.
(b) Whether and to what extent plans with the  characteristics described in section 4 of
this 2019 Act currently exist in the private market.
(2) Perform an actuarial analysis of the plan.
SECTION 12.
Annual reports. The Oregon Paid Family and Medical Leave Board  shall
report in each calendar year to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related
[7]
HB 3385
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to business and workforce detailing the board’s progress and activities.
SECTION 13. Preemption. Sections 1 to  17 of this 2019 Act supersede and preempt any
rule, regulation, code or ordinance of any  unit of a local government, as defined in ORS
174.116, relating to paid family and medical leave.
SECTION 14. State agencies to assist with outreach, technical assistance and compliance
services. The Secretary of  State, the Department of Revenue, the Employment Department,
the Bureau of  Labor and Industries and any other agency that enters into an intergovern-
mental agreement with the Oregon Paid Family and Medical Leave Board to provide out-
reach, technical assistance or compliance services shall collaborate to provide  the outreach,
technical assistance or compliance services to the board.
SECTION 15.
The Oregon Paid Family  and Medical Leave Board shall report to a com-
mittee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related to business and  workforce
on or before February 15, 2020. The report must include:
(1) The results of the analyses conducted by the board under sections 3 and 11 of this 2019
Act.
(2) An analysis of potential costs to employers associated with  providing automatic pay-
roll deductions for participation in the plan developed  under section 3 of this 2019 Act, and
recommendations on how to eliminate or reduce those costs  through incentives, tax credits
or other means.
(3) A timeline for developing and establishing the plan developed under section 3 of  this
2019 Act, providing that eligible employees may begin making contributions as required under
section 16 of this 2019 Act.
(4) An overview of any contracts entered into by the board in the performance of  its
duties.
SECTION 16. The Oregon Paid Family and Medical Leave  Board shall establish the paid
family and medical leave plan developed under  section 3 of this 2019 Act such that eligible
employees may begin making contributions as payroll deductions to the  plan no later than
January 1, 2021.
SECTION 17. Timeline of initial appointments to board. (1) The Governor, the  President
of the Senate and the Speaker of the  House of Representatives shall first make appointments
to the Oregon Paid Family and Medical Leave Board  for terms of office beginning on De-
cember 31, 2019.
(2) Notwithstanding the term of office specified in section 2 of this 2019  Act, of the
members first appointed to the board by the Governor:
(a) Two shall serve for a term ending August 31, 2021.
(b) Two shall serve for a term ending August 31, 2022.
(c) Two shall serve for a term ending August 31, 2023.
SECTION 18.
Section 19 of this 2019 Act is added  to and made a part of ORS 657.115 to
657.140.
SECTION 19.  Wages;  exclusion of payment to replacement employees.  As used in ORS
657.105, “wages” includes  the amount of any payment made to an individual who was hired
to temporarily fill the position of a permanent employee who is taking leave and who is re-
ceiving family and medical leave insurance benefits under sections 1 to 17 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 659A.153 is amended to read:
659A.153. (1) The requirements of ORS 659A.150 to 659A.186 apply [ only] to employers who em-
[8]
HB 3385
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
ploy [ 25] one or more  persons in the State of Oregon for each working day during each of 20 or
more calendar workweeks in the year in which the leave is to be taken or in  the year immediately
preceding the year in which the leave is to be taken.
(2) The requirements of ORS 659A.150 to 659A.186 do not apply to any employer who  offers to
an eligible employee a nondiscriminatory cafeteria plan, as defined  by section 125 of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, providing, as one of its options, employee leave at least as generous as  the
leave required by ORS 659A.150 to 659A.186.
SECTION 21.  ORS 657.100 is amended to read:
657.100. (1) An individual is deemed “unemployed” in  any week during which the individual
performs no services and with respect to which no remuneration for  services performed is paid or
payable to the individual, or in any week of less than full-time  work if the remuneration paid or
payable to the individual for services performed during the week is less  than the individual’s weekly
benefit amount.
(2) For the purposes of ORS 657.155 (1), an individual who performs full-time services in any
week for an employing unit is not unemployed  even though remuneration is neither paid nor payable
to the individual for the services  performed; however, nothing in this subsection shall prevent an
individual from meeting the definition of  “unemployed” as used in this section solely by reason of
the individual’s  performance of volunteer services without remuneration for a charitable institution
or a governmental entity.
(3) An individual may not be  deemed “unemployed” under this section for any week in
which the  individual is receiving family and medical leave insurance benefits under section
1 of this 2019 Act.
[(3)] (4) The Director of the Employment Department shall prescribe rules as the director  deems
necessary with respect to the various types of unemployment.
SECTION 22. Section captions. The section captions  used in this 2019 Act are provided
only for the convenience of the reader  and do not become part of the statutory law of this
state or express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 23. Federal severability. If any part of the plan developed under section 3 of
this 2019 Act is found to be in conflict with federal  requirements that are a prescribed con-
dition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of employers  in this
state for federal unemployment tax credits, the conflicting  part of the plan is inoperative
solely to the extent of the conflict.
SECTION 24. Effective date. This 2019 Act being  necessary for the immediate preserva-
tion of  the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2019
Act takes effect on its passage.
[9]