Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Department of Fish  and Wildlife may not take any action to close
a public or private fish hatchery engaged  in the propagation of any species used as an ex-
ploitation rate indicator stock  pursuant to the Pacific Salmon Treaty, and any amendments
thereto, or any other treaty entered into between the Unites  States and Canada, unless the
department receives prior approval to do so by an Act of the Legislative Assembly.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1794