Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any contrary provision  of law or common law, a
veterinarian that has provided treatment to an animal may not require the owner of  the
animal to surrender the animal to the veterinarian, or otherwise require the owner to leave
the animal with the veterinarian after completion of the treatment, on the basis that  the
owner has not paid for the treatment.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3652