Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $____ for deposit in the Emergency Housing
Account established under ORS 458.620, for the purpose of providing services  and assistance
to school-aged children enrolled in kindergarten through grade 12, or  their families, who are
homeless or at risk of becoming homeless.
SECTION 2. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Human Services, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out
of the General  Fund, the amount of $12,500,000, for the purpose of awarding grants to in-
crease access by youth experiencing homelessness to shelter facilities,  outreach, culturally
specific services and mental health or substance abuse services, and  to strengthen partner-
ships with host home programs and other transitional housing options.
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to the
Department of Human Services, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $12,500,000, for the  purpose of providing two-year grants to organiza-
tions operating host home projects to establish, continue or expand operation of host home
projects for youth experiencing homelessness.
SECTION 3.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3561