Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
DISABILITY DISCRIMINATION
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of  this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
659A.103 to 659A.145.
SECTION 2. The Bureau of  Labor and Industries shall create guidance and informational
materials to assist employers in complying with the provisions of ORS  659A.112, 659A.118 and
659A.121 concerning reasonable accommodation. The bureau shall make the materials  avail-
able to employers on the bureau’s website.
SECTION 3. (1) The Bureau of Labor and Industries shall establish a program  to admin-
ister and coordinate low-cost or no-cost  mediation services for the resolution of disputes
related to reasonable accommodation under ORS 659A.112.
(2) The bureau may contract with, or use the services of, a private  mediation organiza-
tion, a community-based program, another state agency or a  combination of organizations
and agencies to provide the mediation services described in this section.
SECTION 4.  ORS 659A.112 is amended to read:
659A.112. (1) It is an unlawful employment practice for any employer to refuse to hire, employ
or promote, to bar or discharge from employment or to discriminate in compensation or in terms,
conditions or privileges of employment on the basis of disability.
(2) An employer violates subsection (1)  of this section if the employer does any of the following:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1859
HB 2742
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The employer limits, segregates or classifies a job applicant or employee in  a way that ad-
versely affects the opportunities or  status of the applicant or employee because the applicant or
employee has a disability.
(b) The employer participates in a contractual or other  arrangement or relationship that has the
effect of subjecting a qualified job applicant or employee with a  disability to the discrimination
prohibited by ORS 659A.112 to 659A.139, including but not limited to participating  in a relationship
with an employment or referral agency, a labor union, an organization providing fringe benefits to
an employee of the employer, or an organization providing training and apprenticeship programs.
(c) The employer utilizes standards, criteria or methods of administration that have the effect
of discrimination on the basis of  disability, or that perpetuate the discrimination of others who are
subject to common administrative control.
(d) The employer excludes or otherwise denies equal jobs or benefits  to a qualified individual
because the individual is known to have a relationship or association with an individual  with a
disability.
(e) The employer does not  make reasonable accommodation to the known physical or mental
limitations of a qualified individual with a disability who is a job applicant or employee,  unless the
employer can demonstrate that the accommodation would  impose an undue hardship on the opera-
tion of the business of the employer.
(f) The employer denies employment opportunities to a job  applicant or employee who is a
qualified individual with a disability, if the denial is based on the need of the employer to  make
reasonable accommodation to the physical or mental impairments of the employee or applicant.
(g) The employer uses qualification standards, employment tests  or other selection criteria, in-
cluding those based on  an individual’s uncorrected vision or unaided hearing, that screen out or
tend to screen  out an individual with a disability or a class of individuals with disabilities unless
the standard, test or  other selection criterion, as used by the employer, is shown to be job-related
for the position in question and is consistent with business necessity.
(h) The employer  fails to select and administer tests relating to employment in the most effective
manner to ensure that when the test is administered to a job applicant or  employee who has a dis-
ability that impairs sensory, manual or speaking skills, the test results accurately reflect the  skills,
aptitude or other  characteristics of the applicant or employee that the test purports to measure,
rather than reflecting the impaired sensory, manual or speaking  skills of the employee or applicant.
The provisions of this paragraph do not limit the ability of an employer to select or  administer tests
designed to measure sensory, manual or speaking skills of an employee or job applicant.
(i) The employer uses minimum physical requirements set forth in a job posting to screen
out individuals with disabilities  without connecting how the physical requirements are es-
sential functions of the job.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 659A.118 is amended to read:
659A.118. (1) For the purposes of ORS 659A.112, reasonable accommodation may include:
(a) Making existing facilities used by employees  readily accessible to and usable by individuals
with disabilities.
(b) Job restructuring, part-time or  modified work schedules or reassignment to a vacant position.
(c) Acquisition or modification of equipment or devices.
(d) Appropriate adjustment or modification of examinations, training materials or policies.
(e) The provision of qualified readers or interpreters.
(2) An employer is not required to provide a  reasonable accommodation to an individual who
[2]
HB 2742
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
satisfies the criteria for being an individual with a disability  for the purposes of ORS 659A.103 to
659A.145 solely because the individual meets the criterion described in ORS 659A.104 (1)(c).
(3) An employer may not  deny a request by an employee who is represented by a labor
organization to have a representative accompany  the employee in any discussion over mat-
ters concerning reasonable accommodation.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 659A.142 is amended to read:
659A.142. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Health care facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 442.015.
(b) “Health professional regulatory board” has the meaning given that term in ORS 676.160.
(c) “Local government” means any city, county, school  district or other special district
in this state.
[(c)] (d) “Medical resources” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Medical devices or equipment.
(B) Prescription drugs.
(C) Laboratory testing.
[(d)] (e) “Provider” means:
(A) An individual licensed or certified by a health professional regulatory board.
(B) A health care facility.
[(e)] (f) “State government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.111.
(2) It is an unlawful employment practice for an employment agency to fail or  refuse to refer for
employment, or otherwise  discriminate against, any individual because that individual has a disa-
bility, or to classify or refer for employment any individual because that individual  has a disability.
(3) It is an unlawful employment practice for a labor  organization, because an individual has a
disability, to exclude or to expel from its membership such individual  or to discriminate in any way
against such individual.
(4) It is an unlawful practice for any place  of public accommodation, resort or amusement as
defined in ORS 659A.400, or  any person acting on behalf of such place, to make any distinction,
discrimination or restriction because a customer or patron is an individual with a disability.
(5)(a) It is an unlawful practice for state or local  government to exclude an individual from
participation in or deny an individual the benefits  of the services, programs or activities of state
or local government or to make any distinction, discrimination or restriction because the individual
has a disability.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection  is intended to ensure equal access to available services,
programs and activities of state  and local  government.
(c) Paragraph (a) of this subsection is not intended to:
(A) Create an independent entitlement to any  service, program or activity of state  or local
government; or
(B) Require state  or local  government to take any action that state  or local  government can
demonstrate would result in a fundamental alteration in the nature of a service, program or  activity
of state  or local  government or would result in  undue financial or administrative burdens on state
or local government.
(6)(a) It is an unlawful practice for a provider or any person acting on behalf of a  provider to
discriminate by doing any of the following based on the patient’s race, color, national  origin, sex,
sexual orientation, gender identity, age or disability:
(A) Deny medical treatment to the patient that is likely to benefit  the patient based on an in-
[3]
HB 2742
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
dividualized assessment of the patient using objective medical evidence; or
(B) Limit or restrict in any manner the allocation of medical resources to the patient.
(b) In determining whether medical treatment  is likely to benefit a patient under paragraph
(a)(A) of this subsection, a provider shall consult with the patient and others legally authorized  to
act on behalf of the patient, if available.
(c) This subsection does not:
(A) Restrict the authority  of a patient, or an individual legally authorized to act on behalf of a
patient, to consent to or decline medical treatment;
(B) Require the provision of medical treatment that is prohibited by state or federal law; or
(C) Restrict a provider, after completing the individualized assessment  described in paragraph
(a)(A) of this subsection and the consultation described in  paragraph (b) of this subsection, from
providing objective information to the patient about the risks and benefits of treatment.
(7) Receipt or alleged receipt  of treatment for a mental disorder does not constitute evidence
of an individual’s inability to acquire, rent or maintain property.
OUTREACH, RECRUITMENT AND RETENTION PLANS
SECTION 7.
 ORS 279A.100 is amended to read:
279A.100. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Affirmative action” means a program designed to ensure equal opportunity  in employment
and business for persons otherwise disadvantaged by reason of race, color,  religion, sex, national
origin, age or physical or mental disability or a policy  to give a preference in awarding public
contracts to disabled veterans.
(b) “Disabled veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
(2) The provisions of the Public  Contracting Code may not be construed to prohibit a contract-
ing agency  from engaging in public contracting practices designed to promote affirmative action
goals, policies or programs for disadvantaged or  minority groups or to give a preference in awarding
public contracts to disabled veterans.
(3) In carrying out an affirmative action goal, policy or program, a contracting agency :
(a) By appropriate ordinance, resolution or rule may limit competition for a public  contract for
goods and services, or for any other public contract estimated to cost $50,000 or less,  to contracting
entities owned or controlled by persons described in subsection (1) of this section.
(b) Establish and execute a plan for outreach,  recruitment and retention of persons with
disabilities to perform work on public improvement projects.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 659A.012 is amended to read:
659A.012. (1) To  achieve the public policy of the State of Oregon for persons in the state to at-
tain employment and advancement without discrimination because of race, religion, color, sex,  mar-
ital status, national origin, disability or age, every state  agency shall be required to include in the
evaluation of all management personnel the manager’s or supervisor’s  effectiveness in achieving af-
firmative action objectives as a key consideration of the manager’s or supervisor’s performance.
(2) To achieve the public  policy of the State of Oregon for persons in the state to attain em-
ployment and advancement without discrimination because  of race, religion, color, sex, marital sta-
tus, national origin, age or disability, every state agency shall be required  to present the affirmative
action objectives and performance of that agency  of the current biennium and those for the follow-
ing biennium to the Governor of the State  of Oregon and to the Legislative Assembly. These plans
[4]
HB 2742
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
shall:
(a) Be reviewed as part of the budget review process.
(b) Include strategies for outreach, recruitment and retention of persons with  disabili-
ties.
SECTION 9.
The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader  and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
[5]