Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Corrections Budget Oversight Commission is  estab-
lished, consisting of 11 members appointed by the Governor.
(2) The term of office of each member of the  commission is four years, but a member
serves at the pleasure of the Governor. Before the expiration of the term  of a member, the
Governor shall appoint a successor whose term begins on July 1  next following. A member
is eligible for reappointment. If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make
an appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(3) The appointment of each member of the commission is subject to confirmation by the
Senate in the manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
(4) A member of the commission is entitled  to compensation and expenses as provided in
ORS 292.495.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding the term of office specified by section  1 of this 2017 Act,
of the  members first appointed to the Department of Corrections Budget Oversight Com-
mission:
(1) Three shall serve for a term ending June 30, 2019.
(2) Three shall serve for a term ending June 30, 2020.
(3) Three shall serve for a term ending June 30, 2021.
(4) Two shall serve for a term ending June 30, 2022.
SECTION 3.
(1) The members of the Department of Corrections Budget Oversight Com-
mission must be  residents of this state with experience and expertise in the state and local
correction system and the criminal justice system in this  state, including but not limited to:
(a) Two representatives of labor organizations whose  members are employed in the state
corrections system;
(b) Representatives of organizations that advocate regarding issues pertaining to the
state and local corrections system;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2792
HB 2105
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Representatives of public, private, profit and nonprofit agencies,  organizations and
other entities with experience in, interest in and responsibility for the provision of services
to persons in the custody of the Department of Corrections;
(d) Members of the Oregon  State Bar with expertise in the state and local correction
system and the criminal justice system in this state; and
(e) Representatives of law enforcement agencies and district attorneys.
(2) The members  of the commission shall select one of the commission’s members to
serve as chairperson and another to serve as vice chairperson,  for terms and with duties and
powers necessary for the performance of  the functions of the offices as the commission de-
termines.
(3) A majority of the members of the commission constitutes a quorum  for the trans-
action of business.
(4) The commission shall meet at  least once every three months at a time and place de-
termined by the chairperson of the commission. The commission also may meet at  other
times and places specified by the  call of the chairperson or of a majority of the members of
the commission.
(5) All agencies of  state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist the
commission in the performance of the commission’s duties, powers  and obligations and, to
the extent permitted  by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information that the
members of the commission consider necessary  in order to further the work of the com-
mission. The assistance under this  subsection may constitute the provision of staffing re-
sources to the commission.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Department of Corrections Budget Oversight Commission shall ad-
vise the  Governor and the Director of the Department of Corrections, and make recom-
mendations for legislation, regarding the management and implementation of  the biennial
budget of the department, including employee overtime expenses and health care expenses.
(2) The commission may establish  any advisory or technical committees the commission
considers necessary to aid and advise  the commission in the performance of its functions.
The committees  may be continuing or temporary committees. The commission shall deter-
mine the representation, membership, terms and organization  of the committees and shall
appoint the members of the committees. Members of  the committees are not entitled to
compensation but, at the discretion of the  commission, may be reimbursed from funds
available to the commission for actual and necessary travel and  other expenses incurred by
the members in the performance of official  duties in the manner and amount provided in
ORS 292.495.
(3) The commission may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
(4) Not later than January 1 of each year, the  commission shall submit a report to the
Governor and the Legislative Assembly  in the manner provided by ORS 192.245. The report
shall describe the findings and  recommendations of the commission regarding the imple-
mentation of the biennial budget of  the department and any recommendations for legislation
the commission determines are appropriate.
SECTION 5.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]