Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 81, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 81.  As used in sections 81 to 86 [ of this 2024 Act ], chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024 :
(1) “Commission” means the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(2) “Local correctional facility” has the meaning  given that term in ORS 169.005 and also
means any facility operated by a county  supervisory authority, as defined in ORS 144.087,
including facilities for providing corrections supervision services or custodial services .
(3) “Tribal correctional facility” means a jail or prison in Oregon that is  operated by a federally
recognized tribe and confines persons for more than 36 hours.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 847