Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
ORS 274.885, 274.890 and 274.895 are repealed.
SECTION 2.  ORS 274.990 is amended to read:
274.990. Violation of ORS  274.745 [ or 274.895 ], or any rule promulgated under [ such sections ]
that section , is a misdemeanor.
SECTION 3.  ORS 506.011 is amended to read:
506.011. As used in the commercial fishing laws, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Anadromous fish” includes but is not limited to salmon, as defined in ORS 506.016; roccus
saxatilis, commonly  known as striped bass; alosa sapidissima, commonly known as shad; acipenser
medirostris and acipenser transmontanus, commonly  known as sturgeon; and thaleichthys pacificus,
commonly known as smelt.
(2) “Animals living  intertidally on the bottom” includes but is not limited to starfish, sea
urchins, sea cucumbers, snails, bivalves, worms, coelenterates and shore, hermit and other  small
crabs not included within subsection (1) or (7) of this section.
(3) “Black rockfish” means sebastes melanops, commonly known as black rockfish.
(4) “Blue rockfish” means sebastes mystinus, commonly known as blue rockfish.
(5) “Food fish” means any animal over which the State Fish and Wildlife Commission  has juris-
diction pursuant to ORS 506.036.
(6) “Nearshore fish” means:
(a) Enophrys bison, commonly known as buffalo sculpin;
(b) Hemilepidotus hemilepidotus, commonly known as red Irish lord;
(c) Hemilepidotus spinosus, commonly known as brown Irish lord;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4106
HB 3193
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Scorpaenichthys marmoratus, commonly known as cabezon;
(e) Hexagrammos decagrammus, commonly known as kelp greenling;
(f) Hexagrammos lagocephalus, commonly known as rock greenling;
(g) Hexagrammos stelleri, commonly known as whitespotted greenling;
(h) Oxylebius pictus, commonly known as painted greenling;
(i) Sebastes atrovirens, commonly known as kelp rockfish;
(j) Sebastes auriculatus, commonly known as brown rockfish;
(k) Sebastes carnatus, commonly known as gopher rockfish;
(L) Sebastes caurinus, commonly known as copper rockfish;
(m) Sebastes chrysomelas, commonly known as black and yellow rockfish;
(n) Sebastes dalli, commonly known as calico rockfish;
(o) Sebastes maliger, commonly known as quillback rockfish;
(p) Sebastes miniatus, commonly known as vermilion rockfish;
(q) Sebastes nebulosus, commonly known as china rockfish;
(r) Sebastes nigrocinctus, commonly known as tiger rockfish;
(s) Sebastes rastrelliger, commonly known as grass rockfish;
(t) Sebastes serranoides, commonly known as olive rockfish; or
(u) Sebastes serriceps, commonly known as treefish.
(7) “Ocean shore” has the meaning given that term in ORS 390.605.
(8) “Seaweed” means one or more species of  multicellular marine algae belonging to the
kingdom Protista that inhabit the ocean shore and tidal submerged lands.
[(7)] (9) “Shellfish” includes but is not limited to abalone, clams,  crabs, crayfish or crawfish,
mussels, oysters, piddocks, scallops and shrimp.
(10) “Tidal submerged lands” has the meaning given that term in ORS 274.705.
SECTION 4.
Sections 5 to 7 of this 2017 Act are added to and made a part of  the com-
mercial fishing laws.
SECTION 5. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Small-scale commercial hand harvest of seaweed” means the gathering or  collecting
of seaweed by cutting or  plucking the fronds of the seaweed by hand for the purpose of
selling the seaweed for human consumption.
(b) “Small-scale commercial hand harvest of  seaweed” does not mean mechanical har-
vesting using a boat with cutters  or other large-scale mechanized cutting process to collect
or remove seaweed from the ocean shore or tidal submerged lands.
(2) A person may not harvest or  remove seaweed from the ocean shore or tidal sub-
merged lands owned by the State of Oregon for a commercial purpose  unless the person has
first obtained a permit from the State Department of Fish and Wildlife.
(3) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife, after consultation  with the Department
of State Lands and the State Parks and Recreation Department, shall adopt by rule a  pro-
gram for granting permits for small-scale commercial hand harvests of seaweed for the
purposes of human consumption.
(4) Rules adopted under this section:
(a) Shall provide for a single permitting process for  small-scale commercial hand har-
vests of seaweed from the ocean shore and tidal submerged lands that includes, but is not
limited to:
(A) Conditions of approval for permits issued under this section;
[2]
HB 3193
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
(B) A schedule of reasonable fees for permits issued under this section;
(C) A process for an annual review of the activities authorized by the permit program;
and
(D) Any provision necessary to ensure small-scale  commercial harvests of seaweed are
conducted in a responsible manner that allows seaweed to continue to grow and reproduce.
(b) May include an  exemption from the permit requirements for a person to harvest
seaweed, in an amount to be  determined by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for
personal use.
(5) All moneys received by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife from permit  fees
imposed under this section shall be paid into the Seaweed Harvest Permit Program  Account
established under section 7  of this 2017 Act to administer and implement the provisions of
this section.
SECTION 6.
The State Department of Fish and  Wildlife may enter into a memorandum
of agreement with the Department of State  Lands and the State Parks and Recreation De-
partment with respect to the permit program for  small-scale commercial hand harvest of
seaweed provided for under section 5 of this 2017 Act. The memorandum of agreement may
assign sole responsibility for  permitting to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife when
the harvesting of seaweed would occur on ocean shores subject to the jurisdiction of  the
State Parks and Recreation  Department or over tidal submerged lands subject to the juris-
diction of the Department of State Lands.
SECTION 7. (1) There is established  a Seaweed Harvest Permit Program Account in the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest on moneys in the ac-
count shall be credited to the account.
(2) The account shall consist of moneys deposited into  the account by the State Depart-
ment of Fish and Wildlife from  moneys received from the collection of permit fees provided
under section 5 of this 2017 Act. The moneys in the account  are continuously appropriated
to the department for  administering the permit program established under section 5 of this
2017 Act.
[3]