Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 284.368 is amended to read:
284.368. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Actual Oregon expenses” means the costs  paid in Oregon for principal photography, pro-
duction or postproduction in Oregon of a film,  or for media production services, including but not
limited to the purchase or rental cost of equipment, food, lodging, real property and  permits and
payments made for salaries, wages and benefits for work in Oregon.
(b) “Film” means a television movie or one or more episodes of a single television series, or  a
movie produced for release  to theaters, video or the Internet. “Film” does not include the production
of a commercial or one or more segments of a newscast or sporting event.
(c) “Filmmaker” means a person who owns a television or film production company.
(d) “Local filmmaker” means a person who owns a television  or film production company that
has its principal place of business in this state.
(e) “Local media production project” means, if made or performed by a local media production
services company, a single interactive video game  or a portion thereof, or postproduction services
for a single film.
(f) “Local media production services company” means a media production  services company that
has its principal place of business in this state.
(g) “Media production services” includes postproduction services  and interactive video game
development. “Media production services” does  not include the production of a commercial or one
or more segments of a newscast or sporting event.
(h) “Media production services company” means a person who  is engaged in media production
services.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1442
HB 2523
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) “Portland metropolitan zone” means the  area within a 30-mile radius of the center of the
Burnside Bridge in Portland.
(j) “Resident of this state” has the meaning given that term in ORS 316.027.
(2)(a) The Oregon Business Development Department may  reimburse a filmmaker or local media
production services company for a  portion of the actual Oregon expenses incurred by the filmmaker
or local media production services company.
(b) Maximum reimbursement for a single film or a single local media  production project shall
be the total of:
(A) 20 percent of payments made for employee salaries, wages and benefits for work done  in
Oregon; and
(B) 25 percent of all other actual Oregon expenses.
(c) Notwithstanding  paragraph (b) of this subsection, maximum reimbursement for a single film
may not exceed 50 percent of total moneys received by  the Oregon Production Investment Fund
during the biennium in which the actual Oregon expenses are incurred.
(d) To qualify for reimbursement under this  subsection, total actual Oregon expenses for a film
or a local media production project must equal or exceed $1 million.
(3)(a) The department may reimburse a local  filmmaker or local media production services
company for all or a portion of the actual Oregon expenses,  up to [ $1 million] $2 million, incurred
by the local filmmaker or local media production services company.
(b) To qualify for reimbursement under this subsection:
(A) Total actual Oregon expenses paid for the  film or media production services must be at least
$75,000;
(B) The local filmmaker or local media production services company must have spent 80  percent
of the film’s payroll on employees who are residents of this state; and
(C) The local  filmmaker or local media production services company must have employed or
contracted with a public accountant certified under ORS 673.040 for the provision  of payroll ser-
vices.
(4) In combination with the reimbursements allowed under subsections  (2) and (3) of this section,
the department may make an additional payment to a filmmaker for one of the following:
(a) A travel and living expenses rebate of $200 per employee per day, for any  day that a film is
shot entirely outside the Portland metropolitan zone, not to exceed $10,000  per day or $50,000 per
film; or
(b) An increase of 10 percent of the amount otherwise allowable  under subsections (2) and (3)
of this section, if for at least six days and at least one day  more than half of its total shoot days in
Oregon the film is shot entirely outside the Portland metropolitan zone.
(5) Reimbursement under this  section shall be made from moneys credited to or deposited in the
Oregon Production Investment Fund during the biennium in which the actual Oregon expenses were
paid or any prior biennium. A reimbursement may not be made to the extent funds are not  available
in the fund to make the reimbursement.
(6)(a) Total actual Oregon  expenses supporting a claim for reimbursement under this section
must be verified by the Oregon  Film and Video Office. The filmmaker or local media production
services company must  submit to the office proof of the actual Oregon expenses. The proof must
include any documentation that may be required by the office in its discretion to  verify the actual
Oregon expenses.
(b) The office may charge the filmmaker or local media  production services company for costs
[2]
HB 2523
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
reasonably incurred to verify the actual Oregon expenses, including but not limited  to the cost for
a review or audit of the supporting documentation by  an accountant or auditor. The office may re-
quire the department to deduct the  costs incurred by the office in performing its review or audit
from any reimbursement made to the filmmaker or local media production services company  under
this section.
(c) The office may adopt rules  that establish a procedure for the submission and verification of
actual Oregon expenses.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 315.514 is amended to read:
315.514. (1) A credit against the taxes that are otherwise due  under ORS chapter 316 or, if the
taxpayer is a corporation, under ORS chapter 317 or 318, is allowed to a taxpayer  for certified film
production development contributions made  by the taxpayer to the Oregon Production Investment
Fund established under ORS 284.367.
(2)(a) The Department of Revenue shall, in cooperation with the Oregon Film and  Video Office,
conduct an auction of tax credits under this section.  The auction may be conducted no later than
April 15 following December 31 of any tax year for  which the credit is allowed. The department may
conduct the auction in the manner that it determines is best  suited to maximize the return to the
state on the sale of tax credit certifications and shall announce  a reserve bid prior to conducting
the auction. The reserve amount  shall be at least 90 percent of the total amount of the tax credit.
Moneys necessary to  reimburse the department for the actual costs incurred by the department in
administering an auction, not to exceed 0.25 percent of  auction proceeds, are continuously appro-
priated to the department. The department shall deposit net receipts from  the auction required un-
der this section in the Oregon Production Investment Fund.
(b) The Oregon Film and Video Office shall adopt rules in order to achieve the following  goals:
(A) Subject to paragraph (a) of this subsection, generate contributions for which tax credits of
$20 million are certified for each fiscal year;
(B) Maximize income and  excise tax revenues that are retained by the State of Oregon for state
operations;  and
(C) Provide  the necessary financial incentives for taxpayers to make contributions, taking into
consideration the impact of granting a credit upon a taxpayer’s federal income tax liability.
(3) Contributions made under this section shall be deposited in the Oregon Production  Invest-
ment Fund.
(4)(a) Upon receipt of a contribution, the Oregon  Film and Video Office shall, except as provided
in ORS 315.516, issue to the  taxpayer written certification of the amount certified for tax credit
under this section to the extent the amount certified for tax credit, when added to all  amounts
previously certified for tax credit under this section, does not exceed $20 million  for the fiscal year
in which certification is made.
(b) The Oregon Film and Video Office may issue a certification  for a credit under this section,
and a credit may be allowed, for the  tax year in which a contribution is made, or for the tax year
immediately preceding the tax year in which a  contribution is made and for auctions conducted no
later than April 15 following December 31 of any tax year for which the credit is allowed, if no re-
turn has yet been filed for the preceding tax year.
(c) The Oregon Film  and Video Office and the department are not liable, and a refund of a
contributed amount need not be made, if a taxpayer who  has received tax credit certification is
unable to use all or a portion of the tax credit to offset the tax liability of the taxpayer.
(5) To the extent the Oregon Film and Video Office does not certify contributed  amounts as el-
[3]
HB 2523
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
igible for a tax credit under this section, the taxpayer may request a refund of the amount the tax-
payer contributed, and the office shall refund that amount.
(6)(a) Except  as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a tax credit claimed under this
section may not exceed the tax liability  of the taxpayer and may not be carried over to another tax
year.
(b) Any tax credit otherwise allowable under this section that is not  used by the taxpayer in a
particular tax year may be carried forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax liability for the next
succeeding tax year. Any  credit remaining unused in the next succeeding tax year may be carried
forward and used in  the second succeeding tax year, and likewise, any credit not used in that second
succeeding tax year may be carried forward and used in the third succeeding tax year but may  not
be carried forward for any tax year thereafter.
(c) A taxpayer  is not eligible for a tax credit under this section if the first tax year for which
the credit would otherwise be allowed begins on or after January 1, [ 2030] 2034.
(7) If a tax credit is claimed under this section by a  nonresident or part-year resident taxpayer,
the amount shall be allowed without proration under ORS 316.117.
(8) If the amount of contribution for which a tax credit certification is made  is allowed as a
deduction for federal tax purposes, the amount of the contribution shall be  added to federal taxable
income for Oregon tax purposes.
SECTION 3.
 Section 77, chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, as amended by  section 1, chapter 913,
Oregon Laws 2009, section 17, chapter 730, Oregon  Laws 2011, section 42, chapter 701, Oregon Laws
2015, and section 34, chapter 525, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 77.  ORS 315.514 applies to tax years beginning on or after January  1, 2005, and before
January 1, [ 2030] 2034, and to tax credit certifications  issued by the Oregon Film and Video Office
on or after July 1, 2005.
SECTION 4. The amendments to ORS 284.368 and 315.514 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025
Act apply to fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]