Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 342.934 is amended to read:
342.934. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Competence” means the ability of a teacher to teach a subject or grade  level based on
consideration of any of the following:
(A) Teaching experience within the past five years related to the subject or grade level;
(B) Educational attainments, which may not be based solely on being licensed to teach; or
(C) The teacher’s willingness to undergo additional training or pursue additional education.
[(b) “Cultural or linguistic expertise”  means the expertise of one teacher, as measured against the
expertise of another teacher, based on consideration of any of the following factors: ]
[(A) A teacher’s linguistic ability in relation  to an in-district language, as determined by a school
district using a method of verification or attestation of fluency for all in-district languages; ]
[(B) A  teacher’s completion of a teacher pathway program that is implemented by a teacher path-
way partnership at the national, state, regional or local level and that has the primary focus of  in-
creasing the number of culturally or linguistically diverse teachers; or ]
[(C) A teacher’s current work assignment that requires the teacher to work at  least 50 percent of
the teacher’s work assignment time: ]
[(i) At a school where at least  25 percent of the student population consists of students from a
historically underserved background, if the teacher is assigned to one school; or ]
[(ii) At programs, schools or school districts where at least  25 percent of the student population
consists of students from a historically underserved background, if the teacher  is assigned to multiple
programs, schools or school districts. ]
[(c) “In-district language” means a heritage  language or a language other than English that is
spoken:]
[(A) By five percent or more of the students enrolled at the school where a teacher is assigned or,
if the teacher is not assigned  to a school, of the students enrolled in the schools of the school district;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3220
SB 669
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or]
[(B) At five percent or more of the homes of the students enrolled at the school where a  teacher is
assigned or, if the teacher is not assigned to a school, of the homes of the students enrolled in  the
schools of the school district. ]
[(d)] (b)  “Merit” means the measurement of one  teacher’s ability and effectiveness against the
ability and effectiveness of another teacher.
[(e) “Qualified teacher with cultural or linguistic expertise” means a teacher who: ]
[(A) Has more cultural or linguistic expertise than a teacher with more or equal seniority; and ]
[(B) Holds proper licenses or other credentials to fill a remaining position. ]
[(f)] (c) “School district” includes an education service district.
[(g) “Student from a historically underserved background” includes a student who: ]
[(A) Is an English language learner; ]
[(B) Is from a racial or ethnic  group that has historically experienced academic disparities, in-
cluding racial or ethnic groups for which a statewide education plan  has been developed under ORS
329.841, 329.843 or 329.845 for students who are  black, African-American, American Indian, Alaska
Native, Latino or Hispanic; ]
[(C) Is economically disadvantaged; or ]
[(D) Has a disability. ]
[(h)] (d) “Teacher” has the meaning given that term in ORS 342.120.
(2) This section shall provide the procedure for making reductions in teacher  staff positions re-
sulting from a school district’s lack of funds to continue its educational program at  its anticipated
level or resulting from the school district’s elimination or adjustment of classes due to  administra-
tive decision. Nothing in this section is intended to interfere with the right of a fair dismissal dis-
trict to discharge, remove or fail to renew the contract of a probationary teacher  pursuant to ORS
342.835.
(3) Before making any layoff  decisions related to teacher staff, a school district shall make every
reasonable effort to:
(a) Transfer teachers of eliminated or  adjusted classes to other teaching positions for which the
teachers are licensed and qualified.
(b) Combine teaching positions in a  manner that allows teachers to remain qualified so long as
the combined positions meet the curriculum needs  of the school district and the competence con-
sideration specified in subsection (5) of this section.
[(c) Maintain the proportion of teachers with cultural or linguistic expertise compared to  teachers
without cultural or linguistic expertise. ]
(4)(a) Except [ as required by paragraph (b)  of this subsection and ] as allowed by subsection (5)
of this section,  a school district shall prioritize seniority when determining which teachers will be
retained when a school district reduces its teacher staff under this section.
[(b) A school district shall retain a qualified teacher with  cultural or linguistic expertise who has
less seniority if the release of  the less senior teacher would result in a lesser proportion of teachers
with cultural or  linguistic expertise compared to teachers without cultural or linguistic expertise. When
a qualified teacher with cultural or linguistic expertise is retained under this  paragraph and the school
district is determining which teachers to retain who  do not have cultural or linguistic expertise, the
school district shall prioritize: ]
[(A) Seniority; or ]
[(B) To the extent allowed under subsection (5) of this section, competence or merit. ]
[2]
SB 669
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(c)(A) ] (b)  [ Except as provided by subparagraph (B)  of this paragraph, ] Any ties in calculations
of seniority shall be broken by drawing lots.
[(B) If the release of a qualified teacher with cultural or linguistic expertise who has equal sen-
iority would result in a lesser proportion of teachers with cultural  or linguistic expertise compared to
teachers without cultural or  linguistic expertise, the school district shall retain the teacher with cultural
or linguistic expertise. ]
[(d)] (c)  For the purposes of this subsection, seniority shall be calculated from the  first day of
actual service as teachers with the school district, inclusive of approved leaves of absence.
[(e)] (d)  Nothing in this subsection prohibits a school district  from requiring that teachers to
be retained hold proper licenses or other credentialing at the  time of layoff to fill remaining posi-
tions or prohibits a school district from retaining a teacher  as allowed under subsection (5) of this
section.
(5) A school district may retain a teacher with less seniority than a  teacher being released un-
der this section if the school district determines that the teacher being retained has  more compe-
tence or merit than the teacher with more seniority who is being released.
(6)(a) Except as  provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, an administrator shall retain status
and seniority as a contract teacher and voluntarily  may return to teaching in a reduction in staff
situation.
(b) An administrator who  was never employed as a teacher in the school district shall not be
eligible to become a nonadministrative teacher in  the school district if the effect is to displace a
nonadministrative contract teacher.
(7) In consultation with its employees or,  for those employees in a recognized or certified col-
lective bargaining unit, with the exclusive bargaining representative of that unit, each school  dis-
trict shall establish a procedure for recalling teachers to employment in the school district who have
been released  because of a prospective or actual reduction in staff. The procedure shall define the
criteria for recall and the teacher shall have the right of recall for 27 months after the last  date
of release by the school  district unless waived as provided in the procedure by rejection of a specific
position. A contract teacher who is recalled  shall retain the status obtained before the release. A
probationary teacher who is recalled shall have years of teaching for  the school district counted as
if the employment had been continuous for purposes of obtaining contract teacher status.
(8) An appeal  from a decision on reduction in staff or recall under this section shall be by ar-
bitration under the rules of the Employment Relations Board or by a procedure  mutually agreed
upon by the  employee representatives and the employer. The results of the procedure shall be final
and binding on  the parties. Appeals from multiple reductions may be considered in a single arbi-
tration. The arbitrator is authorized to reverse the  staff reduction decision or the recall decision
made by the school district only if the school district:
(a) Exceeded its jurisdiction;
(b) Failed to follow the procedure applicable to the matter before it;
(c) Made a finding or order not supported by substantial evidence in the whole record; or
(d) Improperly construed the applicable law.
(9)(a) A school district shall not agree in any collective  bargaining agreement to waive the right
to consider competence  in making decisions about the order of reduction in staff or recall of staff.
Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a school district  and the exclusive bargaining represen-
tative from agreeing to alternative criteria for  competence determinations under this subsection so
long as the criteria ensure that all retained teachers are qualified for the positions they fill.
[3]
SB 669
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
(b) As used in this  subsection, “qualified” means the measurement of the teacher’s ability to
teach the particular grade level or subject matter in which the teacher is placed after the  reduction
in force. Qualifications shall be measured by more than seniority and licensure,  but may include
other criteria that  reasonably measure the teacher’s fitness to teach the relevant grade or subject
level. Determinations of competence or qualifications  under this subsection may take into account
requirements for any special needs students.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 342.934 by section 1 of this 2025 Act  apply to con-
tracts entered into, renewed or extended on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]