Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to  the contrary, the Department of
Corrections may employ on a  part-time or full-time basis an individual who retired from
service as a corrections officer, as defined in ORS 181A.355, as follows:
(1) The department may negotiate independently the  terms and conditions of employment
for each individual.
(2) An individual employed under this section may not receive pay in excess of the  pay
received at the time the individual retired from the department.
(3) The employment may not affect the  existing eligibility, pay or benefits of an individual
pursuant to the Public Employees Retirement System under ORS chapter 238.
(4)(a) The employment, pay and  benefits may not be subject to the Public Employees
Retirement System under ORS chapter 238.
(b) Except as provided in section 3 of this 2025 Act, the employment, pay  and benefits
may not be subject to a collective bargaining agreement.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 1, 2032.
SECTION 3. (1) Section 1 of this 2025 Act applies to employment contracts  entered into
by the Department of Corrections and an individual on or after the effective date  of this 2025
Act.
(2)(a) If application of section 1 of this 2025  Act conflicts with the provision of an existing
collective bargaining agreement, the existing  collective bargaining agreement shall preempt
section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(b) If application of section 1  of this 2025 Act conflicts with the provision of a collective
bargaining agreement entered into, modified or renewed on or after the effective date of this
2025 Act, section 1 of this 2025 Act preempts the collective bargaining agreement.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3991