Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall study issues  re-
lated to  workers’ compensation for the secondary effects of infection by SARS-CoV-2 or a
diagnosis of coronavirus disease 2019 (COVID-19)  and present the results of the study in a
report to an appropriate committee or interim committee  of the Legislative Assembly in the
manner provided under ORS 192.245 on or before September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2104