Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 125.675 to
125.691.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Public Guardian and Conservator shall develop  and adminis-
ter a community restoration program to provide guardianship services to defendants  whose
criminal cases may be or have been suspended  or discharged under ORS 161.370 and who may
be or have been released into the community.
(2) The program shall prioritize eligibility for defendants:
(a) Who are at high risk  of suffering serious harm following release into the community;
(b) For whom the court has found or is likely to find there is no substantial probability
that the defendant would, within the foreseeable future,  gain or regain the capacity to stand
trial; or
(c) Who are at high risk for reoffending and reentering the ORS 161.370 process.
(3) A defendant’s eligibility to participate in the program  may be determined at any time
after a defendant’s fitness to proceed is  drawn into question under ORS 161.370 or, if the
court found there was no substantial probability that the  defendant would, within the fore-
seeable future, gain or regain the capacity to  stand trial, no later than one year following
the date on which the defendant’s case is dismissed under ORS 161.370.
(4)(a) In administering the  program, the Oregon Public Guardian and Conservator shall
collaborate and coordinate with district attorneys, community mental health  programs and
facilities in which defendants are housed, including the Oregon State Hospital.
(b) The Oregon Public Guardian and Conservator may provide services under this  section
at any point after the defendant’s fitness to proceed is drawn into question.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 125.683 is amended to read:
125.683. (1) In providing public guardian and  conservator services, the Oregon Public Guardian
and Conservator shall conduct a needs assessment for  a person who claims or is claimed not to have
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1422
SB 579
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
relatives  or  friends willing or able to assume the duties of guardianship or conservatorship and who
claims or is claimed to lack the financial resources to obtain a  private guardian or conservator. The
purpose of the needs assessment is to determine  the person’s eligibility to receive public guardian
and conservator services and to determine the  appropriateness of filing a petition for the appoint-
ment of a fiduciary or other pleading on  behalf of the person in a court having probate jurisdiction.
The needs assessment shall, at a minimum:
(a) Assess the person’s capacity to:
(A) Care for the person’s own safety;
(B) Manage the person’s own financial affairs; and
(C) Attend to and provide for necessities such as food, shelter, clothing and medical care;
(b) Assess the person’s financial resources;
(c) Determine  whether information that is available about the person is sufficient to support a
finding that  the person is incapacitated or financially incapable and the entry of a court order for
the appointment of a fiduciary under ORS 125.010;
(d) Determine whether any other person may be willing and able to serve as the person’s
guardian or conservator and, if appropriate, locate and contact that other person;
(e) Determine the type of fiduciary, if any, to request in  a petition filed under ORS 125.055,
giving preference to the least intrusive form  of fiduciary relationship consistent with the best in-
terests of the person; and
(f) Determine  how best to provide public guardian and conservator services to the person that
are least restrictive  to the person’s liberty, that are least intrusive to the person and that provide
for the greatest degree of independence that the person is capable of exercising.
(2)(a) If the person is a resident of a nursing home as  defined in ORS 678.710 or a residential
facility as defined in ORS [ 441.402] 443.400, the  nursing home or residential facility shall provide the
Oregon Public Guardian and Conservator access to the person’s records as is necessary  to conduct
the needs assessment required under this section.
(b) Any other public agency that has provided or is providing care  or services to the person
under assessment  shall disclose  to the Oregon Public Guardian and Conservator, upon request, a
minimum amount of information about the person for whom the needs assessment is being conducted,
including protected health  information as defined in ORS 192.556 and financial information, as is
reasonably necessary to prevent or lessen a  serious and imminent threat to the health or safety of
the person who is the subject  of the needs assessment. For purposes of this paragraph, a request
from the Oregon Public Guardian and Conservator for the  purpose of conducting a needs assessment
is presumed to be a situation that will prevent or lessen a  serious and imminent threat to the health
or safety of the person.
(c) Any health care provider not identified in either paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection  may
disclose protected health information to the Oregon Public Guardian and  Conservator in accordance
with 45 C.F.R. 164.512 (j) to  prevent or lessen a serious or imminent threat to the health or safety
of a person  if the health care provider, in good faith, believes the disclosure is necessary to prevent
or lessen the threat. For purposes of this  paragraph, a request from the Oregon Public Guardian and
Conservator for disclosure under this paragraph for the purposes  of conducting a needs assessment,
or the good faith belief and disclosure of  the health care provider under this paragraph, are pre-
sumed to be situations  that will prevent or lessen a serious and imminent threat to the health or
safety of the person.
(d) If the person under assessment is currently or was previously a defendant subject  to
[2]
SB 579
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ORS 161.370, the Oregon Public Guardian and Conservator may have access to any reports
resulting from examinations of the defendant, documents containing recommendations of  or
resulting from consultations with  community mental health programs, documents submitted
to the court by a state mental hospital related to the proceedings under ORS 161.370  and any
other court records relating to the defendant.
(3) For each person determined to be  eligible for public guardian and conservator services under
this section, the Oregon Public Guardian  and Conservator shall develop a written plan setting forth
the type and duration of services to  be provided by the Oregon Public Guardian and Conservator.
The plan shall be included in any nonemergency petition or pleading filed with the court.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 161.365 is amended to read:
161.365. (1)(a) When the court has  reason to doubt the defendant’s fitness to proceed by reason
of incapacity as described in ORS  161.360, the court may call any witness to assist it in reaching
its decision and shall order that a  community mental health program director, or the director’s
designee, consult with the defendant and with any local entity that  would be responsible for super-
vising the defendant if the defendant were to  be released in the community, to determine whether
services and supervision necessary to safely allow the defendant to gain or  regain fitness to proceed
are available in the community. After  the consultation, the program director or the director’s
designee shall provide to the  court a copy of the findings resulting from the consultation. If the
court determines the assistance of a psychiatrist or psychologist would be helpful, the court may:
(A) Order that a psychiatric or  psychological examination of the defendant be conducted by a
certified evaluator and a report of the examination be prepared; or
(B) Order the defendant to be committed for the purpose of an examination to a state mental
hospital or other facility designated by the Oregon Health Authority if  the defendant is at least 18
years of age, or to a secure intensive community inpatient facility designated by the authority  if the
defendant is under 18 years of age. The  state mental hospital or other facility may retain custody
of a defendant committed  under this paragraph for the duration necessary to complete the exam-
ination of the  defendant, not to exceed 30 days. The examination may include a period of observa-
tion.
(b) The court shall provide a copy of any order entered  under this subsection to the community
mental health program director or designee and  to the state mental hospital or other facility by the
end of the next judicial day.
(2)(a) A defendant committed under subsection (1)(a)(B) of this section  shall be transported to
the state mental hospital or other facility for the examination.
(b) At the conclusion of the examination, the superintendent of the state mental hospital  or the
superintendent’s designee or the director of the facility may:
(A) Return the defendant to the facility from which the defendant was transported; or
(B) Inform the court and  the parties that the defendant requires a hospital level of care due to
the defendant’s dangerousness and the  acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental dis-
order and request that the defendant  remain at the state mental hospital or other facility pending
a hearing or order under ORS 161.370.
(c) If both parties consent, the court may, without holding a hearing, enter  any order authorized
by ORS 161.370 based on a report resulting from an examination conducted under this section.
(3) The report of an examination described in this section  must include, but is not necessarily
limited to, the following:
(a) A description of the nature of the examination;
[3]
SB 579
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) A statement of the mental condition of the defendant;
(c) If the defendant suffers from a qualifying mental disorder, an opinion as  to whether the de-
fendant is incapacitated within the description set out in ORS 161.360; and
(d) If the defendant is incapacitated  within the description set out in ORS 161.360, a recom-
mendation of treatment  and services necessary to allow the defendant to gain or regain capacity,
including whether a hospital level of care is required due to the defendant’s dangerousness and  the
acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder.
(4) Except when the defendant and the court both request to the contrary, the report may  not
contain any findings or conclusions as to whether the defendant as a result of a qualifying mental
disorder was subject to the provisions of ORS 161.295 or 161.300 at the time of the  criminal act
charged.
(5) If the examination by the certified evaluator cannot be conducted by  reason of the unwill-
ingness of the defendant to participate in the  examination, the report must so state and must in-
clude, if possible, an opinion as to whether the  unwillingness of the defendant was the result of a
qualifying mental disorder affecting capacity to proceed.
(6)(a) The report resulting from the examination  of a defendant under this section may be filed
electronically and must be filed with the clerk  of the court, who shall cause copies to be delivered
to the district attorney and to counsel for defendant.
(b) The entity or evaluator conducting  the examination shall provide a copy of the report re-
sulting from the examination to the community mental health program director or designee in:
(A) The county in which the defendant is charged; and
(B) The county of the defendant’s last known residence.
(c) Reports prepared under this section are confidential and may be made available only:
(A) To the court, prosecuting attorney, defense attorney, agent of the prosecuting or  defense
attorney, defendant, Oregon Public Guardian and Conservator, community mental health program
director or designee and any facility in which the defendant is housed; or
(B) As ordered by a court.
(d) Any facility in which a defendant is housed may not  use a report prepared under this section
to support a disciplinary action against the defendant.
(e) Nothing in this subsection prohibits the prosecuting attorney,  defense attorney or agent of
the prosecuting or  defense attorney from discussing the contents of a report prepared under this
section with witnesses or victims as otherwise permitted by law.
(7)(a) When upon motion of the court or a financially eligible defendant, the  court has ordered
a psychiatric or psychological examination of the defendant, a county or justice court shall order
the county to pay, and a circuit court shall order the  public defense services executive director to
pay from funds available for the purpose:
(A) A reasonable fee if the examination of the defendant  is conducted by a certified evaluator
in private practice; and
(B) All  costs including transportation of the defendant if the examination is conducted by a
certified evaluator in the employ of the Oregon  Health Authority or a community mental health
program established under ORS 430.610 to 430.670.
(b) When an examination is ordered  at the request or with the acquiescence of a defendant who
is determined not to be financially eligible, the examination shall be performed at the defendant’s
expense. When an examination is ordered at the request of the prosecution, the county shall pay for
the expense of the examination.
[4]
SB 579
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(8) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish by rule  standards for the consultation described
in subsection (1) of this section.
(9) As  used in this section and ORS 161.370, “certified evaluator” has the meaning given that
term in ORS 161.309.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 161.370 is amended to read:
161.370. (1)(a) When the defendant’s fitness to  proceed is drawn in question, the issue shall be
determined by the court.
(b) If neither the prosecuting attorney nor counsel for the defendant contests the finding of the
report filed under  ORS 161.365, the court may make the determination on the basis of the report.
If the finding  is contested, the court shall hold a hearing on the issue. If the report is received in
evidence in the hearing, the party who contests the finding has the right to summon and to  cross-
examine any certified evaluator who submitted the  report and to offer evidence upon the issue.
Other evidence regarding the defendant’s fitness to proceed may be introduced by either party.
(2)(a) If the court determines that the defendant lacks fitness to proceed, the criminal proceeding
against the defendant shall be suspended and the  court shall, at a hearing, proceed in accordance
with this subsection.
(b) After making the determination under  paragraph (a) of this subsection, the court shall re-
ceive a recommendation, to be considered at the hearing, from a community mental health  program
director or the  director’s designee, and from any local entity that would be responsible for super-
vising the defendant if the defendant were  to be released in the community, concerning whether
services and supervision necessary to safely allow the defendant to gain or  regain fitness to proceed
are available in the community.
(c) The court and the parties shall  at the hearing determine an appropriate action in the case,
and the  court shall enter an order necessary to implement the action. In determining the appropriate
action, the court shall consider the  primary and secondary release criteria as defined in ORS
135.230, the least restrictive option appropriate for the defendant, the needs  of the defendant and
the interests of justice. Actions may include but are not limited to:
(A) Commitment for the defendant  to gain or regain fitness to proceed under subsection (3) or
(5) of this section;
(B) Community restoration as recommended  by the community mental health program director
or designee;
(C) Release on supervision;
(D) Commencement of a civil commitment proceeding under ORS 426.070 to 426.170, 426.701 or
427.235 to 427.290;
(E) Commencement of protective proceedings under ORS chapter 125; or
(F) Dismissal of the charges pursuant to ORS 135.755.
(d) If the court, while considering or ordering an appropriate action  under this subsection, de-
termines that the defendant does not require a hospital level of care due to  the defendant’s
dangerousness and the acuity of symptoms  of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder, but that
services and supervision necessary to safely allow the defendant to gain or  regain fitness to proceed
are not available in the community, for  any defendant remaining in custody after such determi-
nation, the court shall set a review hearing seven days from the date  of the determination under
paragraph (a) of this subsection. At the review hearing, the court shall consider all relevant  infor-
mation and determine an  appropriate action in the case as described in paragraph (c) of this sub-
section. If the defendant remains in custody following  the initial review hearing, the court shall hold
[5]
SB 579
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
further review hearings every seven days thereafter until the defendant is no longer in custody.
(e) If the court determines that the commencement  of a protective proceeding under
ORS chapter 125 is the appropriate  action under this subsection, the court may, subject to
ORS 125.600 and 125.605, appoint a temporary guardian for the defendant until a permanent
guardian can be appointed under ORS chapter 125.
(3)(a) Unless the court orders an action other than commitment under subsection (2)  of this
section, and except as otherwise provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, if the court finds
that the defendant is dangerous to self  or others as a result of a qualifying mental disorder, that a
hospital level of care is necessary  due to the defendant’s dangerousness and the acuity of symptoms
of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder, and that, based on the findings resulting from  the
consultation described in ORS 161.365 (1) and from any  information provided by community-based
mental health providers or any other sources, the  services and supervision necessary to allow the
defendant to gain or regain fitness to proceed are  not available in the community, the court shall
commit the defendant to the custody of the superintendent of a state mental hospital  or director of
a facility designated  by the Oregon Health Authority if the defendant is at least 18 years of age,
or to the custody of the director of a secure intensive community inpatient facility  designated by
the authority if the defendant is under 18 years of age.
(b) If the defendant is committed under this  subsection, the community mental health program
director shall at  regular intervals, during any period of commitment, review available community
resources and maintain communication with the defendant  and the superintendent of the state
mental hospital or director of the facility in order to facilitate an  efficient transition to treatment
in the community when ordered.
(4)(a) If the court does not make a finding described in subsection (3)  of this section, if com-
mitment is precluded under subsection (5) of this section or if the court determines  that care other
than commitment for incapacity to stand trial would better serve  the defendant and the community,
the court shall release the defendant on supervision for as long as the unfitness endures.
(b) The court may order a  community mental health program director providing treatment to the
defendant in the  community to provide the court with status reports on the defendant’s progress in
gaining or regaining fitness to proceed.
(c) A  community mental health program director providing treatment to the defendant in the
community shall notify the court if the defendant gains or regains fitness to proceed.
(5)(a) If the most  serious offense in the charging instrument is a violation, the court may not
commit the defendant under subsection (3) of this section.
(b) If the most serious offense in  the charging instrument is a misdemeanor, the court may not
commit the defendant under  subsection (3) of this section unless the finding that the defendant re-
quires a hospital level of care due  to the defendant’s dangerousness and the acuity of symptoms of
the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder is based on a recommendation by  a certified evaluator
as defined in ORS 161.309, or a community mental health program director or the director’s
designee, that the defendant requires such level of care.
(c) If at the time of determining the appropriate  action for the case the court has not received
a recommendation as to whether the defendant  requires a hospital level of care due to the
defendant’s dangerousness and  the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder,
the court shall order a certified evaluator or  a community mental health program director, or the
director’s designee, to make such a recommendation.
(d) If the court does not order the commitment of  a defendant described in this subsection to the
[6]
SB 579
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
state mental hospital or other facility, the court shall hold  a hearing in accordance with subsection
(2)(c) of this section to determine and order an appropriate action other than commitment.
(6) When a defendant is released on supervision under subsection (4) of  this section, the court
may place conditions  that the court deems appropriate on the release, including the requirement
that the defendant regularly report to the authority  or a community mental health program for ex-
amination to determine if the defendant has gained or regained capacity to stand trial.
(7) When the court, on its own motion or upon the application of the superintendent of the
hospital or director of the facility in which the defendant is committed, a  person examining the de-
fendant as a  condition of release on supervision, or either party, determines, after a hearing, if a
hearing is requested, that the defendant has gained or regained fitness  to proceed, the criminal
proceeding shall be resumed. If,  however, the court is of the view that so much time has elapsed
since the commitment or release of the defendant on supervision that  it would be unjust to resume
the criminal proceeding, the court on motion of either party may dismiss the charge  and may order
the defendant to be discharged or cause a proceeding to  be commenced forthwith under ORS 426.070
to 426.170, 426.701 or 427.235 to 427.290.
(8) The superintendent of a state hospital or director  of a facility to which the defendant is
committed shall cause the defendant to be evaluated within 60 days from the defendant’s delivery
into the superintendent’s or director’s custody, for  the purpose of determining whether there is a
substantial probability that, in the foreseeable future, the defendant will have the  capacity to stand
trial. In addition, the superintendent or director shall:
(a) Immediately notify the committing court if the defendant, at any time, gains or regains  the
capacity to stand trial or will never have the capacity to stand trial.
(b) Within 90 days of the defendant’s delivery into the superintendent’s or  director’s custody,
notify the committing court that:
(A) The defendant has the present capacity to stand trial;
(B) There is no substantial probability that, in the foreseeable future,  the defendant will gain
or regain the capacity to stand trial; or
(C) There is a substantial probability that,  in the foreseeable future, the defendant will gain or
regain the capacity to stand trial. If the  probability exists, the superintendent or director shall give
the court an estimate  of the time in which the defendant, with appropriate treatment, is expected
to gain or regain capacity.
(c) Notify the court if court-ordered involuntary medication is necessary for  the defendant to
gain or regain the capacity to proceed and, if appropriate, submit a  report to the court under ORS
161.372.
(9)(a) If the superintendent  or director determines that there is a substantial probability that,
in the  foreseeable future, the defendant will gain or regain the capacity to stand trial, unless the
court otherwise orders, the defendant shall remain in the superintendent’s or  director’s custody
where the defendant shall receive treatment designed for the purpose of enabling the  defendant to
gain or regain capacity. In keeping with the notice requirement under  subsection (8)(b) of this sec-
tion, the superintendent or director shall, for the duration of the defendant’s period of  commitment,
submit a progress report to the committing court, concerning the  defendant’s capacity or incapacity,
at least once every 180 days as measured from the date of the  defendant’s delivery into the
superintendent’s or director’s custody.
(b)(A) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection, if the superintendent or director deter-
mines that a defendant committed under this section is no longer dangerous to self  or others as a
[7]
SB 579
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
result of a qualifying mental disorder,  that a hospital level of care is not necessary due to the
defendant’s dangerousness and  the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder,
or that the services  and supervision necessary to allow the defendant to gain or regain fitness to
proceed are available in the community, the superintendent or director shall file notice of that  de-
termination with the court.
(B) Upon receipt of the notice, the court shall order  that a community mental health program
director or the director’s designee, within five judicial days:
(i) Consult with the defendant and with any local entity that would be responsible for supervis-
ing the defendant if the defendant were  to be released in the community to determine whether ser-
vices and supervision necessary to safely  allow the defendant to gain or regain fitness to proceed
are available in the community; and
(ii) Provide the court and the parties with recommendations from the consultation.
(C) Within 10 judicial days of receiving the recommendations from the consultation, the  court
shall hold a hearing to determine an appropriate action in accordance with subsection (2)(c) of this
section as follows:
(i) If, after consideration of the factors and possible actions described in subsection (2)(c) of this
section,  and  any recommendations from the consultation described in this paragraph, the court de-
termines that the defendant remains dangerous to self or others as a result  of a qualifying mental
disorder, a hospital level of care is necessary due to the defendant’s dangerousness and the  acuity
of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder, and  the services and supervision neces-
sary to allow the defendant to  gain or regain fitness to proceed are not available in the community,
the court may, after making specific findings to that effect, continue the commitment.
(ii) If the court does not make the findings described in sub-subparagraph  (i) of this subpara-
graph, the court shall terminate the commitment and shall set a review hearing seven days  from the
date of the commitment termination for any defendant remaining in  custody. At the review hearing,
the court shall consider all relevant information and determine an  appropriate action in the case
as described in  subsection (2)(c) of this section. If the defendant remains in custody following the
initial review hearing, the court shall hold further review  hearings every seven days thereafter until
the defendant is no longer in custody.
(c) A progress report described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may consist of an update to:
(A) The original examination report conducted under ORS 161.365; or
(B) An evaluation conducted under subsection (8)  of this section, if the defendant did not receive
an examination under ORS 161.365.
(10)(a) A  defendant who remains committed under subsection (9) of this section shall be dis-
charged within a period of time that is reasonable for making a  determination concerning whether
or not, and when, the defendant may gain or regain capacity. However,  regardless of the number
of charges with which the defendant is accused, in no event shall the  defendant be committed for
longer than whichever of the  following, measured from the defendant’s initial custody date, is
shorter:
(A) Three years; or
(B) A period of time equal to the maximum sentence the  court could have imposed if the de-
fendant had been convicted.
(b) For purposes of calculating the  maximum period of commitment described in paragraph (a)
of this subsection:
(A) The initial custody date is the date on which the  defendant is first committed under this
[8]
SB 579
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section on any charge alleged in the accusatory instrument; and
(B) The defendant shall be given credit  against each charge alleged in the accusatory instru-
ment:
(i) For  each day the defendant is committed under this section, whether the days are consecutive
or are interrupted by a period of time during which the defendant has  gained or regained fitness to
proceed;  and
(ii) Unless the defendant is charged on any charging instrument with aggravated murder or  a
crime listed in ORS 137.700 (2), for each day the defendant is  held in jail before and after the date
the defendant is first committed, whether the days are consecutive or are  interrupted by a period
of time during which the defendant lacks fitness to proceed.
(11) The  superintendent or director shall notify the committing court of the defendant’s im-
pending discharge 30 days  before the date on which the superintendent or director is required to
discharge the defendant under subsection (10) of this section.
(12) When the committing  court receives a notice from the superintendent or director under
subsection (8) or (11) of this section concerning the  defendant’s progress or lack thereof, the com-
mitting court shall  determine, after a hearing, if a hearing is requested, whether the defendant
presently has the capacity to stand trial.
(13) If at any time  the court determines that the defendant lacks the capacity to stand trial, the
court shall further determine whether there is a substantial probability that the defendant,  in the
foreseeable future, will gain  or regain the capacity to stand trial and whether the defendant is en-
titled to discharge under  subsection (10) of this section. If the court determines that there is no
substantial probability  that the defendant, in the foreseeable future, will gain or regain the capacity
to stand  trial or that the defendant is entitled to discharge under subsection (10) of this section, the
court shall dismiss, without prejudice, all charges against the defendant and:
(a) Order that the defendant be discharged; or
(b) Initiate commitment proceedings under ORS 426.070 or 427.235 to 427.290.
(14) All notices required under  this section shall be filed with the court and may be filed elec-
tronically.  The  clerk of the court shall cause copies of the notices to be delivered to both the dis-
trict attorney and the counsel for the defendant.
(15) If the defendant gains or regains fitness to proceed, the term of  any sentence received by
the defendant for conviction of the crime charged shall be reduced by the amount of  time the de-
fendant was  committed under this section to the custody of a state mental hospital, or to the custody
of a secure intensive community inpatient facility designated by the Oregon Health Authority.
(16) Notwithstanding the suspension of the criminal  proceeding under subsection (2) of this
section, the fact that the defendant is unfit to proceed does not preclude any objection  through
counsel and without the personal participation of the defendant on the grounds that the  indictment
is insufficient, that the statute of limitations has run, that double jeopardy  principles apply or upon
any other ground at the  discretion of the court which the court deems susceptible of fair determi-
nation prior to trial.
(17) At the time that the court determines that the defendant lacks fitness  to proceed under
subsection (2) of this  section, the court shall notify the defendant that federal law prohibits the de-
fendant from purchasing or  possessing a firearm unless the person obtains relief from the prohibition
under federal law. The court shall again notify the defendant of the prohibition if the  court finds
that the defendant has gained or regained fitness to proceed under subsection (7) of this section.
(18)(a) The entity or  evaluator conducting an examination of a defendant under this section shall
[9]
SB 579
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
provide a copy of any report described in this section to the  community mental health program di-
rector or designee in:
(A) The county in which the defendant is charged; and
(B) The county of the defendant’s last known residence.
(b) Reports prepared under this section are confidential and may be made available only:
(A) To the court, prosecuting attorney, defense attorney, agent of the prosecuting or  defense
attorney, defendant, community mental health program director or designee and any facility  in
which the defendant is housed; or
(B) As ordered by a court.
(c) Any facility in which a defendant is housed may not use  a report prepared under this section
to support a disciplinary action against the defendant.
(d) Nothing in this subsection prohibits the  prosecuting attorney, defense attorney or agent of
the prosecuting or defense attorney from discussing the contents of a report prepared  under this
section with witnesses or victims as otherwise permitted by law.
(19) The court shall  ensure that an order entered under this section is provided, by the end of
the next judicial  day, to any entity ordered to provide services and supervision necessary to restore
the defendant’s fitness to proceed.
(20) Unless the court orders otherwise or  either party objects, a defendant committed to a state
hospital or other facility, or a certified evaluator or  other expert witness, may attend hearings held
under this section via simultaneous electronic transmission.
(21) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish by rule standards  for the recommendation
provided to the court described in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 6.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the  Oregon Public Guardian and Conservator, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,696,450 for deposit in  the Oregon Public Guardian
and Conservator Fund  established under ORS 125.689, to carry out the purposes of section 2
of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 7. (1) Section 2 of this 2021 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2022.
(2) The Oregon  Public Guardian and Conservator may take any action before the opera-
tive date  specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary for the Oregon Public
Guardian and Conservator to exercise, on and after  the operative date specified in subsection
(1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the Oregon Public
Guardian and Conservator by section 2 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 8.
This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[10]