Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
If the United States Secretary of Commerce issues notice of designation with
respect to a proposed national marine sanctuary that is to be located  partially or entirely
within the seaward boundary of this state, the Governor must certify to the secretary that
the designation is unacceptable,  except upon confirmation by the Legislative Assembly that
all terms of the national marine sanctuary are acceptable. Legislative  confirmation as re-
quired by this section shall be  by joint resolution of the Legislative Assembly that is in ses-
sion at the time notice of the designation is made or during the regular or  special session
of the Legislative Assembly next following the designation.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1322