Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Housing and  Community Services Department shall study
homeownership. The department shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees  of the
Legislative Assembly related to housing no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1838