Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the State Department of Geology and Mineral In-
dustries, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund,  the amount of
$5,945,144 for operations of the department.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the amount of
$6,349,951 is established  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts
and federal funds for contract services, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds not
described in this section, collected or received by the State Department  of Geology and
Mineral Industries.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$6,308,753 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum  limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds other than those described in  section 2 of this 2021
Act, collected or received by the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3443