Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall conduct a study to identify the best
method for ensuring that the  amount of moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly
for public education is adequate,  consistent, stable and sustainable. When conducting the
study, the department shall consider:
(a) The  method followed by the Quality Education Commission as provided by ORS
327.506; and
(b) The method of spending at least 33 percent of the amount approved by  the Legislative
Assembly for a biennium on education and public safety.
(2) The department shall report  the results of the study in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may include recommendations for  legislation, to an interim committee of the
Legislative Assembly related to education no later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4224