Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 336.455 is amended to read:
336.455. (1) Each school district shall provide age-appropriate human sexuality education courses
in all public elementary and secondary schools as an integral part of  the health education curric-
ulum.
(2) Course material and instruction for all human sexuality  education courses shall enhance
students’ understanding of sexuality as a  normal and healthy aspect of human development. Course
instruction  shall:
(a) Be medically accurate.
(b) Be comprehensive.
(c) Include information  about responsible sexual behaviors and hygienic practices that eliminate
or reduce the risks of  pregnancy and the risks of exposure to human immunodeficiency virus,
hepatitis B, hepatitis  C and other sexually transmitted infections. Information about those risks shall
be presented in a manner designed  to allay fears concerning risks that are scientifically groundless.
(d) Promote abstinence  for school-age youth and mutually monogamous relationships with an
uninfected partner for adults as the most effective way to prevent pregnancy and the transmission
of sexually transmitted infections. However, abstinence may not be taught to the  exclusion of other
material and instruction  on contraceptive and infection reduction measures. Human sexuality edu-
cation courses shall acknowledge the value of  abstinence while not devaluing or ignoring those
students who have had or are having sexual intercourse.
(e) Include  a discussion about the characteristics of the emotional, physical and psychological
aspects of a healthy relationship and a discussion about the  benefits of delaying pregnancy beyond
the adolescent years as a means to better ensure a healthy future for parents and  their children.
Students shall be provided with statistics based on  the latest medical information regarding both the
health benefits  and the possible side effects of all forms of contraceptives, including the success and
failure rates for prevention of pregnancy.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1917
HB 3459
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) Stress  that sexually transmitted infections are serious possible outcomes of sexual contact.
Students shall be provided with statistics  based on the latest medical information regarding the ef-
ficacy of all methods of sexual protection in preventing sexually transmitted infections,  including
human immunodeficiency virus, hepatitis B and hepatitis C.
(g) Provide students with information  about Oregon laws that address young people’s rights and
responsibilities related to childbearing and parenting.
(h) Advise students of the circumstances in which it is unlawful under ORS  163.435 and 163.445
for persons  18 years of age or older to have sexual relations with persons younger than 18 years
of age to whom they are not married.
(i) Teach students that no form of sexual expression is acceptable when the  expression phys-
ically or emotionally harms oneself or others and teach students  not to make unwanted physical and
verbal sexual advances, how to decline unwanted sexual advances or accept the  refusal of unwanted
sexual advances. Students shall be taught that it  is wrong to take advantage of or to exploit an-
other person. Materials and  information shall be presented in a manner sensitive to the fact that
there are students who have experienced sexual abuse.
(j) Validate through course material and instruction  the importance of honesty with oneself and
others, respect for each person’s dignity and well-being, and responsibility for one’s actions.
(k) Assist students in the development and practice of effective communication skills, the de-
velopment of self-esteem and the ability to resist peer pressure.
(L) Encourage family  communication and involvement to help students learn to make responsible
decisions.
(m) Include annually, beginning in grade three:
(A) An oral, written  or digital lesson, lecture or presentation about human biology re-
lated to pregnancy and human development inside a uterus;
(B) A high-definition ultrasound  video that is at least three minutes in duration and that
shows the development of the brain,  heart, sex organs and other vital organs in early fetal
development; and
(C) A video that shows the process of fertilization and  every stage of human development
inside the uterus and that identifies every significant marker of pregnancy until birth in re-
lation to cell growth and organ development.
(3) Any course in any public elementary and secondary school, the main purpose of which is to
address human sexuality education or sexually transmitted infections, including  human
immunodeficiency virus, or  both, must emphasize that abstinence from sexual contact is the only
method that is 100  percent effective against unintended pregnancy, sexually transmitted infections
and human immunodeficiency virus when  transmitted sexually. Abstinence must be stressed, but not
to the exclusion of other material and instruction on  contraceptive and infection reduction meas-
ures. Courses described in this subsection must acknowledge the value of abstinence while  not de-
valuing or ignoring those students who have had or are having sexual intercourse.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits instruction in sanitation, hygiene or  traditional courses in
biology.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to  ORS 336.455 by section 1 of this 2025 Act first apply to
the 2026-2027 school year.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]
HB 3459
1
[3]