Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 348.205 is amended to read:
348.205. (1) The Oregon  Opportunity Grant program is established within the Higher Education
Coordinating Commission.
(2) Under the program, the cost of education of a qualified student shall be shared by  the stu-
dent, the family of the student, the federal government and the state.
(3) The Executive Director of the Office of Student  Access and Completion shall determine the
cost  of  education of a qualified student based on the type of eligible post-secondary institution the
student is attending. The cost of education equals:
(a) For a student attending a community college, the  average cost of education of attending a
community college in this state;
(b) For a student attending a public university listed  in ORS 352.002, the average cost of edu-
cation of attending a public university;
(c) For a student attending  a two-year Oregon-based, generally accredited, not-for-profit institu-
tion of higher education, the average cost of education of attending a  community college in this
state; and
(d) For  a student attending [ the] Oregon Health and Science University or a four-year Oregon-
based, generally accredited, not-for-profit institution  of higher education, the average cost of edu-
cation of attending a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(4)(a) The executive director shall determine the amount of the student  share. The student share
shall be based on:
(A) The type of eligible post-secondary institution the student is attending;
(B) The number of hours of  work that the executive director determines may be reasonably ex-
pected from the student; and
(C) The amount of loans  that the executive director determines would constitute a manageable
debt burden for the student.
(b) The student shall determine how to cover  the student share through income from work,
loans, savings and scholarships.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 359
SB 576
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) The student share  for a student who attends a community college may not exceed the amount
that the executive director  determines a student may earn based on the number of hours of work
reasonably expected from the student under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(d) The student share for a student who attends an eligible post-secondary  institution that is not
a community college may not  exceed the sum of the amount that the executive director determines
a student may receive as loans  plus the amount a student may earn based on the number of hours
of work reasonably expected from the student under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(5) The executive director  shall determine the amount of the family share. The family share shall
be based on the resources of the family.
(6) The executive director shall determine the amount of the federal  share based on how much
the student or the student’s family is  expected to receive from the federal government as grants,
loans, tax credits or other student assistance.
(7)(a) The executive  director shall determine the amount of the state share. The state share shall
be equal to the cost of education  reduced by the student share, family share and amount received
by the student from the federal government.
(b) The executive director shall establish a minimum amount that a student may receive  as a
state share. If the executive director determines that the amount of the  state share of a student is
below the minimum amount, the student may not receive the state share.
(c) The executive director may not reduce the amount of  the state share of a student based on
amounts available to the student by virtue of being the designated beneficiary  of a college savings
network account established under ORS 178.300 to 178.355.
(8) Subject to  subsection (9) of this section, if the executive director determines that there are
insufficient moneys to award the state share to all qualified students, the executive director:
(a) May establish  the maximum amount that a student may receive as a state share. This amount
may vary based on whether the student is attending an eligible post-secondary institution  on a
half-time or full-time basis.
(b) May establish procedures that prioritize awarding  Oregon Opportunity Grants to qualified
students with the greatest financial need  or whose circumstances would enhance the promotion of
equity guidelines published by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(c) May not reduce the amount of the state share awarded to students in the low  income range
in a greater  proportion than the amount that the state share for students in other income ranges
is reduced.
(9)(a) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall adopt rules [ that prioritize current
foster children and former foster children for receiving ] for distributing  Oregon  Opportunity Grants
when the Oregon Opportunity Grant  program does not have sufficient funding to serve all eligible
Oregon students.  These rules shall ensure that:
(A) At least 25 percent of  all Oregon Opportunity Grant moneys are awarded to students
who commit to major in science, technology, engineering or mathematics fields; and
(B) Current foster children and former  foster children are prioritized for receiving
Oregon Opportunity Grants.
(b) [For the purposes of ] As used in  this subsection, “former foster  child” has the meaning given
that term in ORS 350.300.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 348.205 by section 1 of this 2017  Act first apply to
Oregon Opportunity Grants awarded on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
[2]