Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Housing  and Community Services Department shall establish a
project to develop affordable, mixed-used housing that  integrates residential units with
community services and commercial spaces. The project must  prioritize the needs of families
and individuals facing housing insecurity and economic challenges in the north and northeast
areas of the Portland  metropolitan area, and align with existing affordable housing develop-
ments in the area to contribute to a holistic approach to community revitalization and  sta-
bility.
(2) The objectives of the project established under this section include:
(a) Strengthening existing wrap-around services from community-based  organizations
dedicated to guiding underserved youth in this  state to realize their full potential in order
to boost educational outcomes and enhance family stability;
(b) Promoting economic development by creating job opportunities during and  after con-
struction; and
(c) Providing affordable housing options for 644 individuals in order to address the critical
shortage of housing in the community.
(3) The project must utilize environmentally sustainable practices during  the con-
struction of the development. The completed development must utilize  environmentally
sustainable practices to enhance energy efficiency and promote community resilience.
(4) The department shall consult with Self Enhancement, Inc.,  and other stakeholders,
in establishing and effectuating the project described in this section.
(5) Annually not later than December 15, the  department shall submit, in the manner
provided in ORS 192.245, a report on the progress of the project  described in this section to
the interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to housing. The department may
consult with stakeholders in compiling the report required under this subsection.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2623
SB 949
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2030.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to the Housing  and Community Services Department,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000
for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]