Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2, 3 and 4 of this 2025 Act are added to  and made a part of the
Oregon Vehicle Code.
SECTION 2. Abandoned recreational vehicle disposal fees.  (1) In addition to  the regis-
tration fees required under ORS 803.420 (7), a person must pay the abandoned  recreational
vehicle disposal fee for  registering campers, travel trailers and motor homes each biennial
registration period. The additional fee is $25 for each year of the registration period.
(2) In addition to the recreational vehicle trip permit fees  prescribed under ORS 803.645,
a person must pay the abandoned recreational vehicle disposal fee of $40.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 366.512, the  registration fees and recreational vehicle trip per-
mit fees charged and collected under this section must be deposited  into the Abandoned
Recreational Vehicle Account established under section 3 of this 2025 Act.
(4) Each biennium, beginning July 1, 2027, the  Department of Transportation shall adjust
the dollar amounts set forth in this section by the cumulative change in the Consumer Price
Index for All  Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as published by the Bureau of La-
bor Statistics  of the United States Department of Labor, or its successor index, since the
previous adjustment. The adjustments performed under this subsection  shall be rounded to
the nearest whole dollar.
(5) The adjusted fees under subsection (2) of  this section take effect on January 1 and
apply for the following two years.
(6) The Department  of Transportation may adopt rules necessary to implement this sec-
tion.
SECTION 3. Abandoned Recreational Vehicle Account. (1) The Abandoned Recreational
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1934
HB 3209
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Vehicle Account is established  in the General Fund. Interest earned by the account shall be
credited to the account.
(2) The account shall consist of:
(a) Moneys paid into the account under section 2 of this 2025 Act;
(b) Moneys appropriated to the account by the Legislative Assembly; and
(c) Other amounts deposited in the account from any source.
(3) Moneys in the account are  continuously appropriated to the Department of Trans-
portation to pay the expenses incurred under section 4 of this 2025 Act. Before awarding
reimbursements, the department may withhold an amount not exceed  five percent of the
total amount appropriated or otherwise transferred or credited to the fund to pay for  the
administrative and operational expenses of the department under section 4 of this 2025 Act.
(4) Moneys in the Abandoned Recreational  Vehicle Account that are derived from any
revenues under Article IX, section 3a, of the Oregon Constitution, may be  used only for
purposes permitted by Article IX, section 3a, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 4.
Reimbursement of costs of disposing of abandoned recreational  vehicle. (1)
As used in this section and sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act:
(a) “Costs of disposing of a vehicle” includes the reasonable costs of:
(A) Hooking up for tow,  towing, impounding, immobilizing, transporting, storing, ap-
praising, dismantling, recycling or disposing of an abandoned recreational vehicle;
(B) Providing cleaning services  necessary for the recycling or disposing of an abandoned
recreational vehicle, including pest removal, drug  abatement, asbestos removal or other en-
vironmental or hazardous waste cleanup service; and
(C) Any other action associated with the removal or disposal of an abandoned recre-
ational vehicle specified by the Department of Transportation by rule.
(b) “Person” includes a person as defined  in ORS 174.100 and a public body as defined in
ORS 174.109.
(2) A person that tows, stores or dismantles  an abandoned recreational vehicle at the
request of a local government, special district, or a state agency  may request from the de-
partment reimbursement of the person’s  unrecovered costs of disposing of the vehicle. The
request must be received by  the department no later than 60 days following the date that
an abandoned recreational vehicle is towed.
(3) The department may use funds available from  the Abandoned Recreational Vehicle
Account established in this 2025 Act to reimburse a person for up to 100 percent  of the re-
quested costs of disposing of a vehicle.
(4) A person may not receive reimbursement for the costs of disposing of  a vehicle if, as
determined by a court, local ordinance or agency rule:
(a) The person is liable for those costs;
(b) The costs of disposing of the vehicle are unreasonable or unlawful; or
(c) The towing or disposal was unlawful.
(5) After consultation with cities and counties, the department  may establish a process
for requesting reimbursement, set maximum reimbursement rates, distribute aid across  the
state, aid in the recovery of account expenses or otherwise administer this section.
SECTION 5.
Sections 2 to 4 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2036.
SECTION 6. Any balance  in the Abandoned Recreational Vehicle Account that is unex-
pended and unobligated on the date of repeal of sections  2 to 4 of this 2025 Act by section 5
[2]
HB 3209
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of this 2025 Act,  and all moneys that would have been deposited in the Abandoned Recre-
ational Vehicle Account had sections 2  to 4 of this 2025 Act remained in effect, shall be
transferred to  and deposited in the State Highway Fund, and are appropriated for expendi-
ture in the manner of other moneys in the State Highway Fund.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 803.420 is amended to read:
803.420. (1) The vehicle registration fees imposed under  this section shall be based on the clas-
sifications determined by the Department of Transportation by rule. The department  may classify a
vehicle to ensure that  registration fees for the vehicle are the same as for other vehicles the de-
partment determines to be comparable.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, or unless the vehicle is registered  quarterly,
the fees described in  this section are for an entire registration period for the vehicle as described
under ORS 803.415. For a vehicle registered  for a quarterly registration period under ORS 803.415,
the department shall apportion any fee under this section to reflect the number of  quarters regis-
tered.
(3) Vehicle registration fees are due when a vehicle is  registered and when the registered owner
renews the registration.
(4) In addition  to the registration fees listed in this section, a county or a district may impose
an additional registration fee as provided under ORS 801.041 and 801.042.
(5) A rental or leasing company, as defined in ORS 221.275,  that elects to initially register a
vehicle for an annual or biennial registration period shall pay a fee of $2 in addition to  the vehicle
registration fee provided under this section.
(6) The registration fees for each year of the registration  period for vehicles subject to biennial
registration are as follows:
(a) Passenger vehicles not otherwise provided for in this section or ORS 821.320, $43.
(b) Utility trailers or light trailers, as those terms are defined by rule by the department, $63.
(c) Mopeds and motorcycles, $44.
(d) Low-speed vehicles, $63.
(e) Medium-speed electric vehicles, $63.
(7) The registration  fees for vehicles that are subject to biennial registration and that are listed
in this subsection are as follows:
(a) State-owned  vehicles registered under ORS 805.045 and undercover vehicles registered under
ORS 805.060, $10 upon registration or renewal.
(b) Fixed load vehicles:
(A) If a declaration of weight described under ORS 803.435 is submitted establishing  the weight
of the vehicle at 3,000 pounds or less, $61.
(B) If no declaration of weight is submitted or if the weight of  the vehicles is in excess of 3,000
pounds, $82.
(c) Travel trailers, special use  trailers, campers and motor homes, based on length as determined
under ORS 803.425:
(A) Trailers or campers that are 6 to 10 feet in length, [ $81] $125.
(B) Trailers or campers over 10 feet in length, [ $81] $125 plus $7 a foot for each foot of length
over the first 10 feet.
(C) Motor homes that are 6 to 14 feet in length, [ $86] $132.
(D) Motor homes over 14 feet in length, [ $126] $194 plus $8 a foot for  each foot of length over
the first 10 feet.
[3]
HB 3209
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(8) The registration fee for trailers  for hire that are equipped with pneumatic tires made of an
elastic material and that are not travel  trailers or trailers registered under permanent registration
is $30.
(9) The registration fees for vehicles subject to ownership registration are as follows:
(a) Government-owned vehicles registered under ORS 805.040, $5.
(b) Vehicles registered with special registration for disabled veterans under ORS  805.100 or for
former prisoners of war under ORS 805.110, $15.
(c) School vehicles registered under ORS 805.050, $5.
(10) The registration fees for vehicles subject to permanent registration are as follows:
(a) Antique vehicles registered under ORS 805.010, $100.
(b) Vehicles of special interest registered under ORS 805.020, $100.
(c) Racing activity vehicles registered under ORS 805.035, $100.
(d) Trailers, $10.
(e) State-owned vehicles  registered under ORS 805.045 and undercover vehicles registered under
ORS 805.060, $10.
(11) The registration fee for trailers registered as part of a fleet under an agreement  reached
pursuant to ORS 802.500 is the same fee as the fee for vehicles  of the same type registered under
other provisions of the Oregon Vehicle Code.
(12) The registration fee for vehicles with proportional registration under ORS 826.009, or  pro-
portional fleet registration under ORS 826.011, is the  same fee as the fee for vehicles of the same
type under this section except that the fees shall be fixed on  an apportioned basis as provided under
the agreement established under ORS 826.007.
(13) In addition to any other registration fees charged for registration  of vehicles in fleets under
ORS 805.120, the department may charge the following fees:
(a) Service charge for each vehicle entered into a fleet, $3.
(b) Service charge for each vehicle in the fleet at the time of renewal, $2.
(14)(a) The registration fee for  motor vehicles required to establish a registration weight under
ORS 803.430 or 826.013, tow vehicles used to transport property for hire other than as described  in
ORS 822.210 and commercial buses is as provided in the  following chart, based upon the weight
submitted in the declaration of weight prepared under ORS 803.435 or 826.015:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Weight in Pounds Fee
8,000 or less $ 74
8,001 to 10,000 464
10,001 to 12,000 528
12,001 to 14,000 591
14,001 to 16,000 655
16,001 to 18,000 718
18,001 to 20,000 801
20,001 to 22,000 864
22,001 to 24,000 949
24,001 to 26,000 1,031
26,001 to 28,000 375
28,001 to 30,000 391
[4]
HB 3209
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
30,001 to 32,000 422
32,001 to 34,000 438
34,001 to 36,000 468
36,001 to 38,000 485
38,001 to 40,000 515
40,001 to 42,000 532
42,001 to 44,000 562
44,001 to 46,000 578
46,001 to 48,000 593
48,001 to 50,000 625
50,001 to 52,000 656
52,001 to 54,000 672
54,001 to 56,000 686
56,001 to 58,000 717
58,001 to 60,000 750
60,001 to 62,000 780
62,001 to 64,000 811
64,001 to 66,000 827
66,001 to 68,000 857
68,001 to 70,000 874
70,001 to 72,000 904
72,001 to 74,000 921
74,001 to 76,000 951
76,001 to 78,000 967
78,001 to 80,000 998
80,001 to 82,000 1,014
82,001 to 84,000 1,045
84,001 to 86,000 1,061
86,001 to 88,000 1,092
88,001 to 90,000 1,108
90,001 to 92,000 1,139
92,001 to 94,000 1,155
94,001 to 96,000 1,185
96,001 to 98,000 1,202
98,001 to 100,000 1,218
100,001 to 102,000 1,249
102,001 to 104,000 1,265
104,001 to 105,500 1,295
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(b)(A) The registration fee for motor  vehicles with a registration weight of more than 8,000
pounds that are described in ORS 825.015,  that are operated by a charitable organization as defined
in ORS 825.017 (13), is as provided in the following chart:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
[5]
HB 3209
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Weight in Pounds Fee
8,001 to 10,000 $ 71
10,001 to 12,000 85
12,001 to 14,000 92
14,001 to 16,000 107
16,001 to 18,000 114
18,001 to 20,000 128
20,001 to 22,000 135
22,001 to 24,000 149
24,001 to 26,000 156
26,001 to 28,000 170
28,001 to 30,000 178
30,001 to 32,000 192
32,001 to 34,000 199
34,001 to 36,000 213
36,001 to 38,000 220
38,001 to 40,000 234
40,001 to 42,000 241
42,001 to 44,000 256
44,001 to 46,000 263
46,001 to 48,000 270
48,001 to 50,000 284
50,001 to 52,000 298
52,001 to 54,000 305
54,001 to 56,000 312
56,001 to 58,000 327
58,001 to 60,000 341
60,001 to 62,000 355
62,001 to 64,000 369
64,001 to 66,000 376
66,001 to 68,000 391
68,001 to 70,000 398
70,001 to 72,000 412
72,001 to 74,000 419
74,001 to 76,000 433
76,001 to 78,000 440
78,001 to 80,000 454
80,001 to 82,000 462
82,001 to 84,000 476
84,001 to 86,000 483
86,001 to 88,000 497
88,001 to 90,000 504
90,001 to 92,000 518
92,001 to 94,000 525
94,001 to 96,000 540
[6]
HB 3209
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
96,001 to 98,000 547
98,001 to 100,000 554
100,001 to 102,000 568
102,001 to 104,000 575
104,001 to 105,500 589
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(B) The registration fee for motor vehicles that are certified under ORS 822.205, unless the mo-
tor vehicles  are registered under paragraph (a) of this subsection, or that are used exclusively to
transport manufactured structures, is as provided in the following chart:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Weight in Pounds Fee
8,000 or less $ 63
8,001 to 10,000 145
10,001 to 12,000 173
12,001 to 14,000 187
14,001 to 16,000 217
16,001 to 18,000 231
18,001 to 20,000 260
20,001 to 22,000 274
22,001 to 24,000 304
24,001 to 26,000 318
26,001 to 28,000 346
28,001 to 30,000 362
30,001 to 32,000 391
32,001 to 34,000 405
34,001 to 36,000 435
36,001 to 38,000 449
38,001 to 40,000 477
40,001 to 42,000 491
42,001 to 44,000 521
44,001 to 46,000 535
46,001 to 48,000 550
48,001 to 50,000 578
50,001 to 52,000 608
52,001 to 54,000 622
54,001 to 56,000 636
56,001 to 58,000 665
58,001 to 60,000 694
60,001 to 62,000 723
62,001 to 64,000 753
64,001 to 66,000 767
66,001 to 68,000 795
68,001 to 70,000 809
[7]
HB 3209
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
70,001 to 72,000 839
72,001 to 74,000 853
74,001 to 76,000 882
76,001 to 78,000 896
78,001 to 80,000 926
80,001 to 82,000 940
82,001 to 84,000 968
84,001 to 86,000 983
86,001 to 88,000 1,012
88,001 to 90,000 1,027
90,001 to 92,000 1,055
92,001 to 94,000 1,071
94,001 to 96,000 1,099
96,001 to 98,000 1,113
98,001 to 100,000 1,127
100,001 to 102,000 1,157
102,001 to 104,000 1,172
104,001 to 105,500 1,200
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(C) The owner of a vehicle described in  subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph must certify
at the time of initial registration, in a manner determined by the department by rule,  that the motor
vehicle will be used exclusively to transport manufactured structures or exclusively  as described in
ORS 822.210, unless the motor vehicle is registered under paragraph (a) of this subsection, or as
described in ORS 825.015 or 825.017 (13). Registration of a  vehicle described in subparagraph (A) or
(B) of this paragraph  is invalid if the vehicle is operated in any manner other than that described
in the certification under this subparagraph.
(c) Subject to paragraph (d) of this  subsection, the registration fee for motor vehicles registered
as farm vehicles under ORS 805.300 is as provided in the following chart, based upon the registra-
tion weight given in the declaration of weight submitted under ORS 803.435:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Weight in Pounds Fee
8,000 or less $ 50
8,001 to 10,000 65
10,001 to 12,000 75
12,001 to 14,000 97
14,001 to 16,000 108
16,001 to 18,000 129
18,001 to 20,000 141
20,001 to 22,000 162
22,001 to 24,000 172
24,001 to 26,000 195
26,001 to 28,000 204
28,001 to 30,000 226
[8]
HB 3209
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
30,001 to 32,000 237
32,001 to 34,000 258
34,001 to 36,000 270
36,001 to 38,000 291
38,001 to 40,000 302
40,001 to 42,000 324
42,001 to 44,000 334
44,001 to 46,000 356
46,001 to 48,000 366
48,001 to 50,000 388
50,001 to 52,000 399
52,001 to 54,000 409
54,001 to 56,000 432
56,001 to 58,000 453
58,001 to 60,000 463
60,001 to 62,000 474
62,001 to 64,000 496
64,001 to 66,000 517
66,001 to 68,000 528
68,001 to 70,000 540
70,001 to 72,000 561
72,001 to 74,000 571
74,001 to 76,000 594
76,001 to 78,000 604
78,001 to 80,000 625
80,001 to 82,000 636
82,001 to 84,000 657
84,001 to 86,000 669
86,001 to 88,000 690
88,001 to 90,000 700
90,001 to 92,000 723
92,001 to 94,000 733
94,001 to 96,000 754
96,001 to 98,000 765
98,001 to 100,000 787
100,001 to 102,000 798
102,001 to 104,000 819
104,001 to 105,500 831
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(d) For any  vehicle that is registered under a quarterly registration period, the registration fee
is a minimum of $15 for each quarter registered plus an additional fee of $2.
(15) The registration and renewal fees  for vehicles specified in this subsection that are required
to establish a registration weight under ORS 803.430 or 826.013 are as follows:
(a) State-owned vehicles registered under ORS 805.045, $10.
[9]
HB 3209
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
(b) Undercover vehicles registered under ORS 805.060, $10.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 803.645 is amended to read:
803.645. Fees for trip permits issued under ORS 803.600 are as follows:
(1) For a heavy motor vehicle trip permit, $43.
(2) For a heavy trailer trip permit, $10.
(3) For a light vehicle trip permit, $35.
(4) For a recreational vehicle trip permit, [ $35] $50.
(5) For a registration weight trip permit, $5.
(6) For a registered vehicle trip permit, $7.50.
(7) For a 10-day trip permit issued under ORS  803.600 (2) by a person with a vehicle dealer
certificate or a towing business certificate, $15.
SECTION 9.
Section 10 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Vehicle
Code.
SECTION 10. (1) Each biennium, beginning July 1, 2027, the  Department of Transporta-
tion shall adjust the dollar amounts set  forth in ORS 803.420 (7)(c)(A), (B), (C) and (D) and
ORS 803.645 (4) by the cumulative change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Con-
sumers, West Region (All Items),  as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the
United States Department of Labor, or  its successor index, since the previous adjustment.
The adjustments performed under this subsection shall  be rounded to the nearest whole
dollar.
(2) The adjusted fees under subsection (2) of this  section take effect on January 1 and
apply for the following two years.
(3) The Department of Transportation may adopt rules necessary to implement  this sec-
tion.
SECTION 11.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 803.420  and 803.645
by sections  7 and 8 of this 2025 Act apply to fees imposed on or after the effective date of
this 2025 Act.
SECTION 12. The section captions  used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the con-
venience of the reader and do not become  part of the statutory law of this state or express
any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
[10]