Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 496.
SECTION 2. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds  that barred owls are known to prey on
spotted owls.
(2) The State Fish and Wildlife Commission shall:
(a) Issue an order authorizing the taking of barred owls; and
(b) Establish a program that awards $5 for each taking of a barred owl.
SECTION 3.
There is appropriated  to the State Fish and Wildlife Commission, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $100,000 for the
purpose specified in section 2 (2)(b) of this 2025 Act. This appropriation is available contin-
uously until expended for the purpose specified in section 2 (2)(b) of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1821