Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Vehicle
Code.
SECTION 2. “Kei truck” means a motor vehicle that:
(1) Was originally manufactured in Japan or South Korea;
(2) Has an engine that has a piston or rotor displacement of 660 cubic centimeters;
(3) Is 11 feet or less in length;
(4) Is 4.9 feet or less in width;
(5) Is 6.6 feet or less in height; and
(6) Has a model year that predates the current year by 25 years or more.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 803.045 is amended to read:
803.045. (1) The Department of Transportation shall issue  title for a vehicle if the applicant and
the vehicle meet the following qualifications:
(a) The applicant must  satisfy the department that the applicant is the owner of the vehicle and
is otherwise entitled to have title issued in the applicant’s name.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in ORS  803.050 (2), the applicant must submit a completed and
signed application for title described in ORS 803.050.
(c) The applicant must pay the fee for issuance of a certificate of title under ORS 803.090 or  the
fee for issuance  of title in another form, as established by the department by rule in accordance with
ORS 803.012.
(d) If the vehicle is a reconstructed vehicle or  an assembled vehicle, the applicant must provide
the following information in addition to any other information required under this section:
(A) The certificate of  title last issued for the frame of the vehicle, a salvage title certificate is-
sued for the vehicle or other evidence of ownership satisfactory to the department.
(B) Bills of sale for major components used to build the vehicle.
(e) If the vehicle is  covered by an Oregon title or salvage title certificate, the applicant shall
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4955
SB 1213
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
surrender the Oregon title or salvage title certificate, submit  an application as provided under ORS
803.065 or submit other evidence of ownership satisfactory to the department.
(f) Unless the department adopts rules to the contrary, if the vehicle  is from another jurisdic-
tion, the applicant shall surrender to the department with the  application the certificate of title is-
sued by the other jurisdiction, if  such jurisdiction requires certificates of title. If such jurisdiction
does not require certificates of title, then the applicant shall surrender the registration cards.
(g) If required by the department, the applicant must submit proof of ownership as described
under ORS 803.205.
(h) Other than a racing activity vehicle [ as defined in ORS 801.404 ] or Kei truck , if the de-
partment has reason to  believe a vehicle was not certified by the original manufacturer as con-
forming to federal  vehicle standards, the department may require the applicant to provide proof
satisfactory to the department that the vehicle conforms to federal vehicle standards.
(i) Unless  the vehicle is exempted from odometer disclosure requirements, the applicant shall
submit an appropriate odometer disclosure form. The department shall determine what constitutes
an appropriate form in any particular situation. The department may make exceptions  by rule to the
requirement for submission of an odometer disclosure form.
(2) The department may not issue title for a vehicle:
(a) Required by ORS 803.210 to be inspected unless the vehicle has been inspected as  described
in ORS 803.212 and the inspection fee paid under ORS 803.215.
(b) If the current vehicle title, certificate, ownership document  or the vehicle record available
through electronic record inquiry:
(A) Has a junk status;
(B) Is a junk title, junk certificate or similar ownership  document issued by another jurisdiction;
or
(C) Has a junk or similar brand or notation.
(c) As prescribed in ORS 803.591.
(3) The department may adopt any rules it considers necessary for  the administration of sub-
section (2)(a) and (b) of this section.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 803.210 is amended to read:
803.210. (1) The Department of Transportation shall not issue title for a  vehicle described in
subsection (2) of this section unless:
(a) An inspection of the vehicle identification number or numbers  of the vehicle is performed in
accordance with ORS 803.212; and
(b) The fee established under ORS 803.215 is paid to the department for the inspection.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the requirements of  this section apply
to all of the following:
(a) A vehicle from another jurisdiction.
(b) Any assembled or reconstructed vehicle.
(c) Any vehicle if the  certificate of title has been or is required to be submitted to the depart-
ment, or a person is required to report to the department, under ORS 819.010, 819.012, 819.014  or
819.030.
(d) Any vehicle if the department has received notice that the vehicle has been or will  be
wrecked, dismantled, disassembled or substantially altered under ORS 819.010 or 822.135.
(e) Replicas.
(f) Other than a racing activity  vehicle  or Kei truck  [ as defined in ORS 801.404 ], any vehicle
[2]
SB 1213
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the department has reason to believe was  not certified by the original manufacturer as conforming
to federal vehicle standards.
(3) The requirements of this section do not apply to the  following vehicles if the person shown
as the owner on  an out-of-state title for the vehicle applies for an Oregon title in that person’s name:
(a) A rental truck, rental truck tractor or rental trailer that is registered in  Oregon under an
interstate agreement that provides that a portion of the owner’s fleet is  to be registered in each
state in which the fleet operates.
(b) A trailer or semitrailer that has permanent registration.
(4) The requirement to inspect a vehicle identification number  or numbers of the vehicle under
subsection (1) of this section does not apply to park model recreation vehicles, as  defined in ORS
803.036.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 803.420 is amended to read:
803.420. (1) The vehicle registration fees imposed under  this section shall be based on the clas-
sifications determined by the Department of Transportation by rule. The department  may classify a
vehicle to ensure that  registration fees for the vehicle are the same as for other vehicles the de-
partment determines to be comparable.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, or unless the vehicle is registered  quarterly,
the fees described in  this section are for an entire registration period for the vehicle as described
under ORS 803.415. For a vehicle registered  for a quarterly registration period under ORS 803.415,
the department shall apportion any fee under this section to reflect the number of  quarters regis-
tered.
(3) Vehicle registration fees are due when a vehicle is  registered and when the registered owner
renews the registration.
(4) In addition  to the registration fees listed in this section, a county or a district may impose
an additional registration fee as provided under ORS 801.041 and 801.042.
(5) A rental or leasing company, as defined in ORS 221.275,  that elects to initially register a
vehicle for an annual or biennial registration period shall pay a fee of $2 in addition to  the vehicle
registration fee provided under this section.
(6) The registration fees for each year of the registration  period for vehicles subject to biennial
registration are as follows:
(a) Passenger vehicles not otherwise provided for in this section or ORS 821.320, $43.
(b) Utility trailers or light trailers, as those terms are defined by rule by the department, $63.
(c) Mopeds and motorcycles, $44.
(d) Low-speed vehicles, $63.
(e) Medium-speed electric vehicles, $63.
(f) Kei trucks, $63.
(7) The registration  fees for vehicles that are subject to biennial registration and that are listed
in this subsection are as follows:
(a) State-owned  vehicles registered under ORS 805.045 and undercover vehicles registered under
ORS 805.060, $10 upon registration or renewal.
(b) Fixed load vehicles:
(A) If a declaration of weight described under ORS 803.435 is submitted establishing  the weight
of the vehicle at 3,000 pounds or less, $61.
(B) If no declaration of weight is submitted or if the weight of  the vehicles is in excess of 3,000
pounds, $82.
[3]
SB 1213
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Travel trailers, special use  trailers, campers and motor homes, based on length as determined
under ORS 803.425:
(A) Trailers or campers that are 6 to 10 feet in length, $81.
(B) Trailers or campers over 10 feet in length,  $81 plus $7 a foot for each foot of length over
the first 10 feet.
(C) Motor homes that are 6 to 14 feet in length, $86.
(D) Motor homes over 14 feet in length, $126 plus $8 a foot for each foot of length over the  first
10 feet.
(8) The registration fee for trailers for hire that are equipped with  pneumatic tires made of an
elastic material and that are not travel trailers  or trailers registered under permanent registration
is $30.
(9) The registration fees for vehicles subject to ownership registration are as follows:
(a) Government-owned vehicles registered under ORS 805.040, $5.
(b) Vehicles registered with  special registration for disabled veterans under ORS 805.100 or for
former prisoners of war under ORS 805.110, $15.
(c) School vehicles registered under ORS 805.050, $5.
(10) The registration fees for vehicles subject to permanent registration are as follows:
(a) Antique vehicles registered under ORS 805.010, $100.
(b) Vehicles of special interest registered under ORS 805.020, $100.
(c) Racing activity vehicles registered under ORS 805.035, $100.
(d) Trailers, $10.
(e) State-owned vehicles  registered under ORS 805.045 and undercover vehicles registered under
ORS 805.060, $10.
(11) The  registration fee for trailers registered as part of a fleet under an agreement reached
pursuant to ORS 802.500 is the same  fee as the fee for vehicles of the same type registered under
other provisions of the Oregon Vehicle Code.
(12) The  registration fee for vehicles with proportional registration under ORS 826.009, or pro-
portional fleet registration under ORS 826.011, is the same fee as  the fee for vehicles of the same
type under this section except that the fees shall be fixed on  an apportioned basis as provided under
the agreement established under ORS 826.007.
(13) In addition to any other registration fees charged for registration  of vehicles in fleets under
ORS 805.120, the department may charge the following fees:
(a) Service charge for each vehicle entered into a fleet, $3.
(b) Service charge for each vehicle in the fleet at the time of renewal, $2.
(14)(a) The registration fee for motor vehicles required to establish  a registration weight under
ORS 803.430 or 826.013, tow vehicles used to transport property for hire other than as described in
ORS 822.210 and commercial buses is as  provided in the following chart, based upon the weight
submitted in the declaration of weight prepared under ORS 803.435 or 826.015:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Weight in Pounds Fee
8,000 or less $ 74
8,001 to 10,000 464
10,001 to 12,000 528
12,001 to 14,000 591
[4]
SB 1213
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
14,001 to 16,000 655
16,001 to 18,000 718
18,001 to 20,000 801
20,001 to 22,000 864
22,001 to 24,000 949
24,001 to 26,000 1,031
26,001 to 28,000 375
28,001 to 30,000 391
30,001 to 32,000 422
32,001 to 34,000 438
34,001 to 36,000 468
36,001 to 38,000 485
38,001 to 40,000 515
40,001 to 42,000 532
42,001 to 44,000 562
44,001 to 46,000 578
46,001 to 48,000 593
48,001 to 50,000 625
50,001 to 52,000 656
52,001 to 54,000 672
54,001 to 56,000 686
56,001 to 58,000 717
58,001 to 60,000 750
60,001 to 62,000 780
62,001 to 64,000 811
64,001 to 66,000 827
66,001 to 68,000 857
68,001 to 70,000 874
70,001 to 72,000 904
72,001 to 74,000 921
74,001 to 76,000 951
76,001 to 78,000 967
78,001 to 80,000 998
80,001 to 82,000 1,014
82,001 to 84,000 1,045
84,001 to 86,000 1,061
86,001 to 88,000 1,092
88,001 to 90,000 1,108
90,001 to 92,000 1,139
92,001 to 94,000 1,155
94,001 to 96,000 1,185
96,001 to 98,000 1,202
98,001 to 100,000 1,218
100,001 to 102,000 1,249
102,001 to 104,000 1,265
[5]
SB 1213
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
104,001 to 105,500 1,295
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(b)(A) The registration fee for motor  vehicles with a registration weight of more than 8,000
pounds that are described in ORS 825.015,  that are operated by a charitable organization as defined
in ORS 825.017 (13), is as provided in the following chart:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Weight in Pounds Fee
8,001 to 10,000 $ 71
10,001 to 12,000 85
12,001 to 14,000 92
14,001 to 16,000 107
16,001 to 18,000 114
18,001 to 20,000 128
20,001 to 22,000 135
22,001 to 24,000 149
24,001 to 26,000 156
26,001 to 28,000 170
28,001 to 30,000 178
30,001 to 32,000 192
32,001 to 34,000 199
34,001 to 36,000 213
36,001 to 38,000 220
38,001 to 40,000 234
40,001 to 42,000 241
42,001 to 44,000 256
44,001 to 46,000 263
46,001 to 48,000 270
48,001 to 50,000 284
50,001 to 52,000 298
52,001 to 54,000 305
54,001 to 56,000 312
56,001 to 58,000 327
58,001 to 60,000 341
60,001 to 62,000 355
62,001 to 64,000 369
64,001 to 66,000 376
66,001 to 68,000 391
68,001 to 70,000 398
70,001 to 72,000 412
72,001 to 74,000 419
74,001 to 76,000 433
76,001 to 78,000 440
78,001 to 80,000 454
[6]
SB 1213
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
80,001 to 82,000 462
82,001 to 84,000 476
84,001 to 86,000 483
86,001 to 88,000 497
88,001 to 90,000 504
90,001 to 92,000 518
92,001 to 94,000 525
94,001 to 96,000 540
96,001 to 98,000 547
98,001 to 100,000 554
100,001 to 102,000 568
102,001 to 104,000 575
104,001 to 105,500 589
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(B) The registration fee for motor vehicles that are certified under ORS 822.205, unless the mo-
tor vehicles  are registered under paragraph (a) of this subsection, or that are used exclusively to
transport manufactured structures, is as provided in the following chart:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Weight in Pounds Fee
8,000 or less $ 63
8,001 to 10,000 145
10,001 to 12,000 173
12,001 to 14,000 187
14,001 to 16,000 217
16,001 to 18,000 231
18,001 to 20,000 260
20,001 to 22,000 274
22,001 to 24,000 304
24,001 to 26,000 318
26,001 to 28,000 346
28,001 to 30,000 362
30,001 to 32,000 391
32,001 to 34,000 405
34,001 to 36,000 435
36,001 to 38,000 449
38,001 to 40,000 477
40,001 to 42,000 491
42,001 to 44,000 521
44,001 to 46,000 535
46,001 to 48,000 550
48,001 to 50,000 578
50,001 to 52,000 608
52,001 to 54,000 622
[7]
SB 1213
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
54,001 to 56,000 636
56,001 to 58,000 665
58,001 to 60,000 694
60,001 to 62,000 723
62,001 to 64,000 753
64,001 to 66,000 767
66,001 to 68,000 795
68,001 to 70,000 809
70,001 to 72,000 839
72,001 to 74,000 853
74,001 to 76,000 882
76,001 to 78,000 896
78,001 to 80,000 926
80,001 to 82,000 940
82,001 to 84,000 968
84,001 to 86,000 983
86,001 to 88,000 1,012
88,001 to 90,000 1,027
90,001 to 92,000 1,055
92,001 to 94,000 1,071
94,001 to 96,000 1,099
96,001 to 98,000 1,113
98,001 to 100,000 1,127
100,001 to 102,000 1,157
102,001 to 104,000 1,172
104,001 to 105,500 1,200
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(C) The owner of a vehicle described in  subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph must certify
at the time of initial registration, in a manner determined by the department by rule,  that the motor
vehicle will be used exclusively to transport manufactured structures or exclusively  as described in
ORS 822.210, unless the motor vehicle is registered under paragraph (a) of this subsection, or as
described in ORS 825.015 or 825.017 (13). Registration of a  vehicle described in subparagraph (A) or
(B) of this paragraph  is invalid if the vehicle is operated in any manner other than that described
in the certification under this subparagraph.
(c) Subject to paragraph (d) of this  subsection, the registration fee for motor vehicles registered
as farm vehicles under ORS 805.300 is as provided in the following chart, based upon the registra-
tion weight given in the declaration of weight submitted under ORS 803.435:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Weight in Pounds Fee
8,000 or less $ 50
8,001 to 10,000 65
10,001 to 12,000 75
12,001 to 14,000 97
[8]
SB 1213
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
14,001 to 16,000 108
16,001 to 18,000 129
18,001 to 20,000 141
20,001 to 22,000 162
22,001 to 24,000 172
24,001 to 26,000 195
26,001 to 28,000 204
28,001 to 30,000 226
30,001 to 32,000 237
32,001 to 34,000 258
34,001 to 36,000 270
36,001 to 38,000 291
38,001 to 40,000 302
40,001 to 42,000 324
42,001 to 44,000 334
44,001 to 46,000 356
46,001 to 48,000 366
48,001 to 50,000 388
50,001 to 52,000 399
52,001 to 54,000 409
54,001 to 56,000 432
56,001 to 58,000 453
58,001 to 60,000 463
60,001 to 62,000 474
62,001 to 64,000 496
64,001 to 66,000 517
66,001 to 68,000 528
68,001 to 70,000 540
70,001 to 72,000 561
72,001 to 74,000 571
74,001 to 76,000 594
76,001 to 78,000 604
78,001 to 80,000 625
80,001 to 82,000 636
82,001 to 84,000 657
84,001 to 86,000 669
86,001 to 88,000 690
88,001 to 90,000 700
90,001 to 92,000 723
92,001 to 94,000 733
94,001 to 96,000 754
96,001 to 98,000 765
98,001 to 100,000 787
100,001 to 102,000 798
102,001 to 104,000 819
[9]
SB 1213
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
104,001 to 105,500 831
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(d) For any  vehicle that is registered under a quarterly registration period, the registration fee
is a minimum of $15 for each quarter registered plus an additional fee of $2.
(15) The registration and renewal fees  for vehicles specified in this subsection that are required
to establish a registration weight under ORS 803.430 or 826.013 are as follows:
(a) State-owned vehicles registered under ORS 805.045, $10.
(b) Undercover vehicles registered under ORS 805.060, $10.
SECTION 6.
Section 7 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Vehicle
Code.
SECTION 7. (1) A person commits the  offense of unlawfully operating a Kei truck on a
highway if the person operates a Kei truck on a  highway that has a speed limit or posted
speed that is greater than 65 miles per hour.
(2) The offense described in this section, unlawfully operating a Kei  truck on a highway,
is a Class B traffic violation.
SECTION 8.  ORS 815.075 is amended to read:
815.075. (1) A person commits the offense of selling vehicles or equipment that violates state
equipment administrative rules if the person sells or  offers for sale any vehicle or sells or offers for
sale for use upon a vehicle or uses on any vehicle any equipment if the vehicle or equipment:
(a) Does not conform to standards established by the Department of  Transportation by rule un-
der ORS 815.030; and
(b) Does not bear thereon proof of certification that it complies with the applicable standards.
(2) Proof of certification required under this section may be made in  any manner provided under
ORS 815.030.
(3) This section is subject to  the following exemptions in addition to any exemptions under ORS
801.026:
(a) Vehicles of special  interest that are registered under ORS 805.020 are deemed to comply with
this section if:
(A) The vehicles are equipped with  original manufacturer’s equipment and accessories, or their
equivalent, and are maintained in safe operating order; or
(B) The vehicles are street rods that conform to ORS 815.107.
(b) Road  machinery, road rollers, implements of husbandry, farm trailers and farm tractors are
not subject to this section.
(c) Antique vehicles are  not subject to this section if the vehicles are maintained as collectors’
items and used for  exhibitions, parades, club activities and similar uses, but not used primarily for
the transportation of persons or property.
(d) Racing activity vehicles  and Kei trucks  are not subject to this section.
(4) The offense described under this section, selling vehicles or equipment that violates state
equipment administrative rules, is a Class D traffic violation.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 815.105 is amended to read:
815.105. This section establishes  exemptions from ORS 815.030 and 815.100. Exemptions under
this section are in addition to any exemptions under  ORS 801.026. Exemptions under this section are
partial or complete as described in the following:
(1) Vehicles of special interest  that are registered under ORS 805.020 are deemed to comply with
[10]
SB 1213
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ORS 815.030 and 815.100 if:
(a) The vehicles are equipped with original manufacturer’s equipment and accessories, or their
equivalent, and are maintained in safe operating condition; or
(b) The vehicles are street rods that conform to ORS 815.107.
(2) Road machinery, road rollers, implements of husbandry, farm trailers and farm tractors are
exempt from ORS 815.030 and 815.100.
(3) Antique vehicles are exempt from ORS 815.030 and 815.100 if the  vehicles are maintained as
collectors’ items and used for exhibitions, parades, club activities  and similar uses, but not used
primarily for the transportation of persons or property.
(4) Motorized wheelchairs are exempt from ORS 815.030 and  815.100 when used as permitted
under ORS 811.440.
(5) Racing activity vehicles  and Kei trucks  are exempt from ORS 815.030 and 815.100.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 815.109 is amended to read:
815.109. [ A] Racing activity [ vehicle is ] vehicles  and Kei trucks are  exempt from vehicle
equipment requirements  under ORS 815.040, 815.075, 815.250, 815.295 and 815.310 if all of the fol-
lowing apply:
(1) The vehicle is equipped with original manufacturer’s equipment and accessories  or their
equivalent; and
(2) The vehicle is maintained in safe operating condition.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 815.300 is amended to read:
815.300. This section establishes exemptions from the requirements under ORS  815.295 to be
equipped with a certified pollution control system. Exemptions established  by this section are in
addition to any exemptions established by ORS 801.026. The exemptions established  in this section
are also  applicable to requirements for certification of pollution control equipment before registra-
tion under ORS 803.350 and 803.465. All of the following  vehicles are exempt from the requirements
under ORS 815.295:
(1) Any vehicle that is not a motor vehicle.
(2) Any vehicle unless the vehicle is registered within:
(a) The boundaries of the metropolitan service district formed under ORS chapter  268 for the
metropolitan area, as defined in ORS 268.020, which includes the City of Portland, Oregon.
(b) Boundaries designated by the Environmental Quality Commission under ORS 468A.390.
(3) Any new motor vehicle or new motor vehicle engine  when the registration results from the
initial retail sale thereof.
(4) Any motor vehicle:
(a) Not registered in areas designated under subsection (2)(a) of this section, including any ex-
pansion of such boundary under  subsection (2)(b) of this section, with a model year that predates
by more than 20 years the year in which registration or renewal of registration is required; or
(b) Registered in areas designated under  subsection (2)(a) of this section, including any expan-
sion of such boundary under subsection (2)(b) of this section, with a model year of 1974 or earlier.
(5) Motor vehicles that are registered as farm vehicles under  ORS 805.300 or apportioned farm
vehicles under ORS 805.300.
(6) Special interest vehicles that are maintained  as collectors’ items and used for exhibitions,
parades, club activities and similar uses but not used primarily for the transportation of persons  or
property.
(7) Fixed load vehicles.
[11]
SB 1213
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(8) Vehicles that are proportionally registered under ORS 826.009 and 826.011  in accordance
with agreements established under ORS 826.007.
(9) Electric motor vehicles. This subsection does not  exempt hybrid motor vehicles that use
electricity and another source of motive power.
(10) First  response rescue units operated by political subdivisions of this state that are not used
to transport persons who are ill or injured or who have disabilities.
(11) A vehicle that is currently registered in Oregon at  the time application for new registration
is received by the Department of Transportation  if the new registration is a result of a change in
the registration or plate type and the application is received at least  four months prior to the ex-
piration of the existing registration.
(12) Golf carts.
(13) Any Class I, Class II, Class III or Class IV all-terrain vehicle.
(14) An original  equipment manufacturer vehicle that is engineered, designed, produced and
warranted to use natural gas as its only fuel source.
(15) Racing activity vehicles.
(16) Kei trucks.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 468A.350 is amended to read:
468A.350. As used in ORS 468A.350 to 468A.400:
(1) “Certified system” means a motor vehicle pollution control system for which a certificate  of
approval has been issued under ORS 468A.365 (3).
(2) “Factory-installed  system” means a motor vehicle pollution control system installed by the
manufacturer which meets criteria for emission of pollutants  in effect under federal laws and regu-
lations applicable on September 9, 1971, or which meets criteria adopted pursuant to ORS 468A.365
(1), whichever criteria are stricter.
(3) “Motor vehicle” includes any  self-propelled vehicle used for transporting persons or com-
modities on public roads and  highways but does not include a vehicle of special interest as that term
is defined in ORS 801.605, if  the vehicle is maintained as a collector’s item and used for exhibitions,
parades, club activities and similar uses but not used primarily for the transportation of persons  or
property, [ or] a racing activity vehicle as defined in ORS 801.404  or Kei  truck as defined in sec-
tion 2 of this 2025 Act .
(4) “Motor vehicle pollution control system” means equipment designed for installation  on a
motor vehicle for the purpose of reducing the pollutants emitted from the vehicle, or a system or
engine adjustment or modification which causes a reduction of pollutants emitted from the vehicle.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 646.913 is amended to read:
646.913. (1) Except  as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a wholesale dealer, retail dealer
or nonretail dealer may not sell gasoline or offer gasoline  for sale unless the gasoline contains at
least 10  percent denatured fuel ethanol by volume. Gasoline that contains anhydrous ethanol in
concentrations of at least 9.2 percent by volume  complies with the requirement set forth in this
subsection.
(2) The State Department of Agriculture shall adopt standards for gasoline blended with  ethanol
that is sold in this state. The standards that the department adopts shall require that  the gasoline
blended with ethanol:
(a) Contains ethanol that is derived from agricultural or woody waste or residue;
(b) Complies with the volatility requirements specified in 40 C.F.R. part 1090;
(c) Complies with ASTM International specification D 4814,  Standard Specification for Automo-
[12]
SB 1213
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
tive Spark-Ignition Engine Fuel;
(d) Is not blended with casinghead gasoline, absorption gasoline, drip gasoline or natural  gaso-
line after the gasoline has been sold, transferred or otherwise removed from a refinery or terminal;
and
(e) Contains denatured fuel ethanol that complies  with ASTM International specification D 4806,
Standard Specification for Denatured Fuel Ethanol for Blending with Gasolines for Use  as Automo-
tive Spark-Ignition Engine Fuel.
(3) The department may review  specifications adopted by ASTM International, or equivalent
organizations, and federal regulations and revise the standards adopted under this section as nec-
essary.
(4) A wholesale dealer, retail dealer or nonretail  dealer may sell or offer for sale gasoline that
is not blended with  ethanol if the gasoline has an octane rating, as defined in ORS 646.945, of 91
or above or if the gasoline is for use in:
(a) An aircraft:
(A) With a supplemental type certificate approved by the  Federal Aviation Administration that
allows the aircraft to use gasoline that is intended for use in motor vehicles; or
(B) Issued a type certificate  by an aircraft engine manufacturer that allows the aircraft to use
gasoline that is intended for use in motor vehicles;
(b) An aircraft that has been issued an experimental certificate, as  described in 14 C.F.R. 21.191,
by the  Federal Aviation Administration and for which the manufacturer’s specifications require the
use of gasoline that is intended for use in motor vehicles;
(c) A light-sport aircraft, as defined in 14  C.F.R. 1.1, for which the manufacturer’s specifications
require the use of gasoline that is intended for use in motor vehicles;
(d) A vintage aircraft, as defined by the  Oregon Department of Aviation by rule, for which the
manufacturer’s specifications require the use of gasoline that is intended for use in motor vehicles;
(e) An antique vehicle, as defined in ORS 801.125;
(f) A Class I all-terrain vehicle, as defined in ORS 801.190;
(g) A Class III all-terrain vehicle, as defined in ORS 801.194;
(h) A Class IV all-terrain vehicle, as defined in ORS 801.194 (2);
(i) A racing activity vehicle, as defined in ORS 801.404;
(j) A snowmobile, as defined in ORS 801.490;
(k) Tools, including but not limited to lawn mowers, leaf blowers and chain saws; [ or]
(L) A watercraft ; or
(m) A Kei truck, as defined in section 2 of this 2025 Act .
[13]