Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “family coach team” means a  specialized team
that addresses  the unique needs of underserved populations across this state by providing
targeted, culturally responsive services that promote well-being and family stability.
(2) The Family Coach Program  is established in the Department of Human Services to
provide technical support and funding necessary  to ensure the sustainability and effective-
ness of family coach teams statewide.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Human Services,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $2,063,239,  for the purpose of hiring 8.5 full-time equivalent
family coach positions and one full-time equivalent manager position to  carry out the pro-
visions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4839