Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 339.345 is amended to read:
339.345. (1) As used in this section, “school” means the buildings and grounds of any
kindergarten through grade 12 public or private school.
(2) [ Each school campus in a school district, private  school campus and public charter school
campus shall have on the premises ] Each school shall have  at least one automated external
defibrillator.  The location of each automated external defibrillator  must be clearly identified
and be in an unlocked location  that is accessible when students are at the school, including
when students are at the school for athletic events or practices.
(3) The governing body for each school shall develop a cardiac emergency response  plan
for responding to incidents involving an  individual experiencing a cardiac arrest at the
school. The plan must include:
(a) The identification of the members of a cardiac emergency  response team and the
duties of the members.
(b) The process for activating  the members of the cardiac emergency response team in
response to a report of an individual experiencing a cardiac arrest at the school.
(c) Specific provisions for any athletic department  of the school for responding to a re-
port of an individual experiencing a cardiac arrest  while attending or participating in a
school-sponsored athletic event or practice at the school.
(d) The placement of automated external defibrillators in a manner that ensures that:
(A) An automated external defibrillator may be accessed  within three minutes from any
location of the school, including locations used for athletic events and practices; and
(B) Guidelines that are established by  an organization that promotes emergency
cardiovascular care and that relate to the placement of automated external defibrillators  are
followed to the greatest extent practicable.
(e) Provisions for the routine testing and regular maintenance  of automated external
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1915
HB 2529
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
defibrillators.
(f) Methods for ensuring that members of the school community are aware of the  pro-
visions of the plan and, as applicable, their roles under the provisions of the plan.
(g) The provision of staff training in the use of automated external defibrillators.
(h) Annual drills on the use of automated external defibrillators.
(i) Annual  reviews of the plan, which must be made in collaboration with local providers
of emergency services.
(4) The State Board of Education shall adopt by rule:
(a) Training requirements for staff in the use of automated external  defibrillators. The
training requirements may:
(A) Require training for school nurses, physical  education teachers, coaches, athletic
trainers and any other persons identified by the board.
(B) Prescribe a ratio of the  number of students to the number of staff members not
identified in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph who are trained.
(C) Take into consideration relevant training received for licensure.
(b) Requirements for ensuring compliance with the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The amendments to ORS 339.345 by section 1  of this 2025 Act become
operative July 1, 2026.
(2) The amendments to  ORS 339.345 by section 1 of this 2025 Act first apply to the
2026-2027 school year.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, which may be  distributed to school districts and
public charter schools to assist in implementing the provisions  of ORS 339.345, as amended
by section 1 of this 2025 Act, with priority given to schools with the highest financial needs.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]