Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 801.455 is amended to read:
801.455. “School activity vehicle” means a vehicle, other than  a school bus, that is used to
transport students to or from authorized school activities , to or from school  and that is not de-
scribed by any of the following:
(1) A vehicle subject to ORS 825.100 or a vehicle under  regulation of the United States De-
partment of Transportation.
(2) A vehicle, commonly known as a private  passenger car or private passenger van, that is used
by the owner of the vehicle or a relative of the owner of the vehicle for  personal transportation of
students to or from  school activities and is not used for compensation except for the sharing of ex-
penses in a ridesharing arrangement or reimbursement of mileage.
(3) A vehicle that is exempted from regulation as a school activity vehicle under ORS 820.150.
(4) A transit bus, as defined in ORS 811.167.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 820.100, as amended by section 3, chapter 43, Oregon Laws 2024, is  amended
to read:
820.100. (1) The State Board of Education shall adopt and enforce  such reasonable standards
relating to school bus and school activity vehicle construction and school bus and  school activity
vehicle equipment as the board deems necessary for safe and economical operation, except that the
board may not authorize the use of school buses manufactured before April 1, 1977.
(2) The governing board  of a public university listed in ORS 352.002 may adopt and enforce
separate standards of  the type described under this section for school buses and school activity ve-
hicles that are under the governing board’s jurisdiction, except that :
(a) The governing board may not authorize the use of school  buses manufactured before April
1, 1977; and
(b) School activity vehicles may be used transport students to and from home to school .
(3) The State Board of Education shall adopt and  enforce standards for school bus stop arms
authorized by ORS 820.105.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2352
HB 3205
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
(4) The State Board of Education shall adopt and  enforce standards for school bus stop arm
camera warning signs authorized by section 2, chapter 43, Oregon Laws 2024.
(5) Standards adopted under this section:
(a) Must  be consistent with requirements established by statute or by rule adopted under stat-
utory authority that relate to the same subject.
(b) Shall be consistent with minimum uniform national standards, if such standards exist.
(c) May include different requirements for different classes or types of school buses or  school
activity  vehicles.
(d) May include any exemptions determined appropriate under ORS 820.150.
[2]