Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Human Services shall study  the demographics of families
involved in the child welfare system. The department  shall submit a report in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for  legislation, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to human services no later than  September
15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4369