Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 4, chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 4. (1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General
Fund, the Economic Equity Investment Fund. Interest  earned by the Economic Equity Investment
Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) All moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon  Business Development
Department for the purposes of developing and implementing the Economic  Equity Investment Pro-
gram under sections 1 to 4 , [ of this 2022 Act ] chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2022 .
(3) Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Moneys transferred to the fund from  the Oregon Marijuana Account under ORS
475C.726;
[(b)] (c) Moneys otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or the  Oregon
Business Development Department;
[(c)] (d) Interest earned upon moneys in the fund; and
[(d)] (e) Other moneys or property transferred to the fund from any public or private source.
(4) The department may solicit and accept for deposit in the fund any  grant, donation, gift or
bequest of moneys or property from any public or private source.
(5) Any moneys transferred to the fund other  than from the Oregon Marijuana Account
shall supplement but not supplant moneys transferred from the Oregon Marijuana Account.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 475C.726, as amended by section  1, chapter 15, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended
to read:
475C.726. (1) As used in this section,  “U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index” means the U.S.
City Average Consumer Price  Index for All Urban Consumers (All Items) as published by the Bureau
of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(2) There is established in the State Treasury  the  Oregon Marijuana Account, separate and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3287
HB 3431
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
distinct from the General Fund.  The  account consists of moneys transferred to the account under
ORS 475C.734.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly the amount of moneys available  in the
Oregon Marijuana Account.
(b)[(A)] Before making other transfers  of moneys required by this section, the department shall
transfer quarterly [ to the  Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund ] all moneys in the Oregon
Marijuana Account in excess of $11,250,000[ .] as follows:
(A) To the Economic Equity Investment Fund established under section 4, chapter  103,
Oregon Laws 2022, the greater of:
(i) Fifty percent of the excess amount; or
(ii) $6,250,000; and
(B) To the Drug Treatment  and Recovery Services Fund established under ORS 430.384,
the remainder of the excess amount.
[(B)] (c) The department shall annually adjust the  $11,250,000 limitation  in [ subparagraph (A)
of this  paragraph. ] paragraph (b) of this subsection and the $6,250,000 minimum in paragraph
(b)(A) of this subsection  [ The department shall multiply $11,250,000 ] by the percentage, if any, by
which the monthly averaged U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index for the 12  consecutive months
ending August  31 of the prior calendar year exceeds the monthly index for the fourth quarter of the
calendar year 2020[ , and shall add that product to $11,250,000 ]. Any increase in the limitation or
minimum shall  apply beginning with transfers made in July of each year, based upon receipts in
the second calendar quarter of each year.
[(c)] (d) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, and  after making the transfer of moneys re-
quired by paragraph (b) of this  subsection, the department shall transfer quarterly 20 percent of the
moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account as follows:
(A) Ten percent of the moneys  in the account must be transferred to the cities of this state in
the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10 percent  must be transferred in shares that reflect the popu-
lation of each city of this state that is  not exempt from this paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)
of this section compared to the population of all cities of this  state that are not exempt from this
paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section, as determined by  Portland State University
under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately preceding the date of the transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the  number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093 and 475C.097 on the last business  day
of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located in each city compared
to the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093  and 475C.097 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the  following
shares:
(i) Fifty  percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the total commer-
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant
to ORS 475C.065 on the last business day of  the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer
for all premises located in each county compared to the total commercially  available area of all
grow canopies associated with marijuana producer licenses held pursuant to  ORS 475C.065 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the  number of li-
[2]
HB 3431
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
censes held pursuant to ORS 475C.085, 475C.093 and 475C.097 on the last business  day of the cal-
endar quarter preceding the date of  the transfer for premises located in each county compared to
the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475C.085, 475C.093 and 475C.097 on the last business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
[(d)] (e) After making the transfer of moneys required by  paragraph (b) of this subsection, 80
percent of the remaining moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account must be used as follows:
(A) Forty  percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used;
(B) Twenty percent of the moneys in the account must  be used solely for mental health treat-
ment or for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment;
(C) Fifteen percent of  the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020 may be used; and
(D) Five percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for  purposes related to al-
cohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
(4)(a) A city that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment  of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097 is  required is not eligible to
receive transfers of moneys under subsection [ (3)(c)(A)] (3)(d)(A) of this section.
(b) A  county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475C.065  is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
subsection [ (3)(c)(B)(i)] (3)(d)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475C.085, 475C.093 or  475C.097 is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection [ (3)(c)(B)(ii)] (3)(d)(B)(ii) of this section.
(d)(A) Paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection do not apply to a county ordinance  adopted on
or after January 1, 2018,  that prohibits the establishment of a premises for which a license under
ORS 475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097 is required but allows in the unincorporated  area of
the county the continued  operation of an existing premises for which a license under ORS 475C.065,
475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097 is required.
(B) A county that  adopts an ordinance described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall
certify the adoption of the ordinance under subsection (6) of this section.
(5)(a) A city or county that is ineligible under subsection (4) of this section to  receive a transfer
of moneys from the Oregon Marijuana Account during a given quarter but has received a  transfer
of moneys for that quarter shall return the amount transferred to the Department of Revenue,  with
interest as described under paragraph (f) of this subsection. An ineligible city or county  may vol-
untarily transfer the moneys to the Department of Revenue immediately upon receipt of the ineligi-
ble transfer.
(b) If the Director of the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services determines that a city
or county received a transfer of moneys under subsection [ (3)(c)] (3)(d) of this section but was inel-
igible to receive that transfer under subsection (4) of this  section, the director shall provide notice
to the ineligible city or  county and order the city or county to return the amount received to the
Department of Revenue, with interest as described under paragraph (f) of this subsection. A city or
county may appeal the order  within 30 days of the date of the order under the procedures for a
contested case under ORS chapter 183.
(c) As soon as the order under paragraph  (b) of this subsection becomes final, the director shall
notify the Department of  Revenue and the ineligible city or county. Upon notification, the Depart-
[3]
HB 3431
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ment of Revenue immediately shall proceed to collect the amount stated in the notice.
(d) The Department of Revenue shall have the benefit of all  laws of the state pertaining to the
collection of income and excise taxes and may proceed to collect the amounts described  in the no-
tice under paragraph (c) of this subsection. An assessment of tax is not necessary and  the collection
described in this subsection is not precluded by any statute of limitations.
(e) If a city or county is subject to an order  to return moneys from an ineligible transfer, the
city or county shall  be denied any further relief in connection with the ineligible transfer on or after
the date that the order becomes final.
(f) Interest under this section shall accrue at the  rate established in ORS 305.220 beginning on
the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(g) Both the moneys and the interest collected from or returned by an  ineligible city or county
shall be redistributed to the cities  or counties that were eligible to receive a transfer under sub-
section [ (3)(c)] (3)(d) of this section on the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(6)(a) Not later than July 1 of each year,  each city and county in this state shall certify with
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services whether the city or county  has an ordinance
prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issuance  of a license under ORS 475C.065,
475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097 is required and whether the county has an ordinance described in
subsection (4)(d) of this section. The certification shall be made  concurrently with the certifications
under ORS 221.770, in a form and manner prescribed by the Oregon  Department of Administrative
Services.
(b) If a city fails to comply with this subsection, the city is not eligible to receive transfers  of
moneys under subsection [ (3)(c)(A)] (3)(d)(A) of this section.  If a county fails to comply with this
subsection, the county is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection  [ (3)(c)(B)]
(3)(d)(B) of this section.
(c) A city or county that repeals an ordinance as provided  in ORS 475C.457 shall file an updated
certification with the Oregon Department of Administrative Services in a  form and manner pre-
scribed by the department, noting the effective date of  the change. A city or county that repeals an
ordinance as provided in ORS 475C.457 is eligible to  receive quarterly transfers of moneys under
this section for quarters where  the repeal is effective for the entire quarter and the updated certi-
fication was filed at least 30 days before the date of transfer.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 475C.726 by section 2 of this  2023 Act apply to
moneys transferred to the Oregon Marijuana Account on or after July 1, 2023.
SECTION 4.  ORS 475C.726, as amended by section 1, chapter 15, Oregon Laws 2022, and section
2 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
475C.726. (1) As used in this section,  “U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index” means the U.S.
City Average Consumer Price  Index for All Urban Consumers (All Items) as published by the Bureau
of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(2) There is established in the State Treasury  the Oregon Marijuana Account, separate and
distinct from the General Fund.  The  account consists of moneys transferred to the account under
ORS 475C.734.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly the amount of moneys available  in the
Oregon Marijuana Account.
(b) Except as provided in ORS 475C.871,  before making other transfers of moneys  required by
this section, the department shall transfer  quarterly all moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account
in excess of $11,250,000 as follows:
[4]
HB 3431
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) To the Economic Equity Investment Fund established under section 4,  chapter 103, Oregon
Laws 2022, the greater of:
(i) Fifty percent of the excess amount; or
(ii) $6,250,000; and
(B) To the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund established under ORS  430.384, the re-
mainder of the excess amount.
(c) The department shall  annually adjust the $11,250,000 limitation in paragraph (b) of this sub-
section and the $6,250,000 minimum in paragraph (b)(A)  of this subsection by the percentage, if any,
by which the  monthly averaged U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index for the 12 consecutive
months ending August 31 of the prior calendar year exceeds the monthly index for the fourth quar-
ter of the calendar  year 2020. Any increase in the limitation or minimum shall apply beginning with
transfers made in July of each year, based upon receipts in the second calendar quarter of  each
year.
(d) Subject  to subsection (4) of this section, and after making the transfer of moneys required
by paragraph (b) of this subsection,  the department shall transfer quarterly 20 percent of the moneys
in the Oregon Marijuana Account as follows:
(A) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to the  cities of this state in
the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred  in shares that reflect the popu-
lation of each city of this state that is  not exempt from this paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)
of this section compared to the population of  all cities of this state that are not exempt from this
paragraph pursuant to subsection  (4)(a) of this section, as determined by Portland State University
under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately preceding the date of the transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five  percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093 and 475C.097 on the last business  day
of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located in each city compared
to the number of licenses  held pursuant to ORS 475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093 and 475C.097 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten  percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the following
shares:
(i) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the total  commer-
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant
to ORS 475C.065 on the last business day of  the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer
for all premises located in  each county compared to the total commercially available area of all
grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant to ORS 475C.065 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent of  the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number of li-
censes held pursuant to ORS  475C.085, 475C.093 and 475C.097 on the last business day of the cal-
endar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located  in each county compared to
the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475C.085, 475C.093 and 475C.097 on the last business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
(e) After making the transfer of  moneys required by paragraph (b) of this subsection, 80 percent
of the remaining moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account must be used as follows:
(A) Forty  percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used;
[5]
HB 3431
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Twenty percent of the moneys in the  account must be used solely for mental health treat-
ment or for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment;
(C) Fifteen percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for  purposes for which
moneys in the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020 may be used; and
(D) Five percent of the  moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes related to al-
cohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
(4)(a) A city that has an ordinance  prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS  475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097 is required is not eligible to
receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(d)(A) of this section.
(b) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which  issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475C.065  is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
subsection (3)(d)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475C.085, 475C.093 or  475C.097 is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(d)(B)(ii) of this section.
(d)(A) Paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection do not apply to a county ordinance  adopted on
or after January 1, 2018,  that prohibits the establishment of a premises for which a license under
ORS 475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097 is required but allows in the unincorporated  area of
the county the continued  operation of an existing premises for which a license under ORS 475C.065,
475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097 is required.
(B) A county that  adopts an ordinance described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall
certify the adoption of the ordinance under subsection (6) of this section.
(5)(a) A city or county that is ineligible under subsection (4) of this section to  receive a transfer
of moneys from the Oregon Marijuana Account during a given quarter but has received a  transfer
of moneys for that quarter shall return the amount transferred to the Department of Revenue,  with
interest as described under paragraph (f) of this subsection. An ineligible city or county  may vol-
untarily transfer the moneys to the Department of Revenue immediately upon receipt of the ineligi-
ble transfer.
(b) If the Director of the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services determines that a city
or county received a transfer of moneys under subsection (3)(d) of this section but was  ineligible to
receive that transfer under subsection (4)  of this section, the director shall provide notice to the
ineligible city or  county and order the city or county to return the amount received to the Depart-
ment of Revenue, with interest as  described under paragraph (f) of this subsection. A city or county
may appeal the order within 30 days of the  date of the order under the procedures for a contested
case under ORS chapter 183.
(c) As soon as the order under paragraph  (b) of this subsection becomes final, the director shall
notify the Department of  Revenue and the ineligible city or county. Upon notification, the Depart-
ment of Revenue immediately shall proceed to collect the amount stated in the notice.
(d) The Department of Revenue shall have the benefit of all  laws of the state pertaining to the
collection of income and excise taxes and may proceed to collect the amounts described  in the no-
tice under paragraph (c) of this subsection. An assessment of tax is not necessary and  the collection
described in this subsection is not precluded by any statute of limitations.
(e) If a city or county is subject to an order  to return moneys from an ineligible transfer, the
city or county shall  be denied any further relief in connection with the ineligible transfer on or after
the date that the order becomes final.
[6]
HB 3431
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) Interest under this section shall accrue at the  rate established in ORS 305.220 beginning on
the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(g) Both the moneys and the interest collected from or returned by an  ineligible city or county
shall be redistributed to the cities  or counties that were eligible to receive a transfer under sub-
section (3)(d) of this section on the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(6)(a) Not later than July 1 of each year,  each city and county in this state shall certify with
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services whether the city or county  has an ordinance
prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issuance  of a license under ORS 475C.065,
475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097 is required and whether the county has an ordinance described in
subsection (4)(d) of this section. The certification shall be made  concurrently with the certifications
under ORS 221.770, in a form and manner prescribed by the Oregon  Department of Administrative
Services.
(b) If a city fails to comply with this subsection, the city is not eligible to receive transfers  of
moneys under subsection (3)(d)(A)  of this section. If a county fails to comply with this subsection,
the county is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(d)(B) of this section.
(c) A city or county that repeals an ordinance as provided  in ORS 475C.457 shall file an updated
certification with the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services in a form and manner pre-
scribed by the department, noting the effective date of  the change. A city or county that repeals an
ordinance as provided in ORS 475C.457 is  eligible to receive quarterly transfers of moneys under
this section for quarters where the repeal is effective for the entire quarter  and the updated certi-
fication was filed at least 30 days before the date of transfer.
SECTION 5.
The amendments to ORS  475C.726 by section 4 of this 2023 Act become op-
erative on January 2, 2024.
SECTION 6.  ORS 430.384 is amended to read:
430.384. (1) The Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund  is established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.  Interest earned by the Drug Treatment and Re-
covery Services Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys deposited into the fund pursuant to ORS 305.231;
(b) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(c) Moneys allocated from the Oregon Marijuana Account, pursuant to ORS 475C.726 (3)(b) (B);
(d) Moneys allocated from the Criminal Fine Account pursuant to ORS 137.300 (4); and
(e) All other moneys deposited into the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated to  the Oregon Health Authority for
the purposes set forth in ORS 430.389.
(4)(a) Pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section, the Legislative Assembly  shall appropriate
or transfer to the fund  an amount sufficient to fully fund the grants program required by ORS
430.389.
(b) The total amount deposited and transferred into the fund shall not be less  than $57 million
for the first year chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021, is in effect.
(c) In each subsequent year, the minimum  transfer amount set forth in paragraph (b) of this
subsection shall be increased by not less than the sum of:
(A) $57 million multiplied by the percentage, if any, by which the monthly  averaged U.S. City
Average Consumer Price Index for the 12 consecutive months ending August 31 of the prior calendar
year exceeds the monthly index for the fourth quarter of the calendar year 2020; and
[7]
HB 3431
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
(B) The annual increase, if any, in moneys distributed pursuant to ORS 475C.726 (3)(b) (B).
SECTION 7.
 Section 2, chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall develop and implement an  Eco-
nomic Equity Investment Program under which  the department shall award grants to organizations
that provide culturally responsive services to support economic  stability, self-sufficiency, wealth
building and economic equity among disadvantaged individuals,  families, businesses and communities
in this state.
(2)(a) The department shall prescribe  the form and manner in which an organization may apply
for a grant under the program.
(b) An organization’s application must demonstrate a proven ability to provide services as de-
scribed in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Grant moneys shall be awarded to organizations only for proposals  to provide outreach,
support and resources to individuals, families,  businesses or communities whose future is at risk
because of any combination of two or more economic equity risk factors in order to  improve eco-
nomic equity as measured by:
(a) Ownership of land, principal residences and other real property;
(b) Entrepreneurship;
(c) Business development;
(d) Workforce development; and
(e) Intergenerational wealth building, such as savings, investments and real property equity.
(4) Organizations awarded grant moneys under  this section may allocate the moneys to
any entity that is lawfully organized and operating under state law.
[(4)] (5) Upon request, the department shall provide technical assistance to organizations  that
receive grant moneys under the program  and may consult with an organization about the
organization’s needs to  maintain capacity to carry out the proposal for which the grant moneys were
awarded.
(6)(a) The department may adopt rules for purposes of this section.
(b) During any rulemaking process, the department shall  consult with persons and com-
munities most likely to be affected by this section.
SECTION 8.
This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[8]