Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Environmental Quality, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,500,000 for the purposes of:
(1) Awarding grants under section  2, chapter 87, Oregon Laws 2016, in an amount not less
than $1,300,000; and
(2) Administration costs necessary to implement section  2, chapter 87, Oregon Laws 2016.
SECTION 2. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1388