Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 468A.875 is amended to read:
468A.875. (1) As used in this section:
[(a) “Continuous automated  sampling system” means the total equipment and procedures for auto-
mated sample collection, sample recovery and analysis  to determine an air contaminant concentration
or emission rate by collecting a single sample or multiple integrated samples of the air contaminant for
subsequent on- or off-site analysis. ]
[(b) “Continuous  emissions monitoring system” means a monitoring system for continuously meas-
uring the emissions of an air contaminant from an incinerator. ]
[(c)] (a)  “Dioxin/furan” means tetra- through octa-chlorinated  dibenzo-p-dioxins and
dibenzofurans.
(b) “Federal  operating permit program” has the meaning given that term in ORS
468A.300.
[(d)] (c)  “Municipal solid waste incinerator” means  any facility operated before, on or after
September 24, 2023, for the purpose of combusting municipal solid waste,  regardless of whether the
facility is later reclassified as another type of waste combustion facility.
(2)[(a)] The owner or  operator of a municipal solid waste incinerator shall develop a plan to
[continuously] annually monitor or sample emissions of:
[(A)] (a) Carbon monoxide;
[(B)] (b) Sulfur dioxide;
[(C)] (c) Nitrogen oxides;
[(D)] (d) Opacity;
[(E)] (e) PCB;
[(F)] (f) Dioxin/furan;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2753
HB 3244
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(G)] (g) Cadmium;
[(H)] (h) Lead;
[(I)] (i) Mercury;
[(J)] (j) Arsenic;
[(K)] (k) Total chromium;
(L) Manganese;
[(M)] (m) Nickel;
[(N)] (n) Selenium; and
[(O)] (o) Zinc.
[(b) Where technologically feasible, the plan must provide for the use of a continuous  emissions
monitoring system to monitor the air contaminants described in paragraph (a) of this subsection. ]
[(c) If it is not technologically feasible to use a continuous  emissions monitoring system to monitor
an air contaminant described  in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the plan must provide for the use of
a continuous automated sampling system to continuously sample that air contaminant. ]
(3) The plan must describe how the owner or operator will:
(a) [ Conduct continuous monitoring or sampling required by this  section for a period of 12 con-
secutive months; ] Conduct annual monitoring or  sampling of air contaminants as required by
subsection (2) of this section;  and
(b) Make emissions data available to the Department of Environmental Quality and the public.
(4)(a) The owner or operator of  a municipal solid waste facility must submit [ the] a plan required
by this section to the department [ no later than three months after September  24, 2023. Before ap-
proving the plan,  the department may make such modifications to the plan as necessary to ensure the
quality and accuracy  of sampling or monitoring data. ] at the time and in the manner prescribed
by the department.
(b) The department may modify a plan if the department determines that:
(A) Monitoring or sampling methods included in a plan are not technologically feasible;
or
(B) Lower cost alternative  monitoring or sampling methods are available that would not
significantly impair the quality and accuracy of monitoring or sampling data.
[(b)] (5)(a)  The owner or operator of a  municipal solid waste incinerator must implement a plan
approved by the department [ no later than ] three months after the date of approval  or  at the time
that annual monitoring or sampling is conducted pursuant to  the federal operating permit
program, whichever is later .
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph  (a) of this subsection, the department may extend the
time for plan implementation at the discretion of the department.
[(5) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this section, the department may at the department’s  dis-
cretion, for good cause shown, extend the three-month  deadlines for submitting or implementing the
plan required by this section. ]
(6) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, if  the owner or operator of a
municipal solid waste incinerator is required under the  federal operating permit program to
conduct monitoring or sampling  of an air contaminant described in subsection (2) of this
section more frequently than annually, the owner or operator shall conduct  the monitoring
or sampling as required by the federal operating permit.
SECTION 2.
 Section 5, chapter 612, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  [ (1) No later than September  15, 2024, the Department of Environmental Quality shall
[2]
HB 3244
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
submit a report on the progress made in implementing section 2 of this 2023 Act, including data  re-
ceived by the department, in the manner provided in ORS  192.245, and may include recommendations
for legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to the environment. ]
[(2) No later than three months after the completion of the 12-month  period required by section 2
of this 2023 Act, the department  shall submit a report on the results of the continuous monitoring or
sampling conducted under section 2 of this 2023 Act, in the manner provided in ORS  192.245, and may
include recommendations for legislation, to the committees or interim committees of the  Legislative As-
sembly related to the environment. ]
No later than three months after completion of  annual monitoring or sampling required
by ORS 468A.875, the Department of Environmental Quality shall  submit a report on the
results of the monitoring or sampling, in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245, and may in-
clude recommendations for legislation, to the committees or interim committees of  the
Legislative Assembly related to the environment.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]