Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Forestry Department, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $695,000, which shall be placed into the State Forestry Depart-
ment Account and be expended for carrying out an integrated pest  management program
under ORS 527.310 to 527.370 to combat the plant disease Sudden Oak  Death. The department
shall expend $50,000 of the moneys appropriated under  this section as a block grant to assist
the Association of Oregon Counties  to establish and operate a task force to encourage and
coordinate county integrated pest management programs to combat Sudden Oak Death.
SECTION 2.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3870