Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 167.322 is amended to read:
167.322. (1) A person commits the crime of aggravated animal abuse in the first  degree if the
person:
(a) Maliciously kills an animal; or
(b) [ Intentionally or knowingly tortures ] Maliciously causes physical injury to  an animal.
(2) Aggravated animal abuse in the first degree is a  Class C felony and the Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission shall classify the offense as crime category 6 of the sentencing guidelines grid.
(3) As used in this section ,[:]
[(a)] “maliciously” means intentionally  acting with a depravity of mind and reckless and wanton
disregard of life.
[(b) “Torture” means an action taken for the primary purpose of inflicting pain. ]
SECTION 2.
 ORS 105.597 is amended to read:
105.597. In addition to  any places described in ORS 105.555, the following are declared to be
nuisances and shall be enjoined and abated as provided in ORS 105.550 to 105.600:
(1) Any place being used on a continuous, regular or sporadic basis for carrying out any of the
following activities, except  with regard to activities and animals described under ORS 167.335,
whether or not carried out with a particular mental state:
(a) Causing physical injury or serious physical injury, both as defined in ORS 167.310,  or cruelly
causing death.
(b) Maliciously killing [ maliciously] or maliciously causing physical injury  as defined in  ORS
167.322 [or committing torture as defined in ORS 167.322 ].
(c) Failing to provide minimum care as defined in ORS 167.310.
(d) Possession of a domestic animal as defined  in ORS 167.310 by a person described under ORS
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2882
HB 2719
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
167.332.
(2) Any place appearing to be vacant at which  a domestic animal or equine, both as defined in
ORS 167.310, are present and have been left without provision for minimum care as defined in ORS
167.310.
(3) Any place being used on a continuous, regular or sporadic basis for carrying out any of the
following activities, whether or not carried out with a particular mental state:
(a) Training or keeping an  animal for use in an exhibition of fighting as defined in ORS 167.355.
(b) Preparing  for, occupation for, promoting, conducting or participating in an exhibition of
fighting as defined in ORS 167.355.
(c) Possessing, keeping, breeding,  training, buying, selling or offering for sale a fighting dog as
defined in ORS 167.360.
(d) Promoting, conducting, participating in or performing services in furtherance of  a dogfight
as defined in ORS 167.360.
(e) Occupation, keeping or use of the place for a dogfight as defined in ORS 167.360.
(f) Exchanging for commerce  raw fur of a domestic cat or dog as defined in ORS 167.390, or
products that include the fur of a domestic cat or dog, if the fur is obtained  through a process that
kills or maims the domestic cat or dog.
(g) Possessing, keeping, rearing, training, buying, selling or offering  for sale a fighting bird as
defined in ORS 167.426.
(h) Promoting, conducting, participating in or performing services  in furtherance of a cockfight
as defined in ORS 167.426.
(i) Occupation, keeping or use of the place for a cockfight as defined in ORS 167.426.
(4) Any place being used on a continuous, regular or sporadic basis for carrying out any of the
following activities:
(a) Sexual assault of an animal as described in ORS 167.333.
(b) Possession of dogfighting paraphernalia as described under ORS 167.372.
(c) Selling or offering for sale equipment  other than paraphernalia described in paragraph (b)
of this subsection with the intent that the equipment be used to train a fighting  dog as defined in
ORS 167.360.
(d) Possessing, controlling or otherwise having  charge at the same time of more than 50 sexually
intact dogs that are two or more years of age for the primary purpose of reproduction.
(e) Manufacturing, buying, selling, bartering, exchanging, possessing or  offering for sale a gaff
or slasher as those terms are defined in ORS 167.426, or  other sharp implement designed for at-
tachment to the leg of a fighting bird as defined in ORS 167.426, with the intent that the gaff, slasher
or other sharp implement be used in a cockfight as defined in ORS 167.426.
(f) Manufacturing,  buying, selling, bartering, exchanging, possessing or offering for sale equip-
ment other than equipment described in  paragraph (e) of this subsection with the intent that the
equipment be used to train or handle a fighting bird as defined  in ORS 167.426 or to enhance the
fighting ability of a fighting bird.
SECTION 3.
As used in sections 3 to 8 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Animal abuser” means a person convicted of an animal crime.
(2) “Animal crime” means:
(a) Animal abuse in the first degree as defined in ORS 167.320;
(b) Aggravated animal abuse in the first degree as defined in ORS 167.322;
(c) Assaulting a law enforcement animal as defined in ORS 167.339;
[2]
HB 2719
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Involvement in animal fighting as defined in ORS 167.355;
(e) Dogfighting as defined in ORS 167.365;
(f) Participation in dogfighting as defined in ORS 167.370;
(g) Possessing dogfighting paraphernalia as defined in ORS 167.372;
(h) Cockfighting as defined in ORS 167.428;
(i) Participation in cockfighting as defined in ORS 167.431;
(j) Sexual assault of an animal as defined in ORS 167.333; or
(k) An attempt to commit a crime described in paragraphs (a) to (j) of this subsection.
(3) “Another United States court,” “attends,”  “correctional facility” and “works” have
the meanings given those terms in ORS 163A.005.
(4) “Convicted” includes a finding of guilty except for insanity.
SECTION 4.
(1) A person who resides in this state and has been convicted of an animal
crime, or a statutory counterpart to an animal crime in  another jurisdiction, shall make an
initial report, in person, to  the Department of State Police, a city police department or a
county sheriff’s office as follows:
(a) If the person is convicted of an animal crime in  this state and, as a result of the
conviction, the person is:
(A) Discharged, released or placed on probation or  any other form of supervised or con-
ditional release, the person shall make an initial report in the county in which  the person is
discharged, released or placed on probation or other form of supervised or  conditional re-
lease, no later than 10 days after the date the person is  discharged, released or placed on
probation or other form of supervised or conditional release.
(B) Confined in a correctional facility, the person shall make the initial report in  the
county in which  the person is discharged or otherwise released from the facility, no later
than 10 days after the date the person is discharged or otherwise released.
(b) If the person is convicted of a  statutory counterpart to an animal crime in another
United States court and, at the time of the conviction, the person is:
(A) Not a resident of this  state, the person shall make the initial report to the Depart-
ment of  State Police in Marion County, Oregon, no later than 10 days after the date the
person moves into this state.
(B) A  resident of this state, the person shall make the initial report to the Department
of State Police in Marion County, Oregon, no later than 10 days after the date the person is
discharged, released or placed on probation or any other form  of supervised or conditional
release by the other United States  court or, if the person is confined in a correctional facility
by the  other United States court, no later than 10 days after the date the person is dis-
charged or otherwise released from the facility.
(2) After making the initial report required by subsection (1) of this section, the person
shall report, in person, to the Department of  State Police, a city police department or a
county sheriff’s office, in the county of the person’s last reported residence:
(a) Within 10 days of a change of residence; and
(b) Once each year within 10 days of the person’s birth date.
(3) When  a person who has been convicted of an animal crime, or a statutory counterpart
to an animal crime in another jurisdiction, resides in another state and attends school or
works in this state, the person shall report,  in person, to the Department of State Police, a
city police department  or a county sheriff’s office, in the county in which the person attends
[3]
HB 2719
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
school or works, no later than 10 days after:
(a) The first day of school attendance or the 14th day of employment; and
(b) A change in school enrollment or employment.
(4) The law enforcement agency to which a person reports under  this section shall com-
plete an animal crime registration  form concerning the person when the person reports un-
der this section. As part of the registration and reporting requirements of this section:
(a) The person required to report shall:
(A) Provide the information necessary to complete the animal crime registration  form
and sign the form as required; and
(B) Submit to the requirements described in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The Department  of State Police, the city police department or the county sheriff’s
office:
(A) Shall photograph the person when the person initially reports under this  section and
each time the person reports annually under this section;
(B) May photograph the person’s face or any identifying  scars, marks or tattoos located
on the person  when the person reports under any of the circumstances described in this
section; and
(C) Shall fingerprint the person if the person’s fingerprints  are not included in the record
file of the Department of State Police.
(5) The obligation to report under this section is terminated  if the conviction that gave
rise to the obligation is reversed or vacated.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Department of State Police shall create an  animal crime registration
form for use by law  enforcement agencies under section 4 (4) of this 2017 Act. The form must
include a place to list all the names used by the animal abuser.
(2) No later than three working days after registering an animal  abuser under section 4
of this 2017 Act, a city police department or a county sheriff’s office shall:
(a) Send the original copy of the registration form to the Department of State Police;  or
(b) Forward the registration information to the  Department of State Police by any means
and, within 10 working days after registration, send the original copy of the registration form
to the Department of State Police.
(3) The  Department of State Police shall enter into the Law Enforcement Data System
the animal crime information obtained  from the animal crime registration forms. The de-
partment shall remove from the Law Enforcement Data  System the animal crime informa-
tion obtained from the animal  crime registration form submitted under sections 3 to 8 of this
2017 Act if the conviction or adjudication that gave rise to the registration obligation is  re-
versed or vacated or if the registrant is pardoned.
(4) The Department of State Police may adopt rules to carry  out the provisions of
sections 3 to 8 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 6. (1) The Department of  State Police, a city police department or a county
sheriff’s office shall release, upon request, any information that may be necessary to protect
the public concerning animal abusers who reside in  a specific area or concerning a specific
animal abuser.
(2) The Department  of State Police may use the Internet to make the following infor-
mation about an animal abuser available to the public:
(a) The person’s name and address;
[4]
HB 2719
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) A physical description of the person;
(c) The type of vehicle that the person is known to drive;
(d) Any conditions or restrictions of  the person’s probation, parole, post-prison super-
vision or conditional release;
(e) A description of the person’s primary and secondary targets;
(f) A description of the person’s method of offense;
(g) A current photograph of the person;
(h) If the person is under supervision, the name or telephone  number of the person’s
parole and probation officer; and
(i) If the person is not under supervision, contact  information for the Department of
State Police.
(3) The Department of State Police shall  assess a person who is required to report under
section 4 of this 2017 Act and who is not under supervision  a fee of $70 each year. Moneys
received by the Department of State Police  under this subsection are continuously appro-
priated to the department  for the purpose of carrying out the department’s duties under
sections 3 to 8 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 7.
(1) A person who is required to report in accordance with the applicable
provisions of section 4 of this 2017 Act and who has knowledge of  the reporting requirements
commits the crime of failure to report as an animal abuser if the person:
(a) Fails to make the initial report to a law enforcement agency;
(b) Fails to report following a change of school enrollment or employment status;
(c) Moves to a new residence and fails to report the move and  the person’s new address;
(d) Fails to make an annual report;
(e) Fails to provide the accurate information necessary to complete  the animal crime
registration form;
(f) Fails to sign the animal crime registration form as required; or
(g) Fails to submit to fingerprinting or to having a photograph taken of the person’s face
or any identifying scars, marks or tattoos.
(2) It is an affirmative defense in a prosecution under:
(a) Subsection  (1)(a) of this section that a person required to report under section 4
(1)(b)(A) or (B) of this 2017 Act reported, in person, to the Department of State Police,  a city
police department or a county sheriff’s office, in the county of the person’s residence,  if the
person otherwise complied with all reporting requirements.
(b) Subsection (1)(c) of this section that the person reported, in person, to the  Depart-
ment of State Police, a city police department  or a county sheriff’s office, in the county of
the person’s new  residence, if the person otherwise complied with all reporting requirements.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided  in paragraph (b) of this subsection, failure to report
as an animal abuser is a Class C felony.
(b) Failure to report as an animal abuser under subsection (1)(d) or (e) of this section is
a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 8.
(1) The purpose of sections 3 to 8 of this 2017  Act is to assist law enforce-
ment agencies in preventing the commission of future animal crimes.
(2) When the court imposes sentence upon a  person convicted of an animal crime, the
court shall ensure that the person completes a form that documents the person’s  obligation
to report under  section 4 of this 2017 Act. No later than three working days after the person
[5]
HB 2719
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
completes the form required by this subsection, the court shall ensure  that the form is sent
to the Department of State Police.
(3) At the initial intake for incarceration or release on  any type of supervised release,
the person shall complete a form that documents the person’s obligation to report under
section 4 of this  2017 Act. The Department of State Police shall develop and provide the form.
No later  than three working days after the person completes the form, the person responsi-
ble for the intake process shall send the form to the Department of State Police.
(4) A public agency and its employees are immune from liability, both civil and  criminal,
for the good faith performance of the agency’s or the employee’s  duties under sections 3 to
8 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 132.320 is amended to read:
132.320. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) to (12) of this section, in the investigation of
a charge for the purpose of indictment, the grand jury shall receive  no other evidence than such
as might be given on the trial of the person charged with the crime in question.
(2) A report or  a copy of a report made by a physicist, chemist, medical examiner, physician,
firearms identification expert, examiner of questioned documents, fingerprint  technician, or an ex-
pert or technician in  some comparable scientific or professional field, concerning the results of an
examination, comparison or test performed by such person in  connection with a case which is the
subject of a grand jury  proceeding, shall, when certified by such person as a report made by such
person or as a true copy thereof, be received in evidence in the grand jury proceeding.
(3) An affidavit of a witness who is unable to appear before the grand jury shall be received in
evidence in the grand jury proceeding if, upon application by the district attorney,  the presiding
judge for the judicial district in which the grand jury  is sitting authorizes the receipt after good
cause has been shown for the witness’ inability to  appear. An affidavit taken in another state or
territory of the United States, the District of Columbia or in a foreign country  must be
authenticated as provided in ORS chapter 194 before it can be used in this state.
(4) A grand jury that is investigating a charge of criminal driving while suspended or  revoked
under ORS 811.182 may receive in evidence an  affidavit of a peace officer with a report or copy of
a report of the peace officer concerning the peace officer’s investigation of the violation  of ORS
811.182 by the defendant.
(5) A grand jury  may receive testimony of a witness by means of simultaneous television trans-
mission allowing the grand jury and district attorney to observe and communicate with the  witness
and the witness to observe and communicate with the grand jury and the district attorney.
(6) A grand jury that is investigating a charge of failure to appear  under ORS 133.076, 153.992,
162.195 or 162.205 may  receive in evidence an affidavit of a court employee certifying that the de-
fendant failed to appear as required by law and setting forth  facts sufficient to support that con-
clusion.
(7)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,  a grand jury may receive in evidence
through the testimony of one peace officer involved in the criminal investigation under grand  jury
inquiry information from an official report  of another peace officer involved in the same criminal
investigation concerning the other peace officer’s investigation of the matter before the grand jury.
The statement of a person suspected  of committing an offense or inadmissible hearsay of persons
other than the peace officer who compiled  the official report may not be presented to a grand jury
under this paragraph.
(b) If the official report contains evidence other than chain of custody, venue  or the name of the
[6]
HB 2719
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
person suspected of committing an offense, the grand jurors must be notified that  the evidence is
being submitted by report and that the peace officer who compiled the report will  be made available
for testimony at  the request of the grand jury. When a grand jury requests the testimony of a peace
officer under this paragraph, the peace officer  may present sworn testimony by telephone if requir-
ing the peace officer’s presence before the grand jury would constitute an undue  hardship on the
peace officer or the agency that employs or utilizes the peace officer.
(8)(a) A grand jury that is investigating a charge of failure to report as a sex  offender under
ORS 163A.040 may receive in evidence certified copies of  the form required by ORS 163A.050 (2) and
sex offender registration forms  and an affidavit of a representative of the Oregon State Police, as
keepers of the state’s sex offender registration records, certifying that the certified copies  of the
forms constitute the complete record for the defendant.
(b) A grand jury that is investigating a  charge of failure to report as an animal abuser
under section 7 of this 2017 Act may receive in evidence certified copies of the forms required
by section 8  of this 2017 Act and animal crime registration forms and an affidavit of a rep-
resentative of the Oregon State Police, as keepers of the state’s animal  crime registration
records, certifying that the copies of the  forms constitute the complete record for the de-
fendant.
(9) The  grand jury shall weigh all the evidence submitted to it; and when it believes that other
evidence within its reach will  explain away the charge, it should order such evidence to be
produced, and for that purpose may require the district attorney to issue process for the witnesses.
(10) A grand jury that is  investigating a charge of driving while under the influence of
intoxicants in violation  of ORS 813.010 may receive in evidence an affidavit of a peace officer re-
garding any or all of the following:
(a) Whether the defendant was driving.
(b) Whether the defendant took or refused to take tests under  any provision of ORS chapter 813.
(c) The administration of tests under any provision of  ORS chapter 813 and the results of such
tests.
(d) The officer’s observations of physical or mental impairment of the defendant.
(11)(a) A grand jury may receive in evidence  an affidavit of a representative of a financial in-
stitution for the purpose of authenticating records of the financial institution.
(b) As used in this subsection, “financial institution” means a financial institution as defined in
ORS 706.008, an entity that regularly issues, processes or services credit cards or any  other com-
parable entity that regularly produces financial records.
(12)(a) A defendant who has been arraigned on an information alleging a felony charge  that is
the subject of a grand jury proceeding and who is represented  by an attorney has a right to appear
before the grand jury as a witness if,  prior to the filing of an indictment, the defense attorney serves
upon the district attorney written notice requesting the appearance. The  notice shall include an
electronic mail address at which the defense attorney may be contacted.
(b) A district attorney is not obligated  to inform a defendant that a grand jury proceeding in-
vestigating charges against the defendant is pending, in progress or about to occur.
(c) Upon  receipt of the written notice described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the district
attorney shall provide  in writing the date, time and location of the defendant’s appearance before
the grand  jury to the defense attorney at the indicated electronic mail address. In the event of a
scheduling  conflict,  the district attorney shall reasonably accommodate the schedules of the de-
fendant and the defense attorney if the accommodation does not delay  the grand jury proceeding
[7]
HB 2719
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
beyond the time limit for holding a preliminary hearing described in ORS 135.070 (2).
(d) Notwithstanding ORS 135.070 and paragraph (c) of this subsection, in order  to accommodate
a scheduling conflict, upon the request of the defendant the  time limit for holding a preliminary
hearing described in ORS 135.070 (2) may be extended by a maximum of an additional five judicial
days and the district attorney and the defendant may stipulate to an  extension of greater duration.
During a period of delay caused by  a scheduling conflict under this subsection, ORS 135.230 to
135.290 shall continue to apply concerning the custody status of the defendant.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 192.848 is amended to read:
192.848. (1) The Attorney General may  not disclose the actual address or telephone number of
a program participant, except under either of the following circumstances:
(a) Upon receipt of a court order signed by a judge pursuant to a finding of good cause. Good
cause exists when disclosure is sought for a lawful purpose that outweighs the  risk of the disclosure
and, in the case of a request for disclosure received from  a federal, state or local law enforcement
agency, district attorney or other public body, when information is provided to the court that  de-
scribes the official purpose for which the actual address or  telephone number of the program par-
ticipant will be used. If a judge finds  that good cause exists, the terms of the court order shall
address, as much as practicable, the safety and protection of the program participant. In cases
where the Attorney General has not received prior notice of a court order, not later  than three
business days after receiving the order, the Attorney General may object to the order and  request
a hearing before the judge who signed the order.
(b) Where the program participant  is required to disclose the actual address of the program
participant as part of a registration for :
(A) Sex offenders as required under ORS 163A.005 to 163A.235[ .]; or
(B) Animal abusers as required under sections 3 to 8 of this 2017 Act.
(2) A person to whom an  actual address or telephone number of a program participant has been
disclosed pursuant to a  court order may not disclose the actual address or telephone number to any
other person unless permitted to do so by order of the court.
(3) The Attorney General shall notify a program  participant within one business day after the
Attorney General discloses an actual address under subsection (1)(a) of this section.
(4) Upon request by a public body, the Attorney General may verify whether or not  a person is
a program participant when the verification is for official use only.
SECTION 11.
 (1) The amendments to ORS 105.597 and  167.322 by sections 1 and 2 of this
2017 Act apply to conduct occurring on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
(2) Sections 3 to 8 of this 2017  Act and the amendments to ORS 132.320 and 192.848 by
sections 9 and 10 of this 2017 Act apply  to persons convicted of an animal crime that is
committed on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 12. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[8]