Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 339.122 is amended to read:
339.122. (1) As used in this section[ ,]:
(a) “Virtual public school” means a public school that:
[(a)] (A) Provides online courses; and
[(b)] (B) Does not primarily serve students in a physical location.
(b) “Virtual public school” includes:
(A) A virtual public charter school, as defined in ORS 338.005; and
(B) Any entity that the virtual public school pays to provide educational services  to the
students of the school with moneys received  by the virtual public school as distributions
from the State School Fund or from other state or local public sources.
(2) A virtual public school may not use any moneys received  as distributions from the
State School Fund or from other state or local public sources for the  purpose of paying any
expenses incurred for advertising or other promotional materials of the school.
[(2)] (3) In any advertising or other promotional materials  of a virtual public school, [ including
a virtual public charter school as defined in ORS 338.005, ] the school must clearly  state that the
school is a publicly funded school.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 339.122 by section 1 of this 2019 Act apply to ex-
penses incurred on or after the effective date of this 2019 Act for advertising  or other pro-
motional materials.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3007