Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Battery-powered leaf blower” means a leaf blower  that is powered by an electric
battery.
(b) “Commercial contractor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 701.005.
(c) “Landscape construction professional” means a landscape  construction professional,
as defined in ORS 671.520, who is licensed under ORS 671.510 to 671.760.
(d) “Landscape contracting business”  means a landscape contracting business, as defined
in ORS 671.520, that is licensed under ORS 671.510 to 671.760.
(2) The State Department of Energy shall establish by rule  a program for providing re-
bates to commercial contractors, landscape construction professionals  and landscape con-
tracting businesses for the purchase of battery-powered leaf blowers.
(3) Rebates shall be  in an amount that is equal to 50 percent of the price paid by the
person requesting the rebate for:
(a) A battery-powered leaf blower; and
(b) Any new batteries or new battery chargers necessary for  the person to use the
battery-powered leaf blower for ordinary business reasons.
(4) Rebates shall be made only  for battery-powered leaf blowers that are intended to be
used for business reasons.
(5) Rebates shall be made from moneys credited to or deposited in the  Commercial
Landscape Equipment Rebate Fund established under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Commercial Landscape Equipment Rebate  Fund is established in the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the Com-
mercial Landscape Equipment Rebate Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Commercial Landscape Equipment Rebate Fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 701
HB 2067
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
(b) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the  Legislative As-
sembly;
(c) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any public or private source; and
(d) Interest earned by the fund.
(3) Moneys in the Commercial  Landscape Equipment Rebate Fund are continuously ap-
propriated to the State Department of Energy to carry out the provisions of section 1 of  this
2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Energy, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, out of the
General Fund,  the amount of $  for deposit in the Commercial Landscape Equipment
Rebate Fund established under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) Section 1 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The State Department of  Energy may take any action before the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section  that is necessary to enable the department to ex-
ercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the
duties, functions and powers conferred on the department by section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]