Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Revenue Officer shall conduct a study of tax incentives for
energy development, storage and transmission  in Oregon. The officer shall submit a report
of the findings of  the study, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, to the interim commit-
tees of the Legislative Assembly related to revenue no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2953