Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 687.059 is amended to read:
687.059. (1) To be issued a permit to operate a  massage facility in this  state, an applicant
[must] shall:
(a) Submit an application to the  State Board of Massage Therapists in a form and manner pre-
scribed by the board by rule;
(b) Comply with the health, safety and  infection control requirements adopted by the board un-
der ORS 687.121;
(c) Pay the fee required under ORS 687.071 [ (1)(b)];
(d) If the applicant is a natural person, be at least 18 years of age; and
(e) If the applicant is not a natural person, comport with the  laws of this state related to busi-
ness formation, including making an appropriate filing with the Secretary of State.
(2) A massage facility for which a  person has been issued a permit under this section may pro-
vide massage therapy only through the use of massage therapists licensed under ORS 687.051.
(3) A massage facility may not be located within 1,000 feet of:
(a) A building where a public prekindergarten or kindergarten program is provided by  a
school district or an education service district;
(b) A public elementary  or secondary school for which attendance is compulsory under
ORS 339.020; or
(c) A private or parochial elementary or secondary school, teaching children as  described
in ORS 339.030 (1)(a).
[(3)] (4) The board may authorize relocating a massage facility if:
(a) The permittee submits an application in a form  and manner prescribed by the board by rule;
(b) The permittee pays the fee required under ORS 687.071 [ (1)(h)]; and
(c) The permittee complies with any other applicable rule of the board.
[(4)] (5) The board may authorize transferring a permit to operate a massage  facility from one
person to another person if the person to whom the permit will be transferred:
(a) Submits an application in a form and manner prescribed by the board by rule;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3625
HB 2446
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
(b) Pays the fee required under ORS 687.071 [ (1)(i)];
(c) Makes all necessary changes to documents on file with the Secretary of State; and
(d) Complies with any other applicable rule of the board.
[(5)] (6) The board may  authorize transferring the name of a massage facility to another massage
facility if the permittee who operates the massage facility to which the name will be transferred:
(a) Submits an application in a form and manner prescribed by the board by rule;
(b) Pays the fee required under ORS 687.071 [ (1)(j)];
(c) Makes all necessary changes to documents on file with the Secretary of State; and
(d) Complies with any other applicable rule of the board.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 687.071 is amended to read:
687.071. (1) The State Board of Massage Therapists shall impose fees for the following:
(a) Issuance or renewal of a massage therapist license.
(b) Issuance or renewal of a permit to operate a massage facility.
(c) Examinations and reexaminations.
(d) Inactive status.
(e) Delinquency in renewal of a license or of a permit to operate a massage facility.
(f) Temporary practice permit.
(g) Application for massage license examination.
(h) Relocation of a massage facility as described in ORS 687.059 [ (3)].
(i) Transferring a permit to operate a massage facility from one person to another  person as
described in ORS 687.059 [ (4)].
(j) Transferring the name of a massage facility to another massage facility as described in  ORS
687.059 [ (5)].
(2) If the effective period of an initial massage therapist license or  permit to operate a massage
facility is to be less than 12 months by reason of  the expiration date established by rule of the
board, the required license fee shall be prorated to represent one-half of  the rate for a biennial pe-
riod.
(3) The board shall examine or reexamine an applicant for a massage therapist license  who pays
a fee for each examination and who meets the requirements of ORS 687.051.
(4) All moneys received by the board shall be paid into the account  created by the board under
ORS 182.470 and  are continuously appropriated to the board for the administration and enforcement
of ORS 676.850, 687.011 to 687.250, 687.895 and 687.991.
SECTION 3.
(1) The amendments to ORS 687.059 and  687.071 by sections 1 and 2 of this
2025 Act apply to massage facilities for which a permit is issued under ORS 687.059 on  or
after the  effective date of this 2025 Act and that are relocated on or after the effective date
of this 2025 Act.
(2) A massage facility that is located  in an area described in ORS 687.059 (3), as amended
by section 1 of this 2025 Act, before the effective  date of this 2025 Act may remain at that
location unless the State Board of Massage Therapists revokes the massage  facility’s permit.
[2]