Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall  enter into ne-
gotiations with Home Forward  regarding the grant to compensate landlords described in
section 9, chapter 420, Oregon Laws 2021, to allow the use of the grant described  in section
4 (3), chapter 4, Oregon Laws 2021 (second special session),  for the purposes of section 9,
chapter 420, Oregon Laws 2021, and to make distributions to compensate residential landlords
that:
(a) Applied or were eligible to apply for compensation under section  2, chapter 3, Oregon
Laws 2020 (third special session), except as provided under subsection (2) of this section;
(b) Did not receive from  any source 100 percent of the past-due rent that a tenant owed
but did not pay between April 1, 2020, and June 30, 2021; and
(c) Complete an application before the earlier of January 1, 2025, or the date that grant
moneys have been exhausted.
(2) Notwithstanding section 2 (1), chapter 3,  Oregon Laws 2020 (third special session), a
landlord need not include a copy of a signed declaration as described under section 7 (1)(b)
and (3)(b), chapter 3, Oregon Laws 2020 (third special session), or section 2  (2)(a), chapter
420, Oregon Laws 2021, or any other documentation from the tenant to  be eligible for com-
pensation under subsection (1) of this  section provided that the landlord can demonstrate the
dates that the tenant occupied the dwelling and the dates for which rent was not received.
(3) If the grant is modified under this section, the department  shall take steps to ensure
that landlords that were denied funding  under section 2, chapter 3, Oregon Laws 2020 (third
special session), based on missing documentation may be reevaluated by  Home Forward or
notified of the opportunity to reapply for funding.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2024.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2037
SB 720
1
[2]