Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Health Care Professional Training Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.  The Health Care Professional
Training Fund consists of moneys paid into the fund  in accordance with sections 3, 5, 7 and
9 of this 2017 Act. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Oregon Health
Policy Board and dedicated to supporting community efforts to expand the health care  pro-
fessional workforce available to  the community’s residents, which may include but is not
limited to:
(a) Funding the start up costs for new health care professional training programs;
(b) Ensuring that individuals enrolled  in health care professional training programs are
adequately compensated;
(c) Making investments  in health care professional training programs designed to expand
the racial and ethnic diversity of Oregon’s health care workforce;
(d) Expanding the health care workforce in medically underserved areas;
(e) Supplementing Medicare funding paid to hospitals for graduate medical education; and
(f) Providing financial incentives to faculty members in health care professional training
programs and clinical preceptors.
(2) Interest earned by the Health Care Professional Training Fund shall be credited  to
the fund.
(3) Moneys in the Health Care Professional Training Fund at the end  of a biennium are
retained in the fund and do not revert to the General Fund.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Health Policy Board shall, no less than every 12  months,
assess the health care workforce  needs in this state, including the health care workforce
needed to address:
(a) The continuing expansion in commercial and publicly funded health care coverage;
(b) Health disparities among medically underserved populations; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1424
HB 3085
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) The need for health care professionals in rural communities.
(2) On the basis  of the assessment, the board shall disburse moneys from the Health Care
Professional Training Fund established in section 1 of this 2017 Act to provide loans or grants
to support communities’ plans for addressing the unmet health care professional workforce
needs in each community. The board shall establish criteria to ensure that  the moneys sup-
port community plans that:
(a) Include a substantial financial investment by the community;
(b) Take into account the workforce assessment conducted under subsection (1) of  this
section;
(c) Are designed to improve  the access to health care by medical assistance recipients
and Medicare enrollees to the same extent that each plan improves access to health  care by
the general population of the community; and
(d) Are sustainable over the long term.
(3) The  criteria adopted by the board under subsection (2) of this section shall give pref-
erence to plans that  expand the workforce of mental health providers and oral health care
providers in areas that are eligible for the rural tax credit in ORS 315.613.
(4) The Oregon Health Authority, under the supervision of the  board, shall establish
standards, processes  and procedures, in accordance with the criteria established by the board
under subsection (2) of this section, that  are necessary to carry out sections 2 to 10 of this
2017 Act.
(5) Not later than September 30 of each year,  the board shall report to the Joint Interim
Committee on Ways and Means, on:
(a) The amount of moneys deposited in the Health Care Professional Training Fund;
(b) The results of the board’s assessment under subsection (1) of this section; and
(c) The amount and recipient of each disbursement and the purpose for which each  dis-
bursement was made.
SECTION 3.
(1) As used in this section and section 4 of this 2017 Act:
(a) “Health insurance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 731.162.
(b) “Insurer” means a:
(A) Person with a certificate of authority  to transact insurance in this state that offers
health insurance for sale in this state;
(B) Third party administrator licensed under ORS 744.700 to 744.740;
(C) Health care service contractor as defined in ORS 750.005; and
(D) Multiple employer welfare arrangement as defined in ORS 750.301.
(2) No later than 45 days following the end of  a calendar quarter, an insurer shall pay
an assessment to the Oregon Health Authority  at the rate of one cent per day for each
Oregon resident who was enrolled in health insurance offered  by the insurer during the
previous calendar quarter. The payment must  be accompanied by a verified report, or any
other form prescribed  by the authority, together with any information required by the au-
thority.
(3) The authority shall deposit the assessments collected under this section in the  Health
Care Professional Training Fund established in section 1 of this 2017 Act.
(4) The assessment imposed under this section is in addition  to and not in lieu of any tax,
surcharge or other assessment imposed on an insurer.
SECTION 4.
(1) If an insurer fails to timely file a verified  form or to pay an assessment
[2]
HB 3085
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
required under section 3 of this 2017 Act, the Oregon Health Authority may  impose a penalty
of up to $500 per day of delinquency. The total amount of penalties imposed under this  sec-
tion for a calendar quarter may not exceed the assessment due for the calendar quarter.
(2) Any penalty imposed under this section is in addition to and not in  lieu of the as-
sessment imposed under section 3 of this 2017 Act.
(3) All penalties recovered under this section shall be paid into the State Treasury and
credited to the General Fund and are available for general governmental expenses.
SECTION 5. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Health benefit plan” means a benefit  plan, as defined in ORS 243.105, that reimburses
the costs of health care and related services and supplies.
(b) “Insured” means an  eligible employee or family member, as defined in ORS 243.105,
who is covered by a self-insured health benefit plan under ORS 243.105 to 243.285.
(2) No later than 45 days following  the end of a calendar quarter, the Public Employees’
Benefit Board shall pay an assessment to the Oregon Health Authority at the  rate of one
cent per day for each insured member who was enrolled in a  self-insured health benefit plan
offered by the board during the previous  calendar quarter. The payment must be accompa-
nied by a verified report, or other form prescribed by  the authority, and any information
required by the authority.
(3) The authority shall deposit the assessments collected under this section in the  Health
Care Professional Training Fund established in section 1 of this 2017 Act.
(4) The assessment imposed under this section is in addition  to and not in lieu of any tax,
surcharge or other assessment imposed on the board.
SECTION 6. (1) If the  Public Employees’ Benefit Board fails to timely file a verified form
or to pay an assessment required under section 5 of this 2017  Act, the Oregon Health Au-
thority may impose a penalty of up to $500 per day of delinquency. The  total amount of
penalties imposed under this section for a calendar quarter may not exceed the assessment
due for the calendar quarter.
(2) Any penalty imposed under  this section is in addition to and not in lieu of the as-
sessment imposed under section 5 of this 2017 Act.
(3) All penalties recovered under this section shall be paid into the State Treasury and
credited to the General Fund and are available for general governmental expenses.
SECTION 7. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Health benefit plan” means a benefit  plan, as defined in ORS 243.860, that reimburses
the costs of health care and related services and supplies.
(b) “Insured” means an  eligible employee or family member, as defined in ORS 243.860,
who is covered by a self-insured health benefit plan under ORS 243.860 to 243.286.
(2) No later than 45 days following  the end of a calendar quarter, the Oregon Educators
Benefit Board shall pay an assessment to the Oregon Health Authority at the  rate of one
cent per day for each insured member who was enrolled in a  self-insured health benefit plan
offered by the board during the previous  calendar quarter. The payment must be accompa-
nied by a verified report, or other form prescribed by  the authority, and any information
required by the authority.
(3) The authority shall deposit the assessments collected under this section in the  Health
Care Professional Training Fund established in section 1 of this 2017 Act.
(4) The assessment imposed under this section is in addition  to and not in lieu of any tax,
[3]
HB 3085
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
surcharge or other assessment imposed on the board.
SECTION 8. (1) If the  Oregon Educators Benefit Board fails to timely file a verified form
or to pay an assessment required under section 7 of this 2017  Act, the Oregon Health Au-
thority may impose a penalty of up to $500 per day of delinquency. The  total amount of
penalties imposed under this section for a calendar quarter may not exceed the assessment
due for the calendar quarter.
(2) Any penalty imposed under  this section is in addition to and not in lieu of the as-
sessment imposed under section 7 of this 2017 Act.
(3) All penalties recovered under this section shall be paid into the State Treasury and
credited to the General Fund and are available for general governmental expenses.
SECTION 9.  (1) As used in this section  and section 10 of this 2017 Act, “coordinated care
organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(2) No later than 45 days following  the end of a calendar quarter, a coordinated care or-
ganization shall pay an assessment to the Oregon Health Authority at  the rate of one cent
per day for each  member who was enrolled in the coordinated care organization during the
previous calendar quarter. The payment must  be accompanied by a verified report, or any
other form prescribed  by the authority, together with any information required by the au-
thority.
(3) The authority shall deposit the assessments collected under this section in the  Health
Care Professional Training Fund established in section 1 of this 2017 Act.
(4) The assessment imposed under this section is in addition  to and not in lieu of any tax,
surcharge or other assessment imposed on a coordinated care organization.
SECTION 10. (1) If a coordinated care organization fails  to timely file a verified form or
to pay an assessment required under section 9 of this 2017 Act, the Oregon Health Authority
may impose a penalty of up to $500 per day of delinquency. The total amount of  penalties
imposed under this section for a  calendar quarter may not exceed the assessment due for
the calendar quarter.
(2) Any penalty imposed under  this section is in addition to and not in lieu of the as-
sessment imposed under section 9 of this 2017 Act.
(3) All penalties recovered under this section shall be paid into the State Treasury and
credited to the General Fund and are available for general governmental expenses.
[4]