Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) To foster investment and  trade relations between Oregon and the fol-
lowing countries, the Oregon Business Development Department shall establish:
(a) The Oregon-Taiwan Trade Center in Kaohsiung, Taiwan, no later than January 1,
2026.
(b) The Oregon-Vietnam Trade Center in Hanoi, Vietnam, no later than January 1, 2028.
(2)(a) The department may establish  additional offices in Taiwan or Vietnam as necessary
to foster economic relations or expand trade.
(b) The department shall establish a designated fund at  each trade center for the purpose
of supporting strategic priorities.
(3) Each trade center described in subsection (1) of this section at a minimum must  have
the following staff:
(a) One person who is the  director of the trade center with oversight authority and re-
sponsibility for all Oregon employees working at the center.
(b) At least person who is a representative from the State Department of Agriculture.
(c) One person with expertise in international trade from the Oregon Business Develop-
ment Department.
(d) One person who is a recruiter from a public university in Oregon.
(e) One person with expertise in manufacturing and industrial systems.
(f) One person with expertise in emergency management.
(g) Any other staff necessary to support operations at the trade center.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall study the most  ef-
fective option to reorganize agency staff  structure in Oregon and at the trade centers de-
scribed in section 1 of this 2025 Act for the purpose of fostering  economic relations and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2533
HB 2756
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
expanding trade between Oregon and the countries in which a trade center is established.
(2) In conducting the study, the department shall collaborate with  and consider the views
of the following appointees:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint two members from  among the members of
the Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall  appoint two members from the
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor may appoint subject-matter experts as appropriate.
(3) The department shall submit a report in the manner provided  by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim  committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to economic development no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon  Business Development Department, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $500,000, to carry out section 1 (2)(b) of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]