Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1)(a) The Oregon  Business Development Department shall develop and ad-
minister a program for  awarding grants to community-based rodeo organizations for capital
expenses described in subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(b) A rodeo organization is eligible to apply for a  grant under this section if the rodeo
organization is based in a community with a population of 12,000 or less.
(c) A grant may not be awarded in an  amount greater than $250,000 per rodeo organiza-
tion.
(2)(a) Grant moneys may be used solely for:
(A) Capital projects on existing rodeo property; and
(B) Purchases of capital equipment for capital projects on existing rodeo property.
(b) Grant moneys may not be used for costs associated with personnel, livestock or  the
operations of the rodeo organization.
(3)(a) The department  shall prescribe an application process, including forms and dead-
lines, for rodeo organizations seeking grants.
(b) The department  may consult with a rodeo organization about its application and the
rodeo organization may submit an amended application within the application period.
(4)(a) The department shall review each timely and complete application and:
(A) Approve the application as submitted;
(B) Approve the application for an  amount other than the amount sought in the appli-
cation; or
(C) Reject the application.
(b) Grant award amounts and the rejection of an  application may not be appealed, but a
rodeo organization may submit another application at any time within the  application period.
(5)(a) Upon making a  decision with respect to an application under subsection (4) of this
section, the department shall:
(A) Notify the rodeo organization of its decision and the reason for its decision; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1232
SB 771
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
(B) Offer a grant agreement to a successful applicant rodeo organization.
(b) The  department may elect to disburse the grant moneys in a single payment or in
multiple conditional payments, as specified in the grant agreement.
(c) The grant agreement shall  require the rodeo organization to make such periodic re-
ports as the department deems necessary for  the department’s administration of the grant
award program.
(d) When a grant agreement has been finalized, the department shall distribute  to the
rodeo organization the grant moneys as specified in the grant agreement.
(6)(a) Upon discovery by the  department that the rodeo organization has used the grant
moneys for any purpose other than the purposes set forth in the grant agreement, the rodeo
organization shall become liable for repayment in full of the grant moneys.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph  (a) of this subsection, the department in its sole dis-
cretion may ratify such purposes and cancel the rodeo organization’s liability, subject  to a
new grant agreement.
(7) Any and all amounts required to be repaid  under subsection (6) of this section shall
be considered to be liquidated and delinquent,  and the Oregon Business Development De-
partment shall assign such amounts to the Department of Revenue for  collection as provided
in ORS 293.250.
(8) If  the Oregon Business Development Department discovers that a rodeo organization
willfully made a false statement or misrepresentation, or willfully  failed to report a material
fact, to obtain a  grant award under this section, the Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment may add to the amount the rodeo organization is obligated to repay a penalty not  to
exceed 20 percent of the principal amount of the grant so obtained, plus any  applicable in-
terest and fees associated with the Department of Revenue’s costs of collection.
(9) Subject to ORS 293.250, all amounts repaid to the Oregon Business Development De-
partment or the Department of Revenue under this section, including  grant award amounts,
penalties, interest, fees and any other charges, shall be transferred  to a fund of the Oregon
Business Development Department.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, for
the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
[2]