Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 137.225 is amended to read:
137.225. (1)(a) At any time after the person becomes  eligible as described in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, any person convicted of an  offense who has fully complied with and performed the sen-
tence of the court for the offense, and whose  conviction is described in subsection (5) of this section,
by motion may apply to the court where the conviction was entered for entry of  an order setting
aside the conviction. A person who is still  under supervision  or who has outstanding
compensatory fines or restitution as part of the sentence for the offense that  is the subject of the
motion has not fully complied with or performed the  sentence of the court. The fact that a person
has outstanding fines and fees other  than restitution and compensatory fines that are part
of the sentence for the offense that is the subject of the motion may not be considered when
determining whether the person has fully complied with or performed the sentence of the
court.
(b) A person is eligible to file a motion under paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) For  a Class B felony, seven years from the date of conviction or the release of the person
from imprisonment for the conviction sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(B) For a Class C felony, five years from  the date of conviction or the release of the person from
imprisonment for the conviction sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(C) For a  Class A misdemeanor, three years from the date of conviction or the release of the
person from imprisonment for the conviction sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(D) For a Class B or Class C  misdemeanor, a violation or the finding of a person in contempt
of court, one  year from the date of conviction or finding or the release of the person from
imprisonment for the conviction or finding sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(c) If no accusatory instrument is filed, at any time after 60 days from the  date the prosecuting
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 139
HB 4097
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
attorney indicates that the state has elected not to proceed with a prosecution or contempt pro-
ceeding, an arrested, cited or charged person may  apply to the court in the county in which the
person was arrested, cited or charged, for entry of an order setting aside the record of the  arrest,
citation or charge.
(d) At any time after an acquittal or  a dismissal other than a dismissal described in paragraph
(c) of this subsection, an  arrested, cited or charged person may apply to the court in the county in
which the person was arrested, cited or charged, for entry  of an order setting aside the record of
the arrest, citation or charge.
(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection, a person whose sentence of probation  was
revoked may not apply to the court for entry of an order setting  aside the conviction for which the
person was sentenced to probation for a period of three years from the date  of revocation or until
the person becomes eligible as described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, whichever occurs later.
(f) If  the offense classification of a conviction has been reduced by the court, the appli-
cable time period under  paragraph (b) of this subsection is the time period associated with
the reduced offense classification, calculated from the date of conviction or the release  of
the person from imprisonment for the conviction sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
[(f)] (g)  A person filing a motion under this section is not required to  pay the filing fee estab-
lished under ORS 21.135.
(2)(a) A copy of the motion shall be served upon the office of the  prosecuting attorney who
prosecuted the offense, or who had authority  to prosecute the charge if there was no accusatory
instrument filed.  The prosecuting attorney may [ object] file an objection  to a motion filed under
subsection (1)(a) of this section [ and shall notify the court and  the person of the objection ] within 120
days of the date the motion was filed with the court. The prosecuting attorney  shall notify the
court and the person of the objection upon filing,  and shall indicate in the objection whether
the objection is based on the circumstances and behavior of the person. If the objection is
not based on  the circumstances and behavior of the person, the prosecuting attorney shall
further notify the person that the person has 33 calendar days  from the date of the filing
of the objection to request a hearing.
(b) When a  prosecuting attorney is served with a copy of a motion to set aside a conviction
under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the prosecuting attorney shall provide a copy of the  motion
and notice of the hearing date to the victim, if any,  of the offense by mailing a copy of the motion
and notice to  the victim’s last-known address.  If the prosecuting attorney filed an objection un-
der paragraph (a) of this subsection that is not  based on the circumstances and behavior of
the person, the prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim that the  victim has 33 calendar
days from the date of the filing of the objection to request a hearing.
(c) When a person makes a motion under this section, the person shall  forward to the Depart-
ment of State  Police a full set of the person’s fingerprints on a fingerprint card or in any other
manner specified by the department.
(d) When a person makes  a motion under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the person must pay
a fee to the Department of State Police for the purpose of the  department performing a criminal
record check. The  department shall establish a fee in an amount not to exceed the actual cost of
performing the criminal record check. If the department  is required to perform only one criminal
record check for the person, the department may only charge one fee, regardless of the number of
counties in which the person is filing a motion to set  aside a conviction, arrest, charge or citation
under this section. The department shall provide a copy of the results of the criminal  record check
[2]
HB 4097
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to the prosecuting attorney.
(e) The  prosecuting attorney may not charge the person a fee for performing the requirements
described in this section.
(3)(a) If an  objection  based on the circumstances or behavior of the person  is received to
a motion filed under subsection (1)(a) of this section , or upon the  request of the person or the
victim, the court shall hold a hearing, and may require the filing of such affidavits and may require
the taking of such proofs as the court deems proper. The  court shall allow the victim to make a
statement at the hearing. If the person is otherwise eligible for relief under this section,  the court
shall grant the motion and enter an order as described in  paragraph [ (b)] (c) of this subsection un-
less the court makes written  findings, by clear and convincing evidence, that the circumstances and
behavior of the person, from the date of the conviction the person is seeking  to set aside to the date
of the hearing on the  motion, do not warrant granting the motion due to the circumstances and
behavior creating a risk to public safety. When determining whether the person’s circumstances  and
behavior create a risk to public safety,  the court may only consider criminal behavior, or violations
of regulatory law or administrative rule enforced by civil penalty or  other administrative sanction
that relate to the character of the conviction sought to be set aside. The court may not consider
nonpunitive civil liability, monetary obligations  and motor vehicle violations. Upon granting the
motion, the court shall , within 60 days after the date of the hearing,  enter an appropriate order
containing  the  original arrest or citation charge, the conviction charge, if different from the ori-
ginal, the date of charge, the submitting agency and the disposition of the  charge. Upon the entry
of the order, the person for purposes  of the law shall be deemed not to have been previously con-
victed, and the court shall issue an  order sealing the record of conviction and other official records
in the case, including the records of arrest, citation or charge.
(b) If the court receives  an objection that is not based on the circumstances and behavior
of the person and no request for a hearing is received, the court shall deny the motion.
[(b)] (c)  The court shall grant a motion filed under subsection (1)(c)  or (d) of this section, or
under subsection (1)(a) of this section if no objection to the motion is received, and shall  within 60
days after the conclusion of the time period  during which the prosecuting attorney may ob-
ject under subsection (2)(a) of this section for a motion filed under subsection (1)(a) of this
section, or within 60 days after the date the motion was  filed with the court for a motion
filed under subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this  section, enter an appropriate order containing the
original arrest or citation charge, the conviction charge, if applicable and different from the  ori-
ginal, the date  of charge, the submitting agency and the disposition of the charge. Upon the entry
of the order, the person for purposes of the law shall be deemed  not to have been previously con-
victed, arrested, cited or  charged, and the court shall issue an order sealing all official records in
the case, including the records of arrest, citation or charge, whether or not the arrest, citation or
charge resulted in a further criminal proceeding.
(d) The court,  as part of entering an order under this subsection, may waive any re-
maining fines and fees owed by the person on the offense other than compensatory fines
payable to the victim of the offense.
(4) The  clerk of the court shall forward a certified copy of the order to such agencies as directed
by the  court. A certified copy must be sent to the Department of Corrections when the order con-
cerns a conviction. Upon entry of the order, the conviction,  arrest, citation, charge or other pro-
ceeding shall be deemed  not to have occurred, and the person may answer accordingly any questions
relating to its occurrence.
[3]
HB 4097
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) The provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this section apply to a conviction for:
(a) A Class B felony, except for a violation of ORS 166.429 or any  crime classified as a person
felony as defined in the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(b) Any misdemeanor,  Class C felony or felony punishable as a misdemeanor pursuant to ORS
161.705.
(c) An offense constituting a violation under state law or local ordinance.
(d) An  offense committed before January 1, 1972, that, if committed after that date, would qualify
for an order under this section.
(e) The finding of a person in contempt of court.
(6) Notwithstanding subsection (5) of this section, the provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this sec-
tion do not apply to a conviction for:
(a) Criminal mistreatment  in the second degree under ORS 163.200 if the victim at the time of
the crime was 65 years of age or older.
(b) Criminal mistreatment in the first degree under ORS 163.205 if the victim at the  time of the
crime was 65 years of age or older, or when the offense constitutes child abuse as defined in  ORS
419B.005.
(c) Endangering the welfare of a  minor under ORS 163.575 (1)(a), when the offense constitutes
child abuse as defined in ORS 419B.005.
(d) Criminally negligent homicide under ORS 163.145,  when that offense was punishable as a
Class C felony.
(e) Assault in the third degree under ORS 163.165 (1)(h).
(f) Any sex crime, unless:
(A) The sex crime is listed in ORS 163A.140 (1)(a) and:
(i) The person has been relieved of the obligation  to report as a sex offender pursuant to a court
order entered under ORS 163A.145 or 163A.150; and
(ii) The person has not been convicted of, found guilty except for insanity  of or found to be
within the jurisdiction of the juvenile  court based on a crime for which the court is prohibited from
setting aside the conviction under this section; or
(B) The sex crime constitutes a Class C felony and:
(i) The person was under 16 years of age at the time of the offense;
(ii) The person is:
(I) Less than two years and 180 days older than the victim; or
(II) At least two years and 180 days older, but  less than three years and 180 days older, than
the victim and the court finds that setting  aside the conviction is in the interests of justice and of
benefit to the person and the community;
(iii) The victim’s  lack of consent was due solely to incapacity to consent by reason of being less
than a specified age;
(iv) The victim was at least 12 years of age at the time of the offense;
(v) The person has not been convicted of, found  guilty except for insanity of or found to be
within the jurisdiction of the juvenile  court based on a crime for which the court is prohibited from
setting aside the conviction under this section; and
(vi) Each conviction or finding described in this subparagraph involved the same victim.
(7)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (5) of this section,  the provisions of subsection (1) (a) of this
section do not apply to:
[(a)] (A)  A conviction for a state or municipal traffic offense.
[4]
HB 4097
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(b)] (B)  A person convicted,  within the following applicable time period immediately preceding
the filing of the motion pursuant to subsection (1) (a) of this section, of  any other offense, excluding
motor vehicle violations, whether or not  the other conviction is for conduct associated with the
same criminal episode that caused  the [ arrest, citation, charge or ] conviction that is sought to be set
aside:
[(A)] (i) For a motion concerning a Class B felony, seven years.
[(B)] (ii) For a motion concerning a Class C felony, five years.
[(C)] (iii) For a motion concerning a Class A misdemeanor, three years.
[(D)] (iv)  For a motion concerning a Class B or Class C misdemeanor , a violation or a finding
of contempt of court, one year.
(C) A person who  at the time the motion described in this section is pending before the
court is under charge of commission of any crime.
[(c)] (b) A single violation, other than a motor vehicle violation, within the time  period specified
in paragraph [ (b)] (a)(B)  of this subsection is not a conviction under  this subsection.
Notwithstanding  subsection  (1) of this section, a conviction that has been set aside under this sec-
tion shall be considered for the  purpose of determining whether paragraph [ (b)] (a)(B)  of this sub-
section is applicable.
[(d) A person who at the time the motion authorized by subsection (1) of this section is  pending
before the court is under charge of commission of any crime. ]
(8) The provisions of subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section do not apply to :
(a) An arrest or citation for driving while  under the influence of intoxicants if the charge is
dismissed as  a result of the person’s successful completion of a diversion agreement described in
ORS 813.200.
(b) The dismissal of a citation for a traffic violation.
(c) A person  who at the time the motion described in this section is pending before the
court is under charge of commission of any crime.
(9) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section apply  to convictions, arrests, citations and
charges that occurred before, as well  as those that occurred after, September 9, 1971. There is no
time limit for making an application.
(10) For purposes of any civil action in  which truth is an element of a claim for relief or affir-
mative defense, the provisions of subsection (3) of this section providing that  the conviction, arrest,
citation, charge or other proceeding be deemed not to have occurred do not apply and a party  may
apply to the court for an  order requiring disclosure of the official records in the case as may be
necessary in the interest of justice.
(11)(a) Upon motion of any prosecutor or defendant  in a case involving records sealed under this
section, supported by affidavit  showing good cause, the court with jurisdiction may order the reo-
pening and disclosure of any records sealed  under this section for the limited purpose of assisting
the investigation of the movant. However, such an order has no  other effect on the orders setting
aside the conviction or the arrest, citation or charge record.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, when  an arrest, citation or charge de-
scribed in subsection (1)(c) of this section is set  aside, a prosecuting attorney may, for the purpose
of initiating a criminal proceeding within the statute  of limitations, unseal the records sealed under
this section by notifying the court with jurisdiction  over the charge, record of arrest or citation.
The prosecuting attorney shall notify the person who is the subject  of the records of the unsealing
under this paragraph by sending written notification to the person’s last known address.
[5]
HB 4097
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(12) The State Court Administrator shall create forms to be used throughout the state  for
motions and proposed orders described in this section.
(13) As used in this section:
(a) “Affidavit” includes a declaration under penalty of perjury.
(b) “Sex crime” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163A.005.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 137.223 is amended to read:
137.223. (1) A person who has been  found guilty except for insanity of an offense for which, if
convicted, the person could apply for entry of an order setting  aside the conviction pursuant to ORS
137.225, may by  motion apply to the court for entry of an order setting aside the judgment finding
the person guilty except for insanity of the offense.
(2)(a) A person described in subsection (1)  of this section may file the motion to set aside a
judgment of guilty except for insanity any time after the following time periods:
(A) For a judgment of guilty except for insanity on a Class B felony, seven years from the  date
of entry of the judgment or the date the  person is no longer under the jurisdiction of the Psychiatric
Security Review Board, whichever is later.
(B) For a judgment of guilty except for  insanity on a Class C felony, five years from the date
of entry of the judgment or the date the person is  no longer under the jurisdiction of the board,
whichever is later.
(C) For a judgment of guilty except for insanity on a Class A  misdemeanor, three years from the
date of entry of the judgment or the date the  person is no longer under the jurisdiction of the board,
whichever is later.
(D) For a judgment of  guilty except for insanity on a Class B or Class C misdemeanor, one year
from the  date of entry of the judgment or the date the person is no longer under the jurisdiction
of the board, whichever is later.
(b) A person is eligible to have a judgment of guilty except for insanity set aside under  this
section if the person has no  other findings of guilty except for insanity and no convictions for of-
fenses other than motor vehicle violations within the following time periods prior to filing the  mo-
tion:
(A) For a motion concerning a  judgment of guilty except for insanity on a Class B felony, seven
years.
(B) For a motion concerning a judgment of guilty except for insanity on a Class C felony,  five
years.
(C) For a motion concerning a judgment of guilty except for insanity on a  Class A misdemeanor,
three years.
(D) For a motion concerning  a judgment of guilty except for insanity on a Class B or Class C
misdemeanor, one year.
(3)(a) A copy of  the motion shall be served upon the office of the prosecuting attorney who
prosecuted the offense. The prosecuting  attorney may [ object] file an objection  to the motion [ filed
and shall notify the court and the person of the objection ] within 120 days of [ receiving the motion ]
the date the  motion was filed with the court . The prosecuting attorney shall notify the court
and the person of the objection upon filing, and shall indicate in the  objection whether the
objection is  based on the circumstances and behavior of the person. If the objection is not
based on the circumstances  and behavior of the person, the prosecuting attorney shall fur-
ther notify the person that the person has 33 calendar days from the date of the filing of the
objection to request a hearing.
[6]
HB 4097
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) When a prosecuting attorney is served with a copy  of a motion to set aside a judgment of
guilty except for insanity under this section, the prosecuting attorney shall provide a copy of the
motion and notice of the hearing date to the victim, if  any, of the offense by mailing a copy of the
motion and notice to the victim’s last-known address. If the prosecuting attorney filed an ob-
jection under paragraph (a)  of this subsection that is not based on the circumstances and
behavior of the person, the prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim that  the victim has
33 calendar days from the date of the filing of the objection to request a hearing.
(c) When a person files a motion under this section, the person must pay a fee to the Department
of State Police for the purpose  of the department performing a criminal record check, and shall
forward to the  department a full set of the person’s fingerprints on a fingerprint card or in any other
manner specified by the department. The department shall establish  a fee in an amount not to ex-
ceed the actual cost  of performing the criminal record check. If the department is required to per-
form only one criminal record check for the person, the department may only  charge one fee,
regardless of the number of counties in which the person is filing a  motion to set aside a conviction,
arrest, charge or citation under this section.  The department shall provide a copy of the results of
the criminal record check to the prosecuting attorney.
(d) A person filing a motion under this section is not required to pay the  filing fee established
under ORS 21.135.
(4)(a) If an  objection based on the circumstances or behavior of the person  is received to
a motion filed under this  section , or upon the request of the person or the victim , the court shall
hold a hearing, and may require the filing of such affidavits and may require the taking of such
proofs as the court deems proper. The court shall allow the victim to make a  statement at the
hearing. If the person is otherwise eligible for  relief under this section, the court shall grant the
motion and , within 60 days after the date of the hearing,  enter an order as described in para-
graph [ (b)] (d)  of this subsection unless the court  makes written findings, by clear and convincing
evidence,  that  the circumstances and behavior of the person, from the date of the judgment the
person is seeking to set  aside to the date of the hearing on the motion, do not warrant granting the
motion due to  the circumstances and behavior creating a risk to public safety. When determining
whether the person’s circumstances and behavior create a risk to public safety, the court may only
consider criminal behavior, or violations of regulatory law or administrative rule enforced by civil
penalty or other administrative sanction that relate to the character of the conviction sought  to be
set aside. The court may not consider nonpunitive civil liability, monetary obligations and  motor
vehicle  violations.
(b) If no objection to the motion filed under this section is  received, the court shall grant
the motion and, within 60 days after  the conclusion of the time period during which the
prosecuting attorney  may object under subsection (3)(a) of this section, enter an order as
described in paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(c) If the court receives an  objection that is not based on the circumstances and behavior
of the person and no request for a hearing is received, the court shall deny the motion.
[(b)] (d) An order entered  under this subsection shall state the original arrest charge and the
charge for which the person was found guilty except for  insanity. The order shall further state that
positive identification has been established by the Department of State  Police and further identified
as to Department of State Police number or submitting agency number.
(5)(a) Upon the entry of an order under subsection (4) of this section:
(A) The person, for purposes of the law, shall be deemed not  to have been previously found
[7]
HB 4097
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
guilty except for insanity, and the court shall issue an order sealing the records of the case, in-
cluding the records of arrest, whether or not the arrest resulted in a further criminal proceeding.
(B) The court shall inform the person that  the person’s right to possess, purchase or otherwise
acquire a firearm remains prohibited under federal law.
(b) For  purposes of this subsection, records of the case do not include medical records that are
in the possession of the Psychiatric Security Review Board, including medical evaluations and  re-
ports submitted from other agencies concerning the status or compliance of the person.
(6) The clerk of the court shall forward a certified copy of the order entered under  subsection
(5) of this section to such agencies as  directed by the court. A certified copy shall be sent to the
Psychiatric Security Review Board. Upon entry of the order, the judgment of  guilty except for in-
sanity shall be deemed not to have been  entered, and the person may answer accordingly any
questions relating to its occurrence.
(7) For purposes of any civil action in which truth  is an element of a claim for relief or affir-
mative defense, the provisions of subsection (6) of this section  providing that the judgment of guilty
except for insanity be deemed not to have been entered do not apply and a  party may apply to the
court for an order requiring disclosure of the official records in the case as may  be necessary in the
interests of justice.
(8) Upon motion of any prosecutor or defendant in a case involving records sealed under this
section, supported by affidavit  showing good cause, the court with jurisdiction may order the reo-
pening and disclosure of any records sealed  under this section for the limited purpose of assisting
the investigation of the movant. However, such an order has no  other effect on the orders setting
aside the judgment of guilty except for insanity.
(9) A prosecuting attorney may not condition an agreement not  to object to the entry of a
judgment of guilty except for  insanity on an agreement by a person to waive the ability to set aside
the judgment under this section.
(10) As used in this section, “affidavit” includes a declaration under penalty of perjury.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 137.223 and 137.225 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2024
Act apply to motions filed on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
[8]