Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Drinking Water Services of the Oregon  Health Authority
shall establish a pilot program for training drinking water system operators.
(2) The pilot program must  include three or four workshops across the state, on or be-
fore December 31, 2027, that include a certified water loss control consultant.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 3. (1) The Water Resources Department shall establish a matching funds grant
program that awards at least $25 million in grant  funds to municipal water providers that
are subject to rules adopted by the department that relate to ground water.
(2) The grants must support the expansion of conservation programs described in appli-
cable water management and conservation plans.
SECTION 4. (1) No later than April 1 of each even-numbered year, the Oregon  Depart-
ment of Administrative Services shall submit a  report, in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, to the committees or interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to
water.
(2) The report shall describe the performance of grants awarded under ORS 568.970.
SECTION 5.
 Section 5, chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2005, as amended by section  1, chapter 694,
Oregon Laws 2011, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  (1)  The Water Resources Commission shall repeal the rules referred to in section 2,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3511
HB 3078
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
chapter 669, Oregon Laws 2005, on January 2, [ 2029] 2039.
(2) Ground water permits and mitigation projects  approved before the repeal remain valid and
effective.
SECTION 6.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $500,000, for distribution to the  Oregon Drinking Water Ser-
vices for carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $25,000,000, for  the purpose of carrying out the provisions of
section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the  following amounts, which may be expended for the
purposes of providing grants under ORS 568.970, as follows:
(1) $950,000 for providing a grant to a soil and water conservation district located in
Crook County.
(2) $500,000 for providing a grant to a soil and water conservation district located  in
Jefferson County.
(3) $400,000 for providing a grant to a soil and water conservation district located in
Klamath County.
(4) $400,000 for providing a grant to a soil and water conservation district located  in
Deschutes County.
(5) $400,000 for providing a grant to a soil and water conservation district located in
Harney County.
(6) $300,000 for providing a grant to a soil and water conservation  district located in Lake
County.
(7) $300,000 for providing a grant to Wheeler County.
SECTION 9.
The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall  provide grants
under ORS 568.970 using  moneys appropriated under section 8 of this 2025 Act no later than
July 1, 2025, or 60 days after the effective date of this 2025 Act, whichever is later.
SECTION 10. In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $150,000, for distribution  to the Central
Oregon Intergovernmental Council for  the purpose of connecting to funding sources related
to implementing ORS 568.970.
SECTION 11. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $500,000, for distribution to soil and
water conservation districts for monitoring, or contracting for monitoring, related to im-
plementing ORS 568.970.
SECTION 12.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]