Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Freedom Pilot Program is established in the Department of
Human Services. The purpose of the program is to assist low-income Oregonians to live  in
dignity by providing monthly payments of $750, using a special debit card, to adults partic-
ipating in the program.
(2) The number  of adults participating in the program will be based on the amount of
revenue projected by the Department of  Revenue from sales taxes and use taxes imposed
under sections 7  and 8 of this 2022 Act. The Department of Human Services shall prescribe
by rule eligibility requirements for the program that must give  priority to Oregonians with
incomes furthest below the federal  poverty guidelines and that must include, but not be
limited to, requiring that a participant:
(a) Is a resident of Oregon;
(b) Is 18 years of age or older;
(c) Attends a financial literacy program provided by an entity  described in subsection (3)
of this section; and
(d) Agrees to allow the participant’s spending on the special debit card to be tracked for
analytical purposes only.
(3) The Department of Human Services shall  contract with a community college or with
a nonprofit entity with a strong record of assisting  individuals to recover from debt and
credit problems to provide financial literacy education to participants in the program.
(4) The Department of Human Services shall seek waivers or other exemptions from  the
federal government that are necessary to exclude  payments under this section from consid-
eration for the temporary assistance for needy families program in ORS 412.001  to 412.069,
the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, as  defined in ORS 411.806, medical assist-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 176
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ance, as defined in ORS  414.025, and any other need-based program funded in whole or in part
with federal funds.
(5) Payments  from the Oregon Freedom Pilot Program do not count as income for any
state-funded need-based benefits or assistance.
(6) If the federal government denies waivers or other exemptions requested  by the de-
partment under subsection (4) of this section, the department  shall administer a program to
semiannually reimburse a participant receiving payments under subsection (1)  of this section
for any reduction, caused by  receipt of the payments, in the participant’s temporary assist-
ance for  needy families program benefits, Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program bene-
fits or other need-based benefits.
SECTION 2.
(1) No later than September 15,  2025, the Department of Human Services
shall provide a preliminary report to the interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly
related to human services on the success of  the Oregon Freedom Pilot Program established
in section 1 of this 2022 Act in achieving the goal of enabling  low-income Oregonians partic-
ipating in the program to live in dignity and meet their basic needs.
(2) No later than September 15,  2027, the department shall provide a final report to the
interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to human services with the
department’s findings on the success of the program in achieving the goal of the program.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2022 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2023.
SECTION 4. The Department of Human Services shall take all  actions before the opera-
tive date specified in section 3 of this 2022 Act that are necessary for the department to ex-
ercise, on  and after the date specified in section 3 of this 2022 Act, all of the duties and
functions conferred on the department by section 1 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 5.
Section 1 of this 2022 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 6. As used in sections 6 to 23 of this 2022 Act:
(1) “All-terrain vehicle” means:
(a) A class I all-terrain vehicle as defined in ORS 801.190;
(b) A class II all-terrain vehicle as defined in ORS 801.193;
(c) A class III all-terrain vehicle as defined in ORS 801.194; and
(d) A class IV all-terrain vehicle as defined in ORS 801.194.
(2) “Boat” has the meaning given that term in ORS 830.700 and includes all such
watercraft regardless of how the watercraft is powered.
(3) “Civil aircraft” has the meaning given that term in ORS 836.005.
(4)(a) “Clothing” means all human wearing apparel suitable for general civilian  and sec-
ular use.
(b) “Clothing” does not include bridal apparel.
(5) “Electronic”  means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic,
wireless, optical, electromagnetic or similar capabilities.
(6) “Electronic device” means a desktop or portable  computer, a camera, a cellular phone
or any component of a computer, camera or cellular phone.
(7) “Recreational vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.101.
(8) “Recreational watercraft” means any  boat that is not purchased for commercial or
public uses.
(9)(a) “Retail sales price” means the total price paid at retail by a purchaser to a  seller
for taxable luxury goods, exclusive of the amount of any excise, privilege, sales  or use tax
[2]
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
that becomes due with respect to the sales transaction.
(b) “Retail  sales price” does not include the retail value of modifications to a vehicle op-
erated on land or water or in the air that are necessary for a person with  a disability to
enter or drive or to otherwise operate or use the vehicle.
(10) “Snowmobile” has the meaning given that term in ORS 801.490.
(11)(a) “Taxable luxury goods” means the following goods, whether new or used at  the
time of the taxable sales transaction:
(A) A motor vehicle with a retail sales price greater than $
;
(B) A recreational vehicle with a retail sales price greater than $ ;
(C) An all-terrain vehicle with a retail sales price greater than $ ;
(D) A snowmobile with a retail sales price greater than $ ;
(E) Any motorized recreational watercraft with a retail  sales price greater than
$ ;
(F) Civil aircraft with a retail sales price greater than $ ;
(G) A firearm with a retail sales price greater than $ ;
(H) An electronic device with a retail sales price greater than $ ;
(I) A handbag with a retail sales price greater than $ ;
(J) Any item of clothing with a retail sales price greater than $ ; or
(K)(i) An item or items of jewelry  purchased in a single transaction with a total retail
sales price greater than $ ; or
(ii) Items of jewelry that  are designed to be worn together but are purchased in separate
transactions with a total aggregate sales price greater than $ .
(b) “Taxable luxury goods” does not  mean property that is purchased for commercial or
public uses.
SECTION 7. (1) A sales tax is imposed on the sale in this state of taxable luxury goods.
(2) The sales tax shall be computed at the rate of  three percent of the retail sales price
of the taxable luxury goods. The tax may be rounded to the nearest whole cent.
(3) The sales tax is a liability of the purchaser of the taxable luxury goods.
(4) A  seller shall collect the amount of the sales tax at the time of the taxable sales
transaction.
SECTION 8.
(1) A use tax is imposed on the storage, use or other consumption in this
state of taxable luxury goods purchased from any seller.
(2) The use tax shall be computed at the rate of three percent of the retail sales price
of the taxable luxury goods. The tax may be rounded to the nearest whole cent.
(3) The use tax is a liability of the purchaser of the taxable luxury goods.
(4) The use tax shall  be reduced, but not below zero, by the amount of sales or use tax
imposed by any jurisdiction on the sale, or the storage,  use or other consumption, of the
taxable luxury goods. The reduction under this subsection shall  be made only upon a showing
by the purchaser that the sales or use tax has been paid.
(5) The  amount of the use tax shall be separately stated on an invoice, receipt or other
similar document that the  seller provides to the purchaser or shall be otherwise disclosed
to the purchaser.
(6) A purchaser’s liability for the use  tax is satisfied by a valid receipt given to the pur-
chaser pursuant to section 10 of this 2022 Act by the seller of the taxable luxury goods.
SECTION 9.
For purposes of  ORS 315.037, any tax expenditure enacted with respect to
[3]
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the sales and use taxes imposed under sections 7 and 8 of this 2022 Act shall remain in con-
tinuous effect until the Legislative Assembly expressly provides otherwise.
SECTION 10.
(1) A seller  shall collect the use tax imposed under section 8 of this 2022
Act from a purchaser of taxable luxury  goods and give the purchaser a receipt for the use
tax in the manner and form prescribed by the Department of Revenue if:
(a) The seller is:
(A) Engaged in business in this state;
(B) Required to collect the use tax; or
(C) Authorized by the department, under rules the department adopts, to collect  the use
tax and, for purposes  of the use tax, regarded as a seller engaged in business in this state;
and
(b) The seller makes sales of taxable luxury goods  for storage, use or other consumption
in this state that are subject to the use tax.
(2) A seller required to collect the use tax under this section shall collect the tax:
(a) At the time of the taxable sales transaction; or
(b) If the storage, use or other consumption of the taxable luxury goods is not  taxable
at the time of sale, at the time the storage, use or other consumption becomes taxable.
(3) To ensure the proper administration of section  8 of this 2022 Act, and to prevent
evasion of the use tax, the following presumptions are established:
(a) Taxable  luxury goods are stored, used or otherwise consumed in this state if the
goods are present in this state for private or public display or storage.
(b)(A) Taxable  luxury goods sold by any seller for delivery in this state were sold for
storage, use or other consumption in this state unless the contrary is proved.
(B) The burden of proving the  contrary is on the seller unless the seller takes from the
purchaser a resale certificate to the effect that  the taxable luxury goods were purchased for
resale in the ordinary course of the purchaser’s business.
(c)(A) Taxable luxury goods delivered outside this state  to a purchaser known by the
seller to be a resident of this state were purchased from the seller for storage, use  or other
consumption in this state and stored, used or otherwise consumed in this state  unless the
contrary is proved.
(B) The contrary may be proved by:
(i) A statement in writing, signed by  the purchaser or an authorized agent of the pur-
chaser and retained by the seller, that the taxable luxury goods were  purchased for storage,
use or other consumption exclusively at a designated point or points outside this state; or
(ii) Other evidence satisfactory to the department that the  taxable luxury goods were not
purchased for storage, use or other consumption in this state.
SECTION 11.
(1) Notwithstanding section 7 of this 2022 Act, the sales  tax is not due on
the sale of taxable luxury goods to a purchaser who is not a resident of this state.
(2) Notwithstanding sections  7 and 8 of this 2022 Act, a resale certificate taken from a
purchaser ordinarily engaged in the business of  selling taxable luxury goods relieves the
seller from the obligation to collect and remit  the sales or use tax. A resale certificate must
be substantially in the form prescribed by the Department of Revenue by rule.
SECTION 12. (1) If the amount of sales or use taxes  imposed under section 7 or 8 of this
2022 Act that is paid by a purchaser exceeds the amount of taxes due,  the Department of
Revenue shall refund the amount of the excess.
[4]
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this  section, the period prescribed for the de-
partment to allow  or make a refund of any overpayment of sales or use taxes paid shall be
as provided in ORS 314.415.
(3) The department shall apply any overpayment of tax first to any outstanding amount
of sales or use tax for which the purchaser is liable.
SECTION 13.
(1) The Department of Revenue  shall deposit all revenue collected from the
sales and use taxes imposed under sections 7 and 8 of this 2022 Act in a suspense account
established under ORS 293.445 for the purpose of receiving the revenue. The  department may
pay expenses for the administration and enforcement of the  sales and use taxes out of
moneys received from the taxes. Amounts necessary to pay administrative and enforcement
expenses are continuously appropriated to the department from the suspense account.
(2) After payment of administrative and  enforcement expenses under subsection (1) of
this section and refunds or credits arising from erroneous overpayments, the  department
shall transfer the balance of the  moneys received from the sales and use taxes to as follows:
(a) Moneys attributable to the use tax imposed on motor  vehicles within the meaning of
Article IX, section 3a (1)(b),  of the Oregon Constitution, shall be transferred to the State
Highway Fund.
(b) Moneys attributable to the sales  and use taxes other than those described in para-
graph (a) of this subsection shall be transferred to  the Oregon Freedom Pilot Program Fund
established under section 14 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 14.
(1) The Oregon Freedom Pilot Program Fund is established in  the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the Oregon
Freedom Pilot Program Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Oregon Freedom Pilot Program Fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts transferred to the fund under section 13 of this 2022 Act;
(b) Amounts appropriated  or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative As-
sembly;
(c) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source; and
(d) Interest earned by the fund.
(3) Moneys in the  fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of Human Ser-
vices for the  purpose of implementing the Oregon Freedom Pilot Program established under
section 1 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 15.
(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in sections 6 to 23 of this 2022 Act,  the
sales and use taxes imposed under sections 7 and 8 of this 2022 Act shall be  collected at the
point of sale and remitted by  each seller that engages in the retail sale of taxable luxury
goods.
(b) Notwithstanding that the sales and use  taxes are liabilities of purchasers, each tax
is considered a tax upon the seller that is required to collect the tax, and the seller  is con-
sidered a taxpayer.
(2) Each seller of taxable luxury  goods that is liable for collection of any amount of sales
or use tax shall file a  return with the Department of Revenue, in the form and manner
prescribed by the department, on or before  the last day of January, April, July and October
of each year for the previous calendar quarter. The return shall show the amount of sales
and use taxes due for retail  sales made during the calendar quarter to which the return re-
lates.
[5]
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) Each seller shall pay the applicable sales and use taxes to the department in the  form
and manner prescribed by the  department, but not later than the date of submitting each
quarterly return, without regard to extensions under subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The department may extend the time for making any  return required under this
section if a written request is filed with the department during or prior to  the period for
which the  extension may be granted. The department may not grant an extension of more
than 30 days.
(5) Interest shall be added to delinquent tax amounts  at the rate established under ORS
305.220 from the time the return to which the delinquent tax amounts relate  was originally
required to be filed to the time of payment.
SECTION 16.
(1) Every seller of taxable luxury goods who collects any amount of  sales
or use taxes imposed under sections 7 and  8 of this 2022 Act shall hold the amount in trust
for the State  of Oregon and for payment to the Department of Revenue in the manner and
at the time provided in section 15 of this 2022 Act.
(2) If a seller  of taxable luxury goods fails to remit any amount of sales or use taxes,
whether collected or not, the department may enforce collection  by the issuance of a
distraint warrant for  the collection of the delinquent amount and all penalties, interest and
collection charges accrued on the delinquent amount. The  warrant shall be issued and pro-
ceeded upon in the same manner and  shall have the same force and effect as is prescribed
with respect to warrants for the collection of delinquent income taxes.
(3)(a) In the  case of a seller that is assessed under the provisions of ORS 305.265 (12) and
314.407 (1), the department may issue a notice of liability to any officer,  employee or member
of the seller at any time within three years  after the assessment. Within 30 days after the
date on which the notice of liability is mailed  to the officer, employee or member, the officer,
employee or member shall pay the assessment,  plus penalties and interest, or advise the
department in writing of objections  to the liability and, if desired, request a conference. A
conference shall be governed by the provisions of ORS 305.265 pertaining  to a conference
requested from a notice of deficiency.
(b) After  a conference or, if no conference is requested, a determination of the issues
raised in the written objections, the department shall  mail the officer, employee or member
a conference letter affirming, canceling or adjusting the notice of liability. Within 90 days
after the date on which the conference  letter is mailed to the officer, employee or member,
the officer, employee or member shall  pay the assessment, plus penalties and interest, or
appeal to the tax court in the manner provided for an appeal from a notice of assessment.
(c) If the department does not receive  payment or written objection to the notice of li-
ability within 30 days after the notice of liability was mailed, the notice of liability  becomes
final. The officer, employee or member may appeal the notice of liability  to the tax court
within 90 days after the notice became final in the manner provided for an appeal from a
notice of assessment.
(4)(a) In the case of a seller that fails to file a return  on the due date, in addition to any
action described in the provisions of ORS 305.265 (10) and 314.400, the department  may issue
a notice of determination and assessment to any officer,  employee or member of the seller
at any time within three years after the assessment.  The time of assessment against the
officer, employee or member is 30 days after the date on which the notice of  determination
and assessment is mailed. Within 30 days  after the date on which the notice of determination
[6]
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and assessment is mailed to the officer, employee or member, the officer, employee  or
member shall pay the assessment, plus penalties and interest, or advise the department in
writing of objections  to the assessment and, if desired, request a conference. A conference
shall be governed by the provisions of ORS 305.265 pertaining to a conference  requested from
a notice of deficiency.
(b) After  a conference or, if no conference is requested, a determination of the issues
raised in the written objections, the department  shall mail or otherwise deliver the officer,
employee or member a conference letter affirming, canceling or adjusting  the notice of de-
termination and assessment. Within 90 days after  the date on which the conference letter
is mailed or otherwise delivered to the officer, employee  or member, the officer, employee
or member shall pay the assessment, plus  penalties and interest, or appeal to the tax court
in the manner provided for an appeal from a notice of assessment.
(c) If the department does not receive payment or written  objection to the notice of de-
termination and assessment within 30 days after the notice of determination and assessment
was mailed, the notice of determination and assessment becomes final. The officer, employee
or member may appeal the notice of determination and assessment  to the tax court within
90 days after the notice became final in the  manner provided for an appeal from a notice of
assessment.
(5)(a) More than one officer  or employee of a corporation may be held jointly and se-
verally liable for payment of the sales and use taxes.
(b) Notwithstanding the confidentiality provisions of section  20 of this 2022 Act, if the
department determines that more  than one officer or employee of a corporation may be held
jointly and severally liable for payment of the sales and  use taxes, the department may re-
quire any or all of the  officers or employees to appear before the department for a joint de-
termination of liability. The department shall notify each officer or employee of the time  and
place set for the determination of liability.
(c) Each individual notified of a joint determination  under this subsection must appear
and present such information as is necessary to establish  the individual’s liability or nonli-
ability for payment of the taxes to the department. If an individual who was notified fails  to
appear, the department shall make  the determination on the basis of all the information and
evidence presented. The department’s  determination is binding on all individuals notified and
required to appear under this subsection.
(d)(A) If any individual determined to  be liable for unpaid sales or use taxes under this
subsection appeals the determination to the Oregon Tax Court under section  21 of this 2022
Act, the individual plaintiff shall implead all individuals required to  appear with the plaintiff
before the department under this subsection. The department may implead any  officer or
employee who may be held jointly and severally liable for the payment of  the sales and use
taxes. Each individual impleaded under this  paragraph shall be made a party to the action
before the tax court and shall make  available to the tax court the information that was
presented before the department, as well as other information that may be presented to the
tax court.
(B) The tax court may determine that one or  more individuals impleaded under this
paragraph are liable for unpaid sales or use taxes without regard to any earlier  determi-
nation by the department that an impleaded individual was not liable for the unpaid taxes.
(C) If an individual required to appear before the tax court under this  subsection fails
[7]
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or refuses to appear  or bring such information in part or in whole, or is outside the juris-
diction of the tax court, the tax court shall make its determination on the basis of all  the
evidence introduced. Notwithstanding section 20 of this 2022  Act, the evidence introduced in
the tax court constitutes a public record and shall be available to the parties and  the tax
court. The determination of the tax court is binding on all individuals  made parties to the
action under this subsection.
(e) This subsection may not be construed  to preclude a determination by the department
or the tax court that more than one officer or employee is jointly and severally  liable for
unpaid sales or use taxes.
SECTION 17.
Any purchaser liable for any amount  of the sales or use tax imposed under
section 7 or 8 of this 2022 Act and from  whom the tax has not been collected shall, on or
before the 30th day following the  date on which the tax became due, file with the Department
of Revenue a report of the amount of tax due from the  purchaser in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The purchaser shall remit the amount of  tax due with the
report.
SECTION 18. (1)(a) A seller of taxable luxury goods shall keep  receipts, invoices and
other pertinent records related to retail sales of taxable luxury  goods in the form required
by the Department of Revenue. Each record shall be  preserved for five years from the time
to which the record relates, or for as long as the seller retains the taxable luxury goods  to
which the record relates, whichever is later.
(b) During the retention period and at any time prior to the destruction of records, the
department may give written  notice to the seller not to destroy records described in the
notice without written permission of the department.
(c) Notwithstanding any other  provision of law, the department shall preserve reports
and returns filed with the department for at least five years.
(2) ORS 314.425 applies to  the authority of the Department of Revenue to examine, or
cause to be  examined by an agent or representative designated by the department for the
purpose, any books, papers, records or memoranda bearing  upon the matter required to be
included in any return required under sections 6 to 23 of this 2022 Act for the purpose of
ascertaining the correctness  of the return or for the purpose of making an estimate of the
taxable sales of the taxpayer.
SECTION 19. (1) The Department of Revenue may, by  order or subpoena to be served
with the same force and effect and in  the same manner as a subpoena is served in a civil
action in the circuit court or the Oregon Tax Court, require the production at any time  and
place the department designates of any books, papers, accounts  or other information neces-
sary to carry out sections 6 to 23 of this  2022 Act. The department may require the attend-
ance of any individual having knowledge in the premises, and may take testimony and require
proof material for the information, with power to administer oaths to the individual.
(2)(a) If an individual fails to comply with  a subpoena or order of the department or to
produce or permit the  examination or inspection of any books, papers, records and equip-
ment pertinent to an investigation or inquiry  under sections 6 to 23 of this 2022 Act, or to
testify to any matter regarding  which the individual is lawfully interrogated, the department
may apply to the Oregon Tax Court or to the circuit court of the county in which  the indi-
vidual resides or where the individual is for an order to the individual to attend and testify
or otherwise comply with the demand or request of the department.
[8]
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The department shall apply to the court by ex parte  motion, upon which the court
shall make an order requiring the individual against whom the motion  is directed to comply
with the request or demand of the department within 10 days after the service of the order,
or within the additional time granted by the court, or to  justify the failure within that time.
The order shall  be served upon the individual to whom it is directed in the manner required
by this state for service of process, which is required to confer jurisdiction upon the court.
(3) Failure to obey any order issued by the court under this section is contempt of court.
(4) The remedy provided by this section is in addition  to other remedies, civil or criminal,
existing under the tax laws or other laws of this state.
SECTION 20.
Except as otherwise provided in sections 6 to 23 of this 2022  Act or where
the context requires  otherwise, the provisions of ORS chapters 305 and 314 as to the audit
and examination of returns, periods of limitation, determinations of and notices  of deficien-
cies, assessments, collections, liens,  delinquencies, claims for refund and refunds, confer-
ences, appeals to  the Oregon Tax Court, stays of collection pending appeal, confidentiality
of returns and the related penalties,  and the related procedures, apply to the determinations
of taxes, penalties and interest under sections 6 to 23 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 21. (1) Notwithstanding the confidentiality provisions of  section 20 of this 2022
Act, the Department of Revenue may disclose information received under sections 6 to 23
of this 2022 Act to the Department of Transportation for the purposes of  carrying out the
provisions of sections 8 and 25 of this 2022 Act.
(2) The Department of Transportation may disclose information obtained  under sections
8 and 25 of this 2022 Act to the Department of Revenue for the  purposes of carrying out the
provisions of sections 6 to 23 of this 2022 Act.
(3) Any officer or employee of  the Department of Transportation to whom information
is disclosed under subsection (1) of this section is not required to execute a certificate under
ORS 314.840 (3)(a).
(4) Except as otherwise provided in sections 6 to 23 of this 2022 Act,  a person aggrieved
by an act or  determination of the Department of Revenue or its authorized agent under
sections 6 to 23 of this  2022 Act may appeal, within 90 days after the act or determination,
to the Oregon Tax Court in the manner provided in ORS 305.404 to 305.560. These  appeal
rights are the exclusive remedy available to determine the person’s liability for the sales  and
use taxes.
SECTION 22.
(1) The Department of Revenue shall administer and enforce sections 6 to
23 of this 2022 Act.
(2) The department may adopt or establish rules and procedures  that the department
considers necessary or appropriate for the implementation,  administration and enforcement
of sections 6 to 23 of this 2022 Act and that are consistent with sections  6 to 23 of this 2022
Act.
(3) The Department of Transportation shall enter into  an agreement with the Depart-
ment of Revenue for purposes of the implementation, administration and  enforcement by the
Department of Transportation of those provisions  of section 25 of this 2022 Act, and rules
or procedures adopted or established by the Department of Revenue under  this section, that
the Department of Transportation and the  Department of Revenue determine are necessary
for the effective and efficient implementation, administration  and enforcement of section 25
of this 2022 Act.
[9]
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 23.
(1) The Department of  Revenue and the Department of Transportation shall
enter into an agreement pursuant to which the Department of Transportation shall  assist
the Department of Revenue in the collection of the use tax imposed under section 8 of  this
2022 Act and any other functions of the  Department of Revenue under sections 6 to 23 of this
2022 Act as may be provided under the agreement.
(2) The agreement is not intended to preclude performance by the Department  of Re-
venue of collection functions as from  time to time may be required, nor is the agreement
intended to preclude  the performance of functions by the Department of Transportation,
under less formal arrangements made with the Department of  Revenue, with respect to the
use tax imposed under section 8 of  this 2022 Act if the functions are not specifically men-
tioned in the agreement.
(3) The Department of Transportation may contact,  consult with and enter into agree-
ments with any public or private person for the purpose  of assisting the Department of Re-
venue in the collection of the use tax under this section.
(4) The collection of taxes under sections 6 to 23 of this 2022 Act  by the Department of
Transportation does not  render the Department of Transportation or the agents and em-
ployees of the Department of Transportation responsible for collection of the taxes.
SECTION 24. Section 25 of this 2022 Act is added to and made a part of  the Oregon Ve-
hicle Code.
SECTION 25. (1) A person that purchases a motor vehicle in a sales transaction that
would be subject to the sales tax imposed under section 7 of this 2022 Act if the  sale had
taken place in Oregon may not register or title the motor vehicle  in Oregon unless the per-
son provides proof that:
(a) The person paid the use tax imposed under section 8 of this 2022 Act; or
(b) The person is not required to pay the use tax for the reasons provided in section 8
(4) of this 2022 Act.
(2) The person shall provide the proof described in subsection (1) of this section to  the
Department of Transportation in the manner established by the department by rule.
SECTION 26.
 ORS 822.043 is amended to read:
822.043. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Integrator” has the meaning given that term in ORS 802.600.
(b) “Vehicle dealer” means a person issued a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS 822.020.
(2) A vehicle dealer that the Department of Transportation has designated to act as  an agent
of the department under  ORS 802.031 may elect to prepare, submit, or prepare and submit documents
necessary to:
(a) Issue or transfer a certificate of title for a vehicle;
(b) Register a vehicle or transfer registration of a vehicle;
(c) Issue a registration plate;
(d) Verify and clear a title;
(e) Perfect, release or satisfy a lien or other security interest;
(f) Comply with federal security requirements; or
(g) Render any other services  for the purpose of complying with state and federal laws related
to the sale of a vehicle.
(3) A vehicle dealer who prepares any documents described in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) May charge a purchaser of a vehicle a document processing  fee for the preparation of those
[10]
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
documents.
(b) May not charge a  purchaser of a vehicle a document processing fee for the submission of
any document or the issuance of a registration plate.
(c) May charge a purchaser of a vehicle a document processing fee for performing any of  the
services described in subsection (2) of this section in connection with preparing the documents de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) A purchaser of a vehicle may negotiate the amount of  the document processing fee with a
vehicle dealer, but in no case shall the document processing  fee charged by a vehicle dealer under
this section exceed:
(a) $150, if the vehicle dealer uses an integrator; or
(b) $115, if the vehicle dealer does not use an integrator.
(5) If a vehicle dealer charges a document processing fee  under subsection (4)(a) of this section,
of the amount collected $25 shall be paid to the integrator.
(6) Unless otherwise provided by rule, if a vehicle dealer uses an integrator and charges a doc-
ument processing fee  greater than that charged for not using an integrator, the dealer must inform
the purchaser of the vehicle of the option of using an  integrator to prepare the documents. The
purchaser may then elect whether or not to have  the vehicle dealer use an integrator to prepare the
documents.
(7) If the purchaser of a vehicle  pays a document processing fee, the vehicle dealer shall prepare
and submit all documents to complete the transaction as permitted by law.
(8)(a) A vehicle dealer [ who] that collects the privilege tax imposed under ORS  320.405 from the
purchaser of a taxable motor vehicle may collect the privilege tax at the same time and in the  same
manner as the vehicle dealer collects document processing fees under this  section. The amount of
the privilege tax shall be in addition to and not in lieu  of document processing fees collected under
this section.
(b) A vehicle dealer that collects the sales tax imposed under section  7 of this 2022 Act
from the purchaser of a motor vehicle may  collect the sales tax at the same time and in the
same manner as the vehicle dealer collects document processing fees under this section.  The
amount of the sales tax shall be in addition to and  not in lieu of document processing fees
collected under this section.
[(b)] (c) A vehicle dealer may exclude the amount of the privilege tax and the sales tax  from
the capitalized cost and offering price of  a [ taxable] motor vehicle subject to the taxes. [as those
terms are defined ] “Capitalized cost” and “offering price” have  the meanings given those terms
by the Department of Justice by rule.
SECTION 27.
(1) Sections 6 to 25  of this 2022 Act and the amendments to ORS 822.043
by section 26 of this 2022 Act become operative on January 1, 2023.
(2) The Department of Revenue and the Department of  Transportation shall take all
actions before the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section that are necessary
for the departments to exercise, on  and after the date specified in subsection (1) of this
section, all of the authority, duties and functions conferred on the departments by  sections
6 to 25 of this 2022 Act and the amendments to ORS 822.043 by section 26 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 28. Sections 6 to 25 of this 2022 Act and the amendments to ORS 822.043 by
section 26 of this 2022 Act apply to sales of taxable luxury goods  occurring on or after Jan-
uary 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2027.
SECTION 29. Sections 6 to 25 of this 2022 Act are repealed on January 2, 2027.
[11]
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 30.
 ORS 822.043, as amended by section 26 of this 2022 Act, is amended to read:
822.043. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Integrator” has the meaning given that term in ORS 802.600.
(b) “Vehicle dealer” means a person issued a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS 822.020.
(2) A vehicle  dealer that the Department of Transportation has designated to act as an agent
of the department under  ORS 802.031 may elect to prepare, submit, or prepare and submit documents
necessary to:
(a) Issue or transfer a certificate of title for a vehicle;
(b) Register a vehicle or transfer registration of a vehicle;
(c) Issue a registration plate;
(d) Verify and clear a title;
(e) Perfect, release or satisfy a lien or other security interest;
(f) Comply with federal security requirements; or
(g) Render any other services for the purpose of complying with state  and federal laws related
to the sale of a vehicle.
(3) A vehicle dealer who prepares any documents described in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) May charge a purchaser of a vehicle a document processing  fee for the preparation of those
documents.
(b) May not charge a  purchaser of a vehicle a document processing fee for the submission of
any document or the issuance of a registration plate.
(c) May  charge a purchaser of a vehicle a document processing fee for performing any of the
services described in subsection (2) of this section in connection with preparing the documents de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) A purchaser of a vehicle may  negotiate the amount of the document processing fee with a
vehicle dealer, but in no case shall the  document processing fee charged by a vehicle dealer under
this section exceed:
(a) $150, if the vehicle dealer uses an integrator; or
(b) $115, if the vehicle dealer does not use an integrator.
(5) If a vehicle dealer charges a document processing fee  under subsection (4)(a) of this section,
of the amount collected $25 shall be paid to the integrator.
(6) Unless otherwise provided by rule, if a vehicle dealer uses an integrator and charges a doc-
ument processing fee greater than that charged for not using an integrator, the dealer  must inform
the purchaser of the vehicle of the  option of using an integrator to prepare the documents. The
purchaser may then elect whether or not to have  the vehicle dealer use an integrator to prepare the
documents.
(7) If the purchaser of a vehicle  pays a document processing fee, the vehicle dealer shall prepare
and submit all documents to complete the transaction as permitted by law.
(8)(a) A vehicle dealer that collects  the privilege tax imposed under ORS 320.405 from the pur-
chaser of a taxable motor vehicle may collect the privilege tax at the  same time and in the same
manner as the vehicle dealer  collects document processing fees under this section. The amount of
the privilege tax shall be in addition to and not in lieu  of document processing fees collected under
this section.
[(b) A vehicle dealer that collects the sales tax imposed under section 7 of  this 2022 Act from the
purchaser of a motor vehicle may collect the sales tax  at the same time and in the same manner as the
vehicle dealer collects document processing fees under this section. The  amount of the sales tax shall
[12]
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
be in addition to and not in lieu of document processing fees collected under this section. ]
[(c)] (b) A vehicle dealer may exclude the  amount of the privilege tax [ and the sales tax ] from
the capitalized cost  and offering price of a taxable motor vehicle [ subject to the taxes ]. “Capitalized
cost” and “offering price” have  the meanings given those terms by the Department of Justice by
rule.
SECTION 31.
The amendments to ORS 822.043 by section 30 of  this 2022 Act become op-
erative on January 1, 2027.
SECTION 32. This 2022 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2022
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[13]