Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Clinical veterinary research” means research  on an animal with a naturally occur-
ring disease or injury that is conducted:
(A) For the benefit of the animal; and
(B) With the intention of studying the effect of a procedure, device or  treatment proto-
col.
(b) “Directly fund” does not mean the issuance of funds for:
(A) The construction or maintenance of a research facility;
(B) The purchase or maintenance of general-use equipment;
(C) Overhead costs;
(D) Capital improvements; or
(E) Faculty or employee salaries.
(c) “Laboratory research” has the meaning given that term in ORS 609.410.
(d) “Medically unnecessary laboratory research” means laboratory  research on an animal
that is undertaken for a primary purpose other than  improving the health, welfare or safety
of the animal.
(e) “Research facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 609.410.
(f) “Veterinary education” means laboratory research on an animal for the purpose  of
training veterinary professionals under a program accredited by the American  Veterinary
Medical Association.
(2) A research facility may not  use public funds, in whole or in part, to directly fund
medically unnecessary laboratory research on dogs or cats that  is classified under a pain and
distress category D or E by the United States Department of Agriculture.
(3) This section does not apply to a procedure performed on a  dog or cat for the purpose
of veterinary education or clinical veterinary research.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1199