Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Election Coverage  Grant program is established and shall
be operated and administered by the Secretary of State.
(2) The  secretary shall use moneys from the Oregon Election Coverage Fund established
in section 2 of this 2023 Act to award  a grant under this section to one or more not-for-profit
corporations that are tax exempt  under section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code and that:
(a) Apply for a grant under this section under a process established by rule  by the sec-
retary; and
(b) Commit to using grant moneys  received under this section for the sole purpose of
providing news coverage or otherwise publicly disseminating  information directly related to
elections held in this state.
(3) The secretary shall adopt rules necessary to effectively administer this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Election Coverage Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and  distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon Election Cov-
erage Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Oregon Election Coverage Fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund from individuals or private organizations;
(b) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the  Legislative As-
sembly; and
(c) Interest earned by the fund.
(3) Moneys in the  fund are continuously appropriated to the Secretary of State for the
purpose of:
(a) Awarding grants under the Oregon Election Coverage Grant program established in
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4288
HB 3510
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
section 1 of this 2023 Act; and
(b) Paying for any  administrative costs associated with the Oregon Election Coverage
Grant program.
SECTION 3.
(1) Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed.
(2) The Oregon Election Coverage Fund established under section 2 of this 2023 Act is
abolished. Any moneys remaining in the account on the operative  date of this section shall
be transferred to the General Fund.
SECTION 4. Section 3 of this 2023 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2033.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to  the Secretary of State, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $______, for deposit into the Oregon Election Coverage Fund  established
in section 2 of  this 2023 Act and for awarding grants in the manner described in section 1
of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 6. (1) The Secretary of State shall study how best to:
(a) Expand the scope of the voters’ pamphlet to require greater use of video and audio
content than currently permitted under ORS 251.295; and
(b) Utilize technologies including but not limited to  the radio, television and the Internet
to publicly disseminate information currently included in the voters’ pamphlet.
(2) The secretary shall submit a report in  the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and shall
include recommendations for legislation necessary to  facilitate the expansion of the voters’
pamphlet in the manner described in subsection (1) of this section, to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to elections no later than December 31, 2024.
(3) All agencies of  state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist the
secretary in the performance of the duties of  the secretary under this section and, to the
extent permitted  by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the
secretary considers necessary to perform the study described in this section.
SECTION 7. Section 6 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 8. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Secretary of State, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the  General
Fund, the amount of $______, for the purpose  of conducting the study described in section 6
of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 9. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2023.
[2]