Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2019 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
chapter 701.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this chapter, “fire sprinkler system work” means design, in-
stallation, testing and maintenance of a water-based fire suppression system.
(2) A contractor may not perform work on a water-based fire suppression system  unless
the Construction Contractors  Board has issued the contractor or a full-time employee of the
contractor a fire sprinkler system professional endorsement under this section that  is ap-
propriate for the work.
(3) The board shall establish  a program for the certification of qualified individuals as fire
sprinkler system professionals. The board shall establish:
(a) An endorsement authorizing fire sprinkler system work on  one- and two-family
dwellings and on any underground mains dedicated for supplying water-based fire suppression
systems in one- and two-family dwellings.
(b) An endorsement authorizing  fire sprinkler system work on one- and two-family
dwellings and on multifamily residential structures four stories or less above grade.
(c) An  endorsement authorizing fire sprinkler system work on a structure of any type,
and on any underground mains dedicated  for supplying the water-based fire suppression
system in a structure of any type.
(d) An endorsement authorizing the installation of underground  mains dedicated for
supplying the water-based fire suppression system in a structure of any type.
(e) An endorsement authorizing the  inspection and testing of water-based fire sup-
pression systems.
(4) A residential  contractor or commercial contractor may perform fire sprinkler system
work described in subsection (3)(a) or (b) of this section if the  contractor or at least one
full-time employee of the contractor holds an appropriate endorsement under subsection
(3)(a) or (b) of this section.  A residential contractor or a full-time employee of a residential
contractor may not perform fire sprinkler system work described in subsection (3)(c) to (e)
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1200
SB 771
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of this section.
(5) A commercial contractor may perform fire sprinkler system work described in sub-
section (3)(a) to (c) of this section if the contractor or at least  full-time employee of the
contractor holds an appropriate endorsement under subsection (3)(c) of this section. A com-
mercial contractor may perform fire sprinkler system work described in subsection  (3)(d) of
this section if the contractor or at least one full-time employee of the  contractor holds an
appropriate endorsement under subsection (3)(c) or (d) of this section.  A commercial con-
tractor may perform fire sprinkler  system work described in subsection (3)(e) of this section
if each  individual who physically performs the work holds an endorsement under section
(3)(e) of this section.
(6) A contractor may not subcontract work requiring an endorsement  under this section
unless the subcontractor holds appropriate endorsement under this section for the work.
(7) An applicant for endorsement as a fire sprinkler system professional shall:
(a) Submit an application in a form acceptable to the  board and containing information
required by the board;
(b) Pass an examination approved by the board; and
(c) Provide evidence of any education, training or experience required by the board.
(8) The board may establish reasonable fees for applications and the issuance  or renewal
of endorsements under this section.
(9) The board shall, for purposes of administering and enforcing  the endorsement pro-
gram, give consideration  to any relevant standards of national organizations for fire pro-
tection or engineering technologies.
(10) An endorsement as a fire sprinkler  system professional is a personal privilege that
is nontransferrable.
(11) An individual  who is acting within the scope of an endorsement issued under this
section is not required to be licensed under ORS 447.010 to 447.156,  671.010 to 671.220 or
672.002 to 672.325 or ORS chapter 693 to design a water-based fire suppression system.
SECTION 3.
(1) An individual may not be considered, for purposes of section 2 of this 2019
Act, to be the full-time employee of more than one construction contractor at the same time.
If an individual holding an endorsement as a fire sprinkler professional  ceases to be a full-
time employee of a construction contractor, the individual  shall notify the Construction
Contractors Board of the change no later than  30 days after ceasing to be a full-time em-
ployee of the contractor.
(2) If an individual holding an endorsement as a  fire sprinkler professional ceases to be
a full-time employee of a construction  contractor, the construction contractor shall send
notice to the board no  later than 180 days after the individual holding the endorsement
ceases to be a  full-time employee of the contractor. A notice that the contractor send to the
board under this section must:
(a) Verify that the contractor or at  least one full-time employee of the contractor holds
an endorsement as a fire sprinkler professional appropriate for the fire sprinkler work  en-
gaged in by the contractor; or
(b) Verify that the contractor is not actively engaged in fire sprinkler system work  and
will not undertake fire sprinkler system work unless  the contractor or a full-time employee
holds an appropriate endorsement for the work.
(3) The board may adopt rules  regarding the form, content and delivery method for no-
[2]
SB 771
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
tices required under this section.
SECTION 4. (1) The Construction Contractors Board shall make fire sprinkler system
professional endorsements available for issuance under  section 2 of this 2019 Act no later
than January 1, 2021.
(2) The board may  not assert a violation of section 2 of this 2019 Act for fire sprinkler
system work that a construction contractor commences prior to January 1, 2022.
(3) Section 3 of this 2019 Act becomes operative January 1, 2021.
(4) Notwithstanding sections 2 and  3 of this 2019 Act, the board may issue a contractor
a temporary authorization to perform fire sprinkler system work without holding  an
endorsement under section 1 of this 2019 Act if the contractor is performing  fire sprinkler
system work on the effective  date of this 2019 Act and the board determines that the con-
tractor has the competency to properly perform the work.  A temporary authorization must
specify the classes of fire sprinkler system work that are within the scope of the  temporary
authorization. A temporary  authorization under this subsection shall expire three years after
issuance and may not be renewed. A determination of competency under this subsection ap-
plies only to the temporary authorization and does not  establish competency for purposes
of any subsequent application for endorsement under section 2 of this 2019 Act.
[3]