Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 350.355 is amended to read:
350.355. (1) [Subject to ORS 352.237 and any group health and  welfare insurance benefit plan de-
veloped under ORS 352.237, ] A part-time faculty member  at a public institution of higher education
is eligible for the same health  care benefits as full-time faculty members if the part-time faculty
member is eligible for membership in the Public Employees Retirement System or another  plan au-
thorized under ORS chapter 238  or 238A by teaching either at a single public institution of higher
education or in aggregate at multiple public institutions of higher education during the prior year.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  a part-time  faculty member at
a public institution of higher education shall pay all  insurance premiums for health care benefits
unless otherwise provided for  by the policy of the institution or by collective bargaining at the in-
stitution.
(b) For employee-only coverage,  a part-time faculty member at a public institution of
higher education shall pay 10 percent of the insurance premiums for health benefit plans.
(3) The state shall  pay, out of funds appropriated to the Oregon Educators Benefit Board
by the Legislative Assembly, for the cost  of the insurance premiums for health benefit plans
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 135
HB 4146
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
described in subsection (2)(b) of this  section that are not paid by a part-time faculty member.
(4)(a) Prior to each annual open  enrollment period during which part-time faculty mem-
bers may select health benefit plans, the board shall  determine whether the board has re-
ceived sufficient  appropriations to make the payments described in subsection (3) of this
section.
(b) If the board determines that it has not received sufficient appropriations:
(A) A  public institution of higher education is not required to provide moneys for the cost
of the insurance premiums for  health benefit plans described in subsection (3) of this section;
and
(B) The board may, to the extent  the board determines is necessary, increase the per-
centages specified in subsection (2)(b) of this section that a  part-time faculty member is re-
quired to pay to receive a health benefit plan.
(5) A part-time faculty member at a public institution of higher  education who is eligible
for health care benefits under subsection (1) of  this section may receive health care benefits
only in the manner provided by this section.
(6) The board may make rules to implement this section, including which health  benefit
plans are offered to part-time faculty members under this section  and how the health benefit
plans that are offered are selected.
SECTION 2.
A public institution of higher education that, on  the effective date of this
2020 Act, provided health care benefits to part-time faculty members who are not eligible for
health benefit plans under the amendments to ORS 350.355 by section 1 of this 2020 Act:
(1) May not  increase the eligibility requirements that must be met by a part-time faculty
member who is not eligible for health benefit  plans under the amendments to ORS 350.355
by section 1 of this  2020 Act in order for the part-time faculty member to qualify for health
care benefits from the institution; and
(2) Must  continue to provide comparable health care benefits to part-time faculty mem-
bers who are not eligible for health benefit  plans under the amendments to ORS 350.355 by
section 1 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 3. Any realized savings by a public institution of higher  education as a result
of the amendments to ORS 350.355 by section 1 of this 2020 Act are  considered employment
relations for purposes of collective bargaining under ORS 243.650 to 243.782.
SECTION 4. The Part-Time Faculty  Insurance Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Part-Time  Faculty In-
surance Fund must be credited to the fund.  The fund consists of moneys appropriated, allo-
cated, deposited or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or  otherwise and
interest earned on moneys in the fund. The moneys in the fund  are continuously appropri-
ated to the Oregon  Educators Benefit Board for the purpose of paying premiums for health
benefit plans for part-time faculty under ORS 350.355.
SECTION 5. There is appropriated to the Oregon Educators Benefit Board, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $_____ for deposit
in the Part-Time Faculty Insurance Fund established in  section 4 of this 2020 Act, for the
purposes specified in section 4 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 6. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the amendments to
ORS 350.355 by section 1 of this 2020 Act apply to health benefit plans  offered to part-time
faculty members on or after October 1, 2020.
[2]
HB 4146
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
(2) To the extent that a  conflict exists, the terms of collective bargaining agreements and
other contracts entered into before the effective date  of this 2020 Act shall prevail over the
amendments to ORS 350.355 by section 1 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 7.
The Oregon Educators Benefit Board shall, before the applicability date
specified in section 6 of this 2020 Act, take any actions necessary to implement the amend-
ments to ORS 350.355 by section 1 of this 2020  Act on the applicability date specified in sec-
tion 6 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 8.
This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]