Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 328.005 is amended to read:
328.005. (1) The governing body of each county shall create a county school fund.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 294.060 (1), when the governing  body of a county transfers fed-
eral forest reserve receipts to a county school fund as provided by  ORS 294.060 (1), the gov-
erning body may dedicate a portion of the  moneys to career and technical training provided
through the public schools of the county or for the benefit of students  at the public schools
of the county if:
(a) The moneys will be used to leverage other  state or federal moneys for career and
technical training, including grants for career and technical education or grants that connect
students with their communities;
(b) The moneys will be used to  prepare students for careers that involve value-added
wood products manufacturing or construction;
(c) Data will be collected to determine student outcomes based on use of the moneys;
(d) The amount of moneys dedicated under this  subsection does not exceed $500,000 an-
nually;
(e) The use of the moneys is consistent with the duties  of the local workforce investment
board under ORS 660.327 or with the county economic development plan under ORS 280.500;
and
(f) The county is located in the geographic region identified under ORS 284.592.
[(2)] (3) When a county governing body transfers federal forest reserve receipts under ORS
294.060 (4) subject to a condition that such moneys  be used only for a purpose described in ORS
328.205 (1)(a) or (c), a school district receiving a share of  [such] the moneys may not use the moneys
for any other purpose.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3580