Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Sections 2 and 3 of  this 2020 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
468B.048 to 468B.085.
SECTION 2. (1) This section applies  only to a large confined animal feeding operation or
a large concentrated animal feeding operation, both as defined by the State Department of
Agriculture by rule, that houses:
(a) 2,500 or more mature dairy cows;
(b) 3,500 or more veal calves;
(c) 3,500 or more cattle;
(d) 8,000 or more swine that exceed 55 pounds in weight;
(e) 30,000 or more swine that are 55 pounds or less in weight;
(f) 1,500 or more horses;
(g) 40,000 or more sheep or lambs, or a combination thereof;
(h) 200,000 or more turkeys;
(i) 125,000 or more chickens of any type, if using a wet waste treatment works;
(j) 300,000 or more laying hens, if using a dry waste treatment works;
(k) 350,000 broiler chickens, if using a dry waste treatment works;
(L) 20,000 or more ducks, if using a wet waste treatment works; or
(m) 125,000 or more ducks, if using a dry waste treatment works.
(2) If a feeding operation is located in a ground water management area declared under
ORS 468B.180 and animal waste from the feeding operation is applied  to land in the area, a
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 65
SB 1513
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
permit that the Department of Environmental Quality  or the State Department of Agricul-
ture issues under ORS 468B.050  for the feeding operation must be issued as an individual
permit.
(3) The Department of Environmental Quality or  the State Department of Agriculture
shall include the following terms and conditions for a  feeding operation permit issued under
ORS 468B.050:
(a) A person may not construct or install the feeding operation unless the  permit holder
obtains preliminary approval for the construction or installation  from the Department of
Environmental Quality or the State Department of Agriculture; and
(b) A person may not operate or conduct the  feeding operation, including but not limited
to populating the  feeding operation, unless the permit holder obtains final approval for the
construction or installation from the Department of  Environmental Quality or the State
Department of Agriculture.
(4) Prior to the Department  of Environmental Quality or the State Department of Agri-
culture granting final approval under subsection (3)(b) of this section, the  State Department
of Agriculture  shall determine, in consultation with the Water Resources Department, that,
for supplying the needs of the feeding operation at  the level and duration described in the
proposed feeding operation permit:
(a) The use of the water is legally authorized; and
(b) The water supply is reliable.
(5) To make a determination under subsection (4) of this section, in addition to informa-
tion provided by the Water Resources  Department, the State Department of Agriculture may
consider other information, including information provided in a certified water  right exam-
iner report submitted by an applicant or information provided in public comments.
(6) Except as provided in ORS  468B.215, the Department of Environmental Quality or the
State Department of  Agriculture may charge a fee for granting preliminary or final approval
under this section. The amount that the Department of  Environmental Quality or the State
Department of Agriculture charges a feeding operation  for approvals described in subsection
(3) of this section may  not total more than the maximum fee allowed under ORS 561.255 for
a single large confined animal feeding operation permit.
SECTION 3.
(1) In addition to any other authority of  the Department of Environmental
Quality or the State  Department of Agriculture, those departments may take actions de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section if:
(a) A feeding operation facility is vacated or abandoned, or no longer holds a  valid permit
under ORS 468B.050 to operate or conduct the feeding operation;
(b) The operator of the feeding operation facility does not clean the facility site  or prop-
erly decommission  the waste treatment works of the feeding operation facility in a manner
consistent with the terms of the  feeding operation permit prior to abandoning or vacating
the site;
(c) There  is no person or entity responsible for the financial or operational management
of the feeding operation facility that can sufficiently comply with the terms of  the permit;
and
(d) The Department of Environmental  Quality or the State Department of Agriculture
believes that  there is a potential or imminent threat to the waters of this state from the
facility.
[2]
SB 1513
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Subject to  subsection (1) of this section, the Department of Environmental Quality
or the State Department of Agriculture may:
(a) Independently or jointly clean, repurpose or decommission the feeding operation
waste treatment works through processes that may include, but need  not be limited to, the
use of analysis, assessment,  construction, contracting, designing, engineering, inspection,
investigation, maintenance, monitoring, operation, planning, sampling, studying, surveying,
testing and training; and
(b) Recover from any responsible party any reasonable  expenses incurred or authorized
to carry out the activities and processes described in this subsection.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 468B.050 is amended to read:
468B.050. (1) Except as provided in ORS 468B.053 or  468B.215, without holding a permit from
[the Director of ] the Department of Environmental Quality or the State Department of Agriculture,
which permit shall specify applicable effluent limitations, a person may not:
(a) Discharge any wastes into the  waters of the state from any industrial or commercial estab-
lishment or activity or any disposal system.
(b) Construct, install, modify or operate any  disposal system or part thereof or any extension
or addition thereto.
(c) Increase in volume or strength any wastes  in excess of the permissive discharges specified
under an existing permit.
(d) Construct, install, operate or conduct any  industrial, commercial, confined animal feeding
operation , concentrated animal feeding operation or other  establishment or activity or any ex-
tension or modification thereof or addition thereto, the operation or  conduct of which would cause
an increase in the discharge of wastes into the  waters of the state or which would otherwise alter
the physical, chemical or biological properties  of any waters of the state in any manner not already
lawfully authorized.
(e) Construct or use any new outlet for the discharge of any wastes into the waters  of the state.
(2) Except as provided in section 2 of this 2019 Act,  the Department of Environmental Quality
or the State Department of Agriculture may  issue a permit under this section as an individual,
general or watershed permit. A permit may be issued to a class  of persons using the procedures for
issuance of an order or for the adoption of  a rule. Notwithstanding the definition  of “order” or
“rule” provided in ORS  183.310, in issuing a general or watershed permit by order pursuant to this
section, the State Department of Agriculture or Department of Environmental Quality:
(a) Is not required to direct the order to a named person or named persons; and
(b) May  include in the order agency directives, standards, regulations and statements of general
applicability that implement, interpret or prescribe law or policy.
(3) The  [ State Department of Agriculture or the ] Department of Environmental Quality or the
State Department of Agriculture  may define “confined animal feeding  operation” and “concen-
trated animal feeding operation”  by rule for purposes of implementing this section.
SECTION 5.
(1) Section 2 (2) of this 2020 Act and  the amendments to ORS 468B.050 by
section 4 of this 2020 Act apply to:
(a) Permits for which initial issuance  occurs on or after the effective date of this 2020
Act; and
(b) Permits initially issued before the effective date of this  2020 Act pursuant to an ap-
plication originally filed on or  after January 1, 2020. The Legislative Assembly expressly in-
tends that this paragraph operates retroactively and that any permit described in this
[3]
SB 1513
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
paragraph that does not conform  to section 2 (2) of this 2020 Act be brought into conform-
ance with that requirement or canceled.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, section 2 of  this 2020 Act applies
to permits issued on or after the effective date of this 2020 Act.
(3) Section 3 of this 2020  Act applies to large confined animal feeding operation facilities
and large concentrated animal feeding operation facilities that  an operator vacates or aban-
dons on or after the effective date of this 2020 Act.
[4]