Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 3 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Business development project” means, but is not limited to, strategic investments
for a private sector  business to create long-term value for the business’s customers through
enhanced or new commercial activities  that support the retention or expansion of an eligible
small business in Oregon.
(2) “Eligible project costs” means, but is not limited to, the  following costs to the extent
they are related to the business development project  for which financial assistance is sought:
(a) Tenant and capital improvements;
(b) Equipment and machinery purchases;
(c) Inventory, supplies and accounts receivable;
(d) Employee training and the costs of attending trade shows or conferences;
(e) International or domestic export assistance; or
(f) Marketing and promotion.
(3) “Eligible small  business” means a for-profit business having 100 or fewer employees,
as further defined by the Oregon Business Development Department by  rule relating to em-
ployment or sales.
(4) “Financial assistance” means loans, including forgivable loans, and grants.
(5) “For-profit business”  means any private business, including entities that are legally
formed and authorized to conduct business in Oregon as limited liability companies,  sole
proprietorships, partnerships, corporations or S corporations.
(6) “Rural area” has the meaning given that term in ORS 285A.010.
(7) “Traded sector” has the meaning given that term in ORS 285B.280.
SECTION 2.
(1)(a) The Oregon Business Development Department  shall develop and ad-
minister a  program under which the department may award financial assistance to eligible
small businesses to promote the completion of business development projects.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 340
HB 2350
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) An eligible small business may not use financial assistance to retire any debt.
(2) An eligible small business may apply for financial assistance under the program if the
business:
(a) Is in full compliance with all applicable federal, state and local law;
(b) Operates a physical business location in Oregon;
(c) Has conducted operations in Oregon, and can show sales receipts from those oper-
ations, for at least one year immediately preceding the date on which the  business submits
an application for the financial assistance; and
(d)(A) Is a traded sector business;
(B) Makes a majority of its sales to purchasers outside this state; or
(C) Demonstrates the business’s regional economic  importance in a manner satisfactory
to the department.
(3) In awarding financial assistance under the program, the  department shall prioritize
business development projects that:
(a) Promote expansion or preservation of the principal traded sector industries  of
Oregon;
(b) Encourage economic diversification and competitiveness in Oregon;
(c) Support preservation of regional economies including key businesses in rural areas;
(d) Have significant long-term, regional or statewide economic impacts; or
(e) Support businesses unable to access  resources, capital and assistance due to ge-
ographic or other barriers as determined by the department.
(4) The department shall adopt rules  to implement this section. At a minimum, the rules
must include:
(a) An application process by which an eligible small business may apply for  financial
assistance under this section.
(b) A process for reviewing and approving or rejecting the applications.
(c) The amount  of financial assistance that may be provided to eligible small businesses.
The maximum amount of financial assistance provided to any eligible  small business may not
exceed 70 percent of the business’s total eligible project costs set forth in the application.
(d) A process for establishing the priorities set forth in subsection (3) of this section.
(e) The terms and  conditions for any agreements entered into for financial assistance
under this section. In addition to other terms and  conditions, the department may specify
in any agreement the facts  and circumstances that constitute nonperformance by the re-
cipient, a means  for curing nonperformance, penalties for nonperformance and the means for
recovering financial assistance amounts.
SECTION 3.
(1)(a) The Small Business Sustainability Fund is established in  the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned by the Small Busi-
ness Sustainability Fund must be credited to the fund.
(b) Moneys in the Small Business Sustainability Fund  are continuously appropriated to
the Oregon Business Development Department for the purposes of carrying out the  pro-
visions of sections 1 to 3 of this 2025 Act.
(c) The department may establish other  accounts within the fund to pay administrative
costs and operational expenses or otherwise to carry out the provisions of sections 1 to 3 of
this 2025 Act. Costs  related to business development projects funded with financial assistance
under sections 1 to 3 of this 2025 Act shall not be considered administrative costs of the de-
[2]
HB 2350
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
partment.
(2) The fund shall consist of moneys credited to the fund, including:
(a) Moneys that the Legislative Assembly appropriates or otherwise transfers to  the
fund;
(b) Moneys transferred to the fund by the department from the Strategic Reserve  Fund
created under ORS 285B.266 or otherwise;
(c) Earnings on moneys in the fund;
(d) Repayment amounts, including interest and penalties,  of financial assistance awarded
under sections 1 to 3 of this 2025 Act;
(e) Moneys received from the federal, state or local governments; and
(f) Moneys, or the proceeds of assets,  from any other public or private source, including,
but not limited to, grants and gifts.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]