Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Land Conservation and Development Commission shall update the
scope, content and name of the statewide land use planning goal related to  energy conser-
vation to include  policies and direction regarding the development of renewable energy
projects consistent with subsections (2) and (3) of this section  and, as appropriate, shall
consider changes to any other related statewide land use planning goals.
(2) The update to statewide land use planning goals under this section shall:
(a) Be completed on or before December 30, 2023.
(b) Identify adequate and appropriate amounts and types of urban and  rural lands to
support renewable energy to be developed in the State of Oregon, inside and outside  of urban
growth boundaries, consistent with the objectives  of Oregon’s renewable portfolio standards
and Oregon’s statutory greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals.
(3) In updating the goals, the commission shall, at a minimum, consider the following:
(a) The Oregon Climate Agenda released by the Governor and dated November 28, 2018;
(b) The energy and land use needs of Oregon’s communities;
(c) Areas  where siting renewable energy projects could be appropriately prioritized over
or coexist with other land uses;
(d) The role of efficiency and conservation in meeting energy demand;
(e) The role of community solar projects;
(f) The adequacy and appropriateness of lands within urban growth boundaries;
(g) Protection of agricultural and forest areas;
(h) Preservation of fish and wildlife habitat;
(i) Protection of open spaces and recreational areas;
(j) Location and proximity of infrastructure necessary for renewable  energy generation
and distribution; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3200
HB 2520
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(k) Other important economic, environmental, social and natural items.
SECTION 2.
(1) An advisory committee shall assist the Land Conservation and  Develop-
ment Commission in the update of statewide land use  planning goals under section 1 of this
2021 Act.
(2) The advisory committee shall consist of members as follows:
(a) The Director of the Department of Land Conservation and  Development shall appoint:
(A) A member to represent city governments;
(B) A member to represent county governments;
(C) A member to represent renewable energy development businesses;
(D) A member to represent farming or ranching businesses;
(E) A member to represent forestry businesses;
(F) A member to represent environmental interests;
(G) A member to represent electric utility companies;
(H) A member to represent energy conservation communities;
(I) A member to represent federally recognized tribes; and
(J) Such other members as the director deems appropriate;
(b) The Governor shall appoint a member to represent the office of the Governor;
(c) The Director of Agriculture shall appoint  a member to represent the State Depart-
ment of Agriculture;
(d) The State Forester shall appoint  a member to represent the State Forestry Depart-
ment;
(e) The Director of the  State Department of Energy shall appoint a member to represent
the State Department of Energy;
(f) The Public  Utility Commission of Oregon shall appoint a member to represent the
commission;
(g) The State Fish and Wildlife  Director shall appoint a member to represent the State
Department of Fish and Wildlife; and
(h) The Environmental Justice Task  Force shall appoint a member to represent envi-
ronmental justice issues.
SECTION 3.
All agencies of state government, as defined in ORS  174.111, are directed to
assist the Land Conservation and Development Commission and the  advisory committee de-
scribed in section 2 of this  2021 Act in performing actions under sections 1 and 2 of this 2021
Act.
SECTION 4. No later than September 15, 2022,  the Land Conservation and Development
Commission shall  provide a report to the appropriate interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly, in the  manner provided under ORS 192.245, on the progress of the commission
under sections 1 and 2 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Land  Conservation and Development, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $ , for the  purpose of adminis-
tering and implementing sections 1 to 4 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
[2]