Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Department of Administrative Services  shall distribute moneys
to the Oregon Wellness Program for the purpose  of supporting the program. The moneys
may be used by the program for supporting the well-being of eligible  health care profes-
sionals in this state through counseling, education and research.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,600,000 for the  purpose of carrying out the
provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1093