Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Department  of Emergency Management shall identify facili-
ties owned or operated by the state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, or a local  gov-
ernment, as defined  in ORS 174.116, that currently store fuel and that are of strategic
importance for emergency response.
(2) On and after January 1, 2031, facilities identified under subsection (1) of this  section
shall store and maintain fuel sufficient for at least three weeks of normal usage.
SECTION 2. Cities with a population of at least 50,000 people shall report  their plans to
comply with section 1 of this 2025 Act to the Oregon Department of Emergency  Management
on or before January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. (1) All facilities owned or operated by the state government or a local gov-
ernment shall use renewable diesel for all diesel fuel requirements.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “Local government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.116.
(b) “Renewable diesel” means  a hydrocarbon that is derived from biomass and that is
chemically equivalent to petroleum diesel fuel.
(c) “State government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.111.
SECTION 4.
Section 3 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2028.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2510