Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 311.505 is amended to read:
311.505. (1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, all  taxes and other charges due
from the taxpayer or property, levied or imposed and charged on  the latest tax roll, shall be paid
as follows:
(a) The first one-third on or before November 15;
(b) The second one-third on or before February 15; and
(c) The remaining one-third on or before May 15 next following.
(2) Interest shall begin to accrue, and shall  be collected, at the rate of one and one-third percent
per [ month] year, or fraction of a [ month] year, until paid, on any taxes on property, other charges,
and on any additional taxes or penalty imposed for disqualification of property  for special assess-
ment or exemption, or installment thereof not paid on or before the following dates:
(a) December 15, for the first one-third;
(b) February 15, for the second one-third; and
(c) May 15 next following, for the remaining one-third.
(3) Discounts shall  be allowed on partial or full payments of such taxes, made on or before No-
vember 15 as follows:
(a) Two percent on two-thirds of such taxes so paid.
(b) Three percent where all of such taxes are so paid.
(4) For purposes of this section, “taxes” includes all  taxes on property as defined in ORS 310.140
and certified to the assessor under ORS 310.060 except taxes assessed on any other property which
have by any means become a lien against the property for which the payment was made.
(5) All interest collected and all discounts allowed shall  be prorated to the several municipal
corporations, taxing districts and governmental agencies sharing in the taxes or assessments.
(6) If the total property tax is less than $40, no installment payment of taxes shall be allowed.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 226
HB 4141
1
2
3
4
5
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 311.505  by section 1 of this 2024 Act apply to in-
terest that begins to accrue on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]