Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) For  the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue  lottery bonds
pursuant to  ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $3,000,000 in net proceeds
and interest earnings for the purpose described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an ad-
ditional amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary  to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this  section in an amount sufficient to
provide $3,000,000 in net proceeds and interest earnings must be transferred to the Oregon
Business Development Department for deposit in the Brookings Harbor  Dock Fund estab-
lished under section 28a, chapter 812, Oregon Laws 2015, for distribution to the Port of
Brookings Harbor  for the purpose of repairing and improving docks, marine infrastructure
and facilities owned by the port.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will create  jobs,
further economic development, finance public  education or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Docks, marine  infrastructure and port facilities are an integral part of the commer-
cial and industrial infrastructure of this state.
(b) Repair and  improvement of docks, marine infrastructure and port facilities will pro-
mote economic development within this state.
SECTION 2.
 Section 28a, chapter 812, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 28a.  (1) The Brookings Harbor Dock Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General  Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Brookings Harbor Dock Fund
shall be credited to the fund. The Brookings Harbor Dock  Fund consists of moneys deposited in the
fund under section  28 , chapter 812, Oregon Laws 2015, [of this 2015 Act ] and section 1 of this
2017 Act and may include fees, revenues or  other income deposited into the fund by the Legislative
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1513
SB 646
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
Assembly.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated  to the Oregon Business Development De-
partment for purposes described  in section 28 , chapter 812, Oregon Laws 2015, [of this 2015 Act ]
and section 1 of this 2017 Act .
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
[2]