Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 6 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Covered costs” means the costs of completing  a degree program as determined by
the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by rule. Covered costs must include:
(a) Tuition;
(b) Mandatory and incidental fees;
(c) Textbooks and other supplies;
(d) Housing; and
(e) Any other cost of attending a degree program identified by the commission by rule.
(2) “Degree program” means a degree or certificate program offered by an institution.
(3) “Eligible individual” means an individual who seeks to enroll in the Guaranteed Op-
portunity Program and who:
(a) Is between 18 and 65 years of age; and
(b)(A) Graduated from a high school in this state; or
(B) During the previous year, paid taxes as a resident of this state.
(4) “Institution” means:
(a) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(b) The Oregon Health and Science University;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2765
HB 2719
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) A community college operated under ORS chapter 341; or
(d) A career school as defined in ORS 345.010.
(5) “Participant” means an eligible individual who is enrolled in a degree program as part
of the Guaranteed Opportunity Program.
(6) “Payment period” means the period beginning three  months after a participant com-
pletes the Guaranteed Opportunity Program and ending on the date the participant either
retires or reaches 65 years of age, whichever is later.
SECTION 2.
(1) There is  established the Guaranteed Opportunity Program to be admin-
istered by  the Office of Student Access and Completion pursuant to rules adopted by the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(2) To enroll in the program established under this section, an eligible individual shall:
(a) Submit a request in a manner determined by the commission by rule; and
(b) Following the submission of  a request under paragraph (a) of this subsection, meet
with a counselor at the Office of  Student Access and Completion and execute an agreement
that:
(A) States the institution at which the eligible individual will enroll;
(B) States the degree program in which the eligible individual will enroll;
(C) Sets forth  the grade point average and graduation track requirements that the com-
mission has  established by rule for continuing participation in the Guaranteed Opportunity
Program; and
(D) States that,  in return for the Office of Student Access and Completion paying the
covered costs for the degree program, the eligible individual shall repay  the office in the
manner set forth in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(3) In exchange  for receiving the covered costs for a degree program, an eligible individ-
ual shall agree to pay to the Office of Student Access and  Completion a percentage of the
individual’s adjusted gross annual income during the payment period. The  percentage of ad-
justed gross annual income that the individual shall agree to pay is:
(a) Two percent for a degree program that will result in an associate’s degree or a cer-
tificate degree;
(b) Three percent for a degree program that will result in a bachelor’s degree;
(c) Four percent for a degree  program that will result in a master’s degree, law degree
or other professional post-baccalaureate degree; and
(d) Five percent for a degree program that will result in a doctorate degree.
(4) An eligible individual may enroll in the program an unlimited number  of times to re-
ceive multiple certificates or degrees through the program. For an  eligible individual who
receives multiple certificates or degrees  through the program, the agreement entered into
by the individual under subsection (2) of this section must require the individual to pay to
the Office of Student Access and  Completion the percentage required for the highest level
degree obtained by the individual under the program,  as set forth in subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) If an eligible individual enrolls in the  program multiple times under subsection (4) of
this section, the payment period is deferred during all periods in  which the individual is en-
rolled in the program.
(6) In addition to the requirements set forth in subsection (3) of this section, the com-
mission may require by  rule that participants in the program preauthorize the Office of
[2]
HB 2719
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Student Access and Completion, the federal Internal Revenue Service or any  other entity in
this state or any other state to provide data on the participant  necessary to verify the
participant’s income or to impose any appropriate conditions of payment during the  payment
period.
(7) For any personally identifiable information obtained by the office  regarding partic-
ipants in the program, the office may not:
(a) Publicly release the information; or
(b) Disclose the information as a public record under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(8) Any data obtained by the office  on participants in the program must be recorded in
an aggregate format.
(9) The commission may adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Office of Student Access and Completion shall use moneys from the
Guaranteed Opportunity Program Implementation Fund established in section 6 of this 2025
Act to pay all covered costs for participants in the Guaranteed Opportunity Program.
(2) The office may enter into arrangements and  agreements with institutions to deter-
mine the schedule and method of disbursements made under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The  Higher Education Coordinating Commission may adopt rules to implement this
section.
SECTION 4. (1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall by rule determine
the payment schedule and method of payment of  covered costs for each participant in the
Guaranteed Opportunity Program.
(2)(a) During each tax year of the payment  period, the Director of the Department of
Revenue shall provide the Office of Student Access  and Completion with income tax data for
the participant and the participant’s household.
(b) The office and the  director may enter into an agreement to determine the schedule
and method of providing the information required by this subsection.
(3) If the participant does not reside in this state,  the office may enter into agreements
with the federal Internal Revenue Service or  government entities in other states to verify
the income of the participant and the participant’s household.
(4) If the office determines that a participant has  failed to remit any required payment
within a reasonable period of time, the office may take any action the office considers  nec-
essary to collect any amounts due, including:
(a) Informing the director about the  participant’s delinquency and requesting that the
director assign a deficiency to the participant’s income  tax payments for the appropriate
amount, including any administrative costs; or
(b) Contracting with a collections agency to collect any  amounts due, including any ad-
ministrative costs.
(5) The commission may adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 5.
(1) By September 15 of each even-numbered year, the State Workforce and
Talent Development Board shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245 to
the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to higher education.
(2) The report required under this section shall:
(a) Summarize the board’s analysis and recommendations under subsection (3) of  this
section; and
(b) Include any recommendation for legislation.
[3]
HB 2719
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) For purposes of each report submitted under subsection (1) of this  section, the board
shall analyze the state’s workforce needs and  recommend whether the state workforce would
benefit from changing the percentages of adjusted gross  income that participants in the
Guaranteed Opportunity Program are required to pay under section 2  of this 2025 Act. The
analysis conducted under this subsection may include an examination of whether the state
would benefit from changing the percentages paid by participants in  certain degree programs
but not in others.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Guaranteed Opportunity Program Implementation Fund is estab-
lished in the State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General Fund. Earnings on
moneys in the Guaranteed Opportunity Program Implementation Fund must be credited  to
the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated  to the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission for the purpose  of financing and administering the Guaranteed Opportu-
nity Program established under sections 1 to 6 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The commission shall deposit in the fund:
(a) Amounts appropriated  or otherwise provided by the Legislative Assembly for deposit
in the fund;
(b) Amounts resulting from the issuance of bonds for deposit in the fund;
(c) Gifts, devises or  bequests received by the commission for the purpose described in
subsection (2) of this section or received for  the purpose of providing student assistance and
not directed to a particular fund or account; and
(d) Moneys received as repayment of or in exchange for the grant or loan of  moneys in
the fund.
SECTION 7.
(1) The Task  Force on Implementing the Guaranteed Opportunity Program
is established.
(2) The task force consists of 13 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint two nonvoting  members from among
members of the Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives  shall appoint two nonvoting members
from among members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The State Treasurer shall appoint one voting member with expertise in state  bonding.
(d) The executive  director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall ap-
point:
(A) One voting member to represent the Office of Student Access and Completion; and
(B) One voting member to represent the interests of career  schools as defined in ORS
345.010.
(e) The presidents of the University of Oregon, Oregon State University  and Portland
State University shall  jointly select one voting member to represent the universities’ inter-
ests.
(f) The presidents of the Oregon Institute of Technology, Eastern Oregon University,
Western Oregon University and Southern Oregon University  shall jointly select one voting
member to represent the universities’ interests.
(g) The presidents of  community colleges operated under ORS chapter 341 shall jointly
select one voting member to represent the interests of community colleges.
(h) The Governor  shall appoint three voting members from this state, including one
[4]
HB 2719
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
voting member who is recommended by  an organization that represents the interests of
students in higher education in this state.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Determine the  amount of moneys the Guaranteed Opportunity Program will need to
raise through bonding to be able to fully fund all eligible individuals who seek  to enroll in the
program beginning in 2045;
(b) Determine the amount of moneys the Guaranteed Opportunity Program will  need to
raise on an annual basis beginning in 2045 to fund all eligible individuals who seek to enroll
in the program;
(c) Analyze whether the percentages of income that participants in  the Guaranteed Op-
portunity Program are required to pay under section 2 of this 2025 Act need to be amended;
(d) Analyze methods for preventing the bad faith participation of participants in  the
Guaranteed Opportunity Program; and
(e) Review currently offered grant and scholarship programs and  determine which pro-
grams should be repealed as unnecessary in 2045.
(4) The task force  may suggest legislation to supplement implementation of the Guaran-
teed Opportunity Program.
(5) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for  the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by  the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to higher education no later than September 15, 2026.
(12) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall provide staff  support to the
task force.
(13) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force  are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of the task force’s duties and, to  the extent permitted by
laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice  the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 8.
Section 7 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 9. Sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2045.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding the operative date specified  in section 9 of this 2025 Act,
the Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall, on the effective date  of this 2025 Act,
[5]
HB 2719
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
begin the process of developing the policy and rules necessary to implement sections 1  to 6
of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 11.
Notwithstanding the operative date specified in  section 9 of this 2025 Act,
the Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall submit  a report on the progress the
commission has made in developing the policy and rules  necessary to implement sections 1
to 6 of this 2025 Act to the committees of the Legislative Assembly related to  public finance
and higher education during the 2026 and 2027 regular sessions of the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 12. Section 11 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 13. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[6]