Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 192.390 is amended to read:
192.390. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 192.338,  192.345 and 192.355 and except as otherwise provided
in ORS 192.398  and subsection (2) of this section , public records that are more than 25  years old
shall be available for inspection.
(2) Public records that  are exempt from disclosure pursuant to ORS 40.225 and 192.355
(9) are not available for inspection until the record is more than 50 years old.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3491