Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A city or county may, by  ordinance, designate land within the city’s or
county’s land use planning jurisdiction for the development of housing  as provided in this
section, provided that:
(a) The property is all or a portion of a tract, as defined in ORS 215.010, that is  outside
of an urban growth boundary and is  contiguous to, or across a road from, an urban growth
boundary or a lot or parcel that is zoned to allow for residential or commercial use;
(b) The property is not being used for its  zoned purposes, which, for lands zoned for ex-
clusive farm use, means  having not been used for farm use or permissible nonfarm use under
ORS 215.213 or 215.283 for a period of at least five years;
(c) The property is, or is capable of becoming, connected to  urban services, as defined in
ORS 195.065, used for housing or commercial uses; and
(d) All owners of the property have consented to the designation.
(2) Designated lands may be zoned, divided, developed and used only for residential uses
or light commercial uses that are designed to meet the needs of nearby residents.
(3) Except  for laws applicable only to the procedures for dividing land under ORS 92.010
to 92.192, designated lands are not subject to any provision of:
(a) ORS chapter 195, 197, 197A, 215 or 227;
(b) A statewide land use planning goal;
(c) Rules or orders adopted by the Land Conservation and Development Commission;
(d) A comprehensive plan; or
(e) Land use regulations, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The designating city or county may  adopt, by ordinance, zoning, siting or development
regulations consistent with this section for the specific purpose  of regulating residential or
light commercial uses on designated lands.
(5) An application for  the development of housing or commercial uses on designated lands
must be:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3427
SB 958
1
2
3
4
5
6
(a) Approved or rejected by the governing body of the city or county;
(b) Approved or rejected within 100 days from the date of the application; and
(c) Appealed only by a writ of review under ORS 34.010 to 34.100.
(6) The approval of a  development application under subsection (5) of this section be-
comes void four years after the date it is issued.
[2]