Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Policy and Research  Director shall study methods for legis-
lative oversight of administrative rules. The director shall submit a  report in the manner
provided by ORS  192.245 to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to
general government no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2712