Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 106.220 is amended to read:
106.220. (1) Upon entering into marriage, either party may:
(a) Retain the party’s middle name, if any, and surname prior to the marriage;
(b) Retain  the party’s middle name, if any, and change the party’s surname to the surname of
the other party;
(c) Either retain or remove the party’s middle  name, if any, and change the party’s surname to
one surname or a combination of surnames, or names within the surnames, of either or both parties,
with or without a hyphen;
(d) Change the party’s middle name, if any, to the party’s  middle name or  surname at birth  or
prior to the marriage; or
(e) Add to  the party’s middle name, if any, the party’s surname at birth or prior to the marriage
and change the party’s surname to the surname of the other party.
(2) Each party must indicate on the application, license and record  of marriage the party’s name
after marriage.
(3) The name of each party after marriage as indicated on the application, license  and record
of marriage shall become the sole legal name of each party after marriage. If a party  indicates a
name change other than  as described in subsection (1) of this section, the party shall request ap-
proval of the court pursuant to ORS 33.410.
(4) As used in this section, “middle name” and “surname”  mean a name that may consist of one
or more different names.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 106.335 is amended to read:
106.335. (1) Upon entering into a domestic partnership, either party to  the domestic partnership
may:
(a) Retain the party’s middle name, if any, and surname prior to the domestic partnership;
(b) Retain  the party’s middle name, if any, and change the party’s surname to the surname of
the other party;
(c) Either retain or remove the party’s middle  name, if any, and change the party’s surname to
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4297
HB 3555
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
one surname or a combination of surnames, or names within the surnames, of either or both parties,
with or without a hyphen;
(d) Change the party’s middle name, if any, to the party’s  middle name or  surname at birth  or
prior to the domestic partnership; or
(e) Add to the party’s middle  name, if any, the party’s surname at birth or prior to the domestic
partnership and change the party’s surname to the surname of the other party.
(2) Each party must indicate on the Declaration of  Domestic Partnership the party’s name after
domestic  partnership.
(3) The name  of each party after domestic partnership as indicated on the Declaration of Do-
mestic Partnership shall become the sole legal name of each party after domestic partnership. If  a
party indicates a name change other than as described in subsection (1) of this  section, the party
shall request approval of the court pursuant to ORS 33.410.
(4) As used in this section, “middle name” and “surname”  mean a name that may consist of one
or more different names.
[2]