Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Purpose. It is the purpose of  sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act that the State
of Oregon shall make awards to qualified lending institutions to fund lenders’ loan loss  re-
serve accounts for the purpose of increasing  lending to business owners and entrepreneurs
who currently lack access to capital to start or grow their businesses.
SECTION 2. Definitions. As used in sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act, unless  the context
requires otherwise:
(1) “Loan loss reserve account” or “account” means an account created by a lender  for
the deposit of moneys awarded to the lender under section 3 of this 2021 Act out of which
the lender may reimburse itself for losses incurred due to defaults on qualified loans.
(2) “Qualified business” or “qualified borrower” means a person that:
(a)(A) Operates a business in Oregon; or
(B) Attests to a qualified lender that the person will use  proceeds from a qualified loan
to establish a business in Oregon; and
(b) Enters into a qualified loan agreement  with a lender awarded moneys under section
3 of this 2021 Act.
(3) “Qualified lender” means a lender that:
(a)(A) Is certified as a  community development financial institution by the Community
Development Financial Institutions Fund at the United States Department of the Treasury;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2459
HB 2563
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Is a nonprofit corporation as defined in ORS 307.130; or
(C) Is affiliated with:
(i) An economic development district in Oregon  designated by the Economic Development
Administration of the United States Department of Commerce; or
(ii) A local government as defined in ORS 174.116; and
(b) Has a physical presence in Oregon and at least five years of lending experience.
(4)(a) “Qualified loan” means a loan made by a  lender to a qualified business the losses
from which are reimbursable from moneys in the lender’s loan loss reserve account.
(b) “Qualified loan” does not mean a loan:
(A) With a variable interest rate.
(B) With an annual interest rate that exceeds the prime rate plus  eight percent with an
origination fee that exceeds three percent.
(C) For working capital, including lines of credit, for a term exceeding seven years.
(D) For capital assets for a term exceeding the useful life of the assets.
(E) That includes, in whole  or in part, the refinancing of an existing loan made by the
lender to the borrower.
(F) That includes, in whole or in part, the refinancing  of an existing personal loan not
used for business purposes.
(G) For the purchase of real property that is not used for the business  operations of the
borrower.
(H) For the purchase of owner-occupied residential housing or for the construction, im-
provement or purchase of residential housing owned or to be owned by the borrower.
(5) “RFP” means a request for proposal.
SECTION 3.
RFP process  for awards to lenders; lender requirements; approval criteria.
(1)(a) The Oregon Business Development Department shall, in accordance with  this section,
make awards to lenders to fund the lenders’ loan loss reserve accounts.
(b) The awards shall be made, through  a competitive RFP process administered by the
department, not later than 180 days following the effective date of this 2021 Act.
(c) Of the moneys awarded as a result of  any RFP process, not more than 10 percent of
available funds, or $500,000, whichever is greater, may be awarded to any single lender.
(2) The department shall evaluate proposals according to the following criteria:
(a) The number and value of loans closed by the lender during the five-year period  im-
mediately preceding the date of submission of the lender’s proposal;
(b) The projected  loan production over the performance period of the award, including
the projected number  of loans, the proposed principal amount of qualified loans that the
lender would not make but for the moneys awarded, and the jobs to be created and  retained
by qualified borrowers;
(c) How the award would increase the lender’s capacity to make loans to rural  or
underserved entrepreneurs;
(d) The past performance of loans made by the lender;
(e) The extent to which the lender:
(A) Provides technical assistance and financial  literacy services to underserved borrow-
ers; or
(B) Partners with providers  of technical assistance and financial literacy services to
underserved borrowers;
[2]
HB 2563
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) How the lender’s proposed outreach,  application process, underwriting criteria and
loan terms are designed to reduce historic barriers to borrowers’ access to loan capital;
(g) How  the lender plans to ensure that the loans originated by the lender under the
program are made to borrowers in regionally diverse and rural areas of this state; and
(h) Any other criteria the department considers necessary or useful for  evaluating a
proposal.
(3)(a) After reviewing proposals submitted in response to  an RFP, the department shall
reject or accept proposals and determine the amount awarded for each accepted proposal.
(b) As soon as practicable after the awards are finalized,  the department shall notify the
lenders that submitted proposals of the  results and offer the awards to the lenders whose
proposals are accepted.
SECTION 4.
Agreements with  lenders; terms.  (1) The Oregon Business Development De-
partment shall enter into a written agreement with each lender  that accepts an award of-
fered under section 3 of this 2021 Act.
(2) A written agreement entered into pursuant to this section must:
(a) Provide for the creation of a loan loss reserve account by the lender for the deposit
of moneys  awarded under section 3 of this 2021 Act out of which the lender may reimburse
itself for losses incurred due to defaults on qualified loans;
(b) Provide that, notwithstanding ORS chapter 293 or 295, the lender shall establish  and
maintain the loan loss reserve account with a financial institution,  as defined in ORS 706.008,
in accordance with such policies as the department may adopt;
(c) Require the lender to designate, when a loan is made, whether the loan is  a qualified
loan;
(d) Provide that,  upon default on a qualified loan, the lender shall require the qualified
borrower to liquidate the borrower’s  assets for the benefit of the lender before the lender
may reimburse itself from the lender’s loan loss reserve account;
(e) Provide that the liability of  the State of Oregon and the department under the written
agreement is limited to the amount of moneys awarded and credited to the lender’s loan loss
reserve account; and
(f) Require the lender to file an annual report  in accordance with section 5 of this 2021
Act.
(3) Qualified lenders that accept awards under  section 3 of this 2021 Act shall, within 48
months following the date on which the written agreement entered into  pursuant to sub-
section (1) of this section becomes binding,  originate qualified loans with a total principal
amount equal to at least four times the amount of the moneys awarded.
SECTION 5.
Annual reporting by lenders.  (1) Not later than July 31 of each year, each
lender awarded moneys under section 3 of this 2021 Act shall, during the term of the written
agreement entered into under section 4 of  this 2021 Act, provide a report to the Oregon
Business Development Department,  on a form prescribed by the department, for the period
beginning on July 1 of the immediately preceding year and ending on June 30  of the current
year.
(2) With respect to qualified loans made by the lender, the report shall set forth:
(a) The number and total principal amount of all qualified loans made by the lender;
(b) For each qualified loan, the following information:
(A) The interest rate;
[3]
HB 2563
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) The term of the qualified loan; and
(C) If made to finance  a capital asset, the term of amortization of the capital asset fi-
nanced;
(c) The principal amount loaned to qualified borrowers;
(d) The ratio of the total  principal amount of qualified loans made by the lender to the
moneys awarded to the lender under section 3 of this 2021 Act;
(e) The number of qualified loans  that have been delinquent for at least 60 days as of the
end of the reporting period;
(f) The amount of moneys withdrawn from the lender’s loan loss reserve account to  re-
imburse the lender for losses incurred on qualified loans; and
(g) The amount of award moneys available in the lender’s loan loss reserve account.
(3) With respect to qualified borrowers, the report shall set forth:
(a) The businesses that qualified borrowers conduct in this state;
(b) The cities and counties in which qualified borrowers use the qualified loan proceeds;
(c) The number of individuals employed by the qualified businesses;
(d) Demographic  data voluntarily reported by qualified borrowers, including, but not
limited to, whether a  qualified business is owned by a woman, a minority individual, a vet-
eran of any branch  of the Armed Forces of the United States, the National Guard or other
reserve component, a low income  person or a person operating the business in a rural area
of this state; and
(e) Outreach conducted by the lender to rural and underserved communities.
(4) The department may require  any lender to include in the report financial information
that is identifiable with, or from, the financial records of a borrower.
SECTION 6.
Release; repayment.  (1)(a) A lender shall be released from any obligation
under a written agreement entered into under section 4 of  this 2021 Act, and may use for
any purpose whatever any balance in the lender’s loan loss reserve account, if the lender has:
(A) Performed under the written  agreement entered into with the Oregon Business De-
velopment Department for at least four years;
(B) Attained during the four-year  period, as required under section 4 (3) of this 2021 Act,
a ratio of four to one of  total principal amount of qualified loans made by the lender to the
amount of moneys awarded to the lender under section 3 of this 2021 Act; and
(C) Complied with the annual reporting requirements under section 5 of this 2021 Act.
(b) A release under this section does not  absolve a lender of any contractual obligations
owed to a qualified borrower under a qualified loan agreement.
(2) A lender shall repay  to the department for deposit in the General Fund the balance
of moneys awarded to the lender  under section 3 of this 2021 Act in the lender’s loan loss
reserve account if the department determines that:
(a) The lender has not made a qualified loan for 24 consecutive months;
(b) The lender has become insolvent or has ceased lending operations in Oregon;
(c) The lender has failed to  perform in any material way under the written agreement
with the department;
(d) The lender made material misrepresentations in the proposal  submitted under section
3 of this 2021 Act or in an annual report required under section 5 of this 2021 Act;
(e) The lender has sold, transferred or assigned the loan loss reserve account; or
(f) The lender or the lender’s loan loss reserve account portfolio has been sold,  trans-
[4]
HB 2563
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ferred or assigned, in whole or part.
SECTION 7.
Annual report by the Oregon Business  Development Department.  On or be-
fore September 15 of each  year, the Oregon Business Development Department shall submit,
in the  manner required under ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the Legislative As-
sembly related to economic development, a report that sets forth the following information:
(1) The number and  total dollar amount of proposals for awards received under section
3 of this 2021 Act;
(2) The number of awards  and the amount of moneys awarded under section 3 of this 2021
Act;
(3) Information described in section 3 (2)(b) of this 2021 Act from the approved  proposals;
(4) Aggregated lender and qualified borrower data, including  demographic data reported
by lenders under section 5 (3)(d) of this 2021 Act;
(5) The aggregate performance of qualified loans;
(6) The average interest rate, term and amount of qualified loans;
(7) The cities and counties in which qualified borrowers use the qualified  loan proceeds;
and
(8) Any other information the department considers necessary or useful to include in the
report.
SECTION 8.
Appropriation. There is appropriated to  the Oregon Business Development
Department, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount
of $5,000,000, for the purpose of implementing sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 9. Program evaluation; recommendations.  (1) Not later than September  15,
2023, the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related  to economic development
shall evaluate the effectiveness of the lender loan loss reserve account  program established
under sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act  and develop recommendations for legislation, including
appropriations.
(2) In making the evaluation under subsection (1) of this section, the interim committees
shall:
(a) Consult with lenders that have entered  into written agreements with the Oregon
Business Development Department under section 4 of this 2021 Act  and made qualified loans
and with any other persons the interim committees consider necessary or useful; and
(b) Consider the  annual reports submitted by the department under section 7 of this 2021
Act and any other information the interim committees consider necessary or useful.
SECTION 10. Section captions.  The section captions used  in this 2021 Act are provided
only for the convenience of the reader and do not become part  of the statutory law of this
state or express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 11. (1) There is  allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the
Administrative Services Economic Development Fund, to the  Oregon Department of Admin-
istrative Services,  the amount of $250,000 for distribution to the Oregon Entrepreneurs Net-
work in accordance with this section.
(2) Distributions made pursuant to  this section may be used by the Oregon Entrepre-
neurs Network solely for the following purposes:
(a) Qualitative one-on-one interviews  with 75 entrepreneur ecosystem participants, in-
cluding regulated and nonregulated  lenders, located in all regions of this state, to better
understand the ecosystem and funding needs and gaps.
[5]
HB 2563
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
(b) Two  group meetings of diverse Oregon entrepreneurial stakeholders to study
stakeholder needs. Moneys in  the fund may also be used to make travel and time re-
imbursements to underrepresented entrepreneurs.
(c) To bring  together a research team that will synthesize existing analyses, and conduct
a new  analysis, of the economic needs of Oregon small businesses and the impact of small
businesses on the Oregon economy.
(d) Collaboration and information sharing with the Oregon Capital Scan.
(e) To fund technological infrastructure and the  position of a project manager charged
with creating a statewide, connected and engaged entrepreneurial ecosystem community.
(f) To make recommendations for legislation to the  interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to economic development.
(3) The department may  not make a distribution to the Oregon Entrepreneurs Network
under this section until the amount of lottery funds allocated  to the department under sub-
section (1) of this section has been matched by  at least $150,000 received from private,
nonprofit or philanthropic sources to be used solely for the purposes set  forth in subsection
(2) of this section.
SECTION 12.
(1) There is  allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the
Administrative Services  Economic Development Fund, to the Oregon Business Development
Department, the amount of $3 million for deposit in  the Oregon Growth Fund established
under ORS 284.890.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 284.890 (3), moneys deposited in the Oregon Growth Fund under
this section are continuously appropriated to the department for the use of the Oregon
Growth Board for the following purposes:
(a) To target entrepreneurs and emerging capital innovators;
(b) To support economic  growth through investments in loan funds, venture capital
funds, angel conferences and associated technical assistance;
(c) To leverage private  and other institutional dollars for investment in Oregon compa-
nies;
(d) To make investments in early stage, small and first-time  capital sources to support
economic development; and
(e) To help  funds fill the capital gaps encountered by Oregon businesses, especially in
underserved communities, rural areas and undersupported industry sectors.
(3) Moneys deposited in the Oregon Growth Fund under this  section may not be used for
any other purpose for which moneys in the fund may be used  under ORS 284.890, other than
administrative costs described in ORS 284.890 (5) that are directly related to this section.
SECTION 13.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[6]