Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $702 million for
deposit into the Community College Support Fund established under ORS 341.620  for distrib-
ution to community colleges and community college service districts.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $35 million for
the Office of Community Colleges and Workforce Development  for the purpose of addressing
inequities in educational attainment among systemically marginalized communities and  to
support innovation and best practices.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1770
HB 2907
1
2
3
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
[2]