Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $500,000 for the
purpose of awarding a grant to the College Possible organization to encourage and assist low
income students to attend a post-secondary institution.
SECTION 2. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1818