Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Transportation shall widen and  increase the capacity of
motor vehicle travel on the portion of U.S.  Highway 20 beginning where the highway inter-
sects with Southwest  15th Street, and ending where the highway intersects with the city
limits of the City of Philomath.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Transportation, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be  expended for carrying out the pro-
visions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1059