Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 689.
SECTION 2. (1) A mail-order pharmacy, specialty pharmacy, as defined  in ORS 735.530,
or online pharmacy may  not transfer to a pharmacy located in this state prescription drugs
intended for dispensation to a patient unless the  mail-order, specialty or online pharmacy
first notifies the pharmacy  located in this state of the transfer and receives agreement from
the pharmacy to accept the transfer and dispense the prescription drugs to the patient.
(2) A mail-order, specialty or online pharmacy that transfers  a prescription drug under
subsection (1) of this section shall compensate the pharmacy  that receives the prescription
drug for all costs the pharmacy incurs as a result of receiving the prescription drug, in-
cluding but not limited to, administrative, storage and handling costs.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 735.530 to
735.552.
SECTION 4. A pharmacy benefit manager may not require a pharmacy located in this
state to:
(1) Receive transfers of prescription drugs  intended for dispensation to a patient from a
mail-order pharmacy, specialty pharmacy or online pharmacy; or
(2) Dispense prescription drugs intended for dispensation to a patient on behalf of  a
mail-order pharmacy, specialty pharmacy or online pharmacy.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3343