Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Transportation shall conduct a study of U.S.  Highway
101 and shall make a report on the department’s findings.
(2) The report must focus on the portion  of U.S. Highway 101 beginning in Lincoln City
and ending in Coos Bay and include the following:
(a) An assessment to  determine if the traffic system plans in place for cities along the
portion of U.S. Highway 101 described in this subsection are likely to aid in  decreasing con-
gestion and increasing safety;
(b) An intersection study plan  for local highways that intersect with the portion of U.S.
Highway 101 described in this subsection and recommendations for how best to relieve con-
gestion and produce safer driving conditions at those intersections; and
(c) Any other information the  department deems pertinent and useful to share with the
Joint Committee on Transportation.
(3) The department  shall submit the report required by this section, and may include
recommendations for legislation, to the Joint  Committee on Transportation in the manner
provided under ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 243