Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Policy and Research Director  shall conduct a study of the
manner in which state labor agencies in  other states are funded. The director shall submit
a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to labor and business no later than September 15, 2027.  The report must
include a recommendation for a permanent funding source from other fund  moneys to fund
the operations of the Bureau of Labor and Industries.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 26