Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 243.712 is amended to read:
243.712. (1) If after a 150-calendar-day period of good faith negotiations over the terms of an
agreement or 150 days after certification or recognition of  an exclusive representative no agreement
has been signed, either or both of  the parties may notify the Employment Relations Board of the
status of negotiations and the need for assignment of a mediator. Any period of time  in which the
public employer or  labor organization has been found by the Employment Relations Board to have
failed to bargain in good  faith shall not be counted as part of the 150-day period. This provision
cannot be invoked  by the party found to have failed to bargain in good faith. The parties may agree
to request a mediator before the  end of the 150-day period. Upon receipt of such notification or re-
quest, the board shall appoint a mediator  and shall notify the parties of the appointment. The
150-day period shall  begin when the parties meet for the first bargaining session and each party has
received the other party’s initial proposal or on an alternative date to  which the parties agree in
writing.
(2) The board, upon receipt of a notification or request under subsection  (1) of this section, shall
render assistance to resolve the labor dispute according to the following schedule:
(a) Mediation shall be provided by the State Conciliation Service as provided by  ORS 662.405
to 662.455. Any time after 15 days of mediation, either party may declare an impasse. The  mediator
may declare an impasse at any time during the mediation process. Notification of  an impasse shall
be filed in writing with  the board, and copies of the notification shall be submitted to the parties
on the same day the notification is filed with the board.
(b) Within seven days of the declaration  of impasse, each party shall submit to the mediator in
writing the final offer of the party, including a cost summary of the offer. Upon receipt of the  final
offers, the mediator shall make public the final offers, including any proposed  contract language and
each party’s cost summary dealing with  those issues, on which the parties have failed to reach
agreement. Each party’s proposed contract language shall be titled “Final Offer.”
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 797
SB 310
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
(c) Within 30 days after the mediator makes public the parties’ final offers, the parties may
jointly petition the Employment Relations Board to appoint a fact finder , except that only one
party is required to petition the board if the public employer is a school district, an education
service district, a community college district or a  public university listed in ORS 352.002 . If
the [ parties jointly petition ] board is petitioned for fact-finding, a  fact finder shall be appointed and
the hearing conducted as provided in ORS 243.722.
(d) If an agreement has not been reached 30 days after the mediator makes  public the final of-
fers, or if the parties participated in fact-finding, 30 days after the receipt of the  fact finder’s report,
the public employer may implement all or part of its final offer,  and the public employees have the
right to strike. After a  collective bargaining agreement has expired, and prior to agreement on a
successor contract, the status quo with  respect to employment relations shall be preserved until
completion of impasse procedures except that no public employer shall be required to increase con-
tributions for insurance premiums unless  the expiring collective bargaining agreement provides
otherwise. Merit step and longevity step pay increases  shall be part of the status quo unless the
expiring collective bargaining agreement expressly provides otherwise.
(3) Nothing in subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be construed to prohibit the parties  at
any time from voluntarily agreeing to submit any or all  of the issues in dispute to final and binding
arbitration. The arbitration shall be scheduled and conducted in accordance with ORS  243.746. The
arbitration shall supersede the dispute resolution procedures set forth in ORS 243.726 and 243.746.
[2]