Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Department of Justice shall administer three pilot  programs to ap-
point court-appointed legal counsel for children in contested domestic relations proceedings.
The department shall develop and implement three pilot programs under  this section, one in
a rural area, one in an urban area and one in a mixed urban-rural area of the state.
(2) The purpose of the pilot program is to appoint legal counsel for children  in contested
domestic relations proceedings to ensure that  children’s voices are heard and interests are
represented and the risk of harm to children is minimized.
(3) The department,  by rule, shall establish minimum qualifications for court-appointed
legal counsel under  this section, including but not limited to a minimum number of recent
hours of continuing legal education classes with an emphasis in:
(a) Child development;
(b) Roles of guardians ad litem and child representatives;
(c) Ethics in child custody and allocation of parental responsibilities cases;
(d) Relevant substantive state, federal and case  law in custody, allocation of parental
responsibilities and visitation and parenting time matters; and
(e) Family dynamics,  including substance abuse, domestic abuse and mental health is-
sues.
(4) The department shall:
(a) Establish eligibility criteria for  the court to determine whether a child requires
court-appointed legal counsel and whether  the parties require financial assistance to pay the
court-appointed legal counsel;
(b) Determine reasonable compensation for court-appointed legal  counsel, including court
costs and expenses,  for the representation of a child in contested domestic relations pro-
ceedings; and
(c) Administer a grant program to pay the  fees, costs and expenses of court-appointed
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1791
SB 371
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
legal counsel under this section.
(5) Upon appointment of court-appointed legal counsel for a child in a  domestic relations
proceeding, the court shall enter an order granting the court-appointed  legal counsel access
to the child and any relevant documents.
(6) Court-appointed legal counsel appointed for a child under this section shall:
(a) As soon as  practicable following appointment, interview the child in person or, if the
child is too young to be interviewed, at a minimum, observe the child.
(b) Make reasonable efforts to obtain information relevant to the  issues affecting the
child.
(c) Make reasonable efforts  to determine what services the family needs to facilitate re-
solution of any dispute regarding custody or allocation of parental responsibilities, make ap-
propriate recommendations to the parties and seek  appropriate relief in court, if required,
to serve the best interests of the child.
(d) Determine whether a settlement  of any dispute regarding custody or allocation of
parental responsibilities can be achieved by agreement and, to the  extent feasible, attempt
to resolve disputes by an agreement that serves the best interests of the child.
(7) The department shall  submit an annual report to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to domestic relations no later than September 15 of  each year
regarding the status of the pilot programs developed and implemented under this section.
(8) The department may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2019 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 3. (1) Section 1 of this 2019 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2020.
(2) The Department of Justice may take any  action before the operative date specified in
subsection (1) of this section that is necessary for the department  to exercise, on and after
the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the department by section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to  the Department of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the  amount of $_______ for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section
1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]