Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. As used in sections 1 to 4 of this 2019 Act:
(1) “Customer” means a retail electricity customer of PacifiCorp that is located in  this
state.
(2) “Klamath River dam” means the J.C. Boyle Dam located  in Oregon, the Copco 1 Dam
located in California, the Copco 2 Dam located in California or the  Iron Gate Dam located in
California.
SECTION 2. ORS 757.732, 757.734, 757.736, 757.738, 757.740, 757.742 and 757.744 are repealed
on January 2, 2020, if the physical act of  removing a Klamath River dam has not begun on
or before December 31, 2019.
SECTION 3. If the physical act of removing a Klamath River dam has not  begun on or
before December 31, 2019:
(1) On January 2, 2020, each trust account established by the Public Utility Commission
under ORS 757.738 is abolished.
(2) All moneys in  each trust account established by the commission under ORS 757.738
are transferred to the Klamath Fish Habitat Enhancement Fund established under section 4
of this 2019 Act for use as provided for in section 4 of this 2019 Act.
(3) PacifiCorp shall dedicate an amount equal to the total amount of all moneys collected
from customers as a surcharge  pursuant to ORS 757.736 to be used, subject to oversight by
the commission,  to finance activities related to meeting licensing or relicensing requirements
for the Klamath River dams imposed by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, includ-
ing but not limited to certification requirements under ORS 468B.040 and 33 U.S.C. 1341.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Klamath Fish Habitat  Enhancement Fund is established in the State
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3567
HB 3229
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the  Klamath Fish
Habitat Enhancement Fund shall be credited to the fund. All  moneys in the fund are con-
tinuously appropriated to  the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board to be used for
watershed enhancement projects that serve to improve salmon and trout habitat  near the
Klamath River dams.
(2) The Klamath Fish Habitat Enhancement Fund shall consist of moneys  deposited in
the fund pursuant to subsection (3) of this section and section 3 (2) of this 2019 Act.
(3) The board  may accept gifts, grants or contributions from any source, whether public
or private, for deposit in the Klamath Fish Habitat Enhancement Fund.
SECTION 5. (1) No later than September 15, 2020,  the Public Utility Commission shall
provide in writing to the Legislative Counsel, and  to an interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly related to energy, a statement identifying  whether the physical act of removing a
Klamath River dam began on or before December 31, 2019.
(2) If  the statement provided by the commission provides that the physical act of re-
moving a Klamath River dam did begin on or before December 31,  2019, then sections 1 to 4
of this 2019 Act are repealed on January 2, 2021.
SECTION 6. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]