Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 803.350 is amended to read:
803.350. This section establishes the requirements for qualification  for registration. The De-
partment of Transportation may  not issue registration to a vehicle if the requirements under this
section are not met. The department, in the absence of just cause for refusing  to register a vehicle
upon application,  shall assign a distinctive number or other distinctive means of identification and
shall issue registration for a vehicle if all of the following requirements are met:
(1) The applicant applies for and is granted title in the applicant’s  name at the same time the
person makes application for registration, or presents satisfactory  evidence that title covering the
vehicle has been previously issued to the applicant.
(2) The applicant completes an application described under ORS 803.370. If the vehicle is a re-
constructed or assembled vehicle  or a replica, the person must indicate that fact in the application
or be subject to ORS 803.225.
(3) The applicant pays the department the registration fee established under ORS  803.420 and
803.422 and any applicable fees for issuance of registration plates.
(4) For motor vehicles, proof of compliance with  pollution control equipment requirements is
provided to the department  before the department issues stickers, registration  and
plates. Nothing in this subsection  prohibits a vehicle dealer from issuing a temporary regis-
tration permit for a vehicle that does not have proof  of compliance at the time the vehicle
is sold. The dealer shall provide the purchaser  with a written notice that the department
will not issue stickers,  registration and plates unless proof of compliance is provided before
the expiration of the temporary registration permit . Proof required to comply  with this sub-
section is described under ORS 815.310. This subsection does not apply if the vehicle is exempt  from
the requirements for proof of compliance under ORS 815.300.
(5) The applicant is domiciled in this state, as described in ORS 803.355,  if required by ORS
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3263
HB 2663
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
803.360 to be domiciled in the state in order to register a vehicle. If the department  has reason to
believe that the applicant is not domiciled in this state and is required to be  in order to register a
vehicle, the department may require the person to submit proof of domicile. The department  shall
determine by rule what constitutes proof of domicile.
(6) The applicant owns a vehicle that qualifies under ORS 803.360 (2) for registration in this
state, if the owner  is not domiciled in this state and is not required by ORS 803.200, or any other
provision of law, to register the vehicle in this state.
(7) The applicant surrenders all evidence of any former registration  or title as required by ORS
803.380.
(8)(a) Beginning with 2009 model year new motor vehicles, the applicant  provides proof of com-
pliance  with  low emission motor vehicle standards adopted pursuant to ORS 468A.360. The depart-
ment shall determine by rule what constitutes proof of compliance with low emission motor  vehicle
standards.
(b) The department shall  determine by rule which new motor vehicles are exempt from the re-
quirements of this subsection. Any rules adopted pursuant to this  paragraph shall be consistent with
the Environmental Quality Commission standards adopted pursuant to ORS 468A.360.
(c) For  purposes of this subsection, “new motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle with 7,500 miles
or less on the odometer when the vehicle is initially registered under ORS 803.420  (6)(a), 805.100,
805.110 or 805.120.
(9) If required to do so  by the department, the applicant provides the department with satisfac-
tory proof that the vehicle was designed to be  operated on highways and meets equipment require-
ments imposed by statute or rule  for the lawful operation of a vehicle on highways. The department
may adopt rules specifying the kinds of vehicles  that are subject to this subsection and what con-
stitutes satisfactory proof under this subsection.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 803.625 is amended to read:
803.625. (1) The holder of a current, valid vehicle dealer certificate issued under  ORS 822.020
may issue temporary  registration  permits for the operation of vehicles or the  transporting of a
camper pending the receipt of permanent registration from the Department of Transportation.
(2) Forms for temporary registration permits issued under this section shall be furnished  and,
subject to ORS 803.640, prescribed by the Department of Transportation.
(3) A vehicle  dealer may issue a temporary registration permit for motor vehicles that
do not have proof of compliance with pollution control  equipment requirements. The dealer
shall provide the purchaser with a written notice that  the department will not issue stickers,
registration and plates  unless proof of compliance is provided before the expiration of the
temporary registration permit.
[(3)] (4) The department shall specify, by rule, the procedures to be followed by persons issuing
and using temporary  registration  permits issued under this  section. Persons violating rules estab-
lished by the department under this subsection are  subject to penalty under ORS 803.630 and
803.635.
[2]