Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of  this 2023 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 757.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Customer” means the person in whose name an energy utility residential  service is
provided.
(b) “Energy burden” means the percentage of  household monthly gross income spent on
energy costs.
(c) “Energy utility” means a public utility, a people’s utility district organized  under ORS
chapter 261, a municipal utility operating  under ORS chapter 225 or a cooperative organized
under ORS chapter 62 that provides or delivers electricity or gas service.
(d) “Seek to collect” includes:
(A) Engaging in collection efforts for an amount owed that is overdue.
(B) Hiring a third-party person or agency to collect an amount owed that is overdue.
(C) Assigning to a third party an amount owed that is overdue.
(2) An energy utility may not disconnect service to a customer of the energy utility for
the reason that the customer failed to pay an amount owed to the energy utility.
(3)(a) An  energy utility may not seek to collect from a customer who fails to pay an
amount owed if the customer has an energy burden of six percent or more.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the energy utility may:
(A) Continue to conduct the energy utility’s regular billing practices;
(B) Contact the customer for purposes of offering or accepting  a reasonable partial pay-
ment or payment plan for the amount owed that is overdue; or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2861
HB 3459
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Provide the customer with information about organizations, programs or other re-
sources that provide financial assistance or support services.
(4)(a) Subject to the requirements in paragraph (b) this subsection, an energy  utility may
seek to collect from  a customer who fails to pay an amount owed if the customer has an
energy burden of less than six percent.
(b) The energy utility shall:
(A) Provide written notice to the customer at least 20 days prior to beginning  to seek to
collect on an amount owed that is overdue; and
(B) Accept a reasonable partial payment or  payment plan for an amount owed that is
overdue.
(5)(a) A partial payment or payment plan agreed to under this section may not include
terms that require a customer to pay a monthly amount that is six percent or more  of the
customer’s household monthly gross income.
(b) An energy utility shall provide written notice to the customer at least 20  days prior
to beginning to seek to collect on an amount owed under an agreed-upon  partial payment or
payment plan if a customer fails to pay under the agreed-upon partial payment or payment
plan.
(6)(a) An  energy utility shall provide the Housing and Community Services Department
the name and address of each customer from whom the energy utility seeks to collect whose
annual income is 50 percent of the federal poverty rate guidelines or less.
(b) The department shall contact the customer whose name is provided under  paragraph
(a) of this subsection for  purposes of helping the customer access programs or resources
that provide low-cost weatherization or other assistance for reducing energy usage.
(7) An energy utility shall  establish billing procedures that provide a period of no less
than 30 days from the date of a billing transmittal  for all current charges, including payment
for final bills, to the date the payment for the charges is due.
(8) The Public Utility Commission, for an energy utility that is a public  utility, or the
governing body, for an energy utility that is a people’s  utility district, municipal utility or
cooperative, may allow for costs  of overdue amounts owed to be recoverable in the rates of
the energy utility, at a rate increase not to exceed one percent of the total revenues col-
lected by the energy utility from all of the energy utility’s residential service customers.
SECTION 3.
(1) As used in this section, “energy utility” means a public utility, a people’s
utility district organized under ORS chapter 261, a municipal utility operating under ORS
chapter 225 or a cooperative organized under ORS chapter  62 that provides or delivers elec-
tricity or gas service.
(2) The Public Utility Commission, for an energy utility that is a public  utility, or the
governing body, for an energy utility that is a people’s  utility district, municipal utility or
cooperative, shall establish a program to identify residential customers who have higher than
average energy usage and to connect those  residential customers with the Housing and
Community Services Department for assistance with reducing their energy usage.
(3) Under the program, an energy utility shall:
(a) Identify each residential customer of the energy utility that has an energy usage  that
is at least 135  percent of the average residential customer energy usage for the period from
November 1 through March 31;
(b) Provide the department with the name, address and energy  usage of each residential
[2]
HB 3459
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
customer identified under paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Notify each residential customer identified under  paragraph (a) of this subsection the
residential customer’s energy usage in comparison to the average residential  customer’s
energy usage and provide the residential customer with the following:
(A) Contact information  to an appropriate office within the department that may help the
residential customer access programs or resources to assist with  reducing energy usage; and
(B) Information on programs and resources that may assist with  reducing the residential
customer’s energy usage.
(4) The  department may reach out to a residential customer whose name was provided
by an energy utility under subsection (3) of this section for  purposes of helping the residen-
tial customer  access programs or resources to assist with reducing the residential
customer’s energy usage.
[3]