Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) On or before  January 1, 2027, the Department of State Lands shall deliver
a petition to the United States Congress requesting the  transfer to the state of federal public
lands that are under the management of the Bureau of Land Management or  United States
Forest Service and located within any county that has, by ordinance, requested  that the de-
partment include the  county within the plan for the lands established under subsection (2)
of this section.
(2) For any  lands that are transferred to the state in response to the petition described
in subsection (1) of this section, the department shall establish a program by which  the de-
partment:
(a) Offers the lands for sale to private purchasers;
(b) Transfers the lands  to any of the nine federally recognized Indian tribes in this state,
if the lands are in the same region as or adjacent to lands currently  owned or controlled by
the tribe; and
(c) For any lands that are not disposed of as described in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this
subsection, holds the  lands in trust and annually distributes the profits and interests from
the lands to the counties in which  the lands are located to be used only for the education
of the residents of the county.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 3. The repeal of section 1 of this 2025 Act by section  2 of this 2025 Act does
not repeal any program or trust established by the Department of State Lands under section
1 (2) of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4391