Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 327.133 is amended to read:
327.133. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of  this subsection, each school district, other
than an education service district, shall file with the Superintendent of Public Instruction:
[(A) By July 15 of each year, an annual report covering the school year ending on the preceding
June 30; and ]
[(B)] (A) By January 15[ ,] of each year, a December quarterly  report covering the quarter of the
current school year commencing October 1 and ending December 31[ .];
(B) By July 15 of each year, an  annual report covering the school year ending on the
preceding June 30; and
(C) By September 1 of each year, a description of the allocations and expenditures  of
moneys received under ORS 327.006 to 327.133, 327.348, 327.356 to 327.359, 327.731, 328.542 and
530.115 using uniform definitions provided by the uniform budget and accounting system un-
der ORS 327.511.
(b) Pursuant to rules adopted by the State Board  of Education, the Superintendent of Public
Instruction may waive a reporting date or specify an alternative date for  filing a report if a
human-created disaster or a natural disaster affects the ability  of the school district to file a report
by the specified date.
(2) Each such report shall show the average daily membership of  resident pupils of the school
district for the period covered and shall also  contain such other information as the Superintendent
of Public Instruction may require.
(3) The Department of Education shall make information received under  subsection
(1)(a)(C) of this  section available on the department’s website in a manner that makes the
information transparent, uniform and readily accessible.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1079