Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 243.650, as amended by section 1, chapter 84, Oregon Laws 2024, is  amended
to read:
243.650. As used in ORS 243.650 to 243.809, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Appropriate bargaining  unit” means the unit designated by the Employment Relations Board
or voluntarily recognized by the  public employer to be appropriate for collective bargaining. How-
ever, an appropriate bargaining unit may  not include both academically licensed and unlicensed or
nonacademically licensed school employees. Academically licensed units may include but  are not
limited to  teachers, nurses, counselors, therapists, psychologists, child development specialists and
similar positions. This limitation does not apply to any bargaining  unit certified or recognized prior
to June 6, 1995, or to any school district with fewer than 50 employees.
(2) “Board” means the Employment Relations Board.
(3) “Certification” means official recognition by the board that a labor organization is  the ex-
clusive representative for all of the employees in the appropriate bargaining unit.
(4) “Collective bargaining” means the performance of the mutual obligation of  a public employer
and the representative of its employees to meet at  reasonable times and confer in good faith with
respect to employment  relations for the purpose of negotiations concerning mandatory subjects of
bargaining, to meet and confer  in good faith in accordance with law with respect to any dispute
concerning the interpretation or application of a collective bargaining agreement,  and to execute
written contracts incorporating agreements that have been reached on behalf  of the public employer
and the employees in the bargaining unit covered by such negotiations. The obligation  to meet and
negotiate does not compel either party to agree to a proposal  or require the making of a concession.
This subsection may  not be construed to prohibit a public employer and a certified or recognized
representative of its employees from discussing or executing written agreements regarding matters
other than mandatory subjects  of bargaining that are not prohibited by law as long as there is mu-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2092
HB 2866
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tual agreement of the parties to discuss these matters, which are permissive subjects  of bargaining.
(5) “Compulsory arbitration” means the procedure whereby  parties involved in a labor dispute
are required by law to submit their differences to a third party for a final and binding decision.
(6) “Confidential  employee” means one who assists and acts in a confidential capacity to a per-
son who formulates, determines  and effectuates management policies in the area of collective bar-
gaining.
(7)(a) “Employment relations” includes, but is not limited to,  matters concerning direct or indi-
rect monetary benefits, hours, vacations, sick leave, labor  organization access to and communication
with represented employees, grievance procedures and other conditions of employment.
(b) “Employment relations” does not  include subjects determined to be permissive, nonmanda-
tory subjects of bargaining by the Employment Relations Board prior to June 6, 1995.
(c) After June 6, 1995, “employment relations” does not include subjects that  the Employment
Relations Board determines to have a greater impact on management’s prerogative than on employee
wages, hours, or other terms and conditions of employment.
(d) “Employment relations” does not include subjects that have an  insubstantial or de minimis
effect on public employee wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment.
(e) For school district bargaining:
(A) “Employment relations” includes class size and caseload limits  in schools that qualify for
assistance under Title I of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965.
(B) “Employment relations” excludes the school or educational calendar,  standards of perform-
ance or criteria for evaluation of teachers, the school curriculum,  reasonable dress, grooming and
at-work personal conduct requirements respecting smoking, gum chewing and similar matters of
personal conduct, the standards and procedures  for student discipline, the time between student
classes, the selection, agendas and decisions of 21st Century Schools Councils established under ORS
329.704, requirements for expressing milk under  ORS 653.077, and any other subject proposed that
is permissive under paragraphs (b), (c) and (d) of this subsection.
(f) For employee bargaining involving employees covered by ORS 243.736 and employees  of the
Department of Corrections who have direct contact with adults  in custody, “employment relations”
includes safety issues that  have an impact on the on-the-job safety of the employees or staffing levels
that have a significant impact on the on-the-job safety of the employees.
(g) For all other employee bargaining except school district bargaining and except as  provided
in paragraph (f) of this subsection,  “employment relations” excludes staffing levels and safety issues
(except those staffing levels and safety issues that have a direct and substantial effect on the on-
the-job safety of public employees), scheduling of services provided to the  public, determination of
the minimum qualifications necessary for any position, criteria for evaluation or  performance ap-
praisal, assignment of duties, workload when  the effect on duties is insubstantial, reasonable dress,
grooming, and at-work personal conduct requirements respecting smoking, gum chewing, and similar
matters of personal  conduct at work, and any other subject proposed that is permissive under par-
agraphs (b), (c) and (d) of this subsection.
(8) “Exclusive representative” means the  labor organization that, as a result of certification by
the board or recognition by the employer, has the right to be the collective bargaining agent  of all
employees in an appropriate bargaining unit.
(9) “Fact-finding” means identification of  the major issues in a particular labor dispute by one
or more impartial individuals who review the positions of  the parties, resolve factual differences and
make recommendations for settlement of the dispute.
[2]
HB 2866
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(10) “Fair-share agreement”  means an agreement between the public employer and the recog-
nized or certified bargaining representative of public employees whereby employees who are  not
members of the employee organization [ are required to ] may voluntarily consent to  make an in-
lieu-of-dues payment to an employee organization [ except as provided in ORS 243.666. Upon  the filing
with the board  of a petition by 30 percent or more of the employees in an appropriate bargaining unit
covered by such union security agreement declaring they desire that  the agreement be rescinded, the
board shall take a secret ballot of the employees in the unit and certify the results thereof to  the re-
cognized or certified  bargaining representative and to the public employer. Unless a majority of the
votes cast in an election favor the  union security agreement, the board shall certify deauthorization of
the agreement. A petition for deauthorization of a  union security agreement must be filed not more than
90 calendar days after the collective bargaining agreement is  executed. Only one such election may be
conducted in any appropriate bargaining unit during the term of a  collective bargaining agreement
between a public employer and the recognized or certified bargaining representative ].
(11) “Final offer” means the proposed contract language and cost summary submitted to  the
mediator within seven days of the declaration of impasse.
(12) “Labor dispute”  means any controversy concerning employment relations or concerning the
association or representation of persons in negotiating, fixing,  maintaining, changing, or seeking to
arrange terms or conditions of employment relations,  regardless of whether the disputants stand in
the proximate relation of employer and employee.
(13) “Labor organization” means any organization that has as one of its  purposes representing
employees in their employment relations with public employers.
(14) “Last best offer package” means the offer exchanged by parties not less  than 14 days prior
to the date scheduled for an interest arbitration hearing.
(15) “Legislative body” means the Legislative Assembly, the city council, the county  commission
and any other board or commission empowered to levy taxes.
(16) “Managerial employee” means an  employee of the State of Oregon or a public university
listed in ORS 352.002 who possesses authority to formulate and carry  out management decisions or
who represents management’s interest  by taking or effectively recommending discretionary actions
that control or implement  employer policy, and who has discretion in the performance of these
management responsibilities beyond the routine discharge  of duties. A “managerial employee” need
not act in  a supervisory capacity in relation to other employees. Notwithstanding this subsection,
“managerial  employee”  does not include faculty members at a community college, college or uni-
versity.
(17) “Mediation” means assistance by an  impartial third party in reconciling a labor dispute
between the public employer and the exclusive representative regarding employment relations.
(18) “Payment-in-lieu-of-dues” means an  assessment to defray the cost for services by the exclu-
sive representative in negotiations and contract administration of all persons in  an appropriate
bargaining unit who are not members of the organization serving as exclusive representative  of the
employees. The payment must be equivalent to regular  union dues and assessments, if any, or must
be an amount agreed  upon by the public employer and the exclusive representative of the employees.
(19) “Public employee” means an employee of a public employer but does not  include elected
officials, persons appointed to serve on boards or commissions, incarcerated persons working  under
Article I, section 41, of the  Oregon Constitution, or persons who are confidential employees, super-
visory employees or managerial employees.
(20) “Public  employer” means the State of Oregon, and the following political subdivisions:
[3]
HB 2866
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Cities, counties, community  colleges, school districts, special districts, mass transit districts, metro-
politan service districts, public  service corporations or municipal corporations and public and
quasi-public corporations.
(21) “Public employer representative” includes any  individual or individuals specifically desig-
nated by the public employer to act in its interests in all matters dealing with employee  represen-
tation, collective bargaining and related issues.
(22) “Strike” means a public employee’s refusal in concerted action with others to report  for
duty, or his or her willful absence from his or her position, or his or her stoppage of work, or his
or her absence in whole or in part from the full, faithful or proper  performance of his or her duties
of employment, for the purpose of inducing, influencing or coercing  a change in the conditions,
compensation, rights, privileges or obligations of public employment; however,  nothing shall limit
or impair the right of  any public employee to lawfully express or communicate a complaint or
opinion on any matter related to the conditions of employment.
(23)(a) “Supervisory employee” means any individual having authority in the interest of the
employer to hire, transfer, suspend,  lay off, recall, promote, discharge, assign, reward or discipline
other employees, or responsibly to direct them, or to adjust their  grievances, or effectively to re-
commend such action,  if in connection therewith, the exercise of the authority is not of a merely
routine or clerical nature but requires the use of  independent judgment. Failure to assert supervi-
sory status in any Employment Relations Board proceeding or in negotiations for any collective
bargaining agreement does not thereafter prevent assertion of supervisory status in  any subsequent
board proceeding or contract negotiation.
(b) “Supervisory employee” includes:
(A) A faculty member  of a public university listed in ORS 352.002 or the Oregon Health and
Science University who:
(i) Is employed as a president, vice president, provost, vice provost, dean, associate dean,  as-
sistant dean, head or equivalent position; or
(ii) Is employed in an administrative position without a reasonable expectation of teaching,  re-
search or other scholarly accomplishments.
(B) A guard at a correctional institution or mental hospital or a police officer who serves  in the
rank of lieutenant or higher  except for those lieutenant guards or police officers who were included
in an appropriate bargaining unit for purposes of collective bargaining on or before April 4, 2024.
(C) An employee of the Criminal Justice Division of the Department of Justice who  manages
police officers of the division.
(c) “Supervisory employee” does not include:
(A) A nurse, charge nurse  or nurse holding a similar position if that position has not tradi-
tionally been classified as supervisory;
(B) A firefighter or an emergency communications worker prohibited from  striking by ORS
243.736 who assigns, transfers or directs the work of other employees but does  not have the au-
thority to hire, discharge or impose economic discipline on those employees;
(C) A guard at a correctional institution or mental hospital or a police officer who:
(i) Serves in a rank equivalent to or below the rank of sergeant;
(ii) Is prohibited from striking by ORS 243.736; and
(iii) Assigns, transfers or directs  the work of other employees but does not have the authority
to hire, discharge or impose economic discipline on those employees;
(D) A faculty member  of a public university listed in ORS 352.002 or the Oregon Health and
[4]
HB 2866
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Science University who is not a faculty member described in paragraph (b) of this subsection; or
(E) An employee of the Oregon State Police who:
(i) Serves in a rank equivalent to or below the rank of sergeant;
(ii) Is prohibited from striking by ORS 243.736; and
(iii) Assigns, transfers  or directs the work of other employees but does not hire, discharge or
impose economic discipline on those employees.
(24) “Unfair labor practice”  means the commission of an act designated an unfair labor practice
in ORS 243.672.
(25) “Voluntary arbitration” means the procedure whereby parties involved in a  labor dispute
mutually agree to submit their differences to a third party for a final and binding decision.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 243.656 is amended to read:
243.656. The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that:
(1) The people of this state have a fundamental interest in the development  of harmonious and
cooperative relationships between government and its employees;
(2) Recognition by public employers of the right of public employees to organize  and full ac-
ceptance of the  principle and procedure of collective negotiation between public employers and
public employee organizations can alleviate various forms of strife and unrest. Experience in  the
private and public sectors of our economy  has proved that unresolved disputes in the public service
are injurious to the public, the governmental agencies, and public employees;
(3) Experience in private and public employment has also proved that protection by  law of the
right of employees to organize and negotiate collectively safeguards  employees and the public from
injury, impairment and interruptions of  necessary services, and removes certain recognized sources
of strife and unrest, by  encouraging practices fundamental to the peaceful adjustment of disputes
arising out of  differences as to wages, hours, terms and other working conditions, and by establish-
ing greater equality of bargaining power between public employers and public employees;
(4) The state has a basic obligation to protect the public by attempting to  assure the orderly
and uninterrupted operations and functions of government;
(5) It  is in the public interest to ensure that exclusive representatives of public employees are
able to effectively carry out their statutory duties by  having direct access to represented employees,
including communicating with the employees at the workplace or otherwise;
(6) It is the  purpose of ORS 243.650 to 243.809 to prohibit compulsory payments to labor
organizations by employees who  are not members of the labor organization. It is also the
purpose of ORS 243.650 to 243.809 to  obligate public employers, public employees and their  rep-
resentatives to enter into collective negotiations with willingness to resolve  grievances and disputes
relating to employment relations and to enter into written and signed contracts  evidencing agree-
ments resulting from such negotiations. It is also the purpose of ORS 243.650 to 243.809 to promote
the improvement of employer-employee relations within the various public  employers by providing
a uniform  basis for recognizing the right of public employees to join organizations of their own
choice, and to be represented by such organizations in their employment  relations with public em-
ployers; and
(7) Ensuring meaningful communication between labor organizations and  employees increases
the effectiveness of public employees’ work performance.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 243.672 is amended to read:
243.672. (1) It is an unfair labor practice for a  public employer or its designated representative
to do any of the following:
[5]
HB 2866
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Interfere with, restrain or coerce employees in or because of the exercise of  rights guaran-
teed in ORS 243.662.
(b) Dominate, interfere with  or assist in the formation, existence or administration of any em-
ployee organization.
(c) Discriminate in regard to hiring, tenure or any terms or condition of employment for the
purpose of encouraging or discouraging membership in an employee  organization. [ Nothing in this
section is intended to prohibit  the entering into of a fair-share agreement between a public employer
and the exclusive bargaining representative of its employees. If a “fair-share”  agreement has been
agreed to by the public employer and exclusive representative, nothing prohibits the deduction of the
payment-in-lieu-of-dues from the salaries or wages of the employees. ]
(d) Discharge or otherwise  discriminate against an employee because the employee has signed
or filed an affidavit, petition or complaint or has given  information or testimony under ORS 243.650
to 243.809.
(e) Refuse to bargain collectively in good faith with the exclusive representative.
(f) Refuse or fail to comply with any provision of ORS 243.650 to 243.809.
(g) Violate the provisions of any written contract with respect to employment relations including
an agreement to arbitrate or to accept the terms of an arbitration award, where previously  the
parties have agreed to accept arbitration awards as final and binding upon them.
(h) Refuse to reduce an agreement, reached  as a result of collective bargaining, to writing and
sign the resulting contract.
(i) Violate ORS 243.670 (2).
(j) Attempt to influence an  employee to resign from or decline to obtain membership in a labor
organization.
(k) Encourage an employee to revoke an  authorization for the deductions described under ORS
243.806.
(L) Enter into an agreement that requires  employees who are not members of the labor
organization to make payments to the labor organization.
(2) Subject to the limitations set forth in this subsection, it is an unfair labor practice for  a
public employee or for a labor organization or its designated representative  to do any of the fol-
lowing:
(a) Interfere with, restrain or coerce any employee in or because of the exercise of any  right
guaranteed under ORS 243.650 to 243.809.
(b) Refuse  to bargain collectively in good faith with the public employer if the labor organization
is an exclusive representative.
(c) Refuse or fail to comply with any provision of ORS 243.650 to 243.809.
(d) Violate the provisions  of any written contract with respect to employment relations, includ-
ing an agreement to arbitrate or to accept the terms of an arbitration award, where previously  the
parties have agreed to accept arbitration awards as final and binding upon them.
(e) Refuse to reduce an agreement, reached as a result of collective  bargaining, to writing and
sign the resulting contract.
(3) It is  an unfair labor practice for any labor organization to engage in unconventional strike
activity not protected for  private sector employees under the National Labor Relations Act on June
6, 1995. This provision applies to sitdown, slowdown, rolling, intermittent or  on-and-off again strikes.
(4) It is an unfair labor practice for  a labor organization or its agents to picket or cause, induce,
or encourage to be picketed, or threaten to  engage in such activity, at the residence or business
[6]
HB 2866
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
premises of any individual who is  a member of the governing body of a public employer, with respect
to a dispute over a collective bargaining agreement  or negotiations over employment relations, if
an objective or effect of such picketing is to induce another person to cease doing business  with the
governing body member’s business or to cease handling, transporting or dealing in goods  or services
produced at the governing body’s business. For purposes  of this subsection, a member of the Legis-
lative Assembly is a member of the governing body of a public employer when the collective bar-
gaining negotiation or dispute is between the State of Oregon  and a labor organization. The
Governor and other statewide elected officials are not considered members of  a governing body for
purposes of this subsection. Nothing in this subsection may be  interpreted or applied in a manner
that violates the right of free speech and assembly as protected  by the Constitution of the United
States or the Constitution of the State of Oregon.
(5) It is not an unfair  labor practice or a violation of subsection (2)(a) of this section for the
exclusive representative of an appropriate bargaining unit to charge the following  employees in the
unit reasonable  fees and costs for representation that are unrelated to the negotiation of a collective
bargaining agreement, provided that  the employees are not members of the labor organization that
is the exclusive representative and have not voluntarily entered into a fair-share agreement:
(a) A police officer of a city or municipal police department;
(b) A sheriff or deputy sheriff;
(c) A police officer commissioned by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125;
(d) An employee of the Department of Corrections or of Oregon Corrections Enterprises; or
(e) A parole or probation officer who supervises adult offenders.
(6) It is not an unfair labor practice or a violation of subsection (2)(a) of this  section for
a labor organization to enter into an  agreement whereby employees who are not members
of the labor organization may voluntarily consent to pay payment-in-lieu-of-dues to the  labor
organization to resolve grievances and disputes in employment relations.
[(6)] (7) An injured party  may file a written complaint with the Employment Relations Board
not later than 180 days following the occurrence of  an unfair labor practice. For each unfair labor
practice complaint filed,  a fee of $300 is imposed. For each answer to an unfair labor practice
complaint filed with the board, a fee of $300 is imposed. The board may allow any  other person to
intervene in the proceeding and to present  testimony. A person allowed to intervene shall pay a fee
of $300 to the board. The board may, in  its discretion, order fee reimbursement to the prevailing
party in any case in which the complaint or answer  is found to have been frivolous or filed in bad
faith. The board shall deposit  fees received under this section to the credit of the Employment Re-
lations Board Administrative Account.
[7]