Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Tax Competitiveness is established.
(2) The task force consists of 13 voting members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint two members from  among members of the
Senate, with one member from each of the two largest  caucuses among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives  shall appoint two members from among
members of the House of  Representatives, with one member from each of the two largest
caucuses among members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint nine members as follows:
(A) Two members representing tax practitioners;
(B) Two members representing taxpayers;
(C) Two members representing the Department of Revenue;
(D) One member representing chambers of commerce;
(E) One member representing the League of Oregon Cities; and
(F) One members representing the Association of Oregon Counties.
(3) The task force shall evaluate Oregon’s tax competitiveness  and shall make recom-
mendations for  changes to tax law intended to promote a healthy climate for business and
support Oregon in competing  with other states for employment positions and capital invest-
ments.
(4) All appointments to the task force made under subsection (2) of this section must  be
completed by the  later of 60 days after adjournment sine die of the 2025 regular session of
the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly or September 1, 2025.
(5) The task force may consult with experts, hear testimony  from affected persons and
collect data and information necessary to carry out the task force’s duties.
(6) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2174
HB 2111
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
of business.
(7) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the members
of the task force.
(8) The President of the Senate and the Speaker  of the House of Representatives shall
select one member of the task force  to serve as chairperson and another to serve as vice
chairperson, with the duties and powers necessary for the performance of the functions  of
the offices as the President and the Speaker determine.
(9) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(10) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(11) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(12) The task force shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to an interim committee  of the Legislative
Assembly related to revenue no later than December 1, 2026.
(13) The Legislative Revenue Officer shall provide staff support to the task force.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]