Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 5 of this 2023  Act are added to and made a part of ORS 448.115
to 448.285.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 2 to 5 of this 2023 Act:
(1) “Community benefiting water infrastructure project” means one or more  water
infrastructure projects that provide a direct benefit  to a particular community in the form
of improved drinking water quality and confidence, improved access to water, increased  local
jobs or increased water affordability and efficiency.
(2) “Nonprofit organization” means a nonprofit organization that:
(a) Provides housing;
(b) Provides weatherization or healthy homes services;
(c) Supports water efficiency or affordability; or
(d) Supports community engagement relating to water quality.
(3) “Planning costs” means the costs  related to planning paid by an applicant described
under section 3 of this 2023 Act.
(4) “Project  cost” means the actual cost of the acquisition, construction and installation
of a  community benefiting water infrastructure project incurred by an applicant described
under section 3 of this 2023 Act.
(5) “Public body” means a public body as defined in ORS 174.109.
(6) “Qualifying community” means  a community that qualifies as an environmental jus-
tice community as defined in ORS 469A.400.
(7) “Water infrastructure project” means a project to improve or expand:
(a) An existing drinking or wastewater system including systems for reuse;
(b) Water infrastructure in a building, including systems for water reuse;
(c) Efficiency and management of water use or delivery;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2166
HB 2988
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Natural infrastructure for healthy ecosystems; or
(e) A partnership between upstream and downstream communities.
(8) “Watershed council” has the meaning given that term in ORS 541.890.
(9) “Water utility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 758.300.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Community Benefiting Water  Infrastructure Investment Program is
established for the purpose of:
(a) Offsetting the cost of planning and developing  community benefiting water
infrastructure projects;
(b) Making community benefiting water infrastructure projects  economically feasible for
qualifying communities;
(c) Promoting small-scale community benefiting water infrastructure projects; and
(d) Providing direct benefits to communities across this state in the form  of improved
drinking water quality and confidence,  improved access to water, increased local jobs and
increased water affordability and efficiency.
(2)(a) A federally recognized Oregon Indian tribe, public  body, water utility, nonprofit
organization, community development financial institution certified by the Community  De-
velopment Financial Institutions Fund at the United  States Department of the Treasury or
watershed council may submit to the Oregon Business Development Department  an applica-
tion for grant moneys from the Community Benefiting  Water Infrastructure Investment
Fund established under section 6 of this 2023 Act for the  purpose of planning or developing
a community benefiting water infrastructure project.
(b) An applicant may partner with a federally  recognized Oregon Indian tribe, public
body, water  utility, nonprofit organization, community development financial institution
certified by the Community  Development Financial Institutions Fund at the United States
Department of the Treasury or watershed council, but a grant for  an approved application
will only be awarded and released to an applicant that is a federally recognized Oregon Indian
tribe, public body or water  utility. Any federally recognized Oregon Indian tribe, public body,
nonprofit organization, private business or owner  of rental property that partners with the
applicant must be listed in the application.
(3) An  application for a grant for planning a community benefiting water infrastructure
project must demonstrate that the planning:
(a) Will be  completed within six months of execution of the performance agreement or
a reasonable time frame if good cause to extend the deadline is demonstrated  as determined
by rule;
(b) Will result in a  proposal for developing a community benefiting water infrastructure
project; and
(c) Incorporates feedback from:
(A) Members of qualifying communities served by the community benefiting  water
infrastructure project;
(B) Businesses located in the communities  served by the community benefiting water
infrastructure project;
(C) Water utilities that have customers in the communities served by  the community
benefiting water infrastructure project; and
(D) Other regional stakeholders.
(4)(a) An application for a grant for developing a community  benefiting water
[2]
HB 2988
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
infrastructure project must be on a form prescribed by the Oregon  Business Development
Department and contain:
(A) A detailed description of the project’s systems and the systems’ operation;
(B) Information showing that  the project’s systems will operate as represented in the
application and remain in operation for  at least a period of time established by the Director
of the Oregon Business Development Department by rule;
(C) The anticipated total project cost;
(D) Information on the number and types of jobs directly connected  to the awarding of
the grant that will be:
(i) Created by the project; and
(ii) Sustained throughout construction, installation and operation of the project;
(E) Information demonstrating that the project will  comply with applicable state and lo-
cal laws and regulations and obtain required licenses and permits; and
(F) Any other  information the director considers necessary to determine whether the
project is in compliance with sections 2 to 5 of this 2023 Act and any applicable rules or
standards adopted thereunder.
(b) An application for developing a  community benefiting water infrastructure project
must demonstrate that the project:
(A) Will begin construction  within 12 months of execution of the performance agreement
and be completed within 36 months of execution of the performance agreement or  a reason-
able time frame if good cause to extend the deadline is demonstrated as determined by  rule;
(B) Results in improved drinking water quality and confidence,  improved access to water,
increased local jobs or increased water affordability and efficiency;
(C) Complies with applicable state and local laws and regulations and has the  required
licenses and permits; and
(D) Will operate for at least a period of time established by the director by rule.
(5) Upon receipt of an application submitted under this section, the department shall re-
view and determine whether the applicant is eligible to receive a grant  from the Community
Benefiting Water Infrastructure Investment Program established under  this section. The
department may approve an application if the department finds that:
(a) The planning or development proposal meets the requirements listed in subsection (3)
or (4) of this section;
(b) The proposal meets the standards described in subsection (7) of this section;
(c) The proposal meets any standards adopted by rule under subsection (8) of this section;
(d) The proposal is technically feasible; and
(e) Any federally recognized Oregon Indian tribe, public  body, nonprofit organization,
private business  or owner of rental property partnered with the applicant is listed in the
application.
(6) If the department approves  an application under this section, the department and the
applicant may enter into a performance agreement  that meets the requirements set forth in
section 4 of this 2023 Act.
(7) In approving applications and awarding grant moneys,  the department shall prioritize
planning and development proposals that:
(a) Are for projects located in qualifying communities across the state.
(b) When applicable, are for projects constructed in part or in whole  by disadvantaged
[3]
HB 2988
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
business enterprises, emerging small businesses or businesses that are owned by  minorities,
women or disabled veterans.
(c) Include inclusive hiring and promotion policies for workers working on the projects.
(d) Incorporate equity metrics developed in coordination with the Environmental Justice
Council established by ORS 182.538 for evaluating the involvement of and leadership by people
of low income, Black, Indigenous or People of  Color, members of tribal communities, people
with disabilities, youth, people from  rural communities and people from otherwise disadvan-
taged communities  in the siting, planning, designing or evaluating of the proposed commu-
nity benefitting water infrastructure projects.
(e) Help the applicants achieve goals included in the applicants’ natural hazard mitigation
plans as approved by the Federal Emergency Management Agency.
(f) Ensure resilience and reliability for water systems in the event of a natural  disaster
or other potential disruption in access.
(g) Are unlikely to adversely affect water quality and water supply and do  not interfere
with access or availability of existing water rights, including in-stream water rights.
(h) Combine multiple water infrastructure projects or approaches through a  systems
approach that helps to achieve multiple benefits.
(i) Are for projects that are not receiving or cannot receive other state funding.
(8) The department shall adopt rules to carry out sections 2 to 5  of this 2023 Act. The
rules must:
(a) Define the planning  and project costs eligible to be covered by a grant provided under
this section.
(b) Adopt a methodology to identify qualifying communities and assess  the geographic
diversity of the approved planning and development projects  compared with the other plan-
ning and development project applications for  which grants have been requested in each op-
portunity announcement.
(c) Establish guidelines for significant, unforeseeable or uncontrollable delays  that will
constitute good cause for extending the time lines agreed upon in performance agreements.
(9) The department may adopt rules  capping the amount of grant funds that may be paid
to individual consultants and contractors if the department finds such limitations necessary
to ensure broad distribution of  funds and opportunity for emerging small businesses as de-
fined in ORS 200.005.
SECTION 4.
(1)(a) A performance agreement  for planning a community benefiting water
infrastructure project entered into between the Oregon  Business Development Department
and an applicant under section 3 (6) of this 2023 Act must provide, at a minimum:
(A) A grant in an amount described  in paragraph (b) of this subsection that covers up
to 100 percent of the reasonable planning costs including, but not limited to,  costs associated
with:
(i) Consulting fees.
(ii) Water balance models, groundwater testing, streamflow analysis or  information
gathering about water quality or availability.
(iii) Siting, excluding property acquisition.
(iv) Ensuring code compliance.
(v) Infrastructure associated with connecting to existing water systems.
(vi) Other reasonable expenditures made in  the community benefiting water
[4]
HB 2988
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
infrastructure project planning process as determined by the department by rule.
(B) A grant may not be used to cover any fixed costs the applicant would  incur in the
applicant’s normal course of business such as existing staff salaries or overhead costs.
(C) The department may recover grant moneys if a project  fails to abide by the per-
formance agreement or if planning is not completed within six  months of execution of the
performance agreement or a reasonable time frame if good cause to extend  the deadline is
demonstrated as determined by rule.
(b) The department may establish differing limits on the maximum amount  of grants for
planning community benefiting water infrastructure  projects based on the scope and attri-
butes of the planning applications not to exceed an amount of $100,000 per grant.
(2) A performance  agreement for developing a community benefiting water infrastructure
project entered into between the Oregon Business  Development Department and an applicant
under section 3 (6) of this 2023 Act must provide, at a minimum:
(a) For a community benefiting water infrastructure  project that qualifies as a project
that ensures resilience and reliability for water  systems in the event of a natural disaster
or other potential disruption  in access, a grant that covers up to 100 percent of the project
cost not to exceed $2 million. The  department shall reduce the grant amount, if the grant
combined with other incentives and grants received by the applicant exceeds 100  percent of
the total costs associated with the project.
(b) For a community benefiting water  infrastructure project that does not qualify as a
project that ensures resilience and reliability for water  systems in the event of a natural
disaster or other potential disruption in access, a grant that covers up to 50 percent  of the
project cost not to  exceed $1 million. The department shall reduce the grant amount, if the
grant combined with  other incentives and grants received by the applicant exceeds 100 per-
cent of the total costs associated with the project.
(3) The  department shall gather information from grantees necessary to evaluate indi-
cators of success as determined by rule.
SECTION 5.
The Director of the Oregon Business Development Department  may appoint
an Advisory Committee  on Community Renewable Investment to provide consultation on the
implementation of sections 2 to 5 of  this 2023 Act. A committee appointed under this section
shall consist of:
(1) A member of the Environmental Justice Council;
(2) A representative of the Oregon Health Authority;
(3) A representative of the Department of Environmental Quality;
(4) A representative of the Water Resources Department;
(5) A representative of the Watershed Enhancement Board;
(6) A representative of water utilities;
(7) A representative of small community water systems;
(8) A representative of watershed councils;
(9) A representative of irrigation districts;
(10) A representative of an organization that represents water users;
(11) A representative of an organization that represents water conservation;
(12) A representative of an organization that engages in water efficiency or reuse;
(13) A representative of a federally recognized Oregon Indian tribe;
(14) Representatives of local  government to represent the interests of counties, cities and
[5]
HB 2988
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
special districts;
(15) Representatives of nongovernmental  organizations that represent communities of
low income or disadvantaged households; and
(16) Representatives from relevant state and federal emergency management or  response
agencies.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Community  Benefiting Water Infrastructure Investment Fund is
established in the State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest
earned by the Community Benefiting Water Infrastructure Investment Fund shall be cred-
ited to the fund. The fund consists of:
(a) Moneys  appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assem-
bly;
(b) Moneys received from federal, state or local sources;
(c) Gifts, grants or other moneys contributed to the fund; and
(d) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Oregon Business Develop-
ment Department for the  purpose of providing grants to applicants approved under section
3 of this 2023 Act.
(3) The  department may use reasonable amounts from the fund necessary, but no more
than 10 percent of the fund, to administer the Community  Benefiting Water Infrastructure
Investment Program described in section 3 of this 2023 Act.
(4) The Director of the Oregon Business  Development Department shall submit a biennial
report to the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided by  ORS 293.640 regarding the
expenditures of moneys deposited in the Community  Benefiting Water Infrastructure In-
vestment Fund and status of ongoing projects funded by the moneys,  including but not lim-
ited indicators of program success.
(5) Upon the expenditure of all grant moneys in the Community  Benefiting Water
Infrastructure Investment Fund or four years from the effective date of  this 2023 Act,
whichever occurs earlier, the director  shall submit a report to the Legislative Assembly re-
garding the  expenditures of moneys deposited in the Community Benefiting Water
Infrastructure Investment Fund and status of ongoing  projects that have received moneys
from the fund, including but not limited to indicators of program success.
SECTION 7.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon  Business Development Department, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2023, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $_______, for deposit into the Community Ben-
efiting Water Infrastructure Investment Fund established in section 6 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 8. (1) Sections 2 to 5 of this 2023 Act become operative on January 1, 2024.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department may take any action before the  oper-
ative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is  necessary to enable the depart-
ment to exercise, on or after the operative  date specified in subsection (1) of this section,
all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the department by sections 2 to 5 of  this
2023 Act.
SECTION 9. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[6]