Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 442.
SECTION 2. (1) A hospital licensed in this state shall  report the information prescribed
by subsection (2) of this section to  the Oregon Health Authority in the form and manner
prescribed by the authority.
(2)(a) On a quarterly basis, a hospital shall report its cash on hand. Cash on  hand is
calculated as total assets available for  general expenditures for the previous completed four
calendar quarters divided by the daily operating expenses during the same period.
(b) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Assets” means cash and cash equivalents such as securities.
(B) “Daily operating  expenses” means a hospital’s total operating expenses for the pre-
vious completed four calendar quarters divided by 365.25.
(3) The authority shall adopt rules  necessary to carry out the provisions of this section,
including but not limited  to civil penalties that may be imposed in accordance with ORS
183.745 for a hospital’s failure to comply with the requirements of this section.
(4) The information that must be reported to the authority under this section  is in ad-
dition to and not in lieu of the reporting requirements in ORS 442.386  or 442.425 or other
similar provisions.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1865