Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of  Human Services shall study and evaluate possible
approaches to increasing access  to long term care throughout this state. Based on the
department’s study and  evaluation, the department shall develop recommendations for leg-
islative concepts to increase access to long term care  for all Oregonians and particularly to
Oregonians in rural areas of this state and to medically underserved populations.
(2) No later than September  15, 2022, the department shall report its recommendations,
in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the interim  committees of the Legislative As-
sembly related to health.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1663