Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission, for distribution to the Knight Cam-
pus Graduate Internship Program at the University of Oregon, for  the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $2,392,500. Moneys distributed under this
section must be used to:
(1) Provide student access to modern semiconductor equipment;
(2) Expand staff;
(3) Provide student scholarships;
(4) Establish a student success advocate for priority populations; and
(5) Host an Inclusion Symposium for the purpose  of building community amongst priority
populations within the semiconductor industry.
SECTION 2.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1197