Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Definitions. As used in sections 1 to 5 of this 2024 Act:
(1) “Local correctional facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 169.005.
(2) “Tribal correctional  facility” means a jail or prison in Oregon that is operated by a
federally recognized tribe and confines persons for more than 36 hours.
SECTION 2.
Establishment of grant program; purpose; agency collaboration. (1) The
Oregon Jail-Based Medications for Opioid Use Disorder Grant Program is established  in the
Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  to provide opioid use disorder treatment and transition
planning services to persons in custody in local correctional facilities and  tribal correctional
facilities.
(2) The commission, in collaboration with the Oregon Health Authority,  shall administer
the grant program. At minimum, the commission and authority shall  collaborate to provide
grant recipients support with technical assistance and best practices.
SECTION 3. Program eligibility; mandatory rural and tribal set-aside; authority to con-
tract with third  party for technical assistance. (1) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission
shall award grants to cities and counties in Oregon that operate  a local correctional facility
and to federally recognized tribes in Oregon that operate a tribal correctional facility.
(2) Applicants may submit  an individual application or a joint application in partnership
with other local correctional facilities or tribal correctional facilities.
(3) At least 10 percent of total moneys awarded to grant recipients must be  awarded to
local correctional facilities in rural areas, as  defined by the commission by rule, or tribal
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 100
HB 4120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
correctional facilities. If  any amount of the 10 percent is not awarded during an initial ap-
plication cycle, the remaining amount may be awarded  to any otherwise eligible local
correctional facility or tribal correctional facility under a supplemental application cycle.
(4) The  commission may enter a contract with a third party to provide statewide tech-
nical assistance to grant recipients.
(5) The commission shall consider geographic equity when awarding grant funds.
SECTION 4.
Allowable uses. Moneys awarded to grant recipients under section 3 of  this
2024 Act may be used to:
(1) Provide medication,  telemedicine or any other reasonable treatment to persons in
custody with an opioid use disorder.
(2) Develop or operate mobile or nonmobile opioid treatment units.
(3) Administer screenings for opioid use disorder or risk of acute withdrawal.
(4) Facilitate transition planning services for persons in custody who seek or receive
opioid use disorder treatment.
(5) Undertake any other actions reasonably calculated to mitigate operational or struc-
tural barriers to providing opioid use disorder treatment in local  correctional facilities or
tribal correctional facilities, including  but not limited to mitigating any lack of secure stor-
age for medication.
SECTION 5.
Rules. The commission shall adopt  rules necessary to administer sections 1
to 5 of this 2024 Act. The rules, at minimum, must:
(1) Establish a methodology for reviewing and  approving grant applications and awarding
grants.
(2) Require applicants to  submit a statement acknowledging that any grant funds re-
ceived must be expended in accordance with the allowable uses described in  section 4 of this
2024 Act.
(3) Require  applicants to submit a letter of commitment from each administrator of a
local correctional facility or tribal correctional facility, who  is associated with the applica-
tion, committing to participate in good faith in the grant program.
(4) Define “rural” for purposes of section 3 (3) of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 6.
Grant advisory committee. (1) The commission shall convene  an advisory
committee to evaluate applications and make recommendations to the commission for  the
awarding of grants under section 3 of this 2024 Act.
(2) The chairperson of the commission shall exercise  discretion to appoint members to
serve on the advisory committee.
SECTION 7. The Oregon Jail-Based Medications for Opioid Use Disorder Fund. (1) The
Oregon Jail-Based Medications for Opioid Use Disorder  Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.  Interest earned by the Oregon Jail-
Based Medications for Opioid Use Disorder Fund shall be credited to the fund. The fund
consists of moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to  the fund by the Legislative As-
sembly.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon  Criminal Justice
Commission for the purposes of carrying out sections 1 to 5 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 8.
Legislative report. No later than December 1, 2024, the  commission shall
submit a report, in the manner provided  in ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary and health care. The report must include:
[2]
HB 4120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
(1) The name of each recipient of a  grant under section 3 of this 2024 Act and the amount
of moneys each grant recipient has received to date.
(2) Opportunities, if any, for local correctional facilities or tribal correctional  facilities
to obtain medications for opioid use disorder from state agencies.
(3) Any other information relevant to the provision of opioid use disorder  treatment to
persons in custody in local correctional facilities or tribal correctional facilities.
SECTION 9.
Repeal. Section 8 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 10. Appropriation. In addition to and not in lieu  of any other appropriation,
there is appropriated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the biennium  ending
June 30, 2025,  out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000 for deposit in the Oregon
Jail-Based Medications for Opioid Use Disorder Fund established under section  7 of this 2024
Act.
SECTION 11. Captions. The section captions used in this 2024  Act are provided only for
the convenience of the reader and  do not become part of the statutory law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 12. Effective date. This 2024 Act being  necessary for the immediate preserva-
tion of  the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2024
Act takes effect on its passage.
[3]