Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1)(a) The Department of Public Safety Standards and Training  shall study
fire service professional training standards.
(b) In conducting the study, the department shall consider standards developed  by the
National Fire Protection Association for the organization and deployment to the public of fire
suppression operations, emergency medical operations and  special operations by career and
volunteer fire departments.
(2) The department shall submit  its findings in a report in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may  include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to emergency management no later than September  15, 2026.
The report shall include, but need not be limited to:
(a) Recommendations for modifications to existing  standards based on the standards de-
scribed in subsection (1)(b) of this section; and
(b) Guidance to fire departments for implementing the standards  described in subsection
(1)(b) of this section.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3355