Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated out of the General Fund, for the biennium ending June 30,  2021, for deposit into the
Oregon Ocean Science Fund to be expended by the  Oregon Ocean Science Trust, in consul-
tation with the Oregon Coordinating Council on Ocean Acidification  and Hypoxia, in the form
of competitive grants, the following amounts:
(1) $100,000 for intertidal ocean acidification and hypoxia monitoring at Oregon marine
reserves;
(2) $300,000 for subtidal ocean acidification and hypoxia monitoring at Oregon marine
reserves;
(3) $100,000 for ocean acidification and hypoxia monitoring at Yaquina Bay;
(4) $140,000 for ecosystem modeling of submerged aquatic vegetation;
(5) $25,000 to develop recommendations, through workshops or seminars, for  maximizing
the abundance of wild shellfish, cultured shellfish and submerged aquatic vegetation in
estuaries in Oregon;
(6) $150,000 to develop best management practices for conducting shellfish cultivation in
a manner that protects or promotes estuarine health;
(7) $180,000 to fund a study on the life cycle impacts of ocean acidification and  hypoxia
on shellfish species that are of importance to Oregon; and
(8) $65,000 to develop a communications plan and strategy for  outreach and education on
ocean acidification and hypoxia impacts, science and solutions.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated out of the General Fund, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, to the State Department
of Fish and Wildlife:
(1) $420,000 for the shellfish and estuarine assessment of coastal Oregon project;
(2) $50,000 to  conduct estuary mapping for long-term documentation of ocean
acidification and hypoxia impacts;
(3) $90,000 to support interim monitoring during the report  and evaluation of marine re-
serves as described in ORS 196.540 and 196.545; and
(4) $250,000 to support the scientific  and technical advisory committee of the Ocean Pol-
icy Advisory Council to contract with a university to research and prepare the reports  re-
quired under section 4, chapter 27, Oregon Laws 2012.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission, for distribution to Oregon State
University, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, out of the General Fund:
(1) $170,000 to support the Molluscan Broodstock Program at the Hatfield Marine  Science
Center in conjunction with the Whiskey Creek Shellfish Hatchery;
(2) $100,000 to support the work of the Cooperative Institute for Marine Resources
[2]
SB 1554
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
Studies in augmentation of sampling along the Newport Hydrographic Line  in order to sup-
port research on ocean acidification and hypoxia; and
(3) $100,000 to support the  work of the College of Earth, Ocean, and Atmospheric Sci-
ences in monitoring for ocean acidification using Burke-O-Lator systems.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending June 30,
2021, out of the General  Fund, $250,000 for distribution to the Oregon Coast Aquarium for
ocean-related educational programs.
SECTION 5. This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]