Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 418.258 is amended to read:
418.258. (1) When  the Department of Human Services becomes aware of a report of suspected
child abuse of a child in care, whether in the form of an  allegation, complaint or formal report made
under this section,  and whether made directly to the Director of Human Services, the department
or an  employee of the department, to a hotline operated by the department, through the mandatory
abuse reporting process set forth in ORS 419B.005 to 419B.050 or otherwise, the department shall
immediately:
(a) Notify  appropriate personnel within the department, including but not limited to employees
responsible for licensing, certifying or authorizing child-caring agencies, certified foster homes and
developmental disabilities residential facilities.
(b) Notify any  governmental agency that has a contract with the child-caring agency, certified
foster home or developmental disabilities residential facility to  provide care or services to the child
in care.
(c) Notify  the placement authorities of any other state that retains jurisdiction over a child in
care receiving care or services from  the child-caring agency, certified foster home or developmental
disabilities residential facility.
(d) Commence an investigation to determine  whether the report of suspected abuse is substan-
tiated, unsubstantiated or inconclusive under ORS 418.259 if:
(A) The reported abuse occurred in this state;
(B) The reported abuse occurred in any other state and involves a child in care placed by  the
department in an out-of-state child-caring agency; or
(C) The reported abuse occurred in any other state and the department reasonably believes that
the reported abuse poses a danger to the health, safety or wellness of a child in  care placed by the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2057
HB 3333
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
department in an out-of-state child-caring agency.
(e) Report to a law enforcement agency any  crime that the department has reason to believe
has occurred with respect to a child in care or at a child-caring agency, proctor  foster home, cer-
tified foster  home or developmental disabilities residential facility even if the suspected crime is not
related to a report of abuse made under this section.
(2)(a) If after screening  or during the course of investigating a report of suspected child
abuse of  a child in care the department determines that the incident meets the criteria de-
scribed in ORS 418.259 (1)(b)(B), the department  may require the child-caring agency, proctor
foster home, certified foster home or developmental disabilities residential facility to  submit
a corrective action plan.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (1)(d) of this section, if the department requires a child-
caring agency, proctor  foster home, certified foster home or developmental disabilities resi-
dential facility to submit a corrective  action plan under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the
department is not required to commence or continue an investigation  regarding the sus-
pected child abuse.
[(2)(a)] (3)(a)  As a condition for issuance or renewal of a  license, certificate or authorization to
a child-caring agency, certified foster home or developmental disabilities residential facility, the de-
partment shall require and verify  that the child-caring agency, certified foster home or develop-
mental disabilities residential facility has procedures and protocols that:
(A) Require employees of the child-caring agency, a proctor foster home certified  by the child-
caring  agency,  the certified foster home or the developmental disabilities residential facility to im-
mediately report  suspected abuse of a child in care to the director, the director’s designee or
personnel within the department who have been specifically designated to receive reports  of abuse
of children in care;
(B) Mandate that the child-caring agency, certified foster home  or developmental disabilities
residential facility provide an annual training  and written materials that include information about
the child abuse reporting hotline, and that the agency, home or facility advise and  educate employ-
ees of  the child-caring agency and any proctor foster home certified by the child-caring agency, of
the certified  foster home or of the developmental disabilities residential facility of the duty under
this section and ORS 419B.005 to 419B.050 to report abuse of a child in care; and
(C) Inform employees  of child-caring agencies, proctor foster homes, certified foster homes and
developmental disabilities residential facilities that  the duty to report abuse of a child in care is
personal to the employee and that the duty is not fulfilled by reporting the abuse to the owner, op-
erator or any other employee of the child-caring  agency, proctor foster home, certified foster home
or developmental  disabilities residential facility even if the owner, operator or other employee re-
ports the abuse of a child in care to the director, the director’s designee or the department.
(b) A child-caring agency, certified  foster home or developmental disabilities residential facility
need not develop and maintain procedures and protocols or provide an  annual training and written
materials under paragraph (a) of this  subsection if the agency, home or facility does not have any
employees, staff or volunteers.
[(3)] (4) Interference or hindering an investigation of abuse of a child  in care, including but not
limited to the intimidation of witnesses, falsification of records or denial or limitation of  interviews
with the child  in care who is the subject of the investigation or with witnesses, may constitute
grounds for the revocation, suspension or placing  of conditions on the license, certificate or other
authorization of a child-caring agency, proctor foster home, certified foster home or  developmental
[2]
HB 3333
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
disabilities residential facility.
[(4)(a)] (5)(a)  Anyone,  including but not limited to an employee of a child-caring agency, proctor
foster home, certified foster home or developmental disabilities residential facility, who makes a re-
port of suspected abuse of a child in care to the Governor, the Department of Justice, the Director
of Human Services, the director’s designee or the  department under this section in good faith and
who has reasonable grounds for the making of the report shall have immunity:
(A) From any liability, civil or criminal, that  might otherwise be incurred or imposed with re-
spect to the making or content of such report;
(B) From disciplinary action taken by the person’s employer; and
(C) With  respect to participating in any judicial proceeding resulting from or involving the re-
port.
(b) A person  making a report under this section may include references to otherwise confidential
information  for  the sole purpose of making the report, and any such disclosure must be protected
from further disclosure to other persons or entities  for any other purpose not related to the making
of the report.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 418.259 is amended to read:
418.259. (1) The investigation conducted by  the Department of Human Services under ORS
418.258 must result in one of the following findings:
(a) That the report is substantiated. Except as provided in paragraph  (b)(B) of this sub-
section, a report is substantiated when there is reasonable cause to believe that the abuse of a child
in care occurred.
(b) That the report is unsubstantiated. A report is unsubstantiated when :
(A) There is no evidence that the abuse of a child in care occurred[ .]; or
(B)(i) There is evidence that the abuse  of a child in care occurred but the child in care
was unharmed or the harm to the child in care was not significant;
(ii) There is no evidence of intent to cause harm to the child in care; and
(iii) The behavior that resulted in the report of abuse was  reasonably necessary to pro-
tect the child in care or others from  greater harm or was due to human error or a doc-
umentation error or omission.
(c) That the report is inconclusive. Except as provided in  paragraph (b)(B) of this sub-
section, a report is inconclusive when there  is some indication that the abuse occurred but there
is insufficient evidence to conclude that there is reasonable cause to believe that the abuse  oc-
curred.
(2) When a report is received under ORS 418.258 alleging that a child in  care may have been
subjected  to  abuse, the department shall notify the case managers for the child, the attorney for the
child, the child’s court appointed special advocate, the parents or guardians of the child, any  attor-
ney representing a parent or guardian of the child  and any governmental agency that has a contract
with the child-caring agency or developmental disabilities residential facility to provide care  or
services to the child that a report has been received.
(3)(a) The department may interview the child in care who is the subject of suspected abuse  and
any witnesses, including other children, without the presence of employees of the  child-caring
agency,  proctor  foster home or developmental disabilities residential facility, the provider of services
at a certified foster home or department personnel. The department shall inform  the child in care
that the child may have the child’s parent or guardian, if the child has not been committed to the
custody of the department or  the Oregon Youth Authority, or attorney present when participating
[3]
HB 3333
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in an interview conducted in the course of an abuse investigation.
(b) When investigating an allegation of inappropriate use of restraint or involuntary  seclusion,
the department shall:
(A) Conduct the interviews described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(B) Review all relevant incident reports related to the child in care  and other reports related
to the restraint or involuntary seclusion of the child in care;
(C) Review any audio, video or photographic recordings of the restraint or involuntary seclusion,
including the circumstances immediately before and following the incident;
(D) During an interview with the child in care  who is the subject of the suspected abuse, ask
the child about whether they experienced any  reportable injury or pain as a result of the restraint
or involuntary seclusion;
(E) Review the training records related to all of the  individuals who were involved in the use
of restraint or involuntary seclusion; and
(F) Make all reasonable efforts to conduct trauma-informed interviews  of each child witness,
including the child in care who is the subject of suspected abuse unless the investigator makes a
specific determination that the interview may significantly traumatize the child and  is not in the
best interests of the child.
(4) The department shall notify the following when a report of abuse is substantiated:
(a) The Director of Human Services.
(b) Personnel in  the department responsible for the licensing, certificate or authorization of
child-caring agencies.
(c) The department’s lead personnel in that  part of the department that is responsible for child
welfare generally.
(d) With respect to the child in care who is  the subject of the abuse report and investigation,
the case managers for the child, the attorney for the  child, the child’s court appointed special ad-
vocate, the parents or guardians of the  child, any attorney representing a parent or guardian of the
child and any governmental agency that has a contract with the child-caring agency to  provide care
or services to the child.
(e) The parents or guardians of the child in care who is the subject of the abuse report and  in-
vestigation if the child in care has not  been committed to the custody of the department or the
youth authority. Notification under this paragraph  may not include any details or information other
than that a report of abuse has been substantiated.
(f) Any governmental agency that has a  contract with the child-caring agency to provide care
or services to a child in care.
(g) The local citizen review board established by the Judicial Department under ORS 419A.090.
(5) The department shall report on a quarterly basis to the  interim legislative committees on
child welfare for the  purposes of public review and oversight of the quality and safety of child-caring
agencies, certified foster homes and developmental disabilities  residential facilities that are licensed,
certified or authorized by the department in this state and of proctor foster homes that are certified
by the child-caring agencies. Information provided in reports under this subsection may not  contain
the name or any identifying information of a child in care but must contain all of the following:
(a) The name of any  child-caring agency, including an out-of-state child-caring agency, proctor
foster home or developmental disabilities residential facility, or, provided there are  five or more
certified foster homes in the  county, the name of the county where a certified foster home is located,
where the department conducted an investigation pursuant to ORS 418.258 that resulted in  a finding
[4]
HB 3333
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
that the report of abuse was substantiated during that quarter;
(b) The approximate date that the abuse occurred;
(c) The nature of the abuse and a brief narrative description of the abuse that occurred;
(d) Whether physical injury, sexual abuse or death resulted from the abuse;
(e) Corrective actions taken or ordered  by the department and the outcome of the corrective
actions; and
(f) Information the department received in that  quarter regarding any substantiated allegations
of child abuse made by  any other state involving a congregate care residential setting, as defined
in ORS 418.322, in which the department has placed Oregon children.
(6) The department’s quarterly report under subsection (5) of this  section must also contain all
of the following:
(a) The total number of restraints used in programs that quarter;
(b) The total number of programs that reported the use of  restraints of children in care that
quarter;
(c) The total number of individual children in care who were placed in restraints  by programs
that quarter;
(d) The number of reportable injuries to children in care that resulted from those restraints;
(e) The number of incidents in which an individual who was not appropriately  trained in the use
of the restraint used on a child in care in a program; and
(f) The number of incidents that were reported for potential inappropriate use of restraint.
(7) In compiling records, reports and  other information during an investigation under ORS
418.258 (1) and in issuing findings, letters of concern or reprimands, the Director of Human Services
or the director’s designee and the department may not refer  to the employee, person or entity that
is the subject of the  investigation as an “alleged perpetrator” but must refer to the employee, person
or entity as the “respondent.”
(8) As used in  this section, “program,” “reportable injury” and “restraint” have the meanings
given those terms in ORS 418.519.
SECTION 3.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Children in care” means one or more child in care, as defined in ORS 418.257.
(b) “Just culture model” means a culture  where a person is not punished for actions,
omissions, suggestions or  decisions taken by the person that are commensurate with the
person’s experience and training, but  where gross negligence, willful violations and destruc-
tive acts are not tolerated.
(2) The System  of Care Advisory Council shall establish and administer a grant program
for the purpose of providing just culture model training to Department of Human  Services
employees who conduct investigations under ORS 418.257 to 418.259, staff working in a
child-caring agency, as defined in ORS 418.205, and behavioral health  care providers who
work with children in care. Grants under this section may be used for initial  training as
well as ongoing training and supervision.
SECTION 4.
(1) As used in this section, “children in care” means one or more  child in
care, as defined in ORS 418.257.
(2) The System  of Care Advisory Council shall establish and administer a grant program
for the purpose of providing grants for training  regarding trauma-informed practices and
clinical best practices to the workforce providing residential services to children in care.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
[5]
HB 3333
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
ated to the System of Care  Advisory Council, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the amount  of $____ for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of
section 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 6.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the System of Care  Advisory Council, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the amount  of $____ for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of
section 4 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 7. The amendments to ORS 418.258 and 418.259 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2023
Act apply to actions or behavior occurring on or after the effective date of this 2023 Act.
[6]