Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Policy and Research Director shall study the use of impact
statements in legislative deliberations and shall report findings to the Legislative Policy  and
Research Committee on or before February 1, 2023.
SECTION 2. This 2022 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2022
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 257