Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 10 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Affiliate” means a person that directly or indirectly owns or  controls, is owned or
controlled by, or is under common ownership or control with, another person.
(2) “Control,” for purposes of the definition of “affiliate” under  this section, means direct
or indirect possession of the power to direct or cause the direction of the  management and
policies of a person, whether through the ownership  of voting securities, by contract or
otherwise.
(3) “Heavy equipment rental tax” means the tax imposed  under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(4) “Mobile” means that qualified heavy equipment:
(a) Is intended to be moved among worksites as needed; and
(b) Is not intended to be permanently affixed to real property when put to its  intended
use.
(5) “Own,” for purposes of the definition of “affiliate” under  this section, means to have
ownership of an equity interest, or the equivalent, of 10 percent or more in a person.
(6) “Qualified heavy equipment” means any construction, mining,  earthmoving or indus-
trial equipment, together  with attachments and other equipment and tools, including, but
not limited to, towable trailers and fixed load vehicles, that is:
(a) Mobile;
(b) Owned by a qualified heavy equipment provider; and
(c) Held primarily for rental.
(7)(a) “Qualified heavy equipment provider” means a person who:
(A) Is engaged in a  line of business classified under Code 532412 of the North American
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3792
HB 2942
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Industry Classification System published by the United States Census Bureau (2012 Edition);
and
(B) Who has registered with the Department of  Revenue as a qualified heavy equipment
provider.
(b) “Qualified heavy equipment provider” does not include a  person whose primary busi-
ness is the rental of qualified heavy equipment to one or more affiliates.
(8) “Rental location”  means a qualified heavy equipment provider’s store or other busi-
ness location in this state from which qualified heavy equipment is rented.
(9) “Rental price” means the rental charge for  qualified heavy equipment, net of any in-
voice credits provided to the renter. “Rental price” does not  include delivery and pickup fees,
damage waivers or environmental mitigation fees.
SECTION 2.
(1) A tax of 1.75 percent is imposed on the rental price received for any
qualified heavy equipment.
(2) The tax imposed under this  section shall be collected by the qualified heavy equipment
provider from the renter at the time that the rental  of the qualified heavy equipment is
made.
(3) Qualified heavy equipment is exempt from  any and all ad valorem property taxes if
rental of the qualified heavy equipment is subject to taxation under this section.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 315.037, the exemption granted  under subsection (3) of this
section does not have a maximum term.
SECTION 3. (1) Every qualified heavy equipment provider shall register with the De-
partment of Revenue no later than immediately preceding the beginning of  the next
property tax year by certifying that the provider is engaged in  the line of business described
in section 1 (7) of this 2017 Act.
(2) Every qualified heavy equipment provider shall keep  records, render statements and
comply with rules adopted by the Department of Revenue with respect to the  heavy equip-
ment rental tax. The records and statements required by this section  must be sufficient to
show whether there is a tax liability under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) Every qualified heavy equipment provider that rents  out qualified heavy
equipment is responsible for collecting the heavy equipment rental tax and shall file  a return
with the Department of Revenue, on  or before the last day of the month following the end
of each calendar quarter, reporting the amount of tax due during the quarter.  The depart-
ment shall prescribe the form of the return required by this section, provided that  the form
shall require the qualified heavy equipment provider to report, for each  county in the state,
the aggregate rental  prices and taxes collected for qualified heavy equipment rented out from
each of its rental locations in the county during the applicable  calendar quarter. The rules
of the department shall require that returns be made under penalties for false swearing.
(2) When a return is required under subsection (1) of this section, the  qualified heavy
equipment provider required to make  the return shall remit the tax due to the department
at the time fixed for filing the return.
SECTION 5. If the amount paid  by a qualified heavy equipment provider to the Depart-
ment of Revenue  under section 4 of this 2017 Act exceeds the amount of tax payable, the
department shall refund the amount of the excess with  interest at the rate established under
ORS 305.220 for each month  or fraction of a month during the period beginning 45 days after
the later of the due date of the return to  which the excess relates or the date the excess
[2]
HB 2942
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
was paid, and ending on the date the refund is paid. A refund may not be made to a qualified
heavy equipment provider that fails to  claim the refund within two years after the due date
for filing the return to which the claim for refund relates.
SECTION 6. (1) Every qualified heavy equipment provider is deemed  to hold the amount
of heavy equipment rental taxes collected in trust for the State of Oregon and for payment
to the Department of Revenue  in the manner and at the time provided under section 4 of this
2017 Act.
(2) At  any time the qualified heavy equipment provider fails to remit any amount of
heavy equipment rental taxes deemed to be held in trust for the State of Oregon, the de-
partment may enforce collection by the issuance of  a distraint warrant for the collection of
the delinquent amount and all penalties, interest  and collection charges accrued on the de-
linquent amount. The warrant shall be issued, docketed and proceeded  upon in the same
manner and shall have the same force and effect as warrants for the collection of delinquent
income taxes.
SECTION 7.
(1) Unless the context requires otherwise, the provisions of ORS chapters
305, 314 and 316 governing the audit and examination of reports  and returns, confidentiality
of reports and returns, determination of deficiencies, assessments,  claims for refunds, pen-
alties, interest, jeopardy assessments,  warrants, conferences and appeals to the Oregon Tax
Court, and related procedures, apply to  sections 1 to 10 of this 2017 Act as if the heavy
equipment rental  tax were a tax imposed upon or measured by net income. The provisions
apply to the taxpayer liable for the tax and to any qualified heavy equipment provider re-
quired to collect the tax.
(2) Any amount collected and required to be remitted to the Department  of Revenue is
considered a tax upon the qualified heavy equipment  provider required to collect the tax and
the qualified heavy equipment provider is considered a taxpayer.
SECTION 8.
(1) All moneys received by the Department of Revenue pursuant  to sections
1 to  10 of this 2017 Act, and any interest on the moneys, shall be paid to the State Treasurer
to be held in a suspense account established under ORS 293.445.
(2) After the payment of refunds:
(a) Moneys necessary to reimburse the department for the actual costs incurred by  the
department in administering the heavy equipment rental tax, not to exceed three percent of
heavy equipment rental tax collections, are continuously appropriated to the department; and
(b) The balance of the moneys received shall be transferred  to the treasurer of each
county according to the share of the moneys that are attributable to qualified heavy equip-
ment rented out from rental locations in the county.
(3)(a) On or before July 15 of each year, each county treasurer shall distribute the mon-
eys received under subsection (2)  of this section that are attributable to each rental location
to the taxing districts in which the rental location is located.
(b) The distribution of moneys shall be based on the  ratio that each taxing district’s total
tax rate for purposes of ad valorem property taxation bears  to the total tax rates for all
districts in which a rental location is located.
(4) Provisions of law  relating to the confidentiality of public records do not apply to the
extent that  remittances made by the department pursuant to this section disclose informa-
tion derived from heavy equipment rental tax returns.
SECTION 9.
(1) Public records of heavy equipment rental  tax moneys collected by the
[3]
HB 2942
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Department of Revenue pursuant to sections 1 to 10 of this 2017 Act are exempt from  dis-
closure under ORS 192.410 to 192.505. Nothing in  this section shall limit the use that can be
made of such information for regulatory  purposes or its use and admissibility in any
enforcement proceedings.
(2) If a conflict is  found to exist between subsection (1) of this section and ORS 314.835,
ORS 314.835 controls.
SECTION 10. The Department of Revenue may  adopt rules necessary for the adminis-
tration and enforcement of the heavy equipment  rental tax under sections 1 to 10 of this 2017
Act.
SECTION 11. (1) Sections  1 to 10 of this 2017 Act apply to rentals of qualified heavy
equipment occurring on or after January 1, 2018.
(2) For purposes of complying with section 3 (1) of this 2017  Act for the property tax year
beginning on July 1, 2017, a qualified  heavy equipment provider shall register with the De-
partment of Revenue no later than December 31, 2017.
SECTION 12. (1)(a) On or before March 31, 2018, each qualified heavy equipment provider
shall file with the Department of Revenue a complete report on  forms provided by the de-
partment, made  under penalties for false swearing, that lists the qualified heavy equipment
that is assigned to each rental location and that is:
(A) In this state on January 1, 2018, at 1:00 a.m.; and
(B) Subject to the heavy equipment rental tax imposed under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(b) The report required under this subsection shall provide  the cost, acquisition date,
description and rental location of each piece of qualified heavy equipment.
(c) The department shall use  the report required under this section and the 14 years
personal property valuation factors found in Table 2 of the  department’s Personal Property
Valuation Guidelines 2016,  as revised effective December 2015, to determine a real market
value for the qualified heavy equipment for purposes of this section.
(d) For purposes of this  section, the department shall determine the maximum assessed
value and assessed value for the qualified heavy equipment under ORS 308.153 as if the
qualified heavy equipment were new property.
(e) The department shall use the values  determined under this section to estimate the
amount of ad valorem property taxes  that would be due for the property tax year beginning
on July 1, 2018, if the qualified heavy  equipment were subject to ad valorem property taxa-
tion.
(2) On or before March 31, 2019, for each rental location, the department shall compare:
(a) The total amount of tax reported under  section 4 of this 2017 Act, after any adjust-
ment or amended returns, that is attributable to qualified heavy equipment rented out from
the rental location during the 2018 calendar year; and
(b) The total estimated ad valorem  property tax amount determined under subsection (1)
of this section.
(3)(a) If the total amount  determined under subsection (2)(a) of this section is less than
the total amount determined under subsection (2)(b) of this  section, the department shall
collect the amount of the difference from the applicable qualified heavy equipment  provider
as a supplemental amount  of the heavy equipment rental tax imposed under section 2 of this
2017 Act.
(b) The supplemental tax amount shall be  payable on or before the later of June 30, 2019,
[4]
HB 2942
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or within 60 days after the date of the notice from the department.
(c) The department shall remit  each supplemental tax amount collected under this sub-
section to the treasurer of  the county in which the applicable rental location is located and
the county treasurer  shall deposit all such amounts in the county’s unsegregated tax col-
lections account.
(4) If the amount determined under subsection (2)(a) of this section  is greater than the
amount determined under subsection  (2)(b) of this section, the department shall refund the
amount of the difference to the qualified heavy equipment provider  in the manner provided
in section 5 of this 2017 Act.
(5) Provisions of law relating to the confidentiality of public records do not  apply to the
extent that remittances and refunds made by the department pursuant to this section  dis-
close information derived from heavy equipment rental tax returns.
SECTION 13. (1)(a) On or before March 31, 2019, each qualified heavy equipment provider
shall file with the Department of  Revenue a complete report on forms provided by the de-
partment, made under penalties for false swearing, that lists the qualified heavy  equipment
that is assigned to each rental location and that is:
(A) In this state on January 1, 2019, at 1:00 a.m.; and
(B) Subject to the heavy equipment rental tax imposed under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(b) The report required under  this subsection shall provide the cost, acquisition date,
description and rental location of each piece of qualified heavy equipment.
(c) The department shall use the report required under this section  and the 14 years
personal property valuation factors  found in Table 2 of the department’s Personal Property
Valuation Guidelines 2016, as revised effective December 2015, to determine a  real market
value for the qualified heavy equipment for purposes of this section.
(d) For purposes of this section, the department shall  determine the maximum assessed
value and assessed value for the qualified heavy equipment under ORS 308.153 as if the
qualified heavy equipment were new property.
(e) The department shall use the values determined  under this section to estimate the
amount of ad valorem property taxes that would be due for  the property tax year beginning
on July 1, 2019, if the qualified heavy equipment  were subject to ad valorem property taxa-
tion.
(2) On or before March 31, 2020, for each rental location, the department shall compare:
(a) The total amount of tax reported under section 4  of this 2017 Act, after any adjust-
ment or amended returns, that is attributable to qualified heavy equipment rented out from
the rental location during the 2019 calendar year; and
(b) The total estimated ad valorem  property tax amount determined under subsection (1)
of this section.
(3)(a) If the total amount determined under subsection (2)(a) of this  section is less than
the total amount determined under  subsection (2)(b) of this section, the department shall
collect the  amount of the difference from the applicable qualified heavy equipment provider
as a supplemental amount  of the heavy equipment rental tax imposed under section 2 of this
2017 Act.
(b) The supplemental tax amount shall be  payable on or before the later of June 30, 2020,
or within 60 days after the date of the notice from the department.
(c) The department shall remit each supplemental tax amount  collected under this sub-
[5]
HB 2942
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
section to the treasurer of the county in which the applicable rental  location is located and
the county treasurer shall deposit all such amounts in the county’s unsegregated  tax col-
lections account.
(4) If the amount determined  under subsection (2)(a) of this section is greater than the
amount determined under subsection (2)(b) of this section, the department  shall refund the
amount of the difference to  the qualified heavy equipment provider in the manner provided
in section 5 of this 2017 Act.
(5) Provisions of law relating to the confidentiality of public records do not  apply to the
extent that remittances and refunds made by the department pursuant to this section  dis-
close information derived from heavy equipment rental tax returns.
SECTION 14. Sections 7, 9 and 10 of this 2017 Act  apply to sections 12 and 13 of this 2017
Act.
SECTION 15. Sections 12 and 13 of this 2017 Act are repealed on January 2, 2021.
SECTION 16. (1) Not later than July 1, 2021, the  Department of Revenue, after consulting
with the Legislative  Revenue Officer as necessary, shall submit a report in the manner pro-
vided in  ORS 192.245 to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to re-
venue regarding the heavy equipment rental tax imposed under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(2) For tax years with valuation dates of  January 1, 2018, and January 1, 2019, the report
shall set forth:
(a) The  revenue collected under sections 12 (3)(a) and 13 (3)(a) of this 2017 Act, after
payment of refunds, for all taxpayers registered as qualified heavy equipment providers;  and
(b) The amount of ad valorem property taxes that would have been  due for the property
tax years beginning on  July 1, 2018, and July 1, 2019, respectively, if the qualified heavy
equipment had been subject to ad valorem property taxation.
(3) In the report the Legislative Revenue Officer shall propose  a tax rate for section 2
of this 2017  Act that, based on the experience of the heavy equipment rental tax to date, will
maintain revenue neutrality with respect to the replacement of the ad valorem property  tax
by the heavy equipment rental tax.
SECTION 17. Section 16 of this 2017 Act is repealed on January 2, 2022.
SECTION 18. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[6]