Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Bureau of Labor and Industries shall study matters relating to laws
over which the bureau has enforcement  authority. The bureau shall submit a report in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the
interim committees  of the Legislative Assembly related to business and labor no later than
September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1294