Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 742.449 is amended to read:
742.449. (1) An  insurer [ issuing] that issues  motor vehicle liability insurance policies in this
state may not :
(a) Assign an insured or applicant for insurance  to a higher risk category than the [ person]
insured or applicant  would otherwise be assigned  to solely because the [ person] insured or ap-
plicant has:
[(1)] (A)  Let a prior motor vehicle liability policy lapse, unless the  [ person] insured or appli-
cant was in violation of ORS 806.010 at any time after the prior policy lapsed; or
[(2)] (B)  Had driving privileges suspended [ pursuant to ] under ORS 809.280 (6) or  (8) if the sus-
pension is based on a nondriving offense.
(b) Use or require the use of any device  or technology that records, discloses or allows
access to information that tracks or  reveals the geographic location of an insured during any
time in which the insured is occupying or operating a motor vehicle that the motor vehicle
liability insurance policy covers.
(2) Notwithstanding the prohibition in subsection (1)(b) of this  section, an insurer may
obtain and use information that  reveals the geographic location of an insured solely for the
purpose of providing emergency services or roadside assistance to an insured if  under the
motor vehicle liability insurance policy the insurer provides or agrees with  another person
to provide such services or assistance and the insured affirmatively consents  to the use of
the information for the purpose of receiving emergency services or roadside assistance.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 742.449 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to motor
vehicle liability insurance policies that an insurer  issues or renews on or after the effective
date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2306
SB 508
1
2
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]