Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 215.141 is amended to read:
215.141. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Critical public services facility” includes a:
(A) Facility  related to law enforcement, fire protection, health and medical services,
sanitation services, water or food supply, fuel and fueling, public works and engineering,
public information and communications or emergency response; and
(B) Community resilience center.
(b) “Long-term power outage” means a power outage that lasts for seven or more days.
(c) “Medium-term power  outage” means a power outage that lasts between one to seven
days.
(d) “Short-term power outage” means a power outage that lasts 24 hours or less.
[(1)] (2) The  Legislative Assembly finds that each county should plan for and develop energy
resilience and be prepared, in  the event of major grid disruption, to maintain basic services and
functions.
[(2)] (3) In order to carry out the provisions set forth in subsection [ (1)] (2) of this section, a
county may:
(a) Develop and adopt an energy resilience plan; and
(b) Incorporate the  energy resilience plan into the county’s applicable natural hazard mitigation
plan.
[(3)] (4) An energy resilience plan developed under this section must:
(a) Be based on and plan for short-term, medium-term and long-term power outages[ ;].
[(b) Identify and map: ]
[(A) Existing energy infrastructure located  within the county, including transmission lines, dis-
tribution lines, substations and energy storage systems; ]
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1053
HB 3171
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(B) Natural hazard risks; and ]
[(C) Communities that experience social vulnerability; ]
[(c)] (b) Identify potential locations for community resilience centers  and communication zones
that the public may use to access [ electricity] energy services during a power outage[ ;].
[(d) Inventory the energy consumption needs of critical public services facilities; ]
[(e)] (c) Identify  critical public services facilities where the development of alternate energy
generation and storage resources will meet local energy resilience needs , and, for each  critical
public services facility that the energy resilience  plan identifies, the alternative energy gen-
eration and energy resources that  may be used to meet those needs. An energy resilience
plan may  identify the energy consumption needs of critical public services facilities that the
energy resilience plan identifies. An energy resilience plan does not need to identify every
critical public services facility in a county but must include a justification for the selection
of critical public services facilities that the energy resilience plan identifies and  provide for
a plan to identify additional critical public  services facilities in the future. The plan to iden-
tify additional critical public services facilities in the future must identify the  critical public
services facilities that a  county intends to focus on, the reason for the selection of those
critical public services facilities and a timeline for when the county will  carry out the
plan[;].
[(f) Identify opportunities to  coordinate and locate energy infrastructure development to align with
and support critical public services facilities; ]
[(g)] (d) Include, as needed,  measures to mitigate natural hazard risks to alternative en-
ergy generation and storage resources located at critical public services facilities.
(e) Identify time schedules, priorities and potential funding sources for developing energy
resilience[ ; and].
[(h)] (f) Identify other actions and resources needed to implement the energy  resilience plan.
Actions may  include coordinating with utilities or carrying out interconnection projects with
energy infrastructure.
[(4)(a) To identify and map communities that experience social vulnerabilities  under subsection
(3)(b)(C) of this section, a county shall consult with representatives from  local environmental justice
communities.]
[(b) A county shall  use the locations of communities that experience social vulnerabilities to prior-
itize the potential locations of community resilience centers under subsection (3)(c) of this section. ]
(5) An energy  resilience plan developed under this section may include actions to increase
household energy resilience.
(6) In developing an energy resilience plan under this section, a county shall:
(a) Engage with local  environmental justice communities to help the county identify po-
tential locations for community resilience centers and  select other critical public services
facilities to be included in the county’s energy resilience plan;
(b) Use the locations  of communities that experience social vulnerabilities to prioritize
the potential locations of community  resilience centers to be identified in the county’s en-
ergy resilience plan;
(c) Consider the  needs of communities that experience social vulnerabilities to identify
the critical public services facilities to be identified in the  county’s energy resilience plan;
and
(d) Take into consideration natural hazard  risks and risk mitigation measures when
[2]
HB 3171
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
identifying potential  locations for community resilience centers and selecting other critical
public services facilities to be included in a county’s energy resilience plan.
[(5)] (7) [ A public ] An electric  or natural gas  utility that is operating or serving customers
within the  boundaries of a county that is developing an energy resilience plan shall use reasonable
efforts to assist with and comply with requests  from the county for information regarding energy
infrastructure that is located or serving customers within the boundaries of the  county, provided
that the information is not exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.355.
[(6) As used in this section, “critical  public services facility” includes a facility related to law
enforcement, fire protection,  health and medical services, sanitation services, fuel and fueling, public
works and engineering, public information and communications and emergency response. ]
SECTION 2.
 Section 6, chapter 562, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  (1) The State Department of  Energy shall establish a program for awarding grants to
counties to cover the costs of developing energy resilience  plans that meet the requirements under
[section 5 (3) of this 2023 Act ] ORS 215.141.
(2) Under the program:
(a) A county shall use grant moneys  to cover the costs of developing an energy resilience plan
that meets the requirements [ listed] under [ section 5 (3) of this 2023 Act ] ORS 215.141;
(b) A county may be awarded a total of no more than $50,000;
(c) Counties may combine and use together  grant moneys that have been awarded to the coun-
ties;
(d) A county may use grant award moneys to cover:
(A) The salaries and expenses of county employees for the time  the employees work on devel-
oping an energy resilience plan;
(B) The costs to hire or contract with a technical assistance provider; and
(C) Any other necessary costs as approved by the department; and
(e) The  department may issue grant award moneys to a county or directly to a technical as-
sistance provider or providers hired or contracted by the county.
(3) The department shall establish the:
(a) Application process;
(b) Eligibility criteria for awarding grants;
(c) Process of awarding grants; and
(d) Requirements for reporting on the use of grant award moneys by grantees.
(4) Notwithstanding any amendments to ORS 215.141 that may change the  requirements
for an energy resilience plan that a county develops under ORS 215.141, a  county that is
participating in a grant program established under this section may use any grant  moneys
the county is awarded under the grant program to cover  the costs of developing an energy
resilience plan that meets the requirements listed under ORS 215.141.
[(4)] (5) No later than [ September 15, 2025,] June 30, 2027, the department shall submit a report
in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the interim committees  of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to energy. The report must, at a minimum:
(a) Identify the  counties that have received grants under the program and describe the status
of the counties’ energy resilience plans;
(b) Identify opportunities to incorporate county energy resilience plans into a state  energy
resilience plan and other planning efforts; and
(c) Make recommendations for  improvements to the program and investments that would im-
[3]
HB 3171
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
prove future planning efforts.
SECTION 3.
 Section 7, chapter 562, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  Section 6 , chapter 562, Oregon Laws 2023,  [ of this 2023 Act ] is repealed on  January
2, [2026] 2028.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]