Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Communities of color” means members of the following racial  or ethnic communi-
ties:
(A) American Indians;
(B) Alaskan Natives;
(C) Individuals of Hispanic or Latino descent;
(D) Individuals of Asian descent;
(E) Native Hawaiians or Pacific Islanders;
(F) African Americans;
(G) Individuals of Middle Eastern descent; or
(H) Other members of racial or ethnic minorities.
(b) “Community-led” means an approach based  on a set of core principles that, at a
minimum, engages the people living in a geographic community to establish goals and prior-
ities, using local residents as leaders,  building on strengths rather than focusing on problems
and involving cross-sector collaboration that is intentional and adaptable and  works to
achieve systemic change.
(c) “Cross-sector”  means involving individuals, public and private institutions and com-
munities working together.
(d) “Culturally specific” means led by individuals from the community  served, using lan-
guage, structures and settings familiar to the members of the community.
(e) “Regional Health  Equity Coalition” means an autonomous, community-led, cross-
sector group that:
(A) Is focused on addressing, at the policy, system and environment levels, health  ineq-
uities experienced by target communities, with the leading priority being communities  of
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 200
HB 4161
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
color;
(B) Is completely independent of coordinated  care organizations and public bodies as de-
fined in ORS 174.109; and
(C) Is supported by a federally recognized Indian  tribe in Oregon or one of the following
community-based nonprofit entities:
(i) A culturally specific organization;
(ii) A social service provider;
(iii) An organization that provides health care;
(iv) An organization that conducts public health research;
(v) An organization that provides behavioral health treatment;
(vi) A private foundation; or
(vii) A faith-based organization; and
(D) Has a decision-making body that:
(i) Is composed 51  percent or more of individuals who identify themselves as members
of communities of color;
(ii) Is composed 51 percent or more of members of a grassroots  community of color who
have experienced health inequities; and
(iii) Prioritizes the recruitment of members who identify themselves as members of
communities of color or who work in roles that address health inequities.
(f) “Regional Health Equity Coalition model” means an approach that:
(A) Recognizes the impact of structural, institutional and  interpersonal racism on the
health and well-being of communities of color and other target communities;
(B) Meaningfully engages  target communities to lead efforts to address health inequities;
and
(C) Honors the wisdom of members of a target community by ensuring that policy  sol-
utions and system changes build upon the strengths of the target community.
(g) “Target communities” means:
(A) Communities of color;
(B) Oregon’s nine federally recognized Indian tribes;
(C) Immigrants and refugees;
(D) Migrant and seasonal farmworkers;
(E) Low-income individuals and families;
(F) Persons with disabilities; and
(G) Individuals who identify  as lesbian, gay, bisexual or transgender or who question
their sexual identity.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide grants to Regional Health Equity Coali-
tions and  to groups using a Regional Health Equity Coalition model, to ensure service to
target communities throughout this state.
(3) The authority shall ensure adequate staffing to perform daily  operations to support
grantees through ongoing technical  assistance, contract administration and program plan-
ning.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $244,000, which may be expended  for providing grants to two
organizations seeking  to build the capacity to become Regional Health Equity Coalitions, as
[2]
HB 4161
1
2
3
4
5
defined in section 1 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]