Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The governing board of a public university  listed in ORS 352.002 shall adopt
a policy that  limits the enrollment of students at that university who have not established
residency in this state to 35 percent of the total student population at that university.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act first applies to the 2026-2027 academic year.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2266