Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $30,000,000 for
deposit in the Economic Equity Investment Fund established under ORS 285B.763, to be used
for any purpose for which moneys in the fund may be used.
SECTION 2.  ORS 285B.760 is amended to read:
285B.760. As used in ORS 285B.760 to 285B.763:
(1) “Culturally responsive services” means services provided by an organization:
(a) Whose founding mission and goals are aligned  with the culture of the individuals, families,
businesses and communities receiving the services; and
(b) That demonstrates intimate knowledge of the lived experience of the individuals, families,
businesses and communities receiving the services.
(2) “Economic equity risk factor” means:
(a) Experience of discrimination because of race or ethnicity;
(b) Enrollment as a member of a state or federally recognized Indian tribe, or  proof, ac-
ceptable to a grantee organization, of descent from a parent or  grandparent who is or was
an enrolled member of a state or federally recognized Indian tribe;
[(b)] (c) English language proficiency;
[(c)] (d) Citizenship status;
[(d)] (e) Socioeconomic status; or
[(e)] (f) Residence or operation in a rural location.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 285B.760  by section 2 of this 2024 Act apply to
grants awarded before, on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 285
HB 4041
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
SECTION 4.
 ORS 285B.761 is amended to read:
285B.761. (1) The  Oregon Business Development Department shall develop and implement an
Economic Equity Investment Program under which the department shall award grants to  organiza-
tions that provide culturally responsive services to support economic stability,  self-sufficiency,
wealth building and economic equity among disadvantaged individuals, families, businesses and
communities in this state.
(2)(a) The department shall prescribe  the form and manner in which an organization may apply
for a grant under the program.
(b) An organization’s application must demonstrate a proven ability to provide services as de-
scribed in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Grant moneys shall be awarded to organizations only for proposals  to provide outreach,
support and resources to individuals, families,  businesses or communities whose future is at risk
because of any combination of two or more economic equity risk factors in order to  improve eco-
nomic equity as measured by:
(a) Ownership of land, principal residences and other real property;
(b) Entrepreneurship;
(c) Business development;
(d) Workforce development; and
(e) Intergenerational wealth building, such as savings, investments and real property equity.
(4) Organizations awarded grant moneys under  this section may allocate the moneys to
any entity that is lawfully organized and operating under state law.
[(4)] (5) Upon request, the department shall provide technical assistance to organizations  that
receive grant moneys under the program  and may consult with an organization about the
organization’s needs to  maintain capacity to carry out the proposal for which the grant moneys were
awarded.
(6)(a) The department may adopt rules for purposes of this section.
(b) During any rulemaking process, the department shall  consult with persons and com-
munities most likely to be affected by this section.
SECTION 5.
This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]