Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, which may be expended  for carrying out ORS
569.175 to 569.195, 569.355, 569.360 to 569.495, 569.520, 569.605, 569.615 and 569.620.
SECTION 2.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1780