Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 757.612 is amended to read:
757.612. (1) There is established an annual public purpose  expenditure standard for electric
companies  and  Oregon Community Power to fund new cost-effective local energy conservation, new
market transformation efforts, transportation electrification efforts,  the above-market costs of
new renewable energy resources  and new low-income weatherization. The public purpose expendi-
ture standard shall be funded by the public purpose charge described in  subsection (2) of this sec-
tion.
(2)(a) Beginning on the date an  electric company or Oregon Community Power offers direct ac-
cess to [ its] retail electricity consumers, except residential electricity consumers, the  electric com-
pany or Oregon Community Power shall collect a public purpose charge from all  of the retail
electricity consumers located within [ its] the electric company’s or  Oregon Community Power’s
service area until January 1, 2026. Except as provided in paragraph (b)  of this subsection, the public
purpose charge shall be equal to  three percent of the total revenues collected by the electric com-
pany, Oregon Community Power or the electricity service supplier  from [ its] retail electricity con-
sumers for electricity services, distribution  services , ancillary services, metering and billing,
transition charges and other types of costs included in electric rates on July 23, 1999.
(b) For an aluminum plant that averages more than  100 average megawatts of electricity use
per year, [ beginning on March 1, 2002, ] the electric  company or Oregon Community Power [ whose],
whichever serves  territory  that  abuts the greatest percentage of  the site of the aluminum plant ,
shall collect from the aluminum company a public purpose charge equal to one percent of  the total
revenue from the sale of electricity [ services ] to the aluminum plant [ from any source ].
(3)(a) The Public Utility  Commission shall establish rules implementing the provisions of this
section relating to electric companies and Oregon Community Power.
(b) [ Subject to paragraph (e) ] Except as provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection, funds
collected [ by an electric company or Oregon Community Power ] through public purpose charges  un-
der subsection (2) of this section  shall be allocated as follows:
(A) Sixty-three percent  for new cost-effective local energy conservation, new market transfor-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2907
HB 3019
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mation efforts and transportation electrification efforts .
(B) Nineteen percent for the above-market costs of constructing and operating new  renewable
energy resources with a nominal electric generating capacity, as defined in ORS 469.300,  of 20
megawatts or less.
(C) Thirteen percent for new low-income weatherization.
(D) Five percent  [ shall be transferred to ] for deposit in  the Housing and Community Services
Department Electricity Public  Purpose Charge Fund established by ORS 456.587 (1) [ and used ] for
the purpose of providing grants as described in ORS 458.625 (2).
(c) The costs of administering subsections (1) to (6) of this section for  an electric company or
Oregon Community Power  shall be paid out of the funds collected through public purpose charges.
The commission may require [ that] an electric company or  Oregon Community Power to direct funds
collected through public  purpose charges to [ the] state agencies responsible for implementing sub-
sections  (1)  to (6) of this section in order to pay the costs of [ administering such responsibilities ]
implementation.
(d) The commission  shall direct the manner in which public purpose charges are collected and
spent by an electric company or Oregon Community  Power and may require an electric company
or Oregon Community Power to expend funds through  competitive bids or other means designed to
encourage competition, except that funds dedicated for new low-income weatherization shall be  di-
rected to the Housing and Community Services Department [ as provided in subsection (7)  of this
section] for purposes related to new low-income weatherization . The commission  [may also direct
that] may also require  funds collected [ by an electric company or Oregon Community Power ] through
public purpose charges to be paid to  a nongovernmental entity for investment in public purposes
described in subsection (1) of this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection:
(A) If an electric company collected the funds, at least 80 percent of the funds allocated [ for
conservation] under paragraph (b)(A) of this subsection  shall be spent within the service area of
the electric company [ that collected the funds ]; or
(B) If Oregon Community Power collected the funds, at least 80 percent of  the funds allocated
[for conservation ] under paragraph (b)(A) of this subsection  shall be spent within the service area
of Oregon Community Power.
(e)(A) The first  10 percent of [ the] funds collected [ annually] each year by an electric company
or Oregon Community Power under subsection (2)  of this section shall be distributed to school dis-
tricts that are located in the service territory of the electric company or Oregon  Community Power.
The funds shall be distributed to  individual school districts according to the weighted average daily
membership (ADMw) of  each school district for the prior fiscal year as calculated under ORS
327.013. The commission shall establish by rule a methodology for distributing a  proportionate share
of funds under this paragraph to school districts that are only partially located in  the service ter-
ritory of the electric company or Oregon Community Power.
(B) A school district that receives funds under this paragraph shall use the funds  first to pay
for energy audits for schools located within the school district. A  school district may not expend
additional funds received under this  paragraph on a school [ facility] until an energy audit has been
completed for that school  [facility]. To the extent practicable, a school district shall coordinate with
the State Department  of Energy and incorporate federal funding in complying with this paragraph.
Following completion of an energy audit for an individual school, the school district  may expend
funds received under this paragraph to implement the energy audit. Once an energy audit has been
conducted  and  completely implemented for each school within the school district, the school district
[2]
HB 3019
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
may expend funds received under this paragraph for any of the following purposes:
(i) Conducting additional energy audits. A school district shall conduct an energy audit prior
to expending funds on any other purpose authorized under this paragraph unless the  school district
has performed an energy audit within the three years immediately prior to receiving the funds.
(ii) [ Weatherization ] Weatherizing school  district facilities  and upgrading the energy effi-
ciency of school district facilities.
(iii) Energy conservation education programs.
(iv) Purchasing electricity from [ environmentally focused ] sources that protect the environ-
ment. [and]
(v) Investing in renewable energy resources.
(f) The commission  may not establish a different public purpose charge than the public purpose
charge described in subsection (2) of this section.
(g) If  the commission [ directs] requires funds collected through public purpose charges to be
paid to a nongovernmental entity, the entity shall , pursuant to an  agreement entered into or
renewed between the commission and the entity :
(A) Include on the  entity’s board of directors an ex officio member designated by the commis-
sion, who shall also serve on the entity’s nominating committee for filling board vacancies.
(B) Require the entity’s officers and directors to provide an annual disclosure of economic  in-
terest to be filed  with the commission on or prior to April 15 of each calendar year for public review
in a form similar to  the statement of economic interest required for public officials under ORS
244.060.
(C) Require  the entity’s officers and directors to declare actual and potential conflicts of interest
at regular  meetings of the entity’s governing body when such conflicts arise, and require an officer
or director to abstain from participating in any discussion  or [ vote] voting on any item where that
officer or director has an actual conflict of interest. For the purposes of this subparagraph,  “actual
conflict of interest” and “potential conflict of interest” have the meanings given those terms  in ORS
244.020.
(D) Annually, arrange  for an independent auditor to audit the entity’s financial statements
[annually], and direct the auditor to file an audit opinion with the commission for public review.
(E) Annually file with the commission [ annually] the entity’s  budget, action plan and quarterly
and annual reports for public review.
(F) At least once  every five years, contract for an independent management evaluation to review
the entity’s operations, efficiency and effectiveness, and direct the independent reviewer to  file a
report with the commission for public review.
(h) The commission may remove from the board of directors of a nongovernmental entity  an of-
ficer or director who fails to provide an annual disclosure of economic interest , or who fails  to
declare an actual or potential conflict of interest, as  described in paragraph (g)(B) and (C) of this
subsection, [ in connection with ] if the failure is connected to  the allocation or expenditure of funds
collected through public purpose charges and [ directed] paid to the entity.
(4)(a) An electric company that satisfies its obligations under this section [ shall have ]:
(A) Has  no further obligation to invest in new cost-effective local energy  conservation, new
market transformation , transportation electrification  or new low-income weatherization , or to
provide a commercial energy conservation services program ; and
(B) Is not subject to ORS 469.631 to 469.645 and 469.860 to 469.900.
(b) Oregon Community Power, for any period during which Oregon Community  Power collects
[3]
HB 3019
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a public purpose charge under subsection (2) of this section:
(A) [ Shall have ] Has no [ other] further obligation to invest in new cost-effective local energy
conservation, new market transformation , transportation electrification  or new  low-income
weatherization , or to provide a commercial energy conservation services program; and
(B) Is not subject to ORS 469.631 to 469.645 and 469.860 to 469.900.
(5)(a) A retail electricity consumer that uses more  than one average megawatt of electricity at
any site in the prior year shall receive a credit  against public purpose charges billed by an electric
company or Oregon Community Power for that site. The amount of the credit  shall be equal to the
total amount of qualifying expenditures for [ new energy conservation ] purposes specified in sub-
section (3)(b)(A) of this section , not  to exceed 68 percent of the annual public purpose charges,
and the above-market costs [ of purchases ] of new renewable energy  resources incurred by the retail
electricity consumer, not to exceed 19 percent of the annual  public purpose charges, less adminis-
tration costs incurred under this paragraph and paragraphs (b) and (c) of  this subsection.  The
credit may not exceed, on an annual basis, the lesser of:
(A) The amount of the retail electricity consumer’s qualifying expenditures; or
(B) The portion  of the public purpose charge billed to the retail electricity consumer that is
dedicated to new  cost-effective local  energy conservation, new market transformation , transpor-
tation electrification or the above-market costs of new renewable energy resources.
(b) To obtain a credit under paragraph (a) of  this subsection, a retail electricity consumer shall
file with the State Department of Energy a description of the  proposed conservation project or new
renewable energy resource and a declaration that the retail electricity consumer  plans to incur the
qualifying expenditure. The State Department of Energy shall issue a notice  of precertification
within 30 days  of receipt of the filing, if such filing is consistent with paragraph (a) of  this sub-
section. The credit may be taken  after a retail electricity consumer provides a letter from a certified
public accountant to the State Department of Energy verifying that the  precertified qualifying ex-
penditure has been made.
(c) Credits earned by a retail electricity consumer  as a result of qualifying expenditures that
are not used in one year may be carried forward for use in subsequent years.
(d)(A) A retail electricity consumer that uses more than one average megawatt of electricity  at
any site in the prior year may request that the State  Department of Energy hire an independent
auditor to assess the potential for conservation investments at the site.  If the independent auditor
determines there is  no available conservation measure at the site that would have a simple payback
of one to 10 years, the retail electricity consumer shall be relieved of 54 percent of its payment
obligation for public purpose charges related to the site. If the independent  auditor determines that
there are potential conservation measures available  at the site, the retail electricity consumer shall
be entitled to a credit against public purpose charges related to the site equal to 54  percent of the
public purpose charges less the estimated cost of available conservation measures.
(B) A retail electricity consumer shall be entitled each year to  the credit described in this
[subsection] paragraph unless  a subsequent independent audit determines that new conservation
investment opportunities are available. The State Department  of Energy may require that a new
independent audit be performed on the  site to determine whether new conservation measures are
available, provided that the independent audits [ shall] occur no more than once every two years.
(C) The retail electricity consumer shall pay the cost of the independent audits  described in this
[subsection] paragraph.
(6) Electric utilities and retail electricity consumers shall  receive a fair and reasonable credit
[4]
HB 3019
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
for the public purpose expenditures of  their energy suppliers. The State Department of Energy shall
adopt rules to determine eligible expenditures and the [ methodology] method by which such  credits
are accounted for and used. The  [ rules] State Department of Energy  also shall adopt methods to
account for eligible public purpose expenditures made through consortia or collaborative projects.
(7)(a) In addition to the public purpose charge  provided under subsection (2) of this section, an
electric company or Oregon Community Power  shall collect funds for low-income electric bill pay-
ment assistance in an amount determined under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The commission shall establish the amount to be  collected by each electric company in cal-
endar year 2008 from  retail electricity consumers served by the company, and the rates to be
charged to retail electricity consumers served by  the company, so that the total anticipated col-
lection for low-income electric bill  payment assistance by all electric companies in calendar year
2008 is $15  million. In calendar year 2009 and subsequent calendar years, the commission may not
change the rates established for retail electricity consumers, but the total amount collected  in a
calendar year for low-income electric bill payment assistance may vary  based on electricity usage
by retail electricity consumers and changes in the number of retail electricity  consumers in this
state. In no event shall a retail electricity consumer be required to  pay more than $500 per month
per site for low-income electric bill payment assistance.
(c) Funds collected [ by] through the low-income electric  bill payment assistance charge shall
be paid into the  Housing and Community Services Department Low-Income Electric Bill Payment
Assistance Fund established by ORS 456.587 (2). Moneys  deposited in the fund under this paragraph
shall be used by the Housing and Community Services  Department solely for [ the purpose of
funding] purposes related to  low-income electric bill payment assistance[ .] and for  the Housing
and Community Services  Department’s cost of administering this  subsection . [ shall be paid out of
funds collected by the  low-income electric bill payment assistance charge. Moneys deposited in the fund
under this paragraph shall be expended solely for low-income electric bill payment assistance. ] Funds
collected [ from] by an electric company or Oregon Community Power under this subsection  shall
be expended in the service area of the  electric company or Oregon Community Power from which
the funds are collected.
(d)(A) The Housing and Community Services Department shall determine  the manner in which
funds collected under this subsection will be  allocated by the Housing and Community Services
Department to  energy assistance program providers for the purpose of providing low-income bill
payment [ and crisis ] assistance.
(B) The Housing and Community Services  Department , in consultation  with electric com-
panies, shall investigate and may implement  alternative delivery models [ in consultation with electric
companies] to effectively reduce service disconnections and related costs to retail  electricity con-
sumers and electric utilities.
(C) Priority assistance shall be directed to low-income electricity consumers who  are in danger
of having their electricity service disconnected.
(D) The Housing and Community Services  Department shall maintain records and provide
those records upon request to an electric company, Oregon  Community Power and the Citizens’
Utility Board established under ORS chapter 774 on a  quarterly basis. Records maintained must
include the numbers of low-income electricity  consumers served, the average amounts paid to low-
income electricity consumers  and the type of assistance provided to low-income electricity
consumers. Electric companies and Oregon Community Power shall,  if requested, provide the
Housing and Community Services  Department with aggregate data  relating to  low-income elec-
[5]
HB 3019
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tricity consumers served on a quarterly basis to support program development.
(e) Interest on moneys deposited in the Housing  and Community Services Department Low-
Income Electric Bill Payment Assistance  Fund established by ORS 456.587 (2) may be used to pro-
vide bill payment [ and crisis ] assistance to electricity consumers whose primary source of  heat is
not electricity.
(f) Notwithstanding ORS 757.310, the commission may allow an electric company or  Oregon
Community Power to provide  reduced rates or other  bill payment [ or crisis ] assistance or low-income
program assistance to a low-income household eligible for assistance under the federal Low Income
Home Energy Assistance Act of 1981, as amended and in effect on July 23, 1999.
(8) For purposes of this section, “retail electricity consumers” includes any direct service  in-
dustrial consumer that purchases electricity without purchasing distribution services from the  elec-
tric  utility.
(9) For purposes of this section, [ amounts] funds collected  by Oregon Community Power through
public purpose charges are not considered moneys received from electric utility operations.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 757.600 is amended to read:
757.600. As used in ORS 757.600 to 757.689, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Aggregate” means combining retail  electricity consumers into a buying group for the pur-
chase of electricity and related services.
(2) “Ancillary services” means services  necessary or incidental to the transmission and delivery
of electricity from generating facilities to retail electricity consumers, including but not  limited to
scheduling, load shaping, reactive power, voltage control and energy balancing services.
(3) “Commission” means the Public Utility Commission.
(4) “Consumer-owned utility” means  a municipal electric utility, a people’s utility district or an
electric cooperative.
(5) “Default supplier” means an electricity  service supplier or electric company that has a legal
obligation to provide electricity services to a consumer, as determined by the commission.
(6) “Direct access” means the ability of a retail electricity consumer to purchase electricity and
certain ancillary services, as determined by the commission for  an electric company or the govern-
ing body of a consumer-owned utility, directly from an entity other than the distribution utility.
(7) “Direct service industrial consumer” means an end user of  electricity that obtains electricity
directly from the transmission grid and not through a distribution utility.
(8) “Distribution” means the  delivery of electricity to retail electricity consumers through a
distribution system consisting of local area power  poles, transformers, conductors, meters, sub-
stations and other equipment.
(9) “Distribution utility” means  an electric utility that owns and operates a distribution system
connecting the transmission grid to the retail electricity consumer.
(10) “Economic utility investment” means all electric company investments, including  plants and
equipment and contractual or  other legal obligations, properly dedicated to generation or conser-
vation, that were prudent at the time the obligations were assumed but the full benefits of  which
are no longer available to consumers as a direct result of ORS 757.600 to  757.667, absent transition
credits.  “Economic  utility investment” does not include costs or expenses disallowed by the com-
mission in a prudence review or other proceeding, to the extent of such disallowance, and does not
include fines or penalties authorized and imposed under state or federal law.
(11) “Electric  company” means an entity engaged in the business of distributing electricity to
retail electricity consumers in this state, but does not include a consumer-owned utility.
[6]
HB 3019
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(12) “Electric cooperative” means an electric cooperative corporation organized under  ORS
chapter 62 or under the laws of another state if the service territory of the electric cooperative
includes a portion of this state.
(13) “Electric utility” means an electric company or consumer-owned utility that is engaged in
the business of distributing electricity to retail electricity consumers in this state.
(14) “Electricity” means electric energy, measured in kilowatt-hours, or  electric capacity,
measured in kilowatts, or both.
(15) “Electricity services” means electricity distribution, transmission, generation  or
generation-related services.
(16) “Electricity service supplier” means  a person or entity that offers to sell electricity services
available pursuant to direct access to more than one retail electricity  consumer. “Electricity ser-
vice supplier” does not include  an electric utility selling electricity to retail electricity consumers
in its own service territory.
(17) “Governing body”  means the board of directors or the commissioners of an electric coop-
erative or people’s utility district, or the council or  board of a city with respect to a municipal
electric utility.
(18) “Load”  means the amount of electricity delivered to or required by a retail electricity
consumer at a specific point of delivery.
(19) “Low-income weatherization” means repairs, weatherization and installation of  energy effi-
cient appliances and fixtures for low-income residences for the  purpose of enhancing energy effi-
ciency.
(20) “Municipal electric utility” means an electric distribution  utility owned and operated by or
on behalf of a city.
(21) “New renewable energy resource” means a renewable energy resource project, or  a new
addition to  an existing renewable energy resource project, or the electricity produced by the project,
that is  not in operation on July 23, 1999. “New renewable energy resource” does not include any
portion of a renewable energy resource project under contract to the Bonneville Power  Adminis-
tration on or before July 23, 1999.
(22) “One average megawatt” means 8,760,000 kilowatt-hours of electricity per year.
(23) “People’s utility district” has the meaning given that term in ORS 261.010.
(24) “Portfolio access” means the ability of a retail electricity consumer to choose from a set
of product and pricing options for electricity determined by the governing board of  a consumer-
owned utility and may  include product and pricing options offered by the utility or by an electricity
service  supplier.
(25) “Power generation  company” means a company engaged in the production and sale of
electricity to wholesale  customers, including but not limited to independent power producers, affil-
iated generation companies, municipal and state authorities, provided the company  is not regulated
by the commission.
(26) “Qualifying expenditures” means those expenditures for energy conservation measures that
have a simple payback period of not less than one year and not more than 10 years, and  expen-
ditures for the  above-market costs of new renewable energy resources, provided that the State De-
partment of Energy by rule may establish a limit on the maximum above-market cost for renewable
energy that is allowed as a credit.
(27) “Renewable energy resources” means:
(a) Electricity generation facilities fueled by wind, waste, solar or geothermal power or by low-
[7]
HB 3019
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
emission nontoxic biomass based on solid organic fuels from wood, forest and field residues.
(b) Dedicated energy crops available on a renewable basis.
(c) Landfill gas and digester gas.
(d) Hydroelectric facilities located outside protected areas as defined by federal law  in effect
on July 23, 1999.
(28) “Residential electricity consumer”  means an electricity consumer who resides at a dwelling
primarily used  for residential purposes. “Residential electricity consumer” does not include retail
electricity consumers in a dwelling typically used for residency periods of  less than 30 days, in-
cluding hotels, motels, camps, lodges and clubs. As  used in this subsection, “dwelling” includes but
is not limited to  single family dwellings, separately metered apartments, adult foster homes, manu-
factured dwellings, recreational vehicles and floating homes.
(29) “Retail  electricity consumer” means the end user of electricity for specific purposes such
as heating, lighting or operating equipment, and includes all  end users of electricity served through
the distribution system of an electric  utility on or after July 23, 1999, whether or not each end user
purchases the electricity from the electric utility.
(30) “Site” means a single contiguous area of land containing buildings or  other structures that
are separated by  not more than 1,000 feet, or buildings and related structures that are intercon-
nected by facilities owned by a single  retail electricity consumer and that are served through a
single electric meter.
(31) “Transition charge” means a charge or fee that recovers all or  a portion of an uneconomic
utility investment.
(32) “Transition credit” means a credit that returns to consumers all  or a portion of the benefits
from an economic utility investment.
(33) “Transmission facility” means the plant and equipment used to transmit  electricity in
interstate commerce.
(34) “Transportation electrification” means:
(a) The use of electricity from external sources to provide power to  all or part of a ve-
hicle;
(b) Programs related to developing the use  of electricity for the purpose described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Infrastructure investments related to developing  the use of electricity for the purpose
described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
[(34)] (35) “Undue market power” means the unfair or improper exercise  of influence to increase
or decrease the availability or price of a  service or product in a manner inconsistent with compet-
itive markets.
[(35)] (36) “Uneconomic utility investment” means all electric  company investments, including
plants and equipment and contractual or  other legal obligations, properly dedicated to generation,
conservation and workforce commitments, that were prudent at the time the  obligations were as-
sumed but the full costs of which are no longer recoverable  as a direct result of ORS 757.600 to
757.667, absent transition  charges. “Uneconomic utility investment” does not include costs or ex-
penses disallowed by the commission  in a prudence review or other proceeding, to the extent of such
disallowance, and does not include fines or penalties as authorized by state or federal law.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 757.676 is amended to read:
757.676. The governing body of a consumer-owned utility  is authorized to determine whether and
under what terms and conditions it will offer  its retail electricity consumers direct access, portfolio
[8]
HB 3019
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
access or other forms of access to electric service suppliers. In  making such determination, the
governing body of a  consumer-owned utility shall consider such factors as it deems appropriate. A
consumer-owned utility shall have sole authority to determine:
(1) The quality and nature of electric service, including but not  limited to different product and
pricing options, which shall be made available to its retail electricity consumers.
(2) The extent to which products and services will be unbundled  and the rates, tariffs, terms and
conditions on which they may be offered.
(3) Whether one or more pilot programs for direct access,  portfolio access or other forms of
access to alternative suppliers will be offered.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 757.600 (10) and [ (35),] (36), what constitutes an economic or uneco-
nomic utility investment, the value of such investments and, in the  case of uneconomic utility in-
vestments, the manner and means of mitigating such investments.
(5) Whether and on what basis a transition charge will be adopted, assessed and collected from
a retail electricity consumer located within the utility’s service territory,  including but not limited
to a nonbypassable distribution charge, the amount and period of recovery for the charges,  the al-
location of the charges among  retail electricity consumers located within the utility’s service terri-
tory and the method of collecting such  charges including but not limited to whether to impose a
nonbypassable distribution charge.
(6) The manner of collecting stranded distribution charges, systems benefit  charges, franchise
fees, taxes and payments made in lieu of  taxes from retail electricity consumers located within the
utility’s service territory for electric  power transactions using transmission facilities, whether or
not such transactions use  distribution facilities. The governing body may assign charges on the basis
of usage, demand or any combination or method it  finds appropriate. Charges need not be assigned
to specific facilities.
(7) The collection  from retail electricity consumers located within the utility’s service territory
through rates, fees or  charges, including the imposition of a nonbypassable distribution charge, in
amounts sufficient to recover 100 percent of stranded costs imposed  by, or incurred pursuant to the
purchase of cost-based electric power from, the Bonneville Power Administration. Such stranded cost
charges may include the difference in cost associated with purchasing electric power  from the
Bonneville Power Administration and  the cost of purchasing a like and similar amount of electric
power at market prices.
(8) The establishment of technical capability requirements, financial responsibility requirements
and other protections for retail  electricity consumers located within the utility’s service territory
and the consumer-owned utility in dealings with electric service suppliers.
(9) Access to or  use of the utility’s transmission facilities or distribution system by retail elec-
tricity consumers or electric service suppliers.
(10) The utility’s qualification standards for energy service suppliers in addition  to any certi-
fication standards established by the Public Utility Commission, provided that the  qualification
standards are uniformly applied to electricity service providers in a nondiscriminatory manner.
SECTION 4.
The amendments  to ORS 757.612 by section 1 of this 2017 Act apply to public
purpose charge moneys allocated on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
[9]