Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 497.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding ORS 497.061, if the State Fish  and Wildlife Commission
shortens or cancels a season for angling:
(1) After the start of the season,  the commission shall issue a credit that may be used
in a future season for angling, under a state computerized licensing system, to a person  that
holds an unfilled tag or permit to angle during the season,  in proportion to the portion of the
season during which the person is not allowed to angle under the unfilled  tag or permit, if
the person:
(a) Requests the credit under the state computerized licensing system; and
(b) Returns the unfilled tag or permit to the commission.
(2) Before the start of the season, the commission may only charge a person for a portion
of the fee for the permit or tag described in  ORS 497.061 for the season that is in proportion
to the portion of the  season during which the person will be allowed to angle under the tag
or permit.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 508.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of ORS chapter 508, if the State Fish
and Wildlife Commission shortens or cancels a season pursuant to which a person  may take
fish under a permit issued under ORS chapter 508:
(1) After the start of the season, the commission shall issue  a credit that may be used
in a future season under which a person may take fish under a permit issued  under ORS
chapter 508, under a state  computerized licensing system, to a person that holds an unfilled
permit to take fish  during the season, in proportion to the portion of the season during
which the person is not allowed to take fish under the unfilled permit, if the person:
(a) Requests the credit under the state computerized licensing system; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 173
HB 2046
1
2
3
4
5
6
(b) Returns the unfilled permit to the commission.
(2) Before the start of the season, the commission may only charge a person for a portion
of the fee for a permit described in ORS chapter 508 for the season that  is in proportion to
the portion of the season during which the person will be allowed to take fish under the
permit.
[2]