Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall  conduct a study
of road infrastructure needs in this state  as it relates to housing to identify projects to fund
in the future and shall report on its findings.
(2) The department shall submit the report required by subsection  (1) of this section in
the manner provided under ORS  192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation,
to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to housing no later than
September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1209