Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 274.376 to
274.388.
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of State Lands may use moneys deposited  in the Res-
toration Subaccount of the Submerged Lands Enhancement Fund established under ORS
274.388 to procure insurance coverage  for the costs to clean up or otherwise address damage
to state-owned submerged or submersible lands. If the department determines that pur-
chasing insurance is appropriate, the department shall purchase insurance through the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(2) In addition to or in lieu of procuring insurance coverage,  the Department of State
Lands may use moneys in the Restoration Subaccount to defray the costs  to clean up or
otherwise address damage to state-owned submerged or submersible lands.
(3) The Department of State Lands may assess a surcharge on the payment required for
the lease,  easement, registration, access agreement or other proprietary authorization to use
or occupy  state-owned submerged or submersible lands. A surcharge assessed under this
subsection must be no less  than three percent and no more than 10 percent of the amount
of the payment otherwise required for the  lease, easement, registration, access agreement
or other  proprietary authorization. Notwithstanding ORS 273.105, moneys collected by the
Department of State Lands under this subsection must be deposited in the Restoration  Sub-
account.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 274.388 is amended to read:
274.388. (1) The Submerged Lands Enhancement Fund  is established in the State Treasury, sep-
arate and distinct from the General Fund.  [ Interest earned by the Submerged Lands Enhancement
Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the  fund are continuously appropriated to the Depart-
ment of State Lands for the purposes specified in this section. ] The Submerged Lands Enhancement
Fund shall  consist of the Management and Enhancement Activities Subaccount and the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 489
HB 2272
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
Restoration Subaccount. Interest earned  by each subaccount shall be credited to that sub-
account.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 273.105, the [ fund] Management and Enhancement Activities  Sub-
account shall consist of:
(a) No more than 20 percent of the moneys  collected by the Department of State Lands  per
biennium pursuant to the  department’s granting of leases, easements, registrations and other per-
missions to use or occupy state-owned submerged or submersible lands; and
(b) Moneys [ collected] from the subaccount that were recovered  by the department under
subsection [ (5)] (7) of this section.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 273.105, the Restoration Subaccount shall  consist of moneys
collected by the department under section 2 (3) of this 2019 Act.
[(3)] (4) Moneys in  the [ Submerged Lands Enhancement Fund ] Management and Enhancement
Activities Subaccount are continuously appropriated to the department and  may  be used to
pay the expenses of the  department associated with management and enhancement activities on
state-owned submerged and submersible lands, including but not limited to:
(a) Removal, salvage,  storage and disposal of abandoned or derelict structures under ORS
274.379;
(b) Removal and disposal of marine debris;
(c) Assistance with the salvage, towing, storage and disposal of abandoned  or derelict vessels
pursuant to ORS 830.908 to 830.948; and
(d) Engagement in activities to improve water quality, watershed  enhancement and fish and
wildlife habitat on submerged and submersible lands.
[(4)] (5)  The department may  use moneys in the [ fund] Management and Enhancement Ac-
tivities Subaccount to provide funding to a state agency, county, city,  water improvement district,
watershed council, park and recreation district, port district, federally recognized Indian tribe  or
nonprofit organization to assist the department in completing  any of the management and enhance-
ment activities provided for in subsection [ (3)] (4) of this section.
(6) Moneys  in the Restoration Subaccount are continuously appropriated to the depart-
ment to be used for the purposes described in section 2 of this 2019 Act.
[(5)] (7)  The department may recover payments  made from the [ fund] Management and En-
hancement Activities Subaccount  from an owner of a structure or vessel who is liable  for the
costs  of  removal, salvage, storage and disposal of a structure under ORS 274.382. The department
shall deposit all moneys recovered under this subsection into the [ fund] Management and En-
hancement Activities Subaccount .
[2]