Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
TIMBER SEVERANCE TAX
SECTION 1.
(1) The purpose of this section is to provide  permanent funding for forests,
fire safe communities, county services  and drinking water protection through a timber
severance tax assessed on the sale of timber harvested on private land.
(2) As used in this section “common ownership” means:
(a) For entities, ownership in which a common parent holds a controlling interest  of
more than 50 percent of an entity as determined by law.
(b) For  individuals, ownership in which an individual has a controlling interest of more
than 50 percent of an entity as determined by law.
(3) A tax on the gross proceeds from the sale of unprocessed  timber harvested on private
land in this state is imposed at a rate determined under subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the rate  of the tax imposed
on gross proceeds under this section shall be  based on the number of acres of private land
in excess of 500 acres held in common ownership according to the following schedule:
(A) Tier 1: More than 500 acres and not more than 1,000 acres: One percent.
(B) Tier 2: More than 1,000 acres and not more than 2,500 acres: Two percent.
(C) Tier 3: More than 2,500 acres and not more than 5,000 acres: Four percent.
(D) Tier 4: More than 5,000 acres: Six percent.
(b) For any entity  that receives forest management certification from the Forest
Stewardship Council, the rate of the tax shall be:
(A) Tier 1: 0.6 percent.
(B) Tier 2: 1.6 percent.
(C) Tier 3: 3.6 percent.
(D) Tier 4: 5.7 percent.
(c) The State Forestry Department shall determine:
(A) The number of acres held in common ownership by an entity or individual.
[2]
SB 1593
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Eligibility for the discounts described in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
SECTION 2.
(1) The tax imposed under section 1 of this 2024 Act shall  be due and payable
annually, on or before April 15, for the  preceding calendar year. The tax shall be delinquent
if not paid by  the due date, which shall be determined without regard to any extension of
time for filing the return.
(2)(a) Subject to the provisions relating to estimated tax payments provided in sub-
sections (4) and (5) of this section, on or before April 15, each taxpayer shall:
(A) Make out a return on  the form prescribed by the Department of Revenue showing
the amount of the tax for which the taxpayer is liable for the  preceding calendar year and
the other information the department considers necessary to correctly determine the tax
due; and
(B) Mail or deliver the return, together with a  remittance for the amount of the tax, to
the department.
(b) The return shall be signed and verified by the taxpayer or a duly authorized agent of
the taxpayer.
(c) Whenever in its judgment good cause exists, the department may allow upon  written
application made on or before the due date  further time not exceeding 30 days for filing a
return.
(3) All payments  received under this section shall be credited, first, to penalty and in-
terest accrued, and then to tax due.
(4)(a) Each taxpayer expecting to incur  a liability pursuant to this section in excess of
$1,500 for any calendar year shall, on  forms prescribed by the Department of Revenue, make
and file with the department on or before the last day  of the month following the end of each
calendar quarter an estimate of the taxpayer’s tax liability for the year.
(b) At least one-quarter of the estimated tax shall be remitted  to the department with
each estimated tax report and the  balance shall be remitted to the department on or before
the last day of January of the following calendar  year, without regard to any extension of
time for filing the return.
(5)(a) If the amount remitted with an estimated tax report  filed on or before the due date
thereof is at least 25 percent of the tax of the taxpayer  as due for the calendar year pre-
ceding the year for which the report is  made or at least 20 percent of the taxpayer’s tax li-
ability as due for the year for which the report is made, or 100 percent of the tax liability
on the gross proceeds from the sale of unprocessed  timber harvested on private land for the
calendar quarter preceding the due date of the estimated tax report, no penalty  or interest
shall be charged.
(b) Otherwise a penalty in the form  of interest at the rate established under ORS 305.220
shall be assessed for the period of delinquency calculated on the difference  between the
payment made and the payment that would have been due had  the taxpayer estimated the
liability for the quarter in an amount equal to the liability as due for such quarter.
(c) The provisions of ORS chapters 305 and 314 relating to penalties and interest shall
not apply to the estimated tax payments described in this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) The revenue from the tax imposed under section 1 of this  2024 Act shall
be remitted to the  State Treasurer who shall deposit it in a suspense account established
under the provisions of ORS 293.445.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS 291.238, the amount of moneys  necessary
[3]
SB 1593
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to pay  refunds of the tax imposed under section 1 of this 2024 Act hereby is appropriated
continuously to the Department of Revenue from the suspense account referred to in  sub-
section (1) of this section and shall be used by the department for the payment of  all refunds
of the tax that have been audited and approved by the department.
(b) Any penalties, interest and tax then  due from the taxpayer shall be applied in that
order in computing any refund, and only the balance due the taxpayer,  if any, shall be re-
funded.
(c) The department  shall on its records charge each refund against the revenue from the
tax with respect to which the refund is made.
SECTION 4.
(1) Subject to section 3 (2) of this 2024 Act, moneys remaining  in the De-
partment of  Revenue’s suspense account, referred to in section 3 of this 2024 Act, on Feb-
ruary 10, May 10, August 10 and November 10 of each year shall be transferred as follows:
(a) Twenty-five percent to the  State Forestry Department for deposit in the Fire Safe
Homes, Communities, Forest and Drinking Water Protection Subaccount  established under
ORS 526.060.
(b) Twenty-five percent to the State  Fire Marshal for deposit in the State Fire Marshal
Fund established under ORS 476.055.
(c) Forty percent to the governing bodies of the counties from  which the tax revenues
are received.
(d) Ten percent to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement  Board for deposit in the Natural
Resources Subaccount established under ORS 541.942.
(2)(a) After  withholding from the net revenues received under subsection (1)(a) of this
section the actual costs of the State Forestry Department in administering the tax and ver-
ifying certification by the Forest Stewardship Council for purposes of the discount  allowable
under section 1 (4)(b) of this 2024 Act,  the department shall distribute the net moneys for
purposes of:
(A) Administering the Oregon Forest Practices Act;
(B) Wildfire workforce development and  outreach programs for kindergarten through
grade 12 public education and universities by Oregon  State University in collaboration with
the Higher Education Coordinating Commission; and
(C) Collaboration between the Oregon Conservation  Corps Program and the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission.
(b) Moneys distributed by the State  Forestry Department under paragraph (a) of this
subsection may not exceed the level of funding budgeted for each respective  program listed
in paragraph (a)(A), (B) and (C)  for the 2023-2025 biennium, adjusted biennially for inflation
since 2025 based on the Consumer Price Index for All Urban  Consumers, West Region (All
Items), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of
Labor.
(c) Any moneys received by  the department under subsection (1)(a) of this section that
exceed the amounts  distributed in accordance with paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection
may be used for prescribed burn programs and, in collaboration with  other state agencies,
public health programs related to hazardous wildfire smoke incidents.
(3) The State Fire Marshal shall use the net revenues received under  subsection (1)(b)
of this section for any activities  delegated to the State Fire Marshal under law, with an
emphasis on community risk reduction programs,  including, but not limited to, home as-
[4]
SB 1593
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sessments and activities to increase the fire readiness of buildings and  their surrounding
landscapes, implemented in collaboration with local governments, firefighting organizations
and private property owners.
(4)(a) Moneys distributed to counties under subsection (1)(c) of this section shall be al-
located to each respective  county in the proportion that the volume of unprocessed timber
subject to the tax that is harvested  on land in the county bears to the volume of unprocessed
timber subject to the tax that  is harvested on land in all the counties from which the tax
revenues are received.
(b) The use by the  counties of the moneys distributed under this subsection is unre-
stricted.
(5) Moneys distributed to the Oregon  Watershed Enhancement Board under subsection
(1)(d) of this section  shall be used for the purposes of restoration, enhancement and water
quantity and quality protection projects,  with particular focus on protecting domestic water
supplies and habitat conservation.
REPEAL OF THE FOREST PRODUCTS HARVEST TAX
SECTION 5.
(1) ORS 321.015, 321.017, 321.045, 321.145, 321.152 and 321.185 are repealed.
(2) Sections 4, 5, 6 and 7, chapter 31, Oregon Laws 2022, are repealed.
SUBACCOUNT FOR SEVERANCE TAX REVENUE
SECTION 6.  ORS 526.060 is amended to read:
526.060. (1) Except as provided in ORS 526.121, 530.147 and 530.280, all assessments, federal  ap-
portionments  or  contributions, and other moneys received by the forester or State Board of Forestry,
shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to the State Forestry Department  Account, which
is established separate and distinct from the  General Fund. All moneys in the State Forestry De-
partment Account are continuously appropriated, and shall  be used by the forester, under the
supervision and direction of the board, for the purposes authorized by law.
(2) The forester shall keep a record of all  moneys deposited in the State Forestry Department
Account. The record shall indicate by separate cumulative accounts the source from which the
moneys are derived and the individual activity or program against  which each withdrawal is
charged. All moneys in the account received pursuant to ORS 527.610 to 527.770  and 527.992 shall
be used only  for carrying out the duties, functions and powers of the State Forestry Department in
administering ORS 527.610 to 527.770 and 527.992.
(3) The Urban and Community Forestry Subaccount is established as  a subaccount of the State
Forestry Department Account. Moneys in the Urban and Community Forestry Subaccount  are con-
tinuously appropriated to the  State Forestry Department to be used for urban and community forest
activities described in ORS 469.634 and 469.652.
(4) The  State Forest Enhancement Donation Subaccount is established as a subaccount to the
State Forestry Department Account. Moneys in the State Forest Enhancement Donation  Subaccount
are continuously appropriated to the State Forestry Department to be used for the  purposes de-
scribed in ORS 526.065.
(5) The State Forest Nursery  Subaccount is established as a subaccount to the State Forestry
Department Account. Moneys in  the State Forest Nursery Subaccount are continuously appropriated
[5]
SB 1593
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to the State Forestry Department to be used for the purposes described in ORS 526.235.
(6) The State Forest Tree Seed Bank Subaccount is established as a subaccount to the  State
Forestry Department Account.  Moneys in the State Forest Tree Seed Bank Subaccount are contin-
uously appropriated to the State Forestry Department  to be used for the purposes described in ORS
526.470.
(7) The State Forest Tree Seed Orchard Subaccount is established as a subaccount to the  State
Forestry Department Account. Moneys in the State  Forest Tree Seed Orchard Subaccount are con-
tinuously appropriated to the State Forestry Department to be used for the purposes described in
ORS 526.472.
(8) The  Fire Safe Homes, Communities, Forest and Drinking Water Protection Subac-
count is established as  a subaccount to the State Forestry Department Account. Moneys in
the Fire Safe Homes,  Communities, Forest and Drinking Water Protection Subaccount are
continuously appropriated to  the State Forestry Department to be used for the purposes
described in section 4 (2) of this 2024 Act.
[(8)] (9) Notwithstanding ORS 291.238, the moneys credited to  the subaccounts established under
subsections (5), (6) , [ and] (7)  and (8)  of this section shall be continuously available on a revolving
basis.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 7.
 ORS 321.005 is amended to read:
321.005. As used  in [ ORS 321.005 to 321.185, ] 321.560 to 321.600 and 477.440 to 477.460, unless
the context requires otherwise:
[(1) “Board” means the State Board of Forestry. ]
[(2) “Protected  forestlands” means those lands which are protected from the starting or spread of
fire thereon or therefrom by: ]
[(a) The State Forester, with the approval of the board; ]
[(b) The United States of America through contract with the State Forester; ]
[(c) Any forest protective agency under contract with the State Forester or  the board pursuant to
ORS 477.406; or ]
[(d) Any forest protective agency, described in paragraph (c)  of this subsection, under an agreement
with the United States  of America wherein such agency agrees to protect specific federal forestlands
and, in return, the United States of America agrees to protect specific lands of such agency. ]
[(3) “Department” means the Department of Revenue. ]
[(4) “Committee” means the Emergency Fire Cost Committee. ]
[(5)] (1) “Forestland” means any land producing forest products.
[(6)] (2) “Forest products” means products from  harvested timber, but does not include products
from short rotation fiber grown under agricultural conditions as described  in ORS 321.267 (3) or
321.824 (3), western juniper or products from harvested western juniper.
[(7)] (3) “Harvest” means the point at which timber that  has been cut, severed, or removed for
purposes of sale or use is first measured in the ordinary course of business as  determined by refer-
ence to common practice in the timber industry.
[(8) “Merchantable stand of timber” means any  stand on forestlands containing living or dead
timber which is being or can be harvested. ]
[(9)] (4) “Taxpayer” means the owner of timber at time of harvest.
[6]
SB 1593
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(10) “Taxes” means the taxes provided for in ORS 321.015. ]
[(11)] (5) “Owner of timber” means any individual  or combination of individuals, partnership,
firm, corporation or association of whatever nature holding title to harvested timber by virtue of:
(a) An instrument of conveyance;
(b) The harvesting of the timber; or
(c) The harvesting of the timber and payment therefor.
[(12)] (6) “Timber” means all  logs which can be measured in board feet and other forest products
as determined by [ department] the Department of Revenue  rule.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 321.011 is amended to read:
321.011. The prevention and suppression of  forest fires on forestlands for the preservation of
forest resources and the continuous growth  of timber on lands suitable therefor are declared to be
the public policy of the State of Oregon. The Legislative Assembly recognizes that:
(1) The forested areas  situated within eastern Oregon predominate in Ponderosa pine trees and
associated species, and that the forested areas situated  within western Oregon predominate in
Douglas fir and associated species;
(2) Because of this difference in species, different forest fire  protection problems exist in eastern
and western Oregon, and different logging conditions and circumstances in  each necessitate varied
forest practices in the disposal of forest slashings and debris; and
(3) Therefore, in order to give recognition to such differences and their effect on the accom-
plishment of the public policy stated in this section, certain classifications of  forestlands within the
State of Oregon are established by ORS [ 321.005 to 321.185 and ] 321.560 to 321.600.
SECTION 9.  ORS 321.550 is amended to read:
321.550. (1) No person shall harvest or cause to be harvested  any timber from land in Oregon
without first having notified the State  Forester in writing with a copy to the Department of Revenue
on forms prepared by the State Forester and the department of intent to harvest pursuant  to ORS
[321.005 to 321.185, ] 321.560 to 321.600  [ and] or 321.700 to 321.754 or sections 1 to 4 of this 2024
Act.
(2) The notification shall specify where and when the harvest will take place and the  nature of
the harvest and shall include maps and other data as required  by the State Forester and the de-
partment. The department shall establish by rule procedures to assure the receipt of the tax returns
sent out or a report of  nonharvest from the person. The department shall conduct field and office
audits to ascertain the correctness of any timber tax return.
(3)(a) If a person fails to file a written notice as required in subsection  (1) of this section with
respect to any harvest over 5,000 board feet, the  department shall notify the person. If, after the
person has been notified, the person fails to file a written notice as  required in subsection (1) of this
section with respect  to any subsequent harvest over 5,000 board feet, there shall be added to the
amount of the timber tax required to be shown on the return as a  result of the subsequent harvest
a delinquency penalty of $250 for each violation occurring within  a calendar year. The department
shall collect the penalty in the same manner as taxes are collected.
(b) No  penalty shall be imposed under this subsection if a penalty for failure to file the notice
with the State Forester has been imposed under ORS 527.992.
(c) The delinquency  penalty shall first be added to the small tract forestland timber severance
tax imposed under ORS 321.700 to 321.754, if applicable to the harvest. If the small tract forestland
timber severance tax is not applicable, the delinquency penalty shall  be added to the [ forest products
harvest] tax imposed under [ ORS 321.005 to 321.185 ] sections 1 to 4 of this 2024 Act .
[7]
SB 1593
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 10.
 ORS 321.560 is amended to read:
321.560. (1) The provisions of ORS chapters  305 and 314 as to the audit and examination of re-
ports and returns, determination of deficiencies, liens,  assessments, claims for refund, conferences
and appeals to  the Oregon Tax Court, and the procedures relating thereto, apply to the determi-
nation of taxes, penalties and interest imposed under ORS [ 321.005 to 321.185,] 321.560 to 321.600 or
321.700 to 321.754 or sections 1 to 4 of  this 2024 Act , except where the context requires otherwise.
(2) If a taxpayer fails to file a return required by ORS [ 321.045 or] 321.700 to 321.754 or section
2 of this  2024 Act , or fails to pay a tax at the time the tax becomes due, there shall be added to
the amount of tax required to  be shown on the return a delinquency penalty of five percent of the
amount of such tax.
(3) If the failure to file a return continues  for a period in excess of three months after the due
date, there shall be added to the amount of tax required to be shown on the return a failure  to file
penalty of 20 percent of the amount of such tax. This penalty is in addition to the  delinquency
penalty imposed by subsection (2) of this section.
(4) If all or any part  of the delinquency or deficiency for which a determination is made is due
to fraud or an intent to evade the provisions of ORS  [ 321.005 to 321.185, ] 321.560 to 321.600 or
321.700 to 321.754 or sections 1 to 4 of this 2024 Act , or  the rules adopted thereunder, a penalty
of 100 percent of such delinquency or deficiency shall be added, plus interest at the rate established
under ORS 305.220, computed on  the full amount of the delinquency or deficiency plus penalty, from
the time the return was due.
(5) For purposes of this  section, the amount of tax required to be shown on the return shall be
reduced by the amount of any part of the tax that is paid on or before the date prescribed  for pay-
ment of the tax and by the amount of any credit against the tax that  may be lawfully claimed upon
the return.
(6) A  delinquent tax or a deficiency shall bear interest at the rate established under ORS 305.220
from the time the return was due.
SECTION 11.  ORS 321.570 is amended to read:
321.570. (1) If any tax imposed  [ by ORS 321.005 to 321.185, ] under ORS  321.560 to 321.600 or
321.700 to 321.754 or sections 1 to 4 of  this 2024 Act , or any portion of the tax, is not paid within
30 days after the date that the written notice and demand for payment required under ORS 305.895
is mailed, the Department of Revenue may issue a  warrant for the payment of the amount of the tax,
with the  added penalties, interest and cost of executing the warrant. A copy of the warrant shall
be mailed or delivered to the taxpayer by the department at the taxpayer’s last-known address.
(2) At any  time after issuing a warrant under this section, the department may record the war-
rant in the County Clerk Lien Record of any county of  this state. Recording of the warrant has the
effect described in ORS 205.125. After recording a warrant, the department may direct the  sheriff
for the county in which the warrant is  recorded to levy upon and sell the real and personal property
of the taxpayer found within that county, and to levy upon any currency of the taxpayer  found
within that county, for the application of the proceeds  or currency against the amount reflected in
the warrant and the sheriff’s cost of executing the  warrant. The sheriff shall proceed on the warrant
in the same manner prescribed by law for executions  issued against property pursuant to a judg-
ment, and is entitled to the same fees as provided for executions  issued against property pursuant
to a judgment. The fees of the sheriff shall be added to and collected as a  part of the warrant li-
ability.
(3) In the discretion of the department a warrant under  this section may be directed to any
[8]
SB 1593
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
agent authorized by the department to collect this tax. In the execution of the warrant  the agent
has the powers conferred by law upon sheriffs, but is entitled to no fee or compensation in  excess
of actual expenses paid in the performance of such duty.
(4) Until a  warrant issued under this section is satisfied in full, the department has the same
remedies to enforce the claim for taxes against the taxpayer  as if the state had recovered judgment
against the taxpayer for the amount of the tax.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 321.580 is amended to read:
321.580. If any taxpayer neglects or refuses to make a return required to be made [ by ORS
321.005 to 321.185,] under ORS 321.560 to 321.600 or 321.700 to 321.754 or sections 1 to 4 of this
2024 Act , the Department of Revenue  is authorized to determine the tax due, based upon any in-
formation in its possession or that may come into its possession. The department shall give  the
taxpayer written notice of the tax and delinquency charges and the tax  and delinquency charges
shall be a lien from the time of severance. If the tax and delinquency charges are  not paid within
30 days from the mailing  of the notice, the department shall proceed to collect the tax in the manner
provided in ORS 321.570.
SECTION 13.  ORS 321.600 is amended to read:
321.600. All taxes, interest and penalties  due and unpaid under ORS [ 321.005 to 321.185,] 321.560
to 321.600 or 321.700 to 321.754 or sections  1 to 4 of this 2024 Act  constitute a debt due the State
of Oregon and may be collected, together with interest, penalty and costs, by appropriate  judicial
proceeding, which remedy is in addition to all  other existing remedies. However, no proceeding for
the collection  of taxes under ORS [ 321.005 to 321.185, ] 321.560 to 321.600 or 321.700 to 321.754 or
sections 1 to 4 of this 2024 Act  shall be instituted after the  expiration of six years from the date
the taxes were due.
SECTION 14.  ORS 321.609 is amended to read:
321.609. (1) ORS [ 321.005 to 321.185, ] 321.560 to 321.600 and 321.700  to 321.754 and sections 1
to 4 of this 2024 Act  shall be enforced and the taxes imposed [ by ORS 321.005 to 321.185, ] under
ORS 321.560 to 321.600 and 321.700 to 321.754 and sections 1 to 4 of this 2024 Act  shall be col-
lected  by  the Department of Revenue, which shall have the power to prescribe forms and to adopt
rules for the ascertainment, assessment and collection of the taxes imposed  [ by ORS 321.005 to
321.185,] under ORS 321.560 to 321.600 or 321.700 to 321.754 or sections 1 to 4 of this 2024 Act .
(2) For the purpose of determining the taxes imposed [ by ORS 321.005 to  321.185,] under ORS
321.560 to 321.600 or 321.700 to 321.754  or sections 1 to 4 of this 2024 Act , the department may:
(a) Require any person to furnish any information deemed necessary.
(b) Examine the books, records and files of such person.
(c) Subpoena and examine witnesses and administer oaths.
(d) Enter upon and inspect the land of any owner of the land from which any timber has  been
harvested.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 321.682 is amended to read:
321.682. (1)(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, it shall be  unlawful for the
Department of Revenue or any officer or employee of the  department to divulge or make known in
any manner the amount of the tax or any particulars set forth or disclosed in  any report or return
required to be filed under ORS [ 321.045 or ] 321.741 or section 2 of this 2024 Act  or any appraisal
data collected to  make determinations of specially assessed value of forestland pursuant to ORS
321.201 to 321.222.
(b) It shall be unlawful for  any person or entity to whom information is disclosed or given by
[9]
SB 1593
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the department pursuant  to ORS 321.684 (2) or any other provision of state law to divulge or use
such information for any purpose other than that  specified in the provisions of law authorizing the
use or disclosure.
(c) No subpoena or judicial order shall be issued compelling the department or any of its officers
or employees, or any person who has acquired information pursuant to ORS 321.684 (2) or any other
provision of state law, to divulge or make known the amount of  tax or any particulars set forth or
disclosed in any report or return except where the  taxpayer’s liability for timber tax is to be adju-
dicated by the court from which such process issues.
(2) As used in this section,  “officer,” “employee” or “person” includes an authorized represen-
tative of the officer, employee or person, or any former  officer, employee or person, or an authorized
representative of such former officer, employee or person.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 321.684 is amended to read:
321.684. (1) The Department of Revenue may:
(a) Furnish  to any taxpayer or authorized representative, upon request of the taxpayer or au-
thorized representative, a  copy of the taxpayer’s [ forest products harvest tax ] report or return re-
quired [ by ORS 321.045 or ] under ORS 321.741 or section 2 of this 2024  Act  that is filed with the
department for any year,  or a copy of any report filed by the taxpayer in connection with the return.
(b) Publish a list of taxpayers who are entitled to unclaimed tax refunds.
(c) Publish statistics classified so as to prevent the identification of taxable value  or any par-
ticulars contained in any report or return.
(d) Disclose a  taxpayer’s name, address and Social Security number or employer identification
number to the extent necessary in connection with the processing and  mailing of forms for any re-
port or return required in the administration of ORS [ 321.045 and] 321.741 or section 2 of  this 2024
Act.
(e) Disclose to the State Forester,  upon request of the forester, for the purpose of soliciting
nominations and recommendations referred to in  ORS 526.610, the names of producers meeting pro-
ducer class qualifications established  under ORS 526.610 who filed [ forest products harvest ] tax re-
turns under section 2 of this 2024 Act .
(f) Disclose  appraisal data collected to make determinations of specially assessed value of
forestland under ORS 321.201 to 321.222 to any  member of a forestland value advisory committee the
department has convened under ORS 321.213.
(2) The department also may disclose and give access to information described  in ORS 321.682
to:
(a) The Commissioner of Internal Revenue or authorized representative, for tax purposes only.
(b) The  United States Forest Service, Bureau of Land Management and the State Forestry De-
partment pursuant to their regulatory programs and for investigative purposes related to timber
theft.
(c) The Attorney General, assistants and employees in the Department of Justice or other  legal
representative of the State of  Oregon, to the extent the department considers disclosure or access
necessary for the performance of the duties of advising or representing the department  pursuant to
ORS [ 321.045 and] 321.741 and section 2 of this 2024 Act .
(d) Employees of the State of Oregon, other  than the Department of Revenue or Department of
Justice, to the extent the department  considers disclosure or access necessary for such employees
to perform their duties under contracts  or agreements between the department and any other de-
partment, agency or subdivision of the State of Oregon in the department’s  administration of the tax
[10]
SB 1593
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
laws.
(e) The Legislative Revenue Officer or the authorized  representative of the Legislative Revenue
Officer upon compliance with ORS 173.850. The officer or representative may not remove from  the
premises of the department any materials that would reveal  the identity of any taxpayer or any
other person or the volume of harvest and value reported on individual returns and reports.
(f) Any agency of the State of Oregon, or any person, or any officer  or employee of the agency
or person to whom disclosure or access is given by state  law and not otherwise referred to in this
section, including but not limited to the Secretary of State as  Auditor of Public Accounts under
section 2, Article VI of the Constitution of the State of Oregon.
(3) Each officer or employee  of the department and each person described or referred to in
subsection (2)(b) to (f) of this section to whom disclosure or access to the tax information is given
under subsection (2) of this section or any other provision of state law, prior to  beginning employ-
ment or the performance of duties involving such disclosure  or access, shall be advised in writing
of the provisions of ORS 321.682 and 321.686 relating to  penalties for the violation of ORS 321.682,
and shall, as a condition of employment or performance of duties,  execute a certificate for the de-
partment, in a form  prescribed by the department, stating in substance that the person has read
these provisions of law, that the  person has had them explained and that the person is aware of the
penalties for the violation of ORS 321.682.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 321.824 is amended to read:
321.824. (1) Lands assessed by the Department of Revenue  pursuant to ORS 308.505 to 308.674
or 308.805 to 308.820 may not be assessed under ORS 321.805 to 321.855.
(2) Land used exclusively for growing cultured Christmas trees may not be assessed  under ORS
321.805 to 321.855.
(3) Land that is used to grow hardwood timber, including but not limited to hybrid  cottonwood,
may not be assessed under ORS 321.805 to 321.855 if:
(a) The land is prepared using intensive cultivation methods and is cleared  of competing vege-
tation for at least three years after tree planting;
(b) The timber is of a species marketable as fiber for inclusion in  the furnish for manufacturing
paper products;
(c) The timber is harvested on a rotation cycle within 12 years after planting; and
(d) The land and timber are subject to intensive agricultural practices such as  fertilization, in-
sect and disease control, cultivation and irrigation.
(4) Nothing contained in ORS 321.805 to 321.855 shall prevent:
(a) The collection of ad valorem property taxes that became a lien against timber prior  to July
1, 1962.
(b) The collection of taxes, charges or assessments made pursuant to law for protection.
(c) The collection of  taxes levied under [ the provisions of ORS 321.005 to 321.185 and ] ORS
321.560 to 321.600 or sections 1 to 4 of this 2024 Act .
SECTION 18.
 ORS 321.991 is amended to read:
321.991. Violation of any provision of ORS [ 321.005 to 321.185 and ] 321.560  to 321.600 and
sections 1 to 4 of this 2024 Act  is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 19.  ORS 526.490 is amended to read:
526.490. (1) It is  the policy of the State of Oregon to encourage the afforestation of idle land for
the purpose of establishing commercial forests if such afforestation is consistent  with landowner
objectives. The purpose of this section is to provide an incentive for afforestation by providing  as-
[11]
SB 1593
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
surance that the State of Oregon will not prohibit the harvesting of trees planted on such lands
within the first crop rotation.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “Free to grow” means a stand of well-distributed  trees that has a high probability of re-
maining or becoming vigorous, healthy and dominant over undesired competing vegetation.
(b) “Merchantable stand of timber” means any stand on forestlands containing living  or
dead timber which is being or can be harvested.
[(b)] (c) “Parcel” has the meaning given that term in ORS 92.010.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 527.676, 527.710 or 527.755  or any rules promulgated thereunder, and
except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a person who, after September 9,  1995, plants
or causes to be planted a stand of timber that is intended to become a merchantable stand  of timber
[as defined in ORS 321.005 ] on a parcel owned by the person, or a  portion of such parcel not less
than five contiguous acres, shall not be prohibited from harvesting the planted  timber provided that:
(a) Prior to the time of planting, the parcel or portion thereof has not  been subject to any forest
practice as defined in ORS 527.620 since July 1, 1972; and
(b) Prior to the time of planting, the stocking of forest tree species on the subject parcel or
portion thereof is less than 25 square feet of basal area per acre.
(4) The provisions of subsection (3) of this section shall not apply  to any land or timber located
within 20 feet of any large or medium stream, or any small stream that is a fish-bearing or domestic
use stream, as defined by the State Board of Forestry.
(5)(a) If, within two to five years of planting under subsection (3)  of this section, the person
notifies the State Forester, the State Forester shall inspect the timber and  shall issue a certificate
to the owner indicating that a free to grow stand of timber has been  established under subsection
(3) of this section and identifying the location of  the timber. Upon request of the owner and payment
of any applicable fee,  the county clerk in the county wherein the parcel is located shall record the
certificate as specified under ORS 205.130.
(b) A person who notifies the State Forester and requests certification  shall provide an accurate
plat of the parcel or portion planted under subsection (3) of this section to  the State Forester as
well as photographs that accurately depict the condition of the land prior to planting.
(c) The State Forester may, by rule, establish a fee or schedule of  fees adequate to cover such
necessary expenses incurred by the  State Forester in conducting inspection and certification activ-
ities. Fees may be charged to the person requesting certification.
(6)(a) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this  section, all forest practices conducted on the
planted parcel or portion thereof shall be subject to the provisions of ORS 527.610 to 527.770, 527.990
(1) and 527.992.
(b) No parcel or portion of such parcel shall be subject to the provisions of subsections  (3) and
(5) of this section more than once.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 477.281 is amended to read:
477.281. (1) The obligation of an owner of timberland or  grazing land for payment of assessments
and taxes for fire protection of forestland is limited to:
(a) The  payment of moneys pursuant to ORS [ 321.015 (2), ] 477.277, 477.295, 477.760 (4) and
477.880 to maintain the Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund; and
(b) The payment of forest protection district assessments pursuant to ORS 477.205 to 477.281.
(2) As used in this section, “obligation of an owner of  timberland or grazing land for payment
of assessments and taxes for  fire protection of forestland” does not include the duties or obligations
[12]
SB 1593
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of the  owner under ORS 477.066, 477.068 or 477.120 or the obligations of an owner of land included
in a rural fire protection district pursuant to ORS 478.010.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 477.750 is amended to read:
477.750. [(1)] The Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund is created, separate  and distinct from the
General Fund. This fund shall be held by the State  Treasurer as a trust fund for the uses and pur-
poses provided in ORS 477.750  to 477.775 and 477.880. The State Treasurer shall deposit and invest
moneys in the fund as provided by law, taking into account its  uses and purposes. Interest earned
by the fund shall be credited to the fund.
[(2) Notwithstanding any other law  and as limited by ORS 477.750 to 477.775 and 477.880, that
part of the suspense account created  by ORS 321.145 that is derived from the tax levied by ORS
321.015 (2) after  refunds and other costs permitted by law, shall be credited to the Oregon Forest Land
Protection  Fund. ]
SECTION 22.  ORS 477.755 is amended to read:
477.755. (1) As used in this section, “annual expenditure”  means the expenses of the Oregon
Forest Land Protection Fund obligated in any 12-month period  designated by the Emergency Fire
Cost Committee by rule, corresponding to the policy period of any insurance for  emergency fire
costs.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 291.238, the moneys in the Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund  are
continuously appropriated to the Emergency Fire Cost Committee for the purposes of:
(a) Equalizing  emergency fire suppression costs for safeguarding forestland in any forest pro-
tection district;
(b) Paying necessary administrative expenses,  not to exceed the limit authorized by the Legis-
lative Assembly each biennium;
(c) Contributing to the payment of  emergency fire suppression costs insurance premiums, subject
to the payment limitation established in ORS 477.775 (4);
(d) Paying costs related to the availability and  mobilization of emergency fire suppression re-
sources on a statewide basis; and
(e) Paying for nonroutine purchases of supplemental fire prevention, detection  or suppression
resources that will enhance  the ability of the forester to perform fire protection responsibilities
within a forest protection district.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the annual expenditure from the Oregon  Forest
Land Protection Fund from  revenues received from ORS [ 321.015 (2),] 477.277 (1), 477.295 (1) and (2),
477.750 [(1) and (2) ], 477.760 (4) and 477.880 may not exceed the lesser of:
(a) $13.5 million; or
(b) The sum of:
(A) The lesser  of $10 million or 50 percent of the eligible annual fire suppression costs deter-
mined by the committee;
(B) Necessary administrative expenses as determined  by the committee and authorized under the
limit described in subsection (2)(b) of this section;
(C) Contributions to the payment of emergency fire  suppression costs insurance premiums, sub-
ject to the payment limitation established in ORS 477.775 (4);
(D) The lesser of $3 million or three-fifths of the actual cost  of activities described in ORS
477.777 (1)(b) and (c); and
(E) Any amounts  expended for nonroutine purchases described in subsection (2)(e) of this sec-
tion.
[13]
SB 1593
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 23.
 ORS 477.760 is amended to read:
477.760. (1) The reserve base of the Oregon Forest Land Protection  Fund is $22.5 million. On
or about the  last day of February of each year the Emergency Fire Cost Committee shall meet and
determine the unencumbered balance of the fund as of the preceding February 16.
(2) In order to maintain the reserve base of the fund at $22.5  million, the Emergency Fire Cost
Committee may request and the State Treasurer may approve transfers to the fund in  accordance
with ORS 293.205 to 293.225, if the moneys in this fund fall below the reserve base,  whether or not
there are sufficient moneys in the fund to  pay the obligations of the fund. Repayment of any such
transfers shall be made from moneys paid into the fund pursuant to  ORS [ 321.015 (2),] 477.277 and
477.880 and from such other moneys as may be credited to the fund therefor.
(3) If the committee determines that the moneys in the fund exceed:
(a) The reserve base, and that no repayment obligations are outstanding  from transfers made
pursuant to subsection (2)  of this section, then the Department of Revenue shall reduce [ the taxes
described in ORS 321.015 (2) by 50 percent for the following calendar year and ] the surcharge for each
improved lot or parcel described in ORS 477.277 and the assessments described in ORS 477.880 shall
be reduced by 50 percent for the following fiscal year.
(b) $30 million, and that no repayment obligations are outstanding from transfers made  pursuant
to subsection (2) of this  section, then the Department of Revenue may not collect [ the taxes described
in ORS 321.015 (2) for the following calendar  year and ] the surcharge for each improved lot or parcel
described in ORS 477.277 and the assessments described in ORS 477.880  may not be collected until
the calendar year  or fiscal year following the determination of the committee that the unencumbered
balance in the fund is less than or equal to $22.5 million.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the funds referred to in subsection (2) of
this section  are inadequate to cover repayment of transfers from the State Treasurer or from other
sources, the State Forester shall increase  the following [ taxes,] surcharge and  assessments [ and
charges] in an amount adequate to ensure repayment  of the transfers, and any interest accrued
thereon, allowing for contingencies in valuation, assessment and collection:
[(A) The harvest tax referred to in ORS 321.015 (2). ]
[(B)] (A) The surcharge on developed lots referred to in ORS 477.277.
[(C)] (B) The minimum assessment referred to in ORS 477.295.
[(D)] (C) The acreage assessments referred to in ORS 477.880 (2).
(b) The increases to [ taxes,] the surcharge and  assessments [ and charges ] shall be  apportioned
based upon the proportionate levels of revenues received  from each source by the Oregon Forest
Land Protection Fund. Any such increases shall  be computed on or before January 1 of each year,
and shall be  based upon revenues received during the previous four quarters. Any such increases
shall be made in the appropriate calendar or fiscal year following that in which  the requested
transfers from the State Treasurer or from other sources are made.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 350.525 is amended to read:
350.525. ORS 350.500 to 350.530 do not establish any obligation or expectation for the appropri-
ation of General Fund moneys to the subaccount described in ORS 350.520 [ or any obligation or ex-
pectation that moneys from forest products harvest taxes will be increased  or reallocated for deposit to
the subaccount described in ORS 350.520 ].
SECTION 25.  ORS 526.675 is amended to read:
526.675. [ (1)] The Oregon Forest Resources Institute Fund is created in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Except as otherwise  provided by law, all moneys re-
[14]
SB 1593
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
ceived  by  the Oregon Forest Resources Institute shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited
to the fund. All moneys in the fund are appropriated continuously to the institute  to carry out its
duties, functions and powers. Interest earnings on all moneys in the fund shall be retained in the
fund.
[(2) The board of directors of the institute may repay moneys from the  fund to persons who paid
a privilege tax levied  under ORS 321.017. The board may repay the amount of tax paid upon applica-
tion by the person who  paid the tax. The board shall adopt rules necessary for the implementation of
this subsection. Rules adopted by the board shall include standards for the repayment of  moneys and
limits on the amount that may be requested. ]
APPLICABILITY
SECTION 26.
Sections 1 to 4 of this 2024 Act, the amendments to ORS 321.005, 321.011,
321.550, 321.560, 321.570, 321.580, 321.600, 321.609, 321.682,  321.684, 321.824, 321.991, 350.525,
477.281, 477.750, 477.755, 477.760, 526.060, 526.490 and 526.675 by sections  6 to 25 of this 2024
Act and the repeal of  ORS 321.015, 321.017, 321.045, 321.145, 321.152 and 321.185 and sections
4 to 7, chapter 31, Oregon Laws 2022 by  section 5 of this 2024 Act apply to calendar years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
UNIT CAPTIONS NOT PART OF LAW
SECTION 27. The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
REFERRAL TO THE 2024 GENERAL ELECTION
SECTION 28. This 2024 Act shall be submitted to the people for their approval or re-
jection at the next regular general election held throughout this state.
[15]