Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 350.300 is amended to read:
350.300. (1) Notwithstanding ORS  341.290, 352.105 or 353.050, a student who is a current foster
child, former foster child or adopted former foster  child or a current homeless youth or former
homeless youth, under [ 25] 40 years of age and enrolled in courses  totaling one or more credit hours
at an institution of higher  education as an undergraduate student shall have the amount of tuition
and all fees levied against the  student waived if attending an institution of higher education for
purposes of pursuing an initial undergraduate degree.
(2) A  student is entitled to waiver of tuition and all fees under subsection (1) of this section until
the student has received the equivalent of four years of undergraduate education.
(3) As a  condition of receiving a tuition waiver for an academic year, if the student is eligible
to file the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA), the student must complete and  submit
the application for that academic year.
(4) A waiver of tuition and all fees under subsection (1) of this section may be reduced by the
amount of  any federal aid scholarships or grants, an award from the Oregon Opportunity Grant
program established under ORS 348.205 and any other  aid received from the institution of higher
education. For the purposes of  this subsection, “federal aid scholarships or grants” does not include
Chafee educational and training voucher program grants under 42 U.S.C. 677.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) “Adopted former foster child”  means an individual who, for a total of six or more months,
was:
(A) A ward of the court pursuant to ORS 419B.100 (1)(b) to (e) and in the legal custody of  the
Department of Human Services for out-of-home placement prior to becoming an adopted child; or
(B) An Indian child subject to ORS 419B.600 to 419B.654, under the jurisdiction of a tribal court
for out-of-home placement prior to becoming an adopted child.
(b) “Former foster child”  means an individual who, for a total of six or more months while be-
tween 14 and 21 years of age  or 18 or more months while between 10 and  21 years of age , was:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1495
SB 738
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
(A) A ward of the court pursuant to ORS 419B.100 (1)(b) to (e), in the  legal custody of the De-
partment of Human Services for out-of-home placement [ and not dismissed from care before reaching
16 years of age ]; or
(B) An Indian child subject to ORS 419B.600 to 419B.654, under the jurisdiction of a tribal court
for out-of-home placement [ and not dismissed from care before reaching 16 years of age ].
(c) “Homeless youth” means a person who:
(A) Experienced homelessness for a total of six or more months while  between 14 and 24 years
of age;
(B) While  experiencing homelessness as described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, re-
ceived services from an organization contracted by the Department of Human Services to provide
services to homeless persons or from a host home, as defined by the department by rule; and
(C) Was at least 16 years of age when the person last received the services described in  sub-
paragraph (B) of this paragraph.
(d) “Institution of higher education” means:
(A) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(B) A community college operated under ORS chapter 341; or
(C) The Oregon Health and Science University.
[2]