Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A person commits the crime of harmful communication with a minor if
the person is at least 18 years of age and knowingly engages in  a pattern of written or verbal
communication with a  minor that includes explicit and detailed descriptions or narrative
accounts of sexual conduct in a manner that causes harm to the minor.
(2) Harmful communication with a minor is a Class C felony.
(3) It is not a defense to a prosecution under this section that the person did not  know
the minor’s age, that the person reasonably believed that the minor was  at least 18 years
of age, or that the minor misrepresented the minor’s age to the person.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Minor” means a person under 18 years of age.
(b) “Sexual conduct” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163.472.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 161.005 is amended to read:
161.005. ORS 161.005 to 161.055, 161.065, 161.085 to 161.125, 161.150  to 161.175, 161.190 to
161.275, 161.290 to 161.373, 161.405 to 161.485, 161.505 to 161.585, 161.605, 161.615 to 161.685, 161.705
to 161.737, 162.005, 162.015 to 162.035, 162.055 to 162.115, 162.135  to 162.205, 162.225 to 162.375,
162.405 to 162.425, 162.465, 163.005, 163.095, 163.107, 163.115, 163.125 to 163.145,  163.149, 163.160 to
163.208, 163.191, 163.196, 163.215 to 163.257, 163.261, 163.263,  163.264, 163.266, 163.275, 163.285,
163.305 to 163.467, 163.429, 163.432, 163.433, 163.472, 163.505 to 163.575, 163.665  to 163.693, 163.700,
163.701, 163.715, 164.005, 164.015 to 164.135, 164.138, 164.140, 164.205 to 164.270, 164.305 to 164.377,
164.395 to 164.415, 164.805, 164.857, 164.886, 165.002 to 165.102, 165.109, 165.118,  165.805, 165.815,
166.005 to 166.095,  166.119, 166.125, 166.128, 166.350, 166.382, 166.384, 166.660, 167.002 to 167.027,
167.057, 167.060 to 167.100, 167.117, 167.122 to 167.162, 167.203 to 167.252,  167.310 to 167.340, 167.350,
167.810 and 167.820 and section 1 of this 2025 Act  shall be  known and may be cited as Oregon
Criminal Code of 1971.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2196