Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 350.355 is amended to read:
350.355. (1) [Subject to ORS 352.237 and any group health and  welfare insurance benefit plan de-
veloped under ORS 352.237, ] A part-time faculty member  at a public institution of higher education
is eligible for the same health  care benefits as full-time faculty members if the part-time faculty
member is eligible for membership in the Public Employees Retirement System or another  plan au-
thorized under ORS chapter 238  or 238A by teaching either at a single public institution of higher
education or in aggregate at multiple public institutions of higher education during the prior year.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  a part-time  faculty member at
a public institution of higher education shall pay all  insurance premiums for health care benefits
unless otherwise provided for  by the policy of the institution or by collective bargaining at the in-
stitution.
(b) Unless otherwise  provided for by collective bargaining, a part-time faculty member
at a public institution of higher education shall  pay 10 percent of the insurance premiums
for health benefit plans for employee-only coverage.
(3) The public  institutions of higher education that employ a part-time faculty member
described in subsection (1) of this section shall pay for the cost of  the insurance premiums
for health benefit plans described in subsection (2)(b)  of this section that are not paid by a
part-time faculty member. The payments  shall be made in accordance with the process de-
scribed in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The Oregon Educators Benefit Board shall by  rule establish a process to bill public
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1531
HB 2988
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
institutions of higher education for the previous academic year’s cost of  providing the in-
surance premiums for  health benefit plans described in subsection (2)(b) of this section that
are not paid by a part-time faculty member. This process must ensure that:
(a) The amount paid by each institution is prorated based on  the number and share of
teaching load attributable to each institution for each part-time faculty  member described
in subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) Each institution fully pays the board for the previous academic year’s cost of  pro-
viding the insurance premiums no later than August 31 of each calendar year.
(5) Unless otherwise provided for  by collective bargaining, a part-time faculty member
at a public institution of higher education who is eligible for health care benefits under sub-
section (1) of this section may  receive health care benefits only in the manner provided by
this section.
(6) The board may make rules to implement this section, including which health  benefit
plans are offered to part-time faculty members under this section  and how the health benefit
plans that are offered are selected.
SECTION 2.
A public institution of higher education that, on  the effective date of this
2021 Act, provided health care benefits to part-time faculty members who are not eligible for
health benefit plans under the amendments to ORS 350.355 by section 1 of this 2021 Act:
(1) May not  increase the eligibility requirements that must be met by a part-time faculty
member who is not eligible for health benefit  plans under the amendments to ORS 350.355
by section 1 of this  2021 Act in order for the part-time faculty member to qualify for health
care benefits from the institution; and
(2) Must  continue to provide comparable health care benefits to part-time faculty mem-
bers who are not eligible for health benefit  plans under the amendments to ORS 350.355 by
section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3. Any realized savings by a public institution of higher  education as a result
of the amendments to ORS 350.355 by section 1 of this 2021 Act are  considered employment
relations for purposes of collective bargaining under ORS 243.650 to 243.782.
SECTION 4. The Part-Time Faculty  Insurance Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Part-Time  Faculty In-
surance Fund must be credited to the fund.  The fund consists of moneys appropriated, allo-
cated, deposited or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly, public  institutions
of higher education or  otherwise and interest earned on moneys in the fund. The moneys in
the fund are continuously  appropriated to the Oregon Educators Benefit Board for the pur-
pose of paying premiums for health benefit plans for part-time faculty under ORS 350.355.
SECTION 5. There is appropriated to the Oregon Educators Benefit Board, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $_____ for deposit
in the Part-Time Faculty Insurance Fund established in  section 4 of this 2021 Act, for the
purposes specified in section 4 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 6. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the amendments to
ORS 350.355 by section 1 of this 2021 Act apply to health benefit plans  offered to part-time
faculty members on or after October 1, 2021.
(2) To the extent that a  conflict exists, the terms of collective bargaining agreements and
other contracts entered into before the effective date  of this 2021 Act shall prevail over the
amendments to ORS 350.355 by section 1 of this 2021 Act.
[2]
HB 2988
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
SECTION 7.
The Oregon  Educators Benefit Board and public institutions of higher edu-
cation shall, before the applicability date specified in section 6 of this 2021 Act, take  any
actions necessary to  implement the amendments to ORS 350.355 by section 1 of this 2021 Act
on the applicability date specified in section 6 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 8. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]