Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “504 Plan”  means an education plan developed for a student in accordance with sec-
tion 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794.
(b) “Related services” has the meaning given that term in ORS 343.035.
(c) “Special education” has the meaning given that term in ORS 343.035.
(2) Each school district shall prepare an annual report that summarizes the legal expen-
ditures of  the school district and the legal processes involved in by the school district, as
described in subsections (3) to (5) of this section.
(3) The report required under this section must include the total amount  paid for legal
expenditures during the school year, including amounts paid during the school year:
(a) To law firms or attorneys who are not employees of the school district, disaggregated
by total amount paid to each attorney or firm and including current accounts payable.
(b) To attorneys  employed by the school district, including salaries, bonuses and other
compensation.
(c) For legal services related to special education and related services  or to 504 Plans,
including:
(A) General legal guidance;
(B) Private study or learning groups led through a law firm or by an attorney;
(C) Training related  to special education and related services purchased through a law
firm or from an attorney;
(D) Attendance  at meetings for special education and related services or for 504 Plans;
and
(E) Legal services provided  for mediations, for complaints filed with the Department of
Education and for lawsuits filed in state or federal court.
(d) For legal services related to contract negotiations,  internal investigations, personnel
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2108
SB 978
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
actions and other labor relations, including:
(A) General legal guidance;
(B) Private study or learning groups led through a law firm or by an attorney;
(C) Training in negotiations or human resources purchased through  a law firm or from
an attorney;
(D) Attendance at disciplinary meetings or at appeals to disciplinary actions; and
(E) Legal services provided for  complaints filed by employees or volunteers and for
lawsuits filed in state or federal court.
(e) To students or families for settlements or judgments, disaggregated by payment for:
(A) Whether the payment was for a settlement or a judgment;
(B) Attorney fees and other costs; and
(C) Controversies related to special  education and related services, 504 Plans or other
controversies.
(f) To employees or volunteers  for settlements or judgments, disaggregated by payment
for:
(A) Whether the payment was for a settlement or a judgment; and
(B) Attorney fees and other costs.
(g) To a prevailing party not  identified in paragraph (e) or (f) of this subsection for
settlements or judgments, disaggregated by payment for:
(A) Whether the payment was for a settlement or a judgment; and
(B) Attorney fees and other costs.
(4) The  report required by this section must include the total number of each of the fol-
lowing legal processes for the school district for the school year:
(a) Mediations related to special education and related services.
(b) Formal complaints  filed with the Department of Education related to special educa-
tion and related services, including due process claims.
(c) Formal complaints filed with the department related to discrimination.
(d) Lawsuits filed and  lawsuits resolved in state or federal court against the school dis-
trict related to special education and related services.
(e) Lawsuits filed and lawsuits resolved in state or federal court  against the school dis-
trict that were not related to special education and related services.
(f) Contested adverse employment actions.
(5) The report  required by this section must include the case number and the names of
the parties of any action brought against the school  district that was active in any state or
federal court during the school year.
(6) No later than October 15 of the year following the school  year for which the report
is prepared, each school district  must ensure that the report is made available on the school
district’s website and is provided to:
(a) The district school board; and
(b) The Department of Education in the form and manner  prescribed by the department.
(7) No later than January 15 of the year  following receipt of the information described
in subsection (6) of this section, the Department of Education shall:
(a) Compile the information received under subsection (6) of this section and ORS 334.240
into a single report that allows for transparency and accountability;
(b) Make available the report prepared under paragraph (a) of  this subsection on the
[2]
SB 978
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
department’s website; and
(c) Provide a summary of the report prepared under paragraph (a) of this subsection to
the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education and to the education
subcommittee of the Joint Interim Committee on Ways and Means.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 334.240 is amended to read:
334.240. (1) Except as  provided in subsection (2) of this section, the education service district
board shall be subject [ in all respects ] to ORS 294.305 to 294.565,  except that , in addition to other
qualifications, members of  the budget committee who are not members of the education service dis-
trict board shall be members of component school district boards within the education  service dis-
trict or shall be designees of a school district board.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 294.414 and 294.423, a majority  of the members of the budget commit-
tee of an education service district must consist of members of the component school district  boards
or designees of a  school district board. The budget committee may meet to conduct business if the
education service district board is unable to fill all of the positions on the budget committee.
(3) The budget committee shall prepare  a budget for the operational and administrative expenses
of the education service district. The budget shall include amounts necessary to provide  services
required by the local service plan of the district developed under ORS 334.175. The budget must  be
adopted by the board of the education service district.
(4) The board of the education service district shall ensure that :
(a) An annual  audit of the accounts of the education service district is prepared in accordance
with the Municipal Audit Law, as provided in ORS 297.405 to 297.555 and 297.990.
(b) An annual report that summarizes the legal expenditures of the education service
district and the legal processes involved in by  the education service district, as described in
section 1 of this 2025 Act, is prepared and is:
(A) Made available on the education service district’s website; and
(B) Provided to the board of directors of the education service district and to the De-
partment of Education.
SECTION 3.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 334.240 by  section 2
of this 2025 Act first apply to the 2025-2026 school year.
[3]