Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Department of Aviation  shall study issues related to improving
airport infrastructure resilience and  present the results of the study in a report to an ap-
propriate committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly in  the manner pro-
vided under ORS 192.245 on or before September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3153