Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 471.001 is amended to read:
471.001. As used in this chapter and ORS chapter 473:
(1) “Alcoholic beverage”  and “alcoholic liquor” mean any liquid or solid containing more than
one-half of one percent alcohol by volume and capable of being consumed by a human being.
(2) “Commercial establishment” means a place of business:
(a) Where food is cooked and served;
(b) That has kitchen facilities adequate for the preparation and serving of meals;
(c) That has dining facilities adequate for the serving and consumption of meals; and
(d) That:
(A) If not a for-profit private club, serves meals to the general public; or
(B) If a for-profit private  club, serves meals to the club’s members and guests and complies with
any minimum membership and food  service requirements established by Oregon Liquor and Cannabis
Commission rules.
(3) “Commission” means the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
(4) “Distilled liquor” means any alcoholic beverage other than a wine, cider  or malt beverage.
“Distilled liquor” includes distilled spirits.
(5) “Licensee” means :
(a) Any person holding a license issued under this chapter[ .]; or
(b) An agent appointed by the commission under ORS 471.750.
(6)(a) “Malt  beverage” means beer, ale, porter, stout and other similar fermented beverages that
contain more than one-half of one percent and not more than 16 percent of alcohol by  volume and
that are brewed or produced from malt, wholly  or in part, or from rice, grain, bran, glucose, sugar
or molasses as a substitute for malt.
(b) “Malt beverage” does not include cider, mead, sake or wine.
(7) “Manufacturer” means every  person who produces, brews, ferments, manufactures or blends
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1067
HB 2121
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
an alcoholic beverage within  this state or who imports or causes to be imported into this state an
alcoholic beverage for sale or distribution within the state.
(8) “Permittee” means a person holding a permit issued under ORS 471.360 to 471.385.
(9) “Premises” or  “licensed premises” means a location licensed under this chapter and includes
all enclosed areas at the location that are used in the business operated at the location,  including
offices, kitchens, rest rooms and storerooms, including all public and private areas  where patrons
are permitted to be present. “Premises” or  “licensed premises” includes areas outside of a building
that the commission has specifically designated as approved for alcoholic beverage  service or con-
sumption.
(10) “Regulatory specialist” means a full-time employee of  the commission who is authorized to
act as an agent of the commission in conducting  inspections or investigations, making arrests and
seizures, aiding in prosecutions for offenses, issuing citations for violations  and otherwise enforcing
this chapter, ORS 474.005 to 474.095,  474.115, 475C.005 to 475C.525, 475C.540 to 475C.586 and
475C.600 to 475C.648, commission rules  and any other statutes the commission considers related to
regulating liquor, marijuana or marijuana-derived products.
(11) “Wine” means any fermented vinous liquor or fruit juice, or other fermented beverage  fit
for beverage purposes that is not a malt beverage, containing  more than one-half of one percent of
alcohol by volume and  not more than 21 percent of alcohol by volume. “Wine” includes fortified
wine. “Wine” does not include cider.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]