Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission for the biennium beginning July 1,
2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,000,000,  to be distributed to Oregon State
University for the purpose of developing, implementing and operating a  publicly accessible
website program designed to provide  members of the public with information relating to
chemical and nonchemical solutions for plant pest problems.
SECTION 2. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3903