Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Health Authority shall study access to health care in this state.
No later than September 15, 2025, the authority shall submit a report of its findings, in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, to the  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to health. The report may include recommendations for legislative changes.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 272