Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of  this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 468.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Approved disposal facility” means a facility that has been approved by the Depart-
ment of Environmental Quality to accept, destroy and dispose of eligible equipment in  ac-
cordance with all applicable laws.
(b) “Combustion lawn and garden equipment” means equipment that:
(A) Is a chainsaw, trimmer, edger, brushcutter, leaf  blower, leaf vacuum, walk-behind
lawn mower or ride-on lawn mower;
(B) Is powered by an internal combustion engine; and
(C) Meets any other  criteria established by the Environmental Quality Commission by
rule.
(c) “Eligible equipment” means combustion lawn and garden equipment that:
(A) Is in working condition; and
(B) Has been owned and used in this state by an applicant for at least two years.
(d) “Participating retailer” means a retail seller of  zero-emission lawn and garden
equipment that has entered into  an agreement with the program administrator to participate
in the rebate program established under this section.
(e) “Program administrator” means:
(A) A third-party organization that the department hires or contracts with to administer
the program established under this section; or
(B) The department, if  the department does not hire or contract with a third-party or-
ganization.
(f) “Zero-emission lawn and garden equipment” means equipment that:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 770
HB 3016
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Is a chainsaw, trimmer, edger, brushcutter, leaf  blower, leaf vacuum, walk-behind
lawn mower or ride-on lawn mower;
(B) Is cordless;
(C) Is powered by an electric motor; and
(D) Meets any other criteria established by the commission by rule.
(2) The Environmental Quality Commission shall establish by rule a program  to provide
rebate vouchers to residential and commercial applicants for the  replacement of combustion
lawn and garden equipment with zero-emission  lawn and garden equipment. The Department
of Environmental Quality may hire  or contract with a third-party organization to implement
and serve as the program administrator.
(3) To be eligible to  receive a rebate voucher, an applicant must complete an application
in the form and manner prescribed by the commission that includes:
(a) A description of the eligible equipment that the applicant intends to replace;
(b) Certification that the applicant owns the eligible equipment and has operated the  eli-
gible equipment in this state for at least two years;
(c) A description of the zero-emission lawn  and garden equipment the applicant intends
to purchase;
(d) Certification that the applicant will own and operate  the zero-emission lawn and
garden equipment in this state for at least three years;
(e) Certification that the applicant will surrender the eligible equipment to the program
administrator or an approved disposal facility for destruction and disposal; and
(f) Evidence that the applicant is an Oregon resident.
(4)(a) A voucher recipient must surrender eligible equipment to the program adminis-
trator or an approved disposal facility for destruction and disposal within 30  days of pur-
chasing replacement zero-emission lawn and garden equipment using  a rebate voucher
provided under the program.
(b) The program administrator or the approved disposal facility shall verify that  eligible
equipment surrendered for disposal:
(A) Matches the  description of the eligible equipment in the voucher recipient’s applica-
tion; and
(B) Is in working condition.
(5) The maximum amount of a rebate voucher allowed for an applicant shall be as follows:
(a) For chainsaws, trimmers, edgers or brushcutters:
(A) $300 for residential applicants; and
(B) $700 for commercial applicants.
(b) For leaf blowers or leaf vacuums:
(A) $200 for residential applicants; and
(B) $1,400 for commercial applicants.
(c) For walk-behind lawn mowers:
(A) $330 for residential applicants; and
(B) $1,500 for commercial applicants.
(d) For ride-on lawn mowers:
(A) $2,000 for residential applicants; and
(B) $15,000 for commercial applicants.
(6)(a) Rebate vouchers may only be used to purchase  zero-emission lawn and garden
[2]
HB 3016
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
equipment and any batteries or charging cables necessary for the  use of zero-emission lawn
and garden equipment that are purchased as part of the same transaction.
(b) A rebate voucher  may not be issued for an amount that exceeds the cost of all zero-
emission lawn and garden equipment, batteries and charging cords that the voucher recipient
plans to purchase.
(c) A rebate voucher may only be used to purchase  zero-emission lawn and garden
equipment that is of the same equipment type and performs  the same function as the eligible
equipment that it will replace.
(7) The program  administrator shall enter into agreements with participating retailers.
A participating retailer must:
(a) Agree to accept rebate vouchers for the  purchase of zero-emission lawn and garden
equipment and be reimbursed by the program administrator at a later date; and
(b) Comply with all program rules and policies established by the commission.
(8)(a) The department  may designate as an approved disposal facility, any facility that the
department determines is equipped to accept, destroy  and dispose of eligible equipment in
accordance with all applicable laws.
(b) Before participating in the  rebate program, an approved disposal facility must enter
into an agreement with the program administrator stating that  the approved disposal facility
will:
(A) Accept, destroy and dispose of eligible equipment;
(B) Verify that eligible equipment is in working  condition at the time it is presented for
disposal; and
(C) Comply with all program rules and policies established by the commission.
(9) A  voucher recipient that does not satisfy the requirements of subsection (4) of this
section shall reimburse the program administrator for the full amount of the voucher.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Lawn and Garden Equipment Rebate Fund is established  in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the  General Fund. Interest earned by the Lawn and
Garden Equipment Rebate Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Lawn and Garden Equipment Rebate Fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts appropriated  or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative As-
sembly;
(c) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any public or private source; and
(d) Interest earned by the fund.
(3) Moneys in the Lawn and Garden Equipment Rebate Fund are  continuously appropri-
ated to Department of Environmental  Quality to carry out the provisions of section 2 of this
2025 Act.
(4) No more than 10 percent of the moneys deposited in the fund per biennium may  be
expended to pay administrative expenses incurred in the  administration of section 2 of this
2025 Act by:
(a) The department; and
(b) Any third-party organization that the  department hires or contracts with under sec-
tion 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]
HB 3016
1
[4]