Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 4 of this 2021 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
401.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon  Public Places Are Safe Places Investment Fund is established
in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) Amounts in the Oregon Public Places Are  Safe Places Investment Fund may be in-
vested as provided in ORS 293.701 to 293.857, and interest earned  on moneys in the fund must
be credited to the fund.
(3) Amounts credited to the fund are  continuously appropriated to the Office of Emer-
gency Management for the implementation of strategies  for identifying and developing stag-
ing areas for emergency response.
(4) The fund consists of:
(a) Amounts appropriated, or otherwise provided, by the Legislative Assembly for deposit
in the fund; and
(b) Gifts, grants or contributions received by the office  from any source for deposit in
the fund.
SECTION 3.
(1) There is created within the Office of Emergency Management an advisory
committee to provide recommendations and  advice to the office regarding expenditures from
the Oregon Public Places Are Safe Places Investment Fund established under section  2 of
this 2021 Act.
(2) The advisory committee  initially consists of 26 members appointed by the Governor
as follows:
(a) The Governor shall appoint as members one representative from  each of the follow-
ing:
(A) The Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(B) The Department of Corrections;
(C) The Department of Environmental Quality;
(D) The Department of Human Services;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3211
HB 2883
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(E) The Department of Justice;
(F) The Department of Land Conservation and Development;
(G) The Department of State Police;
(H) The Department of Transportation;
(I) The office of State Resilience Officer;
(J) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services;
(K) The Oregon Department of Aviation;
(L) The Oregon Health Authority;
(M) The Public Utility Commission of Oregon;
(N) The State Department of Agriculture;
(O) The State Department of Energy;
(P) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife;
(Q) The State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries;
(R) The State Fire Marshal;
(S) The State Forestry Department;
(T) The State Marine Board;
(U) The State Parks and Recreation Department;
(V) The State Treasurer; and
(W) The Water Resources Department.
(b) The Governor shall appoint three members as follows:
(A) One member representing local governments in this state;
(B) One member representing special districts in this state; and
(C) One member of the public who has experience or  interest in disaster response and
recovery.
(3) Appointments shall  be made for a term of four years in a manner to preserve as much
as possible the representation of the advisory committee  described in subsection (2) of this
section. Vacancies shall be filled for any unexpired term as  soon as the Governor can make
such appointments.
(4) The chairperson of the advisory committee may appoint additional members to the
advisory committee. Members added  under this subsection serve for a term of four years.
If a member appointed under  this subsection leaves service on the advisory committee for
any reason, the chairperson may appoint another person for the unexpired term.
(5) The advisory committee  shall choose its own chairperson and shall meet at the call
of the chairperson or  the Director of the Office of Emergency Management. The advisory
committee shall  adopt rules to govern its proceedings and may select officers it considers
necessary.
(6) The Office of  Emergency Management shall provide office space and personnel to as-
sist the advisory committee as requested by the chairperson, within the limits  of available
funds.
(7) Members of the advisory committee shall receive no compensation for their services.
Members of the advisory committee other than members employed  in full-time public service
shall be reimbursed by the office for their actual and necessary expenses  incurred in the
performance of their duties. Such reimbursements shall be subject to the  provisions of ORS
to 292.288. Members of the advisory committee who are employed in  full-time public service
may be reimbursed by their employing agency for their actual and necessary expenses  in-
[2]
HB 2883
1
2
3
4
curred in the performance of their duties.
SECTION 4.
Sections 2 to 4 of this 2021 Act shall be known and may be cited as the
Oregon Public Places Resiliency Investment Act.
[3]