Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 10 of this 2023 Act:
(1) “Biological carbon sequestration” means  the removal of carbon dioxide from the at-
mosphere by plants and other organisms and the storage of carbon in organic matter, in-
cluding storage in grasslands, forests, soils and oceans.
(2) “Carbon dioxide equivalent” means the  amount of carbon dioxide by weight that would
produce the same global warming impact as a given weight of another greenhouse gas.
(3) “Climate resilience” means the capacity  of society, the economy and ecosystems to
cope with the impacts of climate change  by responding or reorganizing in ways that maintain
their essential function,  identity and structure, and in the case of ecosystems, biodiversity,
while also maintaining the capacity for adaptation and transformation.
(4) “Environmental justice community” has the meaning given  that term in ORS 182.535.
(5) “Managed grazing” has the meaning given that term in section 20 of this 2023 Act.
(6) “Natural and working lands” means:
(a) Lands:
(A) Actively used by an agricultural owner or operator for  an agricultural operation, in-
cluding but not limited to active engagement in farming or ranching;
(B) Producing forest products;
(C) Consisting of forests, woodlands, grasslands, sagebrush steppes, deserts,  freshwater
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4022
HB 3490
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and riparian systems, wetlands, coastal and estuarine  areas or the submerged and
submersible lands within Oregon’s territorial sea and marine  habitats associated with those
lands;
(D) Used for  recreational purposes, including, but not limited to, parks, trails, greenbelts
and other similar open space lands; or
(E) Consisting of trees, other vegetation and soils in urban and near-urban  areas, in-
cluding, but not limited to, urban watersheds,  street trees, park trees, residential trees and
riparian habitats; and
(b) Lands described in paragraph (a) of this subsection that are:
(A) Held in trust by the United States for the benefit  of any of the nine federally recog-
nized Indian tribes in this state;
(B) Held in trust by the United States for the benefit of individual members of any of the
nine federally recognized Indian tribes in this state;
(C) Within the boundaries of  the reservation of any of the nine federally recognized In-
dian tribes in this state; or
(D) Otherwise owned or controlled by any of the  nine federally recognized Indian tribes
in this state.
(7) “Natural  climate solution” means an activity that enhances or protects the capacity
of natural and working lands for  biological carbon sequestration or greenhouse gas emissions
reduction, while maintaining or increasing climate resilience,  human well-being, biodiversity
and ecological system functions.
SECTION 2.
The Legislative Assembly declares that it is the policy of this state to:
(1)(a) To sequester in Oregon’s natural and working lands, the following amounts of
carbon dioxide equivalent, as measured against a 2010-2019 “business as usual” baseline:
(A) At least 5 million metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent per year by 2030; and
(B) At least 9.5 million metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent per year by 2050.
(b) The carbon sequestration goals described in this subsection are  in addition to the
greenhouse gas reduction goals described in ORS 468A.205.
(2) Implement  strategies to advance natural climate solutions to mitigate the future im-
pacts of climate change.
(3) Invest in research to improve our understanding of:
(a) The effects of natural  climate solutions on natural and working lands and the pro-
ducts produced by natural and working lands; and
(b) The contributions of natural climate solutions to reducing greenhouse gas  emissions,
increasing net biological carbon sequestration and strengthening climate resilience.
(4) Direct state agencies to incentivize and implement natural climate solutions by:
(a) Securing and leveraging federal and private investments in  natural climate solutions
on natural and working lands;
(b) Prioritizing the use of existing programs to administer funds;
(c) Ensuring equitable benefits of  climate mitigation for environmental justice commu-
nities, landowners and land managers;
(d) Ensuring that a diversity  of landowners and managers are able to voluntarily partic-
ipate in incentive-based programs for natural climate solutions and climate resilience;
(e) Identifying resources to provide incentives  to land managers interested in voluntarily
adopting practices that optimize natural climate solutions;
[2]
HB 3490
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) Strengthening land manager education, engagement and technical assistance efforts;
(g) Providing financial assistance for tribal governments, local governments,  as defined
in ORS 174.116, or nongovernmental organizations  for the purpose of entering into voluntary
transactions with willing landowners to acquire natural and working lands to enhance the
local benefits of natural climate solutions;
(h) Increasing and deploying natural climate solutions in  and around our urban and built
environment; and
(i) Optimizing the social, health, ecological, climate  resilience and economic benefits of
natural climate solutions, including:
(A) Reducing heat island effects;
(B) Improving air quality;
(C) Improving flood control;
(D) Improving soil health and productivity;
(E) Improving wildfire resilience and community protection;
(F) Improving drought resilience and response;
(G) Improving wetland and riparian  functionality for enhanced water quality and quan-
tity;
(H) Increasing long-term fiber supplies;
(I) Increasing the climate resilience of fish and wildlife; and
(J) Increasing protection for coastal communities from the impacts of storm surge.
(5) Direct state  agencies to incorporate natural climate solutions into their missions,
programmatic investments and performance metrics.
(6) Direct state  agencies to use metrics designed to track progress in implementing na-
tural climate solutions.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Natural and  Working Lands Fund is established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the Natural and
Working Lands Fund shall be credited to the fund.  Moneys in the Natural and Working
Lands Fund are continuously appropriated  to State Department of Energy for the purposes
described in this section and section 4 of this 2023 Act.
(2) At the written request of the State Department of Energy, the State  Treasurer shall
transfer moneys from the balance available  in the Natural and Working Lands Fund on Au-
gust 1 of each year to the following funds in accordance with allocations established by the
department by rule under subsection (3) of this section:
(a) The  Agriculture Natural Climate Solutions Fund established under section 11 of this
2023 Act.
(b) The Forestry Natural Climate Solutions Fund established under  section 12 of this 2023
Act.
(c) The Watershed Natural Climate Solutions Fund established under section  13 of this
2023 Act.
(d) The Fish and Wildlife Natural  Climate Solutions Fund established under section 14
of this 2023 Act.
(3) The State Department of  Energy shall establish by rule the allocations under sub-
section (2) of  this section. Allocations may be adjusted annually and must be based on the
anticipated needs of the agency to which moneys are allocated. The department shall  consult
with the State Department of Agriculture, the State Forestry Department,  the State De-
[3]
HB 3490
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
partment of Fish and Wildlife  and the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board before adopt-
ing or adjusting allocations under this subsection.
SECTION 4.
(1) Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of  this section, the State Department
of Agriculture, the State Forestry Department, the State Department of  Fish and Wildlife
and the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall use moneys allocated from the Natural
and Working Lands Fund to:
(a) Provide incentives  to help landowners, land managers, tribal governments and envi-
ronmental justice communities adopt practices that support natural climate solutions; and
(b) Provide financial assistance for technical support for landowners, land managers,
tribal governments and  environmental justice communities for the adoption of natural cli-
mate solutions.
(2)(a) The State Department of  Agriculture, the State Forestry Department, the State
Department of Fish and Wildlife  and the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall pro-
vide incentives and financial assistance according to the following priorities:
(A) First, to  incentives and financial assistance that will increase net biological carbon
sequestration within natural and working lands.
(B) Second, to  incentives and financial assistance that will reduce greenhouse gas emis-
sions from natural and working lands.
(b) Incentives and financial assistance shall  be designed to promote, as applicable, the
following biological carbon sequestration strategies:
(A) Planting cover crops on agricultural lands, with priority given to perennial plants;
(B) No-till farming practices;
(C) Managed grazing practices on private agricultural lands;
(D) Systems  for withdrawing compostable materials from the general public waste
stream and using those materials for soil augmentation;
(E) The use of perennial crops instead of annual crops, especially on grazing lands;
(F) The application of agroforestry practices in appropriate landscapes;
(G) Lengthening logging rotations on  all state-owned and private lands to no less than
80-year cycles;
(H) The retention of mature and old-growth forests on state and federal forest lands;
(I) Preventing the conversion of natural forests to managed plantations;
(J) Increasing green tree retention on forest land during harvest;
(K) The protection of riparian buffers and restoration of forested  riparian areas and
wetlands;
(L) The reforestation of historically forested areas;
(M) Avoiding conversion of natural ecosystems that sequester carbon and  have a high
biodiversity value; and
(N) The protection of existing coastal and marine ecosystems.
(3) The State Department of Energy, in consultation with the Oregon Global Warming
Commission, the State Department of Agriculture, the State Forestry Department,  the State
Department of Fish and Wildlife and the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, shall adopt
rules to describe the areas of responsibility, in carrying out  subsection (1) of this section, for
each agency that receives an allocation from the Natural and Working Lands Fund.
(4) The State Department of Energy, the Oregon Global  Warming Commission, the State
Department of Agriculture, the State Forestry Department, the State Department of  Fish
[4]
HB 3490
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and Wildlife and the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall jointly:
(a) Coordinate, to the maximum  extent practicable, on the development and implemen-
tation of programs and activities related to natural climate solutions to reduce duplication
and overlapping or redundant efforts;
(b) Review, at regular intervals,  progress made in implementing natural climate solutions
and barriers to future implementation;
(c) Identify opportunities for  cross-agency coordination on natural climate solutions; and
(d) Identify opportunities for leveraging natural climate solution capacities across  agen-
cies.
(5) Agencies that receive an allocation from the Natural and Working  Lands Fund under
section 3 of this 2023  Act shall provide to the Oregon Global Warming Commission an ac-
counting of the uses of moneys from the fund by the agency.
(6) The Oregon Global Warming  Commission shall provide a summary of the uses of the
Natural and Working  Lands Fund, and identify additional funding needs, in a report to the
committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to the environment, in the manner provided
by ORS 192.245, no later than September 15 of each year.
SECTION 5.
(1) No later than December 1 of each even-numbered year, the Oregon Global
Warming Commission, in consultation with the State Department of  Energy, the State De-
partment of Agriculture, the State Forestry  Department, the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife and the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, shall submit  a report, in the man-
ner provided by ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related
to the environment and the Governor. The report shall include:
(a) A list  of projects funded by the Natural and Working Lands Fund during the previous
24 months and the amount expended for each project.
(b) A summary of state, federal and private sources of funding for natural climate  sol-
utions.
(c) An assessment of projects described  in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection in
light of the baseline and metrics adopted under section 6 of this 2023 Act.
(d) A list of projects,  grants or other activities that are planned for the upcoming cal-
endar year.
(e) A summary of anticipated climate threats to  Oregon’s natural and working lands in
the upcoming biennium.
(f) An assessment of gaps in programs and authorities to better fulfill the policies de-
scribed in section 2 of this 2023 Act.
(g) An inventory and assessment of existing programs  that relate to natural climate
solutions.
(2) Before finalizing the report under subsection (1)  of this section, the commission shall
solicit public comment on the report and include a summary of comments  received in the
final version of the report submitted to the Legislative Assembly and Governor.
(3) The State Department of Energy shall  provide staff support to the commission for the
purpose of preparing the reports under this section and section 4 (6) of  this 2023 Act. The
department may contract with a third party to provide staff support services  described in
this subsection.
SECTION 6. (1) The State Department of Energy and the Oregon Global Warming Com-
mission shall,  in coordination with the State Forestry Department, the State Department of
[5]
HB 3490
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Agriculture, the State Department of Fish and Wildlife and the Oregon  Watershed En-
hancement Board, and in consultation with relevant  federal agencies, establish and maintain:
(a) A net biological carbon sequestration baseline for natural and working lands;
(b) Activity-based metrics in accordance with subsection (2) of this section; and
(c) Community impact metrics in accordance with subsection (3) of this section.
(2) Activity-based metrics  shall be used to evaluate progress toward increasing net bi-
ological carbon sequestration in natural and  working lands, as measured against the net bi-
ological carbon sequestration baseline.  Activity-based  metrics  may include, but need not be
limited to, acres of lands for which certain management practices have been adopted.
(3) Community impact metrics shall be used to evaluate the  positive and negative effects,
over time, of strategies for net biological carbon sequestration in natural and working  lands
on landowners, land managers and communities. Community impact metrics may include,
but need not be limited to:
(a) Metrics  to measure the effects of net biological carbon sequestration strategies on
jobs, local economies, environmental integrity and public health; and
(b) Metrics to evaluate the accessibility of a diverse range of landowners  to net biological
carbon sequestration programs.
(4) The State Department of Energy may contract with a third party to  assist the de-
partment in performing its duties under this section.
SECTION 7.
(1) The State Department of Energy and the Oregon Global Warming Com-
mission, in coordination with the State Forestry Department, the  State Department of Ag-
riculture, the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, the Department of State Lands,  the
Department of Land Conservation and Development and federal land management  partners,
shall develop a natural and working lands net biological  carbon sequestration inventory. The
inventory must:
(a) Be based on the  best available field-based and remote sensing data on biological car-
bon sequestration and greenhouse gas emissions; and
(b) To  the greatest extent possible, be developed using methods consistent with methods
used to assess greenhouse gas fluxes related to land use, land change and forestry  for the
United States Environmental Protection Agency’s Inventory of  U.S. Greenhouse Gas Emis-
sions and Sinks.
(2) The State Department of Energy shall update the inventory and submit a report  de-
scribing the inventory to the Oregon Global Warming Commission no later than  December
1 of each even-numbered year.
(3) The State Department  of Energy may contract with a third party to assist the de-
partment in performing its duties under this section.
SECTION 8. (1) The State Department of Energy, in coordination with the Oregon Global
Warming Commission, shall study the workforce and training programs  needed to support
adoption of natural climate solutions on natural and working lands.
(2) The department shall provide the results  of the study, and may include recommen-
dations for legislation, in a report to the committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to
the environment, in the manner provided under ORS  192.245, no later than September 15,
2024.
(3) The department may contract  with a third party to assist the department in per-
forming its duties under this section.
[6]
HB 3490
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 9.
Section 8 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 10. (1) The Oregon Global Warming Commission may appoint a  natural and
working lands advisory committee to advise the  commission in the performance of the
commission’s duties under sections 1 to 10 of this 2023 Act.
(2) The advisory committee shall  consist of at least 15 members, including but not limited
to representatives of:
(a) Tribal governments;
(b) Local governments;
(c) Forest products interests or organizations;
(d) Agricultural interests or organizations;
(e) Environmental justice interests;
(f) Conservation interests;
(g) The scientific community with expertise in natural climate solutions; and
(h) Technical service providers.
(3) The State  Department of Energy shall provide staff support for the advisory com-
mittee. The department may contract  with a third party to provide staff support services
under this subsection.
SECTION 11.
(1) The  Agriculture Natural Climate Solutions Fund is established in the
State Treasury, separate  and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Agri-
culture Natural Climate Solutions Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the  fund are
continuously appropriated to State Department of Agriculture to:
(a) Provide incentives and financial assistance as  described in section 4 of this 2023 Act;
and
(b) For the administrative expenses  of the department in implementing section 4 of this
2023 Act, except that no more  than 10 percent of moneys may be used for administrative
expenses.
(2) The Agriculture Natural Climate Solutions  Fund consists of moneys transferred to
the fund under section 3 of this 2023 Act.
(3) The Family Farm Viability Account is established as  a separate account within the
Agriculture Natural Climate Solutions Fund. Of the moneys transferred to the  Agriculture
Natural Climate Solutions Fund under section 3 of  this 2023 Act, 33 percent shall be trans-
ferred to the Family Farm Viability Account. Moneys in the account shall be used  by the
department to provide competitive grants to farms or ranches with  annual gross cash farm
income under $250,000  to carry out biological carbon sequestration strategies described in
section 4 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 12. (1) The Forestry Natural Climate Solutions Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from  the General Fund. Interest earned by the Forestry
Natural Climate Solutions Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund are con-
tinuously appropriated to the State Forestry Department to:
(a) Provide incentives and financial assistance as  described in section 4 of this 2023 Act;
and
(b) For the administrative expenses  of the department in implementing section 4 of this
2023 Act, except that no more  than 10 percent of moneys may be used for administrative
expenses.
(2) The Forestry Natural  Climate Solutions Fund consists of moneys transferred to the
[7]
HB 3490
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
fund under section 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 13.
(1) The Watershed  Natural Climate Solutions Fund is established in the
State Treasury, separate  and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the
Watershed Natural Climate Solutions Fund shall  be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund
are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board to:
(a) Provide incentives and financial assistance as  described in section 4 of this 2023 Act;
and
(b) For the  administrative expenses of the board in implementing section 4 of this 2023
Act, except that no more than 10 percent  of moneys may be used for administrative ex-
penses.
(2) The Watershed Natural Climate Solutions Fund consists of moneys transferred to the
fund under section 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 14. (1) The Fish and Wildlife Natural Climate Solutions Fund is established in
the State  Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Fish
and Wildlife Natural Climate Solutions Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund
are continuously appropriated to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife to:
(a) Provide incentives and financial assistance as described in  section 4 of this 2023 Act;
and
(b) For the administrative expenses of the department in implementing  section 4 of this
2023 Act, except that no more than 10 percent of moneys  may be used for administrative
expenses.
(2) The Fish and Wildlife Natural Climate Solutions Fund  consists of moneys transferred
to the fund under section 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 15. (1) The State  Department of Agriculture shall establish by rule a compet-
itive grant program for the purchase, maintenance  and operation of farm equipment to
support the following soil health practices:
(a) Maximizing soil cover;
(b) Minimizing soil disturbance;
(c) Maintaining biodiversity;
(d) Maintaining a continual live plant in the soil; and
(e) Integrating livestock to recycle nutrients.
(2) Equipment purchased through a grant awarded under the program must be:
(a) Equipment that is typically used on a seasonal basis only; and
(b) Kept by a soil and  water conservation district for loan to small farmers within the
county in which the district is located.
(3) Equipment may be incorporated into any existing tool lending programs  within the
county.
(4)(a) The department shall convene an advisory  committee in accordance with ORS
183.333 to assist the department in drafting rules under this section.  The advisory committee
shall also advise the department in evaluating grant applications according to an  applicant’s
ability to support the soil health practices described in subsection (1) of this section.
(b) As far as is practicable, the membership of the advisory committee shall represent a
diversity of social,  economic, cultural and geographic backgrounds. At least one member of
the committee shall be an owner or employee of a farm or  ranch with annual gross cash
farm income under $250,000.
[8]
HB 3490
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
(5) Rules adopted under this section may include a list of  equipment types that are eli-
gible to be purchased with grant funds.
SECTION 16.
In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $ , which may be expended for the  purpose of
awarding grants under section 15 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 17. Section 18 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 279C.
SECTION 18. Every public improvement contract for the construction or renovation of
a public building shall contain a  condition requiring that any wood product used in the con-
struction or renovation bear a certification from the Forest Stewardship Council.
SECTION 19. Section 20 of this 2023 Act  is added to and made part of ORS 273.805 to
273.825.
SECTION 20. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Biological carbon sequestration” has  the meaning given that term in section 1 of this
2023 Act.
(b) “Managed grazing” means rotational or  deferred grazing, managed in ways that in-
crease biological carbon sequestration in accordance with the best available science regard-
ing crop, soil and livestock classifications, that moves livestock through a series of three or
more paddocks according to their forage  needs, desired residue height and biological carbon
sequestration levels in vegetation and soils.
(2) In addition to the terms described in ORS 273.815, the Department  of State Lands
shall require managed grazing on common school grazing lands  in all leases entered into on
or after June 1, 2024.
(3) The department shall adopt  rules to implement this section. Rules adopted by the
department may include approved managed grazing techniques, including but not limited to:
(a) The use of mobile or temporary fencing;
(b) Requirements for the regular rotation of herds to lessen grazing intensity; and
(c) The planting of perennial grass seeds instead of annual grass seeds.
(4) In adopting rules under this section, the department shall incorporate the best avail-
able science on soil and biological carbon sequestration.  Rules for managed grazing tech-
niques must be designed to achieve the  goal that common school grazing lands achieve net
biological carbon sequestration.
SECTION 21.
In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of State Lands, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $ , which may be expended for the purpose of carrying
out section 20 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 22. (1) The State Forester shall consider the impacts of  climate change in any
determination of the greatest permanent value of forest lands managed by the State Forester
pursuant to ORS 530.050 or 530.490.
(2) The State Board of Forestry shall adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 23.
This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[9]