Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Local Public Health Incentive  Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General  Fund. Interest earned by the Local Public
Health Incentive Fund shall be credited to the fund. The Local  Public Health Incentive Fund
consists of moneys appropriated to the fund by  the Legislative Assembly, grants, donations,
contributions or gifts received from public or  private sources under subsection (2) of this
section and interest earned upon moneys in the fund.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may accept  grants, donations, contributions or gifts
from any public or private source for deposit in the fund.
(3) Moneys in  the fund are continuously appropriated to the authority for carrying out
the provisions of section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “local public health agency” means:
(a) A health district formed under ORS 431.443;
(b) An  intergovernmental entity that provides public health services pursuant to an
agreement entered into under ORS 190.010; or
(c) A  nongovernmental entity that has contracted with a county government to provide
public health services pursuant to ORS 431.413.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide incentives  to increase the recruitment and
retention of professionals  in the local public health workforce who have associate, bachelor’s,
master’s or doctoral degrees or other credentials, who are people of  color, tribal members
or residents of rural areas in this state  and who can provide culturally responsive health
services at local public health agencies that serve underserved populations and  communities
that include:
(a) Tribal members;
(b) People of color;
(c) Individuals who identify as members of the LGBTQ+ community;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1067
HB 2773
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Veterans;
(e) Persons with disabilities; and
(f) Individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities.
(3) The authority shall increase access to services for  rural and underserved communi-
ties by:
(a) Expanding funding to provide incentives to traditional health workers, unlicensed and
licensed public health providers and other local public health professionals who are culturally
competent.
(b) Developing programs  and providing incentives to increase the number of individuals
training for and entering an occupation in the  field of public health and to improve the re-
tention of the local public health workforce in this state through:
(A) Scholarships for undergraduate  and graduate students who are pursuing a program
or course of study that focuses on public health;
(B) Student loan forgiveness and repayment assistance;
(C) Housing assistance;
(D) Sign-on bonuses;
(E) Flextime and part-time opportunities;
(F) Retention bonuses;
(G) Professional development;
(H) Tax subsidies;
(I) Child care subsidies;
(J) Tuition assistance;
(K) Bonuses and stipends for supervisors of interns or fellows;
(L) Financial assistance for licensing  examination fees and costs of examination prepa-
ration courses;
(M) Living stipends for students enrolled at an institution of  higher education in a pro-
gram or course of study that focuses on public health; and
(N) Credit counseling services.
(4) The authority shall  develop a program to award local public health professionals stu-
dent loan forgiveness or student loan repayment assistance based on  criteria, including ten-
ure or the completion of a commitment of service at a local public health agency,  as
prescribed by the authority by rule.
(5) The authority may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount  of $40,000,000 for deposit in the Local Public Health Incentive
Fund established under section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4.
(1) As used in this section, “local public  health agency” has the meaning
given that term in section 2 of this 2023 Act.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall  establish a program to provide grants to local
public health agencies that provide interns  and fellows with opportunities to receive training
in, and clinical supervision of, nursing duties performed in a local public health agency.
(3) The authority shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 5.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
[2]
HB 2773
1
2
3
4
5
General Fund, the amount  of $7,000,000 for carrying out the provisions of section 4 of this
2023 Act.
SECTION 6.
This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]