Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2017, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $3 million for the purposes of carrying out
the requirements of section 2 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Department of  Administrative Services shall issue a grant
in the amount of $3  million to an organization that is dedicated to addressing community
needs relating to  the October 1, 2015, shooting on the campus of Umpqua Community College.
(2) The organization shall use grant funds to assess and address community needs.
SECTION 3.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1581