Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A person that plants  turf type perennial ryegrass or turf type tall fescue
in a field for sale as agricultural seed pursuant to ORS 576.715 to 576.744 shall:
(a) Register the field with Oregon State University.
(b) Annually report the volume and type of turf type perennial ryegrass or turf type tall
fescue produced in the field to the university.
(2) The university shall establish a process and method for the  registration and reporting
required by subsection (1) of this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4100