Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 326.125 is amended to read:
326.125. (1) For  the purpose of assisting school districts and education service districts with
capital costs, the Office of School Facilities is established within the Department of Education.
(2) The office shall be responsible for:
[(a) Distributing hardship  grants to school districts with facility needs. Grants awarded under this
paragraph may not exceed $500,000 and shall be provided to school districts based on the order  in
which the Department of Education receives the completed applications for the grants. A school district
may be  eligible for a grant under this paragraph if the school district meets requirements established
by the State Board of Education by rule, including any requirements to provide matching funds. ]
(a) Distributing grants as provided by section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(b) Providing technical assistance  and establishing and maintaining standards for facilities as-
sessments and long-range facilities plans for school districts and education service districts.
(c) Administering a  certification program for qualified providers of technical assistance for the
purposes described in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
[(d) Providing grants to school  districts and education service districts for the cost of technical
assistance for the purposes described in paragraph (b)  of this subsection. The State Board of Education
may establish by rule requirements for a district to receive a grant under  this paragraph. Grants for
a district under  this paragraph may not exceed the following amounts, as adjusted under subsection
(2) of this section: ]
[(A) $40,000 for a facilities assessment; ]
[(B) $40,000 for a long-range facilities plan; ]
[(C) $40,000 for an assessment of district facilities for  potential environmental hazards under ORS
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 726
HB 3014
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
332.331; and]
[(D) $40,000 for a seismic assessment or other specialized assessment. ]
[(e)] (d) Maintaining the Oregon School Facilities  Database. The database must include infor-
mation that:
(A) Assists with analyzing, planning and prioritizing school capital improvement needs for school
districts and education service  districts by providing district-to-district and school-to-school com-
parisons; and
(B) Is required by the State Board of Education by rule.
[(f)] (e) Administering the grant program described in ORS 286A.801.
[(g)] (f) Administering a statewide facilities assessment program.
[(2) To account  for effects of inflation, the State Board of Education shall, by rule, biennially adjust
the maximum amounts of technical assistance grants specified in subsection (1)(d)  of this section based
on the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as published  by the
Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. ]
SECTION 2.
(1) The Office of School Facilities within the Department of Education shall
award grants as provided by  this section for the purpose of assisting school districts and
education service districts with capital costs.
(2)(a) The office shall distribute hardship grants to school districts with facility needs.
(b) Grants awarded under this subsection may not exceed $500,000 and shall  be provided
to school districts based on the order in which the Department of  Education receives the
completed applications for the grants.
(c) A school district may be eligible for a grant under  this subsection if the school dis-
trict meets requirements established by the State Board of Education by rule, including any
requirements to provide matching funds.
(3)(a) The office shall distribute grants to school districts  and education service districts
for the cost of technical assistance for the purposes described in ORS 326.125 (2)(b).
(b) Grants for a district under this subsection may not exceed the  following amounts, as
adjusted under subsection (5) of this section:
(A) $40,000 for a facilities assessment;
(B) $40,000 for a long-range facilities plan;
(C) $40,000 for an assessment of district facilities for  potential environmental hazards
under ORS 332.331; and
(D) $40,000 for a seismic assessment or other specialized assessment.
(c) The State Board of  Education may establish by rule requirements for a district to
receive a grant under this subsection.
(4)(a) The office shall distribute grants to school districts  and education service districts
from the School District Facility Equity  Fund established in section 3 of this 2025 Act to pay
for facility needs.
(b) Grants awarded from the School District Facility Equity Fund shall be distributed  as
follows:
(A) No more than  50 percent of the amount available for distribution from the fund for
the biennium, as determined by the State Board of Education, may be distributed to  school
districts and education service districts as provided by  this subparagraph. Distributions may
not be made on condition of the  district providing matching funds and may not exceed $2.5
million per grant recipient per biennium. Distributions  must be used for facility replacement,
[2]
HB 3014
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
repair or maintenance or for health and safety upgrades.  Distributions may be used for any
facility that is owned by the district and that  is used to serve students, including public
charter schools.
(B) No more than 50 percent of the amount available for distribution  from the fund for
the biennium, as determined by the State Board of Education, may be distributed to school
districts as provided  by this subparagraph. Distributions must be made on condition of the
district providing matching funds and  may not exceed $10 million per grant recipient per
biennium. Distributions must  be used for construction, remodeling or renovations. Distrib-
utions may be  used for any facility that is owned by the district and that is used to serve
students, including public charter schools.
(c) The State Board of Education shall adopt by rule:
(A) Eligibility requirements for a grant distributed under this subsection, which:
(i) Must include a demonstration of financial need; and
(ii) May include consideration of:
(I) Previous attempts by the district to receive voter approval for  a local general obli-
gation bond for capital costs;
(II) Whether the district has received any  Oregon School Capital Improvement Matching
Program grants or grants through the seismic rehabilitation grant program;
(III) The financial resources of the district; and
(IV) Other criteria identified by the board.
(B) Matching requirements and prioritization requirements for a  grant distributed under
this subsection, which may include consideration of:
(i) The percentage of poverty families within the district;
(ii) The assessed value of taxable property in the district;
(iii) The percentage of students from the district who are in a student group  identified
in ORS 327.180 (2)(b); and
(iv) Other criteria identified by the board.
(5) To account for the effects of inflation,  the State Board of Education shall, by rule,
biennially adjust the maximum  amounts specified in subsections (3) and (4) of this section
based on  the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as
published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
SECTION 3.
(1) The School District Facility Equity Fund is  established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the School Dis-
trict Facility Equity Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the School District Facility Equity Fund are continuously appropriated  to
the Department of Education for the purposes set forth in section 2 (4) of this 2025 Act.
(3) The School District Facility Equity Fund shall consist of moneys credited to the fund,
including:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund or otherwise made  available to the fund by the
Legislative Assembly;
(b) Earnings on moneys in the fund;
(c) Moneys received from the federal or state government; and
(d) Moneys from any other source, including, but not limited to, grants and gifts.
SECTION 4.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  at the request of the Depart-
ment of Education, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS
[3]
HB 3014
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an  amount that produces $100,000,000 in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2)  of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds  of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Department of Education for deposit in the  School District Facility Equity Fund established
in section 3 of this 2025 Act for distribution as grants under section 2 (4) of this 2025 Act.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will create  jobs,
further economic development, finance public  education or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) All students in  this state deserve the opportunity to attend school in a healthy and
safe building that provides a great learning environment for students and a great  teaching
environment for educators.
(b) Over the past decade, the  Legislative Assembly has made significant investments in
improving this state’s kindergarten through grade 12 public  school infrastructure, including
the creation of the Office of School Facilities within the Department of Education, the  cre-
ation and funding of the Oregon School Capital Improvement Matching  Program grants, and
significant funding increases in the seismic rehabilitation grant program. Despite these ef-
forts, many school districts struggle to pass local construction bonds and there  are likely
billions of dollars in  school facilities improvements and deferred maintenance projects in
school districts across this state.
(c) Natural disasters, wildfires and climate change  are putting stress and strain on fa-
cilities, and schools have had to close  temporarily due to unsafe air quality, excessive heat
or other unhealthy learning environments.
(d) All students in  this state deserve the opportunity to attend a high quality school that
is healthy and safe and, in order to achieve the goal of providing high quality schools that
are healthy and safe, additional investment is needed to support school districts that struggle
financially to build and maintain schools.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 327.008 is amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
(b) The Department of Education, on behalf  of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from  public and private sources for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State School  Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred from the Fund for Student Success, moneys transferred from the  Education Sta-
bility Fund and the Oregon Marijuana Account and moneys received  as provided in paragraph (b)
of this subsection.
(d) The State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for  the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to  327.077, 327.095, 327.099, 327.101, 327.125, 327.137, 327.348, 327.356 to
327.359, 336.575, 336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961.
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each school  district a State School
Fund grant,  consisting of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a transportation
grant and a  high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue, computed as provided in ORS 327.011
and 327.013.
(3) For the first school year after a public charter school ceases to  operate because of dissol-
[4]
HB 3014
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ution or closure or because of  termination or nonrenewal of a charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund to  each school district that had sponsored a public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount equal to the school district’s  general purpose grant per extended
ADMw multiplied by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year.
(4) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each education  service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All  figures used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund shall be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in average  daily membership used in the distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend from  the State School Fund no
more than $3 million for expenses incurred  by the department in providing support to school dis-
tricts, education service districts and public charter schools at any time before, during or after a
threat or hazard that may affect a school  district, an education service district or a public charter
school and for the purpose of helping to improve the safety and security of students and staff.
(8) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend from  the State School Fund no
more than $10 million  for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities under ORS 326.125
[(1)(b) to (g) ] or section 2 (3) of this 2025 Act .
(9) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer to the Pediatric Nursing  Facil-
ity Account established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs  of educational ser-
vices provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer the amount of  $55 million from
the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
(11)(a) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $39.5 million from  the State
School Fund to the Educator Advancement Fund established under ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The total  amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by $6 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school districts  from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by $16.75 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education service  districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by $16.75 million.
(c) For each biennium, the  amounts identified in this subsection shall be adjusted by the same
percentage  by  which the instructions furnished to state agencies by the Governor under ORS 291.204
direct the state agencies to adjust their agency budget requests for special payments under ORS
291.216 (6)(a)(C).
(12) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Statewide English  Language Learner Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
(13) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from the  State
School  Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this  section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(14) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $350,000 from the State
[5]
HB 3014
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
School Fund to provide administration of and support for the development  of talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration of a program to increase the number  of licensed speech-language
pathologists and certified speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.398.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $2 million from  the State School
Fund for deposit to the Healthy School Facilities Fund established under ORS  332.337.
Notwithstanding ORS 332.337, the department may expend moneys received in the Healthy  School
Facilities  Fund  under this subsection only as grants for costs associated with testing for elevated
levels of lead in water used for drinking or food preparation.
(17) Each biennium, the Department  of Education shall transfer an amount not to exceed
$5,595,000 for the purpose  of making tampons and sanitary pads available as provided by ORS
326.545.
(18) Each fiscal year, the  Department of Education shall transfer the amount of $2.5 million from
the State School Fund to the Small School District Supplement Fund established in ORS 327.359.
(19) Each biennium,  the Department of Education shall transfer to the Oregon Military Depart-
ment the amount necessary to pay the costs of  educational services provided to students admitted
to programs operated by the military department for at-risk youth, as described  in ORS 396.360, that
are outstanding after any General Fund appropriations  and the calculation of available federal funds
for the programs.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 326.549 is amended to read:
326.549. (1) At least annually, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall convene  a school
facilities advisory group.
(2) The advisory group convened under this section shall consist of:
(a) Experts in finance, architecture, engineering and construction; and
(b) Representatives of school districts.
(3) The advisory group shall assist the superintendent  in issues related to school facilities. To
assist the superintendent, the advisory group shall:
(a) Review the grant program established by ORS 286A.801;
(b) Review the grant programs administered as provided by section 2 of this 2025 Act;
[(b)] (c) Review the certification program  for qualified providers of technical assistance de-
scribed in ORS 326.125 [ (1)(c)] (2)(c) ;
[(c)] (d) Review the maintenance  of the Oregon School Facilities Database described in ORS
326.125 [(1)(e)] (2)(d); and
[(d)] (e) Advise the superintendent on any needed changes of programs  related to school facili-
ties or capital costs of school districts.
SECTION 7.
(1) No later than January 1, 2026, the  Superintendent of Public Instruction
shall convene the school facilities advisory group  described in ORS 326.549 for the purpose
of reviewing and making recommendations for sustainable funding sources for the School
District Facility Equity Fund established in section 3 of this 2025 Act.
(2) No later than June  30, 2026, the school facilities advisory group shall present a report
to the State  Board of Education that makes recommendations for sustainable funding
sources for the School District Facility Equity Fund.
SECTION 8.
Section 7 of this 2025 Act is repealed on July 1, 2026.
SECTION 9. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
[6]
HB 3014
1
2
3
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[7]