Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2023 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 660.300
to 660.364.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Community college” has the meaning given that term in ORS 341.005.
(b) “Institution of higher education” means a public  college or community college or a
university.
(c) “University” means:
(A) A public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(B) Oregon Health and Science University.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall, in  coordination with the
Oregon Health Authority, establish a grant program for the purpose of distributing  moneys
to institutions of higher education to develop training and instructional  programs that pre-
pare students to enter into the behavioral health workforce.
(3) Moneys awarded to a recipient under subsection (2) of this section may be used for:
(a) Scholarships or other tuition assistance for students going into the field  of behavioral
health.
(b) Developing pathways to employment opportunities in the field of behavioral health.
(c) Recruitment and outreach efforts to increase the number  of students training for and
entering into the behavioral health workforce.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3517
HB 2977
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Job training and instruction for behavioral health occupations.
(4)(a) The commission shall establish criteria and standards by which an institution  of
higher education may apply for and receive a grant award.
(b) The commission shall award grants based on the ability of the  applicant to use the
grant as required under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The commission may adopt any  rules necessary for the implementation and adminis-
tration of this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) As  used in this section, “institution of higher education” has the meaning
given that term in section 2 of this 2023 Act.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall, in consultation with  the State
Workforce and Talent Development Board  and the Oregon Health Authority, establish and
administer a program for the purpose of awarding grants to local workforce  development
boards that  provide workforce programs and promote workforce development activities in
the field of behavioral health.
(3) Moneys awarded to a recipient under subsection (2) of this section may be used to:
(a) Develop programs that provide individuals with  training to attain employment in the
behavioral health workforce.
(b) Collaborate with high schools, employers and institutions of higher education to  con-
nect individuals with employment opportunities in the field of behavioral health.
(4)(a) The commission shall establish criteria and standards  by which a local workforce
development board may apply for and receive a grant award.
(b) The commission shall award grants based on the ability of the  applicant to use the
grant as required under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The commission may adopt any  rules necessary for the implementation and adminis-
tration of this section.
SECTION 4.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $1,000,000, for carrying out the provisions
of section 2 of this 2023 Act.
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, for carrying out the provisions of section  3 of
this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall collect and report geographic data and
data described in ORS 413.164 and on the recipients of incentives under ORS 675.655.
(2) Any entity that contracts  with the authority to administer incentives under ORS
675.655 shall collect and biannually report  to the authority data described in ORS 413.164 on
the recipients of the incentives.
(3) Each recipient of a grant  under ORS 675.658 shall collect and biannually report to the
Oregon Health Authority data described in ORS 413.164 on  the associates or other individuals
receiving clinical supervision from the grantee.
(4) The  authority shall prescribe by rule the form and manner for reporting the data
collected under this section. The authority shall enter data received under this section into
the data system described in ORS 413.163.
(5) Data collected and reported  under this section may be disclosed only in the aggregate
[2]
HB 2977
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and in a form that does not allow for the personal identification of individuals whose  data is
disclosed.
SECTION 6.
(1) An oversight council is established to advise the Oregon Health Authority
in carrying out ORS 675.650, 675.655 and 675.658. The council shall assist the authority in
identifying and eliminating systemic barriers that  influence the funding, allocation of funding
and policy choices with respect to the behavioral  health workforce. The authority shall pro-
vide the council with regular, ongoing  updates on the implementation of ORS 675.650, 675.655
and 675.658 and other programs designed to expand access to behavioral health  providers in
this state, including information about deadlines for program applicants, outreach plans and
strategies to increase participation  in the programs, application processes and the demo-
graphics of individuals receiving incentives or benefits.
(2) The council consists of 21 members appointed as follows:
(a) The Speaker  of the House of Representatives shall appoint two members of the
council from among the members of the House of Representatives;
(b) The President of the Senate shall  appoint two members of the council from among
the members of the Senate;
(c) The Speaker of the House of Representatives  and the President of the Senate shall
jointly appoint one member from the staff of the Speaker or the President;
(d) The Governor shall appoint:
(A) Two representatives of county governments;
(B) One representative of community mental health programs;
(C) Two representatives of the federally recognized Indian tribes in this state;
(D) Two academic professionals with expertise in equity, behavioral health  or workforce
development;
(E) Three individuals with practical experience in one or more of the following fields:
(i) Treatment for substance use disorder, gambling addiction or other addictive  behav-
iors;
(ii) Mental health treatment;
(iii) Post-secondary or adult education;
(iv) Primary and secondary education; or
(v) Child care or early learning;
(F) Five individuals who are one or more of the following:
(i) An individual who experiences racism or racial injustice;
(ii) A resident of an area that  is underserved in access to behavioral health treatment
or a resident of a rural area of this state;
(iii) An advocate for equity or an equity professional;
(iv) A bilingual or non-English speaker;
(v) An individual with life experience in seeking or receiving mental health care;
(vi) An individual with life experience with substance use, problem gambling  or addiction;
(vii) A culturally specific peer support worker or traditional health worker;
(viii) An individual who has experienced challenges in  joining or advancing in the behav-
ioral health workforce;
(ix) A student who is Black, Indigenous or a Person of Color; or
(x) An individual with a disability; and
(G) One individual from the Governor’s staff.
[3]
HB 2977
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
(3) A  majority of the voting members of the council constitutes a quorum for the trans-
action of business.
(4) Official action by the council  requires the approval of a majority of the voting mem-
bers of the council.
(5) The council shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(6) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(7) The council shall meet at times and places specified by the call of the chairperson or
of a majority of the voting members of the council.
(8) The council may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the council.
(9) The authority shall provide staff support to the council and  shall make and publish
recordings of each meeting.
(10) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the council  are nonvoting mem-
bers of the council and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(11) Members of the council  who are not members of the Legislative Assembly are enti-
tled to stipends in amounts sufficient  to compensate them for their time and for ancillary
costs, such as child care,  necessary for them to attend the meetings and to reimbursement
for travel and other expenses reasonably incurred by them in carrying  out their official du-
ties as provided in ORS 292.495.
(12) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the council in the performance of  the duties of the council and, to the extent permitted by
laws relating to confidentiality,  to furnish information and advice the members of the council
consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 7.
Section 6 of this 2023 Act is repealed on July 1, 2025.
[4]