Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Human Services,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $4,300,000:
(a) Which shall be expended to award grants to eligible agencies, as defined in ORS
411.139, to supplement the funding received by eligible agencies  from the United States De-
partment of State under 8 U.S.C. 1522 to provide services as described in ORS 411.139; and
(b) Of which up to $600,000 shall be granted  to an employment service provider described
in subsection (2) of this section to provide coordination of employment services.
(2) The Department of  Human Services shall select an employment service provider to
receive the moneys described in subsection (1)(b) of this section that is an  established cul-
turally responsive organization  and provides employment and workforce development ser-
vices to refugees, as defined in ORS 411.139.
SECTION 2. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1669