Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 151.216, as amended  by sections 78, 94 and 101, chapter 281, Oregon Laws
2023, is amended to read:
151.216. (1) The Oregon Public Defense Commission shall:
(a) Establish and maintain a public defense system  that ensures the provision of public defense
services consistent with the Oregon Constitution, the United States Constitution  and Oregon and
national standards of justice.
(b) Adopt policies for public defense providers that:
(A) Ensure compensation, resources  and caseloads are in accordance with national and regional
best practices;
(B) Ensure all public defense provider  contracts provide for compensation that is commensurate
with the character of service performed;
(C) Ensure funding  and resources to support required data collection and training requirements;
and
(D) Recognize the need to consider overhead costs that account for  the cost of living and busi-
ness cost differences in each county or jurisdiction, including but  not limited to rent, professional
membership dues, malpractice insurance and other insurance and other reasonable and usual oper-
ating costs.
(c) Establish operational and contracting  systems that allow for oversight, ensure transparency
and stakeholder engagement and promote equity, inclusion and culturally specific representation.
(d) Review the caseload policies described in paragraph (b)(A) of  this subsection annually, and
revise the policies as necessary and at least every four years.
(e) Adopt a statewide workload plan, based on the  caseload policies described in paragraph
(b)(A) of  this subsection, that takes into account the needs of each county or jurisdiction, practice
structure and type of practice overseen by the commission.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 660
HB 2734
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) Submit the budget of the commission to the Legislative Assembly after the budget is submit-
ted to  the commission by the executive director and approved by the voting members of the com-
mission. The chairperson of the commission shall present the budget to the Legislative Assembly.
(g) Adopt a compensation plan, classification system and affirmative action plan for the com-
mission that are commensurate with other state agencies.
(h) Adopt policies, procedures, standards and guidelines regarding:
(A) The determination of financial eligibility of persons entitled to be  represented by appointed
counsel at state expense;
(B) The appointment of counsel, including the  appointment of counsel at state expense regard-
less of financial eligibility in juvenile delinquency matters;
(C) The fair  compensation of counsel appointed to represent a person financially eligible for
appointed counsel at state expense;
(D) Appointed counsel compensation disputes;
(E) The costs associated with the representation of a person by appointed counsel in the state
courts that are required to be paid by the state; and
(F) The types of fees and expenses subject to a preauthorization requirement.
(i) Reimburse the State Court Administrator from funds deposited  in the Public Defense Services
Account established by ORS 151.225 for the costs  of personnel and other costs associated with lo-
cation of eligibility verification and screening personnel pursuant to ORS  151.489 by the State Court
Administrator.
(j) Develop, adopt and oversee the  implementation, enforcement and modification of policies,
procedures,  minimum standards and guidelines to ensure that public defense providers are providing
effective assistance of counsel consistently to all eligible persons in this state  as required by statute
and the Oregon and United States Constitutions. The policies, procedures, standards and  guidelines
described in this paragraph apply to employees of  the commission and to any person or entity that
contracts with the commission to provide public defense services in this state.
(k) Set minimum standards by which appointed counsel are trained and supervised.
(L) Establish a system, policies and procedures for the mandatory collection of data  concerning
the operation of the commission and all public defense providers.
(m) Enter into contracts and hire attorneys to bring the  delivery of public defense services into
and maintain compliance with the minimum policies,  procedures, standards and guidelines described
in this subsection. All contracts for the  provision of public defense services to which the commission
is a party must include a  requirement for collection by the commission of data determined by the
commission to be  qualitatively necessary for any report required to be submitted to the Legislative
Assembly.
(n) At least once every two years, report to  the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
related to the judiciary, in the manner provided in ORS  192.245, and to the Governor and Chief
Justice, concerning compliance metrics  for the minimum standards described in this subsection and
recommendations for legislative changes.
(o) Develop standard operating expectations for persons and entities providing public  defense
services.
(p) In consultation with the Judicial Department, ensure  the existence of policies that create a
standardized process for determining and verifying financial eligibility for appointed counsel  under
ORS 151.485.
(q) Ensure access to systematic and comprehensive training programs  for attorneys for the
[2]
HB 2734
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
purpose of meeting statewide standards set by the commission.
(r) Enter into contracts or interagency agreements with  the Oregon Department of Administra-
tive Services for the purpose of supporting state public defense population forecasts  and other re-
lated forecasts.
(s) Establish any other policies, procedures,  standards and guidelines for the conduct of the
commission’s affairs and promulgate policies necessary to carry out all powers  and duties of the
commission.
(2) When establishing the minimum policies, procedures, standards and guidelines described  in
this section, the commission shall adhere to the following principles:
(a) Appointed counsel shall be provided sufficient time and a space where attorney-client
confidentiality is safeguarded for meetings with clients.
(b) The workload of appointed counsel must be controlled to permit effective  representation.
Economic disincentives or  incentives that impair the ability of appointed counsel to provide effective
assistance of counsel must be avoided. The commission may develop workload  controls to enhance
appointed counsel’s ability to provide effective representation.
(c) The  ability, training and experience of appointed counsel must match the nature and com-
plexity of the case to which the counsel is appointed.
(d) The same appointed counsel shall continuously  represent a client throughout the pendency
of the case and shall appear at every court appearance other than ministerial hearings.
(e) The commission shall establish continuing legal education requirements for public  defense
providers who are employed by or contract with the  commission that are specific to the subject
matter area and practice of each type of court-appointed counsel.
(f) The commission and public defense providers shall systematically review  appointed counsel
for efficiency and for effective representation according to commission standards.
(3) The commission shall be organized in  a manner for the effective delivery of public defense
services as prescribed by the policies and  procedures created pursuant to statute to financially eli-
gible persons and consistent  with the budgetary structure established for the commission by the
Legislative Assembly.
(4) The commission shall hire attorneys to serve as  appointed counsel, including at the trial
level in Oregon circuit courts, and shall  establish a trial division within the commission consisting
of attorneys employed by the commission who are trial-level public defense providers.
(5)(a) The commission shall establish, supervise and maintain a panel  of qualified counsel who
contract with the commission and are directly assigned  to cases. The commission shall develop a
process for certification of attorneys to  the panel with periodic eligibility and case review. Panel
attorneys are not employees of the commission.
(b) The payment of panel counsel:
(A) May not be lower than the hourly rate established by the commission.
(B) Shall be adjusted to reflect the same percentage amount of any positive cost of  living ad-
justment granted to employees in the management service in other executive branch agencies.
(C) May not provide a financial conflict of interest or  economic incentives or disincentives that
impair an attorney’s ability to provide effective representation.
(6)(a) The commission may  enter into contracts  for the  provision of public defense services
with:
(A) Nonprofit public defense organizations ;
(B) Entities that subcontract with other entities  or persons for the provision of public
[3]
HB 2734
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
defense services;
(C) Individual attorneys who  are not part of the panel described in subsection (5) of this
section; and
(D) Private law firms .
(b) The commission may not enter into a contract or agreement that pays appointed counsel  a
flat fee per case.
(7) The  policies, procedures, standards and guidelines adopted by the commission must be made
available in an accessible manner to the public on the commission’s website.
(8) Policies, procedures, standards and  guidelines adopted by the commission supersede any
conflicting rules, policies or procedures of  the Public Defender Committee, State Court Administra-
tor, circuit courts, the Court of Appeals, the Supreme Court and  the Psychiatric Security Review
Board related to the exercise of the commission’s administrative responsibilities under this section
and transferred duties, functions and powers as they occur.
(9) The  commission may accept gifts, grants or contributions from any source, whether public
or private. However, the commission may not  accept a gift, grant or contribution if acceptance
would create a conflict of interest. Moneys accepted under this subsection  shall be deposited in the
Public Defense Services Account established by ORS 151.225 and  expended for the purposes for
which given or granted.
(10) With the approval of a majority of the voting members of the commission, the commission
may advocate for  or against legislation before the Legislative Assembly or policies or budgets being
considered by the Legislative Assembly.
(11) The commission shall  request that the Governor include in the Governor’s requested budget,
for each fiscal period, at a minimum, the  amount of funds identified by the commission as being
necessary to carry out the duties and activities of the commission.
(12) The commission may adopt rules pursuant to ORS chapter 183.
SECTION 2.
 Section 102, chapter 281, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 102.  (1)(a) The  amendments to ORS 151.211, 151.216 and 151.219 by sections 93 to 95 , [ of
this 2023 Act ] chapter 281, Oregon Laws 2023,  become operative on July 1, 2025.
(b) The amendments to ORS 151.213 [ and 151.216] by [ sections 100 and 101 of this 2023 Act ]
section 100, chapter 281, Oregon Laws 2023,  become operative on July 1, 2027.
(c) The amendments to ORS 151.216 by section 101, chapter 281, Oregon  Laws 2023, be-
come operative on the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(d) The amendments to ORS 151.216 by section 1 of this  2025 Act become operative on the
effective date of this 2025 Act.
(2)(a) A person  who is a member of the Oregon Public Defense Commission on July 1, 2027, may
finish the person’s term as a commission member and is eligible  for reappointment, but, beginning
July 1, 2027, may be removed by the Governor only for inefficiency, neglect of duty  or malfeasance
in office.
(b) The person serving as executive director  of the Oregon Public Defense Commission on July
1, 2027, may finish the person’s term  as executive director and is eligible for reappointment, but,
beginning on July 1, 2027, serves at the pleasure of the voting members of the commission.
(3) The Oregon Public Defense Commission, the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services
and the Governor may take any action before the operative dates specified in subsection (1)  of this
section that is necessary to enable the commission  to exercise, on and after the operative dates
specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and  powers conferred on those
[4]
HB 2734
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
entities by the amendments  to ORS 151.211, 151.213, 151.216 and 151.219 by sections 93 to 95, 100
and 101, [ of this 2023 Act ] chapter 281, Oregon Laws 2023 .
SECTION 3.
The Oregon Public Defense  Commission shall consult with the individuals
and entities described in ORS 151.216 (6)(a) when:
(1) Developing and adopting the  policies, procedures, standards and guidelines described
in ORS 151.216; and
(2) Determining how those policies,  procedures, standards and guidelines applicable to
those individuals and entities are implemented.
SECTION 4. Section 3 of this 2025 Act is repealed on July 1, 2027.
SECTION 5.  ORS 151.211, as amended by section 93,  chapter 281, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
151.211. For purposes of ORS 151.211 to 151.221:
(1) “Appointed counsel” includes trial-level  and appellate attorneys who are employees of the
Oregon Public Defense Commission, attorneys  employed by a nonprofit public defense organization ,
attorneys employed by  a private law firm who provide public defense services, attorneys who
provide public defense services as part  of an entity that subcontracts with other entities or
persons for the provision of public defense services  and attorneys [ on the panel  of qualified
counsel described  in ORS 151.216 (5) ] who contract  directly with the commission to provide public
defense services , regardless of  whether the attorney is on the panel of qualified counsel de-
scribed in ORS 151.216 (5) .
(2) “Chief Justice” means the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court.
(3) “Commission” means the Oregon Public Defense Commission.
(4) “Nonprofit public defense organization” means  a nonprofit organization that employs attor-
neys who provide public defense services.
SECTION 6.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[5]