Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 801.208 is amended to read:
801.208. (1) “Commercial motor vehicle” means  a motor vehicle or combination of motor vehicles
and one or more vehicles that:
(a) Has a gross combination weight rating  or gross combination weight of 26,001 pounds or
more, whichever is greater, inclusive of one or more towed units, with a gross vehicle weight rating
or gross vehicle weight of more than 10,000 pounds, whichever is greater;
(b) Has a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of 26,001 pounds or more;
(c) Is designed to transport 16 or more persons, including the driver; or
(d) Is of any size and is used in the transportation of hazardous materials.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the term “commercial motor  vehicle” does not
include the following:
(a) An emergency fire vehicle being operated by firefighters as defined in ORS 652.050;
(b) Emergency vehicles being operated by qualified emergency service volunteers as defined  in
ORS 401.358;
(c) A motor home used to transport or house, for nonbusiness purposes,  the operator or the
operator’s family members or personal possessions; [ or]
(d) A recreational vehicle that is operated solely for personal use[ .]; or
(e) A rail fixed guideway public transportation system operated by a mass  transit district
created under ORS chapter 267.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3212