Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
If a plaintiff prevails against a federal agency, or against a contractor per-
forming services  for a federal agency, in an action under 28 U.S.C. 2671 to 2680 for injury to
private land arising from a fire originating on federal  forestland, in addition to any other
damages awarded, the  court shall award the prevailing plaintiff damages for the cost of re-
planting the private land.
SECTION 2. Section 3 of this 2025 Act is  added to and made a part of the Insurance Code.
SECTION 3. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Forestland” has the meaning given that term in ORS 526.005.
(b) “Small tract forestland” means contiguous forestland that:
(A) Is owned or held under common ownership; and
(B) Is not less than 10 acres or more than 5,000 acres in size.
(2) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services  shall establish a
joint underwriting association under ORS 735.220 for the purpose of  ensuring the availability
of property insurance for small tract forestlands that covers  the peril of fire.
Notwithstanding ORS 735.210 or 735.215, the director shall establish the  joint underwriting
association without first establishing a market  assistance plan, holding hearings or making
findings regarding insurance availability.
SECTION 4.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act applies to damages  awarded in actions filed on or
after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1411