Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Legislative Policy and Research Committee shall study and make
recommendations concerning the establishment of a new water measurement program.
(2) The committee shall provide the results of the study in a report to  an interim com-
mittee of the Legislative Assembly relating to water, in the manner provided by  ORS 192.245,
no later than September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eight-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2947