Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Department of Administrative  Services shall, from the Cen-
tralized Accommodation Fund established under section 3 of this 2019 Act, distribute  moneys
through grants to  state agencies for the purpose of providing financial assistance to cover
costs related to providing workplace accommodations for employees with disabilities.
(2) The department shall make grant payments to eligible state agencies on  a biennial
basis.
(3) A  grant may be awarded under subsection (1) of this section to state agencies to cover
the costs of providing workplace accommodations that exceed an amount of $______.
(4) The department  may adopt any rules necessary for the administration of grants under
subsection (1) of this section.
(5) As used  in this section, “state agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS
36.110.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $______ to
be deposited in the Centralized  Accommodation Fund established under section 3 of this 2019
Act.
SECTION 3. The Centralized Accommodation Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest on the moneys in the Centralized Ac-
commodation Fund must be credited to the fund. Moneys in the  fund are continuously ap-
propriated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services for  the purposes described
in section 1 of this 2019 Act.NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2773