Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) On January 1, 2020,  The Department of Human Services shall increase
the fee-for-service rate for behavioral health providers participating in medical  assistance
programs by 35 percent.
(2) On July 1, 2021, and on July 1 of each subsequent odd-numbered year, the department
shall adjust the fee-for-service rate  for behavioral health providers participating in medical
assistance programs to reflect any increase in the  cost of living for the previous two years,
based on changes in the Consumer Price Index for  All Urban Consumers, West Region (All
Items), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of
Labor.
(3) No later than  September 15 of each odd-numbered year, the Department of Human
Services shall report to an appropriate committee or interim committee  of the Legislative
Assembly on the impacts of the increased fee-for-service rate for  behavioral health providers
required by this section on patient access and outcomes.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 676.454 is amended to read:
676.454. (1)  There is created in the Oregon Health Authority a health care provider incentive
program for the purpose of assisting qualified health care providers who commit to serving  medical
assistance and Medicare enrollees in rural or  medically underserved areas of this state. The au-
thority shall prescribe by rule:
(a) Participant eligibility criteria, including the  types of qualified health care providers who may
participate in the program;
(b) The terms and conditions of participation  in the program, including the duration of the term
of any service agreement, which must be at least 12 months;
(c) The types of incentives that may be provided, including but not limited to:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4061
HB 3095
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Loan repayment subsidies;
(B) Stipends;
(C) Medical malpractice insurance premium subsidies;
(D) Scholarships for students in health professional training programs at the Oregon Health and
Science  University;
(E) Scholarships for students at institutions of higher education based in this state who are  en-
rolled in health professional training programs leading to a doctor  of osteopathic medicine or doctor
of dentistry or a license as a nurse practitioner, physician assistant or certified registered  nurse
anesthetist, if:
(i) The scholarship funds are distributed equitably  among schools offering the training programs,
based on the percentage of Oregon students attending those schools; and
(ii) The maximum scholarship for each student does  not exceed the highest resident tuition rate
at the publicly funded health professional training programs in this state; [ and]
(F) Paying the moving expenses of providers not located in  rural or medically underserved areas
who commit to relocate to such areas;  and
(G) Matching funds for participants in the federal State Loan Repayment Program;
(d) If the funds allocated  to the program from the Health Care Provider Incentive Fund estab-
lished under ORS 676.450 are insufficient to provide assistance to all of  the applicants who are eli-
gible to participate in the program, the priority for the distribution of funds; and
(e) The financial penalties imposed on an individual who fails to comply with terms and  condi-
tions of participation.
(2) Eligibility requirements adopted for the program:
(a) Must allow providers to qualify for multiple health care provider incentives, to the  extent
permitted by federal law.
(b) Must allow providers to qualify for an incentive for multiyear periods.
(c) Must give preference to applicants willing to:
(A) Commit to extended periods of service in rural or medically underserved areas; or
(B) Serve patients enrolled in Medicare and the state medical assistance program in at  least the
same proportion to the provider’s total number of patients as the Medicare  and medical assistance
patient populations represent in relation to the total  number of persons determined by the Office
of Rural Health to be in need of health care in the area served by the practice.
(d) Must require a behavioral health  or addiction services provider receiving loan repay-
ment subsidies from the program to enter into a service agreement for a period of at  least
two years if the provider is participating in the program on a full-time basis, or  for a period
of at least four years if the provider is participating in the program on a part-time basis.
(3) The authority may use funds allocated to the program from the Health Care Provider In-
centive Fund to administer or provide funding to a locum tenens program for health care providers
practicing in rural areas of this state.
(4) The authority may enter into contracts with one or  more public or private entities to ad-
minister the health care provider incentive program or parts of the program.
(5) The authority shall decide no later than September 1 of  each academic year the distribution
of funds for scholarships that will be provided in the next academic year.
(6) The authority may  receive gifts, grants or contributions from any source, whether public or
private, to carry out the provisions of  this section. Moneys received under this subsection shall be
deposited in the Health Care Provider Incentive Fund established under ORS 676.450.
[2]
HB 3095
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for deposit in the Health Care Provider Incentive
Fund established in ORS 676.450, and which may be expended for the purpose of providing
loan repayment subsidies to behavioral health and addiction  services providers participating
in the health care provider incentive program under ORS 676.454.
SECTION 4.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]