Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board shall study the budget of the
board. The board shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may in-
clude recommendations for  legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assem-
bly related to ways and means no later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3833