Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Vehicle
Code.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “specific fine traffic violation” means specific fine
traffic violations punishable by a maximum fine of $50.
(2) When a police officer issues a citation  for a Class D traffic violation or a specific fine
traffic violation to a person under 18 years of age whose driving  record shows no prior con-
victions for traffic offenses, the  officer shall notify the person that a driver improvement
course is available and that if the  person successfully completes a driver improvement
course, approved by the Department of Transportation under section 3 of this 2025 Act, at
the person’s own expense, the person  will not be convicted of the violation. Notification
consists of giving the person a form developed by the department, along with the citation
and summons.
(3) The department shall  develop a form to be given to a person described in subsection
(2) of this  section who is issued a citation. The form must explain that completion of the
course will enable the person to avoid a conviction  and must inform the person of how to
obtain information about a course.
(4) In order  to avoid conviction of the traffic violation, a person referred to a driver im-
provement course must complete the course before the court date mentioned in the sum-
mons.
(5) When a person has successfully completed a course  described in this section, the in-
structor shall issue a certificate to the person indicating completion. When the person pre-
sents the certificate of completion to the court, the court shall dismiss the citation.
(6) The department may  adopt rules it deems necessary for the implementation of this
section.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Department of Transportation  by rule shall establish standards for
a driver improvement course provided to persons pursuant to  section 2 of this 2025 Act. The
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4104
HB 3323
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
standards must describe  the contents and quality of a curriculum for the course, specify
requirements for obtaining a certificate and otherwise determine  the level and depth of
knowledge a person must have obtained from the course.
(2) The department shall maintain  a list of providers approved to lead the course de-
scribed in this section and  shall update the list monthly. The department shall prescribe
procedures for providing the provider list to police officers.
SECTION 4.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies  to persons issued citations for traffic vio-
lations on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]