Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall study compen-
sation for members of state boards and commissions. The  department shall submit a report
in the manner  provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation,
to the  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to rules no later than Sep-
tember 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3460