Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Each public post-secondary institution shall grant a student  who is a
veteran and who has served two or more years on  active duty with the Armed Forces of the
United States the following academic credits for prior learning:
(a) Four academic credits in the subject area of physical education;
(b) Four academic credits in the subject area of cultural studies; and
(c) Four academic credits in the subject area of science or applied technology.
(2) The academic credits shall:
(a) Be granted at no charge or cost to the student;
(b) Be transferable between public post-secondary institutions; and
(c) Be counted toward the student’s degree requirements.
(3) As used in this section,
(a) “Armed Forces of the United States” means:
(A) The Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps and Coast Guard of the United States;
(B) The reserve components of the Army, Navy, Air Force,  Marine Corps and Coast
Guard of the United States; and
(C) The Oregon National Guard and a National Guard of any other state or territory.
(b) “Public post-secondary institution” means:
(A) A public university listed in ORS 352.002; and
(B) A community college operated under ORS chapter 341.
(c) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 352.138 is amended to read:
352.138. (1) The following entities are not subject  to any provision of law enacted after January
1, 2013, that is unique to governmental entities unless the following entities are expressly named:
(a) A public university listed in ORS 352.002; and
(b) Any not-for-profit organization or other entity if the equity of  the entity is owned or con-
trolled exclusively by  a public university and if the organization or entity is created by the univer-
sity to advance any of the university’s statutory missions.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2277
HB 2828
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Notwithstanding subsection  (1) of this section and ORS 352.033, the provisions of ORS 30.260
to 30.460, 33.710, 33.720, 200.005 to 200.025,  200.045 to 200.090, 236.605 to 236.640, 279.835, 279.840,
279.850 and 297.040 and ORS chapters 35, 190, 192 and  244 apply to a public university listed in ORS
352.002 under the same terms as they apply to public bodies other than the state.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, the provisions of ORS 35.550 to 35.575, 180.060, 180.210
to 180.235, 184.305 to 184.345, 190.480, 190.490, 200.035,  243.696, 357.805 to 357.895 and 656.017 (2)
and ORS chapters 182, 183, 240, 270, 273, 276, 278, 279A, 279B, 279C, 282, 283, 291, 292, 293, 294, 295
and 297 do not apply to a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (3) of this  section and ORS 352.033, ORS 240.167,
279C.600 to 279C.625, 279C.800, 279C.810, 279C.825, 279C.827, 279C.830, 279C.835, 279C.836, 279C.838,
279C.840, 279C.845, 279C.850, 279C.855, 279C.860, 279C.865, 279C.870 and 292.043 apply to  a public
university listed in ORS 352.002 under  the same terms as they apply to public bodies other than the
state.
(b) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (3) of this section, ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870  apply to
an agreement under the terms  of which a private entity constructs, reconstructs, renovates or paints
an improvement on  real property owned by a public university listed in ORS 352.002 or by a not-
for-profit organization or other entity that a public university owns or controls exclusively.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, ORS 190.430 and  192.105 do not apply to a
public university listed in ORS 352.002 or any organization or other entity described in  subsection
(1) of this section.
(6)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 352.033, except as set forth in subsection (3)  of this section, ORS
243.650 to 243.809 and 276.073 to 276.090 and ORS chapters  238 and 238A apply to a public univer-
sity listed in ORS 352.002 under the same terms as they apply to the state.
(b) For purposes of  determining the salary of an active member of the Public Employees Re-
tirement System under ORS 238A.005 (17), remuneration paid to a member in return  for services to
a public university listed in ORS 352.002 is deemed includable  in the member’s taxable income under
Oregon law during a period  of continuous employment with any public university listed in ORS
352.002 if:
(A) The member was hired in a qualifying position by a  public university listed in ORS 352.002
on or after August 29, 2003, and on or before December 31, 2016; and
(B) The member resided  and performed services in the United States during the period of con-
tinuous employment.
(7) ORS 350.285, 350.290, 352.198, 352.226, 352.232, 352.293, 352.296, 352.303[, 352.309] and 352.313
and section 1 of this 2025 Act  apply to a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(8) Notwithstanding ORS 352.033,  a public university listed in ORS 352.002 and its agents and
employees remain subject to all statutes and administrative rules of this  state that create rights,
benefits or protections in favor of military veterans, service members and families of  service mem-
bers to the same extent as an agency  of this state would be subject to such statutes and adminis-
trative rules.
(9) Notwithstanding ORS 352.033, ORS 350.540, 350.545 and 350.550 apply  to a public university
listed in ORS 352.002. A public university may not issue a tax credit certificate  under ORS 350.540,
350.545 and 350.550 that will cause the General Fund to be owed more than $8.4 million  at any one
time under ORS 350.540, 350.545 and 350.550.
(10) If state bonds are issued for the benefit of a public university listed  in ORS 352.002 under
Article XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution:
[2]
HB 2828
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall have the  powers and duties of a
project agency, as defined in  ORS 286A.816, to the extent necessary for the issuance of the state
bonds and the administration of the proceeds of the state bonds; and
(b) The university and the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  shall enter into grant
contracts or loan agreements that comply with rules adopted  by the Oregon Department of Admin-
istrative Services relating to:
(A) Disbursement  of project funds by a project agency through grant contracts or loan agree-
ments;
(B) Submission of a request for project funds to the commission under ORS 350.095; and
(C) Any other matters determined by the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services to be
necessary for the administration of the Article XI-Q bond program.
(11) Nothing in this  section may be construed so that statutory provisions that are not set forth
in this section apply to a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 352.138, as amended by section 10,  chapter 101, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
352.138. (1) The following entities are not subject  to any provision of law enacted after January
1, 2013, that is unique to governmental entities unless the following entities are expressly named:
(a) A public university listed in ORS 352.002; and
(b) Any not-for-profit organization or other entity if the equity of  the entity is owned or con-
trolled exclusively by  a public university and if the organization or entity is created by the univer-
sity to advance any of the university’s statutory missions.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection  (1) of this section and ORS 352.033, the provisions of ORS 30.260
to 30.460, 33.710, 33.720, 200.005 to 200.025,  200.045 to 200.090, 236.605 to 236.640, 279.835, 279.840,
279.850 and 297.040 and ORS chapters 35, 190, 192 and  244 apply to a public university listed in ORS
352.002 under the same terms as they apply to public bodies other than the state.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, the provisions of ORS 35.550 to 35.575, 180.060, 180.210
to 180.235, 184.305 to 184.345, 190.480, 190.490, 200.035,  243.696, 357.805 to 357.895 and 656.017 (2)
and ORS chapters 182, 183, 240, 270, 273, 276, 278, 279A, 279B, 279C, 282, 283, 291, 292, 293, 294, 295
and 297 do not apply to a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (3) of  this section and ORS 352.033, ORS 240.167,
279C.600 to 279C.625, 279C.800, 279C.810, 279C.825, 279C.827, 279C.830, 279C.835, 279C.836, 279C.838,
279C.840, 279C.845, 279C.850, 279C.855, 279C.860, 279C.865, 279C.870 and 292.043 apply to a public
university listed in ORS 352.002 under  the same terms as they apply to public bodies other than the
state.
(b) Notwithstanding subsections  (1) and (3) of this section, ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870 apply to
an agreement under the terms  of which a private entity constructs, reconstructs, renovates or paints
an improvement on real property owned by a public university listed in ORS 352.002 or by  a not-
for-profit organization or other entity that a public university owns or controls exclusively.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section,  ORS 190.430 and 192.105 do not apply to a
public university  listed in ORS 352.002 or any organization or other entity described in subsection
(1) of this section.
(6)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 352.033, except  as set forth in subsection (3) of this section, ORS
243.650 to 243.809 and 276.073 to 276.090 and ORS  chapters 238 and 238A apply to a public univer-
sity listed in ORS 352.002 under the same terms as they apply to the state.
(b) For purposes of determining the salary of an active member of the  Public Employees Re-
[3]
HB 2828
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
tirement System under ORS  238A.005 (18), remuneration paid to a member in return for services to
a public university listed in ORS 352.002 is deemed includable  in the member’s taxable income under
Oregon law during a period of continuous employment with any public  university listed in ORS
352.002 if:
(A) The member was hired in a  qualifying position by a public university listed in ORS 352.002
on or after August 29, 2003, and on or before December 31, 2016; and
(B) The member resided and performed services in the United States during the  period of con-
tinuous employment.
(7) ORS 350.285, 350.290, 352.198, 352.226, 352.232, 352.293, 352.296, 352.303[, 352.309] and 352.313
and section 1 of this 2025 Act  apply to a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(8) Notwithstanding ORS 352.033, a public university listed in ORS 352.002 and  its agents and
employees remain subject to all  statutes and administrative rules of this state that create rights,
benefits or protections  in favor of military veterans, service members and families of service mem-
bers to the same extent as an agency of this state would  be subject to such statutes and adminis-
trative rules.
(9) Notwithstanding ORS 352.033, ORS  350.540, 350.545 and 350.550 apply to a public university
listed in ORS 352.002. A public university may not issue a tax credit certificate  under ORS 350.540,
350.545 and 350.550 that will cause the General Fund to be owed more than $8.4 million  at any one
time under ORS 350.540, 350.545 and 350.550.
(10) If state bonds are  issued for the benefit of a public university listed in ORS 352.002 under
Article XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution:
(a) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission  shall have the powers and duties of a
project agency, as defined in ORS 286A.816, to the extent necessary for the  issuance of the state
bonds and the administration of the proceeds of the state bonds; and
(b) The university and the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall enter into grant
contracts or loan agreements that comply with  rules adopted by the Oregon Department of Admin-
istrative Services relating to:
(A) Disbursement of project funds by a project agency through grant contracts or loan  agree-
ments;
(B) Submission of a request for project funds to the commission under ORS 350.095; and
(C) Any other matters determined by the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services to be
necessary for the administration of the Article XI-Q bond program.
(11) Nothing in this  section may be construed so that statutory provisions that are not set forth
in this section apply to a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
SECTION 4.
ORS 352.309 is repealed.
[4]