Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Committee created.  (1) The Sunset Advisory Committee  is created and con-
sists of:
(a) Five members of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate; and
(b) Five members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the  House
of Representatives.
(2) Members of  the committee serve four-year terms. Members serve ex officio, and a
vacancy occurs when a member ceases to be a member of the Legislative Assembly.
(3) If  a vacancy occurs, the appropriate appointing authority shall appoint a person to
serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(4) The committee shall elect a chairperson and vice-chairperson as presiding officers.
(5) Seven members of the  committee constitute a quorum. The committee may not take
a final action or make a final  recommendation unless it is approved by a vote of a majority
of the members of the committee.
(6) A member of the  committee is entitled to payment of compensation and expenses
under ORS 171.072 from funds appropriated to the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 2.
Staff. (1) The Sunset Advisory Committee shall employ an  executive director
for the committee.
(2) The  executive director shall employ persons necessary to carry out sections 1 to 14
of this 2017 Act with funds made available by the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 3. Agency report to committee.  Before  January 1 of the calendar year imme-
diately preceding the year in which a state  agency is abolished under section 14 of this 2017
Act, the state agency shall report to the Sunset Advisory Committee:
(1) Information regarding the application to the state agency  of the criteria in section 7
of this 2017 Act; and
(2) Any other information that the  state agency considers appropriate or that is re-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 393
SB 621
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
quested by the committee.
SECTION 4. Committee duties.  Before June 1 of the calendar year immediately  preceding
the year in which a state agency is abolished under section 14  of this 2017 Act, the Sunset
Advisory Committee shall:
(1) Review and take action  necessary to verify the reports submitted by the state agency
under section 3 of this 2017 Act;
(2) Conduct a performance evaluation of the  state agency based on the criteria provided
in section 7 of this  2017 Act and prepare a written report as described in section 6 of this
2017 Act; and
(3) Review the  implementation of committee recommendations contained in the reports
presented to the Legislative Assembly during the preceding legislative session.
SECTION 5. Public hearings. (1) Before January 1 of the calendar year in which a  state
agency is abolished under section 14 of this  2017 Act, the Sunset Advisory Committee shall
conduct public hearings concerning but not limited  to the application to the state agency of
the criteria provided in section 7 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The committee may hold the public hearings before the date specified in  subsection
(1) of this section if the evaluation of the state agency required by  section 4 of this 2017 Act
is complete and available to the public.
SECTION 6. Committee report.  (1) At each  odd-numbered year regular session of the
Legislative Assembly, the Sunset Advisory  Committee shall present to the Legislative As-
sembly and the Governor a written report on  the state agencies scheduled to be abolished
that year.
(2) In the report required by this section, the committee shall include:
(a) The committee’s specific findings regarding each of the  criteria prescribed by section
7 of this 2017 Act;
(b) The committee’s recommendations described in section 8 of this 2017 Act; and
(c) Other information the committee considers  necessary for a complete evaluation of
the state agency.
SECTION 7.
Criteria for review.  The Sunset  Advisory Committee shall consider the fol-
lowing criteria in determining whether a public need exists for  the continuation of a state
agency or for the performance of the functions of the state agency:
(1) The efficiency with which the state agency operates.
(2) The mission of the state agency, including the problem or need that  the state agency
was intended to address, the extent to which the objectives have been achieved, any activities
undertaken by the state  agency in addition to those allowed by statute and the state agency’s
authority to undertake those activities.
(3) Whether there are less restrictive or alternative methods of regulation that could
adequately protect the public.
(4) The extent  to which the jurisdiction of the state agency and the programs adminis-
tered by the state agency  overlap or duplicate those of other state agencies and the extent
to which the programs administered by the state agency can be consolidated with the pro-
grams of other state agencies.
(5) Whether the state agency has  recommended to the Legislative Assembly statutory
changes that benefit the public instead of the occupation, business  or institution that the
state agency regulates.
[2]
SB 621
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) The promptness and effectiveness with  which the state agency resolves complaints
concerning persons affected by the state agency.
(7) The extent to which the state agency has encouraged  participation by the public in
making rules and decisions as  opposed to participation solely by regulated persons, and the
extent to which the public participation has resulted  in rules compatible with the objectives
of the state agency.
(8) The extent to which the state agency has complied with applicable requirements of:
(a) Agencies of the United States or  of this state relating to equality of employment op-
portunity and the rights and privacy of individuals; and
(b) State law relating to purchasing goals and programs.
(9) The extent to which changes to the enabling statutes of the state agency are neces-
sary to allow the state agency to adequately comply with the criteria listed in this section.
(10) The extent to which  the state agency issues and enforces rules relating to potential
conflicts of interest of its employees.
(11) The extent to which the state agency follows record retention and management
practices that enable the state agency to respond efficiently to requests for public records.
(12) The effects of federal intervention or loss of federal  funds if the state agency is
abolished.
SECTION 8.
Recommendations. The Sunset Advisory Committee shall include in the re-
port required by section 6 of this 2017 Act:
(1) Recommendations on the abolition, continuation  or reorganization of each state
agency and on the need for continuing the functions of the state agency;
(2) Recommendations on the consolidation, transfer or  reorganization of programs within
state agencies that are not under review  if the programs duplicate functions performed in
state agencies under review;
(3) Recommendations on the funding levels for each state agency; and
(4) Proposed legislation necessary to carry out the committee’s recommendations under
this section.
SECTION 9.
Monitoring of recommendations.  During each legislative session, the staff
of the Sunset Advisory Committee shall  monitor legislation affecting state agencies that
have undergone sunset review and shall periodically report to the members  of the committee
on proposed changes that would modify prior recommendations of the committee.
SECTION 10. Subpoena power. (1) The  Sunset Advisory Committee may issue process to
compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of  books, records, papers and other
objects necessary or proper for the purposes of the committee proceedings.
(2) If a majority of the committee directs the issuance of a  subpoena, the chairperson
shall issue the subpoena in the name of the committee.
(3) A witness who attends a committee proceeding under process is entitled to  the same
mileage and per diem as a witness who appears before a grand jury in this state.
SECTION 11. Assistance of and access to state agencies.  (1) State agencies shall assist
the Sunset Advisory Committee upon request by the committee or the committee’s staff.
(2) In carrying out  its functions under sections 1 to 14 of this 2017 Act, the committee
or its designated staff  member may inspect the records, documents and files of any state
agency.
SECTION 12. Relocation of employees.  If an employee is displaced because a  state agency
[3]
SB 621
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
is abolished or reorganized after review under sections 1 to 14  of this 2017 Act, the state
agency and the Employment Department shall make a reasonable  effort to relocate the dis-
placed employee.
SECTION 13. Review of proposed legislation creating regulatory  agency.  (1) The Legisla-
tive Fiscal Officer shall forward to the Sunset Advisory Committee each  bill filed during a
legislative session that would create a new state agency with regulatory authority.
(2) The committee shall review a bill forwarded to the committee under this  section to
determine if:
(a) The  proposed functions of the state agency could be performed by an existing state
agency;
(b) The form of regulation proposed by the bill is the least restrictive form of  regulation
that will adequately protect the public;
(c) The bill provides for adequate public  input relating to the regulatory function pro-
posed by the bill; and
(d) The bill provides for adequate  protection against conflicts of interest within the state
agency.
(3) After reviewing a  bill under this section, the committee shall forward a written
comment on the legislation to the chairs of committees considering the bill.
SECTION 14. Sunset schedule.  (1) The following state agencies are abolished July 1, 2019:
(a) The Department of Education, the State  Board of Education and the Office of Com-
munity Colleges and Workforce Development.
(b) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(c) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission.
(d) The Department  of Land Conservation and Development and the Land Conservation
and Development Commission.
(2) The following state agencies are abolished July 1, 2021:
(a) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(b) The Water Resources Department and the Water Resources Commission.
(c) The State Forestry Department and the State Board of Forestry.
(d) The State Department  of Fish and Wildlife and the State Fish and Wildlife Commis-
sion.
(e) The Department of State Lands.
(3) The following state agencies are abolished July 1, 2023:
(a) The Oregon  Business Development Department and the Oregon Business Develop-
ment Commission.
(b) The Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(c) The Bureau of Labor and Industries.
(d) The Employment Department.
(e) The State Department of Energy.
(4) The following state agencies are abolished July 1, 2025:
(a) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission.
(b) The Department of Human Services.
(c) The Oregon Health Authority.
(d) The Department of Environmental Quality  and the Environmental Quality Commis-
sion.
[4]
SB 621
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
(e) The Department of Justice.
(5) The following state agencies are abolished July 1, 2027:
(a) The Department of Corrections.
(b) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs.
(c) The Oregon Youth Authority.
(d) The Columbia River Gorge Commission.
(6) The following state agencies are abolished July 1, 2029:
(a) The Department of Transportation and the Oregon Transportation Commission.
(b) The State Department of Agriculture and the State Board of Agriculture.
(c) The Oregon Department of Aviation and the State Aviation Board.
(d) The Construction Contractors Board.
(7) The following state agencies are abolished July 1, 2031:
(a) The Department of Revenue.
(b) The Public Employees Retirement System and Public Employees Retirement Board.
(c) The Department of Public Safety Standards and Training and the Board on Public
Safety Standards and Training.
(8) The following state agencies are abolished July 1, 2033:
(a) The Public Utility Commission.
(b) The Department of State Police.
(c) The Office of Student Access and Completion.
SECTION 15.
There is appropriated to the Sunset Advisory Committee, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $  for the purpose of
implementing sections 1 to 14 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 16. The section captions  used in this 2017 Act are provided only for the con-
venience of the reader and do not become  part of the statutory law of this state or express
any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 17. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[5]