Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 151.211 to
151.221.
SECTION 2. (1) There is established in each judicial district described  in section 3 (1) of
this 2025 Act the office of the district defender.
(2) The executive director of the  Oregon Public Defense Commission shall appoint a dis-
trict defender for each judicial district described in section 3 (1) of  this 2025 Act, subject to
approval by a majority vote of the voting  members of the commission. A district defender
serves at the pleasure of the executive director.
(3) A district defender, as an employee  of the commission, reports to the executive di-
rector and shall receive  compensation equal to that of a circuit court judge under ORS
292.416, including any cost of living adjustment described in ORS 292.428.
(4) The district defender shall hire and supervise personnel  necessary to carry out the
duties of the office and shall maintain and oversee the functions of the office.
(5) The district defender shall:
(a) Oversee the assignment of all circuit court cases in which counsel  is appointed within
the judicial district.
(b) Supervise and provide oversight for the panel attorneys described in ORS 151.216 (5).
(c) Provide oversight for all public defense provider contracts within the district, includ-
ing but not limited to:
(A) Ensuring that all  public defense providers within the judicial district are in compli-
ance with contract training requirements.
(B) Maintaining  current caseload and workload data to ensure compliance with the
caseload policies and workload plans adopted under ORS 151.216.
(C) Maintaining current data on attorney turnover within each public defense contracting
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2636
HB 3376
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
entity.
(d) Provide or oversee the provision  of training to public defense providers within the
district concerning local court rules and procedures.
(e) Serve as  the public defense representative for advisory committees related to criminal
justice within the district. The district defender may appoint a designee to  serve on any
committee.
(f) Keep all public defense providers within the district  apprised of any relevant changes
in the law or local court rules and any other relevant developments.
(g) Maintain data on case assignments  within the district and regularly transmit the data
to the commission.
(6)(a) The district defender may hire deputy district defenders,  subject to the availability
of moneys appropriated for that purpose.
(b) If the district defender hires deputy district defenders,  the district defender may
designate a chief deputy district defender. A chief deputy district defender may serve as the
district defender in the district defender’s absence or if the position is vacant.
(c) A deputy  district defender may serve as trial counsel in adult criminal cases, repre-
sent parents or children in juvenile cases, appear as specialty  court counsel or provide any
other direct client representation necessary to carry  out the public defense needs of the ju-
dicial district.
(7) The district defender may serve as advice counsel or appear  in court as arraignment
counsel, specialty court counsel, or trial counsel.
(8) The Oregon Public Defense Commission and  the county or counties constituting the
judicial district are responsible for the costs of the office of the district defender as follows:
(a) If the office of the district  defender consists of the district defender and the district
defender’s direct support staff only, the governing body of a county or counties constituting
each judicial district shall provide an appropriate office for the district defender  within or
near the county seat. The  office must be comparable to the office of the county district at-
torney.
(b) If a district defender office employs deputy district defenders, the governing body of
the county or counties is obligated  to provide an amount of funds to the district defender
that is equal to the cost of  the office for the district defender and direct support staff only.
The district defender  shall apply the funds provided by the county under this paragraph to
the costs of operating the offices.
(c) The commission is responsible for all office operational and personnel costs  not cov-
ered by paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
SECTION 3.
(1) By no later than March 1, 2026, the Oregon Public  Defense Commission
and the governing bodies of  counties within the following judicial districts shall establish an
office of the district defender described in section 2 of this 2025 Act:
(a) The first judicial district, consisting of Jackson County.
(b) The third judicial district, consisting of Marion County.
(c) The fourth judicial district, consisting of Multnomah County.
(d) The eleventh judicial district, consisting of Deschutes County.
(e) The fifteenth judicial district, consisting of Coos County and Curry County.
(f) The sixteenth judicial district, consisting of Douglas County.
(g) The twentieth judicial district, consisting of Washington County.
[2]
HB 3376
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) By no later than March 1, 2030, the governing body  of a county or counties consti-
tuting a judicial district not described in subsection (1) of this section shall establish  an of-
fice of the district defender described in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
 Section 2 of this 2025 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) There is established in each judicial district [ described in section 3 (1) of this 2025
Act] the office of the district defender.
(2) The  executive director of the Oregon Public Defense Commission shall appoint a district
defender for each judicial district [ described in section 3 (1) of this  2025 Act ], subject to approval by
a majority vote of the voting members of the  commission. A district defender serves at the pleasure
of the executive director.
(3) A district defender, as an employee of the commission, reports to  the executive director and
shall receive compensation equal to that of a circuit  court judge under ORS 292.416, including any
cost of living adjustment described in ORS 292.428.
(4) The district defender shall hire and supervise personnel  necessary to carry out the duties
of the office and shall maintain and oversee the functions of the office.
(5) The district defender shall:
(a) Oversee the assignment of all circuit court cases in  which counsel is appointed within the
judicial  district.
(b) Supervise and provide oversight for the panel attorneys described in ORS 151.216 (5).
(c) Provide oversight for all public defense provider  contracts within the district, including but
not limited to:
(A) Ensuring that all public defense providers within the judicial district are in  compliance with
contract training requirements.
(B) Maintaining current caseload and workload data to  ensure compliance with the caseload
policies and workload plans adopted under ORS 151.216.
(C) Maintaining current data on attorney turnover within each public defense contracting entity.
(d) Provide or oversee the provision  of training to public defense providers within the district
concerning local court rules and procedures.
(e) Serve as the public defense  representative for advisory committees related to criminal justice
within the district. The district defender may appoint a designee to serve on any committee.
(f) Keep all public defense providers within the district apprised of any relevant changes in  the
law or local court rules and any other relevant developments.
(g) Maintain  data on case assignments within the district and regularly transmit the data to the
commission.
(6)(a) The district defender may hire deputy district defenders,  subject to the availability of
moneys appropriated for that purpose.
(b) If the district defender hires deputy district defenders, the district defender may designate
a chief deputy  district defender. A chief deputy district defender may serve as the district defender
in the district defender’s absence or if the position is vacant.
(c) A deputy district defender may serve as trial counsel in adult criminal cases, represent par-
ents or children in juvenile cases, appear as specialty court counsel  or provide any other direct
client representation necessary to carry out the public defense needs of the judicial district.
(7) The district defender may serve as  advice counsel or appear in court as arraignment counsel,
specialty court counsel, or trial counsel.
(8) The  Oregon Public Defense Commission and the county or counties constituting the judicial
[3]
HB 3376
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
district are responsible for the costs of the office of the district defender as follows:
(a) If  the office of the district defender consists of the district defender and the district
defender’s direct support staff only,  the governing body of a county or counties constituting each
judicial district shall provide an appropriate office for the  district defender within or near the
county seat. The office must be comparable to the office of the county district attorney.
(b) If a district  defender office employs deputy district defenders, the governing body of the
county or counties is obligated to provide an amount of funds to the district  defender that is equal
to the cost of the office for the district defender and direct  support staff only. The district defender
shall apply the funds provided by the county  under this paragraph to the costs of operating the of-
fices.
(c) The commission is responsible for all office operational and personnel costs not covered  by
paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 151.211, as amended by  section 93, chapter 281, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
151.211. For purposes of ORS 151.211 to 151.221:
(1) “Appointed counsel” includes trial-level and appellate attorneys who  are employees of the
Oregon Public Defense Commission, attorneys [ employed by a nonprofit public  defense organization ]
who provide public defense services as part of an entity that contracts with the commission
and attorneys [ on the panel of qualified counsel described in ORS 151.216 (5) ] who contract  directly
with the commission  to provide public defense services , including attorneys on the panel de-
scribed in ORS 151.216 (5) .
(2) “Chief Justice” means the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court.
(3) “Commission” means the Oregon Public Defense Commission.
[(4) “Nonprofit public defense organization” means a nonprofit organization that employs attorneys
who provide public defense services. ]
SECTION 6.
 ORS 151.216, as amended  by sections 78, 94 and 101, chapter 281, Oregon Laws
2023, is amended to read:
151.216. (1) The Oregon Public Defense Commission shall:
(a) Establish and maintain a public defense system  that ensures the provision of public defense
services consistent with the Oregon Constitution, the United States Constitution  and Oregon and
national standards of justice.
(b) Adopt policies for public defense providers that:
(A) Ensure compensation, resources  and caseloads are in accordance with national and regional
best practices;
(B) Ensure all public defense provider  contracts provide for compensation that is commensurate
with the character of service performed;
(C) Ensure funding  and resources to support required data collection and training requirements;
and
(D) Recognize the need to consider overhead costs that account for  the cost of living and busi-
ness cost differences in each county or jurisdiction, including but  not limited to rent, professional
membership dues, malpractice insurance and other insurance and other reasonable and usual oper-
ating costs.
(c) Establish operational and contracting  systems that allow for oversight, ensure transparency
and stakeholder engagement and promote equity, inclusion and culturally specific representation.
(d) Review the caseload policies described in paragraph (b)(A) of  this subsection annually, and
[4]
HB 3376
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
revise the policies as necessary and at least every four years.
(e) Adopt a statewide workload plan, based on the  caseload policies described in paragraph
(b)(A) of  this subsection, that takes into account the needs of each county or jurisdiction, practice
structure and type of practice overseen by the commission.
(f) Submit the budget of the commission to the Legislative Assembly after the budget is submit-
ted to  the commission by the executive director and approved by the voting members of the com-
mission. The chairperson of the commission shall present the budget to the Legislative Assembly.
(g) Adopt a compensation plan, classification system and affirmative action plan for the com-
mission that are commensurate with other state agencies.
(h) Adopt policies, procedures, standards and guidelines regarding:
(A) The determination of financial eligibility of persons entitled to be  represented by appointed
counsel at state expense;
(B) The appointment of counsel, including the  appointment of counsel at state expense regard-
less of financial eligibility in juvenile delinquency matters;
(C) The fair  compensation of counsel appointed to represent a person financially eligible for
appointed counsel at state expense;
(D) Appointed counsel compensation disputes;
(E) The costs associated with the representation of a person by appointed counsel in the state
courts that are required to be paid by the state; and
(F) The types of fees and expenses subject to a preauthorization requirement.
(i) Reimburse the State Court Administrator from funds deposited  in the Public Defense Services
Account established by ORS 151.225 for the costs  of personnel and other costs associated with lo-
cation of eligibility verification and screening personnel pursuant to ORS  151.489 by the State Court
Administrator.
(j) Develop, adopt and oversee the  implementation, enforcement and modification of policies,
procedures,  minimum standards and guidelines to ensure that public defense providers are providing
effective assistance of counsel consistently to all eligible persons in this state  as required by statute
and the Oregon and United States Constitutions. The policies, procedures, standards and  guidelines
described in this paragraph apply to employees of  the commission and to any person or entity that
contracts with the commission to provide public defense services in this state.
(k) Set minimum standards by which appointed counsel are trained and supervised.
(L) Establish a system, policies and procedures for the mandatory collection of data  concerning
the operation of the commission and all public defense providers.
(m) Enter into contracts and hire attorneys to bring the  delivery of public defense services into
and maintain compliance with the minimum policies,  procedures, standards and guidelines described
in this subsection. All contracts for the  provision of public defense services to which the commission
is a party must include a  requirement for collection by the commission of data determined by the
commission to be  qualitatively necessary for any report required to be submitted to the Legislative
Assembly.
(n) At least once every two years, report to  the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
related to the judiciary, in the manner provided in ORS  192.245, and to the Governor and Chief
Justice, concerning compliance metrics  for the minimum standards described in this subsection and
recommendations for legislative changes.
(o) Develop standard operating expectations for persons and entities providing public  defense
services.
[5]
HB 3376
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(p) In consultation with the Judicial Department, ensure  the existence of policies that create a
standardized process for determining and verifying financial eligibility for appointed counsel  under
ORS 151.485.
(q) Ensure access to systematic and comprehensive training programs  for attorneys for the
purpose of meeting statewide standards set by the commission.
(r) Enter into contracts or interagency agreements with  the Oregon Department of Administra-
tive Services for the purpose of supporting state public defense population forecasts  and other re-
lated forecasts.
(s) Establish any other policies, procedures,  standards and guidelines for the conduct of the
commission’s affairs and promulgate policies necessary to carry out all powers  and duties of the
commission.
(2) When establishing the minimum policies, procedures, standards and guidelines described  in
this section, the commission shall adhere to the following principles:
(a) Appointed counsel shall be provided sufficient time and a space where attorney-client
confidentiality is safeguarded for meetings with clients.
(b) The workload of appointed counsel must be controlled to permit effective  representation.
Economic disincentives or  incentives that impair the ability of appointed counsel to provide effective
assistance of counsel must be avoided. The commission may develop workload  controls to enhance
appointed counsel’s ability to provide effective representation.
(c) The  ability, training and experience of appointed counsel must match the nature and com-
plexity of the case to which the counsel is appointed.
(d) The same appointed counsel shall continuously  represent a client throughout the pendency
of the case and shall appear at every court appearance other than ministerial hearings.
(e) The commission shall establish continuing legal education requirements for public  defense
providers who are employed by or contract with the  commission that are specific to the subject
matter area and practice of each type of court-appointed counsel.
(f) The commission and public defense providers shall systematically review  appointed counsel
for efficiency and for effective representation according to commission standards.
(3) The commission shall be organized in  a manner for the effective delivery of public defense
services as prescribed by the policies and  procedures created pursuant to statute to financially eli-
gible persons and consistent  with the budgetary structure established for the commission by the
Legislative Assembly.
(4)(a) The commission shall hire attorneys to serve as  appointed counsel, including at the trial
level in Oregon circuit courts, and shall  establish a trial division within the commission consisting
of attorneys employed by the commission who are trial-level public defense providers.
(b) A trial division described in this subsection may be housed  within the office of the
district defender described in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(5)(a) The commission shall establish[ , supervise ] and  maintain a panel of qualified counsel who
contract with the commission and are directly assigned  to cases. The commission shall develop a
process for certification of attorneys to the panel with periodic  eligibility and case review. Panel
attorneys are not employees of the commission.
(b) The payment of panel counsel:
(A) May not be lower than the hourly rate established by the commission.
(B) Shall be  adjusted to reflect the same percentage amount of any positive cost of living ad-
justment granted to employees in the management service in other executive branch agencies.
[6]
HB 3376
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) May not provide a financial conflict of interest or  economic incentives or disincentives that
impair an attorney’s ability to provide effective representation.
(6)(a) The commission may enter into contracts  for the provision of public defense services with
[nonprofit public defense organizations ]:
(A) Individual attorneys, including attorneys who are part of the  panel described in sub-
section (5) of this section; and
(B) Entities, whether  nonprofit or for profit, including entities that subcontract with in-
dividuals for the provision of public defense services .
(b) The commission may not enter into a contract or agreement that pays appointed counsel  a
flat fee per case.
(7) The  policies, procedures, standards and guidelines adopted by the commission must be made
available in an accessible manner to the public on the commission’s website.
(8) Policies, procedures, standards and  guidelines adopted by the commission supersede any
conflicting rules, policies or procedures of  the Public Defender Committee, State Court Administra-
tor, circuit courts, the Court of Appeals, the Supreme Court and  the Psychiatric Security Review
Board related to the exercise of the commission’s administrative responsibilities under this section
and transferred duties, functions and powers as they occur.
(9) The  commission may accept gifts, grants or contributions from any source, whether public
or private. However, the commission may not  accept a gift, grant or contribution if acceptance
would create a conflict of interest. Moneys accepted under this subsection  shall be deposited in the
Public Defense Services Account established by ORS 151.225 and  expended for the purposes for
which given or granted.
(10) With the approval of a majority of the voting members of the commission, the commission
may advocate for  or against legislation before the Legislative Assembly or policies or budgets being
considered by the Legislative Assembly.
(11) The commission shall  request that the Governor include in the Governor’s requested budget,
for each fiscal period, at a minimum, the  amount of funds identified by the commission as being
necessary to carry out the duties and activities of the commission.
(12) The commission may adopt rules pursuant to ORS chapter 183.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 151.219, as amended by  section 95, chapter 281, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
151.219. (1) The executive director of the Oregon Public Defense Commission shall:
(a) Designate a  deputy director of the commission who serves at the pleasure of the executive
director.
(b) Hire necessary staff for the commission.
(c) Recommend to the  commission how to establish and maintain, in a cost-effective manner, the
delivery  of  legal services to persons entitled to, and, where applicable, financially eligible for, ap-
pointed counsel at state expense under Oregon statutes, the Oregon  Constitution, the United States
Constitution and consistent with Oregon and national standards of justice.
(d) Implement and ensure compliance with contracts, policies, procedures,  standards and guide-
lines adopted by the commission or required by statute.
(e) Prepare and submit to the commission for  its approval the biennial budget of the commission.
(f) Negotiate contracts, as appropriate,  for providing legal services to persons eligible for ap-
pointed counsel at state expense in accordance with ORS 151.216 (5) and (6).
(g) Employ personnel or contract for services as necessary to  carry out the responsibilities of
[7]
HB 3376
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the executive director and the commission.
(h) Supervise the personnel, operation and activities of the commission.
(i) Provide services, facilities and materials necessary for the performance of the duties, func-
tions and powers of the commission.
(j) Pay the expenses of the commission.
(k) Prepare and submit to the members of the commission an annual report of the  activities of
the commission.
(L) Provide for legal representation, advice and consultation for the commission,  its members,
the executive director and staff of the commission who require such  services or who are named as
defendants in lawsuits  arising from their duties, functions and responsibilities. If requested by the
executive director, the Attorney General may also provide for legal representation, advice  and
consultation for the commission, its members, the executive director and  staff of the commission in
litigation.
(2) The executive director may:
(a) Designate persons  as representatives of the executive director for the purposes of determin-
ing and paying bills  submitted to the commission and determining preauthorization for incurring fees
and expenses under ORS 135.055.
(b) Establish an external advisory group to assist in developing the standard operating expec-
tations for persons and entities providing public defense services.
(c) Use the title of chief state defender.
SECTION 8.
 Section 102, chapter 281, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 102.  (1)(a) The amendments to ORS 151.211, 151.216 and 151.219 by sections 93  to 95 , [ of
this 2023 Act ] chapter 281, Oregon Laws 2023,  become operative on July 1, 2025.
(b) The amendments to ORS 151.213 [ and 151.216 by sections 100 and 101 of this 2023  Act ] by
section 100, chapter 281, Oregon Laws 2023,  become operative on July 1, 2027.
(c) The amendments to  ORS 151.216 by section 101, chapter 281, Oregon Laws 2023, be-
come operative on March 1, 2026.
(2)(a) A person  who is a member of the Oregon Public Defense Commission on July 1, 2027, may
finish the person’s term as  a commission member and is eligible for reappointment, but, beginning
July 1, 2027,  may be removed by the Governor only for inefficiency, neglect of duty or malfeasance
in office.
(b) The person serving as executive director of the  Oregon Public Defense Commission on July
1, 2027, may finish the person’s term as executive director  and is eligible for reappointment, but,
beginning on July 1, 2027, serves at the pleasure of the voting members of the commission.
(3) The Oregon Public  Defense Commission, the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
and the Governor  may take any action before the operative dates specified in subsection (1) of this
section that is necessary to enable the commission to  exercise, on and after the operative dates
specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and  powers conferred on those
entities by the amendments to ORS 151.211, 151.213, 151.216 and 151.219 by sections 93  to 95, 100
and 101, [ of this 2023 Act ] chapter 281, Oregon Laws 2023 .
SECTION 9.  ORS 1.851 is amended to read:
1.851. (1) The presiding judge of each judicial  district shall establish a local criminal justice
advisory council, unless  one already exists, in each county in the judicial district. Membership of
the council shall include, but is not limited to, representatives of the following:
(a) The presiding judge;
[8]
HB 3376
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The district attorney;
(c) The local correctional administrator;
(d) [ Public defense service providers; ] The district defender of the judicial district;
(e) The county bar association;
(f) Local law enforcement; and
(g) State law enforcement.
(2) In addition to  the persons listed in subsection (1) of this section, the judge may invite the
participation of any other persons involved in the criminal justice system whose participation  would
be of benefit.
(3) The local criminal justice advisory council shall meet regularly to consider  and address
methods of coordinating court, public defense and related services and resources in  the most effi-
cient and cost-effective manner that complies with the constitutional and statutory  mandates and
responsibilities of all participants.
(4) To assist the council in these efforts, council participants shall provide the council with
proposed budget information and caseload and workload projections.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 423.560 is amended to read:
423.560. (1) The board of county commissioners of a county shall convene a local public safety
coordinating council. The council shall include, but need not be limited to:
(a) A police chief selected by the police chiefs in the county;
(b) The sheriff of the county or, if two or more  counties have joined together to provide com-
munity corrections services, a sheriff selected by the sheriffs in the counties;
(c) The district attorney of the county or,  if two or more counties have joined together to pro-
vide community corrections services, a district attorney selected by  the district attorneys of the
counties;
(d) A state court judge, [ and a  public defender or defense attorney, ] both appointed by the pre-
siding judge of the judicial district in  which the county is located , and the district defender of
the judicial district;
(e) A director of community  corrections, a county commissioner, a juvenile department director,
a health director, a mental health director, a representative of community-based  nonprofit organ-
izations that provide services to victims of crime and at least one lay citizen, all appointed  by the
county commissioners;
(f) A city councilor or mayor and a city manager or other city representative,  both selected by
the cities in the county;
(g) A representative of the Oregon State Police, who is a  nonvoting member of the council, se-
lected by the Superintendent of State Police; and
(h) A representative of the Oregon Youth Authority, who  is a nonvoting member of the council,
selected by the Director of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(2) The boards of county commissioners of two or more counties may jointly  convene a single,
regional local public safety coordinating  council by means of an intergovernmental agreement. Local
officials may combine  the council with existing local criminal justice advisory councils established
under ORS 1.851.
(3) The local public safety coordinating council shall, at a minimum:
(a) Develop and recommend to the county board of commissioners a plan for use of:
(A) State resources to serve the local offender population; and
(B) State and local resources to serve the  needs of that part of the local offender population
[9]
HB 3376
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
who are at least 15 years  of age and less than 18 years of age, which plan must provide for coor-
dination of community-wide services  involving prevention, treatment, education, employment re-
sources and intervention strategies; and
(b) Coordinate local criminal justice policy among affected criminal justice entities.
(4) Nonvoting members of a local public safety coordinating council may not be counted  in de-
termining whether a quorum exists.
(5) If a quorum is present at any meeting of the council, action may be taken by an affirmative
vote of a majority of the quorum.
(6) The appointing authorities described in subsection (1) of  this section shall fill a vacancy over
which they have appointment authority within three months of a vacancy or as soon as possible.
SECTION 11.
Section 3 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2031.
SECTION 12. (1)(a) Section 2 of this 2025  Act and the amendments to ORS 151.211, 151.216
and 151.219 by sections 5 to 7 of this 2025 Act become operative on March 1, 2026.
(b) The amendments to section 2 of this 2025 Act by section 4 of this  2025 Act become
operative March 1, 2030.
(c) The amendments to ORS 1.851 and 423.560 by sections 9 and 10 of this 2025 Act become
operative on March 1, 2030.
(2) The Oregon Public Defense  Commission and the governing body of a county may take
any action before the operative dates  specified in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section that
is necessary to enable the commission and  county to exercise, on and after the operative
dates specified in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this  section, all of the duties, functions and
powers conferred on those entities  by section 2 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS
151.211, 151.216 and 151.219 by sections 5 to 7 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 13. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[10]