Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
AGENCY AND WORKFORCE STRATEGIC PLANNING
(Oregon Department of Administrative Services
Enterprise Planning Authority)
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Agency” means a board, commission, department, agency or other  entity, without
regard to the designation given to the  entity, that is within the executive department and
that:
(A) Has at least  full-time equivalent employees; or
(B) Has authority to make decisions that are more than recommendations.
(b) “Executive department” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.112.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4121
HB 3803
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services has authority to develop  enter-
prise strategic workforce plans, standards and policies  to facilitate and enhance the devel-
opment of an agency workforce that is more  flexible, dynamic, efficient and effective at
responding to current and potential future needs.
(3) The department shall develop  an enterprise strategic workforce plan and then revise
and update the plan at least once every four years.
(4) The enterprise strategic workforce plan shall inform agencies about:
(a) Agency head performance reviews,  quarterly check-ins, employee engagement and
feedback surveys, succession  planning, and new manager and employee development training;
(b) Enterprise values and competencies, including  the alignment of staffing to meet op-
erational needs and the development of coordinated staffing models that focus  on data col-
lection and analysis;
(c) Standardizing best practices for agency-level review and planning;
(d) Developing an oversight process to  monitor agency workforce strategic planning
progress;
(e) Developing workforce planning processes  and methodologies to integrate workforce
planning with statewide budget and equity processes; and
(f) Other subjects that the department determines are appropriate for inclusion in  an
enterprise strategic workforce plan.
(5)(a) The department has authority to  direct agencies to develop and submit for review
agency-specific strategic workforce plans that contain  specifics and details regarding the
items described in subsection (4) of this section that  are applicable to the agency submitting
the agency-specific  strategic workforce plan. An agency-specific strategic workforce plan
may also address implementation efforts that pertain to the items described  in subsection
(4) of this section, or the department may require implementation efforts to  be addressed in
an agency-specific strategic workforce plan.
(b) The department  shall adopt a schedule establishing when agency-specific strategic
workforce plans must be submitted to the department for review.
(6)(a) When an agency  submits an agency-specific strategic workforce plan to the de-
partment for review, the submitting agency shall identify and  explain any plan specifics that
deviate from  the most recent iteration of the enterprise strategic workforce plan developed
by the department under subsection (4) of this section.
(b) The department shall review each agency-specific strategic workforce plan  submitted
by an agency and may require modification of a submitted plan.
(c) Following submission, each agency  shall comply with the terms of the agency-specific
strategic workforce plan the agency submitted, or as further modified by the department.
(7) The Director of the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services, in the discretion
of the director, may exempt any agency from participation in the strategic  workforce plan-
ning program, or may modify or withdraw the exemption, at any time.
SECTION 2.
The Oregon Department of  Administrative Services shall prepare the first
enterprise strategic workforce plan described in section 1 of this  2025 Act on or before Jan-
uary 1, 2026.
(Enterprise Definitions and Standards Task Force)
[2]
HB 3803
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 3.
(1) The Enterprise Definitions and Standards Task Force is established.
(2) The purpose of the  task force is to improve budgeting decisions and value-based
analysis by reducing administrative variations in similar agency functions.
(3) The task force consists of:
(a) The Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, or  the director’s
designee, who shall serve as the chair of the task force; and
(b) The following, to be appointed by the Governor:
(A) Two representatives from large agencies that have full-time equivalent staff of  more
than 3,000 positions;
(B) Two representatives  from medium-sized agencies that have full-time equivalent staff
of between 201 and 3,000 positions;
(C) Two representatives from small-sized agencies  that have full-time equivalent staff
that do not exceed 200 positions;
(D) Two  representatives from advocacy commissions established under ORS 185.110 to
185.230, 185.310 to 185.330, 185.410 to 185.430 or 185.510 to 185.550; and
(E) Two representatives from governance boards within the executive department, as
that term is defined in ORS 174.112.
(4)(a) The task  force shall create enterprise-wide definitions and standards for programs,
studies, processes, task forces, work groups, boards, commissions and any  other definitions
and standards that the task force determines are common agency  definitions, standards and
functions.
(b) The task force shall research and identify  definitions, standards and functions that
are dormant, obsolete and no longer used.
(5) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the members
of the task force.  Official action includes but is not limited to adopting enterprise-wide defi-
nitions and standards under subsection (4)(a) of this section  and identifying dormant, obso-
lete or no longer used definitions, standards and functions under subsection (4)(b)  of this
section.
(7) When the task force takes an official action under subsection (6) of  this section that
makes a determination described in subsection (4) of this section:
(a) An affected agency shall  implement the task force determination by making con-
forming changes to the agency’s rules through the rulemaking  process, except that rule
changes need only be made prospectively to future programs and functions; and
(b) If implementation of an official action requires legislative change, the  task force shall
recommend proposed legislation to the Legislative Assembly to implement the official  action.
(8)(a) Notwithstanding subsections (4), (6)  and (7) of this section, official actions deter-
mined by the task force may not limit agency functions in subject matter, scope  or duration,
and agency functions that exist on  January 1, 2027, need not align with task force recom-
mendations or official actions.
(b) Any agency rulemaking that occurs after January 1, 2027, must align with official
actions undertaken by the task force under subsection (6) of this section, except that an
agency may deviate from the official actions of the task force  when authorized by the Di-
rector of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
[3]
HB 3803
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(9) If there is a vacancy for any cause among the membership of the  task force, the ap-
pointing authority shall make an appointment to become immediately effective.
(10) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(11) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(12) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall provide staff  support to the
task force.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Enterprise Definitions and Standards Task Force shall undertake
official actions described in section 3 of this 2025 Act on or before January 1, 2027.
(2) The task force shall make any recommendations for legislative  change to the interim
or session committees on rules for consideration during the 2027 regular session  of the
Legislative Assembly.
(3) The task force shall cease operations on or before June 30, 2027.
SECTION 5.
Sections 3 and 4 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2030.
REPORTING REQUIREMENTS FOR PUBLIC FUNDS
DISTRIBUTED TO PRIVATE, NONPROFIT OR
NONGOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES
SECTION 6. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds that in each biennium a  significant
amount of public funds are  ultimately distributed to private, nonprofit or nongovernmental
entities through distributions by state agencies that are authorized by law.
(2) The Legislative Assembly declares that:
(a) Improving accountability and transparency in how public funds are  spent by private,
nonprofit and nongovernmental entities will result in significant improvements in govern-
ment efficiencies; and
(b) Utilizing the requirements, procedures and  processes in sections 6 to 10 of this 2025
Act will achieve those improvements in government efficiencies.
SECTION 7.
(1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall develop re-
porting forms for  private, nonprofit and nongovernmental entities that receive public funds
in a distribution subject to sections 6 to 10 of this 2025 Act to use to report the  information
described in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Each reporting form must request information on:
(a) The use  of public funds received and spent by category of expenditure, including but
not limited to salaries, administration, infrastructure costs, debt service and other  catego-
ries listed by the department; and
(b) Any  other category of information that the department has by rule identified as
needed to be reported.
(3) The department shall include on the reporting form opportunity for additional com-
mentary and explanation by the recipient of the funds.
(4) The department shall study the types of existing  reports and information gathering
that entities described in subsection (1) of this section  are already providing to the State of
Oregon and that satisfy  the requirements of sections 6 to 10 of this 2025 Act. The department
shall by rule exempt  from the reporting requirements of section 9 of this 2025 Act entities
that file the reports or  other information that the department has determined are adequate
[4]
HB 3803
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to satisfy the requirements of sections 6 to 10 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8.
(1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall by rule  provide
a process by which private, nonprofit or nongovernmental entities who receive public  funds
in a  distribution subject to sections 6 to 10 of this 2025 Act receive notice of reporting re-
quirements under sections 6 to 10 of this 2025 Act and any other information  that reporting
entities need in order to comply with sections 6 to 10 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The department shall  develop and maintain internal profiles on entities that are sub-
ject to reporting  under sections 6 to 10 of this 2025 Act, including reporting history. The
department may include internal notes and  summaries that pertain to information described
in this subsection. The department may share  information described in this subsection with
the Secretary of State or the Legislative Fiscal Officer.
SECTION 9. (1) A private,  nonprofit or nongovernmental entity that receives public funds
from an agency or other entity of the executive department, as  defined in ORS 174.112, shall
file a report described in section 7 of this  2025 Act at the time and in the manner prescribed
by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services that is at least once per  a biennium
in which the private, nonprofit or nongovernmental entity receives public funds in a  distrib-
ution subject to sections 6 to 10 of this 2025 Act.
(2) An entity that already provides a  report or information that the department has
identified under section 7 (4) of this 2025 Act as sufficient to satisfy the requirements of
sections 6 to 10 of this 2025 Act need not comply with subsection (1) of this section.
(3) A report required to be made under this section  must be submitted to the department
in the time and manner prescribed by the department by rule.
(4) The department shall publish aggregated information from reports filed under  this
section on the Oregon transparency website, except that  information for which an exemption
from required disclosure may be claimed under ORS 192.311 to 192.478 shall be redacted  or
otherwise anonymized.
SECTION 10.
The Oregon Department of Administrative Services:
(1) Shall by rule identify the types of  grants and other distributions of public funds that
sections 6 to 10 of this 2025 Act apply to; and
(2) May adopt any  other rules to implement the provisions of sections 6 to 10 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 11. Section 9 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
SECTION 12. Section 9 of this 2025 Act applies to  grants or other distributions of public
funds that the Oregon Department of Administrative Services has identified  by rule as sub-
ject to sections 6 to 10 of this 2025 Act and that occur on or after July 1, 2026.
IMPROVING THE LEGISLATIVE KEY PERFORMANCE MEASURE SYSTEM
SECTION 13. (1) There is established the Key Performance Measure Task Force.
(2) The task force consists of the following, or their designees:
(a) The President of the Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor.
(d) The Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(e) The Secretary of State.
[5]
HB 3803
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) The Legislative Fiscal Officer.
(g) The Legislative Policy and Research Director.
(h) The Legislative Counsel.
(3) Representatives of the agencies  of the executive department, as defined in ORS
174.112, may attend task force meetings.
(4) The  task force shall meet every two years to review, analyze and make adjustments
to the key performance  measure system, including recommended adjustments to key per-
formance measures for each state agency,  so as to achieve maximum clarity on
performance-based outcomes for legislation.
(5) The task force  may also make recommendations for improvements and best practices
to:
(a) Align legislative key performance measures with existing agency best practices;
(b) Create a process for legislative service agencies to  set forth anticipated outcomes and
accountability measures for each legislative measure to enhance  the transparency and an-
ticipated effects of the legislative measure;
(c) Align and more  closely tie key performance measures to specific legislation and spe-
cific agency budgets; and
(d) Provide sources of record for desired performance outcomes and future  accountabil-
ity.
(6) The task force may create template documents for legislative service agencies  to use
to achieve the documentation described in subsection (5) of this section.
(7) The task force may make recommendations to:
(a) The Senate and the House  of Representatives for modifications to Senate Rules and
House Rules to achieve the objectives of this section; and
(b) The Legislative Assembly  for statutory changes to achieve the objectives of this sec-
tion.
(8) ORS 173.240 does not apply to recommendations made under subsection (7) of this
section.
REINFORCEMENT OF STATE AUDIT FUNCTIONS
SECTION 14.
 ORS 297.020 is amended to read:
297.020. (1) The  Division of Audits shall have the function and duty of carrying out the pro-
visions of ORS 297.070, 297.210, 297.230, 297.405 to 297.555, 297.990 and this section  and sections
15 and 16 of this 2025 Act .
(2) All moneys received under authority of the sections listed in subsection (1) of this  section
and moneys appropriated for use by the Secretary of State in carrying  out the provisions of those
sections hereby are made available for use by the Division of Audits.
SECTION 15. (1) The Division of Audits shall maintain a small agency team  of auditors,
consisting of at least three full-time equivalent auditors.
(2) The small agency team shall for each fiscal year establish a schedule  of audits of
public entities that have fewer than 75 full-time equivalent employees. The team shall prior-
itize the scheduling of audits of public entities described in this subsection  that have not
received an audit from the division in at least 10 years. The schedule adopted under this
section shall be incorporated into the audit plan prepared  by the Secretary of State under
[6]
HB 3803
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
ORS 297.076.
(3) The small agency team shall conduct  performance audits in conformance with ORS
297.070 on the public entities listed on the schedule adopted for the year.
SECTION 16.
(1) The Division of Audits  shall maintain an economic impact team of au-
ditors, consisting of at least three full-time equivalent auditors.
(2) The economic impact team shall for each fiscal year establish a schedule of audits  of
public entities  that the team determines will likely result in the highest potential economic
return on investment. The schedule adopted under this section shall be  incorporated into the
audit plan prepared by the Secretary of State under ORS 297.076.
(3) The economic impact team shall  conduct performance audits in conformance with
ORS 297.070 on the public entities listed on the schedule adopted for the year.
SECTION 17. The Secretary of State may, in the secretary’s discretion, dedicate more
resources than  prescribed in section 15 or 16 of this 2025 Act to the small agency team or
the economic impact team to further either team’s purposes and objectives.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 18. The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 19. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[7]