Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
(b) “Veteran” includes a disabled veteran as defined in ORS 408.225.
(2) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall develop  and implement one or more pilot
programs statewide to provide training, job placement services,  financial assistance, techni-
cal support and  business creation assistance to veterans in the construction and con-
struction materials  industries. The purpose of the pilot programs is to help veterans
successfully transition from military service to the workforce and the business community.
(3) The department shall  implement pilot programs under this section by awarding grants
to entities  involved in the construction and construction materials industries, including but
not limited to:
(a) Providers of private training programs for the purpose of providing training to vet-
erans who wish to enter the construction and construction materials workforce;
(b) Providers of employment placement services for  the purpose of placing veterans as
apprentices or permanent employees within the construction and  construction materials in-
dustries; and
(c) Private entities that can provide technical support and financial assistance to veter-
ans to establish veteran-owned construction and construction materials businesses.
(4) The department shall:
(a) Develop criteria for providers of private training programs and employment place-
ment services that identify and address the special skills and  needs of veterans in entering
the construction and construction materials workforce; and
(b) By rule, establish processes and procedures for veterans  to apply for assistance from
providers and entities identified in subsection (3) of this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3701
HB 3174
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
(5) The department may solicit and accept gifts, grants and donations from  public and
private sources to further the purposes of this section.
(6) The department may use moneys in the Veterans’  Services Fund established pursuant
to Article XV, section  4f, of the Oregon Constitution, to develop, implement and maintain the
pilot programs under this section.
(7) The department may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall prepare and submit a report to
the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to veterans’ services on or before
September 15, 2018, regarding the  status of pilot programs developed and implemented under
section 1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) Section 1 of this 2017 Act is repealed on December 31, 2019.
(2) All moneys for the pilot programs developed and implemented under section 1 of this
2017 Act that are unexpended and unobligated on the date of the repeal of  section 1 of this
2017 Act shall revert to the Veterans’ Services Fund  and become available for use pursuant
to Article XV, section 4f, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
[2]