Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Land Conservation and Development shall study  issues
related to regional housing needs analysis and present the results of the study in  a report
to an appropriate committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly in the man-
ner provided under ORS 192.245 on or before September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on December 31, 2022.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1774