Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2, 4  and 5 of this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of the In-
surance Code.
SECTION 2. As used in ORS 743B.456 and sections 4 and 5 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Dental insurance plan”  means a policy or certificate of insurance or other contract
that provides only a dental benefit.
(2) “Dental insurer” means an insurer that offers a policy or certificate  of insurance or
other contract that provides only a dental benefit.
(3) “Dental provider” means a person  licensed, certified or otherwise permitted by laws
of this state to  administer dental services in the ordinary course of business or practice of
a profession.
SECTION 3.  ORS 743B.456 is amended to read:
743B.456. [(1) As used in this section, “dental insurer” means an  insurer that offers a policy or
certificate of insurance or other contract, that provides only a dental benefit. ]
[(2)] (1)  A dental insurer  may pay a claim for reimbursement made by a dental care provider
using a credit card or electronic funds transfer payment method that imposes on the provider a fee
or similar charge to process the payment if:
(a) The dental insurer notifies the provider,  in advance, of the potential fees or other charges
associated with the use of the credit card or electronic funds transfer payment method;
(b) The dental insurer offers the provider an alternative payment method that does not  impose
fees or similar charges on the provider; and
(c) The provider or a  designee of the provider elects to accept a payment of the claim using the
credit card or electronic funds transfer payment method.
[(3)] (2)  If a dental insurer contracts with a vendor to process payments of dental  providers’
claims, the dental insurer shall  require  the  vendor to comply with the provisions of subsection
[(2)(a)] (1)(a) of this section.
(3) Except as provided in this subsection, when a  claim under a dental insurance plan is
submitted to a dental insurer by a dental provider on behalf of a  beneficiary, the dental
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1121
SB 532
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
insurer shall pay a clean claim or deny the claim not later than 30  days after the date on
which the dental insurer receives the claim.  If a dental insurer requires additional informa-
tion before payment of a  claim, not later than 30 days after the date on which the dental
insurer receives the claim, the dental insurer shall notify the beneficiary and the dental
provider in writing and give the beneficiary and the dental provider  an explanation of the
additional information needed to process  the claim. The dental insurer shall pay a clean
claim or deny the claim not later than 30 days  after the date on which the dental insurer
receives the additional information.
(4) A contract between a  dental insurer and a dental provider may not include a provision
governing payment of claims that limits the rights and remedies  available to a provider un-
der this section or has the effect of relieving  either party of its obligations under this sec-
tion.
(5) A  dental insurer shall establish a method of communicating to dental providers the
procedures and information  necessary to complete claim forms. The procedures and infor-
mation must be reasonably accessible to dental providers.
(6) This section does not create an assignment of payment to a dental provider.
(7) Each dental insurer  shall report to the Director of the Department of Consumer and
Business Services on its compliance  under this section according to requirements established
by the director.
(8) “Clean claim” as used in this section has the meaning  established by the department
as required in ORS 743B.450.
SECTION 4.
(1) As used  in this section, “refund” means the return, either directly or
through an offset to a future  claim, of some or all of a payment already received by a dental
provider.
(2) Except in the case of fraud or abuse of billing,  and except as provided in subsections
(3) and (5) of this section, a dental insurer may not:
(a) Request from a  dental provider a refund of a payment previously made to satisfy a
claim unless the dental insurer:
(A) Requests the refund in writing on or before the last day of  the period specified by the
contract with the dental provider or 18 months after the date the payment was  made,
whichever is earlier; and
(B) Specifies in the written request why the dental insurer believes  the dental provider
owes the refund.
(b) Request that a contested refund be paid earlier than six months after the dental
provider receives the request.
(3) A dental insurer may not do the following for  reasons related to coordination of
benefits with another dental insurer or entity responsible for payment of a claim:
(a) Request from a dental provider a refund of a payment previously made  to satisfy a
claim unless the dental insurer:
(A) Requests the refund in writing within 30 days after the date the payment was made;
(B) Specifies in the written request why the dental  insurer believes the provider owes the
refund; and
(C) Includes in the written request the name and mailing address of the other  dental
insurer or entity that has primary responsibility for payment of the claim.
(b) Request that a contested refund be paid earlier than six months after the dental
[2]
SB 532
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
provider receives the request.
(4) If a dental provider fails to contest a refund  request in writing to the dental insurer
within 30 days after receiving the request, the request is deemed  accepted and the dental
provider must pay the refund within 30 days after  the request is deemed accepted. If the
dental provider has not paid the refund within 30 days after the request  is deemed accepted,
the dental insurer may recover the amount through an offset to a future claim.
(5) A dental insurer may at any time request from a dental provider  a refund of a pay-
ment previously made to satisfy a claim if:
(a) A third party, including a government entity, is found responsible for  satisfaction of
the claim as a consequence of liability imposed by law; and
(b) The dental insurer is unable to recover directly from the third party because the third
party has already paid or will pay the provider for the dental services covered by the claim.
(6) If a contract between a dental insurer and  a dental provider conflicts with this sec-
tion, the provisions of this section prevail. However, nothing in this section prohibits a dental
provider from choosing at any  time to refund to a dental insurer any payment previously
made to satisfy a claim.
(7) This section neither permits nor precludes a dental insurer from recovering from a
subscriber, enrollee or beneficiary any amounts paid to a dental  provider for benefits to
which the subscriber, enrollee or beneficiary  was not entitled under the terms and conditions
of the dental insurance plan, insurance policy or other benefit agreement.
SECTION 5.
A dental provider that bills a  dental insurer for covered services provided
to an individual who  is insured under a dental insurance plan shall be reimbursed by the
insurer by a direct payment issued to the dental provider.
[3]