Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $250,000, which may  be transferred to the Watershed
Conservation Grant Fund and, notwithstanding ORS 541.958 (1),  expended for issuing a grant
to Curry County for the purpose of implementing the replacement of control devices at the
point of discharge from Floras Lake into Floras Creek, near the community of Langlois.
SECTION 2.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3814