Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 455.050 is amended to read:
455.050. All building permits issued in this state shall contain the following information:
(1) The name and address of the  owner of the building or structure to be constructed or altered
under the permit[ ;].
[(2) The  name and address of the builder or contractor, if known, who will perform the construction
or alteration; and ]
(2) If the person who will be in charge of carrying out the  construction or alteration is
known, the name and address  of the person and, if the person is a construction contractor
licensed under ORS chapter 701, the Construction Contractors Board license number of  the
person.
(3) The street address and legal description or tax lot number of the  property on which con-
struction or alteration will occur.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 455.080 is amended to read:
455.080. Notwithstanding ORS 455.630 (2), any inspector,  including a specialty code inspector
licensed under ORS 455.457, [ authorized by ORS 455.150 or 455.153 to determine compliance with the
requirements of the state building code or any  specialty code under this chapter may, in accordance
with a compliance program  as described in ORS 455.153 (2), ] who performs an inspection for the
Department of Consumer and Business Services  or a municipality as part of a building in-
spection program, or for the purpose  of enforcing a municipal ordinance described in ORS
455.153, shall require any person who is engaged in any activity regulated by the state building
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2055
HB 2872
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
code to demonstrate proof of compliance with the applicable licensing, registration or  certification
requirements of ORS chapters 446, 447, 455, 460, 479, 480, 693 and 701.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 455.158 is amended to read:
455.158. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
(b) “Work on a structure” means the construction, reconstruction, alteration or repair of a
structure.
(2) A public body that administers and enforces a building inspection  program shall ensure that
a person required to be licensed  under a provision of ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to 446.285,
446.395 to  446.420, 446.566 to 446.646, 446.666 to 446.746, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.950 and 480.510 to
480.670[,] or  this chapter or ORS chapter 447, 460 , [ or] 693 or 701  in order to obtain a permit for
work on a structure has a current, valid license of the type required for the permit.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 455.775 is amended to read:
455.775. In  addition to any other authority and power granted under this chapter and ORS
chapters 446, 447, 460, 479, 480 and 693:
(1) The Director of the  Department of Consumer and Business Services may, at the discretion
of the director, enforce the provisions of the state building code and ORS 446.003 to  446.200, 446.225
to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.950, 479.995 and 480.510 to 480.670  and this
chapter and ORS chapters 447, 460 and 693 against any person  regardless of whether a permit,
certificate, license or other indicia of authority has been issued. The director may:
(a) Make an investigation;
(b) Take sworn testimony;
(c) With the authorization of the Office of the Attorney  General, subpoena persons and records;
(d) Order corrective action; and
(e) If an immediate hazard to health and safety is imminent, issue an  order to stop all or any
part of the work under the applicable specialty code.
(2) If the director has  reason to believe that any person has been engaged, or is engaging, or
is about to engage in any violation of the state building code, or ORS  446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to
446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.950 or  480.510 to 480.670 or this chapter or ORS
chapter 447, 460  or 693 or any rule adopted under those statutes, the director may issue an order,
subject to ORS 183.413 to 183.497, directed to the person to cease and desist from the  violation or
threatened violation.
(3) If the director has  reason to believe that any person has been engaged, or is engaging, or
is about to engage  in any violation of the state building code or ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to
446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.950 or  480.510 to 480.670 or this chapter or ORS
chapters 447, 460 and 693 or any  rule adopted under those statutes, the director may, without bond,
bring suit in the name and on behalf of  the State of Oregon in the circuit court of any county of this
state to enjoin the acts or practices  and to enforce compliance with the state building code and ORS
446.003 to  446.200, 446.225 to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.950 and 480.510 to
480.670 and this chapter and ORS chapters 447,  460 and 693 and any rule adopted under those
statutes. Upon a proper showing, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order or writ  of
mandamus shall be granted.
(4) If the director has reason to believe that any person has been engaged, is engaging
or is about to engage in any  violation of ORS 701.021, the director shall, as soon as practi-
cable, provide the Construction Contractors Board with  the information supporting that be-
[2]
HB 2872
1
2
3
4
lief.
[(4)] (5) This section does not grant  any authority over a municipality or an inspector employed
by a municipality.
[3]