Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Health Authority shall conduct a literature review of  peer-
reviewed, independently funded scientific  studies regarding the impact of temperature ex-
cursions on drug efficacy and patient safety when  drugs are in transit from a mail order
pharmacy to  an addressee, including, but not limited to, a consumer, local pharmacy, clinic,
hospital or other entity. The authority shall identify options to  reduce the potential risk of
temperature excursions to patient health. The authority shall submit a report in the  manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and  may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim
committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to health care no later than September 15,
2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1841