Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Environmental Quality, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $500,000, to be deposited in  the Residential Solid Fuel
Heating Air Quality Improvement Fund established under ORS  468A.490 for the purpose of
supporting community efforts to promote economic development and improve  public health
by reducing emissions from solid fuel burning devices that burn wood.
SECTION 2. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4324