Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 166.505 is amended to read:
166.505. (1)(a)  A person may apply for a [ permit-to-purchase] permit to purchase  a firearm or
firearms under this section to the police chief or county sheriff with  jurisdiction over the residence
of the person making the application, or their designees, hereinafter referred to as “permit agent.”
(b) A person is qualified to be issued a permit-to-purchase under this section if the person:
(A)(i) Is not prohibited from purchasing or acquiring a firearm under state or federal law, in-
cluding but not limited to successfully completing a criminal background check as described  [ under
paragraph (e) of this subsection ] in subsection (2) of this section ;
[(B)] (ii) Is not the subject of an order described in ORS 166.525 to 166.543;
[(C)] (iii) Does not present reasonable grounds for a permit agent to conclude that the applicant
has been or is reasonably likely to be a danger to self or others, or to the community at  large, as
a result of the applicant’s mental or psychological state or  as demonstrated by the applicant’s past
pattern of behavior involving unlawful violence or threats of unlawful violence;
[(D)] (iv)  Provides proof of completion of a firearm safety course as defined in subsection (8) of
this section; and
[(E)] (v)  Pays the fee described in subsection (3)(b) of this section[ .]; or
(B) Holds a valid concealed handgun license issued under ORS 166.291 and 166.292.
(c) An application for a permit  under this section must state the applicant’s legal name, current
address and telephone number, date and place of birth, physical description[ ,] and  any additional
information determined necessary by Department  of State Police  rules. The application must be
signed by the applicant in front of the permit agent.
(d) The  permit agent shall verify the applicant’s identity with a government-issued form of
identification bearing a photograph of the applicant.
[(e)] (2)(a)  [ The] An  applicant  other than  a person described in subsection (1)(b)(B) of this
section must submit to fingerprinting and photographing by the permit agent. The permit agent
shall fingerprint and photograph  the applicant and shall conduct any investigation necessary to de-
termine whether the applicant meets the qualifications  described in [paragraph (b) of this
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1755
HB 2780
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
subsection] subsection (1)(b)(A) of this section . The permit agent shall request the department to
conduct a criminal background  check, including but not limited to a fingerprint identification,
through the Federal Bureau of Investigation.  The  permit agent shall ensure that the  Federal
Bureau of Investigation [ shall return ] returns  the fingerprint cards used to conduct the criminal
background check and [ may] does not keep any record of the fingerprints. Upon completion of  the
criminal background check and  determination of whether the permit applicant is qualified or dis-
qualified from purchasing or otherwise acquiring a firearm the  department shall report the results,
including the outcome of the fingerprint-based criminal background check, to the permit agent.
[(2)(a)] (b) If during the background check, the department determines that:
(A) A  purchaser is prohibited from possessing a firearm under ORS 166.250 (1)(c), the department
shall report the attempted application for a permit, the purchaser’s  name and any other personally
identifiable information to all  federal, state and local law enforcement agencies and district attor-
neys that have jurisdiction over the location or locations where the attempted application  for a
permit was made and where the permit applicant resides.
(B) Based on the judgment of conviction, the permit applicant is prohibited from  possessing a
firearm as a condition of probation or that the permit applicant is currently  on post-prison super-
vision or parole,  the department shall report the attempted application for a permit to the permit
applicant’s supervising officer and the district attorney of  the county in which the conviction oc-
curred.
(C) The permit applicant is prohibited from possessing a firearm due to a court order  described
in ORS 166.255 (1)(a),  the department shall report the attempted application for a permit to the court
that issued the order.
(D) The permit  applicant is under the jurisdiction of the Psychiatric Security Review Board, the
department shall report the attempted application for a permit to the board.
[(b)] (c)  Reports required by paragraph [ (a)(A)] (b)(A) to (D) of  this subsection shall be made
within 24 hours  after the determination is made, unless a report would compromise an ongoing in-
vestigation,  in  which case the report may be delayed as long as necessary to avoid compromising
the investigation.
[(c)] (d) On or before January 31 of each  year, beginning in 2024, the department shall annually
publish a report indicating for each county the number of applications made to any permit  agent,
the number of permits-to-purchase issued and the number of permits-to-purchase  denied and the
reasons for denial. The  department may, by rule, include any additional information that it deter-
mines would be helpful to ensuring the permit-to-purchase process is being administered in a con-
sistent and equitable manner.
(3)(a) Within 30 days of receiving an application for a permit under  this section, if the permit
agent has verified the applicant’s identity and determined  that the applicant has met each of the
qualifications described in subsection (1)(b) of this section, the permit agent shall  issue the permit-
to-purchase.
(b) The permit agent may  charge a reasonable fee reflecting the actual cost of the process but
shall not exceed $65, including the cost  of fingerprinting, photographing and obtaining a criminal
background check.  The department shall charge a reduced fee for persons who  do not require
fingerprinting, photographing or a criminal background check due to  holding a valid con-
cealed handgun license.
(4)(a) The department shall develop:
(A) A standardized application form for a permit under this section; and
[2]
HB 2780
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) A form in quadruplicate for use by permit agents in issuing permits under this section.
(b) The issuing permit agent shall maintain a copy of each permit issued under this section.
(c) The person named in a permit shall:
(A) Maintain a copy of the permit as long as the permit is valid.
(B) Present a  copy of the permit to the gun dealer or transferor of a firearm when required
under ORS 166.412, 166.435, 166.436 or 166.438.
(5)(a) The permit agent shall  report the issuance of a permit under this section to the depart-
ment, and shall provide  to the department a copy of the permit and any information necessary for
the department to maintain an electronic searchable database of all permits  issued under this sec-
tion. A permit agent  revoking a permit shall report the revocation to the department at the time
that notice of the revocation has been sent to the permit holder.
(b) The department  shall maintain the electronic database described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection by ensuring that new permits are added to  the database, renewed permits are assigned
a new expiration date[ ,] and expired or revoked permits are marked expired or revoked but retained
in the database.
(6)(a) A permit-to-purchase issued under this section does not create  any right of the permit
holder to receive a firearm.
(b) A permit-to-purchase issued under this section is not a limit on the number of firearms the
permit holder may purchase or acquire during the time period when the permit is valid.
(7)(a) A  permit-to-purchase issued under this section is valid for five years from the date of is-
suance, unless revoked.
(b) A person may renew an unexpired permit issued under this section by repeating the proce-
dures set forth in subsection (1) of this section, except:
(A) A full fingerprint set does not need to be taken again if the original set  has been retained
by the permit  agent or is otherwise available , or if the person was not fingerprinted at the time
the original permit was issued due to holding a valid concealed handgun  license and the
person continues to hold a valid concealed handgun license ; and
(B) The training course does not need to be completed, provided the  course previously taken
fully complies with each of the requirements set forth in subsection (8) of this  section , or the per-
son was not required to complete the training course at the time the original permit was
issued due to holding a valid concealed handgun license .
(c) A criminal background check is not required for a person who:
(A) Was qualified at the time the original permit was issued due to holding a valid con-
cealed handgun license; and
(B) Continues to hold a valid concealed handgun license.
[(c)] (d) The permit agent may charge a reasonable fee for renewal of the permit, reflecting  the
actual cost of the process but shall  not exceed $50, including the cost of obtaining a criminal
background check and photographing. The department shall charge a reduced  fee for persons
who do  not require a criminal background check or photographing due to holding a valid
concealed handgun license.
(8)(a) As used in this section, “proof of completion of a firearm safety course” means  the fol-
lowing:
[(a)] (A)  Proof of completion of any firearms training course or class available to the general
public that is offered by law enforcement, a community  college, or a private or public institution
or organization , or firearms training  school utilizing instructors certified by a law enforcement
[3]
HB 2780
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
agency, [ and] that includes the components set forth in paragraph [ (c)] (b) of this subsection; or
[(b)] (B)  Proof of completion of any law enforcement firearms training course or  class that is
offered for security guards, investigators, reserve law enforcement officers[ ,] or any other  law
enforcement officers, [ and] that includes the components set forth in paragraph [ (c)] (b) of  this sub-
section;
[(c)] (b)  A firearms  training course or class required for issuance of a permit-to-purchase must
include:
(A) Review of federal and state laws in place at the time of the class and other safe practices
related to ownership, purchase, transfer, use and transportation of firearms;
(B) Review of federal and state safe storage laws in place at the time  of the class and other safe
practices related to safe storage, including reporting lost and stolen guns;
(C) Prevention of abuse or misuse of firearms, including the impact of homicide  and suicide on
families, communities and the country as a whole; and
(D) In-person demonstration of  the applicant’s ability to lock, load, unload, fire and store a
firearm before an instructor certified by a law enforcement agency. This requirement may be met
separately from the other course  requirements in subparagraphs (A), (B) and (C) of this paragraph,
which may be completed in an online course, provided  the online course has been conducted by a
trainer certified by law enforcement.
[(d)] (c)  Proof of successful completion of a training  course in order to meet the requirements
for a concealed handgun license issued under  ORS 166.291 and 166.292 may be submitted for a per-
mit as a substitute for the requirements in paragraph [ (c)] (b)  of this subsection, provided the com-
pleted course included each of the components set forth in paragraph [ (c)] (b) of this subsection.
(9) The department may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
[4]