Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
PERMITTING PROCESS
SECTION 1.
(1) Section 1, chapter 1, Oregon  Laws 2023 (Ballot Measure 114 (2022)), is
repealed.
(2) Section 10, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2023 (Ballot Measure 114 (2022)), is repealed.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 166.500 is amended to read:
166.500. [The People of the State of Oregon find and declare that regulation of sale,  purchase and
otherwise transferring of all firearms and restriction of the manufacture, import, sale, purchase, trans-
fer, use and possession of ammunition magazines  to those that hold no more than 10 rounds will pro-
mote the public health and safety  of the residents of this state and ] Chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2023, shall
be known as the Reduction of Gun Violence Act.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 166.503 is amended to read:
166.503. As used in this section and ORS [ 166.412, 166.435, 166.436, 166.438,] 166.505 and 166.508:
(1) “Criminal background check” has the [ same meaning given to this ] meaning given that  term
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2263
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in ORS 166.432 [ (1)(a) to (e) ].
(2) “Department” means the Department of State Police.
(3) “Gun dealer” means a  person engaged in the business, as defined in 18 U.S.C. 921, of selling,
leasing or otherwise transferring a  firearm, whether the person is a retail dealer, pawnbroker or
otherwise.
(4) “Permit” or “permit-to-purchase” means an authorization issued  under ORS 166.505  to  a
person to purchase or acquire a firearm, provided all other  requirements at the time of purchase
or acquisition are met.
(5) “Permit agent” means a  county sheriff or police chief with jurisdiction over the residence
of the person making an application for a permit-to-purchase[ , or their designees ].
(6) “Transfer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.435 [ (1)(a)].
(7) “Transferor” means a person who is  not a gun dealer or licensed as a manufacturer or
importer under 18 U.S.C. 923 and who intends to deliver a firearm to a transferee.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 166.505 is amended to read:
166.505. (1)(a) A person may apply for a  [ permit-to-purchase] permit to purchase or otherwise
acquire a firearm or firearms under this section to [ the police  chief or county sheriff with jurisdiction
over the residence of the person making the  application, or their designees, hereinafter referred to as
“permit agent.” ] a permit agent, as follows:
(A) An applicant  whose residence is in an incorporated area may apply for a permit to
purchase a firearm to  either the police chief of the city in which the applicant resides or the
county sheriff of the county in which the applicant resides.
(B) An applicant whose residence  is in an unincorporated area may apply for a permit
to purchase a firearm to the county sheriff of the county in which the applicant resides.
(b) A person is qualified to be issued a permit-to-purchase under this section if the person:
(A) Is not prohibited from  possessing,  purchasing or acquiring a firearm under  state or federal
law[, including but not limited to ];
(B) Has not, within the previous four  years, been convicted of or been found guilty except
for insanity of a misdemeanor involving violence as defined in ORS 166.470;
(C) Successfully [ completing] completes  a criminal background check as described [ under] in
paragraph [ (e)] (f)  of this subsection;
[(B)] (D)  Is not the subject of an order described in ORS 166.525 to 166.543;
[(C)] (E)  Does not present reasonable grounds  for a permit agent to conclude that the applicant
has been or  is reasonably likely to be a danger to self or others, or to the community at large, as
a result of the applicant’s mental or  psychological state or as demonstrated by the applicant’s past
pattern of behavior involving unlawful violence or threats of unlawful violence;
[(D)] (F)  Provides proof of completion of a firearm safety  course as defined in subsection (8) of
this section; and
[(E)] (G)  Pays the fee described in subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(c) An application for a permit  under this section must state the applicant’s legal name, current
address and telephone  number, date and place of birth, physical description[ ,] and any additional
information determined necessary by Department  of  State Police  rules. The application must be
signed by the applicant in front of the permit agent.
(d) The permit agent shall verify the applicant’s identity with a government-issued form  of
identification bearing a photograph of the applicant.  Immediately upon acceptance of  the appli-
cation, the  permit agent shall enter the applicant’s name into the Law Enforcement Data
[2]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
System and indicate that the person is an applicant for a permit.
(e) The applicant must submit to fingerprinting and photographing by the permit agent.  The
permit agent shall fingerprint and photograph the applicant and shall conduct  [any] an investigation
necessary to determine whether the applicant meets the qualifications described in paragraph (b)
of this subsection.
(f) The permit agent shall  request the department to conduct a criminal background check, in-
cluding but not limited  to a fingerprint identification, first through state databases and then
through the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The  department shall ensure that the  Federal Bu-
reau of  Investigation [ shall return ] returns  the fingerprint cards used to conduct the criminal
background  check  and [ may] does not keep any record of the fingerprints. Upon completion of the
criminal background check and determination of whether the permit applicant is  qualified or dis-
qualified from  possessing,  purchasing or otherwise acquiring a firearm the department  shall report
the results[ , including the outcome of the fingerprint-based criminal background check, ] in writing to
the permit agent.  The results shall consist of an indication that either the applicant  is quali-
fied or that the applicant is disqualified and the reason for the disqualification, and  the out-
come of the fingerprint-based criminal background check.
(g) The record of information obtained  during the permit application process or during
a request for a criminal  background check by a permit agent is exempt from disclosure as
a public record under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(2)(a) If during the background check, the department determines that:
(A) [ A purchaser ] An applicant is prohibited  from possessing a firearm under ORS 166.250 (1)(c),
the department shall report the attempted application for a permit, the  [ purchaser’s] applicant’s
name and  any other personally identifiable information to all federal, state and local law enforce-
ment agencies and district attorneys that have jurisdiction  over the location or locations where the
attempted application for a permit was made and where the permit applicant resides.
(B) Based on  the judgment of conviction, the permit applicant is prohibited from possessing a
firearm as a condition  of probation or that the permit applicant is currently on post-prison super-
vision or parole, the department shall report the attempted application for a permit to  the permit
applicant’s supervising officer and the district attorney of  the county in which the conviction oc-
curred.
(C) The permit applicant is prohibited from possessing a firearm due to a court order  described
in ORS 166.255 (1)(a),  the department shall report the attempted application for a permit to the court
that issued the order.
(D) The permit  applicant is under the jurisdiction of the Psychiatric Security Review Board, the
department shall report the attempted application for a permit to the board.
(b) Reports required by paragraph [ (a)(A) to (D) ] (a)  of this  subsection shall be made within 24
hours after the determination is made, unless  a report would compromise an ongoing investigation,
in which  case the report may be delayed as long as necessary to avoid compromising the investi-
gation.
(c) On or before January 31 of each year, beginning in  2024, the department shall annually
publish a report indicating for each county the number of applications made to any permit  agent,
the number of permits-to-purchase issued and the number of permits-to-purchase  denied and the
reasons for denial. [ The department may, by rule, include  any additional information that it determines
would be helpful to ensuring the permit-to-purchase process is being administered in a consistent and
equitable manner.] The report shall additionally specify, for each county, racial and gender in-
[3]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
formation concerning each applicant within the  total number of permits granted and denied
and the reason for denial to support the consistent  and equitable administration of the per-
mitting process. The report may not include any  information that personally identifies an
individual applicant. The department may adopt rules  relating to the information needed
from permit agents for the purposes of creating the annual report.
(3)(a) Within [ 30] 60 days of receiving an application for a permit under this section, if the  per-
mit agent has verified the applicant’s identity and determined that the  applicant has met each of the
qualifications described in subsection (1)(b) of this section, the permit agent shall  issue the permit-
to-purchase.
(b) The permit agent may charge a reasonable fee reflecting the actual cost  of the process but
shall not exceed [ $65] $150 , including the cost of fingerprinting, photographing  and obtaining a
criminal background check. The portion  of the fee payable to the department for conducting
the state and federal criminal background check shall be established  by the department and
may not exceed $48.
(4)(a) The department shall develop:
(A) A standardized application form for a permit under this section; and
(B) A form in quadruplicate for use by permit agents in issuing permits under this section.
(b) The issuing permit agent shall :
(A) Enter the name of the permit  holder into the Law Enforcement Data System and
indicate that the person is a permit holder.
(B) Maintain a copy of each permit issued under this section.
(c) The person named in a permit shall:
(A) Maintain a copy of the permit as long as the permit is valid.
(B) Present a copy of the permit to the gun dealer or transferor of a firearm  when required
under ORS 166.412, 166.435, 166.436 or 166.438.
(5)(a) The permit agent shall report the issuance  of a permit under this section to the
department[,] and  shall provide to the department a copy of the permit and any information neces-
sary for the department to maintain an electronic searchable database  of all permits issued under
this section. A permit agent revoking a permit shall report the revocation to the department  at the
time that notice of the revocation has been sent to the permit holder.
(b) The department  shall maintain the electronic database described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection by ensuring that new permits are added to  the database, renewed permits are assigned
a new expiration date[ ,] and expired or revoked permits are marked expired or revoked but retained
in the database.
(c) The record of information obtained during the permit application process provided  to
the department or during the processing of  a criminal background check by the department,
and the information contained in the database  described in this subsection, is exempt from
disclosure as a public record under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(6)(a) A permit-to-purchase issued under this  section does not create any right of the permit
holder to receive a firearm or carry a concealed firearm .
(b) A permit-to-purchase issued under this section is not a limit on the number of firearms the
permit holder may purchase or acquire during the time period when the permit is valid.
(7)(a) A permit-to-purchase issued under this section , including a permit renewed as described
in this subsection,  is valid for five years from the date of issuance, unless revoked.
(b) A person may renew an unexpired permit issued under this section by repeating the proce-
[4]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
dures set forth in subsection (1) of this section, except:
(A) A full fingerprint set does not need to be taken again if the original set  has been retained
by the permit agent or is otherwise available; and
(B) The training course does not need to be completed, provided the  course previously taken
fully complies with each of the requirements set forth in subsection (8) of this section.
(c) The  permit agent may charge a reasonable fee for renewal of the permit, reflecting the actual
cost of the process but shall not exceed [ $50] $110, including the cost of obtaining  a criminal back-
ground check and photographing. The portion of the  fee payable to the department for con-
ducting the state and federal criminal background  check shall be established by the
department and may not exceed $48.
(8)(a) As used  in this section, “proof of completion of a firearm safety course” means the fol-
lowing:
[(a)] (A)  Proof of completion of any firearms training course or class available to the general
public that is offered  by law enforcement, a community college, [ or] a private or public institution
or an  organization or firearms training  school utilizing instructors [ certified] approved by a law
enforcement agency, and that includes the components [ set forth ] described in paragraph [ (c)] (b)
of this subsection; [ or]
[(b) Proof of completion of any law enforcement firearms training course or class  that is offered for
security guards,  investigators, reserve law enforcement officers, or any other law enforcement officers,
and that includes the components set forth in paragraph (c) of this subsection; ]
(B) Proof of completion of a  training course or class for a concealed handgun license is-
sued under ORS 166.291 and 166.292, provided that the course includes all of the components
described in paragraph (b) of this subsection;
(C) Prior or  current certification as a police officer, corrections officer or armed parole
and probation officer, as those terms are defined in ORS 181A.355, or  a federal officer as
defined in ORS 133.005;
(D) Certification as an instructor approved by the National Rifle Association;
(E) Proof of qualification  with a pistol, rifle or other small arms while serving in the
Armed Forces of the United States as defined in ORS 352.313, as  documented on a federal
DD Form 214 (Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty),  if the qualification oc-
curred within the 10 years prior to the date of application for issuance of the permit; or
(F) Current  certification as an armed private security professional under ORS 181A.840
to 181A.918.
[(c)] (b)  A firearms training course or class required for issuance of  a permit-to-purchase must
include:
(A) Review of federal and state laws in place at the time of the class and other safe practices
related to ownership, purchase, transfer, use and transportation of firearms;
(B) Review of federal and state safe storage laws in place at the time  of the class and other safe
practices related to safe storage, including reporting lost and stolen guns;
(C) Prevention of abuse  or misuse of firearms, including the impact of homicide and suicide on
families, communities and the country as a whole; and
(D) In-person demonstration of the applicant’s ability to lock, load, unload, fire  and store a
firearm before an instructor  [ certified] approved by a law enforcement agency. This requirement
may be met separately from the other course requirements in subparagraphs (A),  (B) and (C) of this
paragraph, which may be completed in  an online course, provided the online course has been con-
[5]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ducted by [ a trainer certified  by law enforcement ] an instructor approved by a law enforcement
agency.
(c) A training  course or class described in paragraph (a)(A) or (B) of this subsection must
have been completed within five years  prior to the date of application for issuance of the
permit.
[(d) Proof of successful completion of a training course in order to meet the requirements for  a
concealed handgun license issued under ORS 166.291 and 166.292 may be submitted for a permit as a
substitute for  the requirements in paragraph (c) of this subsection, provided the completed course in-
cluded each of the components set forth in paragraph (c) of this subsection. ]
(d)(A) As used  in this subsection, “instructor approved by a law enforcement agency”
means an instructor who has written certification from an Oregon law enforcement  agency
to provide firearms training or who is currently  approved to provide the firearms training
required for an Oregon concealed handgun license under ORS 166.291.
(B) A law enforcement agency, the political  subdivision governing the law enforcement
agency and their officers, employees and agents are not civilly liable for the actions or  in-
actions of an approved trainer if the law enforcement agency acted in good faith  providing
the approval.
(9) The department may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 166.508 is amended to read:
166.508. (1) If [ the] an application for [ the] a permit-to-purchase is denied, the permit agent shall
set forth in writing  the reasons for the denial. The denial shall be placed in the mail to the applicant
by certified mail, restricted delivery, within 30 days after the application was made. If no  decision
is issued within [ 30] 60  days and the 60th  day occurs on or after January 1, 2026 , the person
may seek review under the procedures  described in subsection [ (5)] (6) of this section.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 166.505  (1) to (3), and subject to review as provided in subsection
[(5)] (6)  of this section, a permit  agent may deny a permit-to-purchase if the permit agent has rea-
sonable grounds to believe that  the applicant has been or is reasonably likely to be a danger to self
or others, or to the community at large, as a result of the applicant’s mental  or psychological state
or as demonstrated by the applicant’s past pattern of behavior involving unlawful violence or threats
of unlawful violence.
(3)(a) Any act or condition that would prevent the issuance of a permit-to-purchase is cause  for
revoking a permit-to-purchase.
(b) A permit agent may  revoke a permit by serving on the permittee a notice of revocation. The
notice must contain the grounds for the revocation and must be served either personally or by  cer-
tified mail, restricted delivery. The notice and return of service shall be included in  the file of the
permit holder. The revocation is effective upon the permit holder’s receipt of the notice.
(4) No civil or criminal liability shall attach to a permit agent, the Department of State
Police or any authorized representative of a permit agent or the department for receiving,
reviewing or conducting an investigation connected with an  application for, or the issuance,
denial, revocation or refusal to renew, a firearm permit under this section  or ORS 166.505,
if the action  is pursuant to or results from the lawful performance of official duties described
in this section and 166.505.
[(4)] (5) Any peace officer or corrections officer may seize a permit-to-purchase and  return it to
the issuing permit agent if the permit is held by a person  who has been arrested or cited for a crime
that can or would otherwise disqualify the person from being issued a permit.  The issuing permit
[6]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
agent shall hold the permit for 30 days. If  the person is not charged with a crime within the 30 days,
the permit agent shall return the  permit unless the permit agent revokes the permit as provided in
subsection (3) of this section.
[(5)] (6)  A person denied a permit-to-purchase or whose permit is revoked or  [ not renewed ] de-
nied renewal may petition the circuit  court in the petitioner’s county of residence to review the
denial[, nonrenewal ] or revocation. The petition must  be filed within 30 days after the receipt of the
notice of the denial or revocation.
[(6)] (7) [ The] A  judgment affirming or overturning [ the] a permit agent’s decision shall be based
on whether the petitioner meets the criteria that are used for issuance of a  permit-to-purchase and,
if the petitioner was denied a permit, whether the  permit agent has reasonable grounds for denial
under subsection (2) of this section. Whenever the  petitioner has been previously sentenced for a
crime under ORS 161.610 [ (Enhanced penalty for use of firearm during commission of felony) ] or for
a crime of violence for which the person could have received a  sentence of more than 10 years, the
court shall grant relief only if the court finds that relief should be granted in the interest of justice.
[(7)] (8)  Notwithstanding  the provisions of ORS 9.320 [ (Necessity for employment of attorney) ], a
party that is not a  natural person, the state or any city, county, district or other political subdivi-
sion or public corporation in this state, without appearance by attorney, may appear  as a party to
an action under this section.
[(8)] (9) Petitions filed under this section shall be heard and disposed of within 15  judicial days
of filing or as soon as practicable thereafter.
[(9)] (10) Filing fees for actions  described in this section  shall  be as for any civil action filed
in the court. If the petitioner prevails, the amount of  the filing fee shall be paid by the respondent
to the petitioner and may be incorporated into the court order.
[(10)] (11) Initial appeals of petitions shall be heard de novo.
[(11)] (12) Any party to a judgment under this section may appeal to  the Court of Appeals in the
same manner as for any other civil action.
[(12)] (13) If the governmental entity files an appeal under this section  and does not prevail, it
shall be ordered to pay the attorney fees for the prevailing party.
TRANSFERS OCCURRING BEFORE JULY 1, 2026
SECTION 6.
 ORS 166.412 is amended to read:
166.412. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Antique firearm” has the meaning given that term in 18 U.S.C. 921;
(b) “Department” means the Department of State Police;
(c) “Firearm” has the  meaning given that term in ORS 166.210, except that it does not include
an antique firearm;
(d) “Firearms transaction  record” means the firearms transaction record required by 18 U.S.C.
921 to 929;
(e) “Firearms transaction thumbprint form” means a form provided by the department  under
subsection (11) of this section;
(f) “Gun dealer” means a person engaged in the business, as  defined in 18 U.S.C. 921, of selling,
leasing or otherwise transferring a firearm, whether the person is a  retail dealer, pawnbroker or
otherwise;
(g) “Purchaser” means a person who buys, leases or otherwise  receives a firearm or unfinished
[7]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
frame or receiver from a gun dealer; and
(h) “Unfinished frame or receiver” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.210.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (12) of  this section, a gun dealer shall comply with the
following before a firearm or unfinished frame or receiver is delivered to a purchaser:
(a) The purchaser shall present to  the gun dealer current identification meeting the require-
ments of subsection (4) of  this section and , for transfers occurring on or after July 1, 2026,  a
valid permit issued under ORS 166.505.
(b) The gun dealer shall complete the firearms transaction record and obtain the signature of
the purchaser on the record.
(c) The gun  dealer shall obtain the thumbprints of the purchaser on the firearms transaction
thumbprint form  and attach the form to the gun dealer’s copy of the firearms transaction record to
be filed with that copy.
(d) The gun dealer shall, by telephone or computer, request that the department conduct a
criminal background check on the purchaser,  verify , for transfers occurring on  or after July
1, 2026,  that the purchaser has a valid [ permit-to-purchase] permit to purchase  a firearm issued
under ORS 166.505, and [ request that  the department conduct a criminal history record check on the
purchaser and shall ] provide the following information to the department:
(A) The federal firearms license number of the gun dealer;
(B) The business name of the gun dealer;
(C) The place of transfer;
(D) The name of the person making the transfer;
(E) The make, model, caliber and manufacturer’s  number of the firearm being transferred or a
description of the unfinished frame or receiver being transferred;
(F) The name and date of birth of the purchaser;
(G) The Social Security number of the  purchaser if the purchaser voluntarily provides this
number to the gun dealer; and
(H) The type, issuer and identification number of the identification presented by the purchaser.
(e) The gun dealer shall receive a  unique approval number for the transfer from the department
and record the approval number on the firearms transaction  record and on the firearms transaction
thumbprint form.
(f) The gun dealer may destroy the firearms transaction thumbprint form five years  after the
completion of the firearms transaction thumbprint form.
(3)(a) Upon receipt of a request of  the gun dealer for a criminal history record check, the de-
partment shall immediately, during the gun dealer’s telephone call or by return call:
(A) Determine, from criminal records and other information  available to it, whether the pur-
chaser is disqualified under ORS 166.470 from completing the purchase; and
(B) Notify the gun dealer when a purchaser is disqualified from completing  the transfer or pro-
vide the gun dealer with a unique approval  number indicating that the purchaser is qualified to
complete the transfer.
(b) If the department is unable to determine  within 30 minutes  if the purchaser is  qualified or
disqualified from completing the transfer [ within 30 minutes ], the department shall notify the gun
dealer and provide the gun  dealer with an estimate of the time when the department will provide
the requested information.
(c) The dealer may  not transfer the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver unless the dealer
receives a unique approval number from the  department . [ and,] Within 48 hours of completing the
[8]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
transfer, the dealer  shall notify the [ state] department that the transfer [ to the permit holder ] was
completed.
(4)(a) Identification required of the purchaser under subsection (2) of this section  shall include
one piece of  current identification bearing a photograph and the date of birth of the purchaser that:
(A) Is issued under the authority of the United States Government, a state, a political  subdivi-
sion of a state, a foreign government, a political subdivision  of a foreign government, an interna-
tional governmental organization or an international quasi-governmental organization; and
(B) Is intended to be used for identification  of an individual or is commonly accepted for the
purpose of identification of an individual.
(b) If the identification  presented by the purchaser under paragraph (a) of this subsection does
not include the  current address of the purchaser, the purchaser shall present a second piece of
current identification that contains the current address of the  purchaser. The Superintendent of
State Police may specify by rule the type of identification that may be  presented under this para-
graph.
(c) The department may require that the gun dealer verify the identification of the  purchaser if
that identity is in question by sending the thumbprints of the purchaser to the department.
(5) The department shall establish  a telephone number that shall be operational seven days a
week between the hours of 8 a.m. and 10 p.m.  for the purpose of responding to inquiries from gun
dealers for a criminal history record check under this section.
(6) No public employee, official or  agency shall be held criminally or civilly liable for performing
the investigations required by this section provided the employee, official  or agency acts in good
faith and without malice.
(7)(a) The department may retain a record of the information obtained  during a request for a
criminal history record check  for no more than five years[ , except for the information provided to the
dealer under subsection (2)(d) of this  section, sufficient to reflect each firearm or unfinished frame or
receiver purchased by  a permit holder, which must be attached to the electronic record of the permit
stored by the department.  The department may develop a system for removal of the information in
subsection (2)(d)(E) of this section, upon proof of sale or transfer of the firearm  or unfinished frame
or receiver to another permit  holder and for recording of the information to reflect the transfer of
ownership to the permit of the new owner ].
(b) The record of the information obtained during a request for a criminal history  record check
by a gun dealer is exempt from disclosure under public records law.
(c) If the department determines that a purchaser is prohibited from possessing  a firearm under
ORS 166.250 (1)(c), the department  shall report the attempted transfer, the purchaser’s name and any
other personally identifiable information to all federal, state  and local law enforcement agencies and
district attorneys that have jurisdiction over the location  or locations where the attempted transfer
was made and where the purchaser resides.
(d) If the department determines that, based on  the judgment of conviction, the purchaser is
prohibited from possessing a firearm as a condition of probation  or that the purchaser is currently
on post-prison supervision or parole,  the department shall report the attempted transfer to the
purchaser’s supervising officer and the district attorney of the county in which  the conviction oc-
curred.
(e) If the department determines that the purchaser is prohibited from possessing a firearm due
to a court order described in ORS 166.255 (1)(a), the department shall  report the attempted transfer
to the court that issued the order.
[9]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) If  the department determines that the purchaser is under the jurisdiction of the Psychiatric
Security Review Board, the department shall report the attempted transfer to the board.
(g) Reports required by  paragraphs (c) to (f) of this subsection shall be made within 24 hours
after the determination is made, unless  a report would compromise an ongoing investigation, in
which case the report may be delayed as long as necessary to avoid compromising  the investigation.
(h) On or  before January 31 of each year, a law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney’s
office that received a report pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection during the previous cal-
endar year shall inform the department of any action that was taken  concerning the report and the
outcome of the action.
(i) The  department shall annually publish a written report, based on any information received
under paragraph (h) of this subsection, detailing the following information for the previous year:
(A) The number of purchasers whom the  department determined were prohibited from possessing
a firearm under ORS 166.250 (1)(c), arranged by category of prohibition;
(B) The number of reports made pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection;
(C) The number of investigations arising from the reports  made pursuant to paragraph (c) of this
subsection, the number of investigations concluded and the  number of investigations referred for
prosecution, all arranged by category of prohibition; and
(D) The number of criminal charges arising from the reports made pursuant to paragraph (c) of
this subsection and the disposition of the charges, both arranged by category of prohibition.
(8) A law enforcement agency may inspect the records of a gun dealer  relating to transfers of
firearms and unfinished frames or receivers with  the consent of a gun dealer in the course of a
reasonable inquiry during a criminal investigation or under the  authority of a properly authorized
subpoena or search warrant.
(9) When a firearm is delivered, it shall be unloaded.
(10) In accordance with applicable provisions of ORS chapter  183, the Superintendent of State
Police may adopt rules necessary for:
(a) The design of the firearms transaction thumbprint form;
(b) The maintenance of a procedure to  correct errors in the criminal records of the department;
(c) The provision of a security  system to identify gun dealers that request a criminal history
record check under subsection (2) of this section; and
(d) The creation and maintenance of a database of the business hours of gun dealers.
(11) The department shall publish the firearms  transaction thumbprint form and shall furnish the
form to gun dealers on application at cost.
(12) This section does not apply to transactions between persons licensed as dealers under  18
U.S.C. 923.
(13)(a) If requested by a transferor who is not a gun dealer, a gun  dealer may request a criminal
background check pursuant to ORS 166.435 or 166.438 and may charge a reasonable fee for providing
the service.
(b) A gun dealer  that requests a criminal background check under this subsection is immune
from civil liability for any use of the firearm or unfinished frame  or receiver by the recipient or
transferee, provided that the gun dealer :
(A) Requests the criminal background  check as described in this section [ and also provided that
the dealer ];
(B) Receives a unique approval number from the department indicating  successful com-
pletion of the criminal background check; and
[10]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) For transfers occurring on  or after July 1, 2026,  verifies that the recipient has a valid
[permit-to-purchase] permit to purchase  the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver . [and the dealer
has received a unique approval number from the department indicating successful  completion of the
background check.]
(14)(a) Knowingly selling or delivering a firearm  or unfinished frame or receiver to a purchaser
or transferee [ who does not have  a valid permit-to-purchase a firearm in violation of subsection (2)(d)
of this section, or ] prior to receiving a unique approval number from the department based on the
criminal background check in violation of subsection (3)(c) of this section[ ,] is a Class A
misdemeanor.
(b) For transfers occurring on or after July 1,  2026, knowingly selling or delivering a
firearm to a purchaser or transferee who does not have a valid permit to purchase a  firearm
in violation of subsection  (2)(d) of this section, or prior to receiving a unique approval num-
ber from the department based on  the criminal background check in violation of subsection
(3)(c) of this section, is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 166.435 is amended to read:
166.435. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Transfer” means the delivery of a firearm from a transferor  to a transferee, including, but
not limited to, the sale,  gift, loan or lease of the firearm. “Transfer” does not include the temporary
provision of a firearm to a transferee if the transferor  has no reason to believe the transferee is
prohibited from possessing a firearm or intends to use the firearm in the commission of a  crime, and
the provision occurs:
(A) At a shooting range,  shooting gallery or other area designed for the purpose of target
shooting, for use during  target practice, a firearms safety or training course or class or a similar
lawful activity;
(B) For the  purpose of hunting, trapping or target shooting, during the time in which the
transferee is engaged in activities related to hunting, trapping or target shooting;
(C) Under circumstances in which the  transferee and the firearm are in the presence of the
transferor;
(D) To a transferee who is in the business of repairing firearms,  for the time during which the
firearm is being repaired;
(E) To a transferee who is  in the business of making or repairing custom accessories for
firearms, for the time during which the accessories are being made or repaired; or
(F) For the purpose of preventing imminent death or serious physical injury, and  the provision
lasts only as long as is necessary to prevent the death or serious physical injury.
(b) “Transferee” means a person who is not a  gun dealer or licensed as a manufacturer or
importer under 18 U.S.C. 923 and who intends to receive a firearm from a transferor.
(c) “Transferor” means a person who is not a gun dealer  or licensed as a manufacturer or
importer under 18 U.S.C. 923 and who intends to deliver a firearm to a transferee.
(2) Except as provided in ORS  166.436 and 166.438 and subsection (4) of this section, a transferor
may not transfer a firearm to a transferee unless the transfer is completed through  a gun dealer as
described in subsection (3) of this section.
(3)(a) A transferor may transfer a firearm to a transferee only as provided in this section. Except
as provided in  paragraph (b) of this subsection, prior to the transfer both the transferor and the
transferee must appear in person before  a gun dealer, with the firearm and , for transfers occur-
ring on or after July 1, 2026,  a valid permit-to-purchase issued to the transferee under  ORS
[11]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
166.505, and request that the gun dealer perform a criminal background check on the transferee.
(b) If the transferor and the  transferee reside over 40 miles from each other, the transferor may
ship or deliver the  firearm to a gun dealer located near the transferee or a gun dealer designated
by the transferee, and the transferor need not appear before the gun dealer in person.
(c) A gun dealer who  agrees to complete a transfer of a firearm under this section shall request
a criminal history record check on the transferee as  described in ORS 166.412 and shall comply with
all requirements of federal law.
(d) If, upon completion of a criminal background check, the gun dealer:
(A) Receives a unique approval number from the Department of  State Police indicating that the
transferee is qualified to complete the transfer, the gun dealer shall notify the transferor,  enter the
firearm into the gun dealer’s inventory and transfer the firearm to the transferee.
(B) Receives notification  that the transferee is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing
or receiving the firearm or that the department is unable to determine if the transferee is qualified
or disqualified from completing the  transfer, the gun dealer shall notify the transferor and neither
the transferor nor the gun dealer shall transfer the firearm to the transferee. If the transferor
shipped or delivered the firearm to the gun dealer pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection, the
gun dealer shall comply with federal law when returning the firearm to the transferor.
(e) A gun dealer may  charge a reasonable fee for facilitating a firearm transfer pursuant to this
section.
(4) The requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of this section do not apply to:
(a) The transfer of a firearm by or to a law enforcement agency, or by or  to a law enforcement
officer, private security professional or member  of the Armed Forces of the United States, while that
person is acting within the scope of official duties.
(b) The transfer of a firearm as part of a firearm turn-in or buyback event, in which  a law
enforcement agency receives or purchases firearms from members of the public.
(c) The transfer of a firearm to:
(A) A transferor’s spouse or domestic partner;
(B) A transferor’s parent or stepparent;
(C) A transferor’s child or stepchild;
(D) A transferor’s sibling;
(E) A transferor’s grandparent;
(F) A transferor’s grandchild;
(G) A transferor’s aunt or uncle;
(H) A transferor’s first cousin;
(I) A transferor’s niece or nephew; or
(J) The spouse or domestic partner of a person specified in subparagraphs (B) to (I) of this par-
agraph.
(d) The transfer of a firearm that occurs because of the death of the firearm owner,  provided
that:
(A) The  transfer is conducted or facilitated by a personal representative, as defined in ORS
111.005, or a trustee of a trust created in a will; and
(B) The transferee is related to the deceased firearm owner in a manner specified in  paragraph
(c) of this subsection.
(5)(a) A transferor who fails  to comply with the requirements of this section commits a Class
A misdemeanor.
[12]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection, a transferor who fails to comply with the
requirements of this section commits a Class  B felony if the transferor has a previous conviction
under this section at the time of the offense.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 166.436 is amended to read:
166.436. (1) The Department  of State Police shall make the telephone number established under
ORS 166.412 (5)  available for requests for criminal background checks under this section from per-
sons who are not gun dealers and who are transferring firearms at gun shows.
(2) Prior to transferring a firearm at a gun show, a transferor who is not a gun dealer shall by
telephone request that the department conduct a  criminal background check on the recipient,
verify, for transfers occurring on or after July  1, 2026,  that the transferee has a valid [ permit-
to-purchase] permit to  purchase  a firearm under ORS 166.505, and [ request that the department
conduct a criminal background check on the recipient upon providing ] provide the following informa-
tion to the department:
(a) The name, address and telephone number of the transferor;
(b) The make, model, caliber and manufacturer’s number of the firearm being transferred;
(c) The name, date of birth, race, sex and address of the recipient;
(d) The Social Security  number of the recipient if the recipient voluntarily provides that number;
(e) The address of the place where the transfer is occurring; and
(f) The type, issuer and identification  number of a current piece of identification bearing a re-
cent photograph of the recipient presented by the  recipient. The identification presented by the re-
cipient must meet the requirements of ORS 166.412 (4)(a).
(3)(a) Upon receipt of a request for a criminal background check under this  section, the de-
partment shall immediately, during the telephone call or by return call:
(A) Determine from criminal  records and other information available to it whether the recipient
is disqualified under ORS 166.470 from  completing the transfer or is otherwise prohibited by state
or federal law from possessing a firearm; and
(B) Notify the transferor when a  recipient is disqualified from completing the transfer or provide
the transferor with a unique approval number indicating that  the recipient is qualified to complete
the transfer. The unique approval number is [ a permit] an authorization  valid for  24 hours for the
requested transfer. If the firearm is not transferred from the transferor to the recipient within  24
hours after receipt of the unique approval number, a new request must be made by the transferor.
(b) If the department is unable to determine whether the recipient is qualified for  or disqualified
from completing the transfer within 30  minutes of receiving the request, the department shall notify
the transferor  and provide the transferor with an estimate of the time when the department will
provide the requested information.
(c) The  transferor may not transfer the firearm unless the transferor receives a unique approval
number from the department and,  within 48 hours of the completed transfer, the transferor shall
notify the [ state] department that the transfer [ to the permit holder ] was completed.
(4) A public employee or  public agency incurs no criminal or civil liability for performing the
criminal background checks required by this section, provided the employee or agency acts  in good
faith and without malice.
(5)(a) The department may retain a  record of the information obtained during a request for a
criminal background  check under this section for the period of time provided in ORS 166.412 (7)[ ,
as amended by section 6, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2023 ].
(b) The record of the information obtained during a request for  a criminal background check
[13]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under this section is exempt from disclosure under public records law.
(c) If the  department determines that a recipient is prohibited from possessing a firearm under
ORS 166.250 (1)(c), the department shall  report the attempted transfer, the recipient’s name and any
other personally identifiable information to all federal, state  and local law enforcement agencies and
district attorneys that have jurisdiction over the location  or locations where the attempted transfer
was made and where the recipient resides.
(d) If the department determines that, based on the  judgment of conviction, the recipient is
prohibited from possessing a firearm as a  condition of probation or that the recipient is currently
on post-prison supervision or parole, the department shall report the  attempted transfer to the
recipient’s supervising officer  and the district attorney of the county in which the conviction oc-
curred.
(e) If  the department determines that the recipient is prohibited from possessing a firearm due
to a court order described in ORS 166.255 (1)(a), the department shall  report the attempted transfer
to the court that issued the order.
(f) If the department determines that the recipient is under the jurisdiction of the Psychiatric
Security Review Board, the department shall report the attempted transfer to the board.
(g) Reports required by  paragraphs (c) to (f) of this subsection shall be made within 24 hours
after the determination is made, unless  a report would compromise an ongoing investigation, in
which case the report may be delayed as long as necessary to avoid compromising  the investigation.
(h) On or  before January 31 of each year, a law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney’s
office that received a report pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection during the previous cal-
endar year shall inform the department of any action that was taken  concerning the report and the
outcome of the action.
(i) The  department shall annually publish a written report, based on any information received
under paragraph (h) of this subsection, detailing the following information for the previous year:
(A) The number of recipients whom the department determined were  prohibited from possessing
a firearm under ORS 166.250 (1)(c), arranged by category of prohibition;
(B) The number of reports made pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection;
(C) The number of investigations arising from the reports  made pursuant to paragraph (c) of this
subsection, the number of investigations concluded and the  number of investigations referred for
prosecution, all arranged by category of prohibition; and
(D) The number of criminal charges arising from the reports made pursuant to paragraph (c) of
this subsection and the disposition of the charges, both arranged by category of prohibition.
(6) The recipient of the firearm must be present when the transferor requests a criminal back-
ground check under this section.
(7)(a) Except  as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a transferor who receives
notification under this section  that the recipient is qualified to complete the transfer of a firearm,
has the recipient fill out the form required by ORS 166.438 (1)(a) and retains  the form as required
by ORS 166.438 (2) is immune from civil liability for any use  of the firearm from the time of the
transfer unless the transferor  knows, or reasonably should know, that the recipient is likely to
commit an unlawful act involving the firearm.
(b) The immunity provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply:
(A) If the transferor knows, or reasonably should know, that the recipient of the  firearm intends
to deliver the  firearm to a third person who the transferor knows, or reasonably should know, may
not lawfully possess the firearm; or
[14]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) In any product liability civil action under ORS 30.900 to 30.920.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 166.438 is amended to read:
166.438. (1) A transferor who is not a gun dealer may not transfer a firearm  at a gun show un-
less the transferor:
(a)(A) For transfers occurring on or  after July 1, 2026,  verifies with the Department  of State
Police that the recipient has a valid permit-to-purchase issued under ORS 166.505;
(B) Requests a criminal background check under ORS 166.436 prior to completing the transfer;
(C) Receives a unique  approval number from the department indicating that the recipient is
qualified to complete the transfer; and
(D) Has the recipient complete the form described in ORS 166.441; or
(b) Completes the transfer through a gun dealer.
(2) The transferor  shall retain the completed form referred to in subsection (1) of this section
for at least five years and shall make the completed  form available to law enforcement agencies for
the purpose of criminal investigations.
(3) A person who organizes a gun show shall post in a prominent  place at the gun show a notice
explaining the  requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The person shall provide the
form required by subsection (1) of this section to any person transferring a firearm at the gun  show.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if the transferee  is licensed as a dealer under
18 U.S.C. 923.
(5)(a) Failure to comply with the  requirements of subsection (1), (2) or (3) of this section is a
Class A misdemeanor.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph  (a) of this subsection, failure to comply with the requirements
of subsection (1), (2) or (3) of this section is a Class C felony if the person has two or more previous
convictions under this section at the time of the offense.
(6) It is an affirmative defense  to a charge of violating subsection (1) or (3) of this section that
the person did not  know, or reasonably could not know, that more than 25 firearms were at the site
and available for transfer.
SECTION 10.
Nothing in the amendments to ORS 166.412, 166.435, 166.436 or 166.438 by
sections 6 to 9 of this 2025  Act is intended to delay or prevent the development of the process
for issuing permits to purchase firearms under ORS 166.503, 166.505 and 166.508.
LARGE-CAPACITY MAGAZINES
SECTION 11.  ORS 166.355 is amended to read:
166.355. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Armed Forces of the United States” has  the meaning given that term in ORS [ 348.282]
352.313.
(b) “Detachable magazine” means an ammunition feeding device that can  be loaded or unloaded
while detached from a firearm and readily inserted in a firearm.
(c) “Fixed magazine” means an ammunition feeding device contained in or  permanently attached
to a firearm in such a manner that the device cannot be  removed without disassembly of the firearm
action.
(d) “Large-capacity magazine” means a fixed or detachable magazine, belt, drum, feed  strip,
helical feeding device,  or similar device, including any such device joined or coupled with another
in any manner, or a kit with such parts, that has  an overall capacity of, or that can be readily re-
[15]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
stored, changed[ ,] or  converted to accept, more than 10 rounds of ammunition and allows a shooter
to keep firing without having to pause to reload, but does not include any of the following:
(A) An ammunition feeding device that has been permanently altered so that it is not capable,
now or in the future, of accepting more than 10 rounds of ammunition;
(B) An attached tubular device designed to accept, and capable of operating only with , 0.22
caliber rimfire ammunition; or
(C) A tubular ammunition feeding device that is contained in a lever-action firearm.
(e) “Loaded” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.360.
(f) “Person” means any natural person, corporation, partnership, [ fire] firm  or association.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 166.250 to 166.470, and except as expressly provided in  subsections (3)
to (5) of this section, a  person commits the crime of unlawful manufacture, importation, possession,
use, purchase, sale or otherwise transferring of large-capacity  magazines if the person manufactures,
imports, possesses, uses, purchases, sells or otherwise  transfers any large-capacity magazine in
Oregon on or after December 8, 2022.
(3) Subsection (2) of this  section does not apply during the first 180 days following December
8, 2022, with respect to:
(a) A licensed gun dealer that within 180 days of December 8, 2022:
(A) Transfers or sells the  large-capacity magazines in the gun dealer’s inventory to a nonresi-
dent gun dealer or other transferee outside of this state;
(B) Purchases  or acquires temporary custody from an owner of any large-capacity magazine for
permanent removal from this state within 180 days of December 8, 2022;
(C) Permanently alters any large-capacity magazine in the gun dealer’s inventory or  custody so
that it is not capable, upon alteration or in the  future, of accepting more than 10 rounds of ammu-
nition or permanently [ alter] alters the magazine so it is no longer a  large-capacity magazine ; or
(D) Permanently  disposes of the large-capacity magazines in the gun dealer’s custody or inven-
tory.
(b) A firearms manufacturer, properly licensed under federal, state and local law, that  is a party
to a contract,  in existence and binding on December 8, 2022, with an entity outside of this state, for
the manufacture of large-capacity magazines, provided that:
(A) All manufacturing is completed no later than 180 days after December 8, 2022; and
(B) The entity outside of  Oregon receiving the large-capacity magazines is made aware in writ-
ing on or before  the delivery of the ammunition devices of the restrictions pertaining to large-
capacity magazines in this state as set forth in chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2023.
(4) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply at any time to:
(a) A firearms manufacturer properly licensed under federal, state and local law that manufac-
tures large-capacity magazines, provided:
(A) The manufacturing is for exclusive  sale or transfer to the Armed Forces of the United States
or a law enforcement agency and solely for authorized use by that entity  related to the official du-
ties of the entity; and
(B) Any  large-capacity magazine, permitted to be manufactured under paragraph (a)(A) of this
subsection after December 8, 2022, shall include  a permanent stamp or marking indicating that the
large-capacity magazine was manufactured or  assembled after December 8, 2022. The stamp or
marking must be legibly and conspicuously engraved or  cast upon the outer surface of the large-
capacity magazine. The Department  of State Police may promulgate such rules as may be necessary
for the  implementation of this section, including but not limited to rules requiring such large-
[16]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
capacity magazine be stamped  with information indicating the limitation for use only by military and
law enforcement or such other identification to  distinguish clearly large-capacity magazines manu-
factured after December 8, 2022. Except as provided in  subsection (3)(b) of this section, no large-
capacity magazines without such stamp may be manufactured in this state after December 8, 2022.
(b) A  licensed gun dealer that sells or otherwise transfers large-capacity magazines to the
Armed Forces of the United States or a law enforcement agency  solely for authorized use by that
entity, provided the large-capacity magazines have been  engraved as provided in paragraph (a)(B)
of this subsection.
(c) Any  government officer, agent or employee, member of the Armed Forces of the United
States or peace officer, as that term is defined in ORS 133.005, that is authorized  to acquire, possess
or use a large-capacity magazine provided that any acquisition, possession or use is related
[directly] to activities within the scope of that person’s official duties.
(5) [ As of December 8,  2022, it shall be] It is an affirmative defense, as provided in ORS
[166.055] 161.055, to the unlawful possession, use and transfer  of a large-capacity magazine in this
state by any person[ , provided ] that:
(a)(A) The large-capacity magazine was owned by the person before December 8,  2022, and
maintained in the person’s control or possession; or
[(b)] (B)  The possession of a large-capacity magazine  was obtained by a person who, on or after
December 8, 2022, acquired possession of  the large-capacity magazine by operation of law upon the
death of a former owner who was in legal possession of the large-capacity magazine; and
[(c)] (b)(A)  [ In addition  to either paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection ] The owner has not
maintained the large-capacity magazine in a manner other than:
[(A)] (i) On property owned or immediately controlled by the [ registered ] owner;
[(B)] (ii) On the premises of a gun dealer or gunsmith licensed under 18 U.S.C. 923 for the pur-
pose of lawful service or repair;
[(C)] (iii) While engaging in the legal use of the large-capacity magazine, at a  public or private
shooting range or shooting gallery or  for recreational activities such as hunting, to the extent per-
mitted under state law; or
[(D)] (iv) While participating in  a firearms competition or  an exhibition, display or educational
project about firearms  sponsored, conducted by, approved or under the auspices of a law enforce-
ment agency or a national or  state-recognized entity that fosters proficiency in firearms use or
promotes firearms education; and
[(E)] (B)  While transporting any large-capacity magazines in a vehicle to one of the locations
authorized in [ paragraph (c)(A) to (D)  of this subsection ] subparagraph (A) of this paragraph , the
large-capacity magazine is not inserted into the firearm and is locked in a separate container.
[(d)] (6) It is an affirmative defense, as provided in  ORS 161.055, to the unlawful pos-
session, use and transfer of a large-capacity magazine in this state by any person that  the
person has permanently and voluntarily relinquished the large-capacity magazine to law
enforcement , or  to a buyback or turn-in program approved by law enforcement, prior to  the  com-
mencement of prosecution for the possession, use or transfer  by arrest, citation or a formal
charge.
[(6)] (7)  Unlawful manufacture, importation,  possession, use, purchase, sale or otherwise trans-
ferring of a large-capacity magazine is a Class A misdemeanor.
TRANSFERS OCCURRING ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2026
[17]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 12.
 ORS 166.412, as amended by section 6 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
166.412. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Antique firearm” has the meaning given that term in 18 U.S.C. 921;
(b) “Department” means the Department of State Police;
(c) “Firearm” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.210, except that it  does not include
an antique firearm;
(d) “Firearms transaction record” means the firearms transaction record required by  18 U.S.C.
921 to 929;
(e) “Firearms  transaction thumbprint form” means a form provided by the department under
subsection (11) of this section;
(f) “Gun dealer” means a person engaged in the business, as  defined in 18 U.S.C. 921, of selling,
leasing or otherwise transferring a  firearm, whether the person is a retail dealer, pawnbroker or
otherwise;
(g) “Purchaser” means a person who  buys, leases or otherwise receives a firearm or unfinished
frame or receiver from a gun dealer; and
(h) “Unfinished frame or receiver” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.210.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (12) of this section,  a gun dealer shall comply with the
following before a firearm or unfinished frame or receiver is delivered to a purchaser:
(a) The purchaser shall present to the gun dealer  current identification meeting the require-
ments of subsection (4) of this section and, [ for transfers occurring on or after July 1, 2026 ] unless
an exception described in subsection (15) of this section applies , a valid permit issued  under
ORS 166.505.
(b) The gun dealer shall complete the firearms transaction record and obtain the signature of
the purchaser on the record.
(c) The gun dealer shall obtain the thumbprints of the purchaser on the  firearms transaction
thumbprint form and attach the form to the gun dealer’s copy of the firearms transaction record  to
be filed with that copy.
(d) The  gun dealer shall, by telephone or computer, request that the department conduct a
criminal background check on the purchaser, verify, [ for transfers  occurring on or after July  1,
2026] unless an exception described in subsection (15) of this section applies , that the purchaser
has a valid permit to  purchase a firearm issued under ORS 166.505, and provide the following in-
formation to the department:
(A) The federal firearms license number of the gun dealer;
(B) The business name of the gun dealer;
(C) The place of transfer;
(D) The name of the person making the transfer;
(E) The make, model, caliber and manufacturer’s number of  the firearm being transferred or a
description of the unfinished frame or receiver being transferred;
(F) The name and date of birth of the purchaser;
(G) The Social Security number of the purchaser  if the purchaser voluntarily provides this
number to the gun dealer; and
(H) The type, issuer and identification number of the identification presented by the purchaser.
(e) The gun dealer shall receive a  unique approval number for the transfer from the department
and record the approval number on the firearms transaction  record and on the firearms transaction
thumbprint form.
[18]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) The gun  dealer may destroy the firearms transaction thumbprint form five years after the
completion of the firearms transaction thumbprint form.
(3)(a) Upon receipt of a request of the gun dealer for a  criminal history record check, the de-
partment shall immediately, during the gun dealer’s telephone call or by return call:
(A) Determine, from criminal records and other  information available to it, whether the pur-
chaser is disqualified under ORS 166.470 from completing the purchase; and
(B) Notify the gun dealer  when a purchaser is disqualified from completing the transfer or pro-
vide the gun dealer with a unique approval number  indicating that the purchaser is qualified to
complete the transfer.
(b) If the department is unable to determine  within 30 minutes if the purchaser is qualified or
disqualified from completing the transfer, the department shall notify the  gun dealer and provide the
gun dealer with an estimate of  the time when the department will provide the requested information.
(c) The dealer may  not transfer the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver unless the dealer
receives a unique approval number from the department. Within 48 hours  of completing the transfer,
the dealer shall notify the department that the transfer was completed.
(4)(a) Identification required of the purchaser under subsection (2) of this section  shall include
one piece of  current identification bearing a photograph and the date of birth of the purchaser that:
(A) Is issued under the authority of the United States Government, a state, a political  subdivi-
sion of a state, a foreign government, a political subdivision  of a foreign government, an interna-
tional governmental organization or an international quasi-governmental organization; and
(B) Is intended to be used for identification  of an individual or is commonly accepted for the
purpose of identification of an individual.
(b) If the identification  presented by the purchaser under paragraph (a) of this subsection does
not include the  current address of the purchaser, the purchaser shall present a second piece of
current identification that contains the current address of the  purchaser. The Superintendent of
State Police may specify by rule the type of identification that may be  presented under this para-
graph.
(c) The department may require that the gun dealer verify the identification of the  purchaser if
that identity is in question by sending the thumbprints of the purchaser to the department.
(5) The department shall establish a telephone number that shall be  operational seven days a
week between the hours of 8 a.m. and 10 p.m.  for the purpose of responding to inquiries from gun
dealers for a criminal history record check under this section.
(6) No public employee, official or  agency shall be held criminally or civilly liable for performing
the investigations required by this section  provided the employee, official or agency acts in good
faith and without malice.
(7)(a) The department may retain a  record of the information obtained during a request for a
criminal history record  check for no more than five years , except that information provided to
the gun dealer under subsection (2)(d) of this section sufficient to reflect each  firearm pur-
chased by a permit holder shall be retained  and attached to the electronic record of the
permit stored by the department. The department may develop a  system for removal of the
information described in subsection (2)(d)(E) of this section upon proof of sale or transfer
of the firearm to another permit holder, and for the recording of  the information to reflect
the transfer of ownership to the permit of the new owner .
(b) The record of the information obtained during a request for a criminal history  record check
by a gun dealer is exempt from disclosure under public records law.
[19]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) If the department determines that a purchaser is prohibited from possessing  a firearm under
ORS 166.250 (1)(c), the department  shall report the attempted transfer, the purchaser’s name and any
other personally identifiable information to all federal, state  and local law enforcement agencies and
district attorneys that have jurisdiction over the location  or locations where the attempted transfer
was made and where the purchaser resides.
(d) If the department determines that, based on  the judgment of conviction, the purchaser is
prohibited from possessing a firearm as a condition of probation  or that the purchaser is currently
on post-prison supervision or parole,  the department shall report the attempted transfer to the
purchaser’s supervising officer and the district attorney of the county in which  the conviction oc-
curred.
(e) If the department determines that the purchaser is prohibited from possessing a firearm due
to a court order described in ORS 166.255 (1)(a), the department shall  report the attempted transfer
to the court that issued the order.
(f) If  the department determines that the purchaser is under the jurisdiction of the Psychiatric
Security Review Board, the department shall report the attempted transfer to the board.
(g) Reports required by  paragraphs (c) to (f) of this subsection shall be made within 24 hours
after the determination is made, unless  a report would compromise an ongoing investigation, in
which case the report may be delayed as long as necessary to avoid compromising  the investigation.
(h) On or  before January 31 of each year, a law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney’s
office that received a report pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection during the previous cal-
endar year shall inform the department of any action that was taken  concerning the report and the
outcome of the action.
(i) The  department shall annually publish a written report, based on any information received
under paragraph (h) of this subsection, detailing the following information for the previous year:
(A) The number of purchasers whom the  department determined were prohibited from possessing
a firearm under ORS 166.250 (1)(c), arranged by category of prohibition;
(B) The number of reports made pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection;
(C) The number of investigations arising from the reports  made pursuant to paragraph (c) of this
subsection, the number of investigations concluded and the  number of investigations referred for
prosecution, all arranged by category of prohibition; and
(D) The number of criminal charges arising from the reports made pursuant to paragraph (c) of
this subsection and the disposition of the charges, both arranged by category of prohibition.
(8) A law enforcement agency may inspect the records of a gun dealer  relating to transfers of
firearms and unfinished frames or receivers with  the consent of a gun dealer in the course of a
reasonable inquiry during a criminal investigation or under the  authority of a properly authorized
subpoena or search warrant.
(9) When a firearm is delivered, it shall be unloaded.
(10) In accordance with applicable provisions of ORS chapter  183, the Superintendent of State
Police may adopt rules necessary for:
(a) The design of the firearms transaction thumbprint form;
(b) The maintenance of a procedure to  correct errors in the criminal records of the department;
(c) The provision of a security  system to identify gun dealers that request a criminal history
record check under subsection (2) of this section; and
(d) The creation and maintenance of a database of the business hours of gun dealers.
(11) The department shall publish the firearms  transaction thumbprint form and shall furnish the
[20]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
form to gun dealers on application at cost.
(12) This section does not apply to transactions between persons licensed as dealers under  18
U.S.C. 923.
(13)(a) If requested by a transferor who is not a gun dealer, a gun  dealer may request a criminal
background check pursuant to ORS 166.435 or 166.438 and may charge a reasonable fee for providing
the service.
(b) A gun dealer  that requests a criminal background check under this subsection is immune
from civil liability for any use of the firearm or unfinished frame  or receiver by the recipient or
transferee, provided that the gun dealer:
(A) Requests the criminal background check as described in this section;
(B) Receives a  unique approval number from the department indicating successful completion
of the criminal background check; and
(C) [ For transfers occurring on or after July  1, 2026 ] Unless an exception described in sub-
section (15) of this section applies , verifies that the recipient has  a valid permit to purchase the
firearm or unfinished frame or receiver.
[(14)(a) Knowingly selling or delivering a firearm or unfinished frame  or receiver to a purchaser
or transferee prior to receiving a unique approval number from the department based  on the criminal
background check in violation of subsection (3)(c) of this section is a Class A misdemeanor. ]
[(b)] (14)  [ For transfers occurring on or after July 1, 2026, ] Knowingly  selling or delivering a
firearm to a purchaser or transferee who does  not have a valid permit to purchase a firearm in vi-
olation of subsection (2)(d) of this  section and does not qualify for an exception described in
subsection (15) of this section , or prior to receiving a unique approval  number from the depart-
ment based on the criminal background check  in violation of subsection (3)(c) of this section, is a
Class A misdemeanor.
(15) A valid permit to  purchase a firearm issued under ORS 166.505 is not required for a
firearm purchase from a gun dealer under this section if:
(a) The purchaser can demonstrate proof of completion of a firearm  safety course as
defined in ORS 166.505 (8) and is purchasing:
(A) A single-shot rifle, whether centerfire or rimfire;
(B) A double-barreled shotgun;
(C) A repeating rifle, whether centerfire or rimfire, that  has a bolt, lever, pump,
straight-pull or revolving action;
(D) A rifle with an attached tubular magazine designed to accept, and capable of  operat-
ing only with, 0.22 caliber rimfire ammunition;
(E) A muzzleloader rifle; or
(F) A shotgun with a pump, break, lever or revolving action; or
(b) The purchaser is:
(A) An active duty state, federal or tribal police officer as defined  in ORS 181A.355 and
presents valid identification and an identification number issued to the purchaser by the
Department of Public Safety Standards and Training; or
(B) An active duty member of  the Armed Forces of the United States as defined in ORS
352.313 and presents valid identification.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 166.435, as amended by section 7 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
166.435. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Transfer” means the delivery of  a firearm from a transferor to a transferee, including, but
[21]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
not limited to, the sale,  gift, loan or lease of the firearm. “Transfer” does not include the temporary
provision of a firearm to a transferee if the  transferor has no reason to believe the transferee is
prohibited from possessing a firearm or intends to use the firearm in the commission of a  crime, and
the provision occurs:
(A) At a shooting range, shooting gallery or other area designed for  the purpose of target
shooting, for use during target practice, a firearms safety or training course or class  or a similar
lawful activity;
(B) For the purpose of hunting, trapping or target shooting, during the time in  which the
transferee is engaged in activities related to hunting, trapping or target shooting;
(C) Under circumstances in which the transferee and the firearm are  in the presence of the
transferor;
(D) To a transferee who is in  the business of repairing firearms, for the time during which the
firearm is being repaired;
(E) To a transferee who is in the business of making  or repairing custom accessories for
firearms, for the time during which the accessories are being made or repaired; or
(F) For the purpose of preventing imminent death or serious physical injury, and  the provision
lasts only as long as is necessary to prevent the death or serious physical injury.
(b) “Transferee” means a person who is not a  gun dealer or licensed as a manufacturer or
importer under 18 U.S.C. 923 and who intends to receive a firearm from a transferor.
(c) “Transferor” means a person who is not a gun dealer  or licensed as a manufacturer or
importer under 18 U.S.C. 923 and who intends to deliver a firearm to a transferee.
(2) Except as provided in ORS  166.436 and 166.438 and subsection (4) of this section, a transferor
may not transfer a firearm to a transferee unless the transfer is completed through  a gun dealer as
described in subsection (3) of this section.
(3)(a) A transferor may transfer a firearm to a transferee only as provided in this section. Except
as provided in  paragraph (b) of this subsection, prior to the transfer both the transferor and the
transferee must appear in  person before a gun dealer, with the firearm and, [ for transfers occurring
on or after July 1, 2026 ] unless an exception described in  subsection (6) of this section
applies, a valid permit-to-purchase issued to the  transferee under ORS 166.505, and request that the
gun dealer perform a criminal background check on the transferee.
(b) If the transferor and the  transferee reside over 40 miles from each other, the transferor may
ship or deliver the  firearm to a gun dealer located near the transferee or a gun dealer designated
by the transferee, and the transferor need not appear before the gun dealer in person.
(c) A gun dealer who  agrees to complete a transfer of a firearm under this section shall request
a criminal history record check on the transferee as  described in ORS 166.412 and shall comply with
all requirements of federal law.
(d) If, upon completion of a criminal background check, the gun dealer:
(A) Receives a unique approval number from the Department of  State Police indicating that the
transferee is qualified to complete the transfer, the gun dealer shall notify the transferor,  enter the
firearm into the gun dealer’s inventory and transfer the firearm to the transferee.
(B) Receives notification  that the transferee is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing
or receiving the firearm or that the department is unable to determine if the transferee is qualified
or disqualified from completing the transfer, the gun dealer shall notify  the transferor and neither
the transferor nor the gun dealer shall transfer the firearm to the transferee. If the transferor
shipped or delivered the firearm to the gun dealer pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection, the
[22]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
gun dealer shall comply with federal law when returning the firearm to the transferor.
(e) A gun dealer may  charge a reasonable fee for facilitating a firearm transfer pursuant to this
section.
(4) The requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of this section do not apply to:
(a) The transfer of a firearm by or to a law enforcement agency, or by or  to a law enforcement
officer, private security professional or member  of the Armed Forces of the United States, while that
person is acting within the scope of official duties.
(b) The transfer of a firearm as part of a firearm turn-in or buyback event, in which  a law
enforcement agency receives or purchases firearms from members of the public.
(c) The transfer of a firearm to:
(A) A transferor’s spouse or domestic partner;
(B) A transferor’s parent or stepparent;
(C) A transferor’s child or stepchild;
(D) A transferor’s sibling;
(E) A transferor’s grandparent;
(F) A transferor’s grandchild;
(G) A transferor’s aunt or uncle;
(H) A transferor’s first cousin;
(I) A transferor’s niece or nephew; or
(J) The spouse or domestic partner of a person specified in subparagraphs (B) to (I) of this par-
agraph.
(d) The transfer of a firearm that occurs because of the death of the firearm owner,  provided
that:
(A) The  transfer is conducted or facilitated by a personal representative, as defined in ORS
111.005, or a trustee of a trust created in a will; and
(B) The transferee is related to the deceased firearm owner in a manner specified in  paragraph
(c) of this subsection.
(5)(a) A transferor who fails  to comply with the requirements of this section commits a Class
A misdemeanor.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection, a transferor who fails to comply with the
requirements of this section commits a Class  B felony if the transferor has a previous conviction
under this section at the time of the offense.
(6) A valid permit to purchase a firearm issued under ORS 166.505 is  not required for a
firearm transfer under this section if:
(a) The transferee can demonstrate proof of completion of a firearm safety  course as
defined ORS 166.505 (8) and is purchasing:
(A) A single-shot rifle, whether centerfire or rimfire;
(B) A double-barreled shotgun;
(C) A repeating rifle, whether centerfire  or rimfire, that has a bolt, lever, pump,
straight-pull or revolving action;
(D) A  rifle with an attached tubular magazine designed to accept, and capable of operat-
ing only with, 0.22 caliber rimfire ammunition;
(E) A muzzleloader rifle; or
(F) A shotgun with a pump, break, lever or revolving action; or
(b) The transferee is:
[23]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) An active duty state,  federal or tribal police officer as defined in ORS 181A.355 and
presents valid identification and an identification number issued  to the transferee by the
Department of Public Safety Standards and Training; or
(B) An active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United  States as defined in ORS
352.313 and presents valid identification.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 166.436, as amended by section 8 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
166.436. (1) The Department  of State Police shall make the telephone number established under
ORS 166.412 (5)  available for requests for criminal background checks under this section from per-
sons who are not gun dealers and who are transferring firearms at gun shows.
(2) Prior to transferring a firearm at a gun show, a transferor who is not a gun dealer shall by
telephone request that the department conduct a criminal  background check on the recipient, verify,
[for transfers occurring on or after July 1, 2026 ] unless an exception  described in ORS 166.438 (7)
applies, that the transferee has a  valid permit to purchase a firearm under ORS 166.505, and provide
the following information to the department:
(a) The name, address and telephone number of the transferor;
(b) The make, model, caliber and manufacturer’s number of the firearm being transferred;
(c) The name, date of birth, race, sex and address of the recipient;
(d) The Social Security  number of the recipient if the recipient voluntarily provides that number;
(e) The address of the place where the transfer is occurring; and
(f) The type, issuer and identification  number of a current piece of identification bearing a re-
cent photograph of the recipient presented by the  recipient. The identification presented by the re-
cipient must meet the requirements of ORS 166.412 (4)(a).
(3)(a) Upon receipt of a request for a criminal background check under this  section, the de-
partment shall immediately, during the telephone call or by return call:
(A) Determine from criminal  records and other information available to it whether the recipient
is disqualified under ORS 166.470 from  completing the transfer or is otherwise prohibited by state
or federal law from possessing a firearm; and
(B) Notify the transferor when a  recipient is disqualified from completing the transfer or provide
the transferor with a unique approval number indicating that  the recipient is qualified to complete
the transfer. The unique approval number  is an authorization valid for 24 hours for the requested
transfer. If the firearm is not transferred  from the transferor to the recipient within 24 hours after
receipt of the unique approval number, a new request must be made by the transferor.
(b) If the department is unable to determine whether the recipient is qualified for  or disqualified
from completing the transfer within 30  minutes of receiving the request, the department shall notify
the transferor  and provide the transferor with an estimate of the time when the department will
provide the requested information.
(c) The  transferor may not transfer the firearm unless the transferor receives a unique approval
number from the department and,  within 48 hours of the completed transfer, the transferor shall
notify the department that the transfer was completed.
(4) A public employee or  public agency incurs no criminal or civil liability for performing the
criminal background checks required by this section, provided the employee or agency acts  in good
faith and without malice.
(5)(a) The department may retain a  record of the information obtained during a request for a
criminal background check under this section for the period of time provided in ORS 166.412 (7).
(b) The record of the  information obtained during a request for a criminal background check
[24]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under this section is exempt from disclosure under public records law.
(c) If the department determines that a recipient is prohibited from possessing a  firearm under
ORS 166.250 (1)(c), the department shall  report the attempted transfer, the recipient’s name and any
other personally identifiable information to all federal, state  and local law enforcement agencies and
district attorneys that have jurisdiction over the location  or locations where the attempted transfer
was made and where the recipient resides.
(d) If the department determines that, based  on the judgment of conviction, the recipient is
prohibited from possessing a firearm as a condition of probation  or that the recipient is currently
on post-prison supervision or parole,  the department shall report the attempted transfer to the
recipient’s supervising officer and the district attorney of the county in which the  conviction oc-
curred.
(e) If  the department determines that the recipient is prohibited from possessing a firearm due
to a court order described in ORS 166.255 (1)(a), the department shall  report the attempted transfer
to the court that issued the order.
(f) If the department determines that the recipient is under the jurisdiction of the Psychiatric
Security Review Board, the department shall report the attempted transfer to the board.
(g) Reports required by  paragraphs (c) to (f) of this subsection shall be made within 24 hours
after the determination is made, unless  a report would compromise an ongoing investigation, in
which case the report may be delayed as long as necessary to avoid compromising  the investigation.
(h) On or  before January 31 of each year, a law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney’s
office that received a report pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection during the previous cal-
endar year shall inform the department of any action that was taken  concerning the report and the
outcome of the action.
(i) The  department shall annually publish a written report, based on any information received
under paragraph (h) of this subsection, detailing the following information for the previous year:
(A) The number of recipients whom the department determined were  prohibited from possessing
a firearm under ORS 166.250 (1)(c), arranged by category of prohibition;
(B) The number of reports made pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection;
(C) The number of investigations arising from the reports  made pursuant to paragraph (c) of this
subsection, the number of investigations concluded and the  number of investigations referred for
prosecution, all arranged by category of prohibition; and
(D) The number of criminal charges arising from the reports made pursuant to paragraph (c) of
this subsection and the disposition of the charges, both arranged by category of prohibition.
(6) The recipient of the firearm must be present when the transferor requests a criminal back-
ground check under this section.
(7)(a) Except  as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a transferor who receives
notification under this section  that the recipient is qualified to complete the transfer of a firearm,
has the recipient fill out the form required by ORS 166.438 (1)(a) and retains  the form as required
by ORS 166.438 (2) is immune from civil liability for any use  of the firearm from the time of the
transfer unless the transferor  knows, or reasonably should know, that the recipient is likely to
commit an unlawful act involving the firearm.
(b) The immunity provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply:
(A) If the transferor knows, or reasonably should know, that the recipient of the  firearm intends
to deliver the  firearm to a third person who the transferor knows, or reasonably should know, may
not lawfully possess the firearm; or
[25]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) In any product liability civil action under ORS 30.900 to 30.920.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 166.438, as amended by section 9 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
166.438. (1) A transferor who is not a gun dealer may not transfer a firearm  at a gun show un-
less the transferor:
(a)(A) [ For transfers occurring on or after July 1,  2026 ] Unless an exception described in
subsection (7) of this section applies , verifies with the Department of State Police that the re-
cipient has a valid permit-to-purchase issued under ORS 166.505;
(B) Requests a criminal background check under ORS 166.436 prior to completing the transfer;
(C) Receives a unique  approval number from the department indicating that the recipient is
qualified to complete the transfer; and
(D) Has the recipient complete the form described in ORS 166.441; or
(b) Completes the transfer through a gun dealer.
(2) The transferor  shall retain the completed form referred to in subsection (1) of this section
for at least five years and shall make the completed  form available to law enforcement agencies for
the purpose of criminal investigations.
(3) A person who organizes a gun show shall post in a prominent  place at the gun show a notice
explaining the  requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The person shall provide the
form required by subsection (1) of this section to any person transferring a firearm at the gun  show.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section does  not apply if the transferee is licensed as a dealer under
18 U.S.C. 923.
(5)(a) Failure to comply with the requirements of subsection (1), (2) or (3)  of this section is a
Class A misdemeanor.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, failure to comply with  the requirements
of subsection (1), (2) or (3) of this section is a Class C felony if the person has two or more previous
convictions under this section at the time of the offense.
(6) It is an affirmative defense to a charge of violating subsection (1) or  (3) of this section that
the person did not  know, or reasonably could not know, that more than 25 firearms were at the site
and available for transfer.
(7) A valid permit to  purchase a firearm issued under ORS 166.505 is not required for a
firearm transfer under this section if:
(a) The recipient can demonstrate proof of completion of a firearm safety course as de-
fined in ORS 166.505 (8) and is purchasing:
(A) A single-shot rifle, whether centerfire or rimfire;
(B) A double-barreled shotgun;
(C) A repeating rifle, whether centerfire or rimfire, that  has a bolt, lever, pump,
straight-pull or revolving action;
(D) A rifle with an attached tubular magazine designed to accept, and capable of  operat-
ing only with, 0.22 caliber rimfire ammunition;
(E) A muzzleloader rifle; or
(F) A shotgun with a pump, break, lever or revolving action; or
(b) The recipient is:
(A) An active duty state, federal or tribal police officer as defined  in ORS 181A.355 and
presents valid identification and an identification number issued to the recipient by the De-
partment of Public Safety Standards and Training; or
(B) An active duty member of  the Armed Forces of the United States as defined in ORS
[26]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
352.313 and presents valid identification.
SECTION 16.
(1) The amendments to ORS  166.412, 166.435, 166.436 and 166.438 by sections
12 to 15 of this 2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2026.
(2) The amendments to ORS 166.412, 166.435, 166.436 and 166.438 by  sections 12 to 15 of
this 2025 Act apply to firearm transfers occurring on or after July 1, 2026.
TRANSFERS OCCURRING ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2028
SECTION 17.  ORS 166.412,  as amended by sections 6 and 12 of this 2025 Act, is amended to
read:
166.412. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Antique firearm” has the meaning given that term in 18 U.S.C. 921;
(b) “Department” means the Department of State Police;
(c) “Firearm” has the  meaning given that term in ORS 166.210, except that it does not include
an antique firearm;
(d) “Firearms transaction  record” means the firearms transaction record required by 18 U.S.C.
921 to 929;
(e) “Firearms transaction thumbprint form” means a form provided by the department  under
subsection (11) of this section;
(f) “Gun dealer” means a person engaged in the business, as  defined in 18 U.S.C. 921, of selling,
leasing or otherwise transferring a firearm, whether the person is a  retail dealer, pawnbroker or
otherwise;
(g) “Purchaser” means a person who buys, leases or otherwise  receives a firearm or unfinished
frame or receiver from a gun dealer; and
(h) “Unfinished frame or receiver” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.210.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (12) of  this section, a gun dealer shall comply with the
following before a firearm or unfinished frame or receiver is delivered to a purchaser:
(a) The purchaser shall present to  the gun dealer current identification meeting the require-
ments of subsection (4) of this section and, unless an exception described in subsection (15)  of this
section applies, a valid permit issued under ORS 166.505.
(b) The gun dealer shall complete the firearms transaction record and obtain the signature of
the purchaser on the record.
(c) The gun dealer shall obtain the thumbprints of the purchaser on the  firearms transaction
thumbprint form and attach the form to the gun dealer’s copy of the firearms transaction record  to
be filed with that copy.
(d) The  gun dealer shall, by telephone or computer, request that the department conduct a
criminal background check on the purchaser, verify,  unless an exception described in subsection (15)
of this section  applies, that the purchaser has a valid permit to purchase a firearm issued under ORS
166.505, and provide the following information to the department:
(A) The federal firearms license number of the gun dealer;
(B) The business name of the gun dealer;
(C) The place of transfer;
(D) The name of the person making the transfer;
(E) The make, model, caliber and manufacturer’s number of  the firearm being transferred or a
description of the unfinished frame or receiver being transferred;
[27]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(F) The name and date of birth of the purchaser;
(G) The Social Security number of the purchaser  if the purchaser voluntarily provides this
number to the gun dealer; and
(H) The type, issuer and identification number of the identification presented by the purchaser.
(e) The gun dealer shall receive a  unique approval number for the transfer from the department
and record the approval number on the firearms transaction  record and on the firearms transaction
thumbprint form.
(f) The gun  dealer may destroy the firearms transaction thumbprint form five years after the
completion of the firearms transaction thumbprint form.
(3)(a) Upon receipt of a request of the gun dealer for a  criminal history record check, the de-
partment shall immediately, during the gun dealer’s telephone call or by return call:
(A) Determine, from criminal records and other  information available to it, whether the pur-
chaser is disqualified under ORS 166.470 from completing the purchase; and
(B) Notify the gun dealer  when a purchaser is disqualified from completing the transfer or pro-
vide the gun dealer with a unique approval number  indicating that the purchaser is qualified to
complete the transfer.
(b) If the department is unable to determine  within 30 minutes if the purchaser is qualified or
disqualified from completing the transfer, the department shall notify the  gun dealer and provide the
gun dealer with an estimate of  the time when the department will provide the requested information.
(c) The dealer may  not transfer the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver unless the dealer
receives a unique approval number from the department. Within 48 hours  of completing the transfer,
the dealer shall notify the department that the transfer was completed.
(4)(a) Identification required of the purchaser under subsection (2) of this section  shall include
one piece of  current identification bearing a photograph and the date of birth of the purchaser that:
(A) Is issued under the authority of the United States Government, a state, a political  subdivi-
sion of a state, a foreign government, a political subdivision  of a foreign government, an interna-
tional governmental organization or an international quasi-governmental organization; and
(B) Is intended to be used for identification  of an individual or is commonly accepted for the
purpose of identification of an individual.
(b) If the identification  presented by the purchaser under paragraph (a) of this subsection does
not include the  current address of the purchaser, the purchaser shall present a second piece of
current identification that contains the current address of the  purchaser. The Superintendent of
State Police may specify by rule the type of identification that may be  presented under this para-
graph.
(c) The department may require that the gun dealer verify the identification of the  purchaser if
that identity is in question by sending the thumbprints of the purchaser to the department.
(5) The department shall establish a telephone number that shall be  operational seven days a
week between the hours of 8 a.m. and 10 p.m.  for the purpose of responding to inquiries from gun
dealers for a criminal history record check under this section.
(6) No public employee, official or  agency shall be held criminally or civilly liable for performing
the investigations required by this section  provided the employee, official or agency acts in good
faith and without malice.
(7)(a) The department may retain a  record of the information obtained during a request for a
criminal history record check  for no more than five years, except that information provided to the
gun dealer under subsection (2)(d) of this section  sufficient to reflect each firearm purchased by a
[28]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
permit holder shall be retained and attached to the electronic record of the  permit stored by the
department. The department may  develop a system for removal of the information described in sub-
section (2)(d)(E) of  this section upon proof of sale or transfer of the firearm to another permit holder,
and for the recording of  the information to reflect the transfer of ownership to the permit of the new
owner.
(b) The record of the information obtained during a request for a criminal history  record check
by a gun dealer is exempt from disclosure under public records law.
(c) If the department determines that a purchaser is prohibited from possessing  a firearm under
ORS 166.250 (1)(c), the department  shall report the attempted transfer, the purchaser’s name and any
other personally identifiable information to all federal, state  and local law enforcement agencies and
district attorneys that have jurisdiction over the location  or locations where the attempted transfer
was made and where the purchaser resides.
(d) If the department determines that, based on  the judgment of conviction, the purchaser is
prohibited from possessing a firearm as a  condition of probation or that the purchaser is currently
on post-prison supervision or parole, the department shall report the  attempted transfer to the
purchaser’s supervising officer and  the district attorney of the county in which the conviction oc-
curred.
(e) If the department determines that the purchaser is prohibited from possessing a firearm due
to a court order described in ORS 166.255 (1)(a), the department shall  report the attempted transfer
to the court that issued the order.
(f) If the department determines that the purchaser is under the jurisdiction of the  Psychiatric
Security Review Board, the department shall report the attempted transfer to the board.
(g) Reports required by paragraphs (c) to (f) of this subsection shall be made  within 24 hours
after the determination is made, unless a report would  compromise an ongoing investigation, in
which case the report may be delayed as long as necessary to avoid compromising  the investigation.
(h) On or  before January 31 of each year, a law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney’s
office that received a report pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection during the previous cal-
endar year shall inform the department of any action that was taken  concerning the report and the
outcome of the action.
(i) The department shall annually publish a written report, based on any information  received
under paragraph (h) of this subsection, detailing the following information for the previous year:
(A) The number of purchasers whom the  department determined were prohibited from possessing
a firearm under ORS 166.250 (1)(c), arranged by category of prohibition;
(B) The number of reports made pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection;
(C) The number of investigations arising from the reports  made pursuant to paragraph (c) of this
subsection, the number of investigations concluded  and the number of investigations referred for
prosecution, all arranged by category of prohibition; and
(D) The number of criminal charges arising from the reports made pursuant to paragraph (c) of
this subsection and the disposition of the charges, both arranged by category of prohibition.
(8) A law enforcement agency  may inspect the records of a gun dealer relating to transfers of
firearms and unfinished frames or receivers with the consent of a gun  dealer in the course of a
reasonable inquiry during a criminal investigation  or under the authority of a properly authorized
subpoena or search warrant.
(9) When a firearm is delivered, it shall be unloaded.
(10) In accordance with applicable provisions  of ORS chapter 183, the Superintendent of State
[29]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Police may adopt rules necessary for:
(a) The design of the firearms transaction thumbprint form;
(b) The maintenance of a procedure to  correct errors in the criminal records of the department;
(c) The provision of a security system to identify gun dealers  that request a criminal history
record check under subsection (2) of this section; and
(d) The creation and maintenance of a database of the business hours of gun dealers.
(11) The department shall publish the firearms  transaction thumbprint form and shall furnish the
form to gun dealers on application at cost.
(12) This  section does not apply to transactions between persons licensed as dealers under 18
U.S.C. 923.
(13)(a) If requested by a transferor who is not a gun dealer, a gun  dealer may request a criminal
background check pursuant to ORS 166.435 or 166.438 and may charge a reasonable fee for providing
the service.
(b) A gun dealer that requests a criminal background check under this  subsection is immune
from civil liability for any use of  the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver by the recipient or
transferee, provided that the gun dealer:
(A) Requests the criminal background check as described in this section;
(B) Receives a  unique approval number from the department indicating successful completion
of the criminal background check; and
(C) Unless an exception described in subsection (15) of this section applies, verifies that the re-
cipient has a valid permit to purchase the firearm or unfinished frame or receiver.
(14) Knowingly selling or delivering a firearm to a purchaser or transferee who does  not have
a valid permit to purchase a firearm  in violation of subsection (2)(d) of this section and does not
qualify for an exception described in subsection (15) of this section, or prior to receiving a  unique
approval number from the department based on the criminal background check in violation of  sub-
section (3)(c) of this section, is a Class A misdemeanor.
(15) A valid permit to purchase a firearm issued under ORS 166.505 is not  required for a firearm
purchase from a gun dealer under this section if[ :]
[(a) The purchaser can demonstrate proof of completion of  a firearm safety course as defined in
ORS 166.505 (8) and is purchasing: ]
[(A) A single-shot rifle, whether centerfire or rimfire; ]
[(B) A double-barreled shotgun; ]
[(C) A repeating rifle, whether centerfire or rimfire, that has a bolt,  lever, pump, straight-pull or
revolving action; ]
[(D) A rifle  with an attached tubular magazine designed to accept, and capable of operating only
with, 0.22 caliber rimfire ammunition; ]
[(E) A muzzleloader rifle; or ]
[(F) A shotgun with a pump, break, lever or revolving action; or ]
[(b)] the purchaser is:
[(A)] (a)  An active  duty state, federal or tribal police officer as defined in ORS 181A.355 and
presents valid identification and an identification  number issued to the purchaser by the Department
of Public Safety Standards and Training; or
[(B)] (b)  An active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States as defined in ORS
352.313 and presents valid identification.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 166.435,  as amended by sections 7 and 13 of this 2025 Act, is amended to
[30]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
read:
166.435. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Transfer” means the delivery of  a firearm from a transferor to a transferee, including, but
not limited to, the sale,  gift, loan or lease of the firearm. “Transfer” does not include the temporary
provision of a firearm to a transferee if the  transferor has no reason to believe the transferee is
prohibited from possessing a firearm or intends to use the firearm in the commission of a  crime, and
the provision occurs:
(A) At a shooting range, shooting gallery or other area designed for  the purpose of target
shooting, for use during target practice, a firearms safety or training course or class  or a similar
lawful activity;
(B) For the purpose of hunting, trapping or target shooting, during the time in  which the
transferee is engaged in activities related to hunting, trapping or target shooting;
(C) Under circumstances in which the transferee and the firearm are  in the presence of the
transferor;
(D) To a transferee who is in  the business of repairing firearms, for the time during which the
firearm is being repaired;
(E) To a transferee who is in the business of making  or repairing custom accessories for
firearms, for the time during which the accessories are being made or repaired; or
(F) For the purpose of preventing imminent death or serious physical injury, and  the provision
lasts only as long as is necessary to prevent the death or serious physical injury.
(b) “Transferee” means a person who is not a  gun dealer or licensed as a manufacturer or
importer under 18 U.S.C. 923 and who intends to receive a firearm from a transferor.
(c) “Transferor” means a person who is not a gun dealer  or licensed as a manufacturer or
importer under 18 U.S.C. 923 and who intends to deliver a firearm to a transferee.
(2) Except as provided in ORS  166.436 and 166.438 and subsection (4) of this section, a transferor
may not transfer a firearm to a transferee unless the transfer is completed through  a gun dealer as
described in subsection (3) of this section.
(3)(a) A transferor may transfer a firearm to a transferee only as provided in this section. Except
as provided in  paragraph (b) of this subsection, prior to the transfer both the transferor and the
transferee must appear in person  before a gun dealer, with the firearm and, unless an exception
described in subsection (6) of this section applies, a valid permit-to-purchase issued to  the transferee
under ORS 166.505, and request that the gun dealer perform a  criminal background check on the
transferee.
(b) If the transferor and the  transferee reside over 40 miles from each other, the transferor may
ship or deliver the  firearm to a gun dealer located near the transferee or a gun dealer designated
by the transferee, and the transferor need not appear before the gun dealer in person.
(c) A gun dealer who  agrees to complete a transfer of a firearm under this section shall request
a criminal history record check on the transferee as  described in ORS 166.412 and shall comply with
all requirements of federal law.
(d) If, upon completion of a criminal background check, the gun dealer:
(A) Receives a unique approval number from the Department of  State Police indicating that the
transferee is qualified to complete the transfer, the gun dealer shall notify the transferor,  enter the
firearm into the gun dealer’s inventory and transfer the firearm to the transferee.
(B) Receives notification  that the transferee is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing
or receiving the firearm or that the department is unable to determine if the transferee is qualified
[31]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or disqualified from completing the transfer, the gun dealer shall notify  the transferor and neither
the transferor nor the gun dealer shall transfer the firearm to the transferee. If the transferor
shipped or delivered the firearm to the gun dealer pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection, the
gun dealer shall comply with federal law when returning the firearm to the transferor.
(e) A gun dealer may  charge a reasonable fee for facilitating a firearm transfer pursuant to this
section.
(4) The requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of this section do not apply to:
(a) The transfer of a firearm by or to a law enforcement agency, or by or  to a law enforcement
officer, private security professional or member  of the Armed Forces of the United States, while that
person is acting within the scope of official duties.
(b) The transfer of a firearm as part of a firearm turn-in or buyback event, in which  a law
enforcement agency receives or purchases firearms from members of the public.
(c) The transfer of a firearm to:
(A) A transferor’s spouse or domestic partner;
(B) A transferor’s parent or stepparent;
(C) A transferor’s child or stepchild;
(D) A transferor’s sibling;
(E) A transferor’s grandparent;
(F) A transferor’s grandchild;
(G) A transferor’s aunt or uncle;
(H) A transferor’s first cousin;
(I) A transferor’s niece or nephew; or
(J) The spouse or domestic partner of a person specified in subparagraphs (B) to (I) of this par-
agraph.
(d) The transfer of a firearm that occurs because of the death of the firearm owner,  provided
that:
(A) The  transfer is conducted or facilitated by a personal representative, as defined in ORS
111.005, or a trustee of a trust created in a will; and
(B) The transferee is related to the deceased firearm owner in a manner specified in  paragraph
(c) of this subsection.
(5)(a) A transferor who fails  to comply with the requirements of this section commits a Class
A misdemeanor.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection, a transferor who fails to comply with the
requirements of this section commits a Class  B felony if the transferor has a previous conviction
under this section at the time of the offense.
(6) A valid permit to purchase a firearm issued under ORS 166.505 is  not required for a firearm
transfer under this section if[ :]
[(a) The transferee can demonstrate proof of completion of a firearm safety course as  defined ORS
166.505 (8) and is purchasing: ]
[(A) A single-shot rifle, whether centerfire or rimfire; ]
[(B) A double-barreled shotgun; ]
[(C) A repeating rifle, whether  centerfire or rimfire, that has a bolt, lever, pump, straight-pull or
revolving action;]
[(D) A rifle with an attached tubular magazine designed to accept, and capable of  operating only
with, 0.22 caliber rimfire ammunition; ]
[32]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(E) A muzzleloader rifle; or ]
[(F) A shotgun with a pump, break, lever or revolving action; or ]
[(b)] the transferee is:
[(A)] (a)  An active duty state, federal or tribal police officer as defined in  ORS 181A.355 and
presents valid identification  and an identification number issued to the transferee by the Department
of Public Safety Standards and Training; or
[(B)] (b)  An active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States as defined in  ORS
352.313 and presents valid identification.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 166.438,  as amended by sections 9 and 15 of this 2025 Act, is amended to
read:
166.438. (1) A transferor who is not a gun dealer may not transfer a firearm  at a gun show un-
less the transferor:
(a)(A) Unless an exception described in subsection (7) of this  section applies, verifies with the
Department of State Police that the  recipient has a valid permit-to-purchase issued under ORS
166.505;
(B) Requests a criminal background check under ORS 166.436 prior to completing the transfer;
(C) Receives a unique  approval number from the department indicating that the recipient is
qualified to complete the transfer; and
(D) Has the recipient complete the form described in ORS 166.441; or
(b) Completes the transfer through a gun dealer.
(2) The transferor  shall retain the completed form referred to in subsection (1) of this section
for at least five years and shall make the completed  form available to law enforcement agencies for
the purpose of criminal investigations.
(3) A person who organizes a gun show shall post in a prominent  place at the gun show a notice
explaining the  requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The person shall provide the
form required by subsection (1) of this section to any person transferring a firearm at the gun  show.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if the transferee  is licensed as a dealer under
18 U.S.C. 923.
(5)(a) Failure to comply with the  requirements of subsection (1), (2) or (3) of this section is a
Class A misdemeanor.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph  (a) of this subsection, failure to comply with the requirements
of subsection (1), (2) or (3) of this section is a Class C felony if the person has two or more previous
convictions under this section at the time of the offense.
(6) It is an affirmative defense  to a charge of violating subsection (1) or (3) of this section that
the person did not  know, or reasonably could not know, that more than 25 firearms were at the site
and available for transfer.
(7) A valid permit to purchase a firearm issued under ORS 166.505 is  not required for a firearm
transfer under this section if[ :]
[(a) The recipient can demonstrate proof of completion  of a firearm safety course as defined in ORS
166.505 (8) and is purchasing: ]
[(A) A single-shot rifle, whether centerfire or rimfire; ]
[(B) A double-barreled shotgun; ]
[(C) A repeating rifle, whether  centerfire or rimfire, that has a bolt, lever, pump, straight-pull or
revolving action;]
[(D) A rifle with an attached tubular magazine designed to accept, and capable of  operating only
[33]
HB 3075
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
with, 0.22 caliber rimfire ammunition; ]
[(E) A muzzleloader rifle; or ]
[(F) A shotgun with a pump, break, lever or revolving action; or ]
[(b)] the recipient is:
[(A)] (a)  An active duty state, federal or tribal police officer as defined in  ORS 181A.355 and
presents valid identification and an identification number issued  to the recipient by the Department
of Public Safety Standards and Training; or
[(B)] (b)  An active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States as defined in  ORS
352.313 and presents valid identification.
SECTION 20.
(1) The amendments  to ORS 166.412, 166.435 and 166.438 by sections 17 to
19 of this 2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2028.
(2) The amendments  to ORS 166.412, 166.435 and 166.438 by sections 17 to 19 of this 2025
Act apply to firearm transfers occurring on or after July 1, 2028.
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS OF BALLOT MEASURE 114
SECTION 21.  Section 13, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2023  (Ballot Measure 114 (2022)), is amended
to read:
Sec. 13.  The provisions of [ this 2022 Act ] chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2023,  apply to all actions
taken on or after  [the effective date of this 2022 Act ] December 8, 2022, [unless] except as  expressly
stated otherwise [ herein] by law . [ This 2022 Act may be known and cited as the Reduction  of Gun
Violence Act.]
CHALLENGE TO LEGALITY OF ACT
SECTION 22. Any action  challenging the legality, including the constitutionality, of this
2025 Act must be commenced in the Circuit Court for Marion County.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 23. The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 24. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[34]