Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly to ensure sustainable funding
for centers for independent living to assist Oregon’s diverse population of older  adults and
people with disabilities to achieve well-being through  opportunities for community living,
employment, family support and services that promote independence, choice  and dignity. The
Legislative Assembly further finds that  centers for independent living require a minimum
funding level of $40 million in  total General Fund moneys, federal funds and other funds to
ensure program stability and the provision of  independent living services in all 36 Oregon
counties.
(2) In each biennium beginning July 1, 2021, the Department of Human Services shall in-
clude in its agency  request budget filed under ORS 291.208, and the Governor shall include
in the Governor’s budget required under ORS 291.202, incremental increases  in the appro-
priations from the General Fund so that, by the end of the biennium ending June  30, 2029,
the department may distribute moneys to the centers for independent living in this state  no
less than a total of $40 million in General Fund moneys, federal funds and other funds.
(3) As used in this section, “center for independent living” has the  meaning given that
term in 29 U.S.C. 796a.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2019 Act is repealed on July 1, 2029.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2481