Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of  $_____, which may be expended for the purpose of providing
assistance for the purchase of fresh, unprocessed, locally grown fruits,  vegetables and herbs
from farmers’ markets or roadside stands under the Senior Farm Direct  Nutrition Program
and the Women, Infants and Children Farm Direct Nutrition Program.
SECTION 2.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4293