Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
ORS 421.074 is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 421.
SECTION 2.  ORS 421.074 is amended to read:
421.074. (1) No later than  September 1, [ 2023] 2026, the Department of Corrections shall ensure
that adults in custody in [ the Coffee Creek Correctional Facility  and the Snake River Correctional
Institution] all department institutions  have online access to:
(a) The adult basic skills development program described in ORS 421.084;
(b) The professional and technical program described in ORS 421.081; and
(c) Education programs that provide college credit, a college  degree, a college certification, an
industry-recognized certification or license or an apprenticeship.
(2) Nothing in this section establishes a legally enforceable right to  online access to the pro-
grams described in this section for adults in custody.
(3) The department shall adopt any rules necessary for  establishing program eligibility and
participation criteria for online access for adults in custody.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1781