Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, for the purposes of:
(1) Enforcement of and  compliance with Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972
(20 U.S.C. 1681 et seq.);
(2) Sexual harassment prevention; and
(3) Gender discrimination prevention.
SECTION 2.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1139