Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Revenue Officer shall conduct a study of  revenue in this
state. The officer shall submit a report of findings  to the interim committees of the Legis-
lative Assembly related to revenue in the  manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than
September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2158