Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Public Employees Retirement Board shall study options for allowing
telecommunicators to obtain  prorated service year units and report to an appropriate com-
mittee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly no later than September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1789