Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Human Services,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $ , which shall be allocated to area agencies, as de-
fined in ORS 410.040, to address the unmet needs of seniors for mental and behavioral health
treatment and to address the disproportionate  burdens on seniors arising from the COVID-19
pandemic.
SECTION 2. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1529