Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 456.548 to
456.725.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “senior cottages” means housing that is:
(a) Cottage clusters, as defined in ORS 197.758, that complies with building codes and with
the model middle housing ordinance created by the Land Conservation and  Development
Commission under section 3 (2), chapter 639, Oregon Laws 2019;
(b) Housing for older persons as defined in ORS 659A.421;
(c) Available to rent by persons with very low income as defined in ORS 458.610;
(d) Made available to rent for the first  year after development for no more than $750 per
month and that thereafter complies with requirements adopted by the Housing and Commu-
nity Services Department that apply  to affordable rental housing managed by the department
that govern rent increases, including requirements related to rent  increase limits, required
notices or approval or review by the department;
(e) Designed and constructed for accessibility in accordance with section 1102  or 1103 of
the International Code Council Standard  for Accessible and Usable Buildings and Facilities,
third version, April 2022; and
(f) Durable and easy to construct.
(2) The Housing and Community Services Department shall:
(a) Develop and freely disseminate sample plans for the development of senior cottages;
and
(b) Provide grants to qualified housing sponsors  to fund project costs or system devel-
opment charges for senior cottages.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $250,000,000, to implement section 2 of this
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1310
SB 46
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
2023 Act.
SECTION 5.
(1) An organization receiving a grant under section 2 of this 2023 Act  shall
submit a report to the Housing and Community Services Department  on or before August
1, 2025, that includes:
(a) A description of the activities undertaken by the organization using the grant;
(b) Identification of the costs of each of the services provided in connection  with the
housing assisted with such grant amounts; and
(c) An  assessment of the effectiveness of the grant program under section 2 of this 2023
Act and any recommendations for improving the program.
(2) On or before September 15, 2025, the  department shall submit a report to an appro-
priate interim committee of the Legislative Assembly  in the manner provided in ORS 192.245
summarizing the information collected in the reports under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 6.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[2]