Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) On or before June 1, 2023, the division of the Oregon Department  of Ad-
ministrative Services that serves as the department’s office of economic  analysis shall esti-
mate the amount of savings to the General Fund in the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
resulting from  the closures of Mill Creek Correctional Facility, Shutter Creek Correctional
Institution and Warner Creek Correctional Facility.
(2) The Legislative Assembly  shall, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, appropriate
a total amount from the General Fund at least equal  to the amount estimated under sub-
section (1) of this section for the following purposes, without supplanting  previous levels of
funding for such purposes:
(a) The Justice Reinvestment Program established under section 53, chapter  649, Oregon
Laws 2013;
(b) Youth  development programs targeted at reducing youth involvement in the legal
system;
(c) Prison education, training, mental health and addiction programs; and
(d) Prisoner reentry programs.
SECTION 2.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3544