Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 442.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “hospital system” means:
(a) A parent corporation of  one or more hospitals and any entity affiliated with the par-
ent corporation through ownership, governance, control or membership; or
(b) A hospital and any entity affiliated with the hospital through ownership, governance,
control or membership.
(2) A hospital licensed in this state or a hospital system operating in  this state shall
make publicly available on  the hospital’s or hospital system’s website, and update annually,
the hospital’s or hospital system’s expenses  for the preceding year, including salary and
benefit information for each classification of employee and for individual executives.
(3) If a hospital or hospital system does not have a  website, the information described in
subsection (2) of this section must be made available in hard copy form in each  reception
area of the hospital or hospital system.
(4) A hospital or hospital system may use the format of the Internal  Revenue Service
Form 990 to provide information described in subsection (2) of this section.
(5) The Oregon Health Authority shall  adopt rules necessary to carry out the provisions
of this section, including but not limited to:
(a) Prescribing definitions for the  classifications of employees and other terms used in
subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) Civil penalties that may be imposed in accordance with ORS 183.745 for a hospital’s
or a hospital system’s failure to comply with the requirements of this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1850