Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 650.005 to
650.100.
SECTION 2. (1)(a) A franchisor may not require as part of a franchise that the franchisee
purchase goods, supplies, inventories or services solely from the franchisor or a source the
franchisor designates if goods, supplies, inventories  or services of comparable quality are
available from sources other than the franchisor or the  sources that the franchisor desig-
nates, except that the franchisor may:
(A) Publish a list of approved sources of goods, supplies,  inventories or services that
comply with a published set of the franchisor’s specifications and standards; and
(B) Disapprove sources of goods, supplies, inventories or services that do not comply with
the franchisor’s published specifications and standards.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply to  goods, supplies, inventories or
services that the franchisor manufactures or that bear the franchisor’s trademark.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a franchisor may not receive
from a person with which a  franchisee does business a payment, a provision of goods or
services or of any other benefit if the payment, provision or benefit arises as a  consequence
of or in relation to the franchisee’s transaction with the person, unless  the franchisor
promptly accounts for and transmits the payment, provision or benefit to the franchisee.
(b) A franchisor may  receive compensation for services the franchisor provides to the
person or the franchisee in enabling or  facilitating the transaction between the person and
the franchisee.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies to franchises into which a  franchisor and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 730
HB 2590
1
2
3
franchisee enter or that  a franchisor and franchisee renew on or after the effective date of
this 2025 Act.
[2]