Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Deaf, Deaf-Blind and Hard of Hearing  Fund is established in the
State Treasury, separate and  distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Deaf,
Deaf-Blind and Hard of Hearing Fund shall be credited to the fund. All moneys  in the Deaf,
Deaf-Blind and Hard of Hearing Fund are continuously appropriated to the  Department of
Human Services for the purpose of administering programs of the department  for individuals
who are deaf, deaf-blind or hard of hearing.
(2) The Deaf, Deaf-Blind and Hard of Hearing Fund shall consist of  all moneys credited
to the fund, including:
(a) Moneys received from the federal government for purposes related to  the adminis-
tration of programs for individuals who are deaf, deaf-blind or hard of hearing;
(b) Moneys appropriated or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly; and
(c) Moneys designated to be transferred to the fund under the laws of the state.
SECTION 2.
Upon collecting surcharge moneys pursuant to section 7, chapter 290,
Oregon Laws 1987, the Public Utility Commission shall transfer  percent of the  moneys
to the Deaf, Deaf-Blind and Hard of Hearing Fund established under  section 1 of this 2017
Act.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2017 Act is repealed on January 2, 2020.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4268