Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 469A.210 is amended to read:
469A.210. (1) The Legislative  Assembly finds and declares that [ community-based renewable en-
ergy projects ]:
(a) Small-scale renewable  energy facilities , including but not limited to marine renewable
energy resources that are either developed in accordance with the Territorial Sea Plan  adopted
pursuant to ORS 196.471 or located on structures adjacent to  the coastal shorelands, are an essen-
tial element of this state’s energy future[ .];
(b) Small-scale renewable energy facilities are one  of the integral parts of this state’s
emergency preparedness and, when paired with energy storage and  other emerging technol-
ogy, help ensure that electricity will be available during catastrophic natural disasters;
(c) A diverse  portfolio of electricity generation facilities that includes small-scale
renewable energy facilities helps  reduce the risk of power outages and other technical and
financial failures;
(d) A diverse portfolio  of electricity generation facilities that includes small-scale
renewable energy facilities helps reduce the need to construct transmission lines to supply
electricity to retail electricity consumers from  a single large-scale electricity generation fa-
cility;
(e) Supplying electricity to retail electricity consumers that is generated  by small-scale
renewable energy facilities is necessary in order to meet the renewable portfolio standards
established under ORS 469A.005 to 469A.210 and therefore necessary for improving  this
state’s air quality and public health;
(f) Small-scale renewable energy  facilities have a smaller footprint on the landscape than
large-scale electricity generation facilities and, therefore, are more  easily incorporated into
existing infrastructure;
(g) There are substantial existing small-scale renewable energy facilities that have the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1886
SB 1178
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
potential to continue to produce renewable energy well into the future;
(h) There is substantial potential for adding small-scale renewable energy facilities; and
(i) Absent the requirement  established in this section, electric companies might other-
wise procure electricity only from large-scale electricity generation facilities.
(2) For purposes related to the findings in  subsection (1) of this section, by the year 2030, at
least 10 percent of the [ aggregate electrical capacity of all electric companies ] electricity sold  in this
state by each electric  company  that [ make] makes sales of electricity to 25,000 or more retail
electricity consumers in this state must  be composed of electricity generated by one or both of the
following sources:
(a) Small-scale renewable energy [ projects] facilities with a generating capacity of  20 megawatts
or less that are not owned by a person that is an electric company and that  generate electricity
utilizing a type of energy described in ORS 469A.025; or
(b) Facilities that are not owned by a person that is an electric company and  that generate
electricity using biomass and that also generate thermal energy for a secondary purpose.
(3) Regardless of the facility’s  nameplate capacity, any single facility described in subsection
(2)(b) of this section may be used to comply with the requirement specified  in subsection (2) of this
section for up to 20 megawatts of capacity.
(4) Beginning on  the effective date of this 2025 Act and until the year 2030, as necessary
to comply with the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, an electric company  sub-
ject to subsection (2) of  this section shall make best efforts to continually increase the an-
nual percentage of electricity sold in this state by the electric company that  is generated by
sources described in subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section.
(5) The Public Utility Commission shall adopt rules as necessary to  implement this sec-
tion.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]