Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department of Energy shall conduct a study to carry out  a
cost-benefit analysis on  deploying renewable energy projects in this state. The department
shall collect all data necessary to complete  the study, including data from entities that rep-
resent small scale and community-based renewable energy projects and public utilities.
(2) The Public Utility Commission shall assist  the department in collecting from public
utilities all data necessary to complete the study.
(3) In  collecting data for the study and drafting the report required under subsection (4)
of this section, the department shall balance the public  interest in information and the pro-
prietary interests  of owners and operators of renewable energy projects and utility service
providers.
(4) The department shall submit a report in the manner provided  by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim  committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to energy no later than September 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3547