Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 469.590 to
469.601.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Small modular reactor” means an advanced nuclear reactor:
(A) With a nameplate capacity of 300 electrical megawatts or less;
(B) That is made up of components that are  factory fabricated and transported to lo-
cation for on-site assembly; and
(C) That may be constructed and operated in combination with similar reactors  at a
single site.
(b) “Small modular reactor energy facility” means an energy facility  that produces power
from using one or more small modular reactors at a single site.
(2) ORS 469.597 does not apply to a small modular reactor energy facility.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act shall be submitted to the people for their  approval or rejection
at the next regular general election held throughout this state.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4507