Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 418.746 to
418.796.
SECTION 2. The Child Abuse  Assessment Account is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the account shall be  cred-
ited to the account. The account consists  of moneys deposited into the account under ORS
418.796 and may include moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or  transferred to the ac-
count by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise. The moneys in  the account are continuously
appropriated to the Department of Justice for the purposes specified in ORS 418.786.
SECTION 3.  ORS 418.746 is amended to read:
418.746. (1) The Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Account is  established separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned, if any, shall  inure to the benefit of the account.
The Child Abuse Multidisciplinary  Intervention Account consists of moneys deposited into
the account under ORS 418.796 and  may include moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited
or transferred to the account by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise.  All moneys  deposited
in the account are continuously appropriated to the Department of Justice for the purposes of  ORS
418.751 and this section.
(2) The Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program, with the advice  of the Advisory
Council on Child Abuse Assessment, created by ORS 418.784, shall allocate moneys from the  Child
Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Account to eligible  county multidisciplinary child abuse teams
formed under ORS 418.747, or entities designated  by the teams, serving the counties from which the
moneys were collected. The program may award only  one grant per county. The moneys shall be
allocated by the same formula as, or a formula similar to, the formula used by the Attorney  General
for equitable distribution of the  fund for victim’s assistance programs under ORS 147.227 (1). Moneys
allocated under this subsection  may not be used as replacement revenues for currently available
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3876
HB 3210
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
funds previously allocated by the county for child abuse intervention.
(3) The Child Abuse  Multidisciplinary Intervention Program shall determine eligibility of the
applicants and:
(a) Allocate funds if the applicant is deemed eligible;
(b) Conditionally allocate funds, with appropriate conditions, when necessary to establish  eligi-
bility; or
(c) Deny funding.
(4) In making the eligibility determination, the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Pro-
gram shall consider the following nonexclusive list of factors:
(a) Whether the services offered by an applicant substantially further the  goals and purposes
of ORS 418.747, 418.790 and 418.792;
(b) Whether the county multidisciplinary child abuse team or the entity designated by the  team
has properly allocated other available funds;
(c) Any evaluations of previously funded services as required by subsection (7) of this section;
(d) The extent to  which the county’s coordinated child abuse multidisciplinary intervention plan
provides for comprehensive services to the victims of child abuse;
(e) Whether  the funds are being used as replacement revenues as prohibited by subsection (2)
of this section;
(f) Whether there is a community assessment center  or advocacy center in existence or planned
in the county; and
(g) The extent to which funding a community assessment center is given priority  in the inter-
vention plan as required under subsection (5) of this section.
(5)(a) At least once a biennium, the county multidisciplinary child abuse team shall  submit to
the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program a coordinated child  abuse multidisciplinary
intervention plan. The intervention plan must:
(A) Describe all sources of funding, other than moneys that may be allocated from the  Child
Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Account, including in-kind contributions that are  available for
the intervention plan;
(B) Describe the critical needs of victims of child  abuse in the county, including but not limited
to assessment, advocacy  and treatment, and how the intervention plan addresses those needs in a
comprehensive manner;
(C) Include the county’s  written protocol and agreements required by ORS 418.747 (2) and
418.785; and
(D) Describe how the intervention plan gives priority to funding a community assessment  center
and how the funding supports the center.
(b) When submitting the intervention plan, the county  multidisciplinary child abuse team shall
also submit:
(A) Those applications  for funding received from entities under subsection (6) of this section that
the team  determines best meet the needs of the county’s intervention plan and a recommendation
that the applications for funding be granted; and
(B) If the team  is seeking funding from the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program,
an application setting forth the information required by rule of the program.
(6) An entity wishing to apply for funding from the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention
Program shall  submit an application to the county multidisciplinary child abuse team for the county
in which the entity proposes to provide services. The application shall:
[2]
HB 3210
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Describe the  services to be funded with moneys from the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary
Intervention Program according to the coordinated child abuse multidisciplinary intervention plan
and the anticipated outcomes in terms of benefits to children and families; and
(b) Describe how the services further the goals  and purposes of ORS 418.747, 418.790 and
418.792.
(7)(a) A designated entity providing services according to a coordinated child abuse multidisci-
plinary intervention plan funded with moneys from the Child  Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention
Program shall submit an annual report to the county multidisciplinary child abuse team.  A multi-
disciplinary child abuse team shall submit an annual report to the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary
Intervention Program.
(b) The annual report filed by the county multidisciplinary child abuse team must:
(A) Document how the moneys were  utilized and describe to what extent the services were able
to meet anticipated outcomes in terms of benefits to children and families.
(B) Include local and state issues and recommendations relating to the prevention of  child
fatalities identified in the fatality review process under ORS 418.785.
(c) A county multidisciplinary child abuse team receiving a  report from a designated entity shall
review  the  report and take into account success of the entity at meeting service outcomes before
making future recommendations regarding allocation of moneys.
(d) The  Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program shall review reports received under
this section before making future eligibility and allocation decisions  and when evaluating services
funded under this section.
(8) Two or more county multidisciplinary child abuse teams may join together to develop  joint
child abuse multidisciplinary  intervention plans. The joint intervention plans shall be submitted as
provided in subsection (5) of this section.
(9) The Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program may adopt rules to  carry out the
provisions of ORS 418.751 and this section including, but not limited to, the following:
(a) Notices and time limits for applications;
(b) Method of review and the role of advisory bodies; and
(c) Reallocation of moneys not applied for or disbursed.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 418.786 is amended to read:
418.786. (1) To accomplish the purpose described in ORS 418.780, with the assistance of the
Advisory Council on Child  Abuse Assessment, the administrator of the Child Abuse Multidiscipli-
nary Intervention Program shall develop and administer a grant program , separate  from the grant
program described in ORS 418.746,  to establish and  maintain regional assessment centers and
community assessment centers under ORS 418.746 to 418.796.
(2) The Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program, with the advice of the Ad-
visory Council on Child Abuse Assessment created by ORS 418.784,  shall allocate moneys
from the Child Abuse Assessment Account established in section 2 of  this 2019 Act to eligible
regional assessment centers  and community assessment centers under ORS 418.746 to
418.796. The moneys shall be allocated by the same formula as, or a formula similar  to, the
formula used by the Attorney General for equitable distribution of the  account for victims’
assistance programs under  ORS 147.227 (1). Moneys allocated under this subsection may not
be used as replacement revenues  for currently available funds previously allocated by the
county for child abuse assessments.
SECTION 5.  ORS 418.788 is amended to read:
[3]
HB 3210
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
418.788. (1) Subject to the availability of funds under the provisions of ORS 418.786 and 418.796,
The administrator  of the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program shall make grants for
the establishment and maintenance of  regional assessment centers or community assessment centers.
(2) A public or private agency  may apply to the administrator for a grant to establish and
maintain a regional assessment center  or community assessment center under ORS 418.746 to
418.796. The administrator may consolidate applications from more than one public  or private
agency or may return the application with the recommendation that the application  be consolidated.
(3) The administrator shall by rule establish criteria for awarding grants to  establish and
maintain regional assessment centers or community assessment centers under ORS  418.746 to
418.796, including but not limited to:
(a) Expenses eligible for reimbursement from funds under ORS  418.786 and 418.796;
(b) The extent to which the applicant’s proposed assessment center will best accomplish  the
purposes of ORS 418.746 to 418.796;
(c) The extent  to which an applicant meets criteria for receiving a grant to establish and
maintain a regional assessment center or community assessment center; and
(d) For a regional assessment center, the extent to which the applicant’s  proposed assessment
center meets the documented needs of the communities, community assessment centers  and county
multidisciplinary child abuse teams in the region or regions to be served by the center.
(4) The administrator is not required to fund any grant in the total amount requested  in the
application.
SECTION 6.  ORS 418.796 is amended to read:
418.796. The Advisory Council on Child Abuse Assessment may solicit and accept  contributions
of funds and assistance from the United States, its agencies or from other  sources, public or private,
and agree to conditions not inconsistent with the purposes  of ORS 418.746 to 418.796. All funds re-
ceived are to  aid in financing the functions of the advisory council and the purposes of ORS 418.746
to 418.796 [ and shall be deposited in the General Fund of the  State Treasury to the credit of a separate
account and are continuously appropriated to the Child  Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program
established by ORS 418.783 for the purposes of ORS 418.746 to 418.796 ]. The Advisory Council on
Child Abuse Assessment  may deposit moneys it collects under this section to the Child Abuse
Multidisciplinary Intervention Account  under ORS 418.746 or the Child Abuse Assessment
Account under section 2 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 7.  ORS 147.391 is amended to read:
147.391. Notwithstanding ORS 147.390, when the moneys provided from the Criminal Injuries
Compensation Account for the purposes of ORS  147.390 are expended for any cumulative time period
within any biennium, the Criminal Injuries Compensation Account shall have no further  obligations
under ORS 147.390 for that time period. However,  if the Criminal Injuries Compensation Account
has unexpended moneys provided  for at the end of any biennium, the balance shall be transferred
to the [ account created by ] Department of Justice for deposit by the Advisory Council on Child
Abuse Assessment under ORS 418.796.
SECTION 8. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to  the Department of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the Gen-
eral Fund,  the amount of $6,000,000 for deposit in the Child Abuse Assessment Account
established in section 2 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 9. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
[4]
HB 3210
1
2
July 1, 2019.
[5]