Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 670.030 is amended to read:
670.030. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Occupational or professional service” means a service:
(A) That an individual must possess  a license, certificate or other form of authorization to pro-
vide under the laws of this state; and
(B) Over which a professional licensing board has regulatory oversight.
(b) “Professional licensing board” means a state agency or board that  licenses, certifies or oth-
erwise authorizes individuals to provide an occupational or professional service.
(2) A professional licensing board that regulates an occupational or professional service and that
requires up to a high school diploma or equivalent for licensure, certification or other authorization
to provide the occupational or professional service [ may] shall  consider  an applicant’s relevant ex-
perience in lieu of the required education.
(3) A professional licensing board may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The amendments to ORS 670.030 by section 1  of this 2025 Act become
operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) A professional licensing board may take any action before the operative date  specified
in subsection (1) of this  section that is necessary to enable the board to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the board by the amendments to ORS 670.030 by section 1 of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 854