Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2019 Act is added to and made  a part of ORS chapter 286A.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Debt service” means:
(A) Payments due on principal, interest or other amounts owed under a bond;
(B) Moneys transferred,  segregated or otherwise disposed of to comply with requirements
for reserves; or
(C) Moneys  owed under an agreement for exchange of interest rates, a credit enhance-
ment device or a similar instrument.
(b) “General Fund revenues” has the meaning given that term in ORS 291.348.
(c) “General Fund-supported debt” means general obligation  bonds and any other bonds
that are secured by General Fund revenues or for which the State of Oregon is legally com-
mitted to make payments from the General Fund of the State of Oregon described in ORS
293.105.
(2) The Legislative Assembly finds  and declares that the prudent maximum outstanding
General Fund-supported debt at any time is the amount for which debt service in  a biennium
equals five percent of the General Fund revenues  estimated to be received in the biennium
as provided in Article IX, section 14, of the Oregon Constitution.
(3) In each biennium, the State Treasurer may not incur  General Fund-supported debt
when the debt service that comes due  in the biennium, for outstanding General Fund-
supported debt and General Fund-supported debt to be incurred,  exceeds five percent of the
General Fund revenues estimated to be received  in the biennium as provided in Article IX,
section 14, of the Oregon Constitution.
(4) Subsection (3) of this section does not apply to the  issuance by the State Treasurer
of refunding bonds for outstanding General Fund-supported debt.
SECTION 3.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2288
SB 614
1
[2]