Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education, in consultation with the Department  of
Consumer and Business Services, shall implement a method to enable school districts and
education service districts to record on the website of the Department  of Education any
school workplace safety incidents involving an employee of the school district or education
service district.
(2) The method must provide for the following data to be recorded for  a school workplace
safety incident:
(a) The school district in which the incident occurred.
(b) The school or other location where the incident occurred.
(c) For an incident that occurred at a school, the location within the school where  the
incident occurred.
(d) The nature of any injuries occurring as a result of the incident, including:
(A) Whether the injury  was recorded as a work-related injury to comply with applicable
health and safety recordkeeping requirements; and
(B) Whether the injury is classified as  a disabling compensable injury or a nondisabling
compensable injury under ORS chapter 656.
(e) Whether a student was involved in the incident.
(f) The status of any de-escalation training received by the employee involved in the in-
cident.
(g) Any additional data, as required by the Department of Education.
(3) The method must provide for:
(a) The recording of the data described in subsection  (2) of this section in a manner that
is:
(A) Easy to use for staff members;
(B) Accessible to the public; and
(C) Accessible in multiple formats and in English and the  languages listed by the Secre-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 937
HB 3357
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
tary of State under ORS 251.167 (1)(a).
(b) A format for making the data described in subsection (2) of this  section accessible for
purposes of data collection and analysis.
(c) Consistency in and fidelity to the data collected.
(d) The minimization of duplicative reporting of school workplace safety incidents.
(e) Safeguards to address bias against protected classes of students.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 339.309 is amended to read:
339.309. (1) Each district school board shall establish  a policy for the reporting of incidents that:
(a) Result in the injury of an employee of the school district; and
(b) Are sustained while in the actual performance of the duty of the employee.
(2) A policy established as provided by  this section must align, to the extent practicable, with
any [ existing] other reporting requirements , including the reporting requirements  of section 1
of this 2025 Act .
[2]