Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding ORS 197.235 (1)(a), on or before June  30, 2020, the Land
Conservation and Development Commission shall  amend its statewide land use planning
goals, including goals related to energy conservation, consistent with section 2 of this 2019
Act and the procedures under ORS 197.235 (4).
SECTION 2. The Legislative Assembly finds that, in addition to  the statewide land use
planning goal related to energy conservation currently adopted by the Land Conservation and
Development Commission:
(1) It is a priority of the state to reduce greenhouse gas emissions, minimize climate
change impacts and support a healthy environment;
(2) Shifting this  state away from fossil fuels promotes energy independence, which is a
priority of the state;
(3) The development of renewable energy facilities supports local jobs;
(4) The Legislative Assembly has adopted policies to  promote Oregon’s green energy
economy, including a renewable portfolio standard and a community solar program;
(5) Land use planning in this state should:
(a) Promote the development of renewable energy facilities to  facilitate the reduction of
greenhouse gas emissions;
(b) Help meet the state’s energy policies;
(c) Promote technologies that facilitate efficient integration of energy resources; and
(d) Facilitate the reduction of greenhouse gas emissions; and
(6) The current statewide land  use planning goals omit the goals and policies of the state
identified in this section and  are therefore inconsistent with the policies of the state and
should be amended as provided in section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 197.235 is amended to read:
197.235. (1) In preparing the goals and  guidelines, the Department of Land Conservation and
Development shall:
(a) Hold at least 10 public hearings throughout the state,  causing notice of the time, place and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1816
HB 2322
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
purpose of each hearing to be published in  a newspaper of general circulation within the area where
the hearing is to be conducted not later than 30 days prior to the date of  the hearing. At least two
public hearings must be held in each congressional district.
(b) Implement any other provision for  public involvement developed by the State Citizen In-
volvement Advisory Committee under  ORS 197.160 (1) and approved by the Land Conservation and
Development  Commission.
(2) Upon completion of the  preparation of the proposed goals and guidelines, or amendments to
those goals and guidelines, the department shall submit them to the commission,  the Local Officials
Advisory Committee, the State Citizen Involvement  Advisory Committee and the appropriate legis-
lative committee for review.
(3) The commission shall consider the comments of the Local Officials Advisory Committee, the
State Citizen Involvement Advisory Committee and the legislative  committee before the adoption
and amendment of the goals and guidelines.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 197.240 and subsection (1)(a) of this section, when a  legislative
enactment or an initiative measure is  inconsistent with the adopted goals and guidelines or directs
the commission to make a specific change to the adopted goals and guidelines, the commission may
[amend] propose and adopt amendments to  the goals and guidelines after only one  public hearing,
at a location determined by the commission, if the proposed amendment:
(a) Is necessary  to conform the goals and guidelines to the legislative enactment or the initiative
measure; and
(b) Makes  no change other than the conforming changes unless the change corrects an obvious
scrivener’s error.
[2]