Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Director  of Veterans’ Affairs, subject to approval by the Governor, may
appoint a deputy director. The deputy director must be  a veteran. The deputy director serves
at the pleasure of the director, has full authority to act for the director and is  subject to the
control of the director. The  appointment of the deputy director shall be by written order filed
with the Secretary of State.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1078