Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 2. (1)(a) To the extent permitted by federal law, the Oregon Health Authority
shall establish fee-for-service reimbursement rates for labor and delivery  services provided
by a hospital to a medical assistance recipient that are no less  than the costs to provide the
services.
(b) Rates of reimbursement established by the authority under  this section shall be suf-
ficient to address a hospital’s need to  have appropriate staff resources available at all times.
(2) A  coordinated care organization shall reimburse a hospital for providing labor and
delivery services at the rates established in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 3. Section 2  of this 2025 Act applies to contracts between a coordinated care
organization and the Oregon Health Authority entered  into, amended or renewed on or after
the effective date of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2767