Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 67, chapter 13, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 67. (1) The State Department of Agriculture shall provide grants to improve the  health and
safety conditions of existing agriculture  workforce housing, as defined in ORS 315.163, for agricul-
tural workers and their families.
(2)(a) The department shall design an  application and establish criteria by which grants awarded
under this section are allocated and prioritized.
(b) Before a  date on which rules that relate to housing for agricultural labor are first adopted
or amended by the Occupational Safety and Health Division of the Department of Consumer and
Business Services and that  is after [ the effective date of this 2023 Act ] March 29, 2023 , the State
Department of Agriculture shall prioritize awarding grants for housing that will comply with
changes to rules that  are under consideration of the agricultural labor housing rulemaking advisory
committee of the division.
(c) Within 30 days of the adoption of rules  described under paragraph (b) of this subsection, the
State Department of Agriculture shall update the grant application and criteria to allow  the use of
grant money to comply with the new or updated rules of the division.
(3) To be eligible for a grant under this section, the housing:
(a) Must comply with all occupational safety or health laws, rules, regulations and standards;
(b) Must be operated by a person who holds a valid indorsement  as a farmworker camp operator
under ORS 658.730, if an indorsement is required;
(c) Must be registered as a farmworker camp with the Department of Consumer and  Business
Services under ORS 658.750, if the housing is farm employment-related housing, on  or before 90 days
following the latter of:
(A) The first day of the first tax year after the grant was received; or
(B) The date the housing is first occupied; and
[(d) May not be housing that is required to be provided as part of  a labor contract made under a
temporary employment visa program; and ]
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3675
HB 2687
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
[(e)] (d) Must comply with any adopted rules, as described in subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(4) The Occupational  Safety and Health Division of the Department of Consumer and Business
Services shall assist the State Department of Agriculture in establishing  the application and criteria
under subsection (2)(b) and (c) of this section and shall assist the department  or a contractor under
subsection (5) of this section in determining eligibility for a grant under subsection (3) of  this sec-
tion.
(5) The  State Department of Agriculture may enter into a contract with a third party to award
or administer grants under this section.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]