Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
ORS 810.412 is repealed.
SECTION 2. The repeal of ORS  810.412 by section 1 of this 2025 Act applies to conduct
alleged to constitute an offense occurring on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4345