Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000 for  distribution to Josephine
County for the  purpose of paying for construction of or improvements to infrastructure that
is essential for emergency needs, including power, water  and sewer infrastructure, at the
Josephine County fairgrounds.
SECTION 2. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1334