Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 327.
SECTION 2. (1) In addition to those moneys distributed through the State School Fund,
the Department of Education shall award  grants to school districts and education service
districts for the purpose of developing, implementing and annually updating  a health services
plan for the students of the school district or the education service district.
(2) Grants awarded under this section  must be used by a school district or an education
service district  to enter into a contract with a nonprofit school nursing professional organ-
ization that is based in this state and that has expertise in the delivery  of school nursing
services. The contract must require the school nursing professional organization to provide
technical assistance related to:
(a) Developing and updating a health services plan, including registration requirements;
(b) Improving the collection of data used for acuity assessments; and
(c) Designing and  implementing systems to provide school nursing services, including
student care coordination.
(3) When awarding grants under  this section, the department shall prioritize school dis-
tricts and education service districts that, based on rules adopted by  the State Board of
Education, are in:
(a) Rural or frontier regions; and
(b) Regions with inadequate school nursing services.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Department of Education shall  establish and administer a pilot pro-
gram for regional support of school nursing services.
(2) Under the program, the department shall distribute grants  to education service dis-
tricts for the purpose of providing  regional support in the delivery of school nursing services,
including student care coordination, to component school  districts, as defined in ORS 334.003.
(3) Regional support in  the delivery of school nursing services shall be provided to com-
ponent school districts by:
(a) A school nurse, as defined in ORS 342.455, who is employed by the education  service
district; and
(b) School nursing service providers who  are under contract with the education service
district, including trained registered nurses who serve  the communities of the component
[2]
HB 3813
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
school districts and nurse-led telehealth providers.
(4) Grants awarded  under this section must be used by an education service district to
enter into a contract with a nonprofit school nursing professional organization  that is based
in this state and that has expertise in the delivery of school nursing services.  The contract
must require  the school nursing professional organization to provide technical assistance
related to:
(a) Completing an assessment of the school  nursing services provided by component
school districts.
(b) Facilitating the collaborative design of a school nursing services model for the  edu-
cation service district.
(c) Training school nursing  service providers and related partners in delivering school
nursing services.
(d) Collecting through electronic  health records systems and student information sys-
tems the following nonpersonally identifiable information for each component  school district:
(A) The dispensation of students who accessed school nursing service  during the school
day, including whether the student returned to class or went home;
(B) Information about communicable disease outbreaks;
(C) The number of visits made by students for school nursing  services and the number
of contacts made with nurse-led telehealth providers;
(D) The number and types of health screenings provided to students;
(E) The student immunization rate;
(F) Patterns of  school attendance, including chronic absenteeism and early releases for
health reasons;
(G) Patterns of academic achievement; and
(H) Patterns of behavior incidents.
(5) The department shall  select two education service districts for participation in the
pilot program. When selecting education service districts, the department shall prioritize
education service districts that,  based on rules adopted by the State Board of Education, are
in:
(a) Rural or frontier regions; and
(b) Regions with inadequate school nursing services.
(6) No later than September 15, 2027,  the department shall submit a report on the pilot
program and the data  collected under subsection (4)(d) of this section in the manner provided
by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation and administrative rules,
to:
(a) The  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education and health
care; and
(b) The State Board of Education.
SECTION 4.
Section 3 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[3]