Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 181A.010 to
181A.350.
SECTION 2. There is  established within the Department of State Police a division to en-
force state  laws related to illegal cultivation of marijuana, as defined in ORS 475C.009, in-
cluding but  not limited to the unlawful production of marijuana, as described in ORS
475C.379.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2029