Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Land Conservation and Development shall study  issues
related to land use and present the results of the study in a  report to an appropriate com-
mittee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly in  the manner provided under ORS
192.245 on or before September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on December 31, 2022.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1190