Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 401.025 is amended to read:
401.025. As used in this chapter:
(1) “Emergency” means a human created or natural event or  circumstance that causes or
threatens widespread loss of life, injury to person or property, human suffering  or financial loss,
including but not limited to:
(a) Fire, wildfire, explosion, flood, severe weather, landslides or  mud slides, drought, earthquake,
volcanic activity, tsunamis or other oceanic phenomena, spills or releases of oil or hazardous mate-
rial as defined in ORS 466.605, contamination, utility or transportation emergencies, disease, blight,
infestation, civil disturbance, riot, sabotage, acts of terrorism and war; and
(b) A rapid influx of individuals  from outside this state, a rapid migration of individuals from
one part of this  state to another or a rapid displacement of individuals if the influx, migration or
displacement results from the type of event or circumstance  described in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section.
(2) “Emergency service  agency” means an organization within a local government that performs
essential services for the public’s benefit before,  during or after an emergency, such as law
enforcement, fire control, health, medical and sanitation services, public  works and engineering,
public information and communications.
(3) “Emergency services” means activities engaged in by state and  local government agencies
to prepare for  an emergency and to prevent, minimize, respond to or recover from an emergency,
including but not limited to coordination,  preparedness planning, training, interagency liaison, fire
fighting, oil or hazardous  material spill or release cleanup as defined in ORS 466.605, law enforce-
ment, medical, health and sanitation services, engineering and public works, search and rescue ac-
tivities, warning and public information,  damage assessment[ ,] and  administration and fiscal
management[, and those measures defined as “civil defense” in 50 U.S.C. app. 2252 ].
(4) “Local government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.116.
(5) “Major disaster” means any event defined as a “major disaster” under 42 U.S.C. 5122(2).
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2456
HB 2763
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) “State-declared emergency” means an emergency that  is the subject of a declaration
of a state of emergency under this chapter.
SECTION 2.
ORS 401.534 and 401.536 and section 3 of this 2025 Act are  added to and made
a part of ORS chapter 401.
SECTION 3. (1) The Oregon  Individual Assistance Grant Account is established as an
account in the Oregon Disaster Response  Fund. The account consists of moneys appropri-
ated by the Legislative Assembly for deposit in the account and any other moneys deposited
into the account pursuant to law.
(2) Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the  Oregon Department of
Emergency Management for:
(a) Providing grants to individuals and households  for basic emergency assistance costs
following state-declared emergencies that are not federally declared disasters;
(b) Providing grants to individuals and households who are ineligible  or otherwise unable
to apply for federal individual assistance disaster grants for basic emergency assistance costs
following state-declared emergencies that are federally declared disasters;
(c) Providing crisis  counseling services, disaster case management and legal services re-
lating to state-declared emergencies to individuals and households;
(d) Providing grants to locally established long-term recovery groups following state-
declared emergencies; and
(e) Paying costs  associated with the coordination and distribution of assistance described
in this section.
(3) The department may adopt rules necessary for the administration of this section.
(4) As used in this section, “basic  emergency assistance costs” includes shelter, trans-
portation, repairs and other immediate needs following an emergency.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 401.534 is amended to read:
401.534. (1) The Oregon Disaster Response Fund is established  in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Moneys received from  federal grants for disaster response ef-
forts shall be deposited into the  Oregon Disaster Response Fund. Moneys in the fund are contin-
uously appropriated to the Oregon Department of Emergency Management to be used to:
(a) Help state agencies and local government  units with immediate disaster response and re-
covery efforts related to federally declared disasters or state-declared emergencies  in this  state;
and
(b) Implement  long-term hazard mitigation measures after a federally declared disaster or
state-declared emergency  in this state during the  period of immediate recovery from the disaster
or emergency .
(2) The Oregon Disaster Response Fund may receive  gifts, grants, bequests, endowments and
donations from public and private sources for purposes related to the fund.
(3) The department shall  adopt rules for the disbursement of moneys from the Oregon Disaster
Response Fund.
(4) If there are expenditures from the  Oregon Disaster Response Fund, the Director of the
Oregon  Department  of Emergency Management shall report to the Emergency Board, or to the
Legislative Assembly if it is in session, on:
(a) The nature and severity of the disaster  or emergency ;
(b) The actual and projected deposits into the fund;
(c) The sources of actual and projected expenditures from the fund;
[2]
HB 2763
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
(d) The nature of in-kind donations received; and
(e) The rationale for expenditures and allocation of payments to state agencies and  local gov-
ernment units.
(5) Following the final expenditure for a particular disaster  or  emergency , the director shall
issue a final report to the Emergency Board, or  to the Legislative Assembly if it is in session. The
report must include an aggregate description of the factors described  in subsection (4) of this sec-
tion.
[3]