Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Eligible entity” means a local government, local housing authority, nonprofit organ-
ization, federally recognized Indian tribe in this state or regional or statewide  nonprofit
housing assistance organization.
(b) “Grant program recipient” means a person that has been  awarded a grant from the
Housing and Community Services Department under this section.
(c) “Homeownership assistance program” means a program  established, implemented and
operated by an eligible entity  whereby the entity provides housing-related assistance to per-
sons in low income households.
(d) “Low income household” means a household having an income equal to or below  80
percent of the median household income, adjusted for family  size, for the county in which
the low income household is located as determined  by the Housing and Community Services
Department. In making  the determination, the department shall give consideration to any
data on area household income published by the United States Department of  Housing and
Urban Development.
(e) “Nonprofit organization”  means an organization or group of organizations that is de-
scribed in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue  Code and is exempt from income tax
under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(f) “Repair and rehabilitation” includes actions that:
(A) Maximize energy efficiency of residences;
(B) Extend the usable life of the residences; or
(C) Improve the health and safety of the occupants of the residences.
(g)(A) “Residence” means a single family  residence that is intended for occupation by a
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2666
HB 2802
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
single family unit and is occupied  by an individual who is a member of a low income house-
hold as the individual’s principal residence.
(B) “Residence”  includes a manufactured home, residential trailer, mobile home or con-
dominium unit.
(2) The Homeownership Repair and Rehabilitation Program is  established within the
Housing and Community Services Department. The purpose  of the program is to provide
grants to eligible entities with  homeownership assistance programs that provide financial
assistance to persons in low income households to repair and rehabilitate their residences.
(3) To be eligible to receive grants from the Homeownership Repair and Rehabilitation
Program, an eligible entity must establish that it:
(a) Is operating, or will operate, a homeownership assistance program that  provides as-
sistance to low income households;
(b) Has the capacity to administer grant funds received under this section; and
(c) Is able to comply with the requirements of all state and federal laws, rules and reg-
ulations.
(4) The department shall provide grants to eligible entities  to provide loans, grants or
other financial assistance to eligible low income households for the repair and rehabilitation
of their residences. The department may establish by rule the nature and extent of the repair
and rehabilitation that may be funded by eligible entities under the program.
(5) The department shall establish by rule processes for eligible entities to apply to  re-
ceive grants from the Homeownership Repair and Rehabilitation Program.  The process may
include a request for proposals.
(6) Upon being awarded a grant under this section, the  grant program recipient shall
enter into an agreement with the department that contains provisions that:
(a) Indicate the purposes for which the grant funds may be used;
(b) Limit  the amount of financial assistance provided by the grant program recipient to
a low income household to a maximum of $25,000 per low income household;
(c) Limit the amount charged by the grant program  recipient for administrative costs to
implement the program to a maximum of five percent of the grant funds received;
(d) Limit the amount charged by the grant program recipient for  program delivery costs
to a maximum of 15 percent of the grant funds received;
(e) Include the repayment provisions set forth in subsection (7) of this section;
(f) Permit the department to conduct audits and investigations of the grant program re-
cipient regarding the purposes for which grant funds have been used; and
(g) Require the grant program recipient to provide reports as  set forth in subsection (8)
of this section.
(7) A grant program recipient must repay to the department, in whole or in  part, grant
funds received under this section to the extent that:
(a) The  grant program recipient does not use the grant funds in accordance with the
provisions of the grant agreement  executed between the department and the grant program
recipient under subsection (6) of this section; or
(b) The Director of the Housing and Community Services  Department determines that
the grant program recipient must repay all  or part of the grant funds on grounds of misap-
propriation, fraud or similar reasons after auditing or investigating the grant  program
recipient’s operations and conducting an administrative hearing under ORS 183.413 to 183.470.
[2]
HB 2802
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(8) A grant program recipient  shall report to the department by June 30 of each year
concerning the status and use of  grant funds received under this section. The department
by rule shall specify the information that the  report must contain. At a minimum, the report
must exclude any personal information about an individual and must include:
(a) A detailed description of the grant program recipient’s use of grant funds;
(b) A  list of each loan, grant or other financial assistance that the grant program recip-
ient has  provided and, where applicable, a full accounting of the repayment status of the
loans;
(c) The number of low income households that the grant program recipient has  provided
financial assistance to for the repair and rehabilitation of their residences;
(d) The nature and amounts of the administrative  expenses the grant program recipient
has incurred in providing the financial assistance under the program; and
(e) Aggregated data concerning the income, racial or ethnic background,  family size and
related demographic information of persons in  low income households who received financial
assistance for repair and rehabilitation of residences under the program  from the grant
program recipient.
(9) The department may not pay amounts for grants under this section from  any source
other than available funds in the Homeownership  Repair and Rehabilitation Program Fund
established in section 2 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the
General Fund, the Homeownership Repair  and Rehabilitation Program Fund. Interest earned
by the fund is credited to the fund.
(2) All moneys in the fund are appropriated to the Housing and Community Services De-
partment to:
(a) Award grants to  eligible entities with homeownership assistance programs under
section 1 of this 2019 Act;
(b) Distribute moneys to the community action agency network with the  advice of the
Community Action Partnership of Oregon for  community action agencies to provide loans,
grants or other financial assistance to eligible low  income households for the repair and re-
habilitation of their residences consistent with section 1 of this 2019 Act; and
(c) Pay for  the administrative expenses of the department in establishing, implementing
and administering the Homeownership Repair and Rehabilitation Program under section  1
of this 2019 Act.
(3) Each biennium, the department shall distribute no less than 50 percent  of the amount
in the fund less the amounts paid  under subsection (2)(c) of this section to the community
action agency network under subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(4) The fund consists of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Grant funds repaid under section 1 (7) of this 2019 Act;
(c) Moneys transferred to the fund from the federal or state government;
(d) Application fees, if any; and
(e) Gifts, grants and donations received from any source.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Healthy  Homes Program is established within the Housing and
Community Services Department. The purpose of the program is to develop methods for  ad-
dressing home  health hazards and to provide financial assistance to eligible organizations to
[3]
HB 2802
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
address home health hazards.
(2) Under the program the department may  develop, or contract with public institutions
of higher education or nonprofit organizations to assist in developing:
(a) Methods for evaluating health hazards in housing;
(b) Methods for preventing and reducing health hazards in housing;
(c) Measures  of evaluating housing related health impacts and the long-term cost-
effectiveness of methods used under paragraph (b) of this subsection;
(d) Performance measures for the work being performed through the  loans made under
this program; and
(e) Recommendations for promoting the incorporation of healthy  housing into ongoing
practices and systems, including housing codes.
(3) Under the program  the department may make no-interest loans to eligible entities,
as defined in  section 1 of this 2019 Act, to take steps to prevent and reduce health hazards
in housing for low income households, as defined in section 1 of this 2019 Act.
(4) The  department may adopt guidelines, requirements and forms to administer the
loans and loan applications under the program and may adopt  rules to implement and carry
out the program.
(5) All moneys received  from servicing loans made under this section shall be deposited
into the Healthy Homes Revolving Fund.
SECTION 4.
(1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the
General Fund, the Healthy Homes Revolving Fund. Interest  earned by the fund is credited
to the fund.
(2) All moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the  Housing and Community
Services Department to:
(a) Award loans to eligible entities under section 3 of this 2019 Act; and
(b) Pay for the administrative expenses of the department  in establishing, implementing
and administering the Healthy Homes Program under section 3 of this 2019 Act.
(3) The fund consists of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Loan funds repaid under section 3 (5) of this 2019 Act;
(c) Moneys transferred to the fund from the federal or state government;
(d) Application fees, if any; and
(e) Gifts, grants and donations received from any source.
SECTION 5.
Sections 1 to 4 of this 2019 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
458.
SECTION 6. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for  the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, out of the General Fund:
(1) The  amount of $13,000,000, for deposit into the Homeownership Repair and Rehabili-
tation Program Fund established in section 2 of this 2019 Act; and
(2) The amount of $2,000,000, for  deposit into the Healthy Homes Revolving Fund estab-
lished in section 4 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 7. (1) Sections 1 and 3 of this 2019 Act become operative on January 1, 2020.
(2) The Director of the Housing and Community Services Department  may take any
action before the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary
[4]
HB 2802
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
to enable the director to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1)
of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers  conferred on the director by sections
1 and 3 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 8.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
[5]