Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of  Environmental Quality shall notify the Attorney
General if:
(a) The department determines that air quality index readings for an  area of this state
have reached 250 or higher during seven consecutive days; and
(b) The cause of the elevated air quality index readings is reasonably believed to be
wildfire smoke from a wildfire that originated on lands owned by the United States.
(2) Upon receiving notice under subsection  (1) of this section, the Attorney General shall
investigate the cause of the wildfire. If the Attorney General determines that the wildfire
was caused, in whole or in part, by forest management practices  of the United States carried
out in a negligent or otherwise unlawful manner, the Attorney General shall bring an  ap-
propriate civil action in the name of the State of Oregon to secure  an injunction, damages
or other appropriate relief.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1347