Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 408.225 is amended to read:
408.225. (1) As used in [ ORS 408.225 to 408.237 ] this section and section 4 of this 2025 Act :
(a) “Application examination” means the selection process utilized  by a public employer
after the initial application  screening of an applicant. An application examination may be
scored or unscored and includes, but is not limited to, formal testing,  assessments resulting
in a score and unscored  examinations or assessments such as interviews and reference
checks.
[(a)(A)] (b)(A)  “Civil service position” means  any position for which a hiring or promotion de-
cision is made or  required to be made based on the results of a merit based, competitive process that
includes, but is not limited to, consideration of  an applicant’s or employee’s relative ability, knowl-
edge, experience and other skills.
(B) A “civil service position” need not be labeled a “civil service position.”
[(b)] (c)  “Combat zone” means an area  designated by the President of the United States by
executive order in which, on the dates designated by executive  order, the Armed Forces of the
United States are or have engaged in combat.
[(c)] (d) “Disabled veteran” means a veteran who has a disability rating from the United  States
Department of Veterans Affairs, a veteran whose discharge or release from active duty was for  a
disability incurred or aggravated in the line  of duty or a veteran who was awarded the Purple Heart
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1966
HB 2874
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
for wounds received in combat.
[(d)] (e)  “Honorable conditions” has the meaning given that term in rules adopted  by the De-
partment of Veterans’ Affairs.
(f) “Initial  application screening” means a public employer’s process to determine
whether a veteran or disabled veteran applicant for a civil service  position meets the mini-
mum and special  qualifications for the position. “Initial application screening” includes an
evaluation of skills or assessment of responses to supplemental test  questions if required in
the recruitment announcement for the position.
(g) “Minimum qualifications”  means baseline education, experience or other require-
ments that an applicant must have in  order to be considered for a civil service position by
a public employer as set forth in rules adopted by the public employer  or in the recruitment
announcement for the position.
[(e)] (h) “Public employer” means a public body, as that term is defined in ORS 174.109, and  any
person authorized to act on behalf  of the public body, with respect to control, management or
supervision of any employee.
(i) “Special qualifications” means attributes desired by a public employer  in an applicant
for a civil service position that make an applicant more competitive for a  position when
compared to  other applicants for the same position who do not possess the special quali-
fications at all or to the same degree. Special qualifications may be unique to each  position
and may, but are not required to, be set forth in rules adopted by  the public employer or in
the recruitment announcement for the position.
[(f)] (j)  “Veteran” means a person who:
(A) Served on active duty with the Armed Forces of the United States:
(i) For a period of more than 90 consecutive days beginning on or before January 31, 1955, and
was discharged or released under honorable conditions;
(ii) For a period  of more than 178 consecutive days beginning after January 31, 1955, and was
discharged or released from active duty under honorable conditions;
(iii) For 178 days or less and was discharged  or released from active duty under honorable
conditions because of a service-connected disability;
(iv) For 178 days or less and was discharged or released  from active duty under honorable
conditions and has a disability rating from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(v) For at least one day  in a combat zone and was discharged or released from active duty under
honorable conditions;
(B) Received a combat or campaign ribbon or  an expeditionary medal for service in the Armed
Forces of the United States and was discharged or released from  active duty under honorable con-
ditions; or
(C) Is receiving a nonservice-connected pension from the United States  Department of Veterans
Affairs.
(2) As used in subsection [ (1)(f)] (1)(j) of this section, “active  duty” does not include attendance
at a school  under military orders, except schooling incident to an active enlistment or a regular tour
of duty, or normal  military training as a reserve officer or member of an organized reserve or a
National Guard unit.
SECTION 2.
ORS 408.230, 408.235 and 408.237 are repealed.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 408.
SECTION 4. (1)(a) A veteran or disabled veteran is eligible to  use the preference provided
[2]
HB 2874
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
for in this section for a civil  service position for which the veteran makes application if the
veteran applies for the position within 10 years after discharge or release  from service in the
Armed Forces of the United States. The veteran shall provide evidence  of eligibility for the
preference at the time the  veteran makes application for the position. Failure to provide
evidence at the time of application will disqualify the veteran from requesting use of  the
preference in the public employer’s consideration of the veteran’s  application for the posi-
tion.
(b) A disabled veteran shall provide  evidence of disability from the United States De-
partment of Veterans  Affairs at the time the veteran makes application for the position.
Failure to provide evidence of disability at the time of application  will disqualify the disabled
veteran from requesting  use of the preference in the public employer’s consideration of the
disabled veteran’s application for the position.
(2) A public employer shall grant  one or more preferences to a veteran or disabled vet-
eran who applies for a vacant civil service position or seeks  promotion to a civil service po-
sition with a higher maximum salary rate in the manner set forth in this section.
(3)(a) Initial application screenings done by public employers must result in a score.
(b) Upon completion of an initial  application screening and determination that a veteran
applicant meets the minimum and special qualifications for the position and, if applicable,  is
evaluated to have the  necessary skills for the position and adequately responds to any sup-
plemental questions, the  public employer shall grant the preference to the veteran as follows:
(A) The employer shall add five preference points to a veteran’s score.
(B) The employer shall add 10 preference points to a disabled veteran’s score.
(c) After application of preference points under paragraph  (b) of this subsection, the
public employer shall  generate a list of qualified veteran applicants to consider for appoint-
ment.
(4)(a) Following the initial application screening under  subsection (3) of this section, the
public employer shall conduct the  employer’s application examination process with all quali-
fied veteran applicants on  the list and shall apply preferences as described in subsection (5)
of this section.
(b) Application examination processes may be  scored or unscored. If scored, applicants
will be ranked on a 100-point scale. If unscored, applicants must be sorted into hierarchical
levels based on the degree to which applicants possess or  demonstrate desired attributes or
meet other criteria for the position.
(c) If the application examination process includes one or more interviews, the  public
employer may choose one of the following:
(A) To interview all veteran applicants on the list.
(B) To interview a selected group of veteran applicants who most closely  match the
public employer’s  purposes in filling the position. This group may be considered along with
nonveteran applicants who closely match the purposes of the employer in filling the  position.
(5) After the application examination process is completed, the preference shall be applied
as follows:
(a) For scored application  examinations, the public employer shall add five points to a
veteran’s score or 10 points to a disabled veteran’s score.
(b) For  unscored application examinations, the public employer shall advance a veteran
one level or advance a disabled veteran two levels.
[3]
HB 2874
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) The application of preferences in  the manner described in this section is not a re-
quirement that the public employer appoint  a veteran or disabled veteran to a civil service
position.
(7)(a) A public employer shall appoint an otherwise  qualified veteran or disabled veteran
to a vacant civil service position if the results  of a veteran’s or disabled veteran’s application
examination, when combined with the veteran’s  or disabled veteran’s preferences, are equal
to or higher than the results of an  application examination for an applicant who is not a
veteran or disabled veteran.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a public employer  may, at the time
of making a final  hiring or promotion decision in the selection process, exercise discretion
to not appoint an otherwise  qualified veteran or disabled veteran described in paragraph (a)
of this subsection based solely  on the veteran’s or disabled veteran’s merits or qualifications
with respect  to the vacant civil service position. A public employer that exercises discretion
under this paragraph shall provide to the veteran or disabled veteran  written reasons for the
employer’s decision not to appoint the veteran or disabled veteran to the position within a
reasonable time after making the decision.
(8) Except as otherwise  provided in subsection (7)(b) of this section, if a public employer
does not appoint a veteran  or disabled veteran to a vacant civil service position, upon written
request of the veteran or disabled veteran, the employer, in writing, shall provide  the
employer’s reasons for the decision not to appoint the veteran  or disabled veteran to the
position.
(9) Violation of this section is an unlawful employment practice.
(10) A veteran or disabled veteran claiming to be aggrieved by a violation  of this section
may file a verified written complaint with the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and In-
dustries in accordance with ORS 659A.820.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 659A.885,  as amended by section 58, chapter 700, Oregon Laws 2019, section
46, chapter 367, Oregon Laws 2021, section 9, chapter  99, Oregon Laws 2022, and section 49, chapter
9, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
659A.885. (1) Except as provided in subsection (12) of this section,  any person claiming to
be aggrieved by an unlawful practice specified  in subsection (2) of this section may file a civil action
in circuit court. In any action under this subsection, the  court may order injunctive relief and any
other equitable relief that may be  appropriate, including but not limited to reinstatement or the
hiring of employees with or  without back pay. A court may order back pay in an action under this
subsection only for the  two-year period immediately preceding the filing of a complaint under ORS
659A.820 with the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor  and Industries, or if a complaint was not
filed before the action was commenced, the  two-year period immediately preceding the filing of the
action. In any action under  this subsection, the court may allow the prevailing party costs and
reasonable attorney fees at trial and on appeal. Except  as provided in subsection (3) of this section:
(a) The judge shall determine the facts in an action under this subsection; and
(b) Upon any appeal of a judgment in an action under this subsection, the appellate court  shall
review the judgment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (3).
(2) An action may be brought under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of:
(a) ORS 10.090, 10.092, 25.337, 25.424, 171.120, 243.323,  [ 408.230, 408.237 (2),] 468B.519, 475C.285,
476.574, 652.020, 652.220, 652.355, 653.060,  653.263, 653.265, 653.547, 653.549, 653.601 to 653.661,
657B.060, 657B.070, 659.852, 659A.030, 659A.040,  659A.043, 659A.046, 659A.063, 659A.069, 659A.082,
[4]
HB 2874
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
659A.088, 659A.103 to 659A.145, 659A.147, 659A.150 to  659A.186, 659A.194, 659A.199, 659A.203,
659A.218, 659A.228,  659A.230, 659A.233, 659A.236, 659A.250 to 659A.262, 659A.277, 659A.290,
659A.300, 659A.306, 659A.309, 659A.315, 659A.318, 659A.320, 659A.343, 659A.355,  659A.357, 659A.370
or 659A.421  or section 4 of this 2025 Act ; or
(b) ORS 653.470, except an action may not be brought for a claim relating to ORS 653.450.
(3) In any action under subsection (1)  of this section alleging a violation of ORS 25.337, 25.424,
243.323, 652.220, 652.355, 653.547, 653.549, 657B.060, 657B.070, 659.852, 659A.030, 659A.040, 659A.043,
659A.046, 659A.069,  659A.082, 659A.103 to 659A.145, 659A.199, 659A.203, 659A.228, 659A.230,
659A.250 to 659A.262, 659A.290, 659A.318, 659A.343, 659A.355, 659A.357, 659A.370 or 659A.421:
(a) The court may award, in addition  to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
compensatory damages or $200, whichever is greater, and punitive damages;
(b) At the request of any party, the action shall be tried to a jury;
(c) Upon  appeal of any judgment finding a violation, the appellate court shall review the judg-
ment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (1); and
(d) Any attorney fee agreement shall be subject to approval by the court.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS  31.730, in an action under subsection (1) of this section alleging a vi-
olation of ORS 652.220, the court may award punitive damages if:
(a) It is proved by  clear and convincing evidence that an employer has engaged in fraud, acted
with malice or acted with willful and wanton misconduct; or
(b) An employer was previously adjudicated in a proceeding  under this section or under ORS
659A.850 for a violation of ORS 652.220.
(5) In any action under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS 653.060  or
659A.147, the court may award, in addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this  sec-
tion, compensatory damages or $200, whichever is greater.
(6) In any action under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS  171.120, 476.574
or 659A.218, the court may award, in addition to  the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this
section, compensatory damages or $250, whichever is greater.
(7) In any action under  subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS 10.090 or 10.092,
the court may award, in  addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section, a civil
penalty in the amount of $720.
(8) Any individual against whom any distinction,  discrimination or restriction on account of
race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, marital  status or age,
if the individual is 18 years of  age or older, has been made by any place of public accommodation,
as defined in ORS  659A.400, by any employee or person acting on behalf of the place or by any
person aiding or abetting the place or person in violation of ORS  659A.406 may bring an action
against the operator or  manager of the place, the employee or person acting on behalf of the place
or the aider or abettor of the place or person. Notwithstanding  subsection (1) of this section, in an
action under this subsection:
(a) The court may award, in addition  to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
compensatory and punitive damages;
(b) The operator or manager of the  place of public accommodation, the employee or person
acting on behalf of the place, and any  aider or abettor shall be jointly and severally liable for all
damages awarded in the action;
(c) At the request of any party, the action shall be tried to a jury;
(d) The court shall award reasonable attorney fees to a prevailing plaintiff;
[5]
HB 2874
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) The court may award reasonable attorney fees and expert  witness fees incurred by a de-
fendant who prevails only if the  court determines that the plaintiff had no objectively reasonable
basis for asserting a claim or no  reasonable basis for appealing an adverse decision of a trial court;
and
(f) Upon any appeal of a judgment under this subsection, the appellate court shall review  the
judgment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (1).
(9) When the commissioner or the Attorney General  has reasonable cause to believe that a
person or group of persons is engaged in a pattern or practice of resistance to the rights  protected
by ORS 659A.145 or 659A.421 or federal housing law, or that a group of persons has been  denied
any of the rights protected by ORS 659A.145 or 659A.421  or federal housing law, the commissioner
or the Attorney General may file a civil action on behalf of the aggrieved persons in the  same
manner as a person or group of persons  may file a civil action under this section. In a civil action
filed under this subsection, the court may  assess against the respondent, in addition to the relief
authorized under subsections (1) and (3) of this section, a civil penalty:
(a) In an amount not exceeding $50,000 for a first violation; and
(b) In an amount not exceeding $100,000 for any subsequent violation.
(10) In any action under subsection (1) of  this section alleging a violation of ORS 659A.145 or
659A.421 or alleging discrimination under  federal housing law, when the commissioner is pursuing
the action on behalf of an aggrieved complainant, the  court shall award reasonable attorney fees to
the commissioner if the commissioner prevails in  the action. The court may award reasonable at-
torney fees and expert witness fees incurred by a defendant that prevails in  the action if the court
determines that the commissioner had no objectively reasonable basis for asserting the  claim or for
appealing an adverse decision of the trial court.
(11) In an action under subsection (1) or (9)  of this section alleging a violation of ORS 659A.145
or 659A.421 or discrimination under federal housing law:
(a) “Aggrieved person” includes a person who believes that the person:
(A) Has been injured by an unlawful practice or discriminatory housing practice; or
(B) Will be injured by an unlawful practice or discriminatory housing  practice that is about to
occur.
(b) An aggrieved  person in regard to issues to be determined in an action may intervene as of
right in the action. The  Attorney General may intervene in the action if the Attorney General cer-
tifies that the case is  of general public importance. The court may allow an intervenor prevailing
party costs and reasonable attorney fees at trial and on appeal.
(12) Before commencing an action under subsection (1) of this section alleging  a violation
of section 4 of this 2025 Act,  the person shall exhaust all available nonjudicial remedies under
ORS 659A.820 to 659A.865.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 659A.320 is amended to read:
659A.320. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,  it is an unlawful employment
practice for an employer to obtain or use  for employment purposes information contained in the
credit history of an applicant  for employment or an employee, or to refuse to hire, discharge, de-
mote, suspend, retaliate or otherwise discriminate against an applicant or an  employee with regard
to promotion, compensation or the terms, conditions or privileges  of employment based on informa-
tion in the credit history of the applicant or employee.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) Employers that are federally insured banks or credit unions;
[6]
HB 2874
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
(b) Employers that are required by state  or federal law to use individual credit history for em-
ployment purposes;
(c) The application for employment or the employment of  a public safety officer who will be or
who is:
(A) A member of a law enforcement unit;
(B) Employed as a peace officer commissioned by a city, port, school district, mass  transit dis-
trict, county, university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125, Indian reservation, the Superintendent of
State Police under ORS 181A.340, the Criminal Justice Division of the Department of Justice, the
Oregon State Lottery Commission or the Governor or employed as a regulatory specialist  by the
Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission; and
(C) Responsible for enforcing the criminal laws of  this state or laws or ordinances related to
airport security; or
(d) The obtainment or use by an  employer of information in the credit history of an applicant
or employee because the information is  substantially job-related and the employer’s reasons for the
use of such information are disclosed to the employee or prospective employee in writing.
(3) An employee or an applicant for employment may file a complaint  under ORS 659A.820 for
violations of this section and may bring a civil action under ORS 659A.885 and recover  the relief
as provided by ORS 659A.885 (1) and (2) (a).
(4) As used in this section, “credit history” means any written  or other communication of any
information by a consumer reporting agency that bears on a consumer’s creditworthiness,  credit
standing or credit capacity.
SECTION 7.
Section 4  of this 2025 Act, the amendments to ORS 408.225, 659A.320 and
659A.885 by sections 1, 5 and 6 of this 2025 Act and  the repeal of ORS 408.230, 408.235 and
408.237 by section 2 of this 2025  Act apply to selection processes for civil service positions
and eligibility lists for civil service positions undertaken by public employers on or after the
effective date of this 2025 Act.
[7]