Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 777.
SECTION 2. (1) ORS 777.135 to 777.165 apply to the Port of Morrow, except to the  extent
the provisions of those sections conflict with the provisions  of this section. In the case of
any such conflict, the provisions of this section control.
(2) The board of the Port of Morrow consists of seven commissioners.
(3) Five of the commissioners are elected as provided in ORS 777.135 to 777.165.
(4)(a) The Governor shall appoint two commissioners,  to be designated as Position No. 6
and Position No. 7. Commissioners appointed by the  Governor must be electors registered in
the port, shall  represent the port district at large and must have knowledge or experience
in the trade sector.
(b) The term of office of  a commissioner appointed under this subsection is four years.
Upon the expiration of the term of office  of a commissioner, the Governor shall appoint a
successor. A commissioner is eligible for reappointment.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Governor  shall appoint commissioners under section 2 (4) of this 2025
Act to terms beginning July 1, 2027.
(2) Notwithstanding section 2 (4)(b) of this 2025 Act, one of the commissioners appointed
by the Governor under section 2 (4) of this 2025 Act to a  term beginning July 1, 2027, shall
serve an initial term of two years.
(3) Nothing in section 2 of this 2025 Act affects the terms of office of  the commissioners
of the Port of Morrow who are in office on the effective date of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3001