Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall conduct  a study exploring possible
solutions to ensuring access to care for  individuals who are placed in outpatient commitment
or who are on conditional release under ORS 426.130 and for other individuals who  have
complex mental health or behavioral health needs.
(2) The authority shall convene an advisory group to consult with the authority  on the
study and to provide recommendations on possible solutions for ensuring access to care.
(3) No later  than September 15, 2026, the authority shall report the findings and recom-
mendations from the study, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the interim  commit-
tees of the Legislative Assembly related to health.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Health  Authority shall implement a pilot program to provide
grants to hospitals and their  community partners to form regional partnerships to increase
their capacity to provide care for individuals who are placed in  outpatient commitment or
who are on conditional release under ORS 426.130 or who have complex mental health or
behavioral health needs.
(2) The authority  may require grantees to collect and report data to assess the success
of the pilot program in improving access to and the capacity to provide care.
(3) No later than September 15, 2028,  the authority shall report, in the manner provided
in ORS 192.245, the authority’s evaluation of the results of the  pilot program and may re-
commend legislation to implement aspects of the program that were a success.
SECTION 3.
(1) Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
(2) Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
SECTION 4.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2026. The Oregon
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2027
SB 884
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
Health Authority shall take all steps prior to January  1, 2026, that are necessary to carry
out section 2 of this 2025 Act on and after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 5.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $
, which may be expended for carrying out section 2 of
this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]