Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Rule” has the meaning given that term in ORS 183.310.
(b) “State agency”  means any officer, board, commission, department, division or insti-
tution in the executive or administrative branch of state government.
(2) In the interpretation  of a statute or rule, a court may not defer to a state agency’s
interpretation of the statute or rule.
(3) In a proceeding in  which a state agency is a party, the court or other adjudicator,
after applying all customary  tools of interpretation, shall exercise any remaining doubt in
favor of  a reasonable interpretation that limits agency power and maximizes individual lib-
erty.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4039