Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Office of the Governor shall conduct a study of family treatment courts
and present the results of the study  in a report to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to human services in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 on or before
September 15, 2020.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 638