Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of  this 2024 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 316.
SECTION 2. (1) There  may be subtracted from federal taxable income any amount re-
ceived in settlement of a civil action arising from wildfire, as  defined in ORS 477.089, and
awarded to a plaintiff.
(2) A subtraction under this  section is allowed only for settlement of civil actions arising
from wildfire that:
(a) Is the subject of a state of emergency declared by the Governor;
(b) Occurs in an area subject to an  executive order of the Governor invoking the Emer-
gency Conflagration Act under ORS 476.510 to 476.610; or
(c) Is a federally declared disaster, as defined in section 165 of the Internal Revenue Code,
whether located within Oregon or elsewhere.
(3) A subtraction may not be allowed under this section  for any amount described in
subsection (1) of this section that is:
(a) Taken into account as a deduction on the taxpayer’s federal  income tax return for
the tax year; or
(b) Allowed as a subtraction on a return filed with a taxing authority in another state.
SECTION 3.
If, in computing federal income tax for  the tax year, the taxpayer deducted
itemized deductions, as defined in section 63(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, there may  be
subtracted from federal taxable income the amount:
(1) That would be allowable under section 67 of the Internal Revenue Code as  amended
and in effect on December 21, 2017, and as applicable to tax  years beginning before January
1, 2018, as a deduction for legal fees incurred by a  plaintiff seeking compensation for losses,
expenses or damages through wildfire-related litigation; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 295
HB 4007
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
(2) As applicable to the tax year of the taxpayer.
SECTION 4.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 315.037,  section 2 of this 2024 Act applies to losses
incurred and amounts received in all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2020.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 315.037, section 3 of this  2024 Act applies to losses incurred and
to legal fees paid or incurred in all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2020.
SECTION 5. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]