Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
DISCLOSURE OF TOTAL SPENDING ON PATIENT ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS
SECTION 1.
 Section 2, chapter 7,  Oregon Laws 2018, as amended by sections 6 and 7, chapter
7, Oregon Laws 2018, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Drug” has the meaning given that term in ORS 689.005.
(b) “Health care facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 442.015.
(c) “Health care service contractor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 750.005.
(d)(A) “Manufacture” means:
(i) The production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion or processing of  a drug,
either directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of natural origin or independently  by
means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis; and
(ii) The packaging or repackaging of a drug or labeling or relabeling of a drug container.
(B) “Manufacture” does not include the preparation or compounding of a drug  by an individual
for the individual’s own use or the preparation, compounding, packaging or labeling of a drug:
(i) By a health care practitioner incidental to  administering or dispensing a drug in the course
of professional practice;
(ii) By a health care practitioner or at the practitioner’s authorization and supervision  for the
purpose of or incidental to research, teaching or chemical analysis activities and not for sale;
(iii) By a health care service contractor for  dispensing to a subscriber or delivery to a health
care facility or outpatient clinic owned or operated by the  health care service contractor or an af-
filiate of the health care service contractor;
(iv) By a centralized repackaging operation for distribution to subscribers of health care  service
contractors or to pharmacies, health care facilities or outpatient clinics operated by or affiliated
with a health care service contractor; or
(v) By a health care facility for dispensing to a patient or other person.
(e) “Manufacturer” means a person that manufactures a prescription drug that  is sold in this
state.
(f) “New prescription drug”  has the meaning prescribed by the Department of Consumer and
Business Services by rule.
(g) “Patient assistance program” means a program that  a manufacturer offers to the general
public in which a consumer may reduce the consumer’s out-of-pocket costs for  prescription drugs
by using coupons or discount cards, receiving copayment assistance or by other means.
(h) “Prescription drug” means a drug that must:
(A) Under federal law, be labeled “Caution:  Federal law prohibits dispensing without pre-
scription” prior to being dispensed or delivered; or
[2]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Under any applicable federal or state law or regulation,  be dispensed only by prescription
or restricted to use only by health care practitioners.
(i) “Price” means the wholesale acquisition cost as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1395w-3a(c)(6)(B).
(2) No later than March 15 of each year, a manufacturer shall report the  information described
in subsection (3) of this section to the department regarding each prescription drug for which:
(a) The price was $100 or more for a one-month supply or for  a course of treatment lasting less
than one month; and
(b) There was  a net increase of 10 percent or more in the price of the prescription drug de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection over the course of the previous calendar year.
(3) For each prescription  drug described in subsection (2) of this section, a manufacturer shall
report to the department, in the form and manner prescribed by the department:
(a) The name and price of the prescription drug  and the net increase, expressed as a percentage,
in the price of the drug over the course of the previous calendar year;
(b) The length of time the prescription drug has been on the market;
(c) The factors that contributed to the price increase;
(d) The name of any generic version of the prescription drug available on the market;
(e) The  research and development costs associated with the prescription drug that were paid
using public funds;
(f) The direct costs incurred by the manufacturer:
(A) To manufacture the prescription drug;
(B) To market the prescription drug;
(C) To distribute the prescription drug; and
(D) For ongoing safety and effectiveness research associated with the prescription drug;
(g) The total sales revenue for the prescription drug during the previous calendar year;
(h) The manufacturer’s profit attributable to the prescription drug during the  previous calendar
year;
(i) The introductory price  of the prescription drug when it was approved for marketing by the
United States Food and Drug Administration and the net yearly increase, by calendar year, in the
price of the prescription drug during the previous five years;
(j) The 10 highest prices paid for the prescription drug during the previous calendar year  in any
country other than the United States;
(k) Any other information that the manufacturer deems relevant  to the price increase described
in subsection (2)(b) of this section; and
(L) The documentation necessary to support the information reported under this subsection.
(4) The department  may use any prescription drug price information the department deems ap-
propriate to verify that manufacturers have properly reported price  increases as required by sub-
sections (2) and (3) of this section.
(5) A manufacturer shall accompany the report provided under subsection (2) of this section
with:
(a) The following information about each patient assistance program offered by  the manufac-
turer to consumers residing in  this state for the prescription drugs described in subsection (2) of this
section:
[(a)] (A)  The number of consumers who participated in the program;
[(b)] (B)  The total value of the coupons, discounts, copayment assistance or other reduction  in
costs provided to consumers in this state who participated in the program;
[3]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) The total cost of the program to the manufacturer;
[(c)] (D)  For each drug, the number of refills that qualify for the program, if applicable;
[(d)] (E)  If the program expires after a specified period of time, the period of time that the
program is available to each consumer; and
[(e)] (F)  The eligibility criteria for the program  and how eligibility is verified for accuracy ; and
(b) Information, as prescribed  by the department by rule, regarding any financial assist-
ance, other than rebates, incentives and  discounts, provided by the manufacturer to phar-
macies, government agencies or patient advocacy organizations .
(6) No later than 30 days after a manufacturer introduces a new prescription  drug for sale in
the United  States at a price that exceeds the threshold established by the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services for  specialty drugs in the Medicare Part D program, the manufacturer shall notify
the department, in the form and manner prescribed by the department, of all the  following informa-
tion:
(a) A description of the marketing used in the introduction of the new prescription drug;
(b) The methodology used to establish the price of the new prescription drug;
(c) Whether  the United States Food and Drug Administration granted the new prescription drug
a breakthrough therapy designation or a priority review;
(d) If the new prescription drug was not developed by the manufacturer, the date of and  the
price paid for acquisition of the new prescription drug by the manufacturer;
(e) The  manufacturer’s estimate of the average number of patients who will be prescribed the
new prescription drug each month; and
(f) The  research and development costs associated with the new prescription drug that were paid
using public funds.
(7)(a) After receiving the report or information described  in subsections (2), (3), (5) or (6) of this
section, the department may make a written request to the manufacturer for supporting  documen-
tation or additional information concerning the report. The department shall  prescribe by rule the
periods:
(A) Following the receipt of the report or information during which the department may request
additional information; and
(B) Following a request by the  department for additional information during which a manufac-
turer may respond to the request.
(b) The department may extend the period prescribed under paragraph (a)(B) of this  subsection,
as necessary, on a case-by-case basis.
(8) A manufacturer  may be subject to a civil penalty, as provided in section 3 [ of this 2018
Act], chapter 7, Oregon Laws 2018 , for:
(a) Failing to submit timely reports or notices as required by this section;
(b) Failing to provide information required under this section;
(c) Failing to respond in a timely manner to a written request by the department for additional
information under subsection (7) of this section; or
(d) Providing inaccurate or incomplete information under this section.
(9) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, the department shall post to its  website
all of the following information:
(a) A list of the prescription drugs reported under subsection (2) of this section and the  man-
ufacturers of those prescription drugs;
(b) Information reported to the department under subsections (3) and (5) to  (7) of this section;
[4]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and
(c) Written requests by the department for additional  information under subsection (7) of this
section.
(10)(a) The department may  not post to its website any information described in subsection (9)
of this section if:
(A) The information is conditionally exempt from disclosure under  ORS 192.345 as a trade secret
or is proprietary ; and
(B) The public interest does not require disclosure of the information.
(b) If the department withholds any information from public disclosure pursuant to  this sub-
section, the department shall post to its website a  report describing the nature of the information
and the department’s basis for withholding the information from disclosure.
(c) A person may petition the Attorney General, as provided in ORS 192.411, to review a deci-
sion by the department to withhold information pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(11) The department shall make available to consumers, online and by telephone, a process  for
consumers to notify the department about an increase in the price of a prescription drug.
(12) The department may  adopt rules as necessary for carrying out the provisions of this section,
including but not limited to rules establishing fees to be paid by manufacturers  to be used solely to
pay the costs of the department in carrying out the provisions of this section.
(13) No later than December  15 of each year, the department shall compile and report the in-
formation collected  by the department under this section to the interim committees of the Legisla-
tive Assembly related to health. The report shall  include recommendations for legislative changes,
if any, to contain the cost of prescription drugs and reduce the impact of price increases on con-
sumers, the Department of  Corrections, the Public Employees’ Benefit Board, the Oregon Health
Authority, the Department of  Human Services, the Oregon Educators Benefit Board and health in-
surance premiums in the commercial market.
FEE-ONLY PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGERS FOR STATE-SPONSORED PROGRAMS
SECTION 2.
 ORS 243.135, as amended by  section 27, chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2017, is
amended to read:
243.135. (1)  Notwithstanding any other benefit plan contracted for and offered by the Public
Employees’ Benefit Board, the board shall contract for a health benefit plan  or plans best designed
to meet the needs and provide for the welfare of eligible employees, the state  and the local gov-
ernments. In considering whether to enter into a contract for a plan, the board shall place  emphasis
on:
(a) Employee choice among high quality plans;
(b) A competitive marketplace;
(c) Plan performance and information;
(d) Employer flexibility in plan design and contracting;
(e) Quality customer service;
(f) Creativity and innovation;
(g) Plan benefits as part of total employee compensation;
(h) The improvement of employee health; and
(i) Health outcome and quality measures, described in ORS 413.017 (4),  that are reported by the
plan.
[5]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The board may approve more than one carrier for each type of plan  contracted for and of-
fered but the number of carriers shall be held to  a number consistent with adequate service to eli-
gible employees and their family members.
(3) Where appropriate for a  contracted and offered health benefit plan, the board shall provide
options under which an eligible employee may arrange coverage for  family members who are not
enrolled in another health benefit plan offered by the board or the Oregon Educators Benefit  Board.
An eligible employee who declines coverage in a health benefit plan offered by  the Public
Employees’ Benefit Board or the Oregon Educators Benefit Board and who is enrolled as a  spouse
or family member in another health benefit plan offered by the  Public Employees’ Benefit Board or
the Oregon Educators Benefit Board may not be paid the employer contribution for the plan that
was declined.
(4) Payroll deductions for costs that are not payable by the state  or a local government may be
made upon receipt of a signed authorization from the  employee indicating an election to participate
in the plan or plans selected and the deduction of a certain sum from the employee’s pay.
(5) In developing any health benefit plan, the board may provide an  option of additional cover-
age for eligible employees and their family members at an additional cost or premium.
(6) Transfer of enrollment from one plan to another shall  be open to all eligible employees and
their family members under rules adopted by  the board. Because of the special problems that may
arise in individual instances  under comprehensive group practice plan coverage involving acceptable
provider-patient relations between a particular panel of providers  and particular eligible employees
and their family members, the board shall provide a procedure under  which any eligible employee
may apply at any time to substitute a  health service benefit plan for participation in a comprehen-
sive group practice benefit plan.
(7) The board shall evaluate a benefit plan that serves a limited geographic region of this  state
according to the criteria described in subsection (1) of this section.
(8)(a) The board shall  use payment methodologies in self-insured health benefit plans offered by
the board that are designed to limit the  growth in per-member expenditures for health services to
no more  than 3.4 percent per year , including but not limited to contracting with a pharmacy
benefit manager or third party administrator on a fee-only basis and requiring the pharmacy
benefit manager or third party administrator to  pass through to the board rebates, incen-
tives or discounts offered by pharmaceutical manufacturers .
(b) The board shall adopt policies and practices designed to  limit the annual increase in pre-
mium amounts paid for contracted health benefit plans to 3.4 percent.
(9) A carrier or third party administrator that contracts with the  board to provide or administer
a health benefit plan shall,  at least once each plan year, conduct an audit of the health benefit plan
enrollees’ continued eligibility for coverage as spouses or dependents or any other  basis that would
affect the cost of the premium for the plan.
(10) By January 1, 2023, the board shall spend at  least 12 percent of its total medical expen-
ditures in self-insured health benefit plans on payments for primary care.
(11) No later than February 1 of each year, the board  shall report to the Legislative Assembly
on the board’s progress toward achieving the target  of spending at least 12 percent of total medical
expenditures in self-insured health benefit plans on payments for primary care.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 243.135, as  amended by section 16, chapter 489, Oregon Laws 2017, and sec-
tion 27, chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
243.135. (1)  Notwithstanding any other benefit plan contracted for and offered by the Public
[6]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Employees’ Benefit Board, the board shall contract for a health benefit plan  or plans best designed
to meet the needs and provide for the welfare of eligible employees, the state  and the local gov-
ernments. In considering whether to enter into a contract for a plan, the board shall place  emphasis
on:
(a) Employee choice among high quality plans;
(b) A competitive marketplace;
(c) Plan performance and information;
(d) Employer flexibility in plan design and contracting;
(e) Quality customer service;
(f) Creativity and innovation;
(g) Plan benefits as part of total employee compensation;
(h) The improvement of employee health; and
(i) Health outcome and quality measures, described in ORS 413.017 (4),  that are reported by the
plan.
(2) The board may approve more than one carrier for each type of plan  contracted for and of-
fered but the number of carriers shall be held to  a number consistent with adequate service to eli-
gible employees and their family members.
(3) Where appropriate for a contracted and offered health benefit plan,  the board shall provide
options under which an eligible employee  may arrange coverage for family members who are not
enrolled in another health benefit plan offered by the board or the Oregon Educators Benefit  Board.
An eligible employee  who declines coverage in a health benefit plan offered by the Public
Employees’ Benefit  Board or the Oregon Educators Benefit Board and who is enrolled as a spouse
or family member in another health  benefit plan offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board or
the Oregon Educators Benefit Board may not be paid the employer contribution for the plan that
was declined.
(4) Payroll deductions for costs that are not payable by the state  or a local government may be
made upon receipt of a signed authorization from the  employee indicating an election to participate
in the plan or plans selected and the deduction of a certain sum from the employee’s pay.
(5) In developing any health benefit plan, the board may provide an  option of additional cover-
age for eligible employees and their family members at an additional cost or premium.
(6) Transfer of enrollment from one plan to another shall  be open to all eligible employees and
their family members under rules adopted by  the board. Because of the special problems that may
arise in individual instances  under comprehensive group practice plan coverage involving acceptable
provider-patient relations between a particular panel of providers  and particular eligible employees
and their family members, the board shall provide a procedure under  which any eligible employee
may apply at any time to substitute a  health service benefit plan for participation in a comprehen-
sive group practice benefit plan.
(7) The board shall evaluate a benefit plan that serves a limited geographic region of this  state
according to the criteria described in subsection (1) of this section.
(8)(a) The board shall  use payment methodologies in self-insured health benefit plans offered by
the board that are designed to limit the  growth in per-member expenditures for health services to
no more  than 3.4 percent per year , including but not limited to contracting with a pharmacy
benefit manager or third party administrator on a fee-only basis and requiring the pharmacy
benefit manager or third party administrator to  pass through to the board rebates, incen-
tives or discounts offered by pharmaceutical manufacturers .
[7]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The board shall adopt policies and practices designed to  limit the annual increase in pre-
mium amounts paid for contracted health benefit plans to 3.4 percent.
(9) A carrier or third party administrator that contracts with the  board to provide or administer
a health benefit plan shall,  at least once each plan year, conduct an audit of the health benefit plan
enrollees’ continued eligibility for coverage as spouses or dependents or any other  basis that would
affect the cost of the premium for the plan.
(10) If the board spends less than 12 percent of its total medical expenditures  in self-insured
health benefit plans on payments for primary  care, the board shall implement a plan for increasing
the percentage of total medical expenditures  spent on payments for primary care by at least one
percent each year.
(11) No later than February 1 of each year, the board  shall report to the Legislative Assembly
on any plan implemented under subsection (10) of this  section and on the board’s progress toward
achieving the target of spending at least  12 percent of total medical expenditures in self-insured
health benefit plans on payments for primary care.
SECTION 4.  ORS 414.312 is amended to read:
414.312. (1) As used in ORS 414.312 to 414.318:
(a) “Pharmacy benefit manager”  means an entity that negotiates and executes contracts with
pharmacies, manages preferred drug lists, negotiates rebates with  prescription drug manufacturers
and serves as  an intermediary between the Oregon Prescription Drug Program, prescription drug
manufacturers and pharmacies.
(b) “Prescription drug claims processor” means an entity that processes  and pays prescription
drug claims, adjudicates pharmacy claims, transmits prescription drug  prices and claims data be-
tween pharmacies and  the Oregon Prescription Drug Program and processes related payments to
pharmacies.
(c) “Program price” means the reimbursement rates and prescription drug prices established by
the administrator of the Oregon Prescription Drug Program.
(2) The Oregon  Prescription Drug Program is established in the Oregon Health Authority. The
purpose of the program is to:
(a) Purchase  prescription drugs, replenish prescription drugs dispensed or reimburse pharmacies
for prescription drugs in order to receive discounted prices and rebates;
(b) Make prescription drugs available at the lowest possible  cost to participants in the program
as a means to promote health;
(c) Maintain a list of prescription  drugs recommended as the most effective prescription drugs
available at the best possible prices; and
(d) Promote health through the purchase and provision of discount prescription  drugs and co-
ordination of comprehensive prescription benefit services for eligible entities and members.
(3) The Director of  the Oregon Health Authority shall appoint an administrator of the Oregon
Prescription Drug Program. The administrator may:
(a) Negotiate price discounts and rebates  on prescription drugs with prescription drug man-
ufacturers or group purchasing organizations;
(b) Purchase prescription  drugs on behalf of individuals and entities that participate in the
program;
(c) Contract  with a prescription drug claims processor to adjudicate pharmacy claims and
transmit program prices to pharmacies;
(d) Determine program prices and reimburse or  replenish pharmacies for prescription drugs
[8]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
dispensed or transferred;
(e) Adopt and implement a preferred drug list for the program;
(f) Develop a system for allocating  and distributing the operational costs of the program and any
rebates obtained to participants of the program; and
(g) Cooperate with other states or regional consortia in the bulk purchase of prescription  drugs.
(4) The following individuals or entities may participate in the program:
(a) Public Employees’ Benefit  Board, Oregon Educators Benefit Board and Public Employees
Retirement System;
(b) Local governments as defined in ORS 174.116 and special government bodies as defined  in
ORS 174.117 that directly or indirectly purchase prescription drugs;
(c) Oregon Health and Science University established under ORS 353.020;
(d) State agencies that directly or indirectly purchase prescription drugs, including agencies that
dispense prescription drugs directly to persons in state-operated facilities;
(e) Residents of this state who lack or are underinsured for prescription drug coverage;
(f) Private entities; and
(g) Labor organizations.
(5) The administrator may establish different program  prices for pharmacies in rural areas to
maintain statewide access to the program.
(6) The administrator may establish the terms and conditions for a  pharmacy to enroll in the
program. A licensed pharmacy that is willing to accept the terms and conditions established by the
administrator may apply to enroll in the program.
(7) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the administrator may not:
(a) Contract with a pharmacy benefit manager;
(b) Establish a state-managed wholesale or retail drug distribution or dispensing system; or
(c) Require pharmacies to maintain or allocate separate  inventories for prescription drugs dis-
pensed through the program.
(8) The administrator shall contract with one or more entities to  perform any of the functions
of the program, including but not limited to:
(a) Contracting with a pharmacy benefit manager on a  fee-only basis and requiring the
pharmacy benefit manager to pass through to participants in the program rebates, incentives
or discounts offered by prescription drug manufacturers.  [ and]
(b) Contracting directly or indirectly with such pharmacy networks as  the administrator con-
siders necessary to maintain statewide access to the program.
[(b)] (c) Negotiating with prescription drug manufacturers on behalf of the administrator.
(9) Notwithstanding subsection (4)(e) of this section, individuals who are eligible for Medicare
Part D prescription drug coverage may participate in the program.
(10) The program may  contract with vendors as necessary to utilize discount purchasing pro-
grams, including but not limited to group purchasing organizations  established to meet the criteria
of the Nonprofit Institutions Act,  15 U.S.C. 13c, or that are exempt under the Robinson-Patman Act,
15 U.S.C. 13.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 414.625, as amended by section 3, chapter 49, Oregon Laws 2018, is  amended
to read:
414.625. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt  by rule the qualification criteria and re-
quirements for a coordinated care organization  and shall integrate the criteria and requirements
into each contract with a coordinated  care organization. Coordinated care organizations may be
[9]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
local, community-based organizations  or statewide organizations with community-based participation
in governance or  any combination of the two. Coordinated care organizations may contract with
counties or with other public or private entities to provide services to members. The authority  may
not contract with only one statewide organization.  A coordinated care organization may be a single
corporate structure or a network of providers organized through contractual relationships. The  cri-
teria and requirements adopted by the authority under this section must include, but are  not limited
to, a requirement that the coordinated care organization:
(a) Have demonstrated experience and a capacity for managing financial risk and  establishing
financial  reserves.
(b) Meet the following minimum financial requirements:
(A) Maintain restricted reserves of $250,000 plus an amount equal to 50  percent of the coordi-
nated care organization’s total actual or projected liabilities above $250,000.
(B) Maintain a net worth in an amount equal to at least five percent of the average combined
revenue in the prior two quarters of the participating health care entities.
(C) Expend a portion of the annual net income or reserves  of the coordinated care organization
that exceed the financial requirements specified in this paragraph  on services designed to address
health disparities and the social determinants of  health consistent with the coordinated care
organization’s community health improvement plan  and transformation plan and the terms and con-
ditions of the Medicaid demonstration project under section 1115 of the Social  Security Act (42
U.S.C. 1315).
(c) Operate  within a fixed global budget and, by January 1, 2023, spend on primary care, as de-
fined in section 2, chapter 575, Oregon Laws 2015, at least 12 percent of the coordinated care
organization’s total expenditures for physical and mental health care provided  to members, except
for expenditures on prescription drugs, vision care and dental care.
(d) Develop and  implement alternative payment methodologies that are based on health care
quality and improved health outcomes.
(e) Coordinate the delivery of physical health care, mental health and chemical dependency
services, oral health care and covered long-term care services.
(f) Engage community members  and health care providers in improving the health of the com-
munity and addressing regional, cultural, socioeconomic and racial  disparities in health care that
exist among the coordinated care organization’s members and in the coordinated care organization’s
community.
(2) In addition to the criteria and requirements specified in subsection  (1) of this section, the
authority must adopt by rule requirements for coordinated care organizations contracting with  the
authority so that:
(a) Each member of the coordinated care organization receives integrated person centered  care
and services designed to provide choice, independence and dignity.
(b) Each member has  a consistent and stable relationship with a care team that is responsible
for comprehensive care management and service delivery.
(c) The supportive and therapeutic needs of  each member are addressed in a holistic fashion,
using patient centered primary care homes, behavioral health homes or other  models that support
patient centered primary care and behavioral  health care and individualized care plans to the extent
feasible.
(d) Members receive comprehensive transitional care, including appropriate  follow-up, when en-
tering and leaving an acute care facility or a long term care setting.
[10]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) Members receive assistance  in navigating the health care delivery system and in accessing
community and social support services  and statewide resources, including through the use of certi-
fied health care interpreters and qualified health care interpreters, as those  terms are defined in
ORS 413.550.
(f) Services and supports are geographically located as close to where members reside as  possi-
ble and are, if available, offered in nontraditional settings  that are accessible to families, diverse
communities and underserved populations.
(g) Each coordinated care organization uses health  information technology to link services and
care providers across the continuum of care to the greatest extent practicable and if financially vi-
able.
(h) Each coordinated care organization complies with the safeguards  for members described in
ORS 414.635.
(i) Each coordinated care organization convenes a community advisory council that meets  the
criteria specified in ORS 414.627.
(j) Each coordinated care organization  prioritizes working with members who have high health
care needs, multiple chronic conditions, mental illness or chemical dependency and involves  those
members in accessing and managing appropriate preventive, health, remedial and supportive care
and services, including the services described in  ORS 414.766, to reduce the use of avoidable emer-
gency room visits and hospital admissions.
(k) Members have a choice of providers within  the coordinated care organization’s network and
that providers participating in a coordinated care organization:
(A) Work together  to develop best practices for care and service delivery to reduce waste and
improve the health and well-being of members.
(B) Are educated about the integrated  approach and how to access and communicate within the
integrated system about a patient’s treatment plan and health history.
(C) Emphasize prevention, healthy  lifestyle choices, evidence-based practices, shared decision-
making and communication.
(D) Are permitted to participate in the networks of multiple coordinated care organizations.
(E) Include providers of specialty care.
(F) Are selected by coordinated care organizations using universal application and  credentialing
procedures and objective  quality information and are removed if the providers fail to meet objective
quality standards.
(G) Work together to  develop best practices for culturally appropriate care and service delivery
to reduce waste, reduce health disparities and improve the health and well-being of members.
(L) Each coordinated care organization  reports on outcome and quality measures adopted under
ORS 414.638 and participates  in the health care data reporting system established in ORS 442.464
and 442.466.
(m) Each coordinated care organization uses best practices in the  management of finances,
contracts, claims processing, payment functions and provider networks.
(n) Each coordinated care  organization participates in the learning collaborative described in
ORS 413.259 (3).
(o) Each coordinated care organization has a governing body  that complies with section 2,
chapter 49, Oregon Laws 2018, and that includes:
(A) At least one member representing persons that share in  the financial risk of the organiza-
tion;
[11]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) A representative of a  dental care organization selected by the coordinated care organization;
(C) The major components of the health care delivery system;
(D) At least two health care providers in active practice, including:
(i) A physician licensed under ORS chapter 677 or a nurse practitioner certified under ORS
678.375, whose area of practice is primary care; and
(ii) A mental health or chemical dependency treatment provider;
(E) At  least two members from the community at large, to ensure that the organization’s
decision-making is consistent with the values of the members and the community; and
(F) At least one member of the community advisory council.
(p) Each coordinated care organization’s governing  body establishes standards for publicizing
the activities  of the coordinated care organization and the organization’s community advisory
councils, as necessary, to keep the community informed.
(3) The authority shall consider the participation of area agencies and other nonprofit agencies
in the configuration of coordinated care organizations.
(4) In selecting one or  more coordinated care organizations to serve a geographic area, the au-
thority shall:
(a) For members and potential members, optimize access to care and choice of providers;
(b) For providers, optimize choice in contracting with coordinated care organizations; and
(c) Allow more than one coordinated  care organization to serve the geographic area if necessary
to optimize access and choice under this subsection.
(5) On or  before July 1, 2014, each coordinated care organization must have a formal contractual
relationship with any dental care organization that serves members of the coordinated care organ-
ization in the area where they reside.
(6) If a coordinated care organization contracts with a pharmacy benefit manager,  it
must be on a fee-only basis and must require the pharmacy benefit manager to pass through
to the coordinated care organization rebates, incentives  or discounts offered by pharmaceu-
tical manufacturers.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 414.625, as  amended by section 14, chapter 489, Oregon Laws 2017, and sec-
tion 4, chapter 49, Oregon Laws 2018, is amended to read:
414.625. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt  by rule the qualification criteria and re-
quirements for a coordinated care organization and shall  integrate the criteria and requirements
into each contract with a coordinated care organization. Coordinated  care organizations may be
local, community-based organizations  or statewide organizations with community-based participation
in governance or any combination of the two. Coordinated care organizations may  contract with
counties or with other public or private entities to provide services to members. The authority  may
not contract with only one statewide organization.  A coordinated care organization may be a single
corporate  structure  or a network of providers organized through contractual relationships. The cri-
teria and requirements adopted by the authority under this section must include, but are  not limited
to, a requirement that the coordinated care organization:
(a) Have  demonstrated experience and a capacity for managing financial risk and establishing
financial reserves.
(b) Meet the following minimum financial requirements:
(A) Maintain restricted reserves of  $250,000 plus an amount equal to 50 percent of the coordi-
nated care organization’s total actual or projected liabilities above $250,000.
(B) Maintain a net worth in an amount equal to at least five percent of the average combined
[12]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
revenue in the prior two quarters of the participating health care entities.
(C) Expend a portion of the annual net income or reserves  of the coordinated care organization
that exceed the financial requirements specified in this paragraph  on services designed to address
health disparities and the social determinants of  health consistent with the coordinated care
organization’s community health improvement plan  and transformation plan and the terms and con-
ditions of the Medicaid demonstration project under section 1115 of the Social  Security Act (42
U.S.C. 1315).
(c) Operate within a fixed global budget and spend  on primary care, as defined by the authority
by rule, at least 12 percent of the coordinated  care organization’s total expenditures for physical
and mental health care provided to members, except for expenditures on prescription drugs,  vision
care and dental care.
(d) Develop and implement alternative payment methodologies that are based on  health care
quality and improved health outcomes.
(e) Coordinate the delivery of physical health care, mental health and chemical dependency
services, oral health care and covered long-term care services.
(f) Engage community members and health care providers in improving the health  of the com-
munity and addressing regional, cultural, socioeconomic  and racial disparities in health care that
exist among the coordinated care organization’s members and in the coordinated care organization’s
community.
(2) In addition to the criteria  and requirements specified in subsection (1) of this section, the
authority  must adopt by rule requirements for coordinated care organizations contracting with the
authority so that:
(a) Each  member of the coordinated care organization receives integrated person centered care
and services designed to provide choice, independence and dignity.
(b) Each member has a consistent and stable relationship with a care team  that is responsible
for comprehensive care management and service delivery.
(c) The supportive and therapeutic needs of each member  are addressed in a holistic fashion,
using patient centered primary  care homes, behavioral health homes or other models that support
patient centered primary care and behavioral  health care and individualized care plans to the extent
feasible.
(d) Members receive comprehensive  transitional care, including appropriate follow-up, when en-
tering and leaving an acute care facility or a long term care setting.
(e) Members receive assistance in navigating the health care delivery system  and in accessing
community and social support services and statewide resources, including through  the use of certi-
fied health care interpreters and  qualified health care interpreters, as those terms are defined in
ORS 413.550.
(f) Services  and supports are geographically located as close to where members reside as possi-
ble and are, if available, offered in  nontraditional settings that are accessible to families, diverse
communities and underserved populations.
(g) Each coordinated care organization uses health  information technology to link services and
care providers across the continuum of care to the greatest extent practicable and if financially vi-
able.
(h) Each coordinated care organization complies with the safeguards  for members described in
ORS 414.635.
(i) Each coordinated care organization convenes a community advisory council that meets  the
[13]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
criteria specified in ORS 414.627.
(j) Each coordinated care organization  prioritizes working with members who have high health
care needs, multiple chronic conditions, mental illness or chemical dependency and involves  those
members in accessing and managing appropriate preventive, health, remedial and supportive care
and services, including the services described in  ORS 414.766, to reduce the use of avoidable emer-
gency room visits and hospital admissions.
(k) Members have a choice of providers within  the coordinated care organization’s network and
that providers participating in a coordinated care organization:
(A) Work together  to develop best practices for care and service delivery to reduce waste and
improve the health and well-being of members.
(B) Are educated about the integrated  approach and how to access and communicate within the
integrated system about a patient’s treatment plan and health history.
(C) Emphasize prevention, healthy  lifestyle choices, evidence-based practices, shared decision-
making and communication.
(D) Are permitted to participate in the networks of multiple coordinated care organizations.
(E) Include providers of specialty care.
(F) Are selected by coordinated care organizations using universal application and  credentialing
procedures and objective  quality information and are removed if the providers fail to meet objective
quality standards.
(G) Work together to  develop best practices for culturally appropriate care and service delivery
to reduce waste, reduce health disparities and improve the health and well-being of members.
(L) Each coordinated care organization  reports on outcome and quality measures adopted under
ORS 414.638 and participates  in the health care data reporting system established in ORS 442.464
and 442.466.
(m) Each coordinated care organization uses best practices in the  management of finances,
contracts, claims processing, payment functions and provider networks.
(n) Each coordinated care  organization participates in the learning collaborative described in
ORS 413.259 (3).
(o) Each coordinated care organization has a governing body  that complies with section 2,
chapter 49, Oregon Laws 2018, and that includes:
(A) At least one member representing persons that share in  the financial risk of the organiza-
tion;
(B) A representative of a  dental care organization selected by the coordinated care organization;
(C) The major components of the health care delivery system;
(D) At least two health care providers in active practice, including:
(i) A physician licensed under ORS chapter 677 or a nurse practitioner certified under ORS
678.375, whose area of practice is primary care; and
(ii) A mental health or chemical dependency treatment provider;
(E) At  least two members from the community at large, to ensure that the organization’s
decision-making is consistent with the values of the members and the community; and
(F) At least one member of the community advisory council.
(p) Each coordinated care organization’s governing  body establishes standards for publicizing
the activities  of the coordinated care organization and the organization’s community advisory
councils, as necessary, to keep the community informed.
(3) The authority shall consider the participation of area agencies and other nonprofit agencies
[14]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in the configuration of coordinated care organizations.
(4) In selecting one or  more coordinated care organizations to serve a geographic area, the au-
thority shall:
(a) For members and potential members, optimize access to care and choice of providers;
(b) For providers, optimize choice in contracting with coordinated care organizations; and
(c) Allow more than one coordinated  care organization to serve the geographic area if necessary
to optimize access and choice under this subsection.
(5) On or  before July 1, 2014, each coordinated care organization must have a formal contractual
relationship with any dental care organization that serves members of the coordinated care organ-
ization in the area where they reside.
(6) If a coordinated care organization contracts with a pharmacy benefit manager,  it
must be on a fee-only basis and must require the pharmacy benefit manager to pass through
to the coordinated care organization rebates, incentives  or discounts offered by pharmaceu-
tical manufacturers.
PUBLISHING INFORMATION REGARDING INSURERS ’
FORMULARIES; NOTICE TO INSUREDS REGARDING
CHANGES TO FORMULARIES
SECTION 7.
 ORS 743B.013 is amended to read:
743B.013. (1) A health benefit plan issued to a small employer:
(a) Other than a grandfathered health plan,  must cover essential health benefits consistent with
42 U.S.C. 300gg-11.
(b) May require an affiliation period that does not exceed two months for an enrollee  or 90 days
for a late enrollee.
(c) May not apply a preexisting condition exclusion to any enrollee.
(2) Late enrollees in a small employer health benefit plan may  be subjected to a group eligibility
waiting period that does not exceed 90 days.
(3) Each small employer  health benefit plan is renewable with respect to all eligible enrollees
at the option of the policyholder, small employer or contract holder unless:
(a) The policyholder, small employer or contract holder fails to pay the required premiums.
(b) The policyholder, small employer or  contract holder or, with respect to coverage of individ-
ual enrollees, an enrollee or a  representative of an enrollee engages in fraud or makes an inten-
tional misrepresentation of a material fact as prohibited by the terms of the plan.
(c) The number of enrollees covered  under the plan is less than the number or percentage of
enrollees required by participation requirements under the plan.
(d) The small employer fails to  comply with the contribution requirements under the health
benefit plan.
(e) The  carrier discontinues both offering and renewing all of the carrier’s small employer health
benefit plans in this state or in a specified service area within this state. In order to discontinue
plans under this paragraph, the carrier:
(A) Must give notice of the decision to the Department of Consumer and Business Services  and
to all policyholders covered by the plans;
(B) May not cancel coverage under the plans for 180 days after the date of  the notice required
under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph if coverage  is discontinued in the entire state or in a
[15]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
specified service area, except that:
(i) The carrier shall cancel coverage in accordance with subparagraph (C) of this  paragraph if
the cancellation is  for a specified service area in the circumstances described in subparagraph (C)
of this paragraph; and
(ii) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services may specify  a cancella-
tion date other than the cancellation date specified in this subparagraph if the carrier is  subject to
a delinquency proceeding, as defined in ORS 734.014; and
(C) May not  cancel coverage under the plans for 90 days after the date of the notice required
under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph if  coverage is discontinued in a specified service area
because of an inability to reach an agreement with  the health care providers or organization of
health care providers to provide services under the plans within the service area.
(f) The carrier discontinues both offering and  renewing a small employer health benefit plan in
a specified service area within this state  because of an inability to reach an agreement with the
health care providers or organization of health  care providers to provide services under the plan
within the service area. In order to discontinue a plan under this paragraph, the carrier:
(A) Must give notice to the department and to all policyholders covered by the plan;
(B) May  not cancel coverage under the plan for 90 days after the date of the notice required
under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph; and
(C) Must offer in writing to each small  employer covered by the plan, all other small employer
health benefit plans that the carrier offers to small employers in  the specified service area. The
carrier shall issue any  such plans pursuant to the provisions of ORS 743B.010 to 743B.013. The
carrier shall offer the plans at least 90 days prior to discontinuation.
(g) The carrier  discontinues both offering and renewing a health benefit plan, other than a
grandfathered health plan, for all small employers in this state or  in a specified service area within
this state, other than a plan discontinued under paragraph (f) of this subsection.
(h) The carrier discontinues both  offering and renewing a grandfathered health plan for all small
employers in this state or in  a specified service area within this state, other than a plan discontin-
ued under paragraph (f) of this subsection.
(i) With respect to plans  that are being discontinued under paragraph (g) or (h) of this sub-
section, the carrier must:
(A) Offer in writing to each small employer covered by the plan, all other health  benefit plans
that the carrier offers to small employers in the specified service area.
(B) Issue any such plans pursuant to the provisions of ORS 743B.010 to 743B.013.
(C) Offer the plans at least 90 days prior to discontinuation.
(D) Act uniformly without regard to the claims experience of the affected  policyholders or the
health status of any current or prospective enrollee.
(j) The Director of the Department of  Consumer and Business Services orders the carrier to
discontinue coverage in  accordance with procedures specified or approved by the director upon
finding that the continuation of the coverage would:
(A) Not be in the best interests of the enrollees; or
(B) Impair the carrier’s ability to meet contractual obligations.
(k) In the case of a small employer health benefit plan that delivers  covered services through
a specified network of health care providers, there is no  longer any enrollee who lives, resides or
works in the service area of the provider network.
(L) In the case of a health benefit  plan that is offered in the small employer market only to one
[16]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or more bona fide associations, the membership of  an employer in the association ceases and the
termination of coverage is not related to the health status of any enrollee.
(4) A carrier may modify a small employer health benefit plan at the time of coverage  renewal.
The modification  is not a discontinuation of the plan under subsection (3)(e), (g) and (h) of this sec-
tion.
(5) Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (3) of this  section to the contrary, a carrier may
not rescind the coverage of an enrollee in a small employer health benefit plan unless:
(a) The enrollee or a person seeking coverage on behalf of the enrollee:
(A) Performs an act, practice or omission that constitutes fraud; or
(B) Makes an intentional misrepresentation of a material fact as prohibited by the terms  of the
plan;
(b) The carrier  provides at least 30 days’ advance written notice, in the form and manner pre-
scribed by the department, to the enrollee; and
(c) The carrier provides notice of the rescission to the department in the form, manner and  time
frame prescribed by the department by rule.
(6) Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (3) of this  section to the contrary, a carrier may
not rescind a small employer health benefit plan unless:
(a) The small employer or a representative of the small employer:
(A) Performs an act, practice or omission that constitutes fraud; or
(B) Makes an  intentional misrepresentation of a material fact as prohibited by the terms of the
plan;
(b) The carrier provides at least 30 days’ advance written notice, in the form and  manner pre-
scribed by the department, to each plan enrollee who would be affected  by the rescission of cover-
age; and
(c) The carrier provides notice of the rescission to the department in the form, manner and  time
frame prescribed by the department by rule.
(7)(a) A carrier may continue to enforce reasonable employer participation and  contribution re-
quirements on small employers. However, participation and contribution requirements shall  be ap-
plied uniformly among all small employer groups with the same  number of eligible employees
applying for coverage or receiving coverage  from the carrier. In determining minimum participation
requirements, a carrier shall count only those employees who are not covered by an existing group
health benefit plan, Medicaid, Medicare, TRICARE, Indian Health Service or a  publicly sponsored
or subsidized health plan, including but not limited to the medical assistance program under  ORS
chapter 414.
(b) A carrier may not deny  a small employer’s application for coverage under a health benefit
plan based on participation or contribution requirements  but may require small employers that do
not meet participation or contribution  requirements to enroll during the open enrollment period
beginning November 15 and ending December 15.
(8) Premium rates for small  employer health benefit plans, except grandfathered health plans,
are subject to the following provisions:
(a) Each carrier must file with the department the initial geographic average rate and  any
changes in the geographic average rate with respect  to each health benefit plan issued by the car-
rier to small employers.
(b)(A) The variations in premium  rates charged during a rating period for health benefit plans
issued to small employers must be based  solely on the factors specified in subparagraph (B) of this
[17]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
paragraph. A carrier may elect which of the factors specified  in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph
apply to premium rates for health benefit plans for  small employers. All other factors must be ap-
plied in the same actuarially sound way to all small employer health benefit plans.
(B) The variations in premium rates described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph may be
based only on one or more of the following factors as prescribed by the department by rule:
(i) The ages  of enrolled employees and their dependents, except that the rate for adults may not
vary by more than three to one;
(ii) The level at which enrolled employees and  dependents of enrolled employees engage in to-
bacco use, except that the rate may not vary by more than 1.5 to one; and
(iii) Adjustments to reflect differences in family composition.
(C) A carrier  shall apply the carrier’s schedule of premium rate variations as approved by the
department and in accordance with this paragraph. Except as  otherwise provided in this section, the
premium rate established by a carrier for a small employer health benefit plan applies uniformly  to
all employees of the small employer enrolled in that plan.
(c) Except as provided in  paragraph (b) of this subsection, the variation in premium rates be-
tween different health benefit plans offered by a carrier  to small employers must be based solely on
objective differences in plan design or coverage, age, tobacco  use and family composition and must
not include differences based on the risk characteristics  of groups assumed to select a particular
health benefit plan.
(d) A carrier may  not increase the rates of a health benefit plan issued to a small employer more
than once in a 12-month period. Annual rate increases are effective on the  plan anniversary date
of the health benefit  plan issued to a small employer. The percentage increase in the premium rate
charged to a small employer for a new rating period may not exceed the sum of the following:
(A) The percentage change in  the geographic average rate measured from the first day of the
prior rating period to the first day of the new period; and
(B) Any adjustment attributable to changes in age and differences in family composition.
(9) Premium rates for  grandfathered health plans are subject to requirements prescribed by the
department by rule.
(10) In connection with the offering for sale of any health benefit plan to  a small employer, each
carrier shall make a  reasonable disclosure as part of the carrier’s solicitation and sales materials
of:
(a) The full array of health benefit plans that are offered to small employers by the carrier;
(b) The authority of the  carrier to adjust rates and premiums, and the extent to which the car-
rier considers age, tobacco use, family composition and geographic factors in establishing and  ad-
justing rates and premiums; and
(c) The benefits and premiums  for all health insurance coverage for which the employer is
qualified.
(11)(a) Each carrier shall maintain at the carrier’s principal place of business a  complete and
detailed description of  the carrier’s rating practices and renewal underwriting practices relating to
the carrier’s small employer health benefit plans,  including information and documentation that
demonstrate that the carrier’s rating methods and practices are based  upon commonly accepted
actuarial practices and are in accordance with sound actuarial principles.
(b) A carrier offering a small employer  health benefit plan shall file with the department at least
once every 12 months an actuarial certification that the carrier is in compliance with ORS  743B.010
to 743B.013 and that the rating  methods of the carrier are actuarially sound. Each certification must
[18]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
be in a uniform form and manner and must contain such information as specified by the department.
The carrier shall retain a copy of each certification at the carrier’s  principal place of business. A
carrier is not required to file the actuarial certification under this paragraph if  the department has
approved the carrier’s rate filing within the preceding 12-month period.
(c) A carrier shall make the information and documentation  described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection available to the department upon request. Except  as provided in ORS 743.018 and except
in cases of violations  of ORS 743B.010 to 743B.013, the information is proprietary and trade secret
information and is not subject to disclosure to persons outside the department except  as agreed to
by the carrier or as ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(12) A carrier may not provide any financial or other incentive  to any insurance producer that
would encourage the insurance producer to sell health benefit  plans of the carrier to small employer
groups based on a small employer group’s anticipated claims experience.
(13) For purposes of this section, the date a small employer health benefit plan is continued  is
the anniversary date of the first issuance of the health benefit plan.
(14) A carrier shall include a provision that offers coverage to all eligible employees of a small
employer and to all dependents of the eligible employees to the extent the employer chooses  to offer
coverage to dependents.
(15) All small employer health benefit plans must contain special enrollment  periods during
which eligible  employees and dependents may enroll for coverage, as provided by federal law and
rules adopted by the department.
(16) A small  employer health benefit plan may not impose annual or lifetime limits on the dollar
amount of essential health benefits.
(17) A carrier that offers a small employer health benefit plan that  reimburses the costs
of prescription drugs sold by a retail pharmacy or administered by a health  care provider
shall:
(a) Publish to the carrier’s website:
(A) The tiers in the carrier’s prescription drug  formulary, definitions of each tier and the
fee structure for each tier;
(B) The carrier’s prescription drug formulary,  sorted alphabetically by the brand name
and the generic name;
(C) For each drug in the prescription drug formulary:
(i) That is a brand name drug, whether:
(I) A generic alternative is available; and
(II) Step therapy or prior authorization protocols are  required and, if so, whether the
protocols require that a generic alternative be substituted;
(ii) Quantity limits imposed on the drug, if any; and
(iii) The applicable cost-sharing; and
(D) Notification that an enrollee, as provided in  section 11 of this 2019 Act, may ask a
pharmacist if the cash price for  a prescription drug is lower than the enrollee’s out-of-pocket
costs under the plan and, if it is, that the enrollee may pay the cash  price and have the price
paid applied to the enrollee’s deductible or out-of-pocket maximum.
(b)(A) Provide written notice to an enrollee at least 60 days  in advance of a change to the
prescription drug formulary that will adversely affect  the enrollee. Changes that adversely
affect an enrollee include but are not limited to:
(i) Imposition of new utilization management requirements;
[19]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(ii) Modification of  tiers in the formulary or a change to the placement of a drug on a
tier that results in a higher out-of-pocket cost to the enrollee; or
(iii) Required substitution of a brand name drug with a generic alternative.
(B) Include in the notice required by this paragraph information for enrollees  about how
to file grievances and about appeals and the appeals process.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 743B.105 is amended to read:
743B.105. The following  requirements apply to all group health benefit plans other than small
employer health benefit plans covering two or more certificate holders:
(1) A carrier offering  a group health benefit plan may not decline to offer coverage to any eli-
gible prospective enrollee  and may not impose different terms or conditions on the coverage, pre-
miums or contributions of any enrollee in the group that are based on the actual or expected health
status of the enrollee.
(2) A group health benefit plan may not apply a preexisting condition exclusion to any  enrollee
but may impose:
(a) An affiliation period that does not exceed two months for an enrollee or three months for  a
late enrollee; or
(b) A group eligibility waiting period for late enrollees that does not exceed 90 days.
(3) Each group  health benefit plan shall contain a special enrollment period during which eligi-
ble employees and dependents may enroll for coverage, as provided by  federal law and rules adopted
by the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(4)(a) A carrier shall issue to a group any of the carrier’s group health benefit plans offered by
the carrier for which the group is eligible, if the group applies for the plan, agrees to make  the re-
quired premium payments and agrees to satisfy the other requirements of the plan.
(b) The department may waive the requirements of this subsection if the department  finds that
issuing a plan to a group or groups would endanger the carrier’s  ability to fulfill the carrier’s con-
tractual obligations or result in financial impairment of the carrier.
(5) Each group health benefit plan shall be renewable with respect to all eligible enrollees at
the option of the policyholder unless:
(a) The policyholder fails to pay the required premiums.
(b) The policyholder or, with respect to coverage of  individual enrollees, an enrollee or a rep-
resentative of an enrollee engages in fraud or makes an intentional misrepresentation of a  material
fact as prohibited by the terms of the plan.
(c) The number of enrollees covered  under the plan is less than the number or percentage of
enrollees required by participation requirements under the plan.
(d) The policyholder fails to comply with the contribution requirements under the plan.
(e) The carrier discontinues both offering  and renewing, all of the carrier’s group health benefit
plans in this state or in a specified service area within this state. In order to discontinue plans un-
der this paragraph, the carrier:
(A) Must give notice of the  decision to the department and to all policyholders covered by the
plans;
(B) May not cancel  coverage under the plans for 180 days after the date of the notice required
under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph if coverage is discontinued  in the entire state or in a
specified service area, except that:
(i) The carrier  shall cancel coverage in accordance with subparagraph (C) of this paragraph if
the cancellation is for a specified service area in the circumstances described in  subparagraph (C)
[20]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of this paragraph; and
(ii) The Director  of the Department of Consumer and Business Services may specify a cancella-
tion date other than the cancellation date specified in this subparagraph if the carrier is  subject to
a delinquency proceeding, as defined in ORS 734.014; and
(C) May not cancel coverage under the plans for 90 days after the date of the  notice required
under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph if coverage is  discontinued in a specified service area
because of an inability to reach an agreement  with the health care providers or organization of
health care providers to provide services under the plans within the service area.
(f) The carrier discontinues both offering  and renewing a group health benefit plan in a specified
service area within this state because of an inability to reach an agreement with the health  care
providers or organization of health care providers  to provide services under the plan within the
service area. In order to discontinue a plan under this paragraph, the carrier:
(A) Must give notice of the decision to the department and to  all policyholders covered by the
plan;
(B) May  not cancel coverage under the plan for 90 days after the date of the notice required
under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph; and
(C) Must offer in  writing to each policyholder covered by the plan, all other group health benefit
plans that the carrier offers in the specified service area.  The carrier shall offer the plans at least
90 days prior to discontinuation.
(g) The carrier discontinues both offering and renewing a group health benefit plan,  other than
a grandfathered  health plan, for all groups in this state or in a specified service area within this
state, other than a plan discontinued under paragraph (f) of this subsection.
(h) The carrier discontinues both offering and renewing a grandfathered health plan for all
groups in this state or in a specified service are within this  state, other than a plan discontinued
under paragraph (f) of this subsection.
(i) With respect to plans  that are being discontinued under paragraph (g) or (h) of this sub-
section, the carrier must:
(A) Offer in writing  to each policyholder covered by the plan, one or more health benefit plans
that the carrier offers to groups in the specified service area.
(B) Offer the plans at least 90 days prior to discontinuation.
(C) Act uniformly without regard to the claims experience of  the affected policyholders or the
health status of any current or prospective enrollee.
(j) The director orders the carrier to discontinue coverage in accordance with procedures spec-
ified or approved by the director upon finding that the continuation of the coverage would:
(A) Not be in the best interests of the enrollees; or
(B) Impair the carrier’s ability to meet contractual obligations.
(k) In the case of a group health benefit plan that delivers covered  services through a specified
network of health care providers, there is no longer any  enrollee who lives, resides or works in the
service area of the provider network.
(L) In the case of a health benefit plan that is offered in the group market only to  one or more
bona fide associations, the membership of an employer in the association ceases and  the termination
of coverage is not related to the health status of any enrollee.
(6) A carrier may modify a group health  benefit plan at the time of coverage renewal. The
modification is not a discontinuation of the plan under subsection (5)(e), (g) and (h) of this section.
(7) Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (5) of this  section to the contrary, a carrier may
[21]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
not rescind the coverage of an enrollee under a group health benefit plan unless:
(a) The enrollee:
(A) Performs an act, practice or omission that constitutes fraud; or
(B) Makes an intentional misrepresentation of a material fact as prohibited by the terms  of the
plan;
(b) The carrier  provides at least 30 days’ advance written notice, in the form and manner pre-
scribed by the department, to the enrollee; and
(c) The carrier provides notice of the rescission to the department in the form, manner and  time
frame prescribed by the department by rule.
(8) Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (5) of this  section to the contrary, a carrier may
not rescind a group health benefit plan unless:
(a) The plan sponsor or a representative of the plan sponsor:
(A) Performs an act, practice or omission that constitutes fraud; or
(B) Makes an intentional misrepresentation of a material fact as prohibited by the terms  of the
plan;
(b) The carrier  provides at least 30 days’ advance written notice, in the form and manner pre-
scribed by the department, to each  plan enrollee who would be affected by the rescission of cover-
age; and
(c) The carrier provides notice of the rescission to the department in the form, manner and  time
frame prescribed by the department by rule.
(9) A group health benefit  plan may not impose annual or lifetime limits on the dollar amount
of essential health benefits.
(10) A  carrier that offers a group health benefit plan that reimburses the costs of pre-
scription drugs sold by a retail pharmacy or administered by a health care provider shall:
(a) Publish to the carrier’s website:
(A) The tiers in the carrier’s prescription drug  formulary, definitions of each tier and the
fee structure for each tier;
(B) The carrier’s prescription drug formulary,  sorted alphabetically by the brand name
and the generic name;
(C) For each drug in the prescription drug formulary:
(i) That is a brand name drug, whether:
(I) A generic alternative is available; and
(II) Step therapy or prior authorization protocols are  required and, if so, whether the
protocols require that a generic alternative be substituted;
(ii) Quantity limits imposed on the drug, if any; and
(iii) The applicable cost-sharing; and
(D) Notification that an enrollee, as provided in  section 11 of this 2019 Act, may ask a
pharmacist if the cash price for  a prescription drug is lower than the enrollee’s out-of-pocket
costs under the plan and, if it is, that the enrollee may pay the cash  price and have the price
paid applied to the enrollee’s deductible or out-of-pocket maximum.
(b)(A) Provide written notice to an enrollee at least 60 days  in advance of a change to the
prescription drug formulary that will adversely affect  the enrollee. Changes that adversely
affect an enrollee include but are not limited to:
(i) Imposition of new utilization management requirements;
(ii) Modification of  tiers in the formulary or a change to the placement of a drug on a
[22]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tier that results in a higher out-of-pocket cost to the enrollee; or
(iii) Required substitution of a brand name drug with a generic alternative.
(B) Include in the notice required by this paragraph information for enrollees  about how
to file grievances and appeals and about the appeals process.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 743B.125 is amended to read:
743B.125. (1) With respect to coverage under an  individual health benefit plan, a carrier may
not impose an individual coverage waiting period.
(2) With respect to individual coverage under a grandfathered health plan, a carrier:
(a) May impose an exclusion period  for specified covered services applicable to all individuals
enrolling for the first time in the individual health benefit plan.
(b) May not impose a preexisting condition exclusion unless the  exclusion complies with the
following requirements:
(A) The exclusion applies only to a condition for which medical advice, diagnosis, care or
treatment was recommended or  received during the six-month period immediately preceding the
individual’s effective date of coverage.
(B) The exclusion expires no later than six  months after the individual’s effective date of cov-
erage.
(3) An individual health  benefit plan other than a grandfathered health plan must cover, at a
minimum, all essential health benefits.
(4) A carrier shall renew an individual  health benefit plan, including a health benefit plan issued
through a bona fide association, unless:
(a) The policyholder fails to pay the required premiums.
(b) The policyholder or a representative of the policyholder engages in fraud  or makes an in-
tentional misrepresentation of a material fact as prohibited by the terms of the policy.
(c) The carrier discontinues both offering and renewing all of the carrier’s  individual health
benefit plans in this state or in a specified service area within  this state. In order to discontinue the
plans under this paragraph, the carrier:
(A) Shall give notice of the decision to the Department of Consumer and Business Services and
to all policyholders covered by the plans;
(B) May not cancel coverage under the plans for 180 days after the date of  the notice required
under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph if coverage  is discontinued in the entire state or in a
specified service area, except that:
(i) The carrier shall cancel coverage in accordance with subparagraph (C) of this  paragraph if
the cancellation is  for a specified service area in the circumstances described in subparagraph (C)
of this paragraph; and
(ii) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services may specify  a cancella-
tion date other than the cancellation date specified in this subparagraph if the carrier is  subject to
a delinquency proceeding, as defined in ORS 734.014; and
(C) May not  cancel coverage under the plans for 90 days after the date of the notice required
under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph if  coverage is discontinued in a specified service area
because of an inability to reach an agreement with  the health care providers or organization of
health care providers to provide services under the plans within the service area.
(d) The carrier discontinues both offering and renewing an individual health benefit plan in a
specified service area within this state because of an inability to reach an agreement with the health
care providers or organization of  health care providers to provide services under the plan within the
[23]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
service area. In order to discontinue a plan under this paragraph, the carrier:
(A) Shall give notice of the decision to the department and to all  policyholders covered by the
plan;
(B) May  not cancel coverage under the plan for 90 days after the date of the notice required
under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph; and
(C) Shall offer in writing to each policyholder covered  by the plan, all other individual health
benefit plans that the carrier offers in the specified service area. The  carrier shall offer the plans
at least 90 days prior to discontinuation.
(e) The carrier  discontinues both offering and renewing an individual health benefit plan, other
than a grandfathered health plan, for all individuals in this state or in  a specified service area
within this state, other than a plan discontinued under paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(f) The carrier discontinues both offering and renewing a grandfathered health  plan for all in-
dividuals in this state or in a specified service area within this state,  other than a plan discontinued
under paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(g) With respect to plans that are being discontinued under paragraph (e) or (f) of  this sub-
section, the carrier shall:
(A) Offer  in writing to each policyholder covered by the plan, all health benefit plans that the
carrier offers to individuals in the specified service area.
(B) Offer the plans at least 90 days prior to discontinuation.
(C) Act uniformly without regard to  the claims experience of the affected policyholders or the
health status of any current or prospective enrollee.
(h) The Director  of the Department of Consumer and Business Services orders the carrier to
discontinue coverage in accordance with procedures specified or approved by the  director upon
finding that the continuation of the coverage would:
(A) Not be in the best interests of the enrollee; or
(B) Impair the carrier’s ability to meet the carrier’s contractual obligations.
(i) In the case of an individual health benefit plan that delivers  covered services through a
specified network of health care providers, the enrollee no longer lives, resides or  works in the
service area of the provider  network and the termination of coverage is not related to the health
status of any enrollee.
(j) In the case of a health benefit plan that  is offered in the individual market only through one
or more bona fide associations, the membership of an individual in  the association ceases and the
termination of coverage is not related to the health status of any enrollee.
(5) A carrier may modify an individual health benefit  plan at the time of coverage renewal. The
modification is not a discontinuation of the plan under subsection (4)(c), (e) and (f) of this section.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of  this section, and subject to the provisions of ORS
743B.310 (2) and (4), a carrier may rescind an individual  health benefit plan if the policyholder or
a representative of the policyholder:
(a) Performs an act, practice or omission that constitutes fraud; or
(b) Makes an intentional misrepresentation of a material fact  as prohibited by the terms of the
policy.
(7) A carrier that continues to offer coverage in the individual market in this state is  not re-
quired to offer coverage in all of the carrier’s individual health benefit plans. However, if a carrier
elects to continue a plan that is closed to new individual policyholders instead of offering  alterna-
tive coverage in the carrier’s other individual health benefit plans, the coverage  for all existing
[24]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
policyholders in the closed plan is renewable in accordance with subsection (4) of this section.
(8) An individual health benefit plan may not impose annual or lifetime limits on the  dollar
amount of essential health benefits.
(9) A grandfathered  health plan may not impose lifetime limits on the dollar amount of essential
health benefits.
(10) This section  does not require a carrier to actively market, offer, issue or accept applications
for:
(a) A  bona fide association health benefit plan from individuals who are not members of the bona
fide association; or
(b) A grandfathered health plan from individuals who are not eligible  for coverage under the
plan.
(11) A carrier that offers an  individual health benefit plan that reimburses the costs of
prescription drugs sold by a  retail pharmacy or administered by a health care provider shall:
(a) Publish to the carrier’s website:
(A) The tiers in the carrier’s prescription drug  formulary, definitions of each tier and the
fee structure for each tier;
(B) The carrier’s prescription drug formulary,  sorted alphabetically by the brand name
and the generic name;
(C) For each drug in the prescription drug formulary:
(i) That is a brand name drug, whether:
(I) A generic alternative is available; and
(II) Step therapy or prior authorization protocols are  required and, if so, whether the
protocols require that a generic alternative be substituted;
(ii) Quantity limits imposed on the drug, if any; and
(iii) The applicable cost-sharing; and
(D) Notification that an enrollee, as provided in  section 11 of this 2019 Act, may ask a
pharmacist if the cash price for  a prescription drug is lower than the enrollee’s out-of-pocket
costs under the plan and, if it is, that the enrollee may pay the cash  price and have the price
paid applied to the enrollee’s deductible or out-of-pocket maximum.
(b)(A) Provide written notice to an enrollee at least 60 days  in advance of a change to the
prescription drug formulary that will adversely affect  the enrollee. Changes that adversely
affect an enrollee include but are not limited to:
(i) Imposition of new utilization management requirements;
(ii) Modification of  tiers in the formulary or a change to the placement of a drug on a
tier that results in a higher out-of-pocket cost to the enrollee; or
(iii) Required substitution of a brand name drug with a generic alternative.
(B) Include in the notice required by this paragraph information for enrollees  about how
to file grievances and appeals and about the appeals process.
DISCLOSURE OF LESSER OF CASH PRICE OR COST-SHARE
AND PROHIBITION ON GAG CLAUSES
SECTION 10.
Section 11 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a  part of the Insurance
Code.
SECTION 11. (1) As used in this section:
[25]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) “Consumer” means an individual with a pharmacy benefit.
(b) “Pharmacist” has the meaning given that term in ORS 689.005.
(c) “Pharmacy” has the meaning given that term in ORS 689.005.
(d) “Pharmacy benefit” means the reimbursement  of an individual’s cost for prescription
drugs under a policy or certificate of health insurance or by a  pharmacy benefit manager or
third party administrator.
(e) “Pharmacy benefit manager” has the meaning given that term in ORS 735.530.
(f) “Third party administrator” means a person licensed under ORS 744.702.
(2) A consumer has the right to be educated by a pharmacy  or pharmacist about all
means available to the consumer to reduce the consumer’s costs for a drug prescribed  for
the consumer including, but not limited to:
(a) Receiving information about the cost and efficacy of any less costly alternative  drug;
(b) Being informed that the consumer may pay the cash price for a prescription drug  if
the cash price is less  than the consumer’s out-of-pocket costs for the drug under the
consumer’s pharmacy benefit; and
(c) Being informed that if the  consumer pays the cash price as described in paragraph
(b) of this  subsection, the price paid must be applied toward the consumer’s deductible or
out-of-pocket maximum as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) An insurer, pharmacy benefit  manager or third party administrator may not, by
contract with a pharmacy or pharmacist, by penalty imposed on a pharmacy or  pharmacist
or by other means, interfere with the right of consumers established in subsection  (2) of this
section.
(4) An insurer, pharmacy benefit  manager or third party administrator shall apply to-
ward any deductible or out-of-pocket  maximum imposed under a consumer’s pharmacy ben-
efit the price paid by a consumer to purchase a prescription drug covered by the  pharmacy
benefit regardless of whether the consumer used the pharmacy benefit to purchase  the drug.
DISCLOSURE OF HOSPITAL AND MEDICAL PROVIDER
MARK-UPS FOR PRESCRIPTION DRUGS
SECTION 12.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Insurer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 731.106.
(b) “Medical provider” means:
(A) A hospital licensed under ORS 441.020.
(B) An ambulatory surgical center licensed under ORS 441.020.
(C) An outpatient renal dialysis facility licensed under ORS 441.020.
(D) A health professional who is in independent  practice and administers drugs to pa-
tients.
(2) A medical provider shall include in every billing that includes  a charge for the dis-
pensing or administration of a prescription drug, whether the charge is listed separately or
is included in a bundle of services, an itemization showing:
(a) The charge for the prescription drug;
(b) The price paid for the drug by the medical provider;
(c) Each fee charged for the preparation, dispensing or administration of the drug; and
(d) The charge  for the drug the medical provider bills to the Oregon Health Authority,
[26]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the Oregon Educators Benefit Board, the  Public Employees’ Benefit Board, Medicare and
commercial insurers.
SECTION 13.  Section 12 of this 2019 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 12.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Insurer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 731.106.
(b) “Medical provider” means:
(A) A hospital licensed under ORS 441.020.
(B) An ambulatory surgical center licensed under ORS 441.020.
(C) An outpatient renal dialysis facility licensed under ORS 441.020.
(D) A health professional who is in independent practice and administers drugs to patients.
(2) A medical provider shall include in every billing that includes a charge  for the dispensing
or administration of a prescription drug, whether the charge is listed separately or is included in a
bundle of services, an itemization showing:
(a) The charge for the prescription drug;
(b) The price paid for the drug by the medical provider;
(c) Each fee charged for the preparation, dispensing or administration of the drug; and
(d) The charge for the drug the medical provider  bills to the Oregon Health Authority, the
Oregon Educators Benefit Board, the Public Employees’ Benefit Board, Medicare and commercial
insurers.
(3) A medical provider shall report the information described in subsection (2) of this
section to the authority,  in the form and manner prescribed by the authority, to be used by
the authority to display health care price information on its website, as described in  ORS
442.466.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 442.466 is amended to read:
442.466. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish and maintain a  program that requires
reporting entities to report health care data for the following purposes:
(a) Determining  the maximum capacity and distribution of existing resources allocated to health
care.
(b) Identifying the demands for health care.
(c) Allowing health care policymakers to make informed choices.
(d) Evaluating the effectiveness of intervention programs in improving health outcomes.
(e) Comparing the costs and effectiveness of various treatment settings and approaches.
(f) Providing information to consumers and purchasers of health care.
(g) Improving the quality and affordability of health care and health care coverage.
(h) Assisting the  authority in furthering the health policies expressed by the Legislative As-
sembly in ORS 442.025.
(i) Evaluating health disparities, including but not limited  to disparities related to race and
ethnicity.
(2) The authority shall prescribe by rule  standards that are consistent with standards adopted
by the Accredited Standards Committee X12 of the American National Standards Institute, the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and the National Council  for Prescription Drug Pro-
grams that:
(a) Establish the time, place, form  and manner of reporting data under this section, including
but not limited to:
(A) Requiring the use of unique patient and provider identifiers;
[27]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Specifying a uniform  coding system that reflects all health care utilization and costs for
health care services provided to Oregon residents in other states; and
(C) Establishing enrollment thresholds below which reporting will not be required.
(b) Establish the types of data to be reported under this section, including but not limited to:
(A) Health care claims and enrollment  data used by reporting entities and paid health care
claims data;
(B) Reports, schedules, statistics or other data relating  to health care costs, prices, quality,
utilization or resources determined  by the authority to be necessary to carry out the purposes of
this section; and
(C) Data related to race, ethnicity and primary language collected  in a manner consistent with
established national standards.
(3) Any third party administrator that is not required to obtain a license  under ORS 744.702 and
that is legally  responsible for payment of a claim for a health care item or service provided to an
Oregon resident may report to the authority the health care  data described in subsection (2) of this
section.
(4) The  authority shall adopt rules establishing requirements for reporting entities to train pro-
viders on  protocols for collecting race, ethnicity and primary language data in a culturally compe-
tent manner.
(5)(a) The authority shall use  data collected under this section to provide information to con-
sumers of health care to empower the consumers to make economically sound and  medically appro-
priate decisions. The information must include,  but not be limited to, the prices and quality of health
care services.
(b) The authority shall, using only data collected under this section from reporting  entities de-
scribed in ORS 442.464 (1) to (3) and data collected from medical providers under section 12  of
this 2019 Act , post to its website health  care price information including the median prices paid
by the reporting entities to hospitals and hospital outpatient clinics for, at a minimum, the 50  most
common inpatient procedures and the 100 most common outpatient procedures.
(c) The health care price information posted to the website must be:
(A) Displayed in a consumer friendly format;
(B) Easily accessible by consumers; and
(C) Updated at least annually to reflect the most recent data available.
(d) The  authority shall apply for and receive donations, gifts and grants from any public or
private source to pay the cost of posting health care price information to  its website in accordance
with this subsection. Moneys received shall be deposited to the Oregon Health Authority Fund.
(e) The obligation of the authority to post  health care price information to its website as re-
quired by this subsection is limited to the extent of any moneys specifically appropriated for  that
purpose or available from donations, gifts and grants from private or public sources.
(6) The authority may contract with  a third party to collect and process the health care data
reported under this section. The contract must prohibit  the collection of Social Security numbers
and must prohibit the disclosure or use of  the data for any purpose other than those specifically
authorized by the contract. The contract must require the third party to transmit all data  collected
and processed under the contract to the authority.
(7) The authority  shall facilitate a collaboration between the Department of Human Services, the
authority, the Department of Consumer and Business Services and  interested stakeholders to de-
velop a comprehensive health care information  system using the data reported under this section
[28]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and collected by  the authority under ORS 442.120 and 442.400 to 442.463  and section 12 of this 2019
Act. The authority, in consultation with interested stakeholders, shall:
(a) Formulate the data sets that will be included in the system;
(b) Establish the criteria and procedures for the development of limited use data sets;
(c) Establish the criteria and procedures to ensure that  limited use data sets are accessible and
compliant with federal and state privacy laws; and
(d) Establish a time frame for the creation of the comprehensive health  care information system.
(8) Information disclosed  through the comprehensive health care information system described
in subsection (7) of this section:
(a) Shall be available, when disclosed in a form and manner that  ensures the privacy and secu-
rity of personal health information as required by state and federal laws, as a resource to  insurers,
employers, providers, purchasers of health care and state agencies to allow for  continuous review
of health care utilization, expenditures and performance in this state;
(b) Shall be available to Oregon programs for  quality in health care for use in improving health
care in Oregon, subject  to rules prescribed by the authority conforming to state and federal privacy
laws or limiting access to limited use data sets;
(c) Shall be presented  to allow for comparisons of geographic, demographic and economic factors
and institutional size; and
(d) May not disclose trade secrets of reporting entities.
(9) The collection, storage and release of health care data and other information under  this
section is subject to the requirements of  the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
Act.
STATE AGENCY COST REPORTING FOR PRESCRIPTION DRUGS
SECTION 15.
(1) The Oregon Health  Authority, the Public Employees’ Benefit Board, the
Oregon Educators Benefit Board,  the Department of Corrections and the Oregon Youth Au-
thority shall annually report to the  Legislative Assembly, in the manner provided in ORS
192.245, information about each agency’s expenditures for  prescription drugs, as described in
subsection (2) of this section. The  Oregon Health Authority shall include in its report infor-
mation about coordinated care organizations’ expenditures for prescription drugs.
(2) Each report required by subsection (1) of this section must include:
(a) The 10 most prescribed drugs;
(b) The 10 highest cost drugs, both before and after any rebates received  from pharma-
ceutical manufacturers;
(c) The 10 drugs for which  there was the greatest increase in cost to the agency from
the prior 12-month period; and
(d) Any drug for which the wholesale acquisition cost, as defined in 42  U.S.C.
1395w-3a(c)(6)(B), is $10,000 or more for a one-month supply or for  a course of treatment
lasting less than one month.
(3) The Oregon Health Authority shall notify the  Pharmacy and Therapeutics Committee
established in ORS 414.353 of drugs described in subsection (2)(d) of this section. The com-
mittee shall evaluate the drugs and make recommendations to the authority as  required by
ORS 414.361 (3) regarding the inclusion of the  drugs on any preferred drug list adopted by
the authority and on the Practitioner-Managed Prescription Drug Plan.
[29]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 16.  ORS 414.361 is amended to read:
414.361. (1) The Pharmacy and Therapeutics Committee shall advise the Oregon Health Author-
ity on:
(a) Adoption of rules to implement ORS 414.351  to 414.414 in accordance with ORS chapter 183.
(b) Implementation  of the medical assistance program retrospective and prospective programs
as described in ORS 414.351 to 414.414, including the type of software programs to be used  by the
pharmacist for prospective drug  use review and the provisions of the contractual agreement between
the state and any entity involved in the retrospective program.
(c) Development of and application  of the criteria and standards to be used in retrospective and
prospective drug use  review in a manner that ensures that such criteria and standards are based
on compendia, relevant guidelines obtained from professional groups through  consensus-driven pro-
cesses, the experience of practitioners with expertise  in drug therapy, data and experience obtained
from drug utilization review program operations. The committee shall have an open professional
consensus process for establishing and revising criteria and standards.  Criteria and standards shall
be available to the public. In developing recommendations  for criteria and standards, the committee
shall establish an explicit ongoing process for soliciting and considering input from interested par-
ties. The committee shall make timely revisions to the criteria and standards based upon this input
in addition to revisions based upon scheduled  review of the criteria and standards. Further, the drug
utilization review standards shall reflect the local practices of prescribers in order to monitor:
(A) Therapeutic appropriateness.
(B) Overutilization or underutilization.
(C) Therapeutic duplication.
(D) Drug-disease contraindications.
(E) Drug-drug interactions.
(F) Incorrect drug dosage or drug treatment duration.
(G) Clinical abuse or misuse.
(H) Drug allergies.
(d) Development, selection and application of and assessment  for interventions that are educa-
tional and not punitive in nature for medical assistance program prescribers, dispensers and pa-
tients.
(2) In reviewing retrospective and prospective drug use,  the committee may consider only drugs
that have received final approval from the federal Food and Drug Administration.
(3) The committee shall  make recommendations to the authority, subject to approval by the Di-
rector of the Oregon Health Authority or the director’s designee[ ,]:
(a) For drugs to  be included on any preferred drug list adopted by the authority and on the
Practitioner-Managed Prescription Drug Plan. [ The committee shall also recommend ]
(b) Regarding the utilization of drugs described in section 15 (2)(d) of  this 2019 Act and
the inclusion of the drugs on any preferred drug list adopted by the authority and on the
Practitioner-Managed Prescription Drug Plan.
(c) All utilization controls, prior authorization requirements or other conditions for the inclu-
sion of a drug on a preferred drug list.
(4) In making recommendations under subsection (3) of this section, the committee may  use any
information the committee  deems appropriate. The recommendations must be based upon the fol-
lowing factors in order of priority:
(a) Safety and efficacy of the drug.
[30]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The ability of Oregonians  to access effective prescription drugs that are appropriate for their
clinical conditions.
(c) Substantial differences in the costs of drugs within the same therapeutic class.
(5) The committee shall post a recommendation to the website of the  authority no later than 30
days after the date the committee approves the  recommendation. The director shall approve, disap-
prove or modify any recommendation of the committee as  soon as practicable, shall publish the de-
cision on the website and shall notify persons who  have requested notification of the decision. A
recommendation adopted by the director, in whole or in part, with respect to the  inclusion of a drug
on a preferred drug list or the Practitioner-Managed Prescription Drug Plan may not  become effec-
tive less than 60 days after the date that the director’s decision is published.
(6) The director shall reconsider any decision  to adopt or modify a recommendation of the
committee with respect to the inclusion of a particular drug on  a preferred drug list or the
Practitioner-Managed Prescription Drug Plan, upon the request of  any interested person filed no
later than 30  days after the director’s decision is published on the website. The decision on recon-
sideration shall be sent to the requester and posted to the website without undue delay.
DISCLOSURE OF FUNDING OF PATIENT ADVOCACY
ORGANIZATIONS BY PHARMACEUTICAL SUPPLY CHAIN
SECTION 17.
Section 18 of this 2019 Act is added  to and made a part of ORS 171.725 to
171.785.
SECTION 18. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Patient advocacy organization” means a nonprofit  organization that is exempt from
taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and:
(A) That advocates on behalf of patients’ access to prescription drugs or  pharmaceutical
treatment;
(B) On whose behalf a lobbyist was registered or was required to  register with the
Oregon Government Ethics Commission; and
(C) That has an annual budget of more than $50,000.
(b) “Pharmaceutical supply chain” means:
(A) A manufacturer, as defined in section 2, chapter 7, Oregon Laws 2018.
(B) A wholesale distributor of prescription drugs.
(C) A pharmacy benefit manager, as defined in ORS 735.530.
(D) An insurer, as defined in ORS 731.106, that offers health  insurance, as defined in ORS
731.162, that reimburses the cost of prescription drugs.
(E) A hospital, as defined in ORS 442.015.
(F) A health care professional that charges  a patient for the cost of a prescription drug
administered by the health care professional.
(G) A coordinated care organization, as defined in ORS 414.025.
(H) A for-profit entity that provides health care.
(I) A trade association for any person described in this paragraph.
(c) “Prescription drug” has the meaning  given that term in section 2, chapter 7, Oregon
Laws 2018.
(2) A patient  advocacy organization that receives more than 10 percent of its annual
budget from payments, donations, subsidies or other  consideration from persons in the
[31]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
pharmaceutical supply chain shall file with the statement required by ORS 171.750  a state-
ment containing the following information:
(a) The total amount of the consideration received by the patient  advocacy organization
from all persons  in the pharmaceutical supply chain reported as a percentage of the
organization’s annual budget; and
(b) For any payment, donation, subsidy or other  consideration of $1,000 or more received
from a person in the pharmaceutical supply chain,  the person’s name and the amount of the
consideration.
(3) A patient advocacy organization shall also report the information described in  sub-
section (2) of this section to the Oregon  Health Authority, in the form and manner pre-
scribed by the authority.
DISCLOSURE OF REBATES, FEES AND REIMBURSEMENTS BY
PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGERS
(To the Department of Consumer and Business Services)
SECTION 19. Sections 20 and 21 of this 2019 Act are added to and made a part of the
Insurance Code.
SECTION 20. (1) As used in this section and section 21  of this 2019 Act, “manufacturer”
has the meaning given that term in section 2, chapter 7, Oregon Laws 2018.
(2) A pharmacy benefit manager  registered under ORS 735.532 shall submit a report to
the Department of Consumer and Business Services on prescription drugs for which the:
(a) Wholesale acquisition cost, as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1395w-3a(c)(6)(B), is $100 or more
for a one-month supply or for a course of treatment lasting less than one month; or
(b) Average reimbursement received from an insurer by the  pharmacy benefit manager
for the prescription drug is 25 percent or more than the average reimbursement  paid by re-
tail pharmacies.
(3) The pharmacy benefit manager shall submit the report in the  form and manner pre-
scribed by the department and shall include the following information:
(a) The average rebate paid by the  manufacturer of the prescription drug to the phar-
macy benefit manager;
(b) The average fee paid by  the manufacturer of the prescription drug to the pharmacy
benefit manager;
(c) The average reimbursement paid by the pharmacy benefit manager to retail  pharma-
cies; and
(d) The average reimbursement paid  to the pharmacy benefit manager by insurers or
other clients of the pharmacy benefit manager.
(4) The information shall be reported using the national drug code number for the  for-
mulation of the prescription drug as assigned  by the United States Food and Drug Adminis-
tration.
(To Plan Sponsors)
[32]
HB 3093
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
SECTION 21. A pharmacy benefit manager registered under ORS 735.532  shall report to
a plan sponsor, following the end of each three-month period within a plan year:
(1) The total amount of rebates, incentives  and fees received by the pharmacy benefit
manager from pharmaceutical manufacturers and the  percentage of the rebates, incentives
and fees received by the pharmacy  benefit manager from pharmaceutical manufacturers that
were paid to the plan sponsor during the three-month period;
(2) The fee paid  by the pharmacy benefit manager to each retail pharmacy during the
three-month period for the dispensing of a prescription drug; and
(3) The fee charged to the plan sponsor during the three-month period to process a  claim
for the dispensing of a prescription drug.
DISCLOSURE OF PRICE IN DRUG ADVERTISEMENT
SECTION 22. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Advertise” means to communicate within this  state by newspaper, radio, television
or other print, broadcast or electronic medium information designed  to create public inter-
est.
(b) “Manufacturer,”  “prescription drug” and “price” have the meanings given those
terms in section 2, chapter 7, Oregon Laws 2018.
(2) A manufacturer that advertises a prescription drug shall clearly and  conspicuously
disclose in the advertisement the wholesale price for the prescription drug paid by  pharma-
cies located in this state.
OPERATIVE DATES AND APPLICABILITY DATES
SECTION 23. The amendments to ORS 743B.013, 743B.105 and 743B.125 by sections 7 to 9
of this 2019 Act apply  to health benefit plans issued, extended or renewed on or after January
1, 2021.
SECTION 24. Section 11 of this 2019 Act applies  to pharmacy benefits, as defined in sec-
tion 11 of this 2019 Act, offered or administered by  insurers, pharmacy benefit managers or
third party administrators on and after the effective date of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 25. (1) Section 12 of this 2019 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2020.
(2) The amendments to section 12 of this 2019 Act by section 13 of this  2019 Act and the
amendments to ORS 442.466 by section 14 of this 2019 Act become operative on July 1, 2022.
SECTION 26. Section 22 of  this 2019 Act applies to a prescription drug advertisement that
is published or broadcast on or after the effective date of this 2019 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 27. The unit captions used in this 2019 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2019 Act.
[33]