Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
CHILDREN’S ADVOCATE
SECTION 1.
ORS 417.805, 417.810, 417.815 and 417.825  are added to and made a part of
sections 3 to 10 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2. Definitions. As used in sections 3 to 10 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Child” means an individual under 21  years of age who is receiving child welfare ser-
vices or juvenile justice services.
(2) “Child-caring agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.205.
SECTION 3.
Children’s Advocate Account.  The Children’s Advocate Account  is estab-
lished in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General  Fund. The Children’s
Advocate Account consists of moneys deposited in  the account under ORS 417.825 and may
include miscellaneous receipts, gifts and federal  and other grants received by the Children’s
Advocate and deposited to the account. The moneys in the account are continuously appro-
priated to the office of Children’s Advocate for carrying out the responsibilities of the  office
of Children’s Advocate.
SECTION 4. Investigations. (1) The Children’s Advocate may, in response to a complaint
or on the Children’s Advocate’s own initiative, investigate an administrative act affecting
children that the Children’s Advocate reasonably believes may be:
(a) Contrary to law;
(b) Based on mistaken facts or irrelevant considerations;
(c) Unsupported by an adequate statement of reasons;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3478
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Performed in an inefficient manner;
(e) Unreasonable, unfair or otherwise objectionable, even  though in accordance with law;
(f) A risk to the health, safety, welfare or rights of a child; or
(g) Otherwise erroneous.
(2) The Children’s Advocate may decline to investigate a complaint if:
(a) The Children’s Advocate reasonably believes the  complaint can be resolved through
a different remedy or process;
(b) The Children’s Advocate has reasonable cause to believe the complaint is trivial,
frivolous, vexatious or not made in good faith;
(c) The complaint was delayed too  long to justify examination or the information received
by the Children’s Advocate is insufficient to initiate an investigation; or
(d) The Children’s Advocate lacks sufficient resources to conduct a full investigation.
(3) When  the Children’s Advocate declines to investigate a complaint, the Children’s Ad-
vocate is not precluded from proceeding, on the Children’s  Advocate’s own initiative, to in-
vestigate an administrative act or circumstance regardless  of whether it is included in a
complaint.
(4) When the Children’s advocate reasonably believes there is  an imminent risk of harm
to a child, the Children’s Advocate shall immediately  report the circumstances to the ap-
propriate authority that can provide for the child’s safety, regardless of whether the
Children’s Advocate chooses to investigate the  circumstances surrounding the imminent risk
of harm to the child.
(5)(a) The  Department of Human Services, Oregon Youth Authority, county juvenile de-
partment or other entity that is the subject of a  complaint, or a person acting in the inter-
ests of the department, authority, county juvenile department  or other entity, may not
retaliate against a person who in good faith files a complaint or participates in  an investi-
gation under this section, including retaliation by:
(A) The imposition of penalties, sanctions or restrictions against the person;
(B) Taking adverse actions connected with the person’s employment or placement; or
(C) The denial of a right, privilege or benefit otherwise available to the person.
(b) A person who alleges retaliation as described in  this subsection may commence a civil
action for appropriate  injunctive relief, damages or other appropriate relief. Upon prevailing
in an action brought under this paragraph, the plaintiff may recover special, general  and
punitive damages.  In addition, the court shall award reasonable attorney fees to the pre-
vailing plaintiff.
(c) The remedies provided by this subsection to a person who is an  employee are in ad-
dition to any remedy provided to an employee under ORS 659A.199.
SECTION 5.
Obstructing a Children’s Advocate investigation.  (1) A person  commits the
crime of obstructing a  Children’s Advocate investigation if the person knowingly and
willfully:
(a) Misleads or attempts to mislead the Children’s Advocate or a  designee of the
Children’s Advocate in the course of an investigation under section 4 of this 2025 Act; or
(b) Obstructs  or hinders the proper and lawful exercise of the Children’s Advocate’s
powers in the course of an investigation under section 4 of this 2025 Act.
(2) Obstructing a Children’s Advocate investigation is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 6.
Procedures to maintain confidentiality. The Children’s Advocate shall es-
[2]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tablish procedures to maintain the confidentiality  of children’s records and files. These pro-
cedures must meet the following requirements:
(1) The Children’s Advocate or a designee of the Children’s Advocate may not  disclose
the identity of any child unless the child or the child’s legal representative consents  in
writing to the disclosure and specifies to whom the disclosure may be made.
(2) The identity of any complainant or child  on whose behalf a complaint is made, or in-
dividual providing information on behalf of the complainant or the child, shall be confidential
and is not subject to disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478. If  the complaint becomes the
subject of judicial proceedings, at the request of the court, the Children’s  Advocate may
disclose the investigative information held by the Children’s Advocate or the designee.
SECTION 7.
Right of entry into  facilities and access to records.  (1) The Children’s Ad-
vocate and each designee of the Children’s Advocate has the right of  entry into any premises
or facility at which a child is being served or housed under the authorization, request  or di-
rection of  the Department of Human Services, the Oregon Youth Authority or a county ju-
venile department. The Children’s Advocate or designee may enter the premises  or facility
at any time considered necessary and reasonable by the Children’s Advocate  or the designee
if the entry is for the purpose of:
(a) Investigating and resolving complaints  made by children or on behalf of children in
the care or custody of the Department of Human  Services, the Oregon Youth Authority or
a county juvenile department or in the care or custody of a person, organization, program
or facility licensed, certified or otherwise authorized or contracted with to provide care  or
services to  children by the Department of Human Services, the Oregon Youth Authority or
a county juvenile department;
(b) Interviewing children, with their consent, in private;
(c) Offering the services of the Children’s Advocate to any eligible child, in private;
(d) Interviewing employees or agents of the facility, agency, program, person or organ-
ization;
(e) Consulting regularly  with the administrators of the facility, agency, program or or-
ganization; and
(f) Providing Children’s Advocate services authorized by law or by rule.
(2) The Children’s Advocate shall have access to a child’s  records and to records of a
public agency as necessary to carry out the duties of the  Children’s Advocate, including re-
cords on  reports of abuse, use of restraint or seclusion or licensing or contract violations.
The provisions of ORS 192.553 to 192.581 are  not intended to limit the access of the Children’s
Advocate to a child’s medical records. If necessary  to investigate a complaint, designees of
the Children’s Advocate shall have access to a child’s records, including medical records  as
authorized by the child or the child’s legal representative.
(3) The Children’s Advocate shall enter  into confidentiality agreements with the Depart-
ment of Human  Services, Oregon Youth Authority, Department of Education, Oregon Health
Authority, county juvenile  departments and public school districts, permitting the Children’s
Advocate to have  access to electronic records as necessary to carry out the duties of the
Children’s Advocate. The agreement must  ensure that records obtained by the Children’s
Advocate that are confidential, privileged or otherwise protected from disclosure are  not
further disclosed, except as permitted by state or federal law.
(4) The Children’s Advocate or designee shall ensure that entry into a facility or premises
[3]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
as authorized by this section be done in a manner that does  not significantly disrupt the
providing of services to children.
(5) When seeking entry to a facility or premises under  this section, the Children’s Ad-
vocate or designee shall show identification to the person in charge.
(6) A child may refuse to communicate with the Children’s Advocate or designee, pro-
vided the refusal be made directly to the Children’s Advocate or designee  and not through
an intermediary.
(7) Unless declined by the child, the Children’s Advocate or designee  shall include the
child in planning any course of action to be taken on the child’s behalf.
SECTION 8.
Report after investigation; referral to other agencies. (1) Following an in-
vestigation, the Children’s Advocate or a  designee of the Children’s Advocate shall report
opinions or recommendations to the party or parties affected and, if  appropriate, shall at-
tempt to resolve the  complaint using informal techniques of mediation, conciliation and
persuasion. The  Children’s Advocate shall refer to an appropriate state agency complaints
of conditions adversely affecting children or  complaints of conditions threatening the safety
or well-being of children that cannot be resolved in the manner described in this section.
(2) The Children’s Advocate or designee  shall promote and publicize programs that pro-
mote the safety or emotional or physical well-being and full expression of children’s rights.
SECTION 9. Notice of complaint  procedures; posting. (1) The Children’s Advocate shall
prepare and distribute to the Department of Human Services, Oregon Youth Authority,
county juvenile departments and any other program deemed appropriate by  the Children’s
Advocate a written notice describing  the procedures to follow in making a complaint, in-
cluding the address and telephone number  of the Children’s Advocate and local designee, if
any, and a poster describing the Children’s Advocate and providing contact information.
(2) The Department of Human Services, Oregon Youth Authority, county juvenile  de-
partments and any other program shall  ensure that each facility, program or premises pro-
viding services to children posts the written notice and poster as required by this section in
conspicuous places in the facility, program or  premises in accordance with procedures pro-
vided by the Children’s Advocate.
(3) The  Department of Human Services, Oregon Youth Authority, county juvenile de-
partments and any other program  shall ensure that the written notice is provided to each
child receiving services and to each child’s legal representative upon entry to service, at each
placement change and at  other appropriate times and places such that the notice is provided
no less often than once each quarter.
SECTION 10.
Rules. In accordance with applicable provisions of  ORS chapter 183, the
office of the Children’s Advocate may adopt rules necessary for the administration of
sections 3 to 10 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 417.810 is amended to read:
417.810. (1) The [ Office] office of Children’s Advocate is established in the [ Department of Human
Services] office of the Long Term Care Ombudsman . The Children’s Advocate shall function
separately and independently from  any other state agency. The Governor shall appoint the
Children’s Advocate for a four-year term from a list  of three nominees nominated by the
Children’s Advocacy Advisory Board established under section 21 of  this 2025 Act. The ap-
pointment of the Children’s Advocate is subject  to Senate confirmation in the manner pro-
vided in ORS 171.562 and 171.565. A vacancy shall be filled  in the same manner as an
[4]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
appointment is made.  [ The office is under the supervision and control of  the Children’s Advocate,
who is responsible for the performance of the duties, functions and powers of  the office. With the
concurrence of the Governor, the Director of Human Services shall appoint the Children’s Advocate and
may terminate the Children’s Advocate. ]
[(2) Subject to available funds and the applicable provisions of ORS chapter  240, the Children’s
Advocate may hire staff  to carry out the duties, functions and powers of the office and shall prescribe
their duties and fix their compensation. ]
[(3) The Children’s Advocate shall be a person who has background and experience in: ]
[(a) Law enforcement with particular emphasis on crimes involving child victims; or ]
[(b) Social work with particular emphasis on child abuse. ]
(2) The Children’s Advocate may be removed for just cause, upon recommendation to the
Governor by the Children’s Advocacy Advisory Board.
(3) The Children’s Advocate must:
(a) Be a resident of the state of Oregon;
(b) Have demonstrated  ability to communicate with, gain trust of and advocate for the
interests of children and youth engaged in the child welfare system  or receiving services
from child-caring agencies;
(c) Have knowledge of the  procedures, policies, regulations and statutes governing the
provision of services to children and youth engaged  in the child welfare system or the juve-
nile justice system or receiving services from child-caring agencies;
(d) Have demonstrated knowledge of and  a commitment to the protection of the rights,
safety and well-being of children and youth; and
(e) Have demonstrated skills in advocacy, communication, investigation and  policy de-
velopment.
(4) The Children’s Advocate may not:
(a) Be a current  provider of services to children or youth in the child welfare system or
the juvenile justice system;
(b) Be a family member of a current provider of services  to children or youth in the child
welfare system or the juvenile justice system; or
(c) Have a financial interest in any program, facility, agency or entity that provides ser-
vices to children or youth in the child welfare system or the juvenile justice system.
(5) The Children’s Advocate may:
(a) Subject to ORS chapter 240, appoint all subordinate officers and  employees of the of-
fice of Children’s Advocate and fix their compensation; and
(b) Appoint volunteer advocate designees.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 417.815 is amended to read:
417.815. (1) The [ Office] office of Children’s Advocate shall :
(a) Be accessible to the public through the state  toll-free telephone line maintained pursuant to
ORS 417.805 and through other electronic and written forms of communication[ . The office shall: ];
[(a) Disseminate information and educate  the public about the detection and prevention of child
abuse and about the prosecution of persons accused of child abuse; ]
[(b) Cooperate with other units within the Department of Human Services and law enforcement  of-
ficials in performing duties under ORS  418.747 and 418.748 and 419B.005 to 419B.050 when the in-
vestigation involves alleged child abuse; ]
[(c) Provide technical  assistance in the development and implementation of state and local programs
[5]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
that relate to child abuse; ]
[(d) In cooperation with the department,  objectively review the department’s systems for handling
child abuse cases; and ]
[(e) Analyze data collected by the office to  discern general patterns and trends, chronic problems
and other systemic difficulties in the detection, reporting, investigation, prosecution and  resolution of
cases of child abuse. ]
[(2) In addition to the duties required under subsection (1) of this section, the office shall: ]
[(a) Review any complaint regarding the department’s involvement in  a specific child abuse case,
unless the office determines there is an adequate remedy for the complaint; ]
[(b) Make any appropriate referrals of the complaint or complainant at the  time the office receives
the complaint or during the office’s review process; ]
[(c) Inform  the complainant of the referral of the complaint or any other action taken by the office
on the complaint; ]
[(d) Inform the department of the office’s intention to review the department’s action, unless the
office determines that advance notice will unduly hinder the review; and ]
[(e) Conduct a review of the department’s  action when appropriate, and inform the department of
the results of the review, including any recommendation the  Children’s Advocate believes would resolve
any case or any systemic issues identified in the review. ]
[(3) If the office has knowledge  of confidential information relating to a child involved or allegedly
involved in child abuse, the office shall keep the information confidential from public  disclosure. How-
ever, the office is subject to legal mandates in ORS 418.747 and 418.748 and 419B.005 to 419B.050. ]
[(4) A person who files a complaint under  this section or ORS 417.805 or participates in any in-
vestigation under this section may not be, because of that action: ]
[(a) Subject to any penalties, sanctions or restrictions imposed by the department; ]
[(b) Subject to any penalties, sanctions or restrictions connected with the person’s employment; or ]
[(c) Denied any right, privilege or benefit. ]
(b) Widely publicize the services of the Children’s Advocate, purpose and mode  of opera-
tion;
(c) Remain separate and distinct from the Department of Human  Services, Oregon Youth
Authority, System of Care Advisory Council, Oregon Health  Authority, county juvenile de-
partments and any advocacy office of the Governor;
(d) Vigorously advocate for the systemic improvement of  services for children and youth
receiving child welfare services or services from child-caring agencies;
(e) Work closely with cooperative associations  and citizen groups in this state that cen-
ter the rights  of children and youth and the state protection and advocacy system under ORS
192.517;
(f) Investigate and resolve, in response to complaints made by  or on behalf of youth or
children, or on the  Children’s Advocate’s own initiative, any act of the Department of Human
Services or any person or provider  of services to children and youth who is licensed, con-
tracted, certified or otherwise authorized to provide services on behalf  of or at the direction
of the department or  the Oregon Youth Authority that may adversely affect children’s
health, safety, welfare or rights;
(g) Respond to concerns or reports made by a child or  any person on behalf of a child
regarding the safety, well-being or the full exercise of child’s rights in  the child welfare or
juvenile justice systems, whether on an individual basis or a systemic basis;
[6]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(h) Inform the department of the results of any investigation, including any recommen-
dation the Children’s Advocate believes would resolve any case  or any systemic issues iden-
tified in the investigation;
(i) Publish the recommendations and results described  in paragraph (h) of this subsection
on a website maintained by the Children’s Advocate in a manner that is accessible to  the
public with  redactions that are necessary to protect all personally identifiable information
about a child;
(j) Provide timely and constructive information to the  Legislative Assembly, Department
of Human Services, System of Care Advisory Council  and other relevant organizations about
the problems experienced by children receiving supports  or services funded or regulated by
the Legislative Assembly, Department of Human Services, System of Care  Advisory Council
or other relevant organizations;
(k) Administer and oversee the Critical Incident  Review Team process, consistent with
ORS 418.806 to 418.816;
(L) Annually submit a report to the relevant interim committees  of the Legislative As-
sembly, the department and the Governor regarding recommendations from Critical Incident
Review Teams conducted during the prior year, with specific  attention to those recommen-
dations that may require legislative or budgetary action;
(m) Notify an appropriate committee or interim committee of the Legislative  Assembly
and the agency of desirable statutory or regulatory  change if the Children’s Advocate be-
lieves an action has been dictated by laws or regulations leading to  unfair or otherwise
objectionable outcomes and could be revised by legislative action;
(n) If the  Children’s Advocate believes any agency official or employee has acted in a
manner warranting criminal or disciplinary proceedings, refer the matter to  the appropriate
authorities without notice to that person;
(o) Immediately report  licensing, contracting and certification violations and concerns
to the Department of Human Services and other relevant authorities in the manner  provided
by state or federal law;
(p) Analyze data collected by the office to discern general patterns and trends, chronic
problems and other systemic  difficulties in safeguarding the well-being of children who have
contact with the  child welfare system, child-caring agencies or the juvenile justice system
and the full exercise of the rights of those children;
(q) Objectively review the efforts of the Department of Human Services, Oregon Youth
Authority and county juvenile departments to ensure children’s  safety, rights and well-being,
including the:
(A) Response to child abuse;
(B) Appropriate regulation of substitute care settings  for compliance with license, certi-
fication and contract requirements;
(C) Appropriate oversight of facilities licensed by the Department of Human  Services or
Oregon Youth Authority to provide care and services to children; and
(D) Compliance with the rights of children in care; and
(r) Submit an annual report of the activities of the  office of Children’s Advocate to the
Governor and to the committees or interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related
to human services.
(2) The Children’s Advocate may:
[7]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) File supplemental  information with the court regarding a specific child if the
Children’s Advocate determines it is in the child’s best interests;
(b) Access  confidential records held by the Department of Human Services, Oregon Youth
Authority or county juvenile department for the purpose of  carrying out the duties of the
Children’s Advocate;
[(5)] (c)  If deemed necessary by the Children’s Advocate  for the purposes of carrying out the
duties of the office, [ the office  may ] conduct criminal records checks pursuant to ORS 181A.200 on
a person through the Law  Enforcement Data System maintained by the Department of State
Police[ .];
(d) Request and  obtain assistance and information from any agency or person the Child
Advocate requires to carry out the duties of the office;
(e) Have access to and examine  or copy, without payment of a fee, any agency records,
including records that are confidential under state or federal law;
(f) Enter and inspect  without prior notice the premises of a provider contracted, licensed,
certified or otherwise authorized  by the Department of Human Services or Oregon Youth
Authority to provide services to children;
(g) Compel by  subpoena any person to appear, give sworn testimony or to produce docu-
mentary or other evidence that is reasonably relevant to the matters under investigation;
(h) Maintain confidential any matter  related to complaints and investigations, including
the identities of the complainants and witnesses, except as  the Children’s Advocate deems
necessary to carry out the duties of the Children’s Advocate;
(i) Bring suit in the  circuit court of Marion County to compel the cooperation of any
state or private entity;
(j) Adopt by rule procedures for receiving and processing complaints, conducting  inves-
tigations and reporting findings, conclusions and recommendations; and
(k) Make recommendations to the Legislative Assembly for policy and legislation  re-
garding implementation, improvement and expansion of Children’s  Advocate services in this
state.
(3) The Children’s Advocate may not  impose any fees for the submission or investigations
of complaints.
(4) All agencies shall cooperate with and assist the Children’s Advocate  in the perform-
ance of its duties and functions.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 417.825 is amended to read:
417.825. (1) In addition to any other fees provided by law, the appropriate agency:
(a) When  records of live birth are registered with the state, shall pay a $1 fee on each record
of live birth registered with the agency.
(b) That issues certified copies of records of live birth for the state or a county,  shall collect a
$1 fee on each certified copy of a record of live birth issued by the agency.
(2) The agencies paying  or collecting the fees described in subsection (1) of this section shall
transfer moneys  from the fees imposed by this section to the State Treasurer for deposit in the
[Department of Human Services  Account established under ORS 409.060 ] Children’s Advocate Ac-
count established under section 3 of this 2025 Act . The moneys deposited under this section are
appropriated continuously to  the [ Department of Human Services for use by the Office ] office  of
Children’s Advocate for the administration of [ ORS 417.805,  417.810 and 417.815 ] sections 3 to 10
of this 2025 Act .
[8]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 14.
 ORS 409.185 is amended to read:
409.185. (1) The Director  of Human Services shall oversee the development of standards and
procedures for assessment, investigation and enforcement of child protective services.
(2)(a) The Department of Human Services shall take action to implement  the provision of child
protective services as outlined in ORS 417.705 to 417.800 and based on the  recommendations in the
1992 “Oregon Child Protective Services Performance  Study” published by the University of Southern
Maine.
(b) In all substantiated  cases of child abuse and neglect, the role of the department is to com-
plete a comprehensive family assessment of risk of abuse  or neglect, or both, assess service needs
and provide immediate protective services as necessary.
(c) The department shall provide remedial services needed to ensure the safety of the child.
(d) In  all cases of child abuse and neglect for which a criminal investigation is conducted, the
role of law enforcement  agencies is to provide a legally sound, child sensitive investigation of
whether abuse or neglect or both have occurred and  to gather other evidence and perform other
responsibilities in accordance with interagency agreements.
(e) The department and law enforcement agencies shall conduct the investigation  and assess-
ment concurrently, based upon the  protocols and procedures of the county child abuse multidisci-
plinary team in each jurisdiction.
(f) When the department and law enforcement agencies conduct  a joint investigation and as-
sessment, the activities of the department and agencies are to be clearly differentiated by the pro-
tocols of the county child abuse multidisciplinary team.
(g) Nothing in this subsection is intended to be inconsistent with ORS 418.702, 418.747  and
418.748 and ORS chapter 419B.
(h) In all cases of child  abuse for which an investigation is conducted, the department shall
provide a child’s parent, guardian or caregiver  with a clear written explanation of the investigation
process, the court hearing process and  the rights of the parent, guardian or caregiver in the abuse
investigation and in the court proceedings related to the abuse investigation.
(3) Upon receipt of a recommendation of the  Children’s Advocate under ORS 417.815 [ (2)(e)]
(1)(h) or section 8  of this 2025 Act , the department shall implement the recommendation or give
the Children’s Advocate written notice of an intent not to implement the recommendation.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 418.201 is amended to read:
418.201. It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly that each foster child have certain essential
rights, including but not limited to the following:
(1) To have the ability to make oral and written complaints  about care, placement or services
that are unsatisfactory or inappropriate, and to be provided with  information about a formal process
for making complaints without fear of retaliation, harassment or punishment.
(2) To be notified  of, and provided with transportation to, court hearings and reviews by local
citizen review boards pertaining to the foster child’s  case when the matters to be considered or
decided upon at  the hearings and reviews are appropriate for the foster child, taking into account
the age and developmental stage of the foster child.
(3) To be provided with written contact information of  specific individuals , including the
Children’s Advocate,  whom the foster child may contact  regarding complaints, concerns or vio-
lations of rights, that is updated as necessary and kept current.
(4) When a foster child is 14 years  of age or older, to be provided with written information
within 60 days of the date of any placement or any change in placement, regarding:
[9]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) How to establish a bank account in the foster child’s name as allowed under state law;
(b) How to acquire a driver license as allowed under state law;
(c) How to remain in foster care after reaching 18 years of age;
(d) The availability of a tuition and fee waiver for a current or former foster child under  ORS
350.300;
(e) How to obtain a copy of the foster child’s credit report, if any;
(f) How to obtain medical, dental, vision, mental health services or other treatment, including
services and treatments available without parental consent under state law; and
(g) A transition toolkit, including a comprehensive transition plan.
(5) With respect to a foster  child’s rights under the federal and state constitutions, laws, in-
cluding case law, rules and regulations:
(a) To receive a document setting forth such rights that is age-appropriate  and developmentally
appropriate within 60 days of the date of any placement or any change in placement;
(b) To have a document  setting forth such rights that is age-appropriate and developmentally
appropriate posted at the residences  of all foster parents, child-caring agencies and independent
resident facilities;
(c) To have an annual review of such rights that is age-appropriate and  developmentally appro-
priate while the foster child is in substitute care; and
(d) When the foster child is 14 years of age or older:
(A) To receive a document  setting forth such rights that is age-appropriate and developmentally
appropriate;  and
(B) To acknowledge in writing receipt of the document and that the  rights contained in the
document were explained in an age-appropriate manner.
(6) To be provided with current and updated contact  information for adults who are responsible
for the care of the foster child and who are involved in the foster child’s  case, including but not
limited to caseworkers, caseworker supervisors, attorneys, foster youth advocates  and supporters,
court  appointed  special advocates, local citizen review boards and employees of the Department of
Human Services that provide certification of foster parents, child-caring agencies  and independent
resident facilities.
(7) To have a hotline phone number that is available to the foster child  at all times for the
purposes of enabling the foster child to make complaints and assert grievances  regarding the foster
child’s care, safety or well-being.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 419B.005, as amended by section 64, chapter 73, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
419B.005. As used in ORS 419B.005 to 419B.050, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Abuse” means:
(A) Any assault, as defined  in ORS chapter 163, of a child and any physical injury to a child that
has been caused by other than accidental means,  including any injury that appears to be at variance
with the explanation given of the injury.
(B) Any mental injury to a child, which shall include only cruel or unconscionable acts or
statements made, or  threatened to be made, to a child if the acts, statements or threats result in
severe harm to the child’s psychological, cognitive, emotional or social well-being and functioning.
(C) Rape of a child,  which includes but is not limited to rape, sodomy, unlawful sexual pene-
tration and incest, as those acts are described in ORS chapter 163.
(D) Sexual abuse, as described in ORS chapter 163.
[10]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(E) Sexual exploitation, including but not limited to:
(i) Contributing to the sexual delinquency of a minor,  as defined in ORS chapter 163, and any
other conduct that allows, employs, authorizes, permits, induces or encourages a child to engage  in
the performing for people to observe or the photographing, filming, tape recording or other  exhibi-
tion that, in whole or in part, depicts sexual conduct or contact, as  defined in ORS 167.002 or de-
scribed in ORS  163.665 and 163.670, sexual abuse involving a child or rape of a child, but not
including any conduct that is part of  any investigation conducted pursuant to ORS 419B.020 or that
is designed to serve educational or other legitimate purposes; and
(ii) Allowing, permitting, encouraging or hiring a  child to engage in prostitution as described in
ORS 167.007 or a commercial sex act as defined in ORS 163.266, to purchase  sex with a minor as
described in ORS 163.413 or to engage in commercial sexual solicitation as described in ORS 167.008.
(F) Negligent treatment or  maltreatment of a child, including but not limited to the failure to
provide adequate food, clothing, shelter or medical care that  is likely to endanger the health or
welfare of the child.
(G) Threatened harm  to a child, which means subjecting a child to a substantial risk of harm
to the child’s health or welfare.
(H) Buying or selling a person under 18 years of age as described in ORS 163.537.
(I) Permitting a person under 18 years of age to enter or remain in or upon premises where
methamphetamines are being manufactured.
(J) Unlawful  exposure to a controlled substance, as defined in ORS 475.005, or to the unlawful
manufacturing of a cannabinoid  extract, as defined in ORS 475C.009, that subjects a child to a sub-
stantial risk of harm to the child’s health or safety.
(K) The restraint or seclusion of a child in violation of ORS 339.285, 339.288,  339.291, 339.303
or 339.308.
(L) The infliction of corporal punishment on a child in violation of ORS 339.250 (9).
(b) “Abuse” does not include  reasonable discipline unless the discipline results in one of the
conditions described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) “Child” means an unmarried person who:
(a) Is under 18 years of age; or
(b) Is a child in care, as defined in ORS 418.257.
(3) “Higher education institution” means:
(a) A community college as defined in ORS 341.005;
(b) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(c) The Oregon Health and Science University; and
(d) A private institution of higher education located in Oregon.
(4)(a) “Investigation” means a detailed inquiry into or assessment of  the safety of a child alleged
to have experienced abuse.
(b) “Investigation” does not include screening activities conducted upon the receipt  of a report.
(5) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) A city or municipal police department.
(b) A county sheriff’s office.
(c) The Oregon State Police.
(d) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125.
(e) A county juvenile department.
(6) “Public or private official” means:
[11]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Physician or physician associate licensed under ORS chapter 677 or  naturopathic physician,
including any intern or resident.
(b) Dentist.
(c) School employee, including an employee of a higher education institution.
(d) Licensed practical  nurse, registered nurse, nurse practitioner, nurse’s aide, home health aide
or employee of an in-home health service.
(e) Employee of the Department of Human Services, Oregon Health  Authority, Department of
Early Learning and Care, Department of Education, Youth Development Division,  the Oregon Youth
Authority, a local health department, a community mental health program, a  community develop-
mental disabilities  program, a county juvenile department, a child-caring agency as that term is de-
fined in ORS 418.205 or an alcohol and drug treatment program.
(f) Peace officer.
(g) Psychologist.
(h) Member of the clergy.
(i) Regulated social worker.
(j) Optometrist.
(k) Chiropractor.
(L) Certified provider of foster care, or an employee thereof.
(m) Attorney.
(n) Licensed professional counselor.
(o) Licensed marriage and family therapist.
(p) Firefighter or emergency medical services provider.
(q) Court appointed special advocate, as defined in ORS 419A.004.
(r) Child care provider registered or certified under ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(s) Elected official of a branch of government of  this state or a state agency, board, commission
or department of a branch of government of this state or of  a city, county or other political subdi-
vision in this state.
(t) Physical, speech or occupational therapist.
(u) Audiologist.
(v) Speech-language pathologist.
(w) Employee of the Teacher Standards  and Practices Commission directly involved in investi-
gations or discipline by the commission.
(x) Pharmacist.
(y) Operator of a preschool recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(z) Operator of a school-age recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(aa) Employee of a private agency or organization  facilitating the provision of respite services,
as defined in ORS 418.205, for parents pursuant  to a properly executed power of attorney under ORS
109.056.
(bb) Employee of a public or private organization providing child-related services or activities:
(A) Including but not limited to an employee of a:
(i) Youth group or center;
(ii) Scout group or camp;
(iii) Summer or day camp;
(iv) Survival camp; or
(v) Group, center or camp that is operated under the guidance, supervision or  auspices of a re-
[12]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ligious, public or private educational system or a community service organization; and
(B) Excluding an employee of a qualified victim services program as defined in  ORS 147.600 that
provides confidential, direct services to victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking or hu-
man trafficking.
(cc) Coach, assistant coach or  trainer of an amateur, semiprofessional or professional athlete,
if compensated and if the athlete is a child.
(dd) Personal support worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ee) Home care worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ff) Animal control officer, as defined in ORS 609.500.
(gg) Member of  a school district board, an education service district board or a public charter
school governing body.
(hh) Individual who is paid by a public body, in accordance with ORS 430.215, to provide a ser-
vice identified in an individualized service plan of a child with a developmental disability.
(ii) Referral agent, as defined in ORS 418.351.
(jj) Parole and probation officer, as defined in ORS 181A.355.
(kk) Behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst licensed under ORS  676.810 or behavior
analysis interventionist registered by the Health Licensing Office under ORS 676.815.
(LL) Children’s Advocate.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 419B.005, as amended by section 6, chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2023, and
section 65, chapter 73, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
419B.005. As used in ORS 419B.005 to 419B.050, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Abuse” means:
(A) Any assault, as defined  in ORS chapter 163, of a child and any physical injury to a child that
has been caused by other than accidental means,  including any injury that appears to be at variance
with the explanation given of the injury.
(B) Any mental injury to a child, which shall include only cruel or unconscionable acts or
statements made, or threatened to be made, to a child if the acts, statements or threats  result in
severe harm to the child’s psychological, cognitive, emotional or social well-being and functioning.
(C) Rape of a child, which includes but is not limited to rape,  sodomy, unlawful sexual pene-
tration and incest, as those acts are described in ORS chapter 163.
(D) Sexual abuse, as described in ORS chapter 163.
(E) Sexual exploitation, including but not limited to:
(i) Contributing to the sexual delinquency of a minor,  as defined in ORS chapter 163, and any
other conduct  that allows, employs, authorizes, permits, induces or encourages a child to engage in
the performing  for people to observe or the photographing, filming, tape recording or other exhibi-
tion that, in whole or in part,  depicts sexual conduct or contact, as defined in ORS 167.002 or de-
scribed in ORS 163.665 and 163.670, sexual abuse involving a child or rape of a child,  but not
including any conduct that is part of  any investigation conducted pursuant to ORS 419B.020 or that
is designed to serve educational or other legitimate purposes; and
(ii) Allowing, permitting, encouraging or hiring a  child to engage in prostitution as described in
ORS 167.007 or a commercial sex act as defined in ORS 163.266, to purchase  sex with a minor as
described in ORS 163.413 or to engage in commercial sexual solicitation as described in ORS 167.008.
(F) Negligent treatment or  maltreatment of a child, including but not limited to the failure to
provide adequate food, clothing, shelter or medical care that  is likely to endanger the health or
welfare of the child.
[13]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(G) Threatened harm  to a child, which means subjecting a child to a substantial risk of harm
to the child’s health or welfare.
(H) Buying or selling a person under 18 years of age as described in ORS 163.537.
(I) Permitting a person under 18 years of age to enter or remain in or upon premises where
methamphetamines are being manufactured.
(J) Unlawful  exposure to a controlled substance, as defined in ORS 475.005, or to the unlawful
manufacturing of a cannabinoid  extract, as defined in ORS 475C.009, that subjects a child to a sub-
stantial risk of harm to the child’s health or safety.
(K) The infliction of corporal punishment on a child in violation of ORS 339.250 (9).
(b) “Abuse” does not include reasonable discipline unless the discipline results  in one of the
conditions described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) “Child” means an unmarried person who:
(a) Is under 18 years of age; or
(b) Is a child in care, as defined in ORS 418.257.
(3) “Higher education institution” means:
(a) A community college as defined in ORS 341.005;
(b) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(c) The Oregon Health and Science University; and
(d) A private institution of higher education located in Oregon.
(4)(a) “Investigation” means a detailed inquiry into or assessment of  the safety of a child alleged
to have experienced abuse.
(b) “Investigation” does not include screening activities conducted upon the receipt  of a report.
(5) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) A city or municipal police department.
(b) A county sheriff’s office.
(c) The Oregon State Police.
(d) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125.
(e) A county juvenile department.
(6) “Public or private official” means:
(a) Physician or  physician associate licensed under ORS chapter 677 or naturopathic physician,
including any intern or resident.
(b) Dentist.
(c) School employee, including an employee of a higher education institution.
(d) Licensed practical  nurse, registered nurse, nurse practitioner, nurse’s aide, home health aide
or employee of an in-home health service.
(e) Employee of the  Department of Human Services, Oregon Health Authority, Department of
Early Learning and Care, Department of Education, Youth Development Division,  the Oregon Youth
Authority, a local  health department, a community mental health program, a community develop-
mental disabilities program, a county juvenile department, a child-caring agency as that term is  de-
fined in ORS 418.205 or an alcohol and drug treatment program.
(f) Peace officer.
(g) Psychologist.
(h) Member of the clergy.
(i) Regulated social worker.
(j) Optometrist.
[14]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(k) Chiropractor.
(L) Certified provider of foster care, or an employee thereof.
(m) Attorney.
(n) Licensed professional counselor.
(o) Licensed marriage and family therapist.
(p) Firefighter or emergency medical services provider.
(q) Court appointed special advocate, as defined in ORS 419A.004.
(r) Child care provider registered or certified under ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(s) Elected official of a branch of government of  this state or a state agency, board, commission
or department of a branch of government of this state or of  a city, county or other political subdi-
vision in this state.
(t) Physical, speech or occupational therapist.
(u) Audiologist.
(v) Speech-language pathologist.
(w) Employee of the Teacher Standards  and Practices Commission directly involved in investi-
gations or discipline by the commission.
(x) Pharmacist.
(y) Operator of a preschool recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(z) Operator of a school-age recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(aa) Employee of a private agency or organization  facilitating the provision of respite services,
as defined in ORS 418.205, for parents pursuant  to a properly executed power of attorney under ORS
109.056.
(bb) Employee of a public or private organization providing child-related services or activities:
(A) Including but not limited to an employee of a:
(i) Youth group or center;
(ii) Scout group or camp;
(iii) Summer or day camp;
(iv) Survival camp; or
(v) Group, center or camp that is operated under the guidance, supervision or  auspices of a re-
ligious, public or private educational system or a community service organization; and
(B) Excluding an employee of a qualified victim services program as defined in  ORS 147.600 that
provides confidential, direct services to victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking or hu-
man trafficking.
(cc) Coach, assistant coach or  trainer of an amateur, semiprofessional or professional athlete,
if compensated and if the athlete is a child.
(dd) Personal support worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ee) Home care worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ff) Animal control officer, as defined in ORS 609.500.
(gg) Member of  a school district board, an education service district board or a public charter
school governing body.
(hh) Individual who is paid by a public body, in accordance with ORS 430.215, to provide a ser-
vice identified in an individualized service plan of a child with a developmental disability.
(ii) Referral agent, as defined in ORS 418.351.
(jj) Parole and probation officer, as defined in ORS 181A.355.
(kk) Behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst licensed under ORS  676.810 or behavior
[15]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
analysis interventionist registered by the Health Licensing Office under ORS 676.815.
(LL) Children’s Advocate.
CRITICAL INCIDENT REVIEW TEAMS
SECTION 18.
 ORS 418.811 is amended to read:
418.811. (1) [ When the  Department of Human Services becomes aware of a critical incident, the
department shall] The Department of Human Services shall immediately notify the Children’s
Advocate when the department causes  an investigation under ORS 419B.020 to be made into
the nature and cause of a fatality that the department reasonably believes is the  result of
child abuse.
(2) The Children’s Advocate shall  assign a Critical Incident Review Team[ .]
[(2) The  department shall assign the team required under subsection (1) of this section ] no later
than the earlier of:
(a) Ten days after the [ department] Children’s Advocate  becomes aware of a fatality that the
[department] Children’s Advocate  reasonably believes is the result of child abuse; or
(b) Seven days after the department [ causes an investigation under ORS  419B.020 to be made into
the nature and cause of a fatality when ] notifies the Children’s  Advocate about a fatality that  the
department reasonably believes [ the fatality] is the result of child abuse.
(3)(a) Members of the team shall include, at a minimum, the following:
(A) The [ Director of Human Services or  a deputy director of the department ] Children’s Advocate
or a designee of the Children’s Advocate ;
(B) The lead department personnel responsible for the administration and oversight of  the child
welfare system within the department or the lead personnel’s deputy; and
(C) The department personnel responsible for media and communications.
(b) Members of the team may include:
(A) Members of the public, appointed by the [ director] Children’s Advocate , as appropriate;
(B) A juvenile court judge appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court;
(C) A member of a local citizen review board established under ORS 419A.090 whose service
area does not include the location where the critical incident occurred; or
(D) If the [ director] Children’s Advocate  determines it is appropriate to  include one or more
legislators as members of the team, up to  one state Senator appointed by the President of the Senate
and one state Representative appointed by the Speaker  of the House of Representatives. A person
is ineligible for appointment to a team  under this subparagraph if [ the critical incident occurred in
the person’s district, the person had  prior contact with or knowledge of the deceased child or the de-
ceased child’s family, or ] the person is a family member of any person associated with the case.
(4)(a) During the course of its review of the case, the team may include or  consult with the
district attorney from the county in which the critical incident occurred.
(b) All members of the team must attend meetings of the team  in person, by telephone or by
other two-way electronic communication device. A team member may not send a  delegate to
meetings of the team to appear on the member’s behalf. Notwithstanding the provisions of  this
paragraph, a meeting of the team may be convened and held even if one or more members are unable
to attend the meeting.
(5)(a) All information and records available to the  department regarding the critical incident
shall be provided to team members. Information and records under this subsection  include, but are
[16]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
not limited to, medical records,  hospital records, records maintained by any state, county or local
agency, police investigative data, coroner or medical examiner  investigative data and social services
records, as necessary to complete a case review under this section.
(b) Information  and records provided to team members are confidential and may be disclosed
only as necessary to carry out the purposes of the team’s case review.
(6) In reviewing the case to  which the team has been assigned, the team shall, with the assist-
ance and cooperation of the department:
(a) Review the  case with the primary focus on the history of the safety and well-being of the
child who was involved in the critical incident and any other children who  may be impacted by the
circumstances surrounding the critical incident.
(b) Document and make a part of the record of the case review all team conclusions and deci-
sions.
(c) Complete the case review even if:
(A) The team concludes that the critical incident was the result of the actions of one or  more
department employees or staff and that such actions  were inconsistent with department policy or
administrative rule; or
(B) The department’s investigation into the critical incident results in a  finding that the report
of child abuse is unfounded or cannot be determined, as described in ORS 419B.026.
(d) Prepare and submit the final report  required under ORS 418.813  and any appropriate sup-
plemental reports.
(7) If the team concludes that the critical incident involves personnel matters  relevant to the
department, the department shall refer the matters to the human resources or personnel divisions
of the department.
(8) The team may meet, upon conclusion of a criminal investigation  or prosecution arising out
of a child fatality to which the team was assigned for review, with  members of law enforcement that
investigated the child fatality or with the prosecuting attorneys who prosecuted the case for  the
purpose of  reviewing the conclusions and recommendations of the team and the reports prepared and
submitted by the team.
(9) The [ department] Children’s Advocate  shall  adopt rules necessary to carry out the pro-
visions of ORS 418.806 to 418.816. The rules adopted by  the [ department] Children’s Advocate shall
substantially conform with the department’s child welfare  protocol regarding Notification and Re-
view of Critical Incidents.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 418.813 is amended to read:
418.813. (1) Subject to subsection (2)(b) of this section, each Critical Incident  Review Team as-
signed under ORS 418.811 shall submit a detailed, written final report to the Department of Human
Services and the Children’s Advocate  no later than the 100th day following the date the  [ depart-
ment] Children’s Advocate assigned the team.  If appropriate, a  Critical Incident Review Team
may submit a  supplement to the final report to the department and the Children’s Advocate,
reflecting any subsequent changes to the Critical Incident Review  Team’s recommendations
or conclusions based on feedback from law enforcement or prosecuting authorities.
(2)(a) Prior  to publishing a final report  and, if applicable, any supplements to the final report
under this  section, the [ department] Children’s Advocate shall take into consideration the following:
(A) Whether publication of the report is likely to compromise an  ongoing investigation of a law
enforcement agency, after  the team has communicated with and obtained agreement of appropriate
law enforcement agency representatives and the district attorney;
[17]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Whether  the report can be modified so as to permit publication of the report without com-
promising a law enforcement agency investigation; and
(C) Whether, as determined by the  [ team with the advice and consultation of the Director of Hu-
man Services ] Children’s Advocate , the public  interest outweighs the potential consequences to a
law enforcement agency investigation as provided in ORS 192.345 (3).
(b) The [ director] Children’s Advocate  may extend the deadline for publication of  the final re-
port [ if the director determines that the report, even  if modified, will compromise a law enforcement
agency investigation and the public interest does not outweigh the potential  consequences. ] by not
more than 12 months if a  law enforcement agency asserts that publication of the report is
reasonably likely to compromise the  agency’s investigation and the Children’s Advocate de-
termines the public interest does not outweigh the potential consequences.
(3) Each final report must include, to the extent determined, at a minimum:
(a) A description of the critical incident.
(b) The date of the critical incident.
(c) The date the department first became aware of the fatality.
(d) The date the department or  a law enforcement agency caused an investigation to be made
under ORS 419B.020 to determine the nature and cause of the fatality.
(e) The date the findings in the case were entered under ORS 419B.026.
(f) The date the department notified the Children’s Advocate of the fatality.
(g) The date the Children’s Advocate first became aware of the fatality.
[(f)] (h) The date the [ department] Children’s Advocate  assigned the team.
[(g)] (i) The dates of, and number of members in attendance at, each meeting of the team.
[(h)] (j)  Whether the [ director] Children’s Advocate  appointed members of the public to  the
team.
[(i)] (k)  The date the team submitted the final report  to the department  and the Children’s
Advocate.
[(j)] (L)  A description of all department  contacts with the deceased child regarding the critical
incident, including contacts with  the deceased child’s siblings or the deceased child’s parents, foster
parents or other caretakers. The description of the department’s  contacts under this paragraph must
include a description of any relevant prior reports of abuse  the department received involving the
individuals identified in this paragraph. The description of relevant prior reports of abuse must in-
clude:
(A) A summary of the specific nature of any allegations of abuse;
(B) A summary of the assessment or investigation activities related to any allegations  of abuse;
and
(C) The disposition of the  reports, including whether the reports were assigned for assessment
or investigation.
[(k)] (m)  A description of any concerns the  team has regarding actions taken or not taken by
the department  or law enforcement agencies in response to the critical incident or to the events that
led to the critical incident.
[(L)] (n) Any recommendations for  improvements in the administration and oversight of the child
welfare system that are specific to the critical  incident and any historical information reviewed by
the team.
(4) A final report under this section may include the team’s recommendations regarding  training
and intervention to support the department personnel involved in responding to critical incidents.
[18]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) Each final report , including any supplement to the final report,  shall be written in a
manner that respects the dignity of the child, the child’s family and those involved  in the critical
incident case. Details about individuals involved in the case may not be included in the report unless
the details are relevant to:
(a) The history of  alleged abuse and neglect of the deceased child and the history of relevant
alleged abuse and neglect of other children  in the deceased child’s home at the time of the critical
incident and the deceased child’s siblings.
(b) The exposure of the deceased child or any other children in the deceased  child’s home at the
time of the critical incident to domestic violence or substance abuse.
(c) The history of the department’s involvement with the family.
(d) The goal of  constructively informing public policy related to child welfare, which may in-
clude public policies related to health care coordination, public health, suicide prevention, mental
health and addiction services, poverty, law enforcement, chronic neglect, prevention services or
other issues that affect the safety and well-being of Oregon families.
(6) A final report and any supplement to a final report  may not include  the names of any
person assigned to the team or any  personally identifiable information regarding any person in-
volved in the critical incident case, including but not limited to employees of the  department, the
Oregon Health Authority or law enforcement.
(7) Any statements contained in a final report , including any supplement to the final report,
or document created solely for the critical incident review process that  are or may be construed as
an admission of error, liability or violation  of law, policy or practice are not admissible as evidence
in any civil or administrative  proceeding. This restriction does not apply to any document that ex-
isted prior to its use and consideration in a critical incident review or that is  created independently
of the critical incident review process.
(8) If a Critical Incident Review Team submits a supplement  to a final report, the
Children’s Advocate must publish both the final report, in its original version, and the sup-
plement.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 418.816 is amended to read:
418.816. (1) After assigning a Critical Incident Review Team  under ORS 418.811, the [ Department
of Human Services ] Children’s Advocate  shall immediately make the  following information regard-
ing the critical incident available on the [ department’s] Children’s Advocate’s  website:
(a) The date of the critical incident and the age of the deceased child.
(b) Whether the child was in the custody of the Department  of Human Services  at the  time of
the critical incident or the fatality.
(c) Whether there was an open abuse investigation under ORS 419B.020 regarding the child  at
the time of the critical incident or the fatality.
(d) The date the [ department] Children’s Advocate  assigned the team.
(e) The due date for the team’s final report under ORS 418.813.
(2)(a) The  [department] Children’s Advocate shall publish the final report  and any supplement
to the final report  on the [ department’s] Children’s Advocate’s  website no later than 10 days after
the [ department] Children’s Advocate  receives the report  or supplement  from the team.
(b) The [ department] Children’s Advocate  may redact the  final report , including any supple-
ment to the final report,  for purposes of publication  only as necessary to remove any confidential
information or records that may not be disclosed under state or federal law.
(c) If the  [ Director of Human Services ] Children’s Advocate  delays the publication of a final
[19]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
report  under  ORS 418.813 (2)(b), the [ department] Children’s Advocate  shall publish on the
[department’s] Children’s Advocate’s  website:
(A) The status of and expected publication date for the report.
(B) [ Any ] All  information in the report that the [ department] Children’s Advocate  determines:
(i) Will not compromise a law enforcement agency investigation.
(ii) Does not require redaction under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
CHILDREN’S ADVOCACY ADVISORY BOARD
SECTION 21.
Establishment; membership. (1) There is established a Children’s  Advocacy
Advisory Board of 15 members to be appointed in the following manner:
(a) One person appointed by the Senate Majority Leader, who is  under 26 years of age
with current or previous experience in the foster care system;
(b) One person appointed by the Senate Minority  Leader, who is under 26 years of age
with current or previous experience in the foster care system;
(c) One person appointed by the House Majority Leader, who is under 26 years of age with
current or previous experience in the juvenile justice system;
(d) One person appointed  by the House Minority Leader, who is under 26 years of age
with current or previous experience in the juvenile justice system;
(e) One member appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, representing  a
citizen review board;
(f) One member appointed by the Governor who is a member of a  federally recognized
tribe with lived experience as a child or youth in the child welfare or juvenile justice system;
and
(g) Nine members appointed by the Governor as follows:
(A) One person, from among persons recommended by the Oregon  Public Defense Com-
mission, who is from an organization that provides legal  services to children and youth in
the child welfare system or the juvenile justice system;
(B) One person, from among persons recommended by the  Oregon Public Defense Com-
mission, who is an attorney representing children or youth in dependency proceedings;
(C) Two persons, from among persons recommended by the CASA Volunteer  Program,
who are court appointed special advocates;
(D) One person representing Disability Rights Oregon;
(E) Two persons, from among two persons recommended by each of the Commission  on
Black Affairs, the Commission on Hispanic Affairs and the  Commission on Asian and Pacific
Islander Affairs,  both of whom must represent an organization advocating with and for youth
and children of color in the child welfare or juvenile justice systems, with preference for in-
dividuals with  lived experience as children or youth of color in the child welfare or juvenile
justice systems;
(F) One person, from among  persons recommended by the children’s advocacy center
network; and
(G) One person representing a  state parent training and information center for special
education.
(2) Members of the board may not:
(a) Be state  employees, employees of county juvenile justice programs, members of the
[20]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
System of  Care Advisory Council or persons contracted, licensed, certified or otherwise au-
thorized by the Department of Human Services, Oregon Youth Authority, Oregon Health
Authority, System of Care Advisory  Council or county juvenile departments to provide ser-
vices, care or supervision to children; or
(b) Have any current role in  the licensing or certification of residential facilities, pro-
grams or agencies serving children.
(3) The  term of office of each member is four years. Before the expiration of the term
of a member, the appointing authority shall appoint a successor whose term begins  on July
1 next following. A member is eligible for reappointment. If there is a vacancy  for any cause,
the appointing authority shall make an appointment to  become immediately effective for the
unexpired term.
(4) The board shall select one of its members as chairperson and another as vice  chair-
person, for such terms and with duties and powers necessary for the  performance of the
functions of such offices as the board determines.
(5) A majority of the members of the  board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business. Decisions may be made by a majority of the quorum.
(6) The board shall  meet at least once each month at a place, day and hour determined
by the board. The board  also shall meet at other times and places specified by the call of the
chairperson or of a  majority of the members of the board. The board shall confer each month
with the Children’s Advocate. All meetings are subject to ORS 192.610 to 192.705.
(7) A member of the board is entitled  to compensation and expenses as provided in ORS
292.495.
SECTION 22.
Staggered initial term.  Notwithstanding the term of office specified in sec-
tion 21 of this 2025 Act, of the 15 members appointed to the  Children’s Advocacy Advisory
Board under section 21 of this 2025 Act, seven members shall serve for terms ending  June
30, 2028.
SECTION 23. Duties. The Children’s Advocacy Advisory Board shall:
(1) Monitor the Children’s Advocate; and
(2) Nominate, after  interviews and according to prescribed criteria, three persons for
appointment by the Governor  to fill the Children’s Advocate position or to fill a vacancy in
the position.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 24.
 ORS 21.007 is amended to read:
21.007. It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly that funding be provided to the  following
entities by appropriations each biennium to fund programs, services and  activities that were funded
through court fees before the 2011-2013 biennium:
(1) To the  counties of this state for the purposes of funding mediation services, conciliation
services and other services in domestic relations cases.
(2) To the counties of this state for the purposes of funding the operation of law libraries  or of
providing law library services.
(3) To Portland State  University and the University of Oregon to fund the programs and ex-
penses of the Mark O. Hatfield School of Government and  the University of Oregon School of Law
under ORS 36.100 to 36.238 and 183.502.
[21]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) To the Higher  Education Coordinating Commission to fund clinical legal education programs
at accredited institutions  of higher education that provide civil legal services to victims of domestic
violence, stalking or sexual assault.
(5) To the State Department of Agriculture for the purpose of funding mediation  programs es-
tablished by the department, other than individual farm credit mediations.
(6) To the Judicial Department for the  purposes of funding the appellate settlement program
established under ORS 2.560.
(7) To the [ Department of Human Services ] office of the Long Term Care Ombudsman  for the
funding of the [ Office] office of Children’s Advocate.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 417.805 is amended to read:
417.805. The [ Office] office of Children’s Advocate shall maintain  a state toll-free telephone line
to allow the public to:
(1) Access information and be referred to the appropriate services in matters of child abuse.
(2) Voice  concerns regarding the actions and conduct of the Department of Human Services re-
lating to child abuse.
(3) Have a single place to file complaints concerning the actions and conduct of the Department
of Human Services relating to child abuse.
SECTION 26.
 ORS 419B.035, as amended by section 68, chapter 73, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
419B.035. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS 192.001 to  192.170, 192.210 to 192.478 and
192.610 to 192.810 relating  to confidentiality and accessibility for public inspection of public records
and public documents, reports and records compiled under the provisions  of ORS 419B.010 to
419B.050 are confidential and may not be disclosed except as provided in this section.  The Depart-
ment of Human Services shall make the records available to:
(a) Any law enforcement agency or a child abuse registry in any other state for  the purpose of
subsequent investigation of child abuse;
(b) Any physician, physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505  to 677.525 or nurse practi-
tioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390, at the request of  the physician, physician associate
or nurse practitioner, regarding  any child brought to the physician, physician associate or nurse
practitioner or coming before the physician, physician associate or nurse practitioner for  examina-
tion, care or treatment;
(c) Attorneys of record for the child or child’s parent or guardian in any juvenile court pro-
ceeding;
(d) Citizen review boards established by the Judicial  Department for the purpose of periodically
reviewing the status of  children, youths and adjudicated youths under the jurisdiction of the juvenile
court under ORS 419B.100 and 419C.005. Citizen review boards may make such records  available to
participants in case reviews;
(e) A court appointed special advocate  in any juvenile court proceeding in which it is alleged
that a child has been subjected to child abuse or neglect;
(f) The Department of Early  Learning and Care for the purpose of carrying out the functions
of the department,  including the certification, registration or regulation of child care facilities and
child care providers and the administration of enrollment in the Central Background Registry;
(g) The [ Office] office of Children’s Advocate;
(h) The Teacher Standards and  Practices Commission for investigations conducted under ORS
339.390 or 342.176 involving any child or any student;
[22]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) Any person, upon request  to the Department of Human Services, if the reports or records
requested regard  an incident in which a child, as the result of abuse, died or suffered serious phys-
ical injury as defined in ORS 161.015. Reports or  records disclosed under this paragraph must be
disclosed in accordance with ORS 192.311 to 192.478;
(j) The Department of Early Learning and Care for purposes of  applications described in ORS
329A.030 (11)(c)(G) to (J);
(k) With respect to a report of abuse occurring  at a school or in an educational setting that
involves a child with a disability, Disability Rights Oregon;
(L) The Department of Education for purposes of investigations conducted under ORS 339.391;
(m) An education provider for the purpose of making determinations under ORS 339.388; and
(n) A national nonprofit organization designated by  the Department of Human Services that
provides assistance with locating, recovering or providing services to children  or youth determined
by the department to be missing.
(2)(a) When  disclosing reports and records pursuant to subsection (1)(i) of this section, the De-
partment of  Human Services may exempt from disclosure the names, addresses and other identifying
information about other children, witnesses, victims or other persons named  in the report or record
if the department determines, in written findings, that  the safety or well-being of a person named in
the report  or record may be jeopardized by disclosure of the names, addresses or other identifying
information, and if that concern outweighs the public’s interest  in the disclosure of that information.
(b) If the Department of Human Services does not have  a report or record of abuse regarding
a child  who, as the result of abuse, died or suffered serious physical injury as defined in ORS
161.015, the department may disclose that information.
(3) The Department of Human Services may make reports and records compiled under the  pro-
visions of ORS 419B.010 to 419B.050 available to any person,  administrative hearings officer, court,
agency,  organization  or other entity when the department determines that such disclosure is neces-
sary to administer its child welfare services and is in the best interests of the affected child,  or that
such disclosure is necessary to investigate, prevent or treat child  abuse and neglect, to protect
children from abuse and neglect or for research  when the Director of Human Services gives prior
written approval. The Department of Human Services shall adopt rules setting forth  the procedures
by which it will make the disclosures  authorized under this subsection or subsection (1) or (2) of this
section. The name, address and other identifying information about  the person who made the report
may not be disclosed pursuant to this subsection and subsection (1) of this section.
(4) A law enforcement agency may make reports and records compiled under  the provisions of
ORS 419B.010 to 419B.050 available to other law enforcement agencies, district attorneys, city at-
torneys with criminal prosecutorial functions and the Attorney General when the law  enforcement
agency determines that disclosure is  necessary for the investigation or enforcement of laws relating
to child abuse and neglect or necessary to determine a claim for crime victim  compensation under
ORS 147.005 to 147.367.
(5)(a) A law enforcement agency, upon completing an investigation and  closing the file in a
specific case relating to child abuse or neglect, shall make reports and records in the case  available
upon request to:
(A) Any law enforcement agency or community corrections  agency in this state, to the Depart-
ment of Corrections, to the Oregon Youth Authority or to the State  Board of Parole and Post-Prison
Supervision for the purpose  of managing and supervising offenders in custody or on probation,
parole, post-prison supervision or other form of conditional or supervised release; and
[23]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission for investigations conducted under ORS
339.390 and 342.176.
(b) A law enforcement agency may make reports and records compiled under the  provisions of
ORS 419B.010 to 419B.050  available to the Oregon Youth Authority, the Teacher Standards and
Practices Commission for investigations conducted under ORS 339.390 and 342.176, law  enforcement,
community corrections, corrections or parole agencies in an open case when the law enforcement
agency determines that the disclosure will not interfere with an ongoing investigation in the case.
(c) The name, address and other identifying information about the  person who made the report
may not be disclosed under this subsection or subsection (6)(b) of this section.
(6)(a) Any record  made available to a law enforcement agency or community corrections agency
in this state, to the Department of Corrections, the Oregon Youth Authority, the State  Board of
Parole and Post-Prison Supervision or the  Teacher Standards and Practices Commission or to a
physician, physician associate or nurse practitioner in this state,  as authorized by subsections (1)
to (5) of this section, shall be kept  confidential by the agency, department, board, commission, phy-
sician, physician associate or nurse practitioner. Any record or report disclosed by the Department
of Human Services to other persons or entities pursuant to subsections (1) and (3)  of this section
shall be kept confidential.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) A law enforcement agency, a community corrections agency, the Department of Corrections,
the Oregon Youth Authority and  the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision may disclose
records made available to them under subsection (5) of this section to  each other, to law enforce-
ment, community corrections, corrections and parole agencies of other states and to  authorized
treatment providers for  the purpose of managing and supervising offenders in custody or on pro-
bation, parole, post-prison supervision or other form of conditional or supervised release.
(B) The Department of Corrections and the Oregon Youth  Authority may disclose records made
available to them under  subsection (5) of this section regarding a person in the custody of the De-
partment of Corrections or the Oregon Youth Authority to each  other, to the court, to the district
attorney and to the person’s attorney for the purpose of the person’s hearing  under ORS 420A.200
to 420A.206.
(C) A person may disclose records made available to  the person under subsection (1)(i) of this
section if the records are disclosed for the purpose of advancing the public interest.
(7) Except as provided by  ORS 339.389, an officer or employee of the Department of Human
Services or of a law enforcement agency  or any person or entity to whom disclosure is made pur-
suant to subsections (1) to (6) of this section may not release any information not  authorized by
subsections (1) to (6) of this section.
(8) A record of sexual orientation, gender identity or gender expression, as defined in  ORS
409.225, is exempt from disclosure under subsection (1) of this section unless:
(a) The department determines, in written findings, that failure to disclose the record  is rea-
sonably likely to jeopardize the child’s safety or well-being;
(b) The department determines, in written findings, that  disclosure of the record is necessary to
provide services to the child or the child’s family; or
(c) The child consents to the disclosure.
(9) As used in this section, “law  enforcement agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS
181A.010.
(10) A person who violates subsection (6)(a) or (7) of this section commits a Class A violation.
[24]
SB 1159
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
TRANSITION PROVISIONS
SECTION 27.
New Children’s Advocate.  The new Children’s Advocate may be appointed
before the  operative date specified in section 29 of this 2025 Act and may take any action
before that date that is necessary to enable the Children’s  Advocate to exercise, on and after
the operative date specified in section 29 of this  2025 Act, the duties, functions and powers
of the Children’s Advocate as described in sections 1 to 10 of  this 2025 Act and the amend-
ments to ORS 21.007, 409.185, 417.805, 417.810,  417.815, 417.825, 418.201, 418.811, 418.813, 418.816,
419B.005 and 419B.035 by sections 11 to 20 and 24 to 26 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 28. Transitional authority.  Any  transfer of duties, functions, powers, records,
property, employees and moneys by sections 1 to 10 of this 2025 Act and the  amendments to
ORS 21.007, 409.185, 417.805, 417.810, 417.815, 417.825, 418.201, 418.811, 418.813, 418.816, 419B.005
and 419B.035 by sections 11 to  20 and 24 to 26 of this 2025 Act does not become operative until
the new Children’s Advocate has been appointed and confirmed. Until appointment  and
confirmation of the new Children’s Advocate, the old Children’s  Advocate and Director of
Human Services shall continue to perform any  of their respective duties and functions
transferred to the  new Children’s Advocate by sections 1 to 10 of this 2025 Act and the
amendments to ORS 21.007,  409.185, 417.805, 417.810, 417.815, 417.825, 418.201, 418.811, 418.813,
418.816, 419B.005 and 419B.035 by sections 11 to 20 and 24 to 26 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 29. Operative date. Except as provided in sections 27 and 28 of this  2025 Act,
sections 2 to 10 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 21.007, 409.185,  417.805, 417.810,
417.815, 417.825, 418.201, 418.811, 418.813, 418.816, 419B.005 and 419B.035 by sections 11 to 20
and 24 to 26 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 30.
(1) All appointments  to the Children’s Advocacy Advisory Board under
section 21 of this 2025 Act must be completed by December 1, 2025.
(2) The Children’s Advocacy Advisory Board shall submit its  list of three nominees for
the Children’s Advocate position to the Governor by July 1, 2026.
(3) The new Children’s Advocate shall assume responsibilities for  the Critical Incident
Review Teams under ORS 418.806 to 418.816 no later than January 1, 2027.
SECTION 31. Captions. The unit and section captions used in this 2025 Act are provided
only for the convenience of the reader  and do not become part of the statutory law of this
state or express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 32. Effective date.  This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on
which the 2025 regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[25]