Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $2,000,000, for distribution to the High Desert
Partnership:
(1) To design and implement projects for restoring or maintaining wet  meadow, wetland
and lake conditions for  birds, farmers and ranchers on the Silvies River Floodplain, on the
Donner und Blitzen River Floodplain, at Malheur Lake  and in the Malheur National Wildlife
Refuge;
(2) For research and public engagement  related to the projects described in subsection
(1) of this section; and
(3) To support collaborative  partnerships related to the projects described in subsection
(1) of this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 763
HB 3222
1
2
3
4
SECTION 2.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]