Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 2. (1) Every two years, the Oregon Health Authority shall recalculate  and re-
vise the reimbursement rates in the medical assistance program  for air ambulance services
in accordance with the national Ambulance Inflation Factor under  section 1834(l)(3)(B) of the
Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395m).
(2) A coordinated care organization shall provide reimbursement  for air ambulance ser-
vices at the rates established under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 3. Section 2  of this 2025 Act applies to contracts between a coordinated care
organization and the Oregon Health Authority entered  into, amended or renewed on or after
the effective date of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1672