Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 10.030 is amended to read:
10.030. (1) Except as otherwise specifically provided by statute, the opportunity for  jury service
may not be denied or limited on the basis of race, religion, sex, sexual  orientation, gender identity,
national origin, age, income, occupation or any other factor that discriminates against a cognizable
group in this state.
(2) Any person is eligible to act as a juror in a civil trial unless the person:
(a) Is not a citizen of the United States;
(b) Does not live in the county in which summoned for jury service;
(c) Is less than 18 years of age; [ or]
(d) Has had rights and privileges withdrawn and not restored under ORS 137.281 ; or
(e) Is a current member of the Legislative Assembly .
(3)(a) Any person is eligible to act as a grand juror, or as  a juror in a criminal trial, unless the
person:
(A) Is not a citizen of the United States;
(B) Does not live in the county in which summoned for jury service;
(C) Is less than 18 years of age;
(D) Has had rights and privileges withdrawn and not restored under ORS 137.281;
(E) Has been convicted of a felony or served a felony sentence within the  15 years immediately
preceding the date the person is required to report for jury service; [ or]
(F) Has been convicted of a misdemeanor involving violence or dishonesty,  or has served a
misdemeanor sentence based on a misdemeanor involving violence or dishonesty, within  the five
years immediately preceding the date the person is required to report for jury service ; or
(G) Is a current member of the Legislative Assembly .
(b) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Felony sentence” includes any  incarceration, post-prison supervision, parole or probation
imposed upon conviction of a felony or served as a result of conviction of a felony.
(B) “Has been convicted of a felony” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.270.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2672
HB 2779
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
(C) “Misdemeanor sentence” includes any incarceration or probation  imposed upon conviction
of a misdemeanor or served as a result of conviction of a misdemeanor.
(4) A person who is blind, hard of hearing or speech impaired or who has  a physical disability
is not ineligible to act as a juror and may not be excluded from a jury  list or jury service on the
basis of blindness, hearing or speech impairment or physical disability alone.
(5) A person is ineligible to act as a juror in any circuit  court of this state within 24 months
after being discharged  from jury service in a federal court in this state or circuit court of this state
unless that person’s service as a juror is required because of a need for additional jurors.
[2]