Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
chapter 317.
SECTION 2. As used in this section and section 3 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Coastal fishing boat” means a commercial fishing vessel that holds  a valid boat li-
cense issued under ORS 508.260 and a permit issued under ORS chapter 508 or under the laws
of the State of Washington or California that is valid for operation in the ocean fishery.
(2) “Farm products” has the meaning given that term in ORS 576.006.
(3) “Financial institution” has the meaning given that term in ORS 314.610.
(4) “Interest” means interest on indebtedness attributed to Oregon and incurred  in the
ordinary course of  the active conduct of any business or interest on indebtedness incurred
that is secured by a single family residence.
(5) “Qualified agricultural real estate loan” means  a loan made on real property that is
substantially used for the production of one or more farm products and that:
(a) Has a maturity of not less than five years and not more than 40 years;
(b) Is  secured by a first lien interest in real estate, except that the loans may be secured
by a second lien interest if the financial institution also holds the first lien  on the property;
and
(c) Has an outstanding loan  balance when made that is less than 85 percent of the ap-
praised value of the  real estate, except that a loan for which private mortgage insurance is
obtained may  exceed 85 percent of the appraised value of the real estate to the extent the
loan amount in excess of 85 percent is covered by the insurance.
(6) “Qualified coastal fishing boat loan” means  a loan for the purchase or improvement
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1058
SB 563
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
of a coastal fishing boat that has an  outstanding loan balance when made that is less than
85 percent of the appraised value of the coastal  fishing boat and is made to an Oregon resi-
dent.
(7) “Qualified net interest income” means total net interest received from:
(a) Qualified agricultural real estate loans;
(b) Qualified coastal fishing boat loans; and
(c) Qualified single family residence loans.
(8) “Qualified  single family residence loan” means a loan secured by a single family resi-
dence that is substantially used for the purchase or improvement of the residence.
(9) “Single family residence” means a residence that:
(a) Is the principal residence of its occupant;
(b) Is located in Oregon:
(A) In a rural area as defined by the United States Department of  Agriculture that is not
within a metropolitan statistical area; or
(B) In a city that has a population of fewer than 2,500 inhabitants according  to the most
recent federal decennial census; and
(c) Is purchased or improved with the proceeds of a loan made  by a financial institution.
SECTION 3.
To derive Oregon taxable income, there shall  be subtracted from federal
taxable income that amount of interest income received by  a financial institution that is
determined by taking the ratio of  the qualified net interest income received by the financial
institution over the total interest income  earned by the financial institution, multiplied by
the total net income of the financial institution as determined before taking the subtraction
under this section.
SECTION 4.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2025  Act apply to tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.
SECTION 5. Section 6 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 317A.100 to
317A.158.
SECTION 6. (1) The definitions provided by section 2 of this 2025  Act apply to this sec-
tion.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 317A.100, an amount equal  to the amount calculated as a sub-
traction under section  3 of this 2025 Act is excluded from the definition of commercial ac-
tivity and is exempt from the tax imposed under ORS 317A.116.
SECTION 7. Section 6 of this 2025  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.
SECTION 8. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]