Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of State Police, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount  of $_______, for use by the State Fire Marshal in making block
grants to rural fire districts within Josephine County that are newly  formed during the
biennium, if any,  for any purposes the State Fire Marshal deems consistent with fire district
functions under ORS chapter 476 or 478.
SECTION 2. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4338