Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Business Development Department may  conduct a survey of
existing state loan and grant programs to identify gaps in access to funds for economic de-
velopment. If the department conducts the survey, the department shall submit a report  of
its findings, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245,  to the interim committees of the Leg-
islative Assembly related to economic development not later than September 15,  2026. The
report may include recommendations for legislation.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1313