Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 757.
SECTION 2. The following costs and expenses that a public utility incurs  are not recov-
erable from public utility customers:
(1) Costs and expenses that are, or are associated with, a criminal or civil fine  or penalty
that is based on negligence or a higher degree of fault on the part of the public utility.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3378
HB 3854
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Costs and expenses that are, or are associated  with, a judgment or settlement from
a civil action  that is based on negligence or a higher degree of fault on the part of the public
utility.
SECTION 3.
(1) As used in this section, “investor-owned utility”  means a public utility,
as defined in ORS 757.005, that provides electric power and is regulated by the Public Utility
Commission under ORS chapter 757.
(2) An investor-owned utility shall provide an incident report to the Department of the
State Fire Marshal  and the State Forestry Department whenever a fire-related incident oc-
curs that  is caused by an electric power line that is under the management, operation,
ownership or control of the investor-owned utility, and the fire-related incident occurred
within this state or posed a risk to the health or safety of residences within this state.
(3) An investor-owned utility shall provide a  copy of an incident report that is provided
under this section to the Public Utility Commission and make public the incident report.
(4) The Department of the State Fire Marshal and the State Forestry  Department may
each, by rule, prescribe the form and content of incident reports that must be provided to
the respective department under this section.
(5) An incident report provided under this section may be used  as evidence, subject to
the Oregon Evidence  Code, in any civil, criminal or enforcement action arising out of any
matter related to the fire-related incident.
(6) The Department of the State Fire Marshal, State Forestry Department and  Public
Utility Commission may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 477.089 is amended to read:
477.089. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Economic and property damage” means the sum of:
(A)(i) [ The lesser of ] The difference in the fair market value of  property immediately before and
immediately after a wildfire ; or
(ii) The cost of restoring property to  the condition the property was in immediately before a
wildfire; and
(B) Any other objectively verifiable monetary losses.
(b) “Fair market value” means  the amount, as determined by a state certified appraiser  or other
objectively verifiable information, that a willing buyer would  pay to a willing seller for property
in an arm’s-length transaction if both parties were fully informed about  all advantages and disad-
vantages of the property and neither party is acting under a compulsion to buy or sell.
(c) “Forest  tree species” means a tree species that is capable of producing logs, fiber or other
wood materials that are suitable for the production of lumber, sheeting, pulp, firewood  or other
commercial forest products.
(d) “State certified appraiser” means  an individual who has been certified as a state certified
appraiser under ORS 674.310 and is qualified to appraise the property that  is the subject of a fair
market value determination.
(e) “Wildfire” means a fire that:
(A) Results from a violation of this chapter  or of rules adopted under ORS 526.016 or 526.041;
or
(B) Originated on land used or capable of being used for growing  forest tree species regardless
of the existing use of the land.
(2) Except as provided in ORS 477.092  and 477.095, in a civil action for property damage caused
[2]
HB 3854
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
by a wildfire, the recoverable  economic damages are:
(a) The amount  of economic and property damages, if the wildfire did not occur as the result
of recklessness, gross negligence, willfulness or malice; or
(b) Twice the  amount of economic and property damages, if the wildfire occurred as the result
of recklessness, gross negligence, willfulness or malice.
(3) Except as provided in ORS 477.095  and subject to any other provision of this chapter limiting
the recovery of fire fighting costs, a person who causes a wildfire  is liable to any person or entity
for the full amount of all expenses incurred by the person or entity in fighting the wildfire.
(4) The remedies provided under this section are in  addition to any available criminal or civil
penalties that may be assessed for the violation of a statute or rule but, subject to Article I, section
10, of the Oregon Constitution, are the exclusive remedies  for recovering economic damages  for
damages or injury to property caused by a wildfire. This subsection does not:
(a) Prohibit the bringing of any cross claim, counterclaim or joinder of parties;
(b) Prohibit the institution  of a suit under ORS 496.705 for the recovery of damages for the un-
lawful taking of wildlife; [ or]
(c) Affect the applicability of ORS 31.600 to an action ; or
(d) Affect any other available remedies, including the recovery of noneconomic damages .
(5) This section does not create a new cause of action or alter any existing cause of action.
SECTION 5.
(1) The amendments to ORS 477.089 by  section 4 of this 2025 Act apply to
claims that arise before, on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act and  to actions in
which a court has not entered a final judgment before the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(2) As used in subsection (1) of this section, “final judgment” means a judgment that  is
not subject to further appeal or review or for which the time to file an appeal  has expired
without a party filing an appeal.
[3]