Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 238.420 is amended to read:
238.420. (1) As used in this section, “eligible retired member” means:
(a) A retired member of the Public Employees Retirement System who is retired for service  or
disability, is receiving a retirement allowance or benefit under the system, had eight years or  more
of qualifying  service in the system at the time of retirement or is receiving a disability retirement
allowance including a pension computed as if the member  had eight years or more of creditable
service in the system at the time of retirement, and is eligible for federal Medicare coverage; or
(b) A person who is a surviving spouse or  dependent of a deceased eligible retired member as
provided in paragraph (a)  of this subsection at the time of death, who is eligible for federal Medicare
coverage and who:
(A) Is receiving a retirement allowance or benefit under the system; or
(B) Was covered at the time of the retired member’s death by the retired member’s  health in-
surance contracted for under ORS 238.410, and the member retired before May 1, 1991.
(2) For purposes  of subsection (1)(a) of this section, “qualifying service” means creditable service
in the system and any periods of employment  with an employer participating in the system required
of the employee before becoming a member of the system.
(3) Of the monthly cost of coverage  for an eligible retired member under a health care insurance
contract that provides [ coverage supplemental to federal ] Medicare or Medicare Supplement cover-
age entered into under ORS 238.410, an amount equal to  [ $60 or the total monthly cost of that cov-
erage] 100 percent of the five-year average of monthly cost of coverage among all carriers
contracted by the Public Employees Retirement Board, as calculated  by the board, or the
actual total monthly cost of that coverage to an eligible retired  member , whichever is less,
shall be paid from the Retirement Health  Insurance Account established by subsection (4) of this
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 468
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section,  and  any monthly cost in excess of [ $60] that amount  shall be paid by the eligible retired
member in the manner provided in ORS 238.410 (4). The board shall adopt rules establishing  the
frequency by which the subsidy under this subsection is adjusted.  Any amount paid under this
subsection shall be exempt from all state, county  and municipal taxes imposed on the eligible retired
member.
(4) Pursuant to section 401(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, the Retirement Health  Insurance
Account is established within the Public Employees Retirement Fund, separate and  distinct from the
General Fund. Interest earned by  the account shall be credited to the account. All moneys in the
account are continuously appropriated  to the Public Employees Retirement Board and may be used
only to pay costs of health care insurance contract coverage under subsection (3)  of this section,
paying the administrative costs incurred by  the board under this section and investment of moneys
in the account under any law of this state specifically authorizing that investment.
(5) The Retirement Health Insurance Account shall be funded by employer contributions. Each
public employer that is a member of the system  shall transmit to the board such amounts as the
board determines  to be actuarially necessary to fund the liabilities of the account. The level of em-
ployer contributions shall be established by the board using the same actuarial  assumptions it uses
to determine employer contribution rates to  the Public Employees Retirement Fund. The amounts
shall be transmitted at the same time and in the same manner as contributions for pension  benefits
are transmitted under ORS 238.225.
(6) As provided in section 401(h)(5)  of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, upon satisfaction of
all liabilities for providing benefits described in subsection (1) of this section, any amount  remaining
in the Retirement Health Insurance Account shall  be returned to the employers participating in the
retirement system on an equitable basis as determined by the board.
(7) No member of the  system shall have an interest in the Retirement Health Insurance Account.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 238A.050 is amended to read:
238A.050. (1) The Oregon Public Service  Retirement Plan is part of the Public Employees Re-
tirement System and is administered by the Public Employees Retirement Board.
(2) ORS 238.008, 238.225, 238.229, 238.235, 238.285,  238.410,  238.415, 238.420,  238.445, 238.447,
238.450, 238.455, 238.458, 238.460, 238.465, 238.470, 238.600, 238.601, 238.605, 238.610, 238.615, 238.618,
238.630, 238.635, 238.640, 238.645, 238.655, 238.660, 238.661, 238.665, 238.675, 238.692, 238.694, 238.695,
238.696, 238.698, 238.700, 238.705, 238.710 and 238.715 apply to the Oregon Public  Service Retirement
Plan.
(3) The Oregon Investment Council shall invest  the assets of the Oregon Public Service Retire-
ment Plan as a part of the  Public Employees Retirement Fund. Except as provided by subsection (4)
of this section,  the investment of Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan assets is subject to the
provisions of ORS 293.701 to 293.857. The Oregon Investment Council may invest assets of the indi-
vidual account program and pension program  differently than the other assets of the Public Em-
ployees Retirement System.
(4) Investment of the assets of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan is  not subject to the
limitations imposed by ORS 293.726 (6).
(5) The board may contract with a private provider for  the administration of the individual ac-
count program. The board is not subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 279A  or 279B in awarding
a contract under the provisions of this subsection. The board  shall establish procedures for inviting
proposals and awarding contracts under this subsection.
[2]