Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 725.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Cash sale price” has the meaning given that term in ORS 83.510.
(b) “Financing agency” has the meaning given to that term in ORS 83.510.
(c) “Motor vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 83.510.
(d) “Motor vehicle dealer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 83.510.
(e) “Retail lease” has the meaning given that term in ORS 83.510.
(f) “Retail installment sale” has the meaning given that term in ORS 83.510.
(2) A licensee, motor vehicle  dealer or financing agency may not charge or collect in
connection with a consumer finance loan  made for the purpose of purchasing a motor vehi-
cle, or in connection  with a retail lease or retail installment sale, an amount that exceeds
the greater of $150, or one half of one percent of the lesser  of the cash sale price of the
motor vehicle or the  amount of the consumer finance loan, as the sum of any or all of the
following fees:
(a) An origination fee;
(b) An acceptance fee;
(c) A contract fee;
(d) A processing fee; or
(e) Any other fee or charge that is not a payment of interest or  a repayment of the
principal on the consumer finance loan or is not a late fee or penalty that  is related to a
borrower’s failure to timely pay interest or repay principal on the consumer finance loan.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act  applies to consumer finance loans for the purchase
of motor vehicles and to a retail  installment sale or retail lease that a person makes or re-
finances on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3490