Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon State University Extension Service and the College  of Agri-
cultural Sciences of Oregon State University shall conduct a study of the fate  and transport
of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) found in biosolids that are applied
to agricultural fields across this  state. In conducting the study under this section, the ex-
tension service and  the college shall collaborate with the Department of Environmental
Quality and Oregon wastewater service providers to:
(a) Identify PFAS concentrations  in biosolids produced by selected wastewater treatment
facilities in this state;
(b) Compare the PFAS concentrations  identified under paragraph (a) of this subsection
to PFAS concentrations in the  selected agricultural fields where biosolids have been applied
as a soil amendment;
(c) Examine the potential for PFAS to leach into ground water; and
(d) Examine PFAS uptake in representative crops from various  ecosystems in this state.
(2) The extension service  and college shall submit a report in the manner provided by
ORS 192.245 to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to agriculture no
later than December 15, 2025.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium  ending June 30,
2025, out of the General Fund, $500,000 for distribution to Oregon State University  to carry
out the study under section 1 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 4. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 44
HB 4049
1
[2]