Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Fire Marshal, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount  of $984,500, for distribution to the Illinois Valley Fire District, which the
district may expend for purposes related to the district’s water supply and  treatment of
sewage.
SECTION 2. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1165