Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Health Authority shall take all steps  practicable to address the
challenges faced by hospitals in discharging patients with complex  health or behavioral
health needs to  appropriate post-acute care settings. The challenges include, but are not
limited to:
(1) Hospital capacity and workforce shortages;
(2) The need to screen patients to determine their financial needs and service needs;
(3) The limited reimbursement paid by the authority for skilled nursing care;
(4) The lack of placement options for patients with complex needs; and
(5) The lack of available public guardians for patients who are incapacitated.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 87