Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Veterans’ Benefits Economic Development Fund is  established in the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Amounts credited  to the
Veterans’  Benefits  Economic Development Fund are continuously appropriated to the De-
partment of Veterans’ Affairs for the purpose described in subsection (4) of this section.
(2) Amounts in the  fund may be invested as provided in ORS 293.701 to 293.857, and in-
terest earned on the moneys in the fund must be credited to the fund.
(3) The department shall credit to the fund any moneys allocated to the fund and any
other moneys appropriated for transfer to the fund.
(4) The department shall use moneys in  the fund to further economic development by
assisting veterans, spouses and dependents  of veterans, or survivors of veterans to apply for
federal and state veterans’ benefits and aid.
SECTION 2. (1) Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2035.
(2) Unobligated moneys remaining in the Veterans’ Benefits Economic Development Fund
on the date described in subsection (1) of this section  revert to the Administrative Services
Economic Development Fund established in ORS 461.540.
SECTION 3. There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, from the  Admin-
istrative Services Economic Development Fund established in ORS 461.540, to the  Depart-
ment of Veterans’ Affairs, the amount  of $10 million for deposit in the Veterans’ Benefits
Economic Development Fund established in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1517