Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 418.017 is amended to read:
418.017. (1)(a) A parent may leave an infant at an authorized facility [ in the physical  custody of
an agent, employee, physician or other medical professional working  at the authorized facility ] if the
infant:
[(a)] (A)  Is 60 days of age or younger as determined to  a reasonable degree of medical certainty;
and
[(b)] (B)  Has no evidence of abuse.
(b) A parent leaving an infant under this section must leave the infant:
(A) In the physical custody of an agent, employee, physician or other medical professional
working at the authorized facility; or
(B) In a newborn safety device described in subsection (7) of this section.
(2) A parent leaving an infant under this section is not required to  provide any identifying in-
formation about the infant or the parent.
(3) An agent,  employee, physician or other medical professional working at an authorized facility
[shall receive ] must  accept an infant [ brought to ] left with the authorized facility under this section.
(4) If acting in good faith in receiving an infant, an authorized facility receiving an infant under
this section and any agent, employee, physician or other medical professional working at the  au-
thorized facility are immune from any criminal or civil liability that otherwise might result from
their actions relating to receiving the infant. A city, county or  other political subdivision of this
state that operates a sheriff’s office, police station or fire station that receives an infant under  this
section is immune from any criminal or civil liability that otherwise might  result from the actions
taken by its employees or agents in receiving the infant.
(5) When an infant has been left at an authorized facility as provided in this section:
(a) The authorized facility shall notify the Department of Human Services that an infant has
been left at the facility as provided in  subsection (1) of this section no later than 24 hours after
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 948
HB 2901
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
receiving the infant.
(b) The infant is deemed abandoned for purposes  of ORS 419B.100, and the department is deemed
to have protective custody of the infant under ORS 419B.150 from the  moment the infant was left
at the facility. The department shall comply with the applicable provisions of ORS chapter 419B with
regard to the infant.
(6) The authorized facility shall release the infant  to the department when release is appropriate
considering the infant’s medical condition  and shall provide the department with all information the
facility has regarding the infant.
(7)(a) An authorized facility may install a newborn safety device if:
(A) The device is located in an area at the authorized facility that  is conspicuous and
visible to the employees of the authorized facility;
(B) The device is equipped with a dual alarm system; and
(C) The authorized facility is staffed 24 hours per day by a physician or other  medical
professional.
(b) An authorized facility that installs a newborn safety device shall:
(A) Be responsible for the cost of the installation and maintenance of the device; and
(B) Ensure the dual  alarm system is in working order by testing the system no less than
once per week and visually inspecting the system no less than two times per day.
[(7)] (8) As used in this section:
(a) “Abuse” has the meaning given that term in ORS 419B.005.
(b) “Authorized facility” means a hospital as described in  ORS 442.015, freestanding birthing
center as defined in ORS 442.015, physician’s office, sheriff’s office, police station or fire station.
(c) “Physician” means a person licensed by the Oregon  Medical Board to practice medicine and
surgery or a naturopathic physician  licensed under ORS chapter 685 to practice naturopathic med-
icine.
[2]