Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(b) “Provider” means an individual who is licensed, certified or  otherwise authorized to
provide health care services in this state.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall expedite the  process for enrolling providers in the
medical assistance program by utilizing separate workflows to process:
(a) Initial applications for enrollment;
(b) Administrative changes to a provider’s enrollment, including a change in the
provider’s contact information or employer; and
(c) Credentialing changes to a provider’s enrollment, including  updates to a provider’s
licensure or certification.
(3) If the authority approves an application in error, the authority shall notify  both the
applicant contact and the applicant’s employer of the error.
SECTION 2.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(b) “Provider” means an individual who is licensed, certified or  otherwise authorized to
provide health care services in this state.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall study the feasibility of developing and implement-
ing an automated, online tool for applications to enroll providers in the medical  assistance
program that would:
(a) Simplify the processes for initial provider enrollment applications  and changes to a
provider’s enrollment;
(b) Utilize rule-based programming to ensure that an  application includes all required
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1548
HB 3229
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
information before the application may be submitted; and
(c) Enable providers and  provider organizations to view the status of a pending applica-
tion.
(3) The authority shall submit a report  on the study conducted under this section, in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, to the  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to health no later than December 15, 2026, and shall include recommendations about:
(a) Potential short-term improvements that could be made by modifying existing software
or acquiring new tools;
(b) The availability of federal funding to develop and implement the  application tool de-
scribed in this section; and
(c) Potential ways that the application tool described in this section could  be designed
and utilized to expedite the processing of provider enrollment applications.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended  for funding temporary staff
positions at the authority to reduce to  14 days the processing time for applications submitted
by health care providers seeking to enroll in the medical assistance program.
SECTION 5.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Coordinated care organization” and “medical assistance” have  the meanings given
those terms in ORS 414.025.
(b) “Provider” means an individual who is licensed, certified or  otherwise authorized to
provide health care services in this state.
(2) A coordinated care organization shall review and render  a decision on a provider’s
request to contract with the coordinated care organization as an in-network  provider within
30 days after the coordinated care organization receives the request.
(3) For covered services provided  by a contracted provider to a medical assistance re-
cipient, a coordinated  care organization shall reimburse the provider retroactively to the
date that the provider submitted to the Oregon  Health Authority a complete application for
enrollment in the medical assistance program if on that date the provider had met all appli-
cable enrollment requirements.
SECTION 6.
Section 5 of this 2025 Act applies to contracts between  a coordinated care
organization and a provider  entered into, amended or renewed on or after the effective date
of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]