Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The provisions of the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services  Personnel
Licensure Interstate Compact are as follows:
RECOGNITION OF EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES PERSONNEL LICENSURE
INTERSTATE COMPACT
(“REPLICA”)
EMS PERSONNEL LICENSURE INTERSTATE COMPACT
SECTION 1. PURPOSE
In order to protect the public through verification of competency and ensure  account-
ability for patient care related activities, all  states license emergency medical services (EMS)
personnel, such as emergency medical  technicians (EMTs), advanced EMTs and paramedics.
This Compact is intended  to facilitate the day-to-day movement of EMS personnel across
state boundaries in the performance of their EMS duties  as assigned by an appropriate au-
thority and authorize state EMS offices  to afford immediate legal recognition to EMS per-
sonnel licensed in a member state. This Compact recognizes that states have a  vested
interest in protecting the public’s health and  safety through their licensing and regulation
of EMS personnel and that such state regulation shared among the  member states will best
protect public health and safety. This Compact is designed to achieve the following  purposes
and objectives:
1. Increase public access to EMS personnel;
2. Enhance the states’ ability to protect the public’s health and  safety, especially patient
safety;
3. Encourage the cooperation of  member states in the areas of EMS personnel licensure
and regulation;
4. Support licensing of military members who are separating from an active  duty tour,
and their spouses;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 200
SB 857
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
5. Facilitate the exchange of information between  member states regarding EMS per-
sonnel licensure, adverse action and significant investigatory information;
6. Promote compliance with the laws governing EMS personnel practice in each  member
state;  and
7. Invest all member  states with the authority to hold EMS personnel accountable
through the mutual recognition of member state licenses.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
In this compact:
A. “Advanced Emergency  Medical Technician (AEMT)” means an individual licensed with
cognitive knowledge and a scope of practice  that corresponds to that level in the National
EMS Education Standards and National EMS Scope of Practice Model.
B. “Adverse action” means  any administrative, civil, equitable or criminal action per-
mitted by a state’s laws which may be imposed against  licensed EMS personnel by a state
EMS authority  or state court including, but not limited to, actions against an individual’s
license such as revocation,  suspension, probation, consent agreement, monitoring or other
limitation or encumbrance on the individual’s practice, letters  of reprimand or admonition,
fines, criminal convictions and state court judgments enforcing adverse actions by the state
EMS authority.
C. “Alternative program” means a  voluntary, nondisciplinary substance abuse recovery
program approved by a state EMS authority.
D. “Certification” means the successful verification of entry-level  cognitive and
psychomotor competency using a reliable, validated and legally defensible examination.
E. “Commission” means the national administrative body of  which all states that have
enacted the Compact are members.
F. “Emergency  Medical Technician (EMT)” means an individual licensed with cognitive
knowledge and a scope of practice that corresponds to that level in the National EMS Edu-
cation Standards and National EMS Scope of Practice Model.
G. “Home state” means a member state where an individual is licensed to  practice
emergency medical services.
H. “License” means  the authorization by a state for an individual to practice as an EMT,
AEMT or paramedic or a level in between EMT and paramedic.
I. “Medical director” means a physician licensed in a member state who is  accountable
for the care delivered by EMS personnel.
J. “Member state” means a state that has enacted this Compact.
K. “Privilege to practice” means  an individual’s authority to deliver emergency medical
services in remote states as authorized under this Compact.
L. “Paramedic” means an individual  licensed with cognitive knowledge and a scope of
practice that corresponds to that level in the National EMS Education  Standards and Na-
tional EMS Scope of Practice Model.
M. “Remote state” means a member state in which an individual is not licensed.
N. “Restricted” means the outcome of an adverse action that limits a license or  the
privilege to practice.
O. “Rule”  means a written statement by the interstate Commission promulgated pursu-
ant to Section 12 of  this Compact that is of general applicability; implements, interprets or
prescribes a policy or provision of the Compact;  or is an organizational, procedural or prac-
[2]
SB 857
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tice requirement of the Commission and has  the force and effect of statutory law in a
member state and includes the amendment, repeal or suspension of an existing rule.
P. “Scope of  practice” means defined parameters of various duties or services that maybe
provided by an individual with specific credentials.  Whether regulated by rule, statute or
court decision, it tends to represent the limits of services an individual may perform.
Q. “Significant investigatory information” means:
1. Investigative information that a state EMS authority, after a  preliminary inquiry that
includes notification and an opportunity to  respond if required by state law, has reason to
believe, if proved true, would result in the imposition  of an adverse action on a license or
privilege to practice; or
2. Investigative information that indicates that the individual represents an immediate
threat to public health and safety regardless of whether the individual has been notified  and
had an opportunity to respond.
R. “State” means any state, commonwealth, district or territory of the United States.
S. “State EMS authority” means the board, office or other agency with  the legislative
mandate to license EMS personnel.
SECTION 3. HOME STATE LICENSURE
A. Any member state in which an individual  holds a current license shall be deemed a
home state for purposes of this Compact.
B. Any  member state may require an individual to obtain and retain a license to be au-
thorized to practice in the member state under circumstances not authorized by the privilege
to practice under the terms of this Compact.
C. A home state’s license authorizes an  individual to practice in a remote state under the
privilege to practice only if the home state:
1. Currently requires  the use of the National Registry of Emergency Medical Technicians
(NREMT) examination  as a condition of issuing initial licenses at the EMT and paramedic
levels;
2. Has a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints about individuals;
3. Notifies the Commission, in compliance  with the terms herein, of any adverse action
or significant investigatory information regarding an individual;
4. No later than five years after activation of the Compact, requires a  criminal back-
ground check of all applicants for initial licensure, including the use of the results of fin-
gerprint or other biometric data checks compliant  with the requirements of the Federal
Bureau of Investigation with the exception of federal  employees who have a suitability de-
termination in accordance with 5 C.F.R. 731.202 and submit documentation of such  as
promulgated in the rules of the Commission; and
5. Complies with the rules of the Commission.
SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE TO PRACTICE
A. Member  states shall recognize the privilege to practice of an individual licensed in
another member state that is in conformance with Section 3 of this Compact.
B. To exercise the privilege  to practice under the terms and provisions of this Compact,
an individual must:
1. Be at least 18 years of age;
2. Possess a current  unrestricted license in a member state as an EMT, AEMT,
paramedic or state recognized and licensed level with a  scope of practice and authority be-
[3]
SB 857
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tween EMT and paramedic; and
3. Practice under the supervision of a medical director.
C. An individual providing patient care in a remote state under the privilege to practice
shall function within the scope of practice authorized by the home state  unless and until
modified by an appropriate authority in  the remote state as may be defined in the rules of
the Commission.
D. Except as provided  in Section 4.C. of this Compact, an individual practicing in a re-
mote state will be subject to the remote state’s authority  and laws. A remote state may, in
accordance with due process and that state’s laws, restrict, suspend or revoke an individual’s
privilege to practice in the  remote state and may take any other necessary actions to protect
the health and safety of its citizens. If a remote state takes action,  it shall promptly notify
the home state and the Commission.
E. If an individual’s license in any home state is restricted or  suspended, the individual
shall not be eligible to practice in a remote state under the  privilege to practice until the
individual’s home state license is restored.
F. If an individual’s privilege to  practice in any remote state is restricted, suspended or
revoked, the individual shall  not be eligible to practice in any remote state until the
individual’s privilege to practice is restored.
SECTION 5. CONDITIONS OF PRACTICE IN A REMOTE STATE
An individual may practice in a remote state under a privilege to practice only  in the
performance of the individual’s EMS duties as assigned by an appropriate  authority, as de-
fined in the rules of the Commission, and under the following circumstances:
1. The individual originates a patient transport in a home state  and transports the pa-
tient to a remote state;
2. The individual originates in the home state  and enters a remote state to pick up a
patient and provide care and transport of the patient to the home state;
3. The individual enters a remote state to provide patient care or  transport within that
remote state;
4. The individual enters a remote state to pick up a patient  and provide care and trans-
port to a third member state; or
5. Other conditions as determined by rules promulgated by the Commission.
SECTION 6. RELATIONSHIP TO EMERGENCY  MANAGEMENT ASSISTANCE COM-
PACT
Upon a member state’s Governor’s  declaration of a state of emergency or disaster that
activates the Emergency Management Assistance Compact (EMAC), all relevant terms and
provisions of EMAC shall apply and to the extent any terms or provisions of this  Compact
conflicts with EMAC, the terms of  EMAC shall prevail with respect to any individual prac-
ticing in the remote state in response to such declaration.
SECTION 7. VETERANS, SERVICE MEMBERS SEPARATING FROM ACTIVE  DUTY
MILITARY, AND THEIR SPOUSES
A. Member states shall  consider a veteran, active military service member and member
of the National Guard and Reserves separating  from an active duty tour, and a spouse
thereof, who holds a current valid and unrestricted NREMT certification at  or above the
level of the state license being sought as satisfying  the minimum training and examination
requirements for such licensure.
[4]
SB 857
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
B. Member states shall expedite the processing of licensure  applications submitted by
veterans, active military service members and members of  the National Guard and Reserves
separating from an active duty tour, and their spouses.
C. All individuals functioning  with a privilege to practice under this Section remain sub-
ject to the adverse actions provisions of Section 8 of this Compact.
SECTION 8. ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. A home state shall have exclusive power to impose adverse  action against an
individual’s license issued by the home state.
B. If an individual’s  license in any home state is restricted or suspended, the individual
shall not be eligible to practice  in a remote state under the privilege to practice until the
individual’s home state license is restored.
1. All home state adverse action orders shall include a statement that the individual’s
compact privileges are inactive. The order may  allow the individual to practice in remote
states with prior written authorization from both the  home state and remote state’s EMS
authority.
2. An individual currently subject to adverse  action in the home state shall not practice
in any remote state without  prior written authorization from both the home state and re-
mote state’s EMS authority.
C. A member state shall report adverse actions and any  occurrences that the individual’s
compact privileges are  restricted, suspended or revoked to the Commission in accordance
with the rules of the Commission.
D. A remote state  may take adverse action on an individual’s privilege to practice within
that state.
E. Any member state may take  adverse action against an individual’s privilege to prac-
tice in that state based on the factual findings of another  member state, so long as each
state follows its own procedures for imposing such adverse action.
F. A home state’s EMS authority shall  investigate and take appropriate action with re-
spect to reported conduct in a remote state as it would if such conduct had occurred  within
the home state. In such cases, the home state’s  law shall control in determining the appro-
priate adverse action.
G. Nothing in this Compact shall  override a member state’s decision that participation
in an alternative program may be used  in lieu of adverse action and that such participation
shall remain nonpublic if required by  the member state’s laws. Member states must require
individuals who enter any alternative programs  to agree not to practice in any other member
state during the term of  the alternative program without prior authorization from such
other member state.
SECTION 9. ADDITIONAL POWERS  INVESTED IN A MEMBER STATE’S EMS AU-
THORITY
A member state’s EMS authority, in addition to any  other powers granted under state
law, is authorized under this Compact to:
1. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that  require the attendance and
testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a member state’s
EMS authority for the attendance and testimony of witnesses, or the  production of evidence
from another member state, shall be enforced in the remote state by  any court of competent
jurisdiction, according to that court’s practice and procedure in considering subpoenas issued
[5]
SB 857
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in its own proceedings. The issuing state’s EMS  authority shall pay any witness fees, travel
expenses, mileage and other fees required  by the service statutes of the state where the
witnesses or evidence are located; and
2. Issue cease and desist orders to restrict,  suspend or revoke an individual’s privilege
to practice in the state.
SECTION 10. ESTABLISHMENT  OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR EMS PER-
SONNEL PRACTICE
A. The Compact states hereby create and establish a joint  public agency known as the
Interstate Commission for EMS Personnel Practice.
1. The Commission is a body politic and an instrumentality of the compact states.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the Commission shall be brought
solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal  office of the
Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the
extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings.
3. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity.
B. Membership, Voting and Meetings
1. Each member state shall have and be limited to one delegate.  The responsible official
of the state EMS authority or their  designee shall be the delegate to this Compact for each
member state. Any delegate may be removed or suspended  from office as provided by the law
of the state from which the  delegate is appointed. Any vacancy occurring in the Commission
shall be filled in  accordance with the laws of the member state in which the vacancy exists.
In the event that more than one board, office or other agency with the legislative  mandate
to license EMS personnel at and above the level of  EMT exists, the Governor of the state
will determine which entity will be responsible for assigning the delegate.
2. Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote with regard to  the promulgation of rules
and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate  in the business
and affairs of the Commission. A delegate shall vote  in person or by such other means as
provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates’ participation in meetings  by
telephone or other means of communication.
3. The Commission  shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional
meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws.
4. All meetings shall be open to the public, and public  notice of meetings shall be given
in the same manner as required  under the rulemaking provisions in Section 12 of this Com-
pact.
5. The Commission may convene  in a closed, nonpublic meeting if the Commission must
discuss:
a. Noncompliance of a member state with its obligations under the Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other  personnel matters, practices or
procedures related to specific employees or other matters related  to the Commission’s
internal personnel practices and procedures;
c. Current, threatened or reasonably anticipated litigation;
d. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase or sale of goods, services or real estate;
e. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
f. Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is  privileged
or confidential;
[6]
SB 857
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
g. Disclosure  of information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a
clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
h. Disclosure of investigatory records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
i. Disclosure of  information related to any investigatory reports prepared by or on behalf
of or for use of the Commission or other committee charged with responsibility of  investi-
gation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to the compact; or
j. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or member state statute.
6. If a meeting, or portion of  a meeting, is closed pursuant to this provision, the
Commission’s legal counsel or designee  shall certify that the meeting may be closed and shall
reference each relevant exempting provision. The Commission shall keep minutes that  fully
and clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate
summary of actions taken, and the  reasons therefore, including a description of the views
expressed. All documents considered  in connection with an action shall be identified in such
minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal,  subject to
release by a majority vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
C. The Commission shall, by a  majority vote of the delegates, prescribe bylaws or rules
to govern its conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes  and ex-
ercise the powers of the Compact, including but not limited to:
1. Establishing the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Providing reasonable standards and procedures:
a. For the establishment and meetings of other committees; and
b. Governing any general  or specific delegation of any authority or function of the Com-
mission;
3. Providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meetings of the Commis-
sion, ensuring reasonable advance notice of all meetings  and providing an opportunity for
attendance of such meetings by  interested parties, with enumerated exceptions designed to
protect the public’s interest,  the privacy of individuals and proprietary information, including
trade secrets. The Commission may meet in closed session only after  a majority of the
membership votes to close a meeting in whole or in part. As soon  as practicable, the Com-
mission must make public a copy of the vote to close  the meeting revealing the vote of each
member with no proxy votes allowed;
4. Establishing the titles, duties and authority and reasonable procedures for  the election
of the officers of the Commission;
5. Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the establishment of the personnel
policies and programs of the Commission. Notwithstanding any civil service or other similar
laws of any member state,  the bylaws shall exclusively govern the personnel policies and
programs of the Commission;
6. Promulgating a  code of ethics to address permissible and prohibited activities of
Commission members and employees;
7. Providing a mechanism for winding up  the operations of the Commission and the eq-
uitable disposition of any surplus funds that may exist after  the termination of the Compact
after the payment or reserving of all of its debts and obligations;
8. The Commission shall publish its bylaws and  file a copy thereof, and a copy of any
amendment thereto, with the appropriate agency  or officer in each of the member states, if
any;
[7]
SB 857
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
9. The Commission shall maintain its financial records  in accordance with the bylaws;
and
10. The Commission shall meet and take such actions as are consistent  with the pro-
visions of this Compact and the bylaws.
D. The Commission shall have the following powers:
1.a. The authority to promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and coordinate implementa-
tion and administration of this Compact. The rules shall  have the force and effect of law
and shall be binding in all member states;
b. Notwithstanding Section 10.D.1.a. of  this Compact, the Oregon Health Authority shall
review the rules of the Commission. The authority may  approve and adopt the rules of the
Commission as rules of the authority. The State of Oregon is subject to a rule of the Com-
mission only if the rule of the Commission is adopted by the authority;
2. To  bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the Commission,
provided that the standing of any  state EMS authority or other regulatory body responsible
for EMS personnel licensure to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
3. To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
4. To borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but not limited  to,
employees of a member state;
5. To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such
individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the compact and to establish
the Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, quali-
fications of personnel and other related personnel matters;
6. To accept any and  all appropriate donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies,
materials and services, and to receive, utilize and dispose of the same;  provided that at all
times the Commission shall strive to avoid any appearance of  impropriety or conflict of in-
terest;
7. To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or otherwise to own, hold,
improve or use, any property, real, personal or mixed; provided that at all times the Com-
mission shall strive to avoid any appearance of impropriety;
8. To  sell convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon or otherwise dispose of any
property real, personal or mixed;
9. To establish a budget and make expenditures;
10. To borrow money;
11. To appoint committees, including  advisory committees composed of members, state
regulators, state legislators  or their representatives, consumer representatives and such
other interested persons as may be designated in this Compact and the bylaws;
12. To provide and receive  information from, and to cooperate with, law enforcement
agencies;
13. To adopt and use an official seal; and
14. To perform such other functions  as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the
purposes of this Compact consistent with the state regulation of EMS personnel  licensure
and practice.
E. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission  shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of
its establishment, organization and ongoing activities.
[8]
SB 857
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate  revenue sources, donations and
grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services.
3.a. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual  assessment from each member
state or impose fees on other parties to cover the cost of the operations and activities of  the
Commission and its staff, which  must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual
budget as approved  each year for which revenue is not provided by other sources. The ag-
gregate annual assessment  amount shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined
by the Commission, which shall promulgate a rule binding upon all member states.
b. An assessment levied, or any other financial obligation imposed, under this Compact,
is effective against the State of Oregon only to the extent  that moneys necessary to pay the
assessment or meet the financial obligation have been deposited in the Emergency  Medical
Services Fund established under ORS 682.403.
4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of  any kind prior to securing the funds
adequate to meet the same; nor shall the  Commission pledge the credit of any of the member
states, except by and with the authority of the member state.
5. The Commission shall keep  accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The
receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall  be subject to the audit and accounting
procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements  of funds
handled by the Commission shall be audited  yearly by a certified or licensed public account-
ant, and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the  annual report
of the Commission.
F. Qualified Immunity, Defense and Indemnification
1. The members,  officers, executive director, employees and representatives of the Com-
mission shall be immune from suit and liability,  either personally or in their official capacity,
for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other  civil liability
caused by or arising  out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that
the person against whom the claim  is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties or  responsibilities; provided that nothing
in this paragraph shall  be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any
damage, loss, injury or liability caused by the intentional or willful  or wanton misconduct
of that person.
2. The Commission  shall defend any member, officer, executive director, employee or
representative of the Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising  out
of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is made
had a  reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment,
duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall  be construed to prohibit that
person from retaining their own counsel;  and provided further, that the actual or alleged act,
error or omission did not result from that person’s intentional  or willful or wanton miscon-
duct.
3. The  Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer, executive di-
rector, employee or representative of the Commission for  the amount of any settlement or
judgment obtained against  that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or
omission that occurred within the scope of Commission  employment, duties or responsibil-
ities, or that such person had a  reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
[9]
SB 857
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Commission employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act,
error or omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.
SECTION 11. COORDINATED DATABASE
A. The Commission shall provide for the development and  maintenance of a coordinated
database and reporting system containing licensure, adverse  action and significant
investigatory information on all licensed individuals in member states.
B. Notwithstanding any other  provision of state law to the contrary, a member state
shall submit a uniform data  set to the coordinated database on all individuals to whom this
Compact is applicable as required by the rules of the Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Significant investigatory information;
4. Adverse actions against an individual’s license;
5. An indicator that an individual’s privilege to practice  is restricted, suspended or re-
voked;
6. Nonconfidential information related to alternative program participation;
7. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reasons for such denial; and
8. Other information that may facilitate the administration of  this Compact, as deter-
mined by the rules of the Commission.
C. The coordinated database administrator shall promptly notify all member states of any
adverse action taken against, or significant  investigative information on, any individual in a
member state.
D. Member states contributing information to the coordinated  database may designate
information that may not be shared  with the public without the express permission of the
contributing state.
E. Any information submitted to the coordinated  database that is subsequently required
to be expunged by the laws of the member state contributing the information  shall be re-
moved from the coordinated database.
SECTION 12. RULEMAKING
A. The  Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set
forth in this section  and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become
binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment.
B. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule, by  enactment of
a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the Compact, then  such rule shall
have no further force and effect in any member state.
C. Rules or amendments to the rules  shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of
the Commission.
D. Prior to promulgation and adoption of  a final rule or rules by the Commission, and
at least 60 days in advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered and voted
upon, the Commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission; and
2. On the website of each member state EMS authority or the publication  in which each
state would otherwise publish proposed rules.
E. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
[10]
SB 857
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
1. The proposed time, date and location of the meeting in which the rule will be  consid-
ered and voted upon;
2. The text of the proposed rule or amendment and the reason for the proposed rule;
3. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and
4. The manner in which interested persons may submit  notice to the Commission of their
intention to attend the public hearing and any written comments.
F. Prior  to adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission shall allow persons to submit
written data, facts, opinions and arguments, which shall be made available to the public.
G. The Commission shall grant an opportunity for a  public hearing before it adopts a rule
or amendment if a hearing is requested by:
1. At least 25 persons;
2. A governmental subdivision or agency; or
3. An association having at least 25 members.
H. If a hearing is held  on the proposed rule or amendment, the Commission shall publish
the place, time and date of the scheduled public hearing.
1. All persons wishing to be  heard at the hearing shall notify the executive director of
the Commission or other designated member in writing of  their desire to appear and testify
at the hearing not less than five business days before the scheduled date of the hearing.
2. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing  each person who wishes to com-
ment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing.
3. No  transcript of the hearing is required, unless a written request for a transcript is
made, in which case the person  requesting the transcript shall bear the cost of producing the
transcript. A recording may be made in lieu of a transcript under  the same terms and con-
ditions as a transcript. This subsection shall not preclude the Commission from making  a
transcript or recording of the hearing if it so chooses.
4. Nothing in this section  shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule.
Rules may be grouped  for the convenience of the Commission at hearings required by this
section.
I. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of business  on the scheduled
hearing date if  the hearing was not held, the Commission shall consider all written and oral
comments received.
J. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all members, take final action on the  pro-
posed rule and shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking
record and the full text of the rule.
K. If no written notice of  intent to attend the public hearing by interested parties is re-
ceived, the Commission may proceed with promulgation of the  proposed rule without a public
hearing.
L. Upon determination that an emergency  exists, the Commission may consider and
adopt an emergency  rule without prior notice, opportunity for comment or hearing, provided
that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact and in this section shall  be
retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than 90 days
after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency  rule is
one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or member state funds;
[11]
SB 857
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
3. Meet a deadline for the  promulgation of an administrative rule that is established by
federal law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may direct  revisions
to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors,
errors in format, errors  in consistency or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions
shall be posted on the  website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge
by any person for  a period of 30 days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on
grounds that  the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made
in writing, and delivered to the chair of the  Commission prior to the end of the notice period.
If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect  without further action. If the revision
is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the Commission.
SECTION 13. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight
1. The  executive, legislative and judicial branches of state government in each member
state shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to  effectuate
the compact’s purposes and intent. The provisions of this Compact  and the rules
promulgated hereunder shall have standing as statutory law.
2. All courts shall  take judicial notice of the Compact and the rules in any judicial or
administrative proceeding in a member state  pertaining to the subject matter of this Com-
pact which may affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the Commission.
3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive  service of process in any such proceeding,
and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to  provide
service of process to the Commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the  Com-
mission, this Compact or promulgated rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance and Termination
1. If the Commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the  performance
of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or the  promulgated rules, the Com-
mission shall:
a. Provide written notice to  the defaulting state and other member states of the nature
of the default, the proposed means of curing the default or any other action  to be taken by
the Commission; and
b. Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.
2. If a state in default fails to cure  the default, the defaulting state may be terminated
from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the member states, and all
rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this Compact may  be terminated on the effective
date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve  the offending state of obligations
or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
3. Termination of membership in the compact shall  be imposed only after all other means
of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate  shall
be given by the Commission to the Governor, the majority and minority leaders of  the de-
faulting state’s legislature, and each of the member states.
4. A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments,  obligations and
liabilities incurred through the effective  date of termination, including obligations that ex-
tend beyond the effective date of termination.
[12]
SB 857
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
5. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be  in de-
fault or that has been terminated from the compact, unless  agreed upon in writing between
the Commission and the defaulting state.
6. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Commission by petitioning the United
States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the Commis-
sion has its principal offices.  The prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of such liti-
gation, including reasonable attorney fees.
C. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by  a member state, the Commission shall attempt to resolve disputes
related to the Compact that arise  among member states and between member and non-
member states.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for  both mediation and binding
dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
D. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable  exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the pro-
visions and rules of this Compact.
2. By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal  action in the United States Dis-
trict Court for the District of Columbia  or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices against a  member state in default to enforce compliance with the provisions
of the Compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event  judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing
member shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees.
3. The remedies  herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission. The
Commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law.
SECTION 14. DATE OF IMPLEMENTATION OF THE  INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR
EMS PERSONNEL PRACTICE AND ASSOCIATED  RULES, WITHDRAWAL AND AMEND-
MENT
A. The  Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the compact statute is en-
acted into law in the 10th member state. The provisions, which become effective at that
time, shall be limited to the powers granted to the  Commission relating to assembly and the
promulgation of rules. Thereafter, the Commission shall meet and exercise rulemaking pow-
ers necessary to the implementation and administration of the Compact.
B. Any state that  joins the Compact subsequent to the Commission’s initial adoption of
the rules shall  be subject to the rules as they exist on the date on which the Compact be-
comes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the  Commission shall
have the full force and effect of law on the day the Compact becomes law in that state.
C. Any member state may withdraw from  this Compact by enacting a statute repealing
the same.
1. A member state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until six  months after enactment
of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect  the continuing requirement of the withdrawing state’s
EMS authority  to comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting requirements
of this Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
D. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any
EMS personnel licensure agreement or  other cooperative arrangement between a member
[13]
SB 857
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
state and a nonmember state that does not conflict with the provisions of this Compact.
E. This Compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to  this Compact
shall become effective and binding upon any member state until  it is enacted into the laws
of all member states.
SECTION 15. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes  thereof. If this
Compact shall be held contrary  to the constitution of any state member thereto, the Com-
pact shall remain in full force and effect as to the  remaining member states. Nothing in this
Compact supersedes state law or rules related to licensure of EMS agencies.
SECTION 2.
The Legislative Assembly of the State of Oregon hereby  ratifies the Recog-
nition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact set forth in
section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 676.177 is amended to read:
676.177. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS  676.165 to 676.180, a health professional
regulatory board, upon a determination by the board that it possesses otherwise confidential  infor-
mation that reasonably relates to  the regulatory or enforcement function of another public entity,
may disclose that information to the other public entity.
(2) Any public entity that receives information pursuant to subsection (1) of this  section shall
agree to take  all reasonable steps to maintain the confidentiality of the information, except that the
public entity may use or disclose  the information to the extent necessary to carry out the regulatory
or enforcement functions of the public entity.
(3) For purposes of this section, “public entity” means:
(a) A board or agency  of this state, or a board or agency of another state with regulatory or
enforcement functions similar to the  functions of a health professional regulatory board of this state;
(b) A district attorney;
(c) The Department of Justice;
(d) A state or  local public body of this state that licenses, franchises or provides emergency
medical services; or
(e) A law enforcement agency of this state, another state or the federal government.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (3) of this section[ ,]:
(a) The Oregon Board of Physical Therapy may disclose information described in  subsection (1)
of this section to the Physical Therapy Compact Commission established in ORS 688.240.
(b) The Oregon Health Authority may disclose information described in  subsection (1) of
this section to the Interstate Commission for EMS Personnel  Practice established in section
1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 682.204 is amended to read:
682.204. (1)(a) A  person may not act as an emergency medical services provider unless the per-
son is licensed under this chapter.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not  apply to an individual who is authorized to
work as an advanced emergency medical  technician, emergency medical technician or
paramedic by privilege to practice as those terms are defined in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
(2) A person or governmental unit which operates an ambulance may not authorize a person  to
act for it as an emergency medical  services provider unless the emergency medical services provider
is licensed under this chapter.
(3) A person or governmental unit may  not operate or allow to be operated in this state any
[14]
SB 857
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ambulance unless it is operated with  at least one emergency medical services provider who is li-
censed at a level higher than emergency medical responder.
(4) It is a defense to any  charge under this section that there was a reasonable basis for be-
lieving that the performance of services contrary to this section was necessary to preserve human
life, that diligent effort was made to obtain the services of a  licensed emergency medical services
provider and that  the services of a licensed emergency medical services provider were not available
or were not  available in time as under the circumstances appeared necessary to preserve such hu-
man life.
(5) Subsections (1) to  (3) of this section are not applicable to any individual, group of individuals,
partnership, entity,  association or other organization otherwise subject thereto providing a service
to the public exclusively by volunteer unpaid  workers, nor to any person who acts as an ambulance
attendant therefor, provided that in the particular  county in which the service is rendered, the
county court or board of county commissioners has by order, after public hearing, granted exemption
from such subsections to the individual, group, partnership, entity, association or organization. When
exemption is granted  under this section, any person who attends an individual who is ill or injured
or who has a disability in an ambulance may not purport to be an emergency medical services  pro-
vider.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 682.403 is amended to read:
682.403. (1) The Emergency Medical Services Fund is  established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the  General Fund. The Emergency Medical Services Fund consists of moneys col-
lected by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 682.400 (3). Moneys in  the fund are continuously
appropriated to the authority for the purposes of:
(a) Providing grants to emergency medical services providers for innovative  ambulance pro-
grams;
(b) Funding the state medical assistance program, including  but not limited to increasing re-
imbursement rates for emergency medical services transports; [ and]
(c) Administering ORS 682.400[ .]; and
(d) Meeting the financial obligations imposed on the  State of Oregon as a result of this
state’s participation in the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services  Personnel Licensure
Interstate Compact established under section 1 of this 2023 Act.
(2) Interest earned by the fund shall be credited to the fund.
SECTION 6.
(1) The amendments to ORS 676.177 by  section 3 of this 2023 Act apply to
information disclosed on and after the operative date specified in section 7 of this 2023 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 682.204 by section 4 of this 2023 Act apply to individuals au-
thorized to work as advanced  emergency medical technicians, emergency medical technicians
or paramedics by privilege to practice on and after the operative date specified in section 7
of this 2023 Act.
(3) The amendments to ORS 682.403 by section 5 of this 2023 Act apply to moneys received
by the Oregon Health Authority on and after the operative date  specified in section 7 of this
2023 Act.
SECTION 7. (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this  2023 Act and the amendments to ORS 676.177,
682.204 and 682.403 by sections 3 to 5 of this 2023 Act become operative on January 1, 2024.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take any  action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the authority to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
[15]
SB 857
1
2
3
4
5
and powers conferred on the  authority by sections 1 and 2 of this 2023 Act and the amend-
ments to ORS 676.177, 682.204 and 682.403 by sections 3 to 5 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 8.
This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[16]