Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall conduct a study to identify  the costs
and possible funding sources to improve school safety. The study shall include consideration
of:
(a) Placing law enforcement officers in schools and  having the officers be responsible for
safety and crime prevention in schools, including responding to active shooter incidents;
(b) Using mental health professionals to provide mental health services in schools; and
(c) Training educators to identify and  refer students in need of additional mental health
services and to identify possible threats to school safety that exist within and  outside the
school community.
(2) The department shall report the results of the study in the  manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to  an interim committee of the
Legislative Assembly related to education no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 908