Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of State Police shall maintain a  patrol trooper staffing level
of at least 20 patrol troopers per 100,000 residents of this state,  based on population figures
from the most recent federal decennial census.
SECTION 2. (1) Section 1 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2036.
(2) The Department of State Police may take any action before the  operative date speci-
fied in subsection (1)  of this section that is necessary for the department to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the department by section 1 of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1640