Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Using the  methodology identified under section 1, chapter 503, Oregon
Laws 2023, the Department of Education shall conduct a study to determine  the appropriate
number of students on a workload for a school-based health practitioner who is a:
(a) Speech-language pathologist.
(b) Occupational therapist.
(c) Physical therapist.
(2) In conducting the study, the department  shall work with speech-language
pathologists, occupational therapists and physical therapists to determine a cost-effective
and outcome-oriented approach to  implement the study in a manner that gathers data from
across the state.
(3) The department shall submit a report on the findings of the study  in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and  may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education no later than January 5, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 968