Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Department of Energy shall study  the need to expand electric
transmission infrastructure in  this state. The department shall submit a report in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to energy no later than  September
15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. (1) The Oregon Electric Transmission Expansion Fund is established in  the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Moneys in the  fund are con-
tinuously appropriated to the State Department of Energy for  the purpose described in sub-
section (4) of this section.
(2) The fund consists of moneys  appropriated, allocated, deposited or transferred to the
fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise.
(3) Moneys in the  fund may be invested as provided in ORS 293.701 to 293.857, and interest
earned on the moneys in the fund must be credited to the fund.
(4) The department shall use moneys in  the fund to develop two electric transmission
expansion projects. The department shall complete the  two projects no later than January
1, 2036.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Department of  Energy, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $8,000,000,000, for deposit  in the Oregon Electric Transmission
Expansion Fund established in section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Energy, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2027, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $8,000,000,000,  for deposit in the Oregon Electric Transmission
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4636
HB 3927
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
Expansion Fund established in section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Department of  Energy, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2029, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $8,000,000,000, for deposit  in the Oregon Electric Transmission
Expansion Fund established in section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Energy, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2031, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $8,000,000,000,  for deposit in the Oregon Electric Transmission
Expansion Fund established in section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Department of  Energy, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2033, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $8,000,000,000, for deposit  in the Oregon Electric Transmission
Expansion Fund established in section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 9. (1) Section 3 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2036.
(2) Unobligated moneys  remaining in the Oregon Electric Transmission Expansion Fund
on the date described in subsection (1) of this section shall revert to the General Fund.
[2]