Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Allowable closing costs” means the disbursements that are listed in a settlement
statement.
(b) “Eligible  costs” means the down payment and allowable closing costs associated with
the purchase of a primary residence.
(c) “Settlement statement” means a document that  outlines the financial details and
transactions involved in the closing of a purchase of a primary residence.
(d) “Special purpose credit program” means a home  loan program designed to facilitate
homeownership by individuals from underserved populations by providing assistance towards
eligible costs, as permitted under 12 C.F.R. part 1002.8, as in effect on January 22, 2025.
(e) “Underserved populations” means individuals from an economically disadvantaged
class of persons who qualify for a special purpose credit program.
(2)(a) The Department of Land Conservation and Development shall commission  a study
to identify barriers to  homeownership that are experienced by underserved populations in
this state due to past and  ongoing policies and practices that created or contributed to bar-
riers to homeownership for such populations.
(b) In commissioning the study, the department shall partner with national  and state
entities with demonstrated experience in applied policy  research and analysis and subject
matter expertise regarding matters related to housing and equity.
(3) The study must:
(a) Examine and document past and ongoing policies  and practices that created or con-
tributed to barriers to homeownership for underserved populations;
(b) Analyze whether and to what extent facially  neutral approaches have been sufficient
to reducing barriers to homeownership;
(c) Consider for recommendation the creation of one or more  special purpose credit
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2589
HB 3804
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
programs as possible options for reducing disparities in homeownership in this state; and
(d) Review the active efforts that are in place, if any, that promote increased accessibility
to credit and homeownership by underserved populations in this state.
(4) No later than  December 15, 2027, the department shall submit a report in the manner
provided in ORS 192.245 to the committees  or interim committees of the Legislative Assem-
bly related to housing. The report shall:
(a) Include comprehensive evaluations on the findings of the study; and
(b) Recommend and evaluate potential programmatic  and policy changes, including any
potential programmatic costs, to  remedy identified policies and practices that created or
contributed to barriers to homeownership  for underserved populations and the impacts of
such barriers.
SECTION 2.
The Department of Land Conservation and Development shall commission
the study under section 1 of this 2025 Act no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]