Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Wildfire is established.
(2) The department shall oversee wildfire prevention, intervention and  recovery in this
state.  The department shall coordinate as necessary with the State Fire Marshal, the State
Forestry Department, the Department of Environmental Quality, the Oregon Department of
Emergency Management, rural fire protection districts, fire  wardens and local fire depart-
ments in carrying out the duties prescribed in this section.
(3) The department may request  assistance from other state and local agencies as nec-
essary to carry out the duties prescribed in this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Department of Wildfire is under the  supervision and control of a
director, who is responsible for the performance of  the duties, functions and powers of the
department.
(2) The Governor shall appoint the Director of the Department  of Wildfire, who holds
office at the pleasure of the Governor.
(3) The director shall be paid a salary as provided by  law or, if not so provided, as pre-
scribed by the Governor.
(4) Subject to the approval of  the Governor, the director may organize and reorganize the
administrative structure of the  department as the director considers appropriate to properly
conduct the work of the department.
(5) The director may divide the functions of the  department into administrative divisions.
Subject to the approval of  the Governor, the director may appoint an individual to administer
each division. The administrator of each  division serves at the pleasure of the director and
is not  subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 240. Each individual appointed under this
subsection must be well qualified by technical training and experience in the functions to  be
performed by the individual.
SECTION 3. The appointment of the Director of the Department of Wildfire is  subject
to confirmation by the Senate in the manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
SECTION 4. (1) The Director of the Department of Wildfire shall, by written order filed
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4364
HB 3578
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
with the Secretary of State, appoint a deputy director. The deputy director serves  at the
pleasure of the director, has authority to act for the director  in the absence of the director
and is subject to the control of the director at all times.
(2) Subject to any applicable provisions of ORS chapter 240, the director shall  appoint all
subordinate officers and employees of the Department  of Wildfire, prescribe their duties and
fix their compensation.
SECTION 5.
In accordance with the provisions of ORS chapter 183,  the Department of
Wildfire may adopt rules for the administration of the laws that the Department  of Wildfire
is charged with administering.
SECTION 6. The Department of Wildfire  Fund is established in the State Treasury, sep-
arate and distinct from the  General Fund. Interest earned by the Department of Wildfire
Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated  to the
Department of Wildfire and may be  used only for the purposes of carrying out sections 1 to
5 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7.  ORS 401.851 is amended to read:
401.851. (1) The Oregon Department of  Emergency Management shall update its statewide
emergency plan as necessary to prepare for or respond to wildfire emergencies on  an area-wide or
statewide basis. The plan developed by the department to prepare for or  respond to wildfire emer-
gencies shall include, but need  not be limited to, wildfire risk mitigation efforts and evacuation
planning.
(2) The department shall coordinate with cities, counties, adult foster  homes, health care facili-
ties and residential facilities,  the Department of Human Services [ and], the Oregon Health Authority
and the Department of Wildfire  to establish local or private procedures to prepare for emergen-
cies related to wildfire and ensure that local  efforts to prevent, respond to or recover from an
emergency caused by wildfire are conducted in a manner consistent with the plan developed  by the
Oregon Department of Emergency Management to prepare for or respond to  wildfire emergencies.
The coordinated activities may include, but need not be limited to,  providing training, carrying out
exercises and promoting community education.
[2]