Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Department of  Energy shall study energy. The department shall
submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations
for legislation, to  the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to energy no
later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3851