Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $50,150,000 for
the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 2.
After withholding $150,000 from the moneys appropriated under  section 1 of
this 2023 Act for its  costs in administering this section and section 3 of this 2023 Act, the
Oregon Business Development Department shall distribute $22,567,995.51 as follows:
(1) $11,837,497 to:
MAJOR VENUES.
Name of venue Grant Amount
High Desert Museum ................ $ 759,500
Oregon Ballet Theatre .............. $ 683,550
Oregon Shakespeare Festival .... $ 5,110,350
Oregon Symphony ..................... $ 1,898,750
Portland Art Museum ............... $ 1,486,597
Portland Center Stage .............. $ 949,375
Portland Opera.......................... $ 949,375
(2) $10,730,498.38 to:
INDEPENDENT VENUES.
Name of venue Grant Amount
Aladdin...................................... $ 539,245.00
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 646
HB 2459
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Alberta Rose ............................. $ 215,849.90
Artichoke Music........................ $ 57,380.23
Ashland Armory........................ $ 272,265.56
Atlantis Lounge ........................ $ 89,621.00
Barnstormers Theatre .............. $ 28,101.50
The Belfry ................................. $ 40,861.10
BodyVox.................................... $ 49,868.77
Bossanova ................................. $ 130,634.00
Britt Festival Pavilion .............. $ 134,302.39
Cascades Theatre Company ...... $ 66,836.00
Coaster Theatre Playhouse ....... $ 28,101.50
CoHo Productions ..................... $ 26,696.43
Cottage Theatre ........................ $ 47,962.43
Craterian Performances
Company ................................... $ 224,256.50
Crystal Ballroom ....................... $ 571,159.19
Cuthbert Amphitheater ............. $ 215,022.05
Dante’s ...................................... $ 207,343.50
Domino Room ........................... $ 40,253.50
Doug Fir.................................... $ 291,754.33
Egyptian Theatre ...................... $ 56,203.00
The Elgin Opera House ............. $ 61,013.14
Elsinore Theatre (Historic) ....... $ 218,736.00
45 East, LLC ............................. $ 256,601.40
Gallery Theater ......................... $ 34,177.50
The Goodfoot............................. $ 66,836.00
Hawthorne Theatre ................... $ 342,534.50
Headwaters Theatre/
Water in the Desert ................. $ 26,772.38
Historic Rogue Theatre ............. $ 60,760.00
Holocene.................................... $ 222,533.50
HQ LaGrande ............................ $ 8,620.33
Hult Center for the
Performing Arts ........................ $ 406,332.50
Imago Theatre .......................... $ 79,496.87
Jack London Revue................... $ 69,570.20
Jazz Station/Willamette
Jazz Society .............................. $ 22,785.00
KALA ........................................ $ 15,190.00
Kelly’s Olympian ....................... $ 39,494.00
Kickstand Comedy (formerly
Brody Theater).......................... $ 66,114.48
Lakewood Center for the
Arts ........................................... $ 91,140.00
Laurelthirst............................... $ 61,671.40
[2]
HB 2459
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Liberty Theater......................... $ 67,253.73
Lincoln City Cultural Center .... $ 34,177.50
Little Theatre on the Bay/
Liberty Theatre (North Bend) .. $ 91,329.88
Majestic Theatre ....................... $ 102,532.50
McDonald Theatre..................... $ 230,925.98
Midtown Ballroom..................... $ 63,798.00
Milagro Theatre ........................ $ 27,896.44
Mississippi Studios.................... $ 319,043.17
New Expressive Works ............. $ 27,212.89
Newport Performing Arts
Center (2 stages) ....................... $ 120,001.00
Northwest Children’s Theater .. $ 87,342.50
OK Theater ............................... $ 18,987.50
Old Church Concert Hall .......... $ 94,937.50
Oregon Contemporary Theatre . $ 56,203.00
Pentacle Theatre ....................... $ 28,579.99
Portland Institute for
Contemporary Art ..................... $ 203,690.31
Pickathon.................................. $ 461,267.14
Polaris Hall ............................... $ 199,307.99
Portland Playhouse................... $ 92,529.89
Revolution Hall ......................... $ 471,208.99
Roseland.................................... $ 527,411.99
Ross Ragland Theater ............... $ 261,746.49
Sawdust Theatre ....................... $ 7,595.00
Shaking the Tree Theatre ......... $ 68,408.17
Shedd Institute for the
Arts ........................................... $ 400,188.15
The Siren Theater ..................... $ 44,810.50
Stage 722 ................................... $ 195,032.01
Star Theater ............................. $ 163,292.50
Theatre in the Grove ................ $ 28,101.50
Theatre Vertigo (The Shoebox) . $ 19,936.88
Vault Theater
(Bag and Baggage) .................... $ 67,724.62
Volcanic Theatre ....................... $ 54,793.52
White Eagle .............................. $ 126,350.42
Whiteside Theatre ..................... $ 40,253.50
Wildish Community Theater ..... $ 65,127.13
Wonder Ballroom ...................... $ 294,617.65
WOW Hall/Community Center
for the Performing Arts ........... $ 82,785.50
[3]
HB 2459
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 3.
(1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Earned revenue” means income from the sale of goods  or services, including,
but not limited to, membership, admission tickets, rentals, exhibitions,  merchandise, food
and beverages, advertising and contracted services and performances.
(B) “Earned revenue” does not include donations,  federal, state or local governmental
grants, or returns on investments.
(b) “Oregon cultural organization” means a public  or private entity, whether operated
for profit or as a nonprofit organization, that:
(A) Has its business headquarters, and operates primarily, in this state;
(B) Operates primarily  for the purpose of producing, promoting or presenting the arts,
culture, humanities, heritage or live cultural entertainment,  other than adult entertainment,
to the public; and
(C)(i) Operates as a public facility, performing arts  organization, museum, historical
site, visual arts organization, county fairgrounds, cultural entity  within a federally recog-
nized Indian tribe based in Oregon or community event organization; or
(ii) Produces cultural projects or programs for the public.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department shall use $27,432,004.49 of  the mon-
eys appropriated under section 1 of this 2023 Act  to develop and implement a program for
awarding grants directly to Oregon cultural organizations.
(3) To be eligible for a grant, an Oregon  cultural organization must demonstrate to the
department’s satisfaction that, at any time during fiscal year 2020 through fiscal  year 2023,
the organization experienced a significant loss in  earned revenue because of statewide man-
dates, or guidance of the Oregon Health Authority, in response to the COVID-19 pandemic.
(4)(a) The department shall prescribe the form and  process by which Oregon cultural
organizations may apply for and be awarded grants under the program.
(b) The department may require  applicants to demonstrate need, as described in sub-
section (6) of this section, in the form of:
(A) The organization’s federal tax returns for the periods  to which the application re-
lates; or
(B) Financial documentation, including, but  not limited to, audited financial statements
or financial statements that have been approved by a certified public accountant.
(5) The department may consult with the Trust  for Cultural Development Board in re-
viewing applications and awarding grants.
(6) The department shall develop an equitable funding allocation so that grant moneys
shall be awarded, subject to subsections (7) and (8) of this section, with priority  given to
applicants who have experienced the greatest proportional  loss, as measured by the ratio of
an applicant’s total lost  earned revenue to the applicant’s total earned revenue for each fis-
cal year, beginning with fiscal year 2019, to which the application relates.
(7) Subject to subsection (8) of  this section, the department shall develop award allo-
cation options that take into account an equitable  percentage of an applicant’s fiscal size and
lost earned revenue and available funding.
(8) Under consultation with the Trust for Cultural  Development Board, the department
shall award grant moneys proportionately among the  geographic regions of this state, as
defined by the department,  based on the relative population of, and the number of eligible
applications received from Oregon cultural organizations located in, each region. Regions
[4]
HB 2459
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
may be defined according to the service areas of  cultural coalitions operating under the
auspices of the board and grant moneys may be distributed through the cultural coalitions.
(9) Before awarding grants, the department may  withhold an amount, not to exceed five
percent of the total amount appropriated under section 1 of this  2023 Act, to reimburse the
department for the actual costs of developing and implementing the program.
(10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this section shall  apply to any grant
moneys that the department awards to an Oregon cultural organization  on or after the ef-
fective date of this 2023 Act in response to the negative impact of the COVID-19 pandemic
on the organization’s earned revenue.
SECTION 4.
(1) Section 3 of this 2023 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2024.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department may take any action  before the op-
erative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section that is necessary for the department
to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1)  of this section, all the
powers, duties and functions conferred on the department under section 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[5]