Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in  this section, “fee” has the meaning given that term in ORS
291.050.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law, no state agency may charge a fee.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1515