Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Public Drinking  Water and Sewer Ratepayer Assistance Fund is es-
tablished in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the  General Fund. The Public
Drinking Water and Sewer Ratepayer Assistance Fund shall consist of all moneys placed in
the fund as provided by law and any gifts, grants, donations, endowments or bequests from
any public or private source.
(2) Moneys in  the fund are continuously appropriated the Housing and Community Ser-
vices Department for the purposes set forth in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The department shall provide grants from moneys deposited in  the fund to qualified
organizations to distribute water and sewer  bill payment assistance to low-income residential
households.
(4) Qualified organizations for receiving grants under this section shall include,  but need
not be limited to:
(a) Nonprofit  community-based organizations, including but not limited to housing au-
thorities and community action agencies; and
(b) Municipal utilities providing domestic water or sewer service.
(5) The department shall adopt rules necessary for the administration and  implementa-
tion of subsections (3) and (4) of this section. In adopting rules, the department  shall con-
sider other utility bill payment  or crisis assistance and low-income assistance programs
administered by the department, including but not limited to  the Low Income Home Energy
Assistance Act of 1981 (42 U.S.C. 8621 et seq.).
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $15,000,000, for deposit in the Public Drinking
Water and Sewer Ratepayer Assistance Fund established under section 1 of this 2021 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1486