Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 656.802 is amended to read:
656.802. (1)(a)  As used in this chapter, “occupational disease” means any disease or infection
arising out of and in the course of employment caused by substances or  activities to which an em-
ployee is not ordinarily subjected or exposed other than during a period  of regular actual employ-
ment therein, and which requires medical services or results in disability or death, including:
(A) Any disease or infection caused by ingestion of, absorption of, inhalation  of or contact with
dust, fumes, vapors, gases, radiation or other substances.
(B) Any mental disorder, whether sudden or gradual  in onset, which requires medical services
or results in physical or mental disability or death.
(C) Any series of traumatic events or occurrences which requires medical  services or results in
physical disability or death.
(b) As used in  this chapter, “mental disorder” includes any physical disorder caused or worsened
by mental stress.
(2)(a) The worker must prove that employment conditions were the major  contributing cause of
the disease.
(b) If the occupational disease claim is based  on the worsening of a preexisting disease or con-
dition pursuant to ORS 656.005 (7), the worker  must prove that employment conditions were the
major contributing cause of the combined condition and pathological worsening of the disease.
(c) Occupational diseases shall be subject to all of  the same limitations and exclusions as acci-
dental injuries under ORS 656.005 (7).
(d) Existence of an occupational disease or worsening  of a preexisting disease must be estab-
lished by medical evidence supported by objective findings.
(e) Preexisting conditions shall be deemed causes in determining  major contributing cause under
this section.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a mental disorder is  not compensable
under this chapter unless the worker establishes all of the following:
(a) The employment conditions producing the  mental disorder exist in a real and objective sense.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3507
SB 606
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The employment conditions producing the  mental disorder are conditions other than condi-
tions generally inherent in every working situation  or reasonable disciplinary, corrective or job
performance evaluation actions by the  employer, or cessation of employment or employment deci-
sions attendant upon ordinary business or financial cycles.
(c) There is a diagnosis of a mental or  emotional disorder which is generally recognized in the
medical or psychological community.
(d) There is clear and convincing evidence  that the mental disorder arose out of and in the
course of employment.
(4)(a) Death, disability or impairment of health of firefighters of any political  division who have
completed five or more years of employment as  firefighters, caused by any disease of the lungs or
respiratory tract, hypertension  or cardiovascular-renal disease, and resulting from their employment
as firefighters is  an “occupational disease.” Any condition or impairment of health arising under this
subsection shall be presumed to  result from a firefighter’s employment. However, any such fire-
fighter must have taken a physical examination upon becoming a firefighter, or subsequently thereto,
which failed to reveal  any evidence of such condition or impairment of health which preexisted
employment. Denial of a claim for any condition or  impairment of health arising under this sub-
section must be on the basis of clear and convincing medical  evidence that the cause of the condi-
tion or impairment is unrelated to the firefighter’s employment.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 656.027 (6), a city that  provides a disability or retirement system for
firefighters by ordinance or charter that is not  subject to this chapter, when accepting and pro-
cessing claims for death, disability or impairment of health from firefighters covered by  the disabil-
ity or retirement system, shall apply:
(A) The provisions of this subsection; and
(B) For claims filed under this subsection, the time  limitations for filing claims that are set forth
in ORS 656.807 (1) and (2).
(5)(a) Death, disability or  impairment of health of a nonvolunteer firefighter employed by a pol-
itical division or subdivision who has completed five  or more years of employment as a nonvolunteer
firefighter is an occupational disease if the death, disability or impairment of health:
(A) Is caused by brain cancer, colon  cancer, stomach cancer, testicular cancer, prostate cancer,
multiple myeloma, non-Hodgkin’s lymphoma, cancer of  the throat or mouth, rectal cancer, breast
cancer, leukemia, bladder cancer or gynecologic cancer of the  uterus, fallopian tubes, ovaries,
cervix, vagina or vulva;
(B) Results from the firefighter’s employment as a nonvolunteer firefighter; and
(C) Is first diagnosed by a physician after July 1, 2009.
(b) Any condition or impairment of health arising under this subsection is  presumed to result
from the firefighter’s  employment. Denial of a claim for any condition or impairment of health aris-
ing under this subsection must be on the basis of clear and convincing medical evidence that the
condition or impairment was not caused or  contributed to in material part by the firefighter’s em-
ployment.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection, the presumption established under para-
graph (b) of this subsection may be rebutted by clear and convincing evidence that the use of  to-
bacco by the nonvolunteer firefighter is the major contributing cause of the cancer.
(d) The presumption established under paragraph (b) of this subsection does  not apply to pro-
state cancer if the cancer is first diagnosed by a  physician after the firefighter has reached the age
of 55. However, nothing in this paragraph affects the right of a firefighter to establish the
[2]
SB 606
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
compensability of prostate cancer without benefit of the presumption.
(e) The presumption established under paragraph (b) of this subsection does not  apply to claims
filed more than  84 months following the termination of the nonvolunteer firefighter’s employment
as a nonvolunteer firefighter. However, nothing in this paragraph affects the  right of a firefighter
to establish the compensability of the cancer without benefit of the presumption.
(f) The presumption established under paragraph (b) of  this subsection does not apply to volun-
teer firefighters.
(g) Nothing in this subsection affects the provisions of subsection (4) of this section.
(h) For purposes of this subsection, “nonvolunteer firefighter” means a  firefighter who performs
firefighting services and receives salary, hourly wages equal to or greater than the  state minimum
wage, or other compensation except for room, board,  lodging, housing, meals, stipends, reimburse-
ment for expenses or nominal payments  for time and travel, regardless of whether any such com-
pensation is subject to federal, state or local  taxation. “Nominal payments for time and travel”
includes, but is not limited to,  payments for on-call time or time spent responding to a call or similar
noncash benefits.
(6) Notwithstanding ORS 656.027 (6),  any city providing a disability and retirement system by
ordinance or charter for firefighters and police officers not subject  to this chapter shall apply the
presumptions established under subsection (5) of  this section when processing claims for firefighters
covered by the system.
(7)(a) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Acute stress disorder” has the meaning given that term in the DSM-5.
(B) “Covered  employee” means an individual who, on the date a claim is filed under this chapter:
(i) Was employed for at  least five years by, or experienced a single traumatic event that satisfies
the criteria set forth  in the DSM-5 as Criterion A for diagnosing post-traumatic stress disorder while
employed by, the state, a political subdivision of the state, a  special government body, as defined in
ORS 174.117, or a public agency in any of these occupations:
(I) A full-time paid firefighter;
(II) A full-time paid emergency medical services provider;
(III) A full-time paid police officer;
(IV) A full-time paid corrections officer or youth correction officer;
(V) A full-time paid parole and probation officer; [ or]
(VI) A full-time paid emergency dispatcher or 9-1-1 emergency operator; [ and]
(VII) A full-time paid  employee of the Oregon State Hospital who has direct contact with
patients; or
(VIII) A full-time paid employee of the Department  of Human Services who works at the
Stabilization and Crisis Unit; and
(ii) Remains employed in an occupation listed in  sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph or
separated from employment in the occupation not more than seven years previously.
(C) “DSM-5” means the fifth edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual  of Mental Disor-
ders published by the American Psychiatric Association.
(D) “Post-traumatic stress disorder” has the meaning given that term in the DSM-5.
(E) “Psychiatrist”  means a psychiatrist whom the Oregon Medical Board has licensed and cer-
tified as eligible to diagnose the conditions described in this subsection.
(F) “Psychologist” means  a licensed psychologist, as defined in ORS 675.010, whom the Oregon
Board of Psychology has certified as eligible to diagnose the conditions described in this  subsection.
[3]
SB 606
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
(b) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, if a  covered employee establishes
through a preponderance of persuasive medical evidence from  a psychiatrist or psychologist that the
covered employee has more likely than not satisfied the  diagnostic criteria in the DSM-5 for post-
traumatic stress disorder or acute stress disorder, any resulting  death, disability or impairment of
health of the  covered employee shall be presumed to be compensable as an occupational disease.
An insurer or self-insured employer may rebut the presumption  only by establishing through clear
and convincing medical evidence that duties as a covered employee were not  of real importance or
great consequence in causing the diagnosed condition.
(c) An  insurer’s or self-insured employer’s acceptance of a claim of post-traumatic stress disorder
or acute stress disorder under this subsection, whether the acceptance was voluntary or was a  re-
sult of a  judgment or order, does not preclude the insurer or the self-insured employer from later
denying the  current compensability of the claim if exposure as a covered employee to trauma that
meets the diagnostic criteria set forth  as Criterion A in the DSM-5 for post-traumatic stress disorder
or acute stress disorder ceases being of real importance or great consequence in causing the  disa-
bility, impairment of health or a need for treatment.
(d) An insurer or self-insured employer may deny  a claim under paragraph (c) of this subsection
only on the basis of clear and convincing medical evidence.
(e) Notwithstanding ORS 656.027 (6), a city that provides  a disability or retirement system for
firefighters and police officers by ordinance or charter that is not subject to this chapter, when ac-
cepting and processing claims for death, disability or impairment of health from firefighters  and
police officers covered by the disability or retirement system, shall apply:
(A) The provisions of this subsection; and
(B) For claims filed under this subsection, the time  limitations for filing claims that are set forth
in ORS 656.807 (1) and (2).
[4]