Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 431A.175 is amended to read:
431A.175. (1) As used in this section and ORS 431A.183:
(a)(A) “Characterizing flavor” means:
(i) An artificial or natural taste, flavor, aroma, smell  or sensation not attributable ex-
clusively to tobacco that an ordinary consumer would distinguish prior to  or during con-
sumption, including but not limited to a taste, flavor, aroma, smell or sensation related  to
menthol, mint,  wintergreen, chocolate, cocoa, vanilla, honey or molasses or any fruit, candy,
dessert, alcoholic beverage, herb or spice.
(ii) A product about which the manufacturer of the product or a third  party authorized
by the manufacturer makes an express  or implied public statement that describes the prod-
uct as producing a taste, flavor, aroma, smell  or sensation related to a minty or cooling ef-
fect or chill, ice, fresh, arctic or frost.
(B) “Characterizing flavor” does not include the artificial or natural taste, flavor, aroma,
smell or sensation of cannabis.
(b) “Flavored inhalant delivery system product” means an  inhalant delivery system
product that imparts a characterizing flavor.
(c) “Flavored tobacco product” means a tobacco product manufactured to impart a
characterizing flavor.
[(a)(A)] (d)(A) “Inhalant delivery system” means:
(i) A device that can be used to deliver [ nicotine or ] cannabinoids or nicotine in the form of a
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 230
SB 702
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vapor or aerosol to a person inhaling from the device; or
(ii) A component of a device described in this subparagraph  or a substance in any form sold for
the purpose of being vaporized or aerosolized by a device described in  this subparagraph, whether
or not  the component or substance is sold separately [ or is not sold separately ].
(B) “Inhalant delivery system” does not include:
(i) Any product that has been approved by the United States Food  and Drug Administration for
sale as a  tobacco cessation product or for any other therapeutic purpose, if the product is marketed
and sold solely for the approved purpose; and
(ii) Tobacco products.
(e) “Nicotine”  means any form of the chemical nicotine, regardless of whether the
chemical is naturally or synthetically derived, including  any salt, complex, alkaloid or analog.
[(b)] (f) “Tobacco products” means:
(A) Any product that contains, is  made from or is derived from tobacco or nicotine, such
as bidis, cigars, cheroots, stogies, periques, granulated, plug cut, crimp cut, ready  rubbed and other
smoking tobacco, snuff, snuff flour, cavendish,  plug and twist tobacco, fine-cut and other chewing
tobaccos,  shorts,  refuse scraps, clippings, cuttings and sweepings of tobacco and other forms of to-
bacco  or nicotine , prepared in a manner that  makes the tobacco or nicotine suitable for human
consumption [ chewing or smoking in a pipe or otherwise, or for both chewing and smoking ];
(B) Cigarettes as defined in ORS 323.010 (1); or
(C) A device that:
(i) Can be used to deliver tobacco products to a person using the device; and
(ii) Has not been approved by the United States Food and Drug  Administration for sale as a
tobacco cessation product or for any other therapeutic purpose, if  the product is marketed and sold
solely for the approved purpose.
(2) It is unlawful:
(a) To violate ORS 167.755.
(b) To fail as a retailer of  tobacco products to post a notice substantially similar to the notice
described in subsection (3) of this section in a location that is clearly visible to the seller and  the
purchaser of the tobacco products.
(c) To fail as a retailer of inhalant delivery systems to post a notice in a location that  is clearly
visible to the seller and the purchaser of the inhalant delivery systems that it is  unlawful to sell
inhalant delivery systems to persons under 21  years of age. The Oregon Health Authority shall
adopt by rule the content of the notice required under this paragraph.
(d) To distribute, sell  or [ allow to be sold ] offer for sale  an inhalant delivery system if the
inhalant delivery system is not labeled in accordance with rules adopted by the authority.
(e) To distribute, sell or [ allow to be sold ] offer for sale  an inhalant delivery system  if the
inhalant delivery system is not packaged in child-resistant safety  packaging, as required by the au-
thority by rule.
(f) To distribute, sell or  [ allow to be sold ] offer for sale  an inhalant delivery system if the
inhalant delivery system is packaged in a manner that  is attractive to minors, as determined by the
authority by rule.
(g) To distribute, sell or [ allow to be sold ] offer for sale  cigarettes in any form  other than a
sealed package that contains at least 20 cigarettes.
(h) To distribute, sell, attempt to sell or offer for  sale a flavored inhalant delivery system
product or flavored tobacco product in this state.
[2]
SB 702
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) To distribute, offer or otherwise provide, without compensation, any  tobacco product
or inhalant delivery system.
(3) The notice required by subsection (2)(b) of this section must be substantially as follows:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
NOTICE
The sale of tobacco in any form to persons under 21 years of age is prohibited by  law. Any
person who sells, or allows to be sold, tobacco to a person  under 21 years of age is in violation of
Oregon law.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(4) Rules adopted under subsection (2)(d), (e) and (f) of this section must be consistent with any
regulation adopted by the United States Food and Drug Administration related to labeling  or pack-
aging requirements for inhalant delivery systems.
(5) This section does not preempt a local government, as defined in ORS 174.116,  from
enacting an ordinance, rule or resolution, or from taking  other legislative action, that im-
poses requirements or prohibitions on the sale of  inhalant delivery system products or to-
bacco products that are more stringent than the requirements or  prohibitions set forth in
this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 167.750 is amended to read:
167.750. For purposes of ORS 167.755 [ and 431A.175], “allows to be sold” includes the negligent
omission of an act by a manager or other person who  supervises the retail sale of tobacco products
or inhalant delivery systems, the commission of which would have prevented the distribution or  sale
of the tobacco products or inhalant delivery system.
SECTION 3.  ORS 180.441 is amended to read:
180.441. (1)(a) A person engaged in the business of selling cigarettes,  inhalant delivery systems
or smokeless tobacco products for profit may not ship or transport,  or cause to be shipped or
transported, cigarettes, inhalant delivery systems or  smokeless tobacco products ordered or pur-
chased by mail or telephone or through a computer or other electronic network to any person in this
state other than a distributor or retailer.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply to  a freight forwarder or motor carrier, as
those terms are defined in 49 U.S.C. 13102, as in effect on August 8,  2017, or an air carrier, as de-
fined in 49 U.S.C. 40102, as in effect on August 8, 2017.
(2) A retailer may not sell cigarettes, inhalant delivery systems or smokeless tobacco products
unless the retailer or an employee of the retailer makes the  sale to the purchaser in person as part
of a face-to-face exchange  that occurs  on premises, as defined in ORS 431A.190, that are li-
censed under ORS 431A.198 or an ordinance, rule or resolution adopted by a local government
as defined in ORS 174.116 .
(3) A person may not knowingly provide substantial assistance to a person  that is violating
subsection (1) or (2) of this section.
SECTION 4.
A local government, as defined in ORS 174.116, that, on or  before the oper-
ative date specified in  section 5 of this 2025 Act, enforces an ordinance, rule or resolution,
or has taken other legislative action, that imposes requirements or prohibitions  on the sale
of inhalant delivery system products  or tobacco products that are more stringent than the
requirements or prohibitions set forth in ORS 431A.175, as amended by  section 1 of this 2025
[3]
SB 702
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
Act, may continue to enforce the ordinance, rule, resolution or  other legislative action after
the operative date specified in section 5 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
(1) The amendments to ORS 431A.175 by section 1  of this 2025 Act become
operative on October 1, 2025.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take any  action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the authority to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the authority by the amendments to ORS 431A.175 by  section 1 of
this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]