Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 475.925 is amended to read:
475.925. When a person is convicted of  the unlawful delivery or manufacture of a controlled
substance, the court shall sentence the person to a term of incarceration  [ ranging from ] as
follows:
(1) 58 months to 130 months, depending on the person’s criminal history, if the delivery or
manufacture involves:
(a) 500 grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of cocaine;
(b) 500 grams  or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of metham-
phetamine, its salts, isomers or salts of its isomers;
(c) 100 grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of heroin;
(d) 100 grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of  fentanyl, or
any substituted derivative of fentanyl as defined by the rules of the State Board of Pharmacy; or
(e) 100 grams or more or 500 or more pills, tablets or capsules of a  mixture or substance con-
taining a detectable amount of ecstasy.
(2) 34 months to 72 months, depending on the person’s criminal  history, if the delivery or man-
ufacture involves:
(a) 100 grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of cocaine;
(b) 100 grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount  of metham-
phetamine, its salts, isomers or salts of its isomers;
(c) 50 grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of heroin;
(d) 50 grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of  fentanyl, or
any substituted derivative of fentanyl as defined by the rules of the State Board of Pharmacy; or
(e) 50 grams or more or 250 or more pills, tablets or capsules of a mixture or  substance con-
taining a detectable amount of ecstasy.
(3) 36 months,  or any term of incarceration required by law or prescribed by the sen-
tencing guidelines of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission,  whichever is longer, if the
person has a conviction for a previous unlawful delivery or  manufacture of a controlled
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 728
HB 2142
1
2
3
substance, or attempted delivery or manufacture  of a controlled substance, within the pre-
vious five years.
[2]