Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 183.
SECTION 2. Upon the written request of 10 members  of the Legislative Assembly sub-
mitted to  the President of the Senate or the Speaker of the House of Representatives ob-
jecting to any rule  adopted by an agency, the agency shall appear before an appropriate
committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly for a hearing on the rule.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3448