Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 442.
SECTION 2. (1) A  hospital licensed in this state shall report to the Oregon Health Au-
thority and make publicly available on the hospital’s website securities data and disclosure
documents that the hospital provides and makes publicly available on  a website operated by
the federal Municipal Securities Rulemaking Board established under 15 U.S.C. 78o-4(b).
(2) A hospital shall report  to the authority and make publicly available the information
described under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Within 24 hours of providing the  information to the federal Municipal Securities
Rulemaking Board, or as frequently as required by the authority; and
(b) In a form and manner required by the authority.
(3) If a hospital does  not have a website, the information described under subsection (1)
of this section must be made available in hard  copy form in each reception area of the hos-
pital.
(4) The information that  must be reported to the authority under this section is in ad-
dition to and not in  lieu of the reporting requirements in ORS 442.386 or 442.425 or other
similar provisions.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2311