Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Department of Emergency  Management shall study seaport
transportation infrastructure  resilience. The department shall submit a report in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and  may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim
committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to emergency management no later than
September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2804