Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Transportation shall translate the student driver  ed-
ucation curriculum and the student driver education instructor curriculum into the  Spanish
language and provide links to the curriculum on the department’s website.
(2) The department shall also make printed copies available for purchase and may charge
a fee to cover the printing costs.
(3) The translated materials must be updated at least once every three years.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2444