Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
For purposes of classifying an individual’s status as an employee  or an in-
dependent contractor as necessary for those agencies responsible for  administering ORS
671.510 to 671.760, ORS chapters 316,  656, 657 and 701 and the wage and hour laws under ORS
chapters 652 and 653, each respective agency shall determine the individual’s status as fol-
lows:
(1) For the  Bureau of Labor and Industries, the bureau shall determine whether the in-
dividual meets  the criteria of an independent contractor according to criteria prescribed by
the bureau by rule.
(2) For agencies other than  the Bureau of Labor and Industries, the agency shall deter-
mine whether the  individual meets the criteria of an independent contractor, as defined in
ORS 670.600.
(3)(a) If an agency determines that the  individual meets the criteria of an independent
contractor under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the agency shall then consider  and
weigh the following factors:
(A) The degree of control that is exercised by the entity for whom  the individual per-
forms work.
(B) The extent of  the relative capital or entrepreneurial investments of the individual and
the entity for whom the individual performs work.
(C) The degree to which  the individual’s opportunity for profit and loss is determined by
the entity for whom the individual performs work.
(D) The skill and initiative required of the individual in performing the work.
(E) The permanence of the relationship between the individual and the  entity for whom
the individual performs work.
(F) The extent  to which the work performed by the individual is an integral part of the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 650
SB 704
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
business of the entity for whom the individual performs work, including whether  the work
performed is outside the usual course of business of the entity.
(b) The agency shall find  that an employment relationship exists between the individual
and the entity for whom the individual performs work when the factors  under paragraph (a)
of this subsection demonstrate, on balance, that the individual is economically dependent  on
the entity for work.
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in  any proceeding where a
question of fact regarding the classification of an  individual as an employee or an independ-
ent contractor is at issue, there is a rebuttable presumption that  the individual is an em-
ployee whenever another individual or entity  engages the individual to perform work in
exchange for remuneration. An individual or entity that engages  an individual to perform
such work may overcome the presumption by  demonstrating by a preponderance of the evi-
dence that the factors and criteria described in section 1 of  this 2025 Act establish that the
individual is an independent contractor.
SECTION 3.  ORS 670.605 is amended to read:
670.605. (1)  In accordance with ORS chapter 183, those agencies responsible for [ the adminis-
tration of ] administering ORS 671.510 to 671.760 , [and] ORS chapters 316, 656, 657 and 701  and the
wage and hour  laws under ORS chapters 652 and 653  jointly shall adopt rules to carry out the
provisions of ORS 670.600  and section 1 of this 2025 Act .
(2) The agencies  responsible for [ the administration of ] administering ORS 671.510 to 671.760 ,
[and] ORS chapters 316, 656, 657 and 701  and the wage  and hour laws under ORS chapters 652
and 653 shall cooperate as  necessary in their compliance and enforcement activities to ensure
among the agencies  the consistent interpretation and application of ORS 670.600  and section 1 of
this 2025 Act .
[2]