Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 456.515 to
456.725.
SECTION 2. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall provide grants
to developers of  moderate income housing for the purposes of paying for permitting fees or
system development charges for the construction of moderate income housing.
(2) The department  may not award more than the total amount of fees and charges as-
sessed for the development.
(3) The department shall distribute grant moneys  awarded under this section directly to
the local government or service district assessing the fee or charge.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $15,000,000 to implement section 2 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4375