Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 137.103 is amended to read:
137.103. As used in ORS 137.101 to 137.109:
(1) “Criminal activities” means any offense with respect to which the defendant is  convicted or
any other criminal conduct admitted by the defendant.
(2) “Economic damages”:
(a) Has the meaning given  that term in ORS 31.710, except that “economic damages” does not
include future impairment of earning capacity; and
(b) In cases involving criminal activities described in ORS 163.263, 163.264 or 163.266, includes
the greater of:
(A) The value to the defendant of the victim’s services as defined in ORS 163.261; or
(B) The value of the victim’s services, as defined in  ORS 163.261, computed using the minimum
wage established under ORS  653.025 and the overtime provisions of the federal Fair Labor Standards
Act of 1938 (29 U.S.C. 201 et seq.).
(3) “Restitution” means full, partial or nominal payment of economic  damages to a victim.
Restitution is independent of and may be awarded in addition to a  compensatory fine awarded under
ORS 137.101.
(4) “Victim” means:
(a) The person or decedent against whom the defendant committed the  criminal offense, if the
court determines that the person  or decedent has suffered or did suffer economic damages as a re-
sult of the offense.
(b) Any person not described  in paragraph (a) of this subsection whom the court determines has
suffered economic damages as a result of the defendant’s criminal activities.
(c) The Criminal Injuries Compensation Account,  if it has expended moneys on behalf of a victim
described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3037
SB 214
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) An insurance carrier, if it has expended moneys on behalf of a victim  described in paragraph
(a) of this subsection.
(e) Upon the death of a victim described in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, the estate
of the victim.
(f) The estate, successor in interest, trust,  trustee, successor trustee or beneficiary of a trust
against which the defendant committed the criminal offense, if  the court determines that the estate,
successor in interest, trust, trustee, successor trustee or beneficiary of a trust suffered economic
damages as a result of the offense.
(g) Any person or entity that has suffered economic  damages from expending moneys on
behalf of, or providing services to, a minor victim as a result of the offense.
(5) “Victim” does not include any coparticipant in the defendant’s criminal activities.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 137.106 is amended to read:
137.106. (1)(a) When a person is convicted of a crime[ ,] or a violation as described in ORS
153.008, [that] or is found guilty except for insanity of a  crime under ORS 161.290 to 161.373,
and the crime or violation  has resulted in economic damages,  the district attorney shall investi-
gate and present to the court, at the time of sentencing or within 90 days after  entry of the judg-
ment, evidence of the nature and amount of  the damages. The court may extend the time by which
the presentation must be made for good  cause. Evidence of economic damages consisting of a
record, bill, estimate or invoice, introduced by the district attorney during  the presentation,
creates a rebuttable presumption that the charge, expense or cost documented in  the evi-
dence is reasonable. If the court finds from the evidence presented that a victim suffered  economic
damages, in addition to any other sanction it may impose,  the court shall enter a judgment or sup-
plemental judgment requiring that the defendant pay the victim restitution in a specific  amount that
equals the full amount of the victim’s economic damages as determined by the court.  The lien, pri-
ority of the lien and ability to enforce the  specific amount of restitution established under this
paragraph by a supplemental judgment relates back to the date of the original  judgment that is
supplemented.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a court  may order that the defendant pay
the victim restitution in  a specific amount that is less than the full amount of the victim’s economic
damages only if:
(A) The victim or, if the victim is an estate, successor in interest,  trust or other entity, an au-
thorized representative of the victim consents to the lesser amount, if the  conviction is not for a
person felony; or
(B) The victim or, if the victim is an estate, successor in interest, trust or  other entity, an au-
thorized representative of the victim consents in writing to  the lesser amount, if the conviction is
for a person felony.
(c) As used in this subsection, “person felony” has the  meaning given that term in the rules of
the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(2) After the district attorney makes a presentation described in  subsection (1) of this section,
if the court is unable to find from the evidence presented that a victim suffered economic damages,
the court shall make a finding on the record to that effect.
(3) No finding  made by the court or failure of the court to make a finding under this section
limits or impairs the rights of a person injured to sue  and recover damages in a civil action as
provided in ORS 137.109.
(4)(a) If a judgment or supplemental judgment described in subsection (1) of  this section includes
[2]
SB 214
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
restitution, a court may delay the enforcement of the monetary sanctions, including restitution,  only
if the defendant  alleges and establishes to the satisfaction of the court the defendant’s inability to
pay the judgment in full at the time the judgment is entered. If the court  finds that the defendant
is unable to pay, the court may establish or allow an appropriate supervising authority  to establish
a payment  schedule, taking into consideration the financial resources of the defendant and the bur-
den that payment of restitution will impose, with due regard to the other obligations  of the defend-
ant. The supervising authority shall  be authorized to modify any payment schedule established under
this section.
(b) As used in this subsection, “supervising authority” means any state or local agency  that is
authorized to supervise the defendant.
(5) If the defendant objects to the imposition, amount or distribution of  the restitution, the court
shall allow the defendant to be heard on such issue at  the time of sentencing or at the time the
court determines the amount of restitution.
(6)(a) At least  10 days prior to the presentation described in subsection (1) of this section, the
district attorney shall:
(A) Disclose to the defendant the names of any witnesses that may be called during the pres-
entation; and
(B) Provide the defendant with copies  of, or allow the defendant to inspect, any exhibits that
will be used or introduced during the presentation.
(b) If the court finds that the district attorney has violated the requirements of this  subsection,
the court shall grant a continuance to allow additional time for preparation upon request  of the
defendant. Any additional time granted under this paragraph may not count toward the  90-day time
limitation described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 419C.450 is amended to read:
419C.450. (1)(a) It is the policy of the State of Oregon to  encourage and promote the payment
of restitution and other obligations by youth offenders  as well as by adult offenders. In any case
within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to ORS  419C.005 in which the youth offender
caused another person any physical, emotional  or psychological injury or any loss of or damage to
property, the victim has the right to receive prompt restitution. The  district attorney shall investi-
gate and present to the court, prior to , [ or] at the time of  or within 90 days after  adjudication  or
other final disposition, evidence of the  nature and amount of the injury, loss or damage.  The court
may extend the time by which the presentation must be made for good  cause.  If the court
finds from the evidence presented that a victim suffered injury, loss or damage, in  addition to any
other sanction it may impose, the court shall:
(A) Include  in the judgment a requirement that the youth offender pay the victim restitution in
a specific amount that equals the full amount of the victim’s injury, loss  or damage as determined
by the court; or
(B) Include in the judgment a requirement that the  youth offender pay the victim restitution,
and that the specific amount of restitution will be established by a supplemental judgment based
upon a determination made by  the court within 90 days of entry of the judgment. In the supple-
mental judgment, the court  shall establish a specific amount of restitution that equals the full
amount of the victim’s injury,  loss or damage as determined by the court. The court may extend the
time within which the determination and supplemental judgment may be completed for  good cause.
The lien, priority of the lien and ability to enforce a specific  amount of restitution established under
this subparagraph by a supplemental judgment relates back to  the date of the original judgment that
[3]
SB 214
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
is supplemented.
(b) After the district attorney makes a presentation described in paragraph (a) of this subsection,
if the court is unable to find from the evidence presented that a victim  suffered injury, loss or
damage, the court shall make a finding on the record to that effect.
(c) No finding made by the court or  failure of the court to make a finding under this subsection
limits or impairs the rights of a person injured to sue  and recover damages in a civil action under
subsection (2) of this section.
(d) The court may  order restitution, including but not limited to counseling and treatment ex-
penses, for emotional or psychological injury under this section only:
(A) When the act that brought  the youth offender within the jurisdiction of the court would
constitute aggravated murder, murder or a sex crime if committed by an adult; and
(B) For an injury  suffered by the victim or a member of the victim’s family who observed the
act.
(e) If the youth offender will be present at a hearing under this subsection  and the victim re-
quests notice, the district attorney or juvenile department shall notify the victim of the hearing.
(2) Restitution  for injury inflicted upon a person by the youth offender, for property taken,
damaged or destroyed  by the youth offender and for a reward offered by the victim or an organiza-
tion authorized by the victim  and paid for information leading to the apprehension of the youth
offender, shall  be required as a condition of probation. Restitution does not limit or impair the right
of a victim to sue in a civil action for damages suffered, nor shall  the fact of consultation by the
victim be admissible in such  civil action to prove consent or agreement by the victim. However, the
court shall credit any restitution paid by the  youth offender to a victim against any judgment in
favor of the victim in such civil action.  Before setting the amount of such restitution, the court shall
notify the person upon whom the injury was  inflicted or the owner of the property taken, damaged
or destroyed and give such person an opportunity to be heard on the issue of restitution.
(3)(a) If a judgment or supplemental judgment described in subsection (1) of  this section includes
restitution, a court may delay the enforcement of the monetary sanctions, including restitution,  only
if the youth offender alleges and establishes to the satisfaction of the court the youth offender’s in-
ability to pay the judgment in full at the time  the judgment is entered. If the court finds that the
youth offender is unable to pay, the court may establish or allow an appropriate  supervising au-
thority to establish a payment schedule. The supervising authority shall be  authorized to modify any
payment schedule established under this section. In establishing a payment schedule, the court or
the supervising authority shall take into consideration:
(A) The  availability to the youth offender of paid employment during such time as the youth
offender may be committed to a youth correction facility;
(B) The financial  resources of the youth offender and the burden that payment of restitution
will impose, with due regard to the other obligations of the youth offender;
(C) The present and future ability of the youth offender to  pay restitution on an installment
basis or on other conditions to be fixed by the court; and
(D) The rehabilitative effect on the youth  offender of the payment of restitution and the method
of payment.
(b) As used in this subsection, “supervising authority” means any state or local agency  that is
authorized to supervise the youth offender.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 419C.501 and  419C.504, when the court has ordered a youth offender
to pay restitution, as provided in this section, the judgment shall  be entered in the register or
[4]
SB 214
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
docket of the court in the manner provided by ORS chapter 18 and enforced in the manner provided
by ORS 18.252 to 18.993. The judgment is in favor of the state and may be enforced only by the state.
Notwithstanding ORS 419A.255, a judgment for restitution entered under this subsection is a  public
record. Judgments entered under this subsection are subject to ORS 18.048.
(5) A person required to pay restitution under  subsection (1) of this section may file a motion
supported by an affidavit for satisfaction of  the judgment or supplemental judgment requiring pay-
ment of restitution in the circuit court of the county  in which the original judgment was entered if:
(a) At  least 50 percent of the monetary obligation is satisfied or at least 10 years have passed
since the original judgment was entered;
(b) The person has substantially complied with all established payment plans;
(c) The person has not been found to be  within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court under ORS
419C.005 or convicted of an offense since the date the original judgment of restitution was entered;
and
(d) The person has satisfactorily completed any required period of probation or  parole for the
act for which the judgment of restitution was entered.
(6) When a  person files a motion described in subsection (5) of this section, the district attorney
for the county in which  the motion was filed shall promptly notify the victim for whose benefit the
judgment of  restitution was entered that the person has filed the motion and that the victim may
object in writing to the motion through the district attorney.
(7) If the victim does not object to the motion  as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
court shall hold a hearing on the motion and may enter an order granting a  full or partial satis-
faction if the allegations in the affidavit supporting the motion are true and failure to grant the
motion would  result in an injustice. In determining whether an injustice would result, the court shall
take into account:
(a) The financial resources of the defendant and the burden that continued  payment of
restitution will impose, with due regard to the other obligations of the defendant;
(b) The ability of the defendant  to continue paying restitution on an installment basis or under
other conditions to be fixed by the court; and
(c) The rehabilitative effect on the defendant of the  continued payment of restitution and the
method of payment.
(8) A person may  file a motion under subsection (5) of this section no more than one time per
year for each judgment of restitution entered against the person.
SECTION 4.
The amendments to ORS 137.103, 137.106  and 419C.450 by sections 1 to 3 of
this 2021 Act apply to crimes committed on or after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
[5]