Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 336.840 is amended to read:
336.840. [(1) As used in this  section, “independent communication” means communication that does
not require assistance or  interpretation by an individual who is not part of the communication but that
may require the use or assistance of an electronic device. ]
[(2) Each district school board shall adopt policies for the use of  personal electronic devices in the
schools of the school district as provided by this section. ]
[(3) A district school board shall adopt a policy for the use of personal  electronic devices that
support academic activities and independent communications. The policy must provide that: ]
[(a) Students may be allowed to  use personal electronic devices that support academic activities and
independent communications.]
[(b) Unless otherwise specifically  prohibited by the policy, students may not be denied the oppor-
tunity to use  a personal electronic device that supports academic activities and independent communi-
cations.]
[(4) If a school district implements a  curriculum that uses technology, the district school board
shall adopt a policy that provides that: ]
[(a) Students may  be allowed, but are not required, to use their own personal electronic devices for
the curriculum. ]
[(b) Students who  use their own personal electronic devices for the curriculum must be granted
access to any applications or electronic materials that  are available to students who do not use their
own personal electronic devices for the curriculum. ]
[(c) Students who use their own  personal electronic devices for the curriculum must be granted
access to applications and  electronic materials free of charge if the applications and electronic materials
are provided free of charge to students who do not use their own personal electronic devices for  the
curriculum.]
[(5) A policy adopted under subsection (3) or (4) of this section must include  a process and timeline
for responding to a student’s request  related to the use of a personal electronic device, including an
appeals process.]
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 627
HB 2251
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
(1) A district school board shall adopt a policy for the use of student personal  electronic
devices.
(2) Except as provided by subsection (3)  of this section, the policy must prohibit the use
of student personal electronic devices:
(a) On school grounds;
(b) At any school-sponsored activity;
(c) On school-provided transportation; or
(d) At any official school bus stop.
(3) A policy adopted under this section must provide for the use of student  personal
electronic devices when the use complies with the terms of an  individualized education pro-
gram, as defined in ORS 343.035, or an education plan developed for a student with  a disa-
bility in accordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794.
(4) The policy must provide consequences for student noncompliance with the prohibition
on the use of student personal electronic devices.
[(6)] (5) [ School districts must  ensure that the policies adopted under subsection (3) or (4) of this
section are ] A school district must ensure that the policy is  made available to:
(a) School  district personnel [ whose duties may require them to assist students with personal
electronic devices ]; and
(b) Students and parents or guardians of students.
[(7) Nothing in the requirements of this section prevents a district school board from prohibiting: ]
[(a) Telephonic or electronic communications during regular school hours or  during school events
if the communications are not related to academic activities or independent communications; ]
[(b) Communications using access to social media or to nonacademic  sites during regular school
hours or during school events; ]
[(c) The use of personal electronic devices for any purpose  that does not support academic activities
or independent communications; or ]
[(d) The use of personal electronic devices for entertainment purposes. ]
[(8) Nothing in this section authorizes a district school board, or any  employees of or volunteers
for the school district or a  school of the school district, to request, require or compel access to a
student’s electronic mail or personal online accounts. ]
(6) A school district that does  not comply with this section is considered nonstandard
under ORS 327.103.
[2]