Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at the request  of the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue  lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $10 million in net proceeds
and interest earnings for the purposes described in subsection  (2) of this section, plus an
additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be  necessary to pay bond-related
costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this  section in an amount sufficient to
provide $10 million in net proceeds and interest earnings must be transferred to  the Oregon
Business Development Department for deposit in the Levee Project Subaccount  established
in the Special Public Works Fund under ORS 285B.456, to be used for any purpose for  which
funds in the Levee  Project Subaccount may be used, including, without limitation, investi-
gating the adequacy of levees and improving levees so they may be certified and accredited.
(3) Lottery bonds authorized  under this section must be issued no later than June 30,
2020.
(4) The Legislative Assembly finds that levees  are a vital component of the state’s
infrastructure and play an essential role in furthering economic development and  protecting
parks, beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife within  Oregon. The Legislative As-
sembly thereby finds that the use of lottery bonds for the purposes  described in subsection
(2) of this section is an appropriate use of state lottery funds under Article XV, section 4,
of the Oregon Constitution, and ORS 461.510.
SECTION 2.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1839