Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall provide grants to disabled
veterans, as defined  in ORS 408.225, for accessibility resources at residences inhabited by
disabled veterans if the residence is owned by the veteran or a family member of the veteran.
(2) The department shall prioritize providing grants under this section to  disabled veter-
ans with an income not exceeding 80 percent of  the area median income in which the veteran
resides as determined by the Oregon Housing Stability Council based on information from the
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.
(3) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall consult and coordinate with county
veterans’ service officers to provide grants to disabled veterans under this section.
(4) The department may adopt rules necessary for the administration of this section.
(5) The department shall submit a report in the manner provided  by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for  legislation, to an interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly related to veterans no later than December 15 of each  even-numbered year. The
report must address:
(a) Successes, challenges and opportunities for improvement  of the administration of this
section.
(b) The amount and manner in which  moneys were granted to disabled veterans under
this section.
(c) Any outstanding balance of moneys  in the Disabled Veterans Assistance Fund estab-
lished under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) The  Disabled Veterans Assistance Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The Disabled Veterans Assistance Fund consists of moneys  appropriated, allocated,
deposited or transferred to the fund by the  Legislative Assembly or otherwise. Interest
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4294
HB 3627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
earned by the Disabled Veterans Assistance Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of Veterans’
Affairs to carry out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall submit the first report required
under section 1 (5) of this 2025 Act no later than December 15, 2026.
SECTION 4. Section 3 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department  of Veterans’ Affairs, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000 for deposit in the  Disabled Veterans Assistance
Fund established under section 2 of this 2025 Act, to be  used for the purpose of carrying out
the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]