Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 825.476 is amended to read:
825.476.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
MILEAGE TAX RATE TABLE “A”
Declared Combined Fee Rates
Weight Groups Per Mile
(Pounds) (Mills)
26,001 to 28,000 [76.4] 92.6
28,001 to 30,000 [80.9] 94.1
30,001 to 32,000 [84.6] 95.6
32,001 to 34,000 [88.4] 97.1
34,001 to 36,000 [91.8] 98.7
36,001 to 38,000 [96.6] 100.3
38,001 to 40,000 [100.2] 101.9
40,001 to 42,000 [103.8] 103.5
42,001 to 44,000 [107.7] 105.2
44,001 to 46,000 [111.3] 106.9
46,001 to 48,000 [114.9] 108.9
48,001 to 50,000 [118.7] 110.3
50,001 to 52,000 [123.1] 112.1
52,001 to 54,000 [127.7] 113.9
54,001 to 56,000 [132.5] 115.7
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 142
SB 1519
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
56,001 to 58,000 [138.0] 117.6
58,001 to 60,000 [144.3] 119.3
60,001 to 62,000 [151.7] 121.4
62,001 to 64,000 [160.1] 123.3
64,001 to 66,000 [169.3] 125.3
66,001 to 68,000 [181.3] 127.3
68,001 to 70,000 [194.1] 129.3
70,001 to 72,000 [206.9] 131.4
72,001 to 74,000 [218.7] 133.5
74,001 to 76,000 [230.0] 135.6
76,001 to 78,000 [241.1] 137.8
78,001 to 80,000 [251.2] 140.0
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
AXLE-WEIGHT MILEAGE
TAX RATE TABLE “B”
Declared Combined Number of Axles
Weight Groups 5 6 7 8 9 or
(Pounds)  (Mills) more
80,001 to 82,000 259.4 237.3 221.8 210.7 198.7
82,001 to 84,000 267.8 241.1 225.4 213.4 201.4
84,001 to 86,000 275.8 246.6 229.1 216.1 204.2
86,001 to 88,000 285.2 252.0 232.7 219.9 206.9
88,001 to 90,000 296.2 258.4 236.5 223.5 210.7
90,001 to 92,000 309.0 265.9 239.9 227.1 214.4
92,001 to 94,000 323.0 273.1 243.8 230.8 217.2
94,001 to 96,000 337.7 281.5 248.3 234.6 220.7
96,001 to 98,000 353.3 291.7 253.9 238.4 224.5
98,001 to 100,000 302.5 259.4 242.8 228.1
100,001 to 102,000 264.9 248.3 231.9
102,001 to 104,000 270.5 253.9 236.5
104,001 to 105,500 277.7 259.4 241.1
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
AXLE-WEIGHT MILEAGE
TAX RATE TABLE “B”
Declared Combined Number of Axles
Weight Groups 5 6 7 8 9 or
(Pounds)  (Mills) more
80,001 to 82,000 247.0 205.8 176.4 154.4 137.2
82,001 to 84,000 253.7 210.6 180.5 157.9 140.3
84,001 to 86,000 260.6 215.5 184.7 161.5 143.5
86,001 to 88,000 267.7 220.5 189.0 165.2 146.8
[2]
SB 1519
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
88,001 to 90,000 275.0 225.6 193.4 169.0 150.1
90,001 to 92,000 282.5 230.8 197.9 172.9 153.5
92,001 to 94,000 290.2 236.2 202.5 176.9 157.0
94,001 to 96,000 298.1 241.7 207.2 181.0 160.6
96,001 to 98,000 340.9 247.3 212.0 185.2 164.2
98,001 to 100,000 271.0 216.9 189.5 167.9
100,001to 102,000 221.9 193.9 171.7
102,001to 104,000 227.0 198.4 175.6
104,001to 105,500 232.3 203.1 179.6
SECTION 2. (1) The Trucking Overpayment Refund Account is created in the State
Highway Fund.  Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the Department of
Transportation. Interest earned by the account shall be credited to the account.
(2) Beginning September 1, 2024, and ending June 30, 2025, each calendar quarter  $41.4
million shall be transferred to the account from revenue generated  from payment of
weight-mile taxes within the State Highway Fund for the purpose of providing refunds  to
taxpayers for overpayment of weight-mile taxes.
(3) The Department of Transportation shall adopt rules  specifying the manner of calcu-
lating, applying and issuing refunds under this  section to taxpayers who overpaid weight-mile
taxes. This section applies to taxes paid beginning July 1, 2023, and ending June 30, 2025.
SECTION 3. (1) To carry out the purposes of Article IX, section 3a (3), of the Oregon
Constitution, and to ensure that users of each class of vehicle are paying  their proportionate
share for the costs of maintenance, operation and improvement of the highways, roads  and
streets of this state, the Department  of Transportation shall limit its expenditures as de-
scribed in this section.
(2) For the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, and for each biennium thereafter, of the
amounts available to the department from revenue  sources described in Article IX, section
3a (3), of the Oregon Constitution, the department may not expend more than the  following:
(a)  percent for bridges.
(b)  percent for seismic improvements related to highways and bridges.
(c)  percent for state highway pavement preservation and culverts.
(d)  percent for state highway maintenance and safety improvements.
(e)  percent for state highway modernization.
(f)  percent for agency administration.
SECTION 4. The amendments to ORS 825.476 by section 1 of this 2024 Act  apply to taxes
imposed on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]