Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
TITLE V FEES
SECTION 1.  ORS 468A.315 is amended to read:
468A.315. (1) The fee schedule required under ORS 468.065 (2) for  a source subject to the federal
operating permit program shall be  based on a schedule established by rule by the Environmental
Quality Commission  in accordance with this section. Except for the additional fee under subsection
[(2)(e)] (3)(c) of this section, this fee schedule shall be in lieu of  any other fee for a permit issued
under ORS 468A.040, 468A.045 or 468A.155.  The fee schedule shall cover all reasonable direct and
indirect costs of implementing the federal operating permit program and shall consist of:
(a) An emission  fee of $  per ton of each regulated pollutant emitted during the prior cal-
endar year as determined under subsection (2) of  this section, subject to annual fee increases as set
forth in paragraph (d) of this subsection. [ The following emission fees apply: ]
[(A) $27 per ton emitted during the 2006 calendar year. ]
[(B) $29 per ton emitted during the 2007 calendar year. ]
[(C) $31 per ton emitted during the 2008 calendar year and each calendar year thereafter. ]
(b) Fees for the following specific elements of the federal operating permit program:
(A) Reviewing and acting upon applications for modifications to federal operating permits.
(B) Any  activity related to permits required under ORS 468A.040 other than the federal operat-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 594
HB 2269
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ing permit program.
(C) Department of Environmental Quality activities  for sources not subject to the federal oper-
ating permit program.
(D) Department review of ambient monitoring networks installed by a source.
(E) Other distinct department activities created by a source or a  group of sources if the com-
mission finds that the activities are unique  and specific and that additional rulemaking is necessary
and will impose costs upon the department that are not  otherwise covered by federal operating
permit program fees.
(c) A base fee for a source subject to the federal operating permit program. [ This base  fee shall
be no ] The base fee may  not be  more than $
 for the period of November 15, 2017,
through November 14, 2018, and  for each annual period thereafter.  [ the fees set forth in sub-
paragraphs (A) to (D) of this paragraph, subject to increases as set forth in paragraph (d)  of this
subsection: ]
[(A) $2,700 for the period of November 15, 2007, through November 14, 2008. ]
[(B) $2,900 for the period of November 15, 2008, through November 14, 2009. ]
[(C) $3,100 for the period of November 15, 2009, through November 14, 2010. ]
[(D) $4,100 for the period of November 15, 2010, through November 14, 2011, and for each annual
period thereafter. ]
(d) An annual increase in the fees set forth in paragraphs (a) to (c) of  this subsection by the
percentage, if any, by which the Consumer Price Index exceeds the Consumer Price Index  as of the
close of the  12-month period ending on August 31, 1989, if the commission determines by rule that
the increased fees are necessary to  cover all reasonable direct and indirect costs of implementing
the federal operating permit program.
(2)(a) The fee on emissions of regulated pollutants required  under this section [ shall] must be
based on the amount of each regulated pollutant  emitted during the prior calendar year as docu-
mented by information provided by the  source in accordance with criteria adopted by the commis-
sion or, if the source  elects to pay the fee based on permitted emissions, the fee shall be based on
the emission limit for the plant site of the major source.
(b) The fee required by subsection  (1)(a) of this section does not apply to any emissions in excess
of [ 4,000 tons per year of any regulated pollutant through calendar  year 2010 and in excess of 7,000
tons per year of all regulated pollutants for each calendar year thereafter ] 7,000 tons of all regulated
pollutants per calendar year . The department may not revise a major source’s plant site  emission
limit due solely to payment of the fee on the basis of documented emissions.
[(c)] (3)(a) The commission shall establish by rule criteria for the acceptability and verifiability
of information related to emissions as documented, including but not limited to the use of:
(A) Emission monitoring;
(B) Material balances;
(C) Emission factors;
(D) Fuel use;
(E) Production data; or
(F) Other calculations.
[(d)] (b) The department shall accept reasonably accurate information that complies with  the
criteria established by the commission as documentation of emissions.
[(e)] (c) The rules  adopted under this section [ shall] must require an additional fee for failure
to pay, substantial underpayment of or late payment of emission fees.
[2]
HB 2269
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(3)] (4) The commission shall establish by rule the size fraction  of total particulates subject to
emission fees as particulates under this section.
[(4)] (5) As used in this section:
(a) “Regulated pollutant” means particulates, volatile organic compounds,  [ oxides of nitrogen ]
nitrogen oxides, and sulfur dioxide; and
(b) “Consumer  Price Index” has the meaning given in 42 U.S.C. 7661a(b), as in effect on June
20, 2007.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 468A.315 (1)(a) by section 1 of this 2017 Act first
apply to regulated pollutants emitted during the 2016 calendar year.
DIESEL ENGINES
SECTION 3.  ORS 468A.795 is amended to read:
468A.795. As used in ORS 468A.795 to 468A.803 and sections 11  to 16, chapter 855, Oregon Laws
2007:
(1) “Combined weight” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
(2) “Cost-effectiveness threshold” means the cost,  in dollars, per ton of diesel particulate matter
reduced, as established by rule of the Environmental Quality Commission.
(3) “Diesel engine” means a compression ignition engine  designed primarily to propel a
motor vehicle on public highways in this state.
(4) “Environmental Mitigation  Trust Agreement” means the Environmental Mitigation
Trust Agreement required by the Volkswagen “Clean Diesel”  Marketing, Sales Practices and
Products Liability Litigation partial consent decree dated October 25, 2016.
(5) “Equivalent equipment” means a piece  of equipment that performs the same function
and has the equivalent horsepower to a piece of equipment subject to a replacement.
(6) “Equivalent motor vehicle” means  a motor vehicle that performs the same function
and is in the same weight class as a motor vehicle subject to a replacement.
[(3)] (7) “Heavy-duty truck” means a motor  vehicle or combination of vehicles operated as a unit
that has a combined weight that is greater than 26,000 pounds.
[(4)] (8)  “Incremental cost” means the cost of a  qualifying repower or retrofit less a baseline
cost that would otherwise be incurred in the normal course of business.
[(5)] (9)  “Medium-duty truck” means a  motor vehicle or combination of vehicles operated as a
unit that has a combined weight that is greater than 14,000 pounds but less  than or equal to 26,000
pounds.
[(6)] (10) “Motor vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
[(7)] (11)  “Nonroad [ Oregon] diesel  engine” means [ any Oregon diesel ] a compression ignition
engine that was not designed primarily to propel a motor vehicle on public highways of this state.
[(8) “Oregon diesel engine” means  an engine at least 50 percent of the use of which, as measured
by miles driven or  hours operated, will occur in Oregon for the three years following the repowering
or retrofitting of the engine. ]
[(9)] (12) “Oregon diesel truck engine” means a diesel engine in a truck at least 50  percent of
the use of which, as measured by miles driven or hours operated, has occurred in  Oregon for the
two years preceding the scrapping of the engine.
[(10)] (13) “Public highway” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
(14)(a) “Replacement” means:
[3]
HB 2269
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) To scrap a motor vehicle powered by a diesel engine and replace the motor vehicle
with an equivalent motor vehicle; or
(B) To scrap a piece of equipment powered by a nonroad  diesel engine and replace the
equipment with equivalent equipment.
(b) “Replacement” does not mean ordinary maintenance, repair or replacement of a diesel
engine.
[(11)] (15) “Repower” means to scrap an old diesel engine and [ replace] substitute  it with a new
engine, a used engine or a remanufactured  engine, or with electric motors, drives or fuel cells, with
a minimum useful life of seven years.
[(12)] (16) “Retrofit” means to equip a diesel engine with new  emissions-reducing parts or tech-
nology after the manufacture of the original engine. A retrofit must use  the greatest degree of
emissions reduction available  for the particular application of the equipment retrofitted that meets
the cost-effectiveness threshold.
[(13)] (17) “Scrap” means to destroy and render inoperable.
[(14)] (18) “Truck” means a motor vehicle or combination of vehicles  operated as a unit that has
a combined weight that is greater than 14,000 pounds.
SECTION 4.  ORS 468A.795, as amended by section 6a, chapter 855, Oregon  Laws 2007, is
amended to read:
468A.795. As used in ORS 468A.795 to 468A.803:
(1) “Combined weight” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
(2) “Cost-effectiveness threshold” means the cost,  in dollars, per ton of diesel particulate matter
reduced, as established by rule of the Environmental Quality Commission.
(3) “Diesel engine” means a compression ignition engine  designed primarily to propel a
motor vehicle on public highways in this state.
(4) “Environmental Mitigation  Trust Agreement” means the Environmental Mitigation
Trust Agreement required by the Volkswagen “Clean Diesel”  Marketing, Sales Practices and
Products Liability Litigation partial consent decree dated October 25, 2016.
(5) “Equivalent equipment” means a piece  of equipment that performs the same function
and has the equivalent horsepower to a piece of equipment subject to a replacement.
(6) “Equivalent motor vehicle” means  a motor vehicle that performs the same function
and is in the same weight class as a motor vehicle subject to a replacement.
[(3)] (7) “Heavy-duty truck” means a motor  vehicle or combination of vehicles operated as a unit
that has a combined weight that is greater than 26,000 pounds.
[(4)] (8)  “Incremental cost” means the cost of a  qualifying repower or retrofit less a baseline
cost that would otherwise be incurred in the normal course of business.
[(5)] (9)  “Medium-duty truck” means a  motor vehicle or combination of vehicles operated as a
unit that has a combined weight that is greater than 14,000 pounds but less  than or equal to 26,000
pounds.
[(6)] (10) “Motor vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
[(7)] (11)  “Nonroad [ Oregon] diesel  engine” means [ any Oregon diesel ] a compression ignition
engine that was not designed primarily to propel a motor vehicle on public highways of this state.
[(8) “Oregon diesel engine” means  an engine at least 50 percent of the use of which, as measured
by miles driven or  hours operated, will occur in Oregon for the three years following the repowering
or retrofitting of the engine. ]
[(9)] (12) “Oregon diesel truck engine” means a diesel engine in a truck at least 50  percent of
[4]
HB 2269
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the use of which, as measured by miles driven or hours operated, has occurred in  Oregon for the
two years preceding the scrapping of the engine.
[(10)] (13) “Public highway” has the meaning given that term in ORS 825.005.
(14)(a) “Replacement” means:
(A) To scrap a motor vehicle powered by a diesel engine and replace the motor vehicle
with an equivalent motor vehicle; or
(B) To scrap a piece of  equipment powered by a nonroad diesel engine and replace the
equipment with equivalent equipment.
(b) “Replacement” does not mean ordinary maintenance, repair or replacement of a diesel
engine.
[(11)] (15) “Repower” means to scrap an old diesel engine and [ replace] substitute  it with a new
engine, a used engine or a remanufactured  engine, or with electric motors, drives or fuel cells, with
a minimum useful life of seven years.
[(12)] (16) “Retrofit” means to  equip a diesel engine with new emissions-reducing parts or tech-
nology after the manufacture of  the original engine. A retrofit must use the greatest degree of
emissions reduction available for the particular application of the equipment retrofitted  that meets
the cost-effectiveness threshold.
[(13)] (17) “Scrap” means to destroy and render inoperable.
[(14)] (18) “Truck” means a motor vehicle or combination of vehicles  operated as a unit that has
a combined weight that is greater than 14,000 pounds.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 468A.797 is amended to read:
468A.797. (1) The Environmental Quality Commission by rule shall  establish standards related
to the certified cost necessary to perform a qualifying replacement, repower or  retrofit, including
but not limited to rules establishing the certified cost for purposes of the tax credit established  in
section 12, chapter 855, Oregon Laws 2007.
(2) For the purposes of subsection (1) of this section, certified cost:
(a) May not exceed  the incremental cost of labor and hardware that the Department of Envi-
ronmental Quality finds necessary to perform a qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit;
(b) Does not include the cost  of any portion of a  replacement,  repower or retrofit undertaken
to comply with any applicable local, state  or federal pollution or emissions law or for ordinary
maintenance, repair or replacement of a diesel engine; and
(c) May not exceed the cost-effectiveness threshold.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 468A.797,  as amended by section 7a, chapter 855, Oregon Laws 2007, is
amended to read:
468A.797. (1) The Environmental  Quality Commission by rule shall establish standards related
to the certified cost necessary to perform a qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit.
(2) For the purposes of subsection (1) of this section, certified cost:
(a) May not exceed the incremental cost of labor and hardware that the  Department of Envi-
ronmental Quality finds necessary to perform a qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit;
(b) Does not include the cost of any portion of a  replacement,  repower or retrofit undertaken
to comply with any applicable local, state or federal pollution  or emissions law or for ordinary
maintenance, repair or replacement of a diesel engine; and
(c) May not exceed the cost-effectiveness threshold.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 468A.799 is amended to read:
468A.799. (1) The Environmental Quality Commission by rule shall establish  standards for [ the
[5]
HB 2269
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
qualifying repower of a nonroad  Oregon diesel engine or retrofit of an Oregon diesel engine, ] quali-
fying replacements, repowers and retrofits,  including but not limited  to rules establishing re-
power or retrofit qualifications for purposes of the tax credit established  in section 12, chapter 855,
Oregon Laws 2007.
(2) The standards adopted by the commission under this section must [ include] require, at  a
minimum:
[(a) A  requirement for the reduction of diesel particulate matter emissions by at least 25 percent
compared with the baseline emissions for the relevant engine year and application; ]
(a) For the qualifying replacement of a motor vehicle powered by a diesel engine, that:
(A) The motor vehicle to be scrapped has at least three years  of remaining useful life;
and
(B) The engine model year of the equivalent motor vehicle is 2010 or newer.
(b) For the qualifying replacement of a piece  of equipment powered by a nonroad diesel
engine, that:
(A) The nonroad piece of equipment to be  scrapped has at least three years of remaining
useful life; and
(B) The equivalent equipment is powered  by a nonroad diesel engine that meets or ex-
ceeds the United States  Environmental Protection Agency Tier 4 standards for nonroad die-
sel exhaust emissions.
(c) For the qualifying repower of a nonroad diesel engine,  that the repower will be ac-
complished using a higher tier engine than the engine to be scrapped, based on the United
States Environmental Protection Agency tier  standards for nonroad diesel exhaust emis-
sions.
(d) For the qualifying retrofit of a diesel engine, a resulting reduction of diesel
particulate matter emissions by at least  85 percent when compared with the baseline emis-
sions for the relevant engine year and application.
[(b)] (e) That  a list of technologies approved as qualifying repowers or retrofits that have  been
verified by the United States  Environmental Protection Agency or the California Air Resources
Board[; and ] is included in the standards.
[(c)] (3) [ A requirement that ] A  qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit [ does] may  not in-
clude the replacement, repower or  retrofit of a motor vehicle , piece of equipment  or engine for
which a grant, loan or tax credit under ORS 468A.803 or section  12, chapter 855, Oregon Laws 2007,
has previously been awarded or  allowed, unless the replacement, repower or retrofit will reduce
emissions further than the replacement, repower or retrofit funded by the previous grant, loan  or
tax credit.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 468A.799, as amended by section 8a, chapter 855, Oregon  Laws 2007, is
amended to read:
468A.799. (1) The Environmental  Quality Commission by rule shall establish standards for [ the
qualifying repower of a nonroad  Oregon diesel engine or retrofit of an Oregon diesel engine ] qualify-
ing replacements, repowers and retrofits .
(2) The standards adopted by the commission under this section must [ include] require, at  a
minimum:
[(a) A  requirement for the reduction of diesel particulate matter emissions by at least 25 percent
compared with the baseline emissions for the relevant engine year and application; ]
(a) For the qualifying replacement of a motor vehicle powered by a diesel engine, that:
[6]
HB 2269
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) The motor vehicle to be scrapped has at least three years  of remaining useful life;
and
(B) The engine model year of the equivalent motor vehicle is 2010 or newer.
(b) For the qualifying replacement of a piece  of equipment powered by a nonroad diesel
engine, that:
(A) The nonroad piece of equipment to be  scrapped has at least three years of remaining
useful life; and
(B) The equivalent equipment is powered  by a nonroad diesel engine that meets or ex-
ceeds the United States  Environmental Protection Agency Tier 4 standards for nonroad die-
sel exhaust emissions.
(c) For the qualifying repower of a nonroad diesel engine,  that the repower will be ac-
complished using a higher tier engine than the engine to be scrapped, based on the United
States Environmental Protection Agency tier  standards for nonroad diesel exhaust emis-
sions.
(d) For the qualifying retrofit of a diesel engine, a resulting reduction of diesel
particulate matter emissions by at least  85 percent when compared with the baseline emis-
sions for the relevant engine year and application.
[(b)] (e) That a list of technologies approved as qualifying repowers or retrofits that have  been
verified by the United States  Environmental Protection Agency or the California Air Resources
Board[; and ] is included in the standards.
[(c)] (3)  [ A requirement that ] A  qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit [ does] may  not in-
clude the replacement, repower or  retrofit of a motor vehicle , piece of equipment  or engine for
which a grant or loan under ORS  468A.803 has previously been awarded or allowed, unless the
replacement, repower  or retrofit will reduce emissions further than the replacement, repower or
retrofit funded by the previous grant or loan.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 468A.801 is amended to read:
468A.801. (1) The Clean Diesel Engine Fund is established in the  State Treasury separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Clean Diesel Engine  Fund shall be credited
to the fund. The moneys  in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of Environ-
mental Quality to be used for the purposes described in ORS 468A.803.
(2) The Clean Diesel Engine Fund consists of:
(a) Funds appropriated by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Grants provided by the federal government pursuant to the federal Clean Air Act, 42  U.S.C.
7401 et seq., or other federal laws; [ and]
[(c) Any other revenues derived from gifts or  grants given to the state for the purpose of providing
financial assistance to owners or operators of diesel engines for the  purpose of repowering, retrofitting
or scrapping diesel engines to reduce diesel engine emissions. ]
(c) Moneys paid to the State of Oregon  pursuant to the Environmental Mitigation Trust
Agreement; and
(d) Any other moneys received by the state for the purpose  of providing financial and
technical assistance to owners  or operators of diesel engines for the purpose of reducing
emissions from diesel engines.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 468A.803 is amended to read:
468A.803. (1) The  Department of Environmental Quality shall use the moneys in the Clean Diesel
Engine Fund to award:
[7]
HB 2269
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Grants and loans to the owners and operators of motor vehicles powered by  diesel
engines, and equipment powered  by nonroad diesel engines, for up to 25 percent of the cer-
tified costs of qualifying replacements as described in ORS 468A.797 and 468A.799;
[(a)] (b) Grants and loans to the owners  and operators of [ Oregon] diesel engines for up to 100
percent of the certified costs of qualifying retrofits as described in ORS 468A.797 and 468A.799;
[(b)] (c)  Grants and loans to the owners and operators of nonroad [ Oregon] diesel engines for
up to 25 percent of the certified costs  of qualifying repowers as described in ORS 468A.797 and
468A.799; and
[(c)] (d) Grants to the owners of Oregon diesel truck engines to scrap those engines.
[(2) Subject to and consistent with federal  law, any moneys received from the federal government
that are deposited  in the Clean Diesel Engine Fund under ORS 468A.801 (2)(b) must be used for ini-
tiatives to reduce emissions from diesel engines. Subsections (1), (3) to  (5) and (7) of this section and
ORS 468A.797 and 468A.799 do not apply to use of moneys in the Clean Diesel  Engine Fund received
from the federal government. ]
(2) The Environmental Quality Commission by rule may set grant or loan award  rates
at a percentage  that is greater than a percentage allowed under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion, provided that the grant  or loan assistance will not exceed the cost-effectiveness
threshold, if the higher percentage award rate would:
(a) Benefit sensitive populations or  areas with elevated concentrations of diesel
particulate matter; or
(b) Otherwise increase participation by those categories of owners or operators.
(3) In determining the amount of a grant or loan under this section, the  department must reduce
the incremental cost of a qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit by the  value of any existing
financial incentive that directly reduces the cost of the  qualifying replacement, repower or retrofit,
including tax credits, other grants or loans, or any other public financial assistance.
(4) The department may certify third parties  to perform qualifying replacements, repowers and
retrofits and may contract with third parties to perform such services  for the certified costs of
qualifying replacements, repowers  and retrofits. The department may also contract with insti-
tutions of higher education or other public bodies as defined  by ORS 174.109 to train and certify
third parties to perform qualifying replacements, repowers and retrofits.
(5) The department may not award a grant or loan for a  replacement, repower or retrofit
under subsection (1) of this section unless the grant or  loan applicant demonstrates to the
department’s satisfaction that the resulting equivalent motor vehicle, equivalent  equipment,
repowered nonroad diesel engine or retrofitted diesel engine will undergo at least 50 percent
of its use in Oregon, as measured by miles driven  or hours operated, for the three years
following the replacement, repower or retrofit.
[(5)] (6)  The department may  not award a grant to scrap an Oregon diesel truck engine under
subsection (1)[ (c)] of this section unless the engine was manufactured prior to 1994 and  the engine
is in operating condition at the time of the grant application or, if repairs are needed, the  owner
demonstrates to the  department’s satisfaction that the engine can be repaired to an operating con-
dition for less than its  commercial scrap value. The Environmental Quality Commission shall adopt
rules for a maximum grant awarded under subsection (1)[ (c)] of this section for an engine in a
heavy-duty truck and for  an engine in a medium-duty truck. A grant awarded under subsection
(1)[(c)] of this  section may not be combined with any other tax credits, grants or loans, or any other
public financial assistance, to scrap an Oregon diesel truck engine.
[8]
HB 2269
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(7) Subject to and consistent with federal law, any moneys received from the federal
government that are deposited in  the Clean Diesel Engine Fund under ORS 468A.801 (2)(b)
must be used for initiatives to reduce emissions from diesel engines.  Subsections  (1) to (6)
of this section and ORS 468A.797 and 468A.799 do not apply to use of moneys in the fund  re-
ceived from the federal government.
(8) Subject to and consistent with the terms  of the Environmental Mitigation Trust
Agreement, any moneys received by the State of Oregon pursuant to the agreement that are
deposited in the Clean Diesel Engine Fund must be used by the department  to award grants
for the  purpose of reducing nitrogen oxides emissions from diesel engines. Subsections (1)
to (7) of this section and ORS 468A.797 and 468A.799 do  not apply to use of moneys in the
fund received pursuant to the agreement. To the extent authorized by  the agreement, the
department shall allocate moneys awarded pursuant to this subsection among:
(a) Owners and operators of school buses powered by diesel engines for 30 percent of
certified replacement costs beginning with  the oldest diesel powered school buses in the state
and proceeding until at least 450 buses have been replaced; and
(b) Owners and operators of the following categories of motor  vehicles powered by diesel
engines, subject to  the preferences for grant awards established under section 12 (1)(b) of
this 2017 Act:
(A) Drayage trucks.
(B) Delivery trucks.
(C) Waste hauling trucks.
(D) Transit buses.
(9) The department may not award a grant under subsection (8) of this section to the
owner or operator of a motor vehicle powered by a diesel engine unless the following criteria
are met:
(a) Use of the motor vehicle has occurred in Oregon during the  year preceding the date
of the grant.
(b) The motor vehicle is authorized for use in this state.
(c) For the three years following the receipt of a grant award, at least 50  percent of the
motor vehicle use for which the owner or operator received  the grant will occur in Oregon,
as measured by miles driven or hours operated.
(d) The grant will not exceed the cost-effectiveness threshold  where, notwithstanding
ORS 468A.795, the “cost-effectiveness threshold”  for purposes of this paragraph means the
cost in  dollars per ton of diesel particulate and nitrogen oxides reduced, as established by
rule of the commission.
(e) Any  other criteria the department deems necessary to ensure that a grant award will
result in reducing emissions from diesel engines in this state.
[(6)] (10) The department may use the moneys in  the Clean Diesel Engine Fund to pay expenses
of the department in administering the program described in [ this section ] ORS 468A.795  to
468A.803.
[(7) The commission shall adopt rules to implement this  section and ORS 468A.801, including but
not limited to establishing preferences for grant and loan awards based upon percentage  of engine use
in Oregon, whether a grant or loan applicant will  provide matching funds, whether scrapping, repow-
ering or retrofitting an engine will benefit sensitive populations or areas with  elevated concentrations
of diesel particulate  matter, or such other criteria as the commission may establish. The rules adopted
[9]
HB 2269
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
by the commission shall reserve a portion  of the financial assistance available each year for applicants
that own or operate a small  number of Oregon diesel engines or Oregon diesel truck engines and shall
provide for simplified access to financial assistance for those applicants. ]
[(8) The  department may perform activities necessary to ensure that recipients of grants and loans
from the Clean Diesel Engine Fund comply with  applicable requirements. If the department determines
that a recipient has not complied with applicable requirements, it may order  the recipient to refund all
grant or loan moneys and may impose penalties pursuant to ORS 468.140. ]
SECTION 11. Section 12 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS  468A.795 to
468A.803.
SECTION 12. (1) The Environmental Quality Commission shall  adopt rules to implement
ORS 468A.801 and 468A.803, including but not limited to rules that establish preferences for
awarding:
(a) Grants and loans under ORS 468A.803 (1) based upon  a percentage of diesel engine use
in Oregon, whether a grant  or loan applicant will provide matching funds, whether scrapping,
replacement, repowering or retrofitting an engine  will benefit sensitive populations or areas
with elevated concentrations of diesel particulate matter, or such other  criteria as the
commission may establish; and
(b) Grants  under ORS 468A.803 (8)(b) based upon the estimated number of vehicles in
each category, estimated emission reduction benefits by category measured in tons per  year
relative to the costs of achieving  those benefits, or such other criteria as the commission
may establish.
(2) Rules adopted by  the commission under this section must reserve a portion of the
financial assistance available each year for applicants that own or operate a small  number
of diesel engines or Oregon diesel truck engines and must provide for simplified  access to
financial assistance for those applicants.
(3) The Department of Environmental Quality may perform activities necessary to ensure
that recipients of grants  and loans from the Clean Diesel Engine Fund comply with applicable
requirements. If the department  determines that a recipient has not complied with applicable
requirements, the  department may order the recipient to refund all grant or loan moneys
and may impose penalties pursuant to ORS 468.140.
RULES FOR STATIONARY SOURCE EMISSIONS
SECTION 13.
 ORS 468A.025 is amended to read:
468A.025. (1) By rule the Environmental Quality Commission  may establish areas of the state
and prescribe the degree of air pollution or air contamination that  may be permitted therein, as air
purity standards for such areas.
(2) In determining air purity standards, the commission shall consider the following factors:
(a) The quality or characteristics of  air contaminants or the duration of their presence in the
atmosphere which may cause air pollution in the particular area of the state;
(b) Existing physical conditions and topography;
(c) Prevailing wind directions and velocities;
(d) Temperatures and temperature inversion periods, humidity, and other atmospheric conditions;
(e) Possible chemical reactions  between air contaminants or between such air contaminants and
air gases, moisture or sunlight;
[10]
HB 2269
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) The predominant character  of development of the area of the state, such as residential, highly
developed industrial area, commercial or other characteristics;
(g) Availability of air-cleaning devices;
(h) Economic feasibility of air-cleaning devices;
(i) Effect on normal human health of particular air contaminants;
(j) Effect on efficiency of industrial operation resulting from use of air-cleaning devices;
(k) Extent of danger to property in the area reasonably to  be expected from any particular air
contaminants;
(L) Interference with reasonable enjoyment of life by persons in the area which can  reasonably
be expected to be affected by the air contaminants;
(m) The volume  of air contaminants emitted from a particular class of air contamination source;
(n) The  economic and industrial development of the state and continuance of public enjoyment
of the state’s natural resources; and
(o) Other factors which the commission may find applicable.
(3) The commission may establish air quality standards  including emission standards for the
entire state or  an area of the state. The standards shall set forth the maximum amount of air pol-
lution permissible in various categories of air contaminants and may differentiate between  different
areas of the state, different air contaminants  and different air contamination sources or classes
thereof.
(4) The commission shall  specifically fulfill the intent of the policy under ORS 468A.010 (1)(a)
as it pertains to the highest and best practicable treatment and control of emissions from  stationary
sources through the adoption of rules:
(a) To require specific permit conditions for the operation and maintenance of pollution  control
equipment to the extent the Department of  Environmental Quality considers the permit conditions
necessary to insure  that pollution control equipment is operated and maintained at the highest
reasonable efficiency and effectiveness level.
(b) To require typically achievable control technology for new, modified and existing  sources of
air contaminants or precursors to air contaminants for which ambient  air quality standards are es-
tablished, to the extent emission units at the source are  not subject to other emission standards for
a particular air contaminant and to  the extent the department determines additional controls on
such sources are necessary to carry out the policy under ORS 468A.010 (1)(a).
(c) To require controls necessary to achieve ambient air quality  standards or prevent significant
impairment of  visibility in areas designated by the commission for any source that is a substantial
cause of any exceedance or projected exceedance in the near future of national ambient air  quality
standards or visibility requirements.
(d) To require controls necessary to meet applicable federal requirements for any source.
(e) Applicable to  a source category, contaminant or geographic area necessary to protect public
health or welfare for air  contaminants not otherwise regulated by the commission or as necessary
to address the cumulative impact of sources on air quality.
[(5) Rules adopted by the commission under subsection (4)  of this section shall be applied to a
specific stationary source  only through express incorporation as a permit condition in the permit for
the source.]
[(6)] (5)  Nothing in subsection (4) of this section or rules adopted under subsection (4) of this
section shall be construed to limit the authority of the commission to adopt  rules, except rules ad-
dressing the highest and best practicable treatment and control.
[11]
HB 2269
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(7)] (6)  As used in this section, “typically achievable control technology” means the emission
limit established on a case-by-case basis for a criterion contaminant  from a particular emission unit
in accordance with  rules adopted under subsection (4) of this section. For an existing source, the
emission limit established shall be typical of  the emission level achieved by emission units similar
in type and size. For a new  or modified source, the emission limit established shall be typical of the
emission level achieved by recently installed,  well controlled new or modified emission units similar
in type and size.  Typically achievable control technology determinations shall be based on informa-
tion known to the department. In  making the determination, the department shall take into consid-
eration pollution prevention, impacts on other  environmental media, energy impacts, capital and
operating costs, cost effectiveness and the age and remaining  economic life of existing emission
control equipment. The department may consider emission control technologies  typically applied to
other types of emission units if such technologies can be readily applied to  the emission unit. If an
emission limitation is not feasible, the  department may require a design, equipment, work practice
or operational standard or a combination thereof.
PENALTIES FOR VIOLATING
MOTOR VEHICLE EMISSIONS STANDARDS
SECTION 14.  ORS 468.140 is amended to read:
468.140. (1) In addition to any other penalty provided by  law, any person who violates any of the
following  shall  incur a civil penalty for each day of violation in the amount prescribed by the
schedule adopted under ORS 468.130:
(a) The terms or conditions  of any permit required or authorized by law and issued by the De-
partment of Environmental Quality or a regional air quality control authority.
(b) Any provision of ORS 164.785, 448.305, 454.010 to 454.040, 454.205 to 454.255, 454.505 to
454.535, 454.605 to 454.755 and 783.625 to 783.640 and  ORS chapter 467 and ORS chapters 468, 468A
and 468B.
(c) Any rule or standard or order of the Environmental  Quality Commission adopted or issued
pursuant to ORS 448.305, 454.010 to 454.040, 454.205 to 454.255, 454.505  to 454.535, 454.605 to 454.755
and 783.625 to 783.640 and ORS chapter 467 and ORS chapters 468, 468A and 468B.
(d) Any term or  condition of a variance granted by the commission or department pursuant to
ORS 467.060.
(e) Any rule or standard or order of a regional authority adopted or issued under authority  of
ORS 468A.135.
(f) The financial assurance requirement under ORS 468B.390 and 468B.485 or any rule related
to the financial assurance requirement under ORS 468B.390.
(2) Each day of violation under subsection (1) of this section constitutes a separate offense.
(3)(a) In  addition to any other penalty provided by law, any person who intentionally or
negligently causes or  permits the discharge of oil or hazardous material into the waters of the state
or intentionally  or negligently fails to clean up a spill or release of oil or hazardous material into
the waters of  the state as required by ORS 466.645 shall incur a civil penalty not to exceed the
amount of $100,000 for each violation.
(b) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, the following persons shall incur  a civil
penalty not to exceed the amount of $25,000 for each day of violation:
(A) Any person who violates the terms or  conditions of a permit authorizing waste discharge
[12]
HB 2269
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
into the air or waters of the state.
(B) Any person who violates any law, rule, order or standard in ORS 448.305, 454.010  to 454.040,
454.205 to 454.255, 454.505 to 454.535, 454.605 to 454.755 and 783.625 to 783.640 and ORS  chapters
468, 468A and 468B relating to air or water pollution.
(C) Any person who violates the provisions of a rule adopted  or an order issued under ORS
459A.590.
(4) In addition to any  other penalty provided by law, any person who violates the provisions of
ORS 468B.130 shall incur a civil penalty not to exceed the  amount of $1,000 for each day of vio-
lation.
(5) [ Subsection (1)(c) and (e) of this section does not apply to violations of motor  vehicle emission
standards which ] Notwithstanding subsection (1)(c) and (e)  of this section, motor vehicle
owners and their lessees shall not incur  a civil penalty for any violation of motor vehicle
emission standards that  are not violations of standards for control of noise emissions.
(6) Notwithstanding the limits of ORS 468.130 (1) and in addition to any other  penalty provided
by law, any person who intentionally  or negligently causes or permits open field burning contrary
to the  provisions of ORS 468A.555 to 468A.620 and 468A.992, 476.380 and 478.960 shall be assessed
by the department  a civil penalty of at least $20 but not more than $40 for each acre so burned.
Any amounts collected by the department pursuant to this subsection  shall be deposited with the
State Treasurer to the credit of the General Fund and shall be available for general  governmental
expense. As used in  this subsection, “open field burning” does not include propane flaming of mint
stubble.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS TO TAX CREDIT
APPLICABLE TO PAST TAX YEARS
SECTION 15.  Section 12, chapter 855, Oregon Laws 2007, is amended to read:
Sec. 12.  (1)  A personal income or corporate income or excise taxpayer is allowed a credit
against the taxes that are  otherwise due under ORS chapter 316, 317 or 318 for the certified costs
of a repower of a  nonroad [ Oregon] diesel engine or retrofit of [ an Oregon ] a diesel engine that oc-
curs after [ the effective date of this 2007 Act ] September 27, 2007, if:
(a) The repower or  retrofit has been identified as qualifying for the credit under rules adopted
by the Environmental Quality Commission under [ section 8 of this 2007 Act ] ORS 468A.799 ;
(b) [ The engine will  constitute an Oregon diesel engine ] The repowered or retrofitted engine
will undergo at least  50 percent of its use in Oregon, as measured by miles driven or hours
operated, for the three years following the repower or retrofit ; and
(c) The taxpayer has obtained a tax credit cost certification from the Department of Environ-
mental Quality under section 16 [ of this 2007 Act ], chapter 855, Oregon Laws 2007,  for  the cost
of the repower or retrofit.
(2) The maximum amount of the tax credit allowed under this section is limited to:
(a) 25 percent of the certified cost of each qualifying repower; and
(b) 50 percent of the certified cost of each qualifying retrofit.
(3) The amount of the tax credit allowed to  the taxpayer under this section in any one tax year
may not exceed the tax liability of the taxpayer for the tax year.
(4) Any tax credit that  is allowed under this section, but limited by subsection (3) of this section,
and that is not used by the taxpayer in a particular tax year may be carried forward  and offset
[13]
HB 2269
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
against the taxpayer’s tax liability as prescribed in  subsection (3) of this section for the next suc-
ceeding tax year. Any credit  remaining unused in the next succeeding tax year may be carried
forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax liability as prescribed in subsection (3) of this section
for the second succeeding tax year. Any credit remaining unused  in the second succeeding tax year
may be carried forward  and offset against the taxpayer’s tax liability as prescribed in subsection (3)
of this section for the third succeeding tax year, but may not be carried forward  for any tax year
thereafter.
(5) The credit  allowed under this section is not in lieu of any depreciation or amortization de-
duction for the engine to which the taxpayer otherwise may be entitled for purposes  of ORS chapter
316, 317 or 318. The taxpayer’s adjusted basis for determining gain  or loss may not be decreased by
any tax credits allowed under this section.
(6)(a) The Department of Revenue may disallow the credit allowed  under this section if the de-
partment finds that the credit was obtained by fraud or misrepresentation, or  if the department
learns that the engine that  was the subject of the qualifying repower or retrofit was destroyed by
arson committed by the taxpayer, or  if the engine no longer meets the requirements for obtaining
the tax credit.
(b) If the tax credit is disallowed pursuant to  this subsection, notwithstanding ORS 314.410 or
other law, all prior tax relief  provided to the taxpayer shall be forfeited, the department shall pro-
ceed to collect those taxes not paid by the taxpayer as a result of the prior granting  of the credit
and the taxpayer shall be denied any further credit provided under this section.
(c) The department may perform activities necessary to ensure that recipients  of the tax credit
comply with applicable requirements.
(7)(a) A nonresident individual shall be allowed the credit computed in the  same manner and
subject to the same limitations as the credit allowed a  resident by this section. However, the credit
shall be prorated using the proportion provided in ORS 316.117.
(b) If a change  in the taxable year of a taxpayer occurs as described in ORS 314.085, or if the
Department of Revenue terminates the taxpayer’s taxable year  under ORS 314.440, the credit al-
lowed by this section shall be prorated or computed in a manner consistent with ORS 314.085.
(c) If a change in the  status of a taxpayer from resident to nonresident or from nonresident to
resident occurs, the credit allowed by  this section shall be determined in a manner consistent with
ORS 316.117.
(8) The  taxpayer shall claim the credit on a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue
containing the information  required by the Department of Revenue. The taxpayer shall maintain the
tax credit cost certification issued by the Department of Environmental Quality  under section 16
[of this 2007 Act ], chapter 855, Oregon Laws 2007,  in the records of the taxpayer for the length
of time prescribed by the Department of Revenue  and shall provide a copy of the cost certification
to the Department of Revenue if requested.
(9) A taxpayer may not claim a credit under this section and ORS  315.304 with respect to the
same diesel engine or  group of diesel engines. A taxpayer may claim a credit under this section and
under ORS [ 469.185 to 469.225] 469B.130 to 469B.169 with respect to the same diesel engine or group
of diesel engines if the taxpayer and diesel engines otherwise meet  the requirements to be allowed
a tax credit under ORS [ 469.185 to 469.225] 469B.130 to 469B.169 .
CAPTIONS
[14]
HB 2269
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
SECTION 16. The unit  captions used in this 2017 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 17. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[15]