Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “place-based  integrated water resources
strategy” means a strategy described in section 2, chapter 780, Oregon Laws 2015.
(2) The Water Resources Department may use available moneys to:
(a) Assist with completion of a place-based integrated water resources strategy;
(b) Periodically update a place-based integrated water resources strategy  to inform up-
dates to the state integrated water resources strategy; or
(c) Facilitate implementation of a place-based integrated water  resources strategy, such
as by:
(A) Staffing or helping to arrange a meeting to work  through issues with implementing
a place-based integrated water resources  strategy or support implementation of actions
identified in a place-based integrated water resources strategy;
(B) Developing or coordinating an annual work plan or progress report for a  place-based
integrated water resources strategy; or
(C) Developing communication materials to engage the  broader community in imple-
menting a place-based integrated water resources strategy,  document or celebrate accom-
plishments in implementing  a place-based integrated water resources strategy or continue
to build individuals’ knowledge of water science or water management.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on July 1, 2023.
SECTION 3. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Water Resources  Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $100,000, which  may be expended for the purposes of car-
rying out section 1 of this 2021 Act.
(2) Of the amount described in subsection (1)  of this section, the department may spend
not more than $50,000 between July 1, 2021, and June 30, 2022.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2910
HB 3105
1
[2]