Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Public Defense  Commission shall study whether legislative
changes are needed in order to  effectively implement chapter 281, Oregon Laws 2023 (En-
rolled Senate Bill 337 (2023)).
(2) The  commission shall provide the results of the study, including any recommended
legislative changes, in a report to the appropriate interim committees of the  Legislative As-
sembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than May 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 404