Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2021 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 86.705
to 86.815.
SECTION 2. (1)(a) The Housing and Community Services Department shall grant to one
or more nonprofit housing  counseling agencies sufficient funding to provide the services of
a housing counselor to each eligible grantor who:
(A) Requests a resolution conference with a beneficiary under ORS 86.726 (3); or
(B) Contacts the department to request the services of a housing counselor.
(b) The department shall  disburse all grant moneys under this section from the Housing
Counseling Fund established under section 3 of this 2021 Act.
(2)(a) A nonprofit housing counseling agency to which the department provides funding
under this section must employ and provide services to grantors through housing counselors
that the federal Department of  Housing and Urban Development has certified under 12 U.S.C.
1701x.
(b) The Housing and  Community Services Department by rule may specify application
materials and other criteria under which a nonprofit  housing counseling agency may receive
funding under this section. The department may also specify  such reporting, record keeping
and auditing requirements for  the nonprofit housing counseling agency as the department
deems necessary or advisable for ensuring that the  nonprofit housing counseling agency uses
the funding for the purposes specified  in this section. A nonprofit housing counseling agency
that receives funding under this section shall make such records and  reports as the depart-
ment specifies by rule available for the  department’s inspection during regular business
hours.
(3)(a) The department by rule shall  determine criteria under which a grantor is eligible
for the services of a housing counselor under this section and the extent of  the services the
grantor may receive. The criteria, at a minimum, must provide that:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3514
HB 3209
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) The  grantor owns real property that the grantor uses as the grantor’s primary resi-
dence and that is subject to a residential trust deed or a mortgage;
(B) The grantor has had a loss of income that jeopardizes the grantor’s ability to  make
one or more required periodic payments or other required payments on an  obligation that is
secured by the residential trust deed or mortgage; and
(C) The beneficiary in the trust deed has not yet recorded a notice of default  or a notice
of sale or has not brought suit to foreclose the residential trust deed or mortgage.
(b) The  department shall specify the contents of and make available to grantors, elec-
tronically or otherwise, such application materials and other resources as  are necessary for
eligible grantors to qualify for housing counseling under this section.
(c) The department shall ensure that the funding the department provides for  housing
counseling services is sufficient to enable the grantor, as is appropriate under  the grantor’s
circumstances,  to:
(A) Understand the options available to the grantor to avoid foreclosure or, if appropri-
ate, to understand how to negotiate a foreclosure avoidance measure with a beneficiary;
(B) Understand and manage the grantor’s finances to the extent possible or necessary
to avoid foreclosure;
(C) Understand and  utilize available community resources, including public assistance
programs, mortgage assistance programs, home  repair assistance programs, utility assist-
ance programs, food assistance programs and other social services;
(D) Seek employment or employment education and training; and
(E) Develop any other understanding or  skill the department deems necessary and spec-
ifies by rule.
(4) The department shall undertake publicity  efforts to make residents of this state
aware of the existence of housing counseling  services and the availability of the services
under the circumstances described in this section. The publicity  must include links on the
department’s website to appropriate application  materials and referrals to information nec-
essary to qualify for, properly understand and use the services of a housing counselor.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Housing Counseling Fund is established in the  State Treasury, sep-
arate and distinct from the General Fund. The Housing Counseling Fund consists of moneys
the Housing  and Community Services Department receives as appropriations or from any
other source for the purposes  of making grants to nonprofit housing counseling agencies in
accordance with section 2 of  this 2021 Act. The moneys in the Housing Counseling Fund are
continuously appropriated to the  department. Interest earned on moneys in the Housing
Counseling Fund must be credited to the fund.
(2) The department may  receive moneys for the purposes set forth in subsection (1) of
this section from any public or private source.
SECTION 4.  ORS 86.707 is amended to read:
86.707. As used in this section , sections 2 and 3 of this 2021 Act  and  ORS 86.726, 86.729,
86.732, 86.736, 86.741, 86.744 and 86.748:
(1) “Facilitator” means a person that a service provider  selects to conduct a resolution confer-
ence.
(2) “Foreclosure avoidance measure” means  an agreement between a beneficiary and a grantor
that uses one or more of the following methods to modify an obligation that is secured by  a resi-
dential trust deed:
[2]
HB 3209
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
(a) The beneficiary  defers or forbears from collecting one or more payments due on the obli-
gation.
(b) The beneficiary modifies, temporarily or  permanently, the payment terms or other terms of
the obligation.
(c) The beneficiary accepts a deed in lieu of foreclosure from the grantor.
(d) The grantor conducts a short sale.
(e) The beneficiary provides the grantor  with other assistance that enables the grantor to avoid
a foreclosure.
(3) “Housing counselor” means a counselor employed by a  nonprofit housing counseling agency
that the Housing and Community Services Department or a successor state agency approves.
(4) “Resolution conference” means a meeting at which a grantor and a beneficiary attempt  to
negotiate and agree upon a foreclosure avoidance measure.
(5) “Service provider”  means a person that the Attorney General appoints under ORS 86.741 to
coordinate a program to implement the provisions of ORS 86.726, 86.729, 86.732 and 86.736.
SECTION 5.
(1) Sections 2 and 3 of this 2021 Act and the amendments to ORS 86.707 by
section 4 of this 2021 Act become operative on the 91st day after the effective date of this
2021 Act.
(2) The  Director of the Housing and Community Services Department may adopt rules
and take any  other action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section
that is necessary to enable the director, on and  after the operative date specified in sub-
section (1) of this section, to undertake and  exercise all of the duties, functions and powers
conferred on the director by sections 2  and 3 of this 2021 Act and the amendments to ORS
86.707 by section 4 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 6.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]