Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 30.260 is amended to read:
30.260. As used in ORS 30.260 to 30.300, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Department” means the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(2) “Director” means the Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(3) “Governing body” means the  group or officer in which the controlling authority of any public
body is vested.
(4) “Public body” means:
(a) A public body as defined in ORS 174.109;
(b) Any nonprofit corporation that  is organized and existing under ORS chapter 65 and that has
only political subdivisions or municipal, quasi-municipal or public corporations  in this state as
members;
(c) A  child-caring agency, as defined in ORS 418.205, that meets the criteria specified in ORS
278.322 (1)(a) and that receives more than 50 percent of its funding from the state  for the purpose
of providing residential treatment to  children who have been placed in the care and custody of the
state or that provides  residential treatment to children more than half of whom have been placed
in the care and custody of the state; [ or]
(d) A private,  nonprofit organization that provides public transportation services if more than
50 percent of the organization’s funding  for the purpose of providing public transportation services
is received from governmental bodies ; or
(e) A commission formed under ORS 381.702 to 381.755 .
(5) “State” means:
(a) State government as defined in ORS 174.111;
(b) The State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation; and
(c) The Oregon Utility Notification Center.
(6) “Local public body” means any public body other than the state.
(7) “Nuclear incident” has the meaning given that term in 42 U.S.C. 2014(q).
(8) “Tort” means the breach of a legal duty that  is imposed by law, other than a duty arising
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3897
HB 3683
1
2
3
4
5
from contract or quasi-contract, the breach of which results in  injury to a specific person or persons
for which the law provides a civil right of action for damages or for a protective remedy.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 30.260 by section 1 of this  2025 Act apply to claims
arising on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[2]