Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this  section, “plan student” means a student enrolled in early
childhood through post-secondary education who:
(a) Is a student eligible for special education as a child with a disability, as defined  in
ORS 343.035; and
(b) Has experienced disproportionate results  in education due to historical practices, as
identified by the State Board of Education by rule.
(2)(a) The Department of Education shall  develop and implement a statewide education
plan for plan students, including:
(A) Consulting with the advisory groups formed  for other similar statewide education
plans;
(B) Establishing criteria and administering the selection and accountability requirements
for grants awarded under this section;
(C) Providing technical assistance to special education advisory councils established as
provided by section 5 of this 2023 Act; and
(D) Advising the State Board of Education on the adoption of rules for implementation
of the plan.
(b) When developing and implementing the plan, the department shall consult with:
(A) Local, state  and national organizations that have expertise in the best practices for
providing special education and related services; and
(B) The advisory group formed under paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(c) The department shall form an advisory group consisting of individuals who are:
(A) Students who are eligible for special education and related services and who  repre-
sent a diversity of:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 779
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) Disability types;
(ii) Geographic locations, including urban and rural communities; and
(iii) Demographics, including students who are  plan students under other statewide edu-
cation plans and students who are  eligible for and enrolled in an English language learner
program;
(B) Parents or other family members of students who are eligible for special education
and related services;
(C) Representatives of a local parent training and information center that serves parents
of children with disabilities; and
(D) Representatives of special education  stakeholders, including community-based or-
ganizations, members of the disability community and representatives of  the Early Learning
Division, the Youth Development  Division and the Higher Education Coordinating Commis-
sion.
(d) The advisory group formed as provided in  paragraph (c) of this subsection shall advise
the department regarding:
(A) Development and implementation of the plan;
(B) Eligibility criteria, applicant selection processes  and expectations for recipients of
grant awards described in this section; and
(C) Adoption of rules by the State  Board of Education for the implementation of the plan.
(3) The plan developed under this section must address:
(a) The disparities experienced by plan students in  every indicator of academic success,
as documented by  the department’s annual performance report to the United States De-
partment of Education, the statewide report card and other relevant reports  related to plan
students;
(b) The historical and ongoing systemic inequities experienced  by plan students that lead
to disproportionate results for plan students;
(c) The  educational needs of plan students from early childhood through post-secondary
education as determined by examining best practices in inclusive education in this  state and
other states;
(d) The importance of having high expectations for all plan students  and ensuring that
teachers, students, parents and others involved in the  education of plan students hold plan
students to a high standard; and
(e) Strategies and goals to increase educational rigor and  expectations for plan students,
which must be  developed by collaborating closely with other statewide education plan advi-
sory groups in recognition that many plan students identify under  more than one statewide
education plan  and that intersections in how a plan student is identified may have com-
pounding effects for plan students.
(4) The plan developed and implemented under this section must provide strategies to:
(a) Address  the disproportionate rate of disciplinary incidents involving plan students
compared to all students in the education system;
(b) Increase parental engagement in the education of plan students  through the use of
special education advisory  councils in each school district as required by section 5 of this
2023 Act;
(c) Increase the engagement of plan students in student leadership,  nonacademic classes
and extracurricular opportunities and activities before,  during and after regular school
[2]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
hours;
(d) Increase early childhood education and kindergarten readiness for plan students;
(e) Improve literacy and  numeracy levels among plan students between kindergarten and
grade three;
(f) Support plan student transitions to middle school and through  the middle school and
high school grades to maintain and improve academic performance;
(g) Support pedagogy and best practices that promote the  inclusion of plan students from
early childhood through post-secondary  education by such strategies as model schools, grant
distributions and the establishment of professional communities of practice;
(h) Support investments and changes in teacher and school administrator  credentialing
and degree programs and in educator professional development to  support plan students and
increase inclusionary practices, either as teachers of special education or as  general educa-
tion teachers and school administrators;
(i) Regularly  review academic content standards from the perspective of persons with
disabilities and with the intent of incorporating content relating to disability awareness,
disability history, disability rights and the social justice movement,  ableism,
intersectionality, universal design and other topics important to the disability community;
(j) Review educational  facilities in this state and make capital investments to support
needed modifications to the facilities to ensure facilities are accessible to plan students;
(k) Ensure that every plan student has the opportunity to attain the most rigorous high
school diploma option possible for that student, and provide disaggregated  data collection on
diplomas awarded to plan students;
(L) Support the development and expansion of an  array of post-secondary education and
career options for plan students;
(m) Provide support in  preparing plan students for post-secondary opportunities, includ-
ing accessing career and technical education,  trade schools, apprenticeships, internships and
other opportunities;
(n) Address disproportionate rates of students leaving school without earning a high
school diploma or having only received an alternative certificate; and
(o) Align the plan with similar statewide education plans  developed and implemented by
the department.
(5) The department shall  submit a biennial report concerning the progress of the plan
developed and implemented under this section to a committee of the Legislative Assembly
related to education at each even-numbered year regular session of the Legislative Assembly.
(6) The department, in consultation with the advisory  group, shall award grants to Early
Learning Hubs, providers of early  learning services, school districts, education service dis-
tricts,  post-secondary  institutions of education, tribal governments, community-based or-
ganizations or a consortium of these entities to implement the strategies provided in the plan
developed and implemented under this section  and to support the implementation of best
practices in inclusive education  in order to address the disparities in educational outcomes
for plan students.
(7) To qualify for and receive a grant described in this section, an  applicant must identify
and demonstrate that the applicant meets the eligibility criteria established by  the State
Board of Education by rule.
SECTION 2.
 Section 1 of this 2023 Act is amended to read:
[3]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Sec. 1.  (1) As used in this section, “plan student” means a student enrolled in early childhood
through post-secondary education who:
(a) Is a student eligible  for special education as a child with a disability, as defined in ORS
343.035; and
(b) Has experienced disproportionate results in education due to historical practices, as identi-
fied by the State Board of Education by rule.
(2)(a) The Department of Education shall develop and implement a statewide education plan  for
plan students, including:
(A) Consulting with the advisory groups formed for other similar statewide education plans;
(B) Establishing criteria and administering the  selection and accountability requirements for
grants awarded under this section;
(C) Providing technical assistance to special education advisory  councils established as provided
by section 5 of this 2023 Act; and
(D) Advising the State Board of Education on the adoption of rules for implementation of the
plan.
(b) When developing and implementing the plan, the Department  of Education  shall consult
with:
(A) Local, state and national organizations that have expertise in the best  practices for provid-
ing special education and related services; and
(B) The advisory group formed under paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(c) The Department of Education  shall form an advisory  group consisting of individuals who
are:
(A) Students who are  eligible for special education and related services and who represent a
diversity of:
(i) Disability types;
(ii) Geographic locations, including urban and rural communities; and
(iii) Demographics, including students who are plan students under other  statewide education
plans and students who are eligible for and enrolled in an English language learner program;
(B) Parents or other family members of students who are eligible for special education and  re-
lated services;
(C) Representatives of a local parent  training and information center that serves parents of
children with disabilities; and
(D) Representatives of special education stakeholders, including  community-based organizations,
members of the disability community and representatives  of the [ Early Learning Division ] Depart-
ment of Early Learning and Care , the Youth Development Division  and the Higher Education
Coordinating Commission.
(d) The advisory group formed as provided in paragraph (c)  of this subsection shall advise the
Department of Education regarding:
(A) Development and implementation of the plan;
(B) Eligibility criteria, applicant selection processes  and expectations for recipients of grant
awards described in this section; and
(C) Adoption of rules by the State Board of Education for the implementation of the plan.
(3) The plan developed under this section must address:
(a) The disparities experienced by plan students in every indicator of academic success, as doc-
umented by  the [ department’s] Department of Education’s  annual performance report to the United
[4]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
States Department of Education, the statewide report card and other relevant reports related to plan
students;
(b) The historical and ongoing systemic inequities experienced by plan students that lead to
disproportionate results for plan students;
(c) The educational  needs of plan students from early childhood through post-secondary educa-
tion as determined by examining best  practices in inclusive education in this state and other states;
(d) The  importance of having high expectations for all plan students and ensuring that teachers,
students, parents and others involved in the education  of plan students hold plan students to a high
standard; and
(e) Strategies and goals to increase educational rigor and expectations for plan students, which
must be developed by  collaborating closely with other statewide education plan advisory groups in
recognition that many plan students identify under more than one  statewide education plan and that
intersections in how a plan student is identified may have compounding effects for plan students.
(4) The plan developed and implemented under this section must provide strategies to:
(a) Address the disproportionate rate of disciplinary incidents  involving plan students compared
to all students in the education system;
(b) Increase parental engagement in the education of plan students through the  use of special
education advisory councils in each school district as required by section 5 of this 2023 Act;
(c) Increase the engagement  of plan students in student leadership, nonacademic classes and
extracurricular opportunities and activities before, during and after regular school hours;
(d) Increase early childhood education and kindergarten readiness for plan students;
(e) Improve literacy and numeracy levels among  plan students between kindergarten and grade
three;
(f) Support plan  student transitions to middle school and through the middle school and high
school grades to maintain and improve academic performance;
(g) Support pedagogy and best practices that  promote the inclusion of plan students from early
childhood through post-secondary education by such strategies  as model schools, grant distributions
and the establishment of professional communities of practice;
(h) Support  investments and changes in teacher and school administrator credentialing and de-
gree programs and in educator professional development to support plan students  and increase
inclusionary practices, either as teachers of special education or as general education  teachers and
school  administrators;
(i) Regularly review  academic content standards from the perspective of persons with disabilities
and with the intent of incorporating content relating to disability awareness, disability  history, dis-
ability rights and the social justice movement, ableism,  intersectionality, universal design and other
topics important to the disability community;
(j) Review educational facilities in this state and  make capital investments to support needed
modifications to the facilities to ensure facilities are accessible to plan students;
(k) Ensure that every plan student has the  opportunity to attain the most rigorous high school
diploma option possible  for that student, and provide disaggregated data collection on diplomas
awarded to plan students;
(L) Support the development and expansion of an  array of post-secondary education and career
options for plan students;
(m) Provide support in preparing plan students for post-secondary opportunities,  including ac-
cessing career and technical education, trade schools, apprenticeships, internships and other  oppor-
[5]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tunities;
(n) Address disproportionate rates of students leaving school without earning a high school  di-
ploma or having only received an alternative certificate; and
(o) Align  the plan with similar statewide education plans developed and implemented by the
Department of Education .
(5) The Department of Education shall submit a biennial report concerning the  progress of the
plan developed and  implemented under this section to a committee of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to education at each even-numbered year regular session of the Legislative Assembly.
(6) The Department  of Education , in consultation with the advisory group, shall award grants
to Early Learning Hubs, providers of early learning services, school  districts, education service
districts, post-secondary institutions of education, tribal  governments, community-based organiza-
tions or a consortium of these entities to implement the  strategies provided in the plan developed
and implemented under this section  and to support the implementation of best practices in inclusive
education in order to address the disparities in educational outcomes for plan students.
(7) To qualify for and receive a grant described in this section, an applicant must identify and
demonstrate that the applicant meets the eligibility criteria established by  the State Board of Edu-
cation by rule.
SECTION 3.
 Section 64,  chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by section 1, chapter 27,
Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 64.  (1) ORS 326.432 and 329A.750, the amendments to ORS 131A.360, 131A.365, 183.459,
279A.050, 326.425, 326.430, 326.435, 327.269, 327.274, 329.155,  329.156, 329.165, 329.170, 329.172,
329.175, 329.181, 329.183, 329.185, 329.195,  329.200, 329.219, 329.841, 329.843, 329.845, 329A.010,
329A.120, 329A.135, 329A.250, 329A.261, 329A.712, 336.101, 336.104, 343.465, 343.475,  343.499, 417.781,
417.782, 417.784, 417.788, 417.790, 417.793,  417.795, 417.796, 417.827, 417.829, 419B.005, 433.301,
609.652, 805.205 and 805.207 by sections 11 and 14 to 62, chapter 631, Oregon  Laws 2021, the
amendments to ORS 329.847 by section 16 of this  2023 Act, the amendments to section 1 of
this 2023 Act by section 2  of this 2023 Act  and the repeal of ORS 329.145, 329.150, 329.190,
329A.490 and 329A.493 by section 63, chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, become operative on July  1,
2023.
(2) Notwithstanding the operative date set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the Early
Learning Division and the Department of Education may take  any action before the operative date
set forth in subsection (1) of this section  that is necessary for the Department of Early Learning and
Care to exercise, on and after the operative date set forth in subsection (1) of this  section, all of the
duties, functions and powers conferred on the Department of Early Learning and Care by  ORS
326.432 and 329A.750 and the amendments to ORS 131A.360, 131A.365,  183.459, 279A.050, 326.425,
326.430, 326.435, 327.269, 327.274, 329.155, 329.156, 329.165, 329.170, 329.172, 329.175, 329.181, 329.183,
329.185, 329.195, 329.200, 329.219, 329.841, 329.843, 329.845, 329A.010, 329A.120, 329A.135, 329A.250,
329A.261, 329A.712, 336.101, 336.104, 343.465, 343.475, 343.499, 417.781, 417.782, 417.784, 417.788,
417.790, 417.793, 417.795, 417.796, 417.827, 417.829, 419B.005, 433.301, 609.652, 805.205 and 805.207 by
sections 11 and 14 to 62, chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021.
(3) For the purpose of ensuring that  the Department of Early Learning and Care may exercise,
on and after the operative date  set forth in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the Department of Early Learning and Care by ORS 326.432 and 329A.750
and the amendments to ORS 131A.360, 131A.365, 183.459, 279A.050, 326.425, 326.430, 326.435,  327.269,
327.274, 329.155, 329.156, 329.165, 329.170, 329.172, 329.175, 329.181, 329.183, 329.185, 329.195, 329.200,
[6]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
329.219, 329.841, 329.843, 329.845, 329A.010, 329A.120, 329A.135, 329A.250, 329A.261, 329A.712,
336.101, 336.104, 343.465, 343.475, 343.499, 417.781, 417.782, 417.784, 417.788, 417.790, 417.793, 417.795,
417.796, 417.827, 417.829, 419B.005, 433.301, 609.652, 805.205 and 805.207 by sections  11 and 14 to 62,
chapter 631, Oregon Laws  2021, the Early Learning Division and the Department of Education shall
develop and implement a plan that provides for a seamless transfer of duties, functions  and powers.
(4) The Governor shall resolve any disputes related  to the plan developed and implemented un-
der subsection (3) of this section, and the Governor’s decision is final.
SECTION 4.
 Section 68, chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 68.  (1) Nothing in [ sections 12 and  13 of this 2021 Act ] ORS 326.432 and 329A.750 , the
amendments to ORS 131A.360, 131A.365, 183.459, 279A.050, 326.425, 326.430,  326.435, 327.269, 327.274,
329.155, 329.156, 329.165, 329.170, 329.172, 329.175, 329.181, 329.183, 329.185, 329.195, 329.200, 329.219,
329.841, 329.843, 329.845, 329A.010, 329A.120, 329A.135, 329A.250, 329A.261, 329A.712, 336.101,
336.104, 343.465, 343.475, 343.499, 417.781, 417.782, 417.784, 417.788, 417.790, 417.793, 417.795, 417.796,
417.827, 417.829, 419B.005, 433.301, 609.652, 805.205 and 805.207 by sections 11 and 14 to 62  [ of this
2021 Act ], chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, the amendments  to ORS 329.847 by section 16 of
this 2023 Act and the amendments to section 1 of this 2023  Act by section 2 of this 2023 Act,
or the repeal  of ORS  329.145, 329.150, 329.190, 329A.490 and 329A.493 by  section 63 [ of this 2021
Act], chapter 631, Oregon  Laws 2021,  relieves a person of a liability, duty or obligation accruing
under or with  respect to the duties, functions and powers transferred by the amendments to ORS
326.430 by section 11 [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021 . The Department of Early
Learning and Care may undertake the collection or  enforcement of any such liability, duty or obli-
gation.
(2) The rights and obligations of the Early Learning Division or the  Department of Education
on behalf  of the Early Learning Division legally incurred under contracts, leases and business
transactions executed, entered into or begun before the operative  date of the amendments to ORS
326.430 by  section 11 [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021,  are transferred to the
Department of Early Learning and Care. For the purpose  of succession to these rights and obli-
gations, the Department of Early Learning and Care is a continuation of  the Early Learning Divi-
sion and not a new authority.
SECTION 5.
(1)(a) Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, each school
district shall establish a special education advisory council.
(b) If  a school district has an average daily membership, as defined in ORS 327.006, of
fewer than 2,500 students, the school district may participate in a regional special  education
advisory council that complies with the requirements established by the State Board of  Ed-
ucation by rule.
(2) The duties of a special education advisory council shall include:
(a) Assisting the school district in complying with  the statewide education plan estab-
lished and implemented as provided by section 1 of this 2023 Act;
(b) Advising the school district board  about the educational impacts of policy decisions
on students with disabilities;
(c) Advising the school district superintendent about the educational  impacts of policy
decisions on students with disabilities; and
(d) Informing the school district board and school district  superintendent when a situ-
ation arises in a school of the  school district that negatively impacts students with disabili-
ties and advising the board and superintendent on how best to address the situation.
[7]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3)(a) The  members of each special education advisory council shall be selected by the
school district superintendent. Members must include employees,  parents, students and
community members from the  school district. The superintendent shall ensure that at least
half of the members are parents of students with a disability and that the student members
represent students with disabilities and students from other underserved student groups.
(b) For the purpose of selecting members, the school district superintendent  shall solicit
names of possible members from the school district and from  the school district’s commu-
nity.
(4) The Department of Education shall issue basic guidelines and  forms to assist school
districts in establishing and administering a special  education advisory council. The number
of members, frequency of meetings and operational procedures of a special education  advi-
sory council shall be  determined by the school district in accordance with guidelines issued
by the department.
(5)(a) No later than June 30 of each year, the  special education advisory council for each
school district shall prepare a report that provides the following information:
(A) The successes and challenges the school district experienced during the  school year
in meeting the  educational inclusion needs of students with disabilities in the school district;
(B) Recommendations the council made to the school district board and  the school dis-
trict superintendent, and the actions that were taken in response to  those recommendation;
and
(C) Any other information required by the State Board of Education by rule.
(b) The report prepared under paragraph (a) of this subsection must be:
(A) Distributed to the parents of the students of the school district;
(B) Posted on the school district’s website;
(C) Presented to the school district board in an open meeting  with adequate opportunity
for public comment;
(D) Submitted to the State Advisory Council for Special Education; and
(E) Submitted to the State Board of Education.
(6) The State Board of Education shall adopt  any rules necessary for the administration
of this section.
SECTION 6.
A school district must first convene a  special education advisory council as
provided by section 5 of this 2023 Act no later than September 15, 2023.
SECTION 7.  ORS 327.180 is amended to read:
327.180. (1) In addition to those moneys  distributed through the State School Fund, the Depart-
ment of  Education shall award grants from the Student Investment Account. Grants shall be dis-
tributed as provided under ORS 327.195.
(2) The purposes of grants distributed under ORS 327.195 shall be to:
(a) Meet students’ mental or behavioral health needs; and
(b) Increase academic achievement for students, including reducing academic disparities for:
(A) Economically disadvantaged students, as determined based  on rules adopted by the State
Board of Education;
(B) Students  from racial or ethnic groups that have historically experienced academic dispari-
ties, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education;
(C) Students with disabilities;
(D) Students who are English language learners;
[8]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(E) Students who are foster children, as defined in ORS 30.297;
(F) Students who are homeless, as determined under  rules adopted by the State Board of Edu-
cation;  and
(G) Any other student groups  that have historically experienced academic disparities, as deter-
mined by the State Board of Education by rule.
(3) Grant moneys received under ORS 327.195 may be used by a grant recipient only for:
(a) Increasing instructional time, which may include:
(A) More hours or days of instructional time;
(B) Summer programs;
(C) Before-school or after-school programs; or
(D) Technological investments that minimize class time used for assessments  administered to
students.
(b) Addressing students’ health or safety needs, which may include:
(A) Social-emotional learning and development;
(B) Student mental and behavioral health;
(C) Improvements to teaching and learning practices or organizational structures  that lead to
better interpersonal relationships at the school;
(D) Student health and wellness;
(E) Trauma-informed practices;
(F) School health professionals and assistants; or
(G) Facility improvements directly related to improving student health or safety.
(c) Reducing class sizes, which  may include increasing the use of instructional assistants, by
using evidence-based criteria to ensure appropriate student-teacher ratios or staff caseloads.
(d) Expanding availability of and student participation in well-rounded  learning experiences,
which may include:
(A) Developmentally appropriate and culturally  responsive early literacy practices and programs
in prekindergarten through third grade;
(B) Culturally responsive practices and programs  in grades six through eight, including learning,
counseling and student support that is connected to colleges and careers;
(C) Broadened curricular options at all grade levels, including access to:
(i) Art, music and physical education classes;
(ii) Science, technology, engineering and mathematics education;
(iii) Career and technical education, including  career and technical student organization pro-
grams and payment of student fees, costs and instructors of those programs;
(iv) Electives that are engaging to students;
(v) Accelerated college credit programs, including dual  credit programs, International
Baccalaureate programs and advanced placement programs;
(vi) Dropout prevention programs and transition supports;
(vii) Life skills classes; or
(viii) Talented and gifted programs; or
(D) Access to licensed educators with a library media endorsement.
(e) The establishment and operation of special education  advisory councils established as
provided by section 5 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 327.254 is amended to read:
327.254. (1) The Department of Education shall use  moneys in the Statewide Education Initi-
[9]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
atives Account to provide funding for statewide education initiatives, including:
(a) Funding the High School Graduation and College and Career Readiness Act at the levels
prescribed by ORS 327.856;
(b) Expanding school breakfast and lunch programs;
(c) Operating youth reengagement programs or providing youth reengagement services;
(d) Establishing and maintaining  the Statewide School Safety and Prevention System under ORS
339.341;
(e) Developing and providing statewide equity initiatives,  including [ the Black or African-
American education plan  developed under ORS 329.841, the American Indian or Alaska Native edu-
cation plan developed under ORS 329.843, the Latino or  Hispanic education plan developed under ORS
329.845 or any similar ] any statewide education plan [ identified] developed and implemented by
the department;
(f) Providing summer learning programs at schools  that are considered high poverty under Title
I of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965;
(g) Funding early warning systems to assist students in  graduating from high school, as de-
scribed in ORS 327.367;
(h) Developing and implementing professional development programs and  training programs, in-
cluding programs that increase educator diversity and retain diverse educators;
(i) Planning for increased transparency and accountability in the public  education system of this
state;
(j) Providing additional funding to school  districts participating in the intensive program under
ORS 327.222;
(k) Providing technical assistance, including costs incurred for:
(A) The coaching program described in ORS 327.214; and
(B) The intensive program described in ORS 327.222, including costs for student success teams;
(L) Funding public charter schools, as described in ORS 327.362;
(m) Funding education service districts, as described in subsection (2) of this section; and
(n) Funding costs incurred by the department in implementing this section and ORS 327.175 to
327.235 and 327.274.
(2)(a) The amount of a distribution to an  education service district under this section shall be
made as provided by paragraph  (b) of this subsection after calculating the following for each edu-
cation service district:
(A) One percent of the  total amount available for distribution to education service districts in
each biennium.
(B) The education service district’s ADMw ×  (the  total amount available for distribution to
education service districts  in each biennium ÷  the total ADMw of all education service districts
that receive a distribution).
(b) The  amount of the distribution to an education service district shall be the greater of the
amounts calculated under  paragraph (a) of this subsection, except that, for distributions made as
provided by paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, the  total amount available for distribution to edu-
cation service districts shall be  the amount remaining after any distributions required under para-
graph (a)(A) of this subsection have been made.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, ADMw equals the ADMw as calculated under  ORS 327.013,
except that the additional amount  allowed for students who are in poverty families, as determined
under ORS 327.013 (1)(c)(A)(v)(I), shall be 0.5.
[10]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) An education service district shall use moneys received under this section  as provided by a
plan developed by the school districts located within the education  service district. A school district
that declines to participate in the development of the plan or that has withdrawn from an education
service district as provided by ORS 334.015 is not entitled to any moneys  distributed to the educa-
tion service district under this subsection.
(e) A plan developed under this subsection must:
(A) Align with and support school districts in meeting  the performance growth targets of the
school districts developing the plan;
(B) Include the  provision of technical assistance to school districts in developing, implementing
and reviewing a plan for receiving a grant from the Student Investment Account;
(C) Provide for  coordination with the department in administering and providing technical as-
sistance to school  districts, including coordinating any coaching programs established under ORS
327.214; and
(D) Be  adopted and amended as provided for local service plans under ORS 334.175 and approved
by the department.
(f) Each education service district must submit an annual report to the department that:
(A) Describes how the education service district spent moneys received under  this subsection;
and
(B) Includes an evaluation of the education service district’s compliance with the plan  from the
superintendent of each school district that participated in the development of the plan.
(3) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules necessary for the distribution of moneys  un-
der this section.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 329.841 is amended to read:
329.841. (1) For the purposes of this section, “plan student” means a  student enrolled in early
childhood through post-secondary education who:
(a) Is Black or African-American; and
(b) Has experienced disproportionate results in education due to historical practices, as identi-
fied by the State Board of Education by rule.
(2)(a) The Department of Education shall develop and implement a statewide education plan  for
plan students.
(b) The  department shall form an advisory group consisting of community members, education
stakeholders and representatives of the Early Learning Division, the Youth  Development Division
and the Higher Education Coordinating Commission to advise the department regarding:
(A) Development and implementation of the plan;
(B) Eligibility criteria,  applicant selection process and expectations for recipients of grant
awards described in this section; and
(C) Adoption of rules by the State Board of Education for the implementation of the plan.
(3) The plan developed under this section shall address:
(a) The disparities experienced by plan students in every indicator of academic success, as doc-
umented by the department’s statewide report card;
(b) The historical practices leading to disproportionate outcomes for plan students; and
(c) The educational needs of plan students from early childhood through  post-secondary educa-
tion by examining culturally appropriate best practices in this state and across the nation.
(4) The plan developed and implemented under this section must provide strategies to:
(a) Address the disproportionate rate of disciplinary incidents for plan students  compared to all
[11]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
students in the education system;
(b) Increase parental engagement in the education of plan students;
(c) Increase the engagement of  plan students in educational activities before and after regular
school  hours;
(d) Increase early childhood and kindergarten readiness for plan students;
(e) Improve literacy and numeracy levels among  plan students between kindergarten and grade
three;
(f) Support plan student transitions to middle school and through the middle and  high school
grades to maintain and improve academic performance;
(g) Support culturally responsive pedagogy  and practices from early childhood through post-
secondary education;
(h) Support the development of culturally responsive  curricula from early childhood through
post-secondary education;
(i) Increase attendance of plan students  in community colleges and professional certification
programs; [and]
(j) Increase attendance of plan students in four-year post-secondary institutions of education[ .];
and
(k) Align the  plan with similar statewide education plans developed and implemented by
the department.
(5) The department  shall submit a biennial report concerning the progress of the plan developed
and implemented under this section at each even-numbered  year regular session of the Legislative
Assembly in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to an interim committee of  the Legislative As-
sembly related to education.
(6) The department, in consultation with the  advisory group, shall award grants to Early
Learning Hubs, providers of early learning services, school districts,  education service districts,
post-secondary institutions of  education and community-based organizations to implement the strat-
egies developed in the plan developed and implemented under this section.
(7) To qualify for and receive a grant described in this section, an applicant must identify and
demonstrate that the applicant meets the  eligibility criteria established by the State Board of Edu-
cation by rule.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 329.841, as amended by  section 34, chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, is
amended to read:
329.841. (1) For the purposes  of this section, “plan student” means a student enrolled in early
childhood through post-secondary education who:
(a) Is Black or African-American; and
(b) Has experienced disproportionate results in education due to historical practices, as identi-
fied by the State Board of Education by rule.
(2)(a) The Department of Education shall develop and implement a statewide education plan  for
plan students.
(b) The Department of Education shall form  an advisory group consisting of community mem-
bers, education stakeholders and representatives of the Department of Early Learning and Care,  the
Youth Development Division and the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission to advise the De-
partment of Education regarding:
(A) Development and implementation of the plan;
(B) Eligibility criteria, applicant selection process and expectations for recipients  of grant
[12]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
awards described in this section; and
(C) Adoption of rules by the State Board of Education for the implementation of the plan.
(3) The plan developed under this section shall address:
(a) The disparities experienced by plan students in every indicator of academic success, as doc-
umented by the statewide report card;
(b) The historical practices leading to disproportionate outcomes for plan students; and
(c) The educational  needs of plan students from early childhood through post-secondary educa-
tion by examining culturally appropriate best practices in this state and across the nation.
(4) The plan developed and implemented under this section must provide strategies to:
(a) Address the disproportionate rate of disciplinary incidents for plan students  compared to all
students in the education system;
(b) Increase parental engagement in the education of plan students;
(c) Increase the engagement of plan students in educational activities  before and after regular
school hours;
(d) Increase early childhood and kindergarten readiness for plan students;
(e) Improve literacy and numeracy levels among  plan students between kindergarten and grade
three;
(f) Support plan  student transitions to middle school and through the middle and high school
grades to maintain and improve academic performance;
(g) Support culturally responsive pedagogy and practices from  early childhood through post-
secondary education;
(h) Support the development of culturally  responsive curricula from early childhood through
post-secondary education;
(i) Increase attendance of plan students  in community colleges and professional certification
programs; [and]
(j) Increase attendance of plan students in four-year post-secondary institutions of education[ .];
and
(k) Align the  plan with similar statewide education plans developed and implemented by
the Department of Education.
(5) The Department  of Education shall submit a biennial report concerning the progress of the
plan developed and implemented under this section at  each even-numbered year regular session of
the Legislative Assembly in  the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to an interim committee of the
Legislative Assembly related to education.
(6) The Department of Education, in consultation with the advisory group, shall award grants
to Early Learning Hubs,  providers of early learning services, school districts, education service
districts, post-secondary institutions of education and community-based organizations to  implement
the strategies developed in the plan developed and implemented under this section.
(7) To qualify for and receive a grant described in this section, an applicant must identify and
demonstrate that the applicant meets the eligibility criteria established by  the State Board of Edu-
cation by rule.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 329.843 is amended to read:
329.843. (1) As used in this section, “plan student” means  a student enrolled in early childhood
through post-secondary education who:
(a) Is an American Indian or Alaska Native; and
(b) Has experienced disproportionate results in education due to historical practices, as identi-
[13]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
fied by the State Board of Education by rule.
(2)(a) The Department of Education shall develop and implement a statewide education plan  for
plan students.
(b) When developing the  plan, the department shall consult with representatives from tribal
governments and from executive branch agencies who have  formed government-to-government re-
lations to focus on education. Additionally, the department may receive input from an advisory
group consisting of community  members, education stakeholders and representatives of the Early
Learning Division, the Youth Development  Division and the Higher Education Coordinating Com-
mission.
(c) The department shall be responsible for:
(A) Implementing the plan developed under this subsection;
(B) Developing eligibility criteria, the  applicant selection process and expectations for recipients
of grant awards described in this section; and
(C) Advising the State Board of Education on the adoption of rules under this section.
(3) The plan developed under this section must address:
(a) The disparities experienced by plan students in every indicator of academic success, as doc-
umented by the department’s statewide report card  and other relevant reports related to plan stu-
dents;
(b) The historical practices leading to disproportionate outcomes for plan students; and
(c) The educational needs of plan students from early childhood through  post-secondary educa-
tion as determined by examining culturally appropriate best practices in  this state and across the
nation.
(4) The plan developed and implemented under this section must provide strategies to:
(a) Address the disproportionate rate of disciplinary incidents involving plan students as  com-
pared to all students in the education system;
(b) Increase parental engagement in the education of plan students;
(c) Increase the engagement of  plan students in educational activities before and after regular
school  hours;
(d) Increase early childhood education and kindergarten readiness for plan students;
(e) Improve literacy and numeracy levels among  plan students between kindergarten and grade
three;
(f) Support plan student transitions to middle school and through the middle school  and high
school grades to maintain and improve academic performance;
(g) Support culturally responsive pedagogy  and practices from early childhood through post-
secondary education;
(h) Support the development of culturally responsive  curricula from early childhood through
post-secondary education;
(i) Increase attendance of plan students in early childhood programs  through post-secondary and
professional certification programs; [ and]
(j) Increase attendance of plan students in four-year post-secondary institutions of education[ .];
and
(k) Align the  plan with similar statewide education plans developed and implemented by
the department.
(5) The department  shall submit a biennial report concerning the progress of the plan developed
and implemented  under this section to a committee of the Legislative Assembly related to education
[14]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
at each even-numbered year regular session of the Legislative Assembly.
(6) The department, in consultation with the  advisory group, shall award grants to Early
Learning Hubs, providers of early learning services, school districts,  education service districts,
post-secondary institutions of education, tribal governments and  community-based organizations to
implement the strategies provided in the plan developed and implemented under this section.
(7) To qualify  for and receive grants described in this section, an applicant must identify and
demonstrate that the applicant  meets the eligibility criteria adopted by the State Board of Education
by rule.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 329.843, as amended by section 35,  chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, is
amended to read:
329.843. (1) As used in this section,  “plan student” means a student enrolled in early childhood
through post-secondary education who:
(a) Is an American Indian or Alaska Native; and
(b) Has experienced disproportionate results in education due to historical practices, as identi-
fied by the State Board of Education by rule.
(2)(a) The Department of Education shall develop and implement a statewide education plan  for
plan students.
(b) When developing the plan, the Department of Education shall consult  with representatives
from tribal governments  and from executive branch agencies who have formed government-to-
government relations to focus on education. Additionally, the Department of  Education may receive
input from an advisory  group consisting of community members, education stakeholders and repre-
sentatives of the Department of Early Learning and Care, the Youth Development Division and the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(c) The Department of Education shall be responsible for:
(A) Implementing the plan developed under this subsection;
(B) Developing eligibility criteria, the  applicant selection process and expectations for recipients
of grant awards described in this section; and
(C) Advising the State Board of Education on the adoption of rules under this section.
(3) The plan developed under this section must address:
(a) The disparities experienced by plan students in every indicator of academic success, as doc-
umented by the statewide report card and other relevant reports related to plan students;
(b) The historical practices leading to disproportionate outcomes for plan students; and
(c) The educational needs of plan students from early childhood through  post-secondary educa-
tion as determined by examining culturally appropriate best practices in  this state and across the
nation.
(4) The plan developed and implemented under this section must provide strategies to:
(a) Address the disproportionate rate of disciplinary incidents involving plan students as  com-
pared to all students in the education system;
(b) Increase parental engagement in the education of plan students;
(c) Increase the engagement of  plan students in educational activities before and after regular
school  hours;
(d) Increase early childhood education and kindergarten readiness for plan students;
(e) Improve literacy and numeracy levels among  plan students between kindergarten and grade
three;
(f) Support plan student transitions to middle school and through the middle school  and high
[15]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
school grades to maintain and improve academic performance;
(g) Support culturally responsive pedagogy  and practices from early childhood through post-
secondary education;
(h) Support the development of culturally responsive  curricula from early childhood through
post-secondary education;
(i) Increase attendance of plan students in early childhood programs  through post-secondary and
professional certification programs; [ and]
(j) Increase attendance of plan students in four-year post-secondary institutions of education[ .];
and
(k) Align the  plan with similar statewide education plans developed and implemented by
the Department of Education.
(5) The Department  of Education shall submit a biennial report concerning the progress of the
plan developed and  implemented under this section to a committee of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to education at each even-numbered year regular session of the Legislative Assembly.
(6) The Department of Education, in consultation with the advisory group, shall award grants
to Early Learning Hubs, providers of early learning services, school  districts, education service
districts, post-secondary institutions of education, tribal governments and community-based organ-
izations to implement the strategies provided in  the plan developed and implemented under this
section.
(7) To qualify  for and receive grants described in this section, an applicant must identify and
demonstrate that the applicant  meets the eligibility criteria adopted by the State Board of Education
by rule.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 329.845 is amended to read:
329.845. (1) As used in this section, “plan student” means  a student enrolled in early childhood
through post-secondary education who:
(a) Is Latino or Hispanic, including individuals of Mexican,  Cuban, Puerto Rican, South Ameri-
can, Central American or Spanish descent; and
(b) Has experienced disproportionate results in education due to historical practices, as identi-
fied by the State Board of Education by rule.
(2)(a) The Department of Education shall develop and implement a statewide education plan  for
plan students.
(b) The department shall form an advisory group consisting of individuals representing:
(A) Urban and rural communities;
(B) Indigenous and immigrant populations;
(C) English language learners;
(D) Individuals with disabilities;
(E) Parents and students;
(F) Youth who are lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer or another minority  gender or
sexual orientation;
(G) Community-based organizations serving Latino or Hispanic youth and families; and
(H) Education  stakeholders, including representatives of the Early Learning Division, the Youth
Development Division and the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(c) The advisory group formed as provided in paragraph (b)  of this subsection shall advise the
department regarding:
(A) Development and implementation of the plan;
[16]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Eligibility criteria, applicant selection processes  and expectations for recipients of grant
awards described in this section; and
(C) Adoption of rules by the State Board of Education for the implementation of the plan.
(3) The plan developed under this section must address:
(a) The disparities experienced by plan students in every indicator of academic success, as doc-
umented by the department’s statewide report card and other  relevant reports related to plan stu-
dents;
(b) The historical practices leading to disproportionate outcomes for plan students; and
(c) The educational  needs of plan students from early childhood through post-secondary educa-
tion as determined by examining culturally  appropriate best practices in this state and across the
nation.
(4) The plan developed and implemented under this section must provide strategies to:
(a) Address the disproportionate rate of disciplinary incidents  involving plan students compared
to all students in the education system;
(b) Increase parental engagement in the education of plan students;
(c) Increase the engagement of  plan students in educational activities before and after regular
school  hours;
(d) Increase early childhood education and kindergarten readiness for plan students;
(e) Improve literacy and numeracy levels among  plan students between kindergarten and grade
three;
(f) Support plan student transitions to middle school and through the middle school  and high
school grades to maintain and improve academic performance;
(g) Support culturally responsive pedagogy  and practices from early childhood through post-
secondary education;
(h) Support the development of culturally responsive  curricula from early childhood through
post-secondary education;
(i) Increase attendance of plan students in  community colleges and professional certification
programs; [and]
(j) Increase attendance of plan students in four-year post-secondary institutions of education[ .];
and
(k) Align the plan with similar statewide education plans developed and  implemented by
the department.
(5) The department  shall submit a biennial report concerning the progress of the plan developed
and implemented  under this section to a committee of the Legislative Assembly related to education
at each even-numbered year regular session of the Legislative Assembly.
(6) The department, in consultation with the advisory  group, shall award grants to Early
Learning Hubs, providers of  early learning services, school districts, education service districts,
post-secondary institutions of education,  tribal governments and community-based organizations to
implement the strategies provided in the plan developed and implemented under this section.
(7) To qualify for and receive a grant described in this section, an applicant must identify and
demonstrate that the applicant meets the eligibility criteria established by  the State Board of Edu-
cation by rule.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 329.845, as amended by section 36,  chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, is
amended to read:
329.845. (1) As used in this section,  “plan student” means a student enrolled in early childhood
[17]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
through post-secondary education who:
(a) Is Latino or Hispanic, including  individuals of Mexican, Cuban, Puerto Rican, South Ameri-
can, Central American or Spanish descent; and
(b) Has experienced disproportionate results in education due to historical practices, as identi-
fied by the State Board of Education by rule.
(2)(a) The Department of Education shall develop and implement a statewide education plan  for
plan students.
(b) The Department of Education  shall form an advisory group consisting of individuals repre-
senting:
(A) Urban and rural communities;
(B) Indigenous and immigrant populations;
(C) English language learners;
(D) Individuals with disabilities;
(E) Parents and students;
(F) Youth who are lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer or another minority  gender or
sexual orientation;
(G) Community-based organizations serving Latino or Hispanic youth and families; and
(H) Education stakeholders, including  representatives of the Department of Early Learning and
Care, the Youth Development Division and the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(c) The advisory group formed as provided in paragraph (b)  of this subsection shall advise the
Department of Education regarding:
(A) Development and implementation of the plan;
(B) Eligibility criteria, applicant selection processes  and expectations for recipients of grant
awards described in this section; and
(C) Adoption of rules by the State Board of Education for the implementation of the plan.
(3) The plan developed under this section must address:
(a) The disparities experienced by plan students in every indicator of academic success, as doc-
umented by the statewide report card and other relevant reports related to plan students;
(b) The historical practices leading to disproportionate outcomes for plan students; and
(c) The educational needs of plan students from early childhood through  post-secondary educa-
tion as determined by examining culturally appropriate best practices in  this state and across the
nation.
(4) The plan developed and implemented under this section must provide strategies to:
(a) Address the disproportionate rate of disciplinary incidents  involving plan students compared
to all students in the education system;
(b) Increase parental engagement in the education of plan students;
(c) Increase the engagement of plan students in educational activities  before and after regular
school hours;
(d) Increase early childhood education and kindergarten readiness for plan students;
(e) Improve literacy and numeracy levels among  plan students between kindergarten and grade
three;
(f) Support plan  student transitions to middle school and through the middle school and high
school grades to maintain and improve academic performance;
(g) Support culturally responsive pedagogy and practices from  early childhood through post-
secondary education;
[18]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(h) Support the development of culturally  responsive curricula from early childhood through
post-secondary education;
(i) Increase attendance of plan students  in community colleges and professional certification
programs; [and]
(j) Increase attendance of plan students in four-year post-secondary institutions of education[ .];
and
(k) Align the  plan with similar statewide education plans developed and implemented by
the Department of Education.
(5) The Department of Education shall submit a biennial report concerning the progress  of the
plan developed and implemented under this section to a committee of the Legislative  Assembly re-
lated to education at each even-numbered year regular session of the Legislative Assembly.
(6) The Department of Education, in consultation with the advisory group, shall award grants
to Early Learning Hubs,  providers of early learning services, school districts, education service
districts, post-secondary institutions of education, tribal governments and community-based organ-
izations to implement the strategies provided in the  plan developed and implemented under this
section.
(7) To qualify for and receive a grant described in this section, an applicant must identify and
demonstrate that the applicant meets the  eligibility criteria established by the State Board of Edu-
cation by rule.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 329.847 is amended to read:
329.847. (1) As used in this section,  “plan student” means a student enrolled in early childhood
through post-secondary education who:
(a) May be lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, two-spirit, intersex, asexual, nonbinary  or
another minority gender identity or sexual orientation; and
(b) Has experienced disproportionate results in education due to historical practices, as identi-
fied by the State Board of Education by rule.
(2)(a) The Department of Education shall develop and implement a statewide education plan  for
plan students.
(b) The department shall form an advisory group to advise the department regarding  the
adoption and implementation of the plan. The advisory group must consist of:
(A) Individuals who identify as lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender,  queer, two-spirit, intersex,
asexual, nonbinary or another minority gender identity or sexual orientation;
(B) Students who identify as lesbian, gay, bisexual,  transgender, queer, two-spirit, intersex,
asexual, nonbinary or another minority gender identity or sexual orientation;
(C) Representatives of community-based organizations that serve  lesbian, gay, bisexual,
transgender, queer, two-spirit, intersex, asexual,  nonbinary or another minority gender identity or
sexual orientation population; and
(D) Education stakeholders,  including representatives of the Early Learning Division, the Youth
Development Division and the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(c) When implementing the plan, the department shall consult with:
(A) The advisory group described in paragraph (b) of this subsection;
[(B) The advisory group described in ORS 329.841, related to students who are  Black or African-
American; ]
[(C) The advisory group described in ORS 329.843, related to students who are American Indian
or Alaska Native; ]
[19]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(D) The advisory group described  in ORS 329.845, related to students who are Latino or Hispanic;
and]
(B) Advisory groups formed by the department  to develop and implement a statewide
education plan for plan students; and
[(E)] (C) Any other advisory groups or education stakeholders identified by the department.
(d) The department shall be responsible for:
(A) Implementing the plan developed under this section;
(B) Developing eligibility criteria, the  applicant selection process and expectations for recipients
of grant awards described in this section; and
(C) Advising the State Board of Education on the adoption of rules under this section.
(3) The plan developed under this section must address:
(a) The disparities experienced by plan students in every indicator of academic success, as doc-
umented by the department’s statewide report card  and other relevant reports related to plan stu-
dents;
(b) The historical practices leading to disproportionate outcomes for plan students; and
(c) The educational needs of plan students from early childhood through  post-secondary educa-
tion as determined by examining culturally appropriate best practices in  this state and across the
nation.
(4) The plan developed and implemented under this section must provide strategies to:
(a) Address the disproportionate rate of disciplinary incidents involving plan students as  com-
pared to all students in the education system;
(b) Increase parental engagement in the education of plan students;
(c) Increase the engagement of  plan students in educational activities before and after regular
school  hours;
(d) Increase early childhood education and kindergarten readiness for plan students;
(e) Improve literacy and numeracy levels among  plan students between kindergarten and grade
three;
(f) Support plan student transitions to middle school and through the middle school  and high
school grades to maintain and improve academic performance;
(g) Support culturally responsive pedagogy  and practices from early childhood through post-
secondary education;
(h) Support the development of culturally responsive  curricula from early childhood through
post-secondary education;
(i) Increase attendance of plan students in early childhood programs  through post-secondary and
professional certification programs; and
(j) Increase attendance of plan students in four-year post-secondary institutions of education.
(5) The department  shall submit a biennial report concerning the progress of the plan developed
and implemented  under this section to a committee of the Legislative Assembly related to education
at each even-numbered year regular session of the Legislative Assembly.
(6) The department, in consultation with the advisory group, may award grants to Early  Learn-
ing Hubs, providers of early learning services, school districts, education  service districts, post-
secondary institutions of education,  tribal governments, community-based organizations or a
consortium of these entities to  implement the strategies provided in the plan developed and imple-
mented under this section.
(7) To qualify for and receive a grant described in this section, an applicant must identify and
[20]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
demonstrate that the applicant meets the eligibility criteria established by  the State Board of Edu-
cation by rule.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 329.847, as amended by section 15 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
329.847. (1) As used in this section, “plan student” means  a student enrolled in early childhood
through post-secondary education who:
(a) May be lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, two-spirit, intersex, asexual, nonbinary  or
another minority gender identity or sexual orientation; and
(b) Has experienced disproportionate results in education due to historical practices, as identi-
fied by the State Board of Education by rule.
(2)(a) The Department of Education shall develop and implement a statewide education plan  for
plan students.
(b) The  department shall form an advisory group to advise the department regarding the
adoption and implementation of the plan. The advisory group must consist of:
(A) Individuals who identify  as lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, two-spirit, intersex,
asexual, nonbinary or another minority gender identity or sexual orientation;
(B) Students who identify as  lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, two-spirit, intersex,
asexual, nonbinary or another minority gender identity or sexual orientation;
(C) Representatives of community-based  organizations that serve lesbian, gay, bisexual,
transgender, queer, two-spirit, intersex, asexual, nonbinary or another  minority gender identity or
sexual orientation population; and
(D) Education stakeholders,  including representatives of the [ Early Learning Division ] Depart-
ment of Early Learning and  Care , the Youth Development Division and the Higher Education
Coordinating Commission.
(c) When implementing the plan, the Department of Education shall consult with:
(A) The advisory group described in paragraph (b) of this subsection;
(B) Advisory groups formed  by the department to develop and implement a statewide education
plan for plan students; and
(C) Any other advisory groups or education stakeholders identified by the department.
(d) The department shall be responsible for:
(A) Implementing the plan developed under this section;
(B) Developing eligibility criteria, the  applicant selection process and expectations for recipients
of grant awards described in this section; and
(C) Advising the State Board of Education on the adoption of rules under this section.
(3) The plan developed under this section must address:
(a) The disparities experienced by plan students in every indicator of academic success, as doc-
umented by the [ department’s] statewide report card and other  relevant reports related to plan stu-
dents;
(b) The historical practices leading to disproportionate outcomes for plan students; and
(c) The educational  needs of plan students from early childhood through post-secondary educa-
tion as determined by examining culturally  appropriate best practices in this state and across the
nation.
(4) The plan developed and implemented under this section must provide strategies to:
(a) Address  the disproportionate rate of disciplinary incidents involving plan students as com-
pared to all students in the education system;
(b) Increase parental engagement in the education of plan students;
[21]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
(c) Increase the engagement of plan students in educational activities  before and after regular
school hours;
(d) Increase early childhood education and kindergarten readiness for plan students;
(e) Improve literacy and numeracy levels among  plan students between kindergarten and grade
three;
(f) Support plan  student transitions to middle school and through the middle school and high
school grades to maintain and improve academic performance;
(g) Support culturally responsive pedagogy and practices from  early childhood through post-
secondary education;
(h) Support the development of culturally responsive  curricula from early childhood through
post-secondary education;
(i) Increase attendance of plan students in early childhood programs  through post-secondary and
professional certification programs; and
(j) Increase attendance of plan students in four-year post-secondary institutions of education.
(5) The department  shall submit a biennial report concerning the progress of the plan developed
and implemented  under this section to a committee of the Legislative Assembly related to education
at each even-numbered year regular session of the Legislative Assembly.
(6) The department, in consultation with the advisory group, may award grants to Early  Learn-
ing Hubs, providers of early learning services, school districts, education  service districts, post-
secondary institutions of education,  tribal governments, community-based organizations or a
consortium of these entities to  implement the strategies provided in the plan developed and imple-
mented under this section.
(7) To qualify for and receive a grant described in this section, an applicant must identify and
demonstrate that the applicant meets the eligibility criteria established by  the State Board of Edu-
cation by rule.
SECTION 17.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[22]