Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Employment Department and the Bureau of Labor and Industries
shall cooperate in conducting a study of the methodology the department uses to  conduct
wage surveys that serve as a basis  for the determination of the prevailing rate of wage under
ORS 279C.815. The department and the bureau shall ensure that the study:
(a) Evaluates the survey methodology for adherence to the intent set forth  in ORS
279C.805; and
(b) Accurately reflects the wage rates actually prevalent in local markets for trades and
occupations that are subject to a determination of a prevailing rate of wage.
(2) The department and the bureau shall present the results of the study in a report  to
an appropriate committee or interim committee  of the Legislative Assembly in the manner
provided under ORS 192.245 on or before September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2977