Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission may create reports and  analysis
of commission data regarding commercial  sales and commercial industries. The commission
may market, sell, license the  use of or offer other forms of value-added access to data and
analysis described in this subsection to private entities.
(2) The commission may enter into  contracts with private entities for the entities to
capture and compile commission data  to create reports and analysis regarding commercial
sales and commercial industries.
(3) Commission data that a private entity captures or compiles  under a contract de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section is proprietary information of the commission.
(4) The commission may enter into contracts with private entities for the entities to ac-
cept payments from sales or licenses for use of data and analysis  described in subsection (1)
of this section or any systems,  processes or business models developed from that data or
analysis. Payments that the commission  or a private entity accepts from sales or licenses
under this section:
(a) Related to alcohol data and analysis shall be remitted for  crediting as provided under
ORS 471.805.
(b) Related to cannabis data and analysis shall be remitted for crediting to the  Marijuana
Control and Regulation Fund.
(5) The commission shall ensure that data and  analysis that the commission sells or li-
censes for use are in a format that preserves anonymity of the source and do  not contain
personally identifiable information.
(6) The commission may adopt rules to:
(a) Ensure that personally identifiable information is not included in data or analysis;
(b) Control the use of data and analysis; and
(c) Establish prices or fees for the purchasing of, or other access to, data and analysis.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 664