Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 336.840 is amended to read:
336.840. [(1) As used in this  section, “independent communication” means communication that does
not require assistance or  interpretation by an individual who is not part of the communication but that
may require the use or assistance of an electronic device. ]
[(2) Each district school board shall adopt policies for the use of  personal electronic devices in the
schools of the school district as provided by this section. ]
[(3) A district school  board shall adopt a policy for the use of personal electronic devices that
support academic activities and independent communications. The policy must provide that: ]
[(a) Students may be allowed to  use personal electronic devices that support academic activities and
independent communications.]
[(b) Unless otherwise specifically prohibited by the policy, students may not be  denied the oppor-
tunity to use a personal electronic device that supports academic activities and  independent communi-
cations.]
[(4) If a school district implements a curriculum that  uses technology, the district school board
shall adopt a policy that provides that: ]
[(a) Students may  be allowed, but are not required, to use their own personal electronic devices for
the curriculum. ]
[(b) Students who use their own personal electronic devices for the curriculum must  be granted
access to any applications or electronic materials that are available  to students who do not use their
own personal electronic devices for the curriculum. ]
[(c) Students who use their own personal electronic devices for  the curriculum must be granted
access to applications and  electronic materials free of charge if the applications and electronic materials
are provided  free of charge to students who do not use their own personal electronic devices for the
curriculum.]
[(5) A policy adopted under subsection (3) or (4) of this section must include  a process and timeline
for responding to a student’s request related to the use of a  personal electronic device, including an
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4949
SB 1212
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
appeals process.]
[(6) School districts must ensure that the policies adopted under subsection (3) or (4) of this section
are made available to: ]
[(a) School district personnel  whose duties may require them to assist students with personal elec-
tronic devices; and ]
[(b) Students and parents or guardians of students. ]
[(7) Nothing in the requirements of this section prevents a district school board from prohibiting: ]
[(a) Telephonic or electronic  communications during regular school hours or during school events
if the communications are not related to academic activities or independent communications; ]
[(b) Communications using access to  social media or to nonacademic sites during regular school
hours or during school events; ]
[(c) The use of personal electronic devices for any purpose  that does not support academic activities
or independent communications; or ]
[(d) The use of personal electronic devices for entertainment purposes. ]
[(8) Nothing in this section  authorizes a district school board, or any employees of or volunteers
for the school district or a school of the school district, to request, require  or compel access to a
student’s electronic mail or personal online accounts. ]
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Personal electronic device” means a portable, electrically powered device that is  ca-
pable of making and receiving calls and text messages and  accessing the Internet independ-
ently from the school’s network infrastructure.
(b) “Personal electronic device” does not include a laptop computer or other device  re-
quired to support academic activities.
(2) A district school board shall adopt a  policy for the use of personal electronic devices
by students.
(3) Except as  provided by subsection (4) of this section, a policy adopted under this sec-
tion must prohibit the use of personal electronic devices by students from the start of  reg-
ular instructional hours until the end of regular instructional hours. The prohibition that
applies from the start of regular instructional hours  until the end of regular instructional
hours:
(a) Must include passing time between classes and time  provided for serving and eating
meals; and
(b) May exclude time when students are not on school grounds and are not under the
supervision of school personnel other than a school bus driver.
(4) A policy adopted under this section must provide for the use of  a personal electronic
device by a student when the use complies with the terms of:
(a) The student’s medical provider’s order for the care and treatment of a medical con-
dition;
(b) The student’s individualized education program, as defined in ORS 343.035;
(c) An education plan developed for  the student in accordance with section 504 of the
Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794; or
(d) A written exemption provided for the student by a  school administrator based on
guidelines adopted by the district school board  to allow the school administrator to accom-
modate the individual circumstances of a student or  to further specific educational outcomes
for a student.
[2]
SB 1212
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
(5)(a) The policy adopted under this section  must provide direction to school personnel
regarding actions that may be taken when a student violates requirements regarding  the use
of personal electronic devices under the policy. Allowed actions may not authorize  or other-
wise result in a student losing instructional time or being suspended or expelled.
(b) Nothing in this subsection prohibits school personnel from imposing  disciplinary
action for violations by a student of other school district  policies that occurred when the
student violated requirements regarding the use of personal electronic  devices as provided
by a policy adopted under this section.
(6) A school district shall ensure that the policy is made available to:
(a) School district personnel; and
(b) Students and parents or guardians of students.
[3]