Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 196.405 to
196.515.
SECTION 2. The Department of Land Conservation and Development shall:
(1) In coordination with community-based  partners, develop site management plans for
each site designated pursuant to  the portion of the Territorial Sea Plan related to rocky
habitat management.
(2) In coordination with other relevant state agencies, assist  community-based partners
in the implementation of the plans developed under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Maintain and update, on a website operated by the department, information regarding
Oregon’s ocean resources, including a mapping tool for rocky habitats.
(4) Consult with relevant state agencies,  stewardship groups and other stakeholders as
necessary to  implement the portion of the Territorial Sea Plan related to rocky habitat
management.
(5) Develop amendments to the portion of the Territorial Sea  Plan related to rocky
habitat management, as needed.
(6) Coordinate public processes for new sites designated pursuant to the  portion of the
Territorial Sea Plan related to rocky habitat management.
SECTION 3.  ORS 196.566 is amended to read:
196.566. The Oregon Ocean Science Trust shall:
(1) Promote peer-reviewed,  competitive research and monitoring that leads to increased knowl-
edge and understanding of Oregon’s ocean and coastal resources;
(2) Promote innovative, collaborative, community-oriented, multi-institutional approaches to re-
search and monitoring related to Oregon’s ocean and coastal resources;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1027
HB 3587
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
(3) Enhance this state’s capacity for peer-reviewed scientific ocean and coastal research; [ and]
(4) Subject  to available funding, establish and execute a competitive grant program to conduct
research and monitoring related to Oregon’s ocean and coastal resources[ .]; and
(5) Subject to available funding, establish  and execute a competitive grant program to
implement nonregulatory management programs for sites  designated pursuant to the portion
of the Territorial Sea Plan, as defined in ORS 196.405, related to rocky habitat  management.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Ocean Science Trust, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  out of the
General Fund, the amount of $300,000, for deposit in the Oregon Ocean Science Fund, to be
used to provide  competitive grants to implement nonregulatory management programs for
sites designated pursuant to the  portion of the Territorial Sea Plan related to rocky habitat
management, and for administrative costs incurred in providing the grants.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]