Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Water Resources Commission shall establish a program for com-
pensating ground water right holders for voluntarily  relinquishing all or a portion of the
holders’ ground water rights in basins designated as  critical ground water areas under ORS
537.730 to 537.740.
(2) The commission:
(a) May compensate a ground water right holder under the program for up to the  ap-
praised market value of a relinquished ground water right or portion of a ground water right.
(b) Shall incentivize participation in the program, which promotes the repurposing of
ground water otherwise used for irrigated agriculture in order to reduce ground water use,
to provide measurable benefits to the environment, the  economy or communities and to
minimize negative impacts of ground water use.
(c) Shall ensure that compensation under the program will:
(A) Result in measurable reductions in ground water use.
(B) Have a high likelihood of contributing to improved ground water conditions.
(3) The commission may accept moneys or grants from federal  or other governmental
entities, or from private or other sources, to support the program.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Water Resources Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out  of the
General Fund, the amount of $105,000,000, which may be expended for establishing and fund-
ing the program described in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]