Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 455.040 is amended to read:
455.040. (1) The state  building code [ shall be] is applicable and uniform throughout this state and
in all municipalities, and [ no] a  municipality [ shall] may not  enact or enforce any ordinance, rule
or regulation relating to the same matters  encompassed by the state building code but which pro-
vides different requirements unless authorized by the Director of the Department of  Consumer and
Business Services. The director’s authorization  [shall not be considered ] is not  an amendment to the
state building code under ORS 455.030. The  director shall encourage experimentation, innovation
and cost effectiveness by municipalities in the adoption of ordinances,  rules or regulations which
conflict with the state building code.
[(2) Subsection (1) of this section is operative: ]
[(a) With regard to the state structural code, July 1, 1974. ]
[(b) With regard to the state mechanical, heating  and ventilating code, on the effective date of such
code as determined under ORS 183.355. ]
[(c) With regard to each specialty code not named by paragraphs (a) and (b) of  this subsection, on
the effective date, as determined under  ORS 183.355, of the first amendments to such code adopted
pursuant to this chapter. ]
(2) Notwithstanding any  ordinance, rule or regulation by means of which a municipality
has adopted amendments to  or variations in the state building code that apply to buildings
or structures  within the municipality, the state building code applies exclusively and uni-
formly to  any building or structure within the municipality in which construction, recon-
struction, renovation or remodeling  occurs for the purpose of converting commercial office
space to housing.
SECTION 2.  ORS 455.040, as amended by section 1 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
455.040. [(1)] The state building code  is applicable and uniform throughout this state and in all
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4802
HB 3958
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
municipalities, and a municipality may not enact or enforce  any ordinance, rule or regulation re-
lating to the same matters encompassed by the state  building code but which provides different re-
quirements unless authorized by the Director of the Department of  Consumer and Business Services.
The director’s authorization is not an amendment to the state building code under ORS 455.030. The
director shall encourage experimentation, innovation and cost effectiveness by municipalities in  the
adoption of ordinances, rules or regulations which conflict with the state building code.
[(2) Notwithstanding any ordinance, rule or  regulation by means of which a municipality has
adopted amendments to or variations in the state building code that apply to buildings or structures
within the  municipality, the state building code applies exclusively and uniformly to any building or
structure within the municipality in which construction, reconstruction, renovation or remodeling occurs
for the purpose of converting commercial office space to housing. ]
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 455.040 by section 1  of this 2025 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. The amendments to ORS 455.040  by section 2 of this 2025 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2031.
[2]