Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in  this section, “application assister” means an individual em-
ployed by an independent nonprofit organization who is trained to assist an applicant for,  or
a recipient of, medical assistance in completing application and renewal forms  and complying
with procedures to qualify for the medical assistance program.
(2) In order to facilitate the enrollment of eligible individuals in the medical assistance
program, the Oregon Health Authority shall:
(a) Maintain a statewide network of application assisters to ensure that there is  at least
one application assister for every 10,000 medical assistance recipients;
(b) Maintain  an easy and efficient procedure for coordinated care organizations to refer
members to the authority for assistance with applications and renewals;
(c) Allow coordinated care organizations to  provide funding to independent nonprofit or-
ganizations that provide application assistance;
(d) Allow coordinated care organizations to provide  application assistance to individuals
who are applying for or seeking to renew medical  assistance and who reside in geographic
areas served by only one coordinated care organization; and
(e) Ensure that effective procedures are in place to reenroll an individual who  was in-
voluntarily disenrolled as a result of incarceration immediately upon the individual’s  dis-
charge from incarceration.
(3) The authority shall request any federal approval that may be required in order  to
secure federal financial participation in the costs of complying with this section.
SECTION 3.  ORS 414.041 is amended to read:
414.041. (1) The Oregon Health Authority, under the direction of the  Oregon Health Policy
Board and in collaboration with the Department of Human  Services, shall implement a streamlined
and simple application  and renewal  process for the medical assistance and premium  assistance
programs administered by the Oregon Health Authority. The process  must meet the requirements
of ORS 411.400, 411.402, 411.404, 411.406, 411.408 and 411.967  and section 2 of this 2017 Act .
(2) [ In developing the simplified application process, the authority shall consult  with ] The au-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3462
HB 2838
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
thority shall  convene an advisory group, that includes stakeholders and  persons not employed
by the authority who have experience in serving vulnerable and hard-to-reach populations , to de-
velop, implement and continuously  improve the application and renewal process for the
medical assistance program .
(3) The authority and the department shall  facilitate outreach and enrollment efforts to connect
eligible individuals with all available publicly funded health programs.
SECTION 4.  ORS 411.400 is amended to read:
411.400. (1) An application for any category of aid shall  also constitute an application for med-
ical assistance.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the  Department of Human Services and
the Oregon Health Authority shall accept an application for  medical assistance and any required
verification of eligibility from the applicant, an adult who is in the applicant’s  household or family,
an authorized representative of  the applicant or, if the applicant is a minor or incapacitated, some-
one acting on behalf of the applicant:
(a) Over the Internet;
(b) By telephone;
(c) By mail;
(d) In person; and
(e) Through other commonly available electronic means.
(3) The department and the authority may require an  applicant or person acting on behalf of
an applicant to provide only the information necessary for the purpose of making an eligibility  de-
termination or for a purpose directly connected to the  administration of medical assistance or the
health insurance exchange.
(4) The department and the authority shall provide application and  [ recertification] renewal as-
sistance , in accordance  with section 2 of this 2017 Act,  to individuals with disabilities, individuals
with limited English proficiency, individuals facing physical or geographic  barriers and individuals
seeking help with the application for medical assistance or recertification of eligibility for medical
assistance:
(a) Over the Internet;
(b) By telephone; and
(c) In person.
(5)(a) The Department of Human Services and the authority shall promptly transfer information
received under this section to the Department of  Consumer and Business Services, the United States
Department of Health and Human Services or the Internal Revenue Service as necessary for the
determination of eligibility for the health insurance  exchange, premium tax credits or cost-sharing
reductions.
(b) The Department  of Human Services shall promptly transfer information received under this
section to the authority for individuals who are eligible for medical assistance because  they qualify
for public assistance.
(6) The Department of Human Services  and the authority shall accept from the Department of
Consumer and Business Services an  application and any verification that was submitted to the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services by an applicant or on behalf of  an applicant in order
for the Department of Human Services or  the authority to determine the applicant’s eligibility for
medical assistance.
SECTION 5.
ORS 414.041 is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
[2]
HB 2838
1
[3]