Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is  added to and made a part of the Insurance Code.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Audit” means an on-site or  remote review of records of or claims made by a provider
by or on behalf of an insurer.
(b) “Behavioral health treatment” includes:
(A) Mental health treatment and services as defined in ORS 743B.427; and
(B) Substance use disorder treatment and services as defined in ORS 743B.427.
(c) “Claim” means a request made by a provider to an insurer to reimburse  the cost of
behavioral health treatment provided to a beneficiary of a policy or certificate of health in-
surance offered by the insurer.
(d) “Clerical error” means a minor error in the keeping, recording or transcribing of re-
cords or documents or in the handling of electronic or hard copies of correspondence.
(e) “Provider”  means a person who is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized to pro-
vide behavioral health treatment in this state.
(2) An insurer that offers a policy or certificate of health insurance that reimburses the
cost of behavioral health treatment shall make available to all  providers who submit claims
a separate  document containing a detailed written description of all requirements for the
successful resolution of a claim that may be audited by the insurer in the future and the
requirements that applied in any previous period during which a claim of the provider was
audited. The description must:
(a) Be written in plain language that is easy  to understand and that does not rely on
references to other sources such as statutes or contract provisions;
(b) Provide examples of documentation requirements for the submission of claims;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1087
HB 2029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Identify which requirements may result in recoupment for failure to comply;
(d) Explain which requirements apply to in-network providers and which apply to out-of-
network providers; and
(e) If the requirements differentiate  between types of providers, explain the requirements
applicable to each type of provider.
(3) An insurer may  not recoup from a provider a payment on a claim if the insurer has
failed to comply with subsection (2) of this section.
(4) An insurer shall notify providers no later than  30 days before the effective date of any
changes made by the insurer to the requirements described in subsection (2) of  this section.
An insurer may not demand recoupment of a payment made on a claim based on new  re-
quirements if the insurer has failed to comply with this subsection.
(5) An insurer’s audit of a claim:
(a) May  not be conducted on any paid claim submitted by a provider on a date more than
12 months earlier or, in the case of suspected fraud,  may not be conducted more than six
years after the date payment was made on the claim;
(b) For an audit initiated after payment  is made on a claim, must be completed no later
than 180 days from the date the audit is initiated on the  claim, unless a provider fails to
submit records in a timely fashion or initiates an appeal of the insurer’s audit finding;
(c) Must be reviewed by a behavioral health professional;
(d) May not result in reversing or overturning a medical necessity determination made
by the insurer when the claim was submitted or prior  authorization of the service approved,
unless the patient was no longer insured at the time the service was provided; and
(e) May use sampling  methods or other similar means to determine whether to initiate
an audit of a provider’s claims but may recoup from the provider only payments on individual
claims for which the insurer specifically identifies an error.
(6) In the course of an audit  initiated prior to payment on a claim, an insurer shall re-
spond to a provider with findings no later than 30 days after  the date the provider responds
to the insurer’s request for additional information regarding the claim.
(7) An insurer may not  demand recoupment of a payment made on a claim based on a
clerical error.
(8) If an insurer identifies an error during an audit  of a claim that results in the
insurer’s demand for recoupment of the insurer’s payment on the claim, the insurer:
(a) Shall provide a detailed description of the error and allow a  provider a reasonable
opportunity of not less than 30 days to rectify the error; and
(b) Shall allow the provider to use a repayment plan of up  to three years to repay the
claim unless the recoupment is based on an insurer’s duplicate payment on a claim.
(9) An insurer may not begin a new audit  of any claim submitted by a provider while
another audit is in process. A subsequent audit  may not be initiated until the provider has
been given the opportunity to correct mistakes identified in the  previous audit and complete
any corrective action plan resulting from the previous audit.
(10) An insurer conducting an audit may not structure  compensation paid to an employee
or agent conducting an audit in any manner that creates a direct financial incentive to the
employee or agent to identify errors that result in recoupment.
(11) An insurer may not charge a provider for the costs of conducting an audit.
(12) The provisions of this section apply to audits conducted  by an insurer and to audits
[2]
HB 2029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
conducted by a third party on behalf of an insurer.
SECTION 3.
Sections 4 and 5 of this 2025 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
chapter 414.
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Audit” has the meaning given that term in section 5 of this 2025 Act.
(b) “Provider” means an individual who is licensed, certified or  otherwise authorized to
provide physical or mental health services  and supplies and who contracts with a coordinated
care organization or is enrolled as a Medicaid provider in this state.
(2)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish an education unit within the  division
of the  authority that is charged with overseeing the integrity of provider billing. The educa-
tion unit, in concert with the compliance officers  of coordinated care organizations and with
input from communities and culturally competent  providers, shall develop a curriculum
based on federal and state statutes and rules to inform  providers regarding audits or reviews
conducted by or on behalf of coordinated care organizations or the authority. The curriculum
shall include, but is  not limited to, written documents and presentations explaining the doc-
umentation that is necessary for audits or reviews  and best practices for preparing and
managing records to best prepare providers for audits or reviews.
(b) If a coordinated care organization requires different documentation to  comply with
an audit than the documentation required by the authority, the coordinated care organiza-
tion shall communicate those differences in the curriculum materials and presentations  de-
veloped under this section.
(3) Curriculum materials and presentations must be:
(a) Easily understood and may not solely rely on references to statutes;
(b) Posted to the websites of the authority and each coordinated care organization; and
(c) Easily accessible and available to all providers.
(4) The authority and coordinated care organizations shall ensure that providers are
aware of the curriculum and how to access the curriculum.
(5) The education unit must be sufficiently staffed to  allow for regular online presenta-
tions statewide.
SECTION 5.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Audit” means an on-site or  remote review of records of or claims made by a provider
by or on behalf of a coordinated care organization or the Oregon Health Authority.
(b) “Behavioral health treatment” includes:
(A) Mental health treatment and services as defined in ORS 743B.427; and
(B) Substance use disorder treatment and services as defined in ORS 743B.427.
(c) “Claim” means a request made by  a provider to a coordinated care organization or
the authority to  reimburse the cost of behavioral health treatment provided to a member
of the coordinated care organization or to a medical assistance recipient who  is not enrolled
in a coordinated care organization.
(d) “Clerical error” means a minor error in the keeping, recording or transcribing of re-
cords or documents or in the handling of electronic or hard copies  of correspondence that
does not result in financial harm to a coordinated care organization or to a patient.
(e) “Provider” means an individual who is licensed, certified or otherwise  authorized to
provide behavioral health treatment in this state.
(2) A coordinated care organization and the Oregon Health Authority shall  make avail-
[3]
HB 2029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
able to all  providers all of the following regarding the requirements for the submission of
claims:
(a) Examples of documentation requirements for the submission of claims;
(b) Identification of which requirements may result in recoupment for failure to  comply;
(c) An explanation of which requirements apply to in-network providers and which  apply
to out-of-network providers; and
(d) If the requirements differentiate between  types of providers, an explanation of the
requirements applicable to each type of provider.
(3) A coordinated care organization and the authority shall notify providers no  later than
30 days before the effective date of any contract changes by the coordinated care  organiza-
tion or changes by the authority to relevant administrative rules.
(4) An audit of a claim:
(a) May  not be conducted on any paid claim submitted by a provider on a date more than
five years earlier without an indication of fraud or an improper payment;
(b) Except  as provided in subsection (5) of this section, must be completed no later than
180 days from the date an audit is initiated on a claim;
(c) Must be conducted by a behavioral health professional; and
(d) May not result in reversing  or overturning a determination that a service is medically
necessary made by a  coordinated care organization or the authority when prior authorization
of the service was given.
(5) In the course of an audit, if a coordinated care organization or the  authority requests
additional information regarding a claim, the coordinated care organization or the authority
shall respond to a provider with findings no later than 180 days after the date the audit was
initiated, unless an extension is agreed to in writing by all parties.
(6) If a  coordinated care organization or the authority identifies an error during an audit
of a claim that results in a demand for recoupment of the payment on the claim:
(a) The coordinated care organization or the authority shall work with a provider on  a
repayment plan, if requested; and
(b) A provider may  request, and is entitled to receive, a revised audit if the provider be-
lieves that the coordinated care organization or the authority based the finding of error  on
an incorrect provision of law.
(7) Unless required  by federal law, a coordinated care organization or the authority con-
ducting an audit may not compensate an individual for conducting  the audit in an amount
that is based on a percentage of the overpayments  recouped or in any other way that creates
a financial incentive to identify errors that result in recoupment.
(8) The provisions of this section apply to audits conducted by a coordinated care organ-
ization and the authority  and to audits conducted by a third party on behalf of a coordinated
care organization or the authority.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall  collaborate with health care providers
that provide care to medical assistance  enrollees, coordinated care organizations, community
groups that advocate for diversity and equity and health care industry representatives  to
develop recommendations for improving the processes by which payers  audit health care
providers’ claims for reimbursement of the cost of health care services delivered.
(2) No later than July 1, 2026, the authority shall report the status of the development
of recommendations under subsection (1) of this section to the interim committees of the
[4]
HB 2029
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
Legislative Assembly related to health and the anticipated date that the  recommendations
will be submitted.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 414.592 is amended to read:
414.592. Notwithstanding ORS 414.590:
(1) Contracts between the Oregon Health Authority and coordinated care organizations or indi-
vidual providers for the provision of behavioral health services must  align with the quality metrics
and incentives developed by the Behavioral Health Committee under ORS 413.017 and  contain pro-
visions that ensure that:
(a) Individuals have easy access to needed care;
(b) Services are responsive to individual and community needs; [ and]
(c) Services will lead to meaningful improvement in individuals’ lives[ .]; and
(d) Coordinated care organizations comply with section 4 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The authority must provide at least 90 days’ notice of changes needed to  contracts that are
necessary to comply with subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 8.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[5]