Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Rural Medical Training Facilities is established.
(2) The task force consists of 11 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint two members from  among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives  shall appoint two members from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint seven members, who must be:
(A) A representative from the City of Roseburg;
(B) A representative from Douglas County;
(C) A representative from a hospital or medical facility  located in or near Douglas
County;
(D) A representative from the Roseburg VA Medical Center;
(E) A nurse, nurse practitioner,  medical technician or other health practitioner who re-
sides in or  near Douglas County and who has experience training students in nursing or as
medical technicians;
(F) A representative from the Oregon State Board of Nursing; and
(G) A representative from the Oregon Health Authority.
(3) In addition to the members described in subsection (2) of this  section, the task force
may upon its own motion add a representative from a university or community college if the
task force has previously identified the university or community college as an  educational
institution that is willing to seek investment opportunities in or near Roseburg.
(4) The task force shall investigate issues related to alleviating a shortage  of skilled and
experienced nurses and medical technicians in  Roseburg and in Douglas County, with a par-
ticular emphasis on issues related to establishing a training facility in partnership with an
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3136
HB 3280
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
academic program in or near  Roseburg. The task force shall also investigate and discuss
methods of reintegration into society through higher education and career training for vet-
erans who are transitioning out of military service.
(5) The task force may:
(a) Consult experts and perform original research;
(b) Receive testimony and documentation in any form;
(c) Issue requests for information, and requests for quotations and other documents,  in
collaboration and partnership with the City of Roseburg and Douglas County; and
(d) Perform any  other task that is necessary to carry out the mission described in sub-
section (4) of this section.
(6) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(7) Official action  by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the members
of the task force.
(8) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(9) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(10) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(11) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(12) The task force shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to an interim committee  of the Legislative
Assembly related to health care no later than December 15, 2026.
(13) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall provide staff support to the task force.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of the task force’s duties and, to  the extent permitted by
laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice  the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]