Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Age-Appropriate Design Code. Sections 1 to 8  of this 2023 Act shall be known
and may be cited as the “Age-Appropriate Design Code.”
SECTION 2. Legislative findings. (1) The Legislative Assembly declares that children
should be afforded  protections by online products, services or features specifically directed
at children and by all online products, services or features that children are reasonably likely
to access.
(2) The Legislative Assembly finds:
(a) When a business designs, develops or provides online products, services or  features
that children are reasonably likely to access, the business  should consider the best interests
of children.
(b) When the  best interests of children and commercial interests conflict, businesses
should prioritize the privacy, safety and well-being of children over commercial interests.
SECTION 3.
Definitions. As used in sections 1 to 8 of this 2023 Act:
(1) “Child” or “children” means an individual or individuals under  18 years of age, unless
otherwise specified.
(2) “Data Protection Impact Assessment” means a systematic survey  to assess and mit-
igate risks arising from a business’s data management practices  as it relates to children who
are reasonably likely to access the business’s online products, services or features.
(3) “Default” means a preselected user option adopted by  a business for the business’s
online product, service or feature.
(4) “Online product, service or feature” does not include:
(a) A broadband Internet access service;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2060
SB 196
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) A telecommunications service; or
(c) The delivery or use of a physical product.
(5) “Profile” or “profiling” means any form of automated processing of  personal infor-
mation to evaluate, analyze or predict  aspects, characteristics or traits of an individual, such
as the individual’s performance at work,  economic situation, health, personal preferences,
interests, reliability, behavior, location or movements.
(6) “Reasonably likely to access” means a reasonable expectation that a child will  access
an online product, service or feature.
SECTION 4.
Reasonably likely to access;  factors. The following factors shall be consid-
ered when determining whether a child is  reasonably likely to access an online product,
service or feature:
(1) Whether the online product, service or feature is directed at children.
(2) Whether the online product, service or feature contains designs or  elements that are
known to be  attractive to children, such as games, cartoons, music or celebrities who appeal
to children.
(3) Whether the online product, service or feature is  substantially similar to an online
product, service or feature that children routinely access.
(4) Whether any advertisements embedded in  the online product, service or feature are
directed at children.
(5) The age demographics  of the individuals who routinely access the online product,
service or feature.
SECTION 5.
Online product, service or feature; requirements.  A business that provides
an online product, service or feature that a child is reasonably likely to access:
(1) Shall:
(a) Before providing  the online product, service or feature, complete a Data Protection
Impact Assessment for the online product, service or feature.
(b) Maintain a  record of the Data Protection Impact Assessment completed under para-
graph (a) of this  subsection and all related documentation for the duration the business is
providing the online product, service or feature.
(c) Review and update biennially the Data Protection Impact Assessment completed  un-
der paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(d) Document any  risk of material detriment to children arising from the business’s data
management practices identified in the Data Protection Impact Assessment completed  under
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(e)(A) Estimate with a reasonable level of certainty the appropriate age for a  child to use
or access the online product, service or feature  in consideration to any risks arising from
the business’s data management practices; or
(B) If unable to estimate with a reasonable level of certainty the appropriate age,  apply
the highest level of privacy and data protections available  to the online product, service or
feature.
(f) Configure all default privacy settings for  children for the online product, service or
feature to the highest level of privacy and data protections available,  unless the business can
demonstrate a compelling reason that a different default privacy setting is in the best in-
terests of children.
(g) Provide any privacy information, terms of service, policies and  community standards
[2]
SB 196
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
concisely, prominently and with clear language suited  for the age of children reasonably
likely to access the online product, service or feature.
(h) Provide an obvious signal to a child accessing the online product,  service or feature
when the child is  being monitored or tracked, if the online product, service or feature allows
a parent, guardian or another user to monitor the child’s online  activity or track the child’s
location.
(i) Enforce published terms, policies and community standards  established by the busi-
ness.
(j) Provide prominent, accessible and responsive tools  for exercising privacy rights and
reporting concerns to a child accessing the  online product, service or feature, or if appro-
priate, the child’s parent or guardian.
(2) May not:
(a) Use the personal information of a child in a manner that the business  knows, or has
reason to know, is materially detrimental to the physical or mental  health or well-being of
the child.
(b) Profile a child by default, unless the business can demonstrate:
(A) Appropriate safeguards are in place to protect children; and
(B)(i) Profiling is necessary to provide  the requested online product, service or feature
and is  limited to aspects of the online product, service or feature in which the child is ac-
tively and knowingly engaged; or
(ii) A compelling reason that profiling is in the best interests of children.
(c) Collect, sell, share or retain  any personal information of a child that is not necessary
to provide the online product, service or feature unless the  business can demonstrate a
compelling reason that collecting, selling,  sharing or retaining the personal information is in
the best interests of children.
(d) Use personal information of a child for any reason except  for the reason for which
the personal information was collected, unless  the business can demonstrate a compelling
reason that use of the personal information is in the best interests of children.
(e) Collect, sell or share any precise geolocation  information of a child by default unless
the collection of  the precise geolocation is strictly necessary for the business to provide the
requested online product, service or feature  and collection of the precise geolocation is lim-
ited to the period of time the precise geolocation is necessary to provide the online product,
service or feature.
(f) Collect any precise geolocation information of a child unless the business provides an
obvious signal to the child that the  information is being collected for the duration the busi-
ness is collecting the precise geolocation information.
(g) Implement a user interface that is  designed to manipulate a child to provide personal
information.
(h) Encourage a child to provide personal information that  is not necessary to provide
the online product, service or feature.
(i) Take any action that the  business knows, or has reason to know, is materially detri-
mental to a child’s physical or mental health or well-being.
(j) Use any personal information the business has collected  to estimate the age or age
range of a child for any purpose  other than providing the online product, service or feature
or retain the personal information longer than necessary to estimate the age  or age range
[3]
SB 196
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of a child.
SECTION 6.
Data Protection  Impact Assessment. A completed Data Protection Impact
Assessment required under section 5 of this 2023 Act must:
(1) Identify:
(a) The purpose or function of an online product, service or feature;
(b) How the online product, service or  feature uses the personal information of a child;
and
(c) The risks of material detriment to the physical  or mental health or well-being of a
child who accesses the online product, service or feature.
(2) Evaluate and mitigate:
(a) Whether the design of or an algorithm used by the online  product, service or feature
could result in a child who accesses the online product, service or feature to:
(A) Access harmful content;
(B) Make contact or interact with individuals who may be harmful; and
(C) Witness, participate in or be subject to harmful conduct;
(b) Whether any advertisements embedded in the online product, service  or feature could
harm a child who accesses the online product, service or feature;
(c) Whether the design of the online product, service or  feature increases, sustains or
extends a child’s use of the online product, service or feature; and
(d) Whether and to what amount  the online product, service or feature collects, pro-
cesses and retains a child’s personal information.
SECTION 7.
Attorney General; access to assessments. (1) Upon written request by the
Attorney General, a business shall provide the Attorney General:
(a) Within three business days, a list of all Data Protection  Impact Assessments the
business has completed pursuant to section 5 of this 2023 Act.
(b) Within five  business days, a copy of each completed Data Protection Impact Assess-
ment.
(2)(a) A Data Protection Impact Assessment provided to the  Attorney General pursuant
to this section is confidential and exempt from public disclosure.
(b) The provision of a Data Protection Impact Assessment  to the Attorney General pur-
suant to this section does not constitute a waiver of any existing privilege or protection.
SECTION 8. Action by Attorney General; civil penalty;  injunction. (1) The Attorney
General may bring an action, in the name  of the state, for a violation of section 5 of this 2023
Act seeking:
(a) Injunctive relief to restrain a business from providing an online product, service or
feature;
(b) To recover civil penalties in amounts provided in subsection (2) of this section; or
(c) To recover attorney fees and other enforcement costs and disbursements.
(2) Civil penalties for a violation of section 5 of this 2023 Act are as follows:
(a) For each  negligent violation, up to $2,500 per child who accessed the online product,
service or feature; or
(b) For each intentional  violation, up to $7,500 per child who accessed the online product,
service or feature.
(3) All sums of moneys from penalties received  by the Department of Justice under a
judgment, settlement or compromise in  an action or potential action brought under this
[4]
SB 196
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section, shall, upon receipt, be deposited with the State Treasurer to the credit of  the De-
partment of Justice Protection and Education Revolving Account established  pursuant to
ORS 180.095.
SECTION 9.
Task Force on Age-Appropriate Design. (1) The Task Force on  Age-
Appropriate Design is established.
(2) The task force consists of eight members appointed as follows:
(a) The President  of the Senate, in consultation with the Senate Minority Leader, shall
appoint two voting members who  are members of the public. The two members appointed
under this paragraph may not be from the same political party.
(b) The Speaker of the  House of Representatives, in consultation with the House Minority
Leader, shall appoint two  voting members who are members of the public. The two members
appointed under this paragraph may not be from the same political party.
(c) The Governor shall appoint three voting members.
(d) The Attorney General shall appoint one ex officio, nonvoting member.
(3) All voting members of the task  force must have an expertise in one or more of the
following areas:
(a) Children’s physical health and development.
(b) Children’s mental and emotional health and development.
(c) Children’s legal rights.
(d) Data privacy.
(e) Computer and Internet science.
(4) The task force shall study best practices for the following:
(a) Identifying online products, services or features that children are reasonably  likely
to access.
(b) Evaluating and prioritizing the best interests of  children with respect to privacy,
physical and mental health and well-being.
(c) Evaluating how the design, development and  implementation of an online product,
service or feature  may affect, positively or negatively, the best interests of children with
respect to privacy, physical and mental health and well-being.
(d) Ensuring that a  business that provides an online product, service or feature that a
child is reasonably likely to access  uses methods to mitigate risks to children arising from
the business’s data management practices.
(e) Assessing and mitigating  risks to children that arise during the use of a business’s
online products, services or features.
(f) Publishing privacy information, policies and standards in concise, clear  language
suitable for  the age of children reasonably likely to access an online product, service or
feature.
(5) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for  the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by  the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
[5]
SB 196
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to an interim committee  of the Legislative
Assembly related to information and  technology management no later than September 15,
2024.
(12) The Legislative Policy and Research Office shall  provide staff support to the task
force.
(13) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(14) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
(15) As used in this section,  “children,” “online product, service or feature” and “rea-
sonably likely to access” have the meanings given those terms in section 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 10.
Task force sunset. Section 9 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 11. Operative date. Sections 1 to 8 of this 2023 Act become operative on July
1, 2024.
SECTION 12. The section captions  used in this 2023 Act are provided only for the con-
venience of the reader and do not become  part of the statutory law of this state or express
any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
[6]