Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) To help local communities build capacity  for, convene around and develop
place-based solutions to local stewardship of natural resources, the Office  of Outdoor Re-
creation established by ORS 390.241 shall establish and operate a rural community and land
stewardship technical assistance and planning pilot program.
(2) The pilot program must facilitate:
(a) The prioritizing of local, community-based stewardship of natural resources; and
(b) The  employment of local community members to achieve the stewardship of natural
resources.
(3) Under the pilot program, the office shall award grants to support:
(a) The conservation of wildlife;
(b) The restoration of fisheries or streams;
(c) The restoration of watersheds or forests;
(d) Activities that promote resilience to wildfire; or
(e) The development of renewable energy on public or private land.
(4) In awarding grants,  the office shall prioritize projects to benefit communities that
identify challenges to the stewardship of natural resources that:
(a) Arise from outdoor recreation activities; and
(b) Impact community development, housing or workforce development.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Local Stewardship Fund  is established in the State Treasury, sepa-
rate and distinct  from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Local Stewardship Fund
shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The fund consists of moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly for deposit in
the fund, grant funds received by the  State Parks and Recreation Department and other
moneys appropriated to, allocated to, deposited in, credited to  or transferred to the fund by
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2397
HB 2409
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
the Legislative Assembly or otherwise.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the department,  for distribution
to the Office of Outdoor Recreation, for purposes described in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) On or before September 15, 2030, the Office of Outdoor  Recreation shall
report on the pilot program established under section 1 of this 2025 Act, in the  manner pre-
scribed by ORS 192.245, to committees  or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
related to natural resources.
(2) The report must include recommendations  concerning further advancement of the
stewardship of natural resources by local communities.
SECTION 4. (1) Sections 1 to 3 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2031.
(2) Any moneys remaining in the Local Stewardship Fund established  under section 2 of
this 2025 Act that are  unexpended and unobligated on the date specified in subsection (1) of
this section shall revert to the General Fund.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  State Parks and Recreation Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the General Fund,  the amount of $500,000, for deposit in the Local Stewardship Fund
established by section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]