Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 326.011 is amended to read:
326.011. In establishing policy for the administration and operation of the public elementary and
secondary schools in the  State of Oregon and in carrying out its duties as prescribed by law, the
State Board of Education shall consider the goals of modern education, the requirements  of a sound,
comprehensive curriculum best suited to the needs and aspirations of the students and the  public
and any other factors consistent with the maintenance of a modern and efficient elementary  and
secondary school system.
SECTION 2.  ORS 329.015 is amended to read:
329.015. (1) The Legislative Assembly believes that education is a major civilizing influence  on
the development of a  humane, responsible and informed citizenry, able to adjust to and grow in a
rapidly changing world. Students must be encouraged to  learn of their heritage and their place in
the global society. The Legislative Assembly concludes that these goals  are not inconsistent with
the goals to be implemented under this chapter.
(2) The Legislative Assembly believes that the goals of kindergarten through grade  12 education
are:
(a) To equip students with the academic and career skills and information  necessary to pursue
the future of their choice through a well-rounded program of rigorous [ academic preparation] liberal
arts academics  and career readiness;
(b) To provide an environment  that motivates , supports and inspires students to pursue serious
scholarship and to have experience in applying knowledge and skills and demonstrating
achievement , whether in technical pursuits, academic pursuits, artistic pursuits  or other
pursuits;
(c) To provide students with the skills necessary  to pursue learning throughout their lives in
an ever-changing world; [ and]
(d) To prepare students for successful transitions to the next phase of their  educational
development[ .]; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1762
HB 2896
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) To ensure that all students have the  opportunity to earn a high school diploma, a
modified diploma or any other credential equivalent to a high school diploma.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 329.025 is amended to read:
329.025. It  is the intent of the Legislative Assembly to maintain a system of public elementary
and secondary schools that allows students,  parents, teachers, administrators, school district boards
and the State Board of Education to be accountable for the  development and improvement of the
public school system. The public school system shall have the following characteristics:
(1) Provides equal  and open access and educational opportunities for all students in the state
regardless of their linguistic background, culture, race, gender, capability or geographic location;
(2) Assumes that all students can learn  and establishes high, specific skill and knowledge ex-
pectations and recognizes individual differences at all instructional levels;
(3) Provides  each student an education experience that supports academic growth beyond profi-
ciency in established academic content standards and encourages  students to attain aspirational
goals that are individually challenging;
(4) Provides special  education, compensatory education, linguistically and culturally appropriate
education and other specialized programs to all students who need those services;
(5) Supports the physical and cognitive growth and development of students;
(6) Provides students with a solid foundation in the skills of reading, writing, problem  solving
and communication;
(7) Provides opportunities for students to learn, think, reason,  retrieve information, use tech-
nology and work effectively alone and in groups;
(8) Provides for rigorous academic content standards  and instruction in mathematics, science,
language arts, history, geography, economics, civics,  higher education and career path skills, per-
sonal financial education, physical education, health, the arts and world languages;
(9) Provides [ increased] sufficient learning time;
(10) Provides students an educational background [ to the end that they will ] that enables them
to function successfully in a constitutional republic, a  participatory democracy and a multicultural
nation and world;
(11) Provides students with the knowledge and skills that will  provide the opportunities to suc-
ceed in the world of work, as members of families and as citizens;
(12) Provides students with the knowledge and skills that lead to an active, healthy lifestyle;
(13) Provides students with the knowledge  and skills to take responsibility for their decisions
and choices;
(14) Provides opportunities for students to learn through a variety of teaching strategies;
(15) Emphasizes involvement of parents and the community in the total education of students;
(16) Transports children safely to and from school;
(17) Ensures that the funds allocated to schools reflect the uncontrollable differences in costs
facing each district;
(18) Ensures  that local schools have adequate control of how funds are spent to best meet the
needs and aspirations of students in their communities; and
(19) Provides for a safe, educational environment.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 329.045 is amended to read:
329.045. (1)(a) In order to achieve the goals contained in ORS 329.025, the State Board of Edu-
cation shall regularly  and periodically review and revise its Common Curriculum Goals, performance
indicators and diploma requirements.
[2]
HB 2896
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The review and revision conducted under this section shall:
(A) Include Essential Learning Skills and rigorous academic content  standards in mathematics,
science, language arts, history, geography, economics, civics, higher education  and career path
skills, personal financial education, physical education, health, the arts and world languages.
(B) Involve teachers  and other educators, parents of students and other citizens and shall pro-
vide ample opportunity for public comment.
(C) [ Encourage increased ] Provide for sufficient  learning time. As used in this  subparagraph,
[“increased learning time” ] “sufficient learning time” means a schedule that encompasses a
[longer] school day,  week or year [ for the purpose of increasing the ] that provides a sufficient  total
number of school hours [ available to provide ] to enable :
(i) Students [ with] to receive instruction in core academic subjects, including  mathematics, sci-
ence, language arts, history, geography, economics, civics, higher education and career path skills,
personal financial education, the arts and world languages;
(ii) Students [ with] to receive instruction in subjects other than the subjects identified in sub-
subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph, including health and physical education;
(iii) Students [ with] to have  the opportunity to participate  in enrichment activities that con-
tribute to a well-rounded education, including learning opportunities that  may be based on service,
experience or work and that may be provided through partnerships with other organizations; and
(iv) Teachers [ with] to have  the opportunity to collaborate, plan and engage in  professional
development within and across grades and subjects.
(c) Nothing in this subsection prevents a school district or  public charter school from main-
taining control over course content, format, materials and teaching methods.
(2) The State Board of Education shall continually review and revise all adopted academic con-
tent standards necessary for students to successfully transition to the next phase of their education.
(3)(a) School  districts and public charter schools must offer students instruction in mathematics,
science, language arts, history, geography, economics, civics, higher education  and career path
skills, personal financial education, physical education, health, the arts and world languages.
(b) Instruction required under paragraph (a) of this subsection must:
(A) Meet the academic content standards adopted by the State Board of Education; and
(B) Meet the  requirements adopted by the State Board of Education and the board of the school
district or public charter school.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 329.045, as amended by  section 1, chapter 202, Oregon Laws 2019, section 6,
chapter  178, Oregon Laws 2021, section 1, chapter 328, Oregon Laws 2023, and section 7, chapter
564, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
329.045. (1)(a) In order to achieve the goals contained in ORS 329.025, the State Board  of Edu-
cation shall regularly  and periodically review and revise its Common Curriculum Goals, performance
indicators and diploma requirements.
(b) The review and revision conducted under this section shall:
(A) Include Essential Learning  Skills and rigorous academic content standards in mathematics,
science, language arts, history,  geography, economics, civics, higher education and career path
skills, personal financial education, physical education, health, the arts and world languages.
(B) Ensure that the academic content standards for history, geography,  economics and civics
include sufficient instruction on the histories, contributions and perspectives of individuals who:
(i) Are Native American;
(ii) Are of African, Asian, Pacific Island, Chicano, Latino, Middle Eastern or Jewish descent;
[3]
HB 2896
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(iii) Are women;
(iv) Have disabilities;
(v) Are immigrants or refugees; or
(vi) Are lesbian, gay, bisexual or transgender.
(C) Involve teachers  and other educators, parents of students and other citizens and shall pro-
vide ample opportunity for public comment.
(D) [ Encourage increased ] Provide for sufficient  learning time. As used in this subparagraph,
[“increased learning time” ] “sufficient learning time” means a schedule that encompasses a
[longer] school day,  week or year [ for the purpose of increasing the ] that provides a sufficient  total
number of school hours [ available to provide ] to enable :
(i) Students [ with] to receive instruction in core academic subjects, including  mathematics, sci-
ence, language arts, history, geography, economics, civics, higher education and career path skills,
personal financial education, the arts and world languages;
(ii) Students [ with] to receive  instruction in subjects other than the subjects  identified in sub-
subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph, including health and physical education;
(iii) Students [ with] to have  the  opportunity to participate in enrichment activities that con-
tribute to a well-rounded education, including  learning opportunities that may be based on service,
experience or work and that may be provided through partnerships with other organizations; and
(iv) Teachers  [ with] to have  the opportunity to collaborate, plan and engage in professional
development within and across grades and subjects.
(c) Nothing in this subsection prevents  a school district or public charter school from main-
taining control over course content, format, materials and teaching methods.
(2) The State Board of Education shall continually review and revise all adopted academic con-
tent standards necessary for students to successfully transition to the next phase of their education.
(3)(a) School  districts and public charter schools must offer students instruction in mathematics,
science, language arts, history,  geography, economics, civics, higher education and career path
skills, personal financial education, physical education, health, the arts and world languages.
(b) Instruction required under paragraph (a) of this subsection must:
(A) Meet the academic content standards adopted by the State Board of Education; and
(B) Meet the  requirements adopted by the State Board of Education and the board of the school
district or public charter school.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 350.014 is amended to read:
350.014. (1) The Legislative Assembly  declares that the mission of all education beyond high
school in Oregon includes ensuring that [ by 2025, when adult Oregonians complete their education ]:
(a) [ At least 40 percent have earned ] All Oregon high  school graduates are given the oppor-
tunity to attain  a bachelor’s degree or higher;  and
(b) [ At least 40 percent have earned ] All Oregon high school graduates are given the oppor-
tunity to attain  an associate’s degree or a post-secondary  credential as their highest level of edu-
cational attainment . [ ; and ]
[(c) The remaining 20 percent or less have earned a high school diploma, an extended  or modified
high school diploma or the equivalent of a high school diploma as their highest  level of educational
attainment.]
(2) The earning of a post-secondary credential described in subsection (1)(b) of this section may
be satisfied by [ adult Oregonians ] Oregon high school graduates  who have completed apprentice-
ship programs registered with the State Apprenticeship and Training Council.
[4]
HB 2896
1
[5]