Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 195.870 is amended to read:
195.870. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Alarm system” means any electrical, mechanical  or electronic device or sensor used to
prevent, detect or alert law enforcement or occupants of burglary, theft, or intrusion of  a structure
or a vehicle used as a commercial structure.
(b) “Battery-charged fence” means a fence that interfaces with an alarm system in a manner that
enables the fence to cause the connected alarm system to transmit a signal intended to summon law
enforcement in response to an intrusion and has an energizer that is driven by battery.
(c) “IEC standards” means the standards set by the International Electrotechnical  Commission
as most recently published on or before January 1, 2021.
(2) A battery-charged fence:
(a) Must use a battery that is not more than 12 volts of direct current;
(b) Must produce an electric charge on contact  that does not exceed energizer characteristics
set for electric fence energizers by IEC standards;
(c) Must be  surrounded by a nonelectric perimeter fence or wall that is not less than five feet
in height;
(d) May not be higher than the greater of 10 feet in height or two feet higher than  the height
of the nonelectric perimeter fence or wall; and
(e) Must be marked with conspicuous warning signs that are located on the fence at not more
than 30-foot intervals and that read: “WARNING: ELECTRIC FENCE.”
(3) Except as required by state building  code, a local government, as defined in ORS 197.015,
may not adopt or  enforce any ordinance, land use regulation or building code for property [ not zoned
or used ] within an urban growth boundary that is zoned to allow for commercial or industrial
use and not used  for residential use that:
(a) Prohibits the installation or use of a battery-charged fence.
(b) Imposes  installation or operational requirements inconsistent with IEC standards or this
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4253
SB 984
1
2
3
4
5
section for an alarm system or battery-charged fence.
(c) Requires a  permit for the installation or use of a battery-charged fence that is additional to
an alarm system permit issued by the local government.
SECTION 2.
ORS 195.870 is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 197A.
[2]