Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 196.600 to
196.921.
SECTION 2. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 196.810, 196.816  and 196.817, a person may remove
material from the beds or banks  of any waters of this state or fill any waters of this state
without first obtaining a permit or general permit issued under the authority of  the Director
of the Department of State Lands if the person is  required to and does obtain a permit from
the United States Army Corps of Engineers for the removal or fill activity.
(2) The requirements of ORS 196.850 do not apply to any removal or  fill activity carried
out pursuant to a permit from the United States Army Corps of Engineers.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2226