Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
ORS 705.146 is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 705.
SECTION 2.  ORS 705.146 is amended to read:
705.146. [The Prescription Drug Affordability Account is established as a subaccount in the  Con-
sumer and Business Services Fund created in ORS  705.145, consisting of moneys collected under ORS
646A.695 and moneys that  may be appropriated for deposit into the Prescription Drug Affordability
Account by the Legislative Assembly.  Interest earned on the account shall be credited to the account.
Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the  Department of Consumer and Business
Services to carry out ORS 646A.680 to 646A.697. ]
The Consumer  and Business Services Fund created under ORS 705.145 shall include as
subaccounts within the fund:
(1) The Prescription Drug  Affordability Account. The Prescription Drug Affordability
Account consists  of moneys the Department of Consumer and Business Services collects
under ORS 646A.695 and moneys  the Legislative Assembly appropriates for deposit into the
Prescription Drug Affordability Account. Interest that accrues on the Prescription Drug
Affordability Account must be credited to the Prescription Drug  Affordability Account.
Moneys in the Prescription Drug Affordability Account are continuously appropriated to the
department to carry out the provisions of ORS 646A.680 to 646A.697.
(2)(a) The Consumer Financial Education Account. The Consumer Financial Education
Account consists of:
(A) Moneys the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services desig-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 383
HB 2568
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
nates for deposit into the  Consumer Financial Education Account from moneys the depart-
ment collects as civil  penalties the department imposes, and under agreements into which
the department enters, to punish, settle or remedy violations of ORS chapter 645 and  ORS
59.005 to 59.505, 59.710 to 59.830, 59.991, 86A.095 to 86A.198 and 650.005 to 650.100; and
(B) Moneys the Legislative Assembly appropriates for deposit into the Consumer Finan-
cial Education Account.
(b) Interest that accrues on the Consumer  Financial Education Account must be credited
to the Consumer Financial Education Account. Moneys in the Consumer  Financial Education
Account are continuously appropriated to the department for the purpose of providing  fi-
nancial education for consumers and for related purposes.
(3)(a) The Consumer Insurance Education Account. The Consumer Insurance  Education
Account consists of:
(A) Moneys the director designates for deposit into the Consumer Insurance Education
Account from moneys the department collects as civil  penalties the department imposes, and
under agreements into which the department enters, to  punish, settle or remedy violations
of the Insurance Code; and
(B) Moneys the Legislative Assembly  appropriates for deposit into the Consumer Insur-
ance Education Account.
(b) Interest that accrues on  the Consumer Insurance Education Account must be cred-
ited to the Consumer Insurance Education  Account. Moneys in the Consumer Insurance
Education Account are continuously appropriated  to the department for the purpose of pro-
viding education about insurance to consumers and for related purposes.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 705.165 is amended to read:
705.165. (1) Except as provided in  ORS 59.255, 59.995, 86A.130, 86A.992 , [ and] 645.950[ ,] and
705.146, the net amount accruing to the Department of Consumer and  Business Services from all
fees, charges, interest, penalties and  miscellaneous revenues from all sources under ORS chapter 645
and ORS 59.005 to 59.505, 59.710 to 59.830, 59.991, 86A.095 to 86A.198, 650.005  to 650.100 and 705.350
shall, after deduction of refunds, be paid over to the State Treasurer and deposited  in a separate
subaccount in the Consumer and Business Services Fund created under ORS  705.145 at least
monthly and may be used only for the expenses of the department in carrying out its functions and
duties under ORS chapter 645 and ORS 59.005 to 59.505, 59.710 to  59.830, 59.991, 59.995, 86A.095 to
86A.198, 650.005 to 650.100 and 705.350.
(2) Any amount deposited in the separate subaccount in the Consumer  and Business Services
Fund as provided in subsection (1) of this  section that at the end of each quarter is determined by
the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services to  be in excess of the amount
needed to administer ORS chapter 645 and ORS 59.005 to 59.505, 59.710 to 59.830,  59.991, 59.995,
86A.095 to 86A.198 and 650.005 to 650.100 shall  be transferred to the General Fund and shall become
available for general governmental expenses.
[2]