Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
On or before July 1, 2026,  the Housing and Community Services Department
shall amend the  department’s homeownership development incubator program, including by
adopting rules as necessary, to ensure the program funds  the development of housing for
households that earn up to 120 percent of the area  median income and offers predevelopment
funding for housing developers.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to the Housing and Community Services Department,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $50,000,000
for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2773