Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, from the Admin-
istrative Services Economic Development Fund, to the  Oregon Business Development De-
partment, the amount of $20,000,000, for deposit  in the Industry Competitiveness Fund
established under ORS 285B.290, to be used for the purpose of awarding grants under section
3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 2 and 3 of this 2023 Act:
(1)(a) “Earned revenue” means income from the sale of goods or services,  including, but
not limited to, admission tickets, rentals, merchandise, food and beverages, advertising and
contracted services and performances.
(b) “Earned revenue” does not include other sources  of income, including, but not limited
to, donations, federal, state and local governmental grants or returns on investments.
(2) “Oregon cultural organization” means a public or private  entity, whether operated for
profit or as a nonprofit, that:
(a) Has its business headquarters, and operates primarily, in this state;
(b) Operates primarily for  the purpose of producing, promoting or presenting the arts,
culture, humanities, heritage or live cultural entertainment,  other than adult entertainment,
to the public; and
(c)(A) Operates as a public facility, performing organization,  museum, historical site or
visual arts organization;
(B) Produces cultural projects or programs for the public; or
(C) Operates a county fair.
(3) “Oregon cultural support business” means a private entity, whether operated  for
profit or as a nonprofit, or an independent contractor, that:
(a) Professionally supports Oregon cultural organizations;
(b) Has its business headquarters, and operates primarily, in this state; and
(c) Operates  primarily to provide the services of a musician, lighting designer or opera-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1386
HB 2911
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tor, makeup artist or hair stylist, cultural content provider, historic preservationist,
archivist or other independent artist or cultural support contractor.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall develop and imple-
ment a program for awarding grants directly to Oregon cultural  organizations and Oregon
cultural support businesses.
(2)(a) To be eligible for a  grant, an Oregon cultural organization must demonstrate to the
department’s satisfaction that, at any time after February 29, 2020, and before January 1,
2023, the organization experienced a significant loss in earned revenue because of statewide
mandates, or  guidance of the Oregon Health Authority, in response to the COVID-19
pandemic.
(b)(A) To be eligible for a grant,  an Oregon cultural support business must demonstrate
to the department’s satisfaction that:
(i) In fiscal year 2019 at least 75 percent of  the business’s total earned revenue derived
from cultural support activities; and
(ii) The business sustained a significant loss  of earned revenue in the period beginning
after February 29, 2020,  and before January 1, 2023, from the cancellation or nonrenewal of
agreements to provide services to Oregon cultural organizations.
(B) An Oregon cultural support business’s loss is eligible only  with respect to earned
revenue directly related to the business’s  professional support of Oregon cultural organiza-
tions.
(3)(a) The department shall prescribe the form  and process by which Oregon cultural
organizations and Oregon  cultural support businesses may apply for and be awarded grants
under the program.
(b) For purposes of reviewing applications, the department may  require applicants to
demonstrate need, as described in subsection (4) of this section, in the form of:
(A) The organization’s or business’s federal tax return  for the periods to which the ap-
plication relates; and
(B) Financial documentation, including, but not limited to, audited financial statements
or financial statements that have been approved by a certified public accountant.
(4) The  department shall develop an equitable funding allocation so that grant moneys
shall be awarded, subject to subsections (5) to (7)  of this section, with priority given ac-
cording to the greatest ratio of an applicant’s total lost earned revenue to  the applicant’s
total earned revenue for each fiscal year, beginning with fiscal year 2019, to which the  ap-
plication relates.
(5) Subject to  subsections (6) and (7) of this section, the department shall develop award
allocation options that take into account  an equitable percentage of an applicant’s fiscal size
and eligible loss and available funding.
(6) Subject to subsection  (7) of this section, grant moneys shall be awarded proportion-
ately among the geographic  regions of this state, as defined by the department, based on the
relative population, and the eligible applications received from Oregon cultural organizations
and Oregon cultural support businesses located, in each region.
(7) Grant moneys shall be awarded in the following proportions:
(a) No less than 60 percent and no more than 80 percent to Oregon  cultural organiza-
tions; and
(b) No less than 20 percent and  no more than 40 percent to Oregon cultural support
[2]
HB 2911
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
businesses.
(8) Before awarding  grants, the department may withhold an amount not to exceed five
percent of the total amount allocated under section 1 of this 2023 Act to  reimburse the de-
partment for the actual costs of developing and implementing the program.
(9) Notwithstanding any other provision of law,  this section shall apply to any grant
moneys that the department awards to an Oregon  cultural organization or an Oregon cul-
tural support business on or after the effective date of this 2023 Act in response to  the
negative impact of the COVID-19 pandemic on the organization’s business.
SECTION 4.
(1) Sections 2 and 3 of this 2023 Act become operative on December 1, 2023.
(2) Notwithstanding the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, the
Oregon Business Development Department  may take any action before the operative date
specified in  subsection (1) of this section that is necessary for the department to exercise,
on and after  the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties,
functions and powers conferred on the department by sections 2 and 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5.  ORS 285B.290 is amended to read:
285B.290. (1) The Industry Competitiveness Fund is established in  the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The  Industry Competitiveness Fund shall consist of all moneys credited to the fund, including
moneys from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund. Interest  earned by the In-
dustry Competitiveness Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph  (b) of this subsection,  moneys in the fund are con-
tinuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Development Department to  provide funds for activ-
ities outlined in ORS 285B.286.
(b) Moneys in the fund that are deposited  or otherwise credited to the fund for the pur-
pose of awarding grants under section 3 of this 2023 Act are allocated to  the department for
such purpose and may not be used for any other purpose.
SECTION 6. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]