Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Department of Education  shall conduct a study on how school social
workers affect:
(a) Student attendance rates;
(b) Reported incidences of acts of harassment, intimidation or bullying or acts  of
cyberbullying, as defined in ORS 339.351;
(c) The morale of students and teachers; and
(d) Any other elements of the school system, students or families.
(2) The department shall submit an annual report on the study to  an interim committee
of the Legislative Assembly related to education no later than October  15, 2018, and October
15, 2019.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2017 Act is repealed on December 31, 2019.
SECTION 3. (1) The Department of  Education shall administer a pilot program to in-
crease the number of public school students served by school social workers.
(2) Under the  pilot program, the department shall distribute moneys to school districts
to:
(a) Hire new school social workers;
(b) Increase the working hours of existing school social workers; or
(c) Enable existing personnel to earn a  license as a school social worker and become
employed by the school district as a school social worker.
(3) A  school district may participate in the pilot program if the school district submits
an application demonstrating how the school  district will use grant moneys to increase the
number of students who  are served by a school social worker as described in subsection (2)
of this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2754
SB 278
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4)(a) A school district  that participates in the pilot program must annually submit in-
formation to the department about how the increase in school social workers affected:
(A) Student attendance rates;
(B) Reported incidences of acts of harassment, intimidation  or bullying or acts of
cyberbullying, as defined in ORS 339.351;
(C) The morale of students and teachers; and
(D) Any other elements of the school system, students or families.
(b) The department shall submit an annual report to an interim committee of the Legis-
lative Assembly related to education no later than October  15 of each year. The report must
summarize the information received under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(5) The State  Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the administration
of the pilot program.
SECTION 4.
Section 3 of this 2017 Act is repealed on June 30, 2021.
SECTION 5.  Section 5, chapter 68, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  (1) As used in this  section, “trauma-informed approach” means an approach that recog-
nizes the signs and symptoms of trauma in students, families and staff and responds by fully inte-
grating knowledge about trauma into policies, procedures and practices for the purposes  of resisting
the reoccurrence of trauma and promoting resiliency.
(2) The Chief Education Office, in coordination with the Oregon Health Authority  and the De-
partment of Education, shall distribute moneys as provided in  this section to school districts and
education service districts for the purpose of decreasing rates of school absenteeism.
(3)(a) A school district or an education service district may apply to receive moneys under  this
section:
(A) By submitting an application that includes a proposal  consistent with subsection (4) of this
section; and
(B) If the district has at least one school in the district with:
(i) A school-based health center; or
(ii) A school-based system for providing behavioral health services and care coordination  that
may include  a school nurse, a school counselor, a school psychologist , [ or] a clinical psychologist
or a school social worker .
(b) A school district or an education service  district may submit an application jointly with one
or more community partners that will  participate with the district in the pilot program described in
subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The office shall distribute moneys to an applicant based  on the applicant’s proposal to design
and implement a pilot program  to decrease rates of school absenteeism by using trauma-informed
approaches to education, health services  and intervention strategies that are based in schools and
take advantage of community resources. The proposal must include a plan that:
(a) Coordinates the services provided by:
(A) The school;
(B) The school-based health center or the administrator of the school-based system described  in
subsection (3)(a)(B)(ii) of this section; and
(C) Coordinated care  organizations, public health entities, nonprofit youth service providers,
community-based organizations, social justice  groups and similar groups that are located in the
community;
(b) Requires professional development and  support for school staff, including educators, school
[2]
SB 278
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
district or education  service district professionals, counselors, nurses, classified staff and other staff
of the school district or education service district, to create a culture in the district and community
that is informed about how to understand, recognize and respond to trauma;
(c) Provides for at least one trauma specialist who:
(A) Is permanently assigned at the school-based health center or at the location where  the
school-based system described in subsection (3)(a)(B)(ii) of this section is provided; and
(B) Oversees the  implementation of the plan, including coordinating the services described in
paragraph (a) of this subsection and coordinating the professional  development and support de-
scribed in paragraph (b) of this subsection;
(d) Indicates how services coordinated under paragraph (a)  of this subsection are provided based
on a trauma-informed approach and with an understanding,  recognition and responsiveness to the
effects of trauma on education, absenteeism and school completion;
(e) Uses evidence-based and evidence-informed approaches, culturally specific approaches when
appropriate  and national models that are tailored to the community to ensure that data are collected
and the effectiveness of the pilot program is determined;
(f) Provides matching community funding, or resources  that are the monetary equivalent of
matching funding, in a ratio determined by the office by rule; and
(g) Pursues additional funding opportunities, including  funding under the federal Every Student
Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95).
(5) The office shall prescribe the timelines by which an  applicant may submit an application for
moneys under this section and the form of the application.
(6) The office  shall evaluate and rank applications based on the proposals submitted in the ap-
plications.
(7) The office shall distribute moneys to applicants based on:
(a) The evaluations and rankings described in subsection (6) of this section;
(b) The moneys appropriated to the office for the purpose of this section;
(c) The amount of matching community funding available to the applicant; and
(d) Any available federal grants.
(8)(a) The office, in collaboration  with the Oregon Health Authority and the Department of Ed-
ucation, shall provide coordination among  school districts and education service districts receiving
moneys under this section.
(b) The office may  coordinate with a statewide nonprofit organization that has experience in
supporting school-based health centers  and student health organizations for the organization to
provide technical assistance to school districts and education service  districts receiving moneys
under this section.
(9) Each participating school district and education service  district shall provide regular reports
on the progress of the district’s pilot program to the office to enable the office to:
(a) Determine the effectiveness of the pilot program; and
(b) Submit a report and recommendations for legislation to  the interim committees of the Leg-
islative Assembly related to education as required under subsection (10) of this section.
(10) No later than October 15, 2019, the Chief Education Office, the Oregon Health  Authority
and the Department of Education, in collaboration with the statewide nonprofit  organization de-
scribed in subsection (8) of this section, shall submit  a report to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to education. The  report must provide individual and comprehensive
evaluations on the  outcomes of the pilot programs and include any recommendations for legislation
[3]
SB 278
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
based on the results of the pilot programs.
SECTION 6. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $4,000,000, which must be expended for the study  described in
section 1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 7. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $20,000,000, which must be expended for the pilot  program de-
scribed in section 3 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 8. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
[4]