Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 2, chapter 783, Oregon Laws 1979, as amended by section  1, chapter 583,
Oregon Laws 1987, section 7, chapter 748,  Oregon Laws 1995, section 1, chapter 218, Oregon Laws
2003, section 1, chapter 548, Oregon Laws 2009, section 1, chapter 213, Oregon Laws 2013, and sec-
tion 3, chapter 578, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  Cargo containers,  as defined in ORS 307.835, are exempt from taxation for tax years
beginning on or after July 1, 1974, and before July 1, [ 2026] 2032.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2114