Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this  2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 178.200 to
178.245.
SECTION 2. ORS 178.200 to 178.245 create a contract  between the State of Oregon and
participants in the retirement plan established as provided in section 15, chapter 557, Oregon
Laws 2015, providing that contributions  to the retirement plan may not be combined with
moneys contained in the Public Employees Retirement Fund for any purpose.
SECTION 3.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 875