Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 316.
SECTION 2. (1) There shall be subtracted from federal taxable income any amount that
is properly reported as income on a taxpayer’s federal  income tax return and that is received
by the taxpayer from a retirement plan qualified under section 401(k) of the Internal Revenue
Code or from an individual retirement account described in section 408 of the Internal Re-
venue Code.
(2) A subtraction under this section is not allowed for any amount described in sub-
section (1) of this  section that is taken into account as a deduction or credit on an income
tax return of the taxpayer, whether state or federal, for any tax year.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4316