Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 646A.572 is amended to read:
646A.572. (1) ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589 apply to any person that  conducts business in this state,
or that provides products or services to residents of this state, and that during a calendar year,
controls or processes:
(a) The personal data of [ 100,000] 35,000 or more consumers,  other than personal data controlled
or processed solely for the purpose of completing a payment transaction; or
(b) The personal data of [ 25,000] 10,000 or more  consumers, while deriving [ 25] 20 percent or
more of the person’s annual gross revenue from selling personal data.
(2) ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589 do not apply to:
(a) A public corporation, including  the Oregon Health and Science University and the Oregon
State Bar, or a public body, as defined in ORS 174.109;
(b) Protected health information that a covered entity or business associate  processes in ac-
cordance with, or documents that a covered entity or  business associate creates for the purpose of
complying with, the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L.  104-191, and
regulations promulgated under the Act, as in effect on January 1, 2024;
(c) Information used only  for public health activities and purposes described in 45 C.F.R. 164.512,
as in effect on January 1, 2024;
(d) Information that identifies a consumer in connection with:
(A) Activities that are subject to the Federal Policy for the Protection of Human Subjects, cod-
ified as 45 C.F.R. part 46 and in various other federal regulations, as in effect on January 1, 2024;
(B) Research on human subjects undertaken in  accordance with good clinical practice guidelines
issued by the International Council for Harmonisation of Technical Requirements for  Pharmaceu-
ticals for Human Use;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4535
HB 3899
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Activities that are subject to  the protections provided in 21 C.F.R. parts 50 and 56, as in
effect on January 1, 2024; or
(D) Research conducted in  accordance with the requirements set forth in subparagraphs (A) to
(C) of this paragraph or otherwise in accordance with applicable law;
(e) Patient identifying information, as defined in 42 C.F.R. 2.11, as in effect on January 1, 2024,
that is collected and processed in accordance with 42 C.F.R. part 2;
(f) Patient safety work product,  as defined in 42 C.F.R. 3.20, as in effect on January 1, 2024, that
is created for purposes of improving patient safety under 42 C.F.R. part 3;
(g) Information and documents created for the  purposes of the Health Care Quality Improvement
Act of 1986,  42 U.S.C. 11101 et seq., and implementing regulations, both as in effect on January 1,
2024;
(h) Information that originates from, or that is intermingled so as to  be indistinguishable from,
information described in  paragraphs (b) to (g) of this subsection that a covered entity or business
associate, or a  program of a qualified service organization, as defined in 42 C.F.R. 2.11, as in effect
on January 1, 2024, creates, collects, processes, uses or maintains in the same  manner as is required
under the laws, regulations and guidelines described in paragraphs (b) to (g) of this subsection;
(i) Information processed or maintained solely in connection with, and for  the purpose of, ena-
bling:
(A) An individual’s employment or application for employment;
(B) An individual’s ownership of, or function as a director or officer of, a business entity;
(C) An individual’s contractual relationship with a business entity;
(D) An individual’s receipt of  benefits from an employer, including benefits for the individual’s
dependents or beneficiaries; or
(E) Notice of an emergency to persons that an individual specifies;
(j) Any activity that involves collecting, maintaining, disclosing, selling, communicating or  using
information for the purpose of  evaluating a consumer’s creditworthiness, credit standing, credit ca-
pacity, character, general reputation, personal characteristics or mode of living if done  strictly in
accordance with the provisions of the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. 1681 et seq., as in  effect
on January 1, 2024, by:
(A) A consumer reporting agency,  as defined in 15 U.S.C. 1681a(f), as in effect on January 1,
2024;
(B) A person who furnishes information to a consumer reporting agency under  15 U.S.C. 1681s-2,
as in effect on January 1, 2024; or
(C) A person who uses a consumer report as provided in 15 U.S.C. 1681b(a)(3);
(k) Information collected, processed,  sold or disclosed under and in accordance with the follow-
ing federal laws, all as in effect on January 1, 2024:
(A) The Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, P.L. 106-102, and regulations adopted to implement that Act;
(B) The Driver’s Privacy Protection Act of 1994, 18 U.S.C. 2721 et seq.;
(C) The Family Educational Rights and Privacy  Act, 20 U.S.C. 1232g and regulations adopted
to implement that Act; and
(D) The Airline  Deregulation Act, P.L. 95-504, only to the extent that an air carrier collects
information related to prices, routes or services and only to the extent that the provisions of  the
Airline Deregulation Act preempt ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589;
(L) A financial institution,  as defined in ORS 706.008, or a financial institution’s affiliate or
subsidiary that is  only and directly engaged in financial activities, as described in 12 U.S.C. 1843(k),
[2]
HB 3899
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
as in effect on January 1, 2024;
(m) Information  that originates from, or is intermingled so as to be indistinguishable from, in-
formation described in paragraph (k)(A) of this subsection and  that a licensee, as defined in ORS
725.010, collects, processes, uses or maintains in the same manner as is required under the laws and
regulations specified in paragraph (k)(A) of this subsection;
(n) An insurer,  as defined in ORS 731.106, other than a person that, alone or in combination with
another person, establishes and maintains a self-insurance program and that does not  otherwise en-
gage in the business of entering into policies of insurance;
(o) An insurance producer, as defined in ORS 731.104;
(p) An insurance consultant, as defined in ORS 744.602;
(q) A person that holds a third party administrator license issued under ORS 744.710;
(r) A nonprofit organization that  is established to detect and prevent fraudulent acts in con-
nection with insurance; and
(s) Noncommercial activity of:
(A) A publisher, editor,  reporter or other person who is connected with or employed by a
newspaper, magazine, periodical, newsletter, pamphlet,  report or other publication in general circu-
lation;
(B) A radio or television station that holds a license issued by the Federal Communications
Commission;
(C) A nonprofit organization that provides programming to radio or television networks; or
(D) An entity that provides an information  service, including a press association or wire service.
(3) ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589 do not prohibit a controller or processor from:
(a) Complying with federal, state or local statutes, ordinances, rules or regulations;
(b) Complying with a federal, state or local  governmental inquiry, investigation, subpoena or
summons related to a civil, criminal or administrative proceeding;
(c) Cooperating with a law enforcement  agency concerning conduct or activity that the con-
troller or processor reasonably  and in good faith believes may violate federal, state or local statutes,
ordinances, rules or regulations;
(d) Investigating, establishing, initiating or defending legal claims;
(e) Preventing, detecting, protecting against or responding  to, and investigating, reporting or
prosecuting persons responsible for,  security incidents, identity theft, fraud, harassment or mali-
cious, deceptive or illegal activity or preserving the integrity or security of systems;
(f) Identifying and repairing technical errors in a controller’s or processor’s information  systems
that impair existing or intended functionality;
(g) Providing a product or service that a consumer specifically requests from the controller or
processor or requests as the parent or  guardian of a child on the child’s behalf or as the guardian
or conservator of a person  subject to a guardianship, conservatorship or other protective arrange-
ment on the person’s behalf;
(h) Negotiating, entering into or performing a contract with a consumer, including  fulfilling the
terms of a written warranty;
(i) Protecting any person’s health and safety;
(j) Effectuating a product recall;
(k) Conducting internal research to  develop, improve or repair products, services or technology;
(L) Performing internal  operations that are reasonably aligned with a consumer’s expectations,
that the  consumer may reasonably anticipate based on the consumer’s existing relationship with the
[3]
HB 3899
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
controller or that  are otherwise compatible with processing data for the purpose of providing a
product or service the  consumer specifically requested or for the purpose of performing a contract
to which the consumer is a party; or
(m) Assisting  another controller or processor with any of the activities set forth in this sub-
section.
(4) ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589 do not apply to the extent that a controller’s or  processor’s com-
pliance with ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589 would violate an evidentiary privilege under the  laws of this
state. Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589, a controller  or processor may
provide personal data about a consumer in  a privileged communication to a person that is covered
by an evidentiary privilege under the laws of this state.
(5) A controller may process personal data in accordance  with subsection (3) of this section only
to the extent that  the processing is adequate and reasonably necessary for, relevant to, propor-
tionate in relation to and limited to the purposes set forth in this section.
(6) Collection,  use and retention of personal data under subsection (3)(e) and (f) of this section
must, where applicable, take into account the nature and purpose of the collection,  use or retention.
The personal data must be subject to reasonable administrative, technical  and physical measures to
protect the confidentiality, integrity and security  of the personal data and reduce reasonably fore-
seeable risks of harm to consumers from the collection, use or retention.
(7) A controller that claims that the  controller’s processing of personal data is exempt under
subsection (3) of this  section has the burden of demonstrating that the controller’s processing qual-
ifies for the exemption and complies with the  requirements of subsections (5) and (6) of this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS  646A.578, as amended by section 12, chapter 369, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
646A.578. (1) A controller shall:
(a) Specify in the privacy notice described in subsection (4) of  this section the express purposes
for which the controller is collecting and processing personal data;
(b) Limit the controller’s collection of personal data to only the personal data that is  adequate,
relevant and reasonably necessary to serve the  purposes the controller specified in paragraph (a)
of this subsection;
(c) Establish, implement and maintain for personal data the same  safeguards described in ORS
646A.622 that are required for protecting personal information, as defined in ORS  646A.602, such
that the controller’s  safeguards protect the confidentiality, integrity and accessibility of the personal
data to the extent appropriate for the volume and nature of the personal data; and
(d) Provide an effective means by which a consumer may revoke consent  a consumer gave under
ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589 to the controller’s processing of the consumer’s personal  data. The means
must be at least as easy as the means  by which the consumer provided consent. Once the consumer
revokes consent, the controller shall cease processing  the personal data as soon as is practicable,
but not later than 15 days after receiving the revocation.
(2) A controller may not:
(a) Process personal data for purposes that are not  reasonably necessary for and compatible
with the purposes the controller specified in subsection (1)(a)  of this section, unless the controller
obtains the consumer’s consent;
(b) Process  sensitive data about a consumer without first obtaining the consumer’s consent or,
if the controller knows  the consumer is a child, without processing the sensitive data in accordance
with the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act of 1998, 15 U.S.C. 6501 et seq. and the regulations,
[4]
HB 3899
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
rules and guidance adopted under the Act, all as in effect on January 1, 2024;
(c) Process a consumer’s personal data for the purposes of targeted advertising, of profiling the
consumer in furtherance of  decisions that produce legal effects or effects of similar significance or
of selling the consumer’s personal data without the  consumer’s consent if the controller has actual
knowledge that, or willfully disregards whether, the consumer is at least 13 years of age  and not
older than 15 years of age; [ or]
(d) Process sensitive data for the purposes of targeted advertising or for  the purpose of
profiling a consumer in furtherance of decisions that produce legal effects or effects of sim-
ilar significance, whether the controller has the consumer’s consent or not;
(e) Sell sensitive data for any reason, with or without a consumer’s consent; or
[(d)] (f)  Discriminate against a consumer that exercises a right provided to  the consumer under
ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589 by means such as denying goods or services,  charging different prices or
rates for goods or services or providing a different level of  quality or selection of goods or services
to the consumer.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not:
(a) Require a controller to provide a good  or service that requires personal data from a con-
sumer that the controller does not collect or maintain; or
(b) Prohibit  a controller from offering a different price, rate, level of quality or selection of
goods or services to a consumer, including an offer for no fee  or charge, in connection with a
consumer’s voluntary  participation in a bona fide loyalty, rewards, premium features, discount or
club card program.
(4) A controller  shall provide to consumers a reasonably accessible, clear and meaningful pri-
vacy notice that:
(a) Lists  the categories of personal data, including the categories of sensitive data, that the
controller processes;
(b) Describes the controller’s purposes for processing the personal data;
(c) Describes how a consumer may exercise the consumer’s rights  under ORS 646A.570 to
646A.589, including how a consumer may appeal a controller’s denial of  a consumer’s request under
ORS 646A.576;
(d) Lists all categories of personal data,  including the categories of sensitive data, that the
controller shares with third parties;
(e) States that the controller may not sell sensitive data  for any reason and may not
process sensitive data for the purposes of targeted advertising or for the purpose of  profiling
the consumer in furtherance of decisions that produce legal effects or effects of similar  sig-
nificance;
[(e)] (f)  Describes all categories  of third parties with which the controller shares personal data
at a level of detail that enables the consumer to understand what type of entity each  third party is
and, to the extent possible, how each third party may process personal data;
[(f)] (g)  Specifies an  electronic mail address or other online method by which a consumer can
contact the controller that the controller actively monitors;
[(g)] (h)  Identifies the controller, including any business  name under which the controller reg-
istered with the Secretary of State and any assumed business name  that the controller uses in this
state;
[(h)] (i) Provides a clear and conspicuous description of any processing of personal data in which
the controller engages for the purpose of targeted advertising or for the purpose of  profiling the
[5]
HB 3899
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
consumer in furtherance of decisions that produce legal effects or effects  of similar significance, and
a procedure by which the consumer may opt out of this type of processing; and
[(i)] (j) Describes the method or methods the controller  has established for a consumer to submit
a request under ORS 646A.576 (1).
(5) The method or methods described in subsection [ (4)(i)] (4)(j)  of this section for submitting a
consumer’s request to a controller must:
(a) Take into account:
(A) Ways in which consumers normally interact with the controller;
(B) A need for security and reliability in communications related to the request; and
(C) The controller’s ability to authenticate the  identity of the consumer that makes the request;
(b) Provide a clear and conspicuous link to a webpage where the consumer or  an authorized
agent may opt out from a controller’s processing of the  consumer’s personal data as described in
ORS 646A.574 (1)(d) or, solely  if the controller does not have a capacity needed for linking to a
webpage, provide another method the consumer can use to opt out; and
(c) Allow a consumer or authorized agent to send a signal to  the controller that indicates the
consumer’s preference  to opt out of the sale of personal data or targeted advertising under ORS
646A.574 (1)(d) by means of a platform, technology or mechanism that:
(A) Does not unfairly disadvantage another controller;
(B) Does not use a default setting but instead requires  the consumer or authorized agent to
make an affirmative, voluntary and unambiguous choice to opt out;
(C) Is consumer friendly and easy for an average consumer to use;
(D) Is as consistent as possible  with similar platforms, technologies or mechanisms required
under federal or state laws or regulations; and
(E) Enables the controller to accurately determine whether the consumer is a  resident of this
state and has made a legitimate request under ORS 646A.576 to opt out as  described in ORS
646A.574 (1)(d).
(6) If a consumer or authorized agent uses a method described in subsection (5) of  this section
to opt out of a controller’s processing of the consumer’s personal data under  ORS 646A.574 (1)(d)
and the decision conflicts with a consumer’s  voluntary participation in a bona fide reward, club card
or loyalty program or a program that provides  premium features or discounts in return for the
consumer’s consent to the controller’s processing of  the consumer’s personal data, the controller
may either comply with the request to opt out or notify the consumer of the  conflict and ask the
consumer to affirm that the consumer intends to withdraw from the  bona fide reward, club card or
loyalty program or the  program that provides premium features or discounts. If the consumer affirms
that the consumer intends to withdraw, the controller shall comply with the request to opt out.
[6]