Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 689.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “patient assistance program” means  a program
operated by or on behalf of a manufacturer that offers  financial assistance to a person to
whom a drug manufactured by the manufacturer is dispensed.
(2) A pharmacy shall notify each person to whom a prescription drug is dispensed that
a patient assistance  program may be available from the drug’s manufacturer and provide to
the patient the name of the manufacturer.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to an institutional drug outlet.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of  this 2025 Act applies to prescription drugs dispensed on or after
the operative date specified in section 4 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) Section 2 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The State  Board of Pharmacy may take any action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the board  to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the board by section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1118