Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Pursuant to Article IX, section 14 (6)(a), of the  Oregon Constitution, the
Legislative Assembly increases the amount of the estimate of revenues that will be  received
from General Fund revenue sources  other than corporate income and excise taxes for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, to $24 billion.
SECTION 2. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of  this section, any positive differ-
ence between the actual amount of revenues collected from General Fund revenue sources
other than corporate income and excise taxes for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, and
the estimate made for that biennium pursuant to Article  IX, section 14 (1), of the Oregon
Constitution, shall be transferred as follows:
(a) An amount  not to exceed one percent of the estimate made for the biennium pursuant
to Article  IX, section 14 (1), of the Oregon Constitution, to the Oregon Military Department
to be used for catastrophic disaster preparedness in accordance with the  Oregon Resilience
Plan; and
(b) The balance to the Public Employees Retirement Fund established under ORS 238.660,
to be applied against the unfunded actuarial  liability of the Public Employees Retirement
System.
(2) If the actual amount of revenues collected from General Fund revenue sources  other
than corporate income and excise taxes for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  exceeds the
amount of the estimate made in section 1 of this 2025 Act by two percent or more:
(a) The difference between the actual amount of  revenues and the estimate made in
section 1 of this 2025 Act shall be returned  to personal income taxpayers in the manner
provided in ORS 291.349; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2644
HB 2752
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
(b) The difference between the estimate of revenues made in section 1 of this 2025  Act
and the estimate made for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, pursuant to Article IX, sec-
tion 14 (1), of the Oregon Constitution, shall be transferred as follows:
(A) An amount not to exceed one percent of the estimate  made for the biennium pursu-
ant to Article IX, section 14  (1), of the Oregon Constitution, to the Oregon Military Depart-
ment to be used for catastrophic  disaster preparedness in accordance with the Oregon
Resilience Plan; and
(B) The balance to the Public Employees  Retirement Fund established under ORS 238.660,
to be applied against the unfunded actuarial  liability of the Public Employees Retirement
System.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]