Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
CALCULATION OF SUSTAINABLE HARVEST LEVELS
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 11 of this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 526.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 2 to 11 and 16 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Available land” means all state forestland  on which the State Forester has discretion
to harvest timber, taking into account any applicable legal requirements.
(2) “Five-year harvest  period” means the five calendar years following the adoption of a
sustainable harvest level.
(3) “Management  change affecting harvest levels” means the adoption or amendment of
any forest management plan or a rule,  order or policy that alters management of state
forestland in a manner that may  materially change the volume of timber to be harvested
from state forestland.
(4) “State forestland” means:
(a) Forestland acquired under ORS 530.010 to 530.040; and
(b) Common School Forest Lands managed under ORS 530.490.
(5) “Sustainable  harvest level” means a planned volume of timber to be sold from avail-
able land and harvested thereafter, calculated in five-year increments over  at least a one
hundred-year period.
SECTION 3.
(1) The State Board of Forestry shall adopt by rule a  sustainable harvest
level that is calculated and recommended by the State Forester:
(a) Immediately before the board  or the State Forester makes any management change
affecting harvest levels; and
(b) At least once every five years.
(2) Neither the board  nor the State Forester may make a management change affecting
harvest levels without first adopting  a sustainable harvest level pursuant to subsection (1)
of this section.
(3) To calculate a sustainable harvest level, the State Forester shall:
(a) Identify available land by harvest unit;
(b) Develop a timber inventory model that:
(A) Is based on an inventory of timber on the available land that is current as of not
more than one year before  a draft of the sustainable harvest level is published under section
4 of this 2025 Act; and
(B) Projects the yield and growth of the  inventory of the timber for at least 100 years
under anticipated management; and
(c) Use the timber inventory model to derive a sustainable harvest level that:
[2]
HB 3103
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Maximizes the net present value of the state forestland, using a discount rate  com-
monly used for owners of a size of private forestland that  is similar to the size of the state
forestland; and
(B) Accounts for all  applicable federal and state legal requirements, including rules re-
lated to forest practices, as defined in ORS 527.620, and  any applicable requirements of any
habitat conservation plan approved by the National Marine Fisheries Service or the United
States Fish and  Wildlife Service, pursuant to the federal Endangered Species Act (16 U.S.C.
1531 to 1544).
(4) A rule that adopts a sustainable harvest level pursuant to subsection  (1) of this sec-
tion may not take effect less than 21 days after the date on which the rule was published.
SECTION 4.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 183.325 to 183.410,  the adoption of a sustainable
harvest level by rule, pursuant to section 3 of this 2025  Act and ORS 526.041 (2), shall be as
provided in this section.
(2) At least 120 days before  recommending a sustainable harvest level to the State Board
of Forestry, the State Forester shall publish:
(a) A draft of the recommended sustainable harvest level;
(b) The timber inventory model described in section 3 of this 2025 Act;
(c) A thorough and detailed description of the timber  inventory model that describes in
detail, at minimum:
(A) The inputs and  methodology used to determine the inventory of timber on the avail-
able land and the projected yield and growth of the inventory of the timber;
(B) Any constraints on harvesting timber on the available land that were used  as inputs
for the timber inventory model, including stream buffers, wildlife setbacks,  inoperable land
or other physical constraints, and any cases, laws or rules that  constrain the harvest of
timber on the available land;
(C) How the constraints  were determined, including the State Forester’s interpretation
of any applicable case, law or rule;
(D) Any financial or economic assumptions that were used as inputs; and
(E) Any other data or assumptions that were used as inputs;
(d) A description of how tax revenues and revenues from timber  sales that would accrue
to counties and the Common School Fund will likely be affected by any change to  the volume
of timber to be harvested from state forestland under the recommended  sustainable harvest
level relative to the volume of timber harvested  from state forestland during the prior five-
year harvest period;
(e) A description of  how local communities and direct consumers of timber products from
state forestland will likely be economically affected, including any economic multiplier ef-
fects, by the volume of timber to be harvested from state  forestland under the recommended
sustainable harvest level relative to the volume of timber harvested from state  forestland
under the prior five-year harvest period; and
(f) A detailed explanation as to why  any harvest unit of available land was removed from
or added to the total harvest units of available land  underlying the timber inventory model,
relative to the total harvest  units of available land underlying the timber inventory model
for the immediately prior sustainable harvest level.
(3) After publishing the documents and information described in  subsection (2) of this
section, the State Forester shall:
[3]
HB 3103
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Hold a public hearing on the documents and information; and
(b) Allow 60 days for the public, the  State Board of Forestry and the Forest Trust Land
Advisory Committee described in ORS 526.156 to comment on  the documents and informa-
tion.
(4) Not more than 60 days after the 60-day comment period closes, the State Forester:
(a) Shall consider, and provide responses  to, all suggestions and information provided at
the hearing or in properly submitted public comments;
(b) May incorporate any of the suggestions or information described in paragraph (a)  of
this subsection into a  final recommended sustainable harvest level without providing an ad-
ditional opportunity for a hearing or public comment;
(c) Shall make publicly available on a website of the State Forestry Department a detailed
explanation of:
(A) The State Forester’s response to the  suggestions and information described in para-
graph (a) of this subsection; and
(B) Why the suggestions  and information were or were not incorporated into the final
recommended sustainable harvest level; and
(d) Shall publish a final recommended sustainable harvest level.
(5) Not more than 30 days after the State Forester publishes  a final recommended
sustainable harvest level, the board shall adopt the final  recommended sustainable harvest
level by rule, pursuant to section 3 of this 2025 Act and ORS 526.041 (2).
SECTION 5.
The State Board of Forestry shall adopt a sustainable harvest level as de-
scribed in section 4 of this 2025 Act on or before December 31, 2026.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding section 4 (2)(d) and (e) of this 2025 Act, as part of  the pro-
cess of adopting a sustainable harvest level by the date required in section 5  of this 2025 Act,
the State Forester:
(1) Is not required to publish the descriptions described in section 4 (2)(d) and (e) of  this
2025 Act.
(2) Shall publish, in lieu of the descriptions described  in section 4 (2)(d) and (e) of this
2025 Act:
(a) A description of how tax revenues and revenues from timber  sales that would accrue
to counties and the  Common School Fund will likely be affected by the volume of timber to
be harvested from state forestland under the recommended sustainable  harvest level relative
to the volume of timber harvested from state forestland in the  five calendar years before the
State Forester calculated the recommended sustainable harvest level; and
(b) A description of how local communities and direct consumers of timber products from
state forestland will likely be economically affected, including any economic multiplier ef-
fects, by the volume of timber to be harvested from state  forestland under the recommended
sustainable harvest level relative to the volume of  timber harvested from state forestland in
the five calendar years before the State Forester  calculated the recommended sustainable
harvest level.
SALES OF TIMBER AT
SUSTAINABLE HARVEST LEVEL
SECTION 7.
Each year,  subject to the provisions of ORS 530.050, 530.059 and 530.500, the
[4]
HB 3103
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
State Forester shall offer timber for sale  at one-fifth of the applicable sustainable harvest
level.
SECTION 8.
(1) As used in this section, “deficit” means a volume of timber sold  from the
available land during one year that is less than one-fifth  of the volume planned to be sold
that year during the applicable five-year harvest period.
(2) On or before September 15 of each  year, the State Forester shall make publicly
available on a State Forestry Department website:
(a) A calculation of the volume of timber sold from  the available land during the previous
year;
(b) A calculation of any deficit;
(c) A description of specific reasons for any deficit; and
(d) If a deficit occurred, a plan for achieving, during any remaining years in  the five-year
harvest period, the sale of the full volume  of timber planned to be sold under the applicable
sustainable harvest level.
(3) Under the plan described in  subsection (2)(d) of this section, to the extent feasible,
the sold volume of the timber must be offered for sale within  the county or counties most
affected by the shortfall.
SECTION 9.
The requirements of section 8 of this 2025 Act apply on and  after January
1, 2027.
SECTION 10. (1) If, at the end of a five-year harvest period, the volume of timber sold
from the available land  is less than the applicable sustainable harvest level, the State
Forester shall offer for sale, during the  next five-year harvest period, the difference in the
volume of timber, in addition to  the sustainable harvest level applicable during the next
five-year harvest period.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section,  the State Forester may reduce the
volume of additional timber to be offered for sale  during the next five-year harvest period
to the degree that the additional timber was not offered for sale during the previous five-year
harvest period as a result of catastrophic wildfire or other large-scale disturbance, after:
(a) Making a finding on why the additional timber was not sold; and
(b) Issuing a final order that describes facts and circumstances supporting the finding.
SECTION 11.
(1) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law,  a person described in
subsection (2) of this section may apply to the Circuit Court for  Marion County for a tem-
porary or permanent injunction directing the State  Forester to comply with the applicable
requirement if the State Forester does not:
(a) Calculate a sustainable harvest level as described in section 3 of this 2025 Act;
(b) Comply with the requirements of section 7 of this 2025 Act; or
(c) Offer timber for sale as required by  section 10 (1) of this 2025 Act, subject to any
applicable reduction under section 10 (2) of this 2025 Act.
(2) This section confers standing to bring an action  under subsection (1) of this section
on any person that demonstrates that the person has received revenue from the  harvest of
timber on state forestland or has purchased timber  sale contracts in this state, without a
further showing of individualized interest.
(3) The court may award costs, but not  attorney fees, to a party that prevails under this
section.
[5]
HB 3103
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ADOPTION OF POLICIES BY RULE
SECTION 12.
 ORS 526.041 is amended to read:
526.041. The [ forester] State Forester , under the general supervision of the State Board of
Forestry, shall:
(1) In compliance with ORS chapter 183[ ,]:
(a) [ Promulgate] Adopt  rules consistent with law for the enforcement of the state forest  laws
relating directly to the protection of forestland and the conservation of forest resources.
(b) Adopt by rule forest management plans.
(2) Adopt by rule sustainable harvest levels, as defined in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
[(2)] (3) Appoint and instruct fire wardens as provided in ORS chapter 477.
[(3)] (4) Direct the improvement and protection of forestland owned by the State of Oregon.
[(4)] (5) Collect data relative to forest conditions.
[(5)] (6) Take action authorized by law to prevent and extinguish forest, brush and grass fires.
[(6)] (7) Enforce all laws pertaining to forestland and prosecute violations of such laws.
[(7)] (8) Cooperate with landowners, political subdivisions, private associations  and agencies and
others in forest protection.
[(8)] (9) Advise and encourage reforestation.
[(9)] (10) Publish  such information on forestry as the forester determines to be in the public in-
terest.
[(10)] (11)  Enter into contracts and cooperative agreements pertaining  to experiments and re-
search in forestry.
[(11)] (12) Sell, exchange or otherwise dispose of  any real property heretofore or hereafter ac-
quired by the board for administrative purposes and no longer needed.
[(12)] (13)  Coordinate any activities of the State Forestry Department related to a  watershed
enhancement project approved by the Oregon  Watershed Enhancement Board under ORS 541.932
with activities of other cooperating state and federal agencies participating in the project.
[(13)] (14)  Prescribe uniform state standards for certification of  wildland fire training courses
and educational programs.
[(14)] (15) Serve  as the Governor’s authorized representative for the purpose of initiating the fire
management assistance declaration process with the Federal Emergency Management  Agency and
administering Federal Emergency Management Agency fire management assistance grants.
SECTION 13.
The amendments to ORS 526.041 by section 12 of this 2025 Act  apply to the
adoption of policies described in ORS 526.041 (1)(b) and (2)  on and after the effective date of
this 2025 Act.
SECTION 14.  ORS 526.990 is amended to read:
526.990. Violation of any rule [ promulgated] adopted under ORS 526.041 (1) (a) is, upon con-
viction, punishable as a misdemeanor.
JUDICIAL REVIEW OF RULES ADOPTING POLICIES
SECTION 15. Section 16 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 526.
SECTION 16. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 183.400, 183.480 (2) and (3), 183.482 and 183.484, ju-
dicial review of a final rule described in ORS 526.041 (2) shall be as described in  this section.
(2) This section confers standing to bring an action  under this section on any person that
[6]
HB 3103
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
demonstrates that the person  has received revenue from the harvest of timber on state
forestland or has purchased timber sale contracts in this state, without a  further showing
of individualized interest.
(3) A person described in subsection (2) of  this section may institute a proceeding for
judicial review under this section by:
(a) Filing a petition in the Circuit Court for Marion County, not more than  21 days after
the rule is published, that includes:
(A) A statement of the rule the petitioner is challenging;
(B) A statement of the legal basis for the challenge; and
(C) A statement and supporting  affidavit demonstrating how the petitioner has standing
to bring the action pursuant to subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) Serving a  copy of the petition, by registered or certified mail, upon the State
Forester, the State Board of Forestry and the Attorney General.
(4)(a) At any time subsequent  to the filing of a petition and prior to a date set for a
hearing, the State Forester may suspend the rule for purposes of reconsideration.
(b) If the State Forester suspends a rule for purposes  of reconsideration, the State
Forester shall, not more than 60 days after suspending  the rule, readopt, amend or perma-
nently suspend the rule.
(c) If the petitioner is dissatisfied with the readoption or amendment of the rule,  the
petitioner may refile the petition, not more than 21  days after the readoption or amendment
of the rule, and judicial review shall proceed upon the readopted or amended rule.
(d) An amended petition for review shall not be  required if the State Forester, on re-
consideration, readopts or amends the rule with only minor changes.
(e) If the State Forester suspends a rule  for purposes of reconsideration and amends the
rule in favor of the petitioner, the court shall allow  the petitioner costs, but not attorney
fees, to be paid from funds available to the State Forester or the State Board of Forestry.
(5) Judicial review of a rule under this section shall be limited to an examination of:
(a) The rule;
(b) The statutory provisions authorizing the rule; and
(c) Copies of any documents related to notice  and comment on the rule, including a
timber inventory model, as described  in section 3 of this 2025 Act, or a sustainable harvest
level, as defined in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(6) The court shall declare the rule invalid only if it finds that the rule:
(a) Violates a constitutional provision;
(b) Contravenes or exceeds the statutory authority of the State Forester;
(c) Was adopted without compliance with applicable rulemaking procedures;
(d) Is inconsistent with a different rule of the State Forester  or a rule of the State Board
of Forestry, with an officially stated position of  the State Forester or the State Board of
Forestry or  with a prior practice of the State Forester or the State Board of Forestry, if the
State Forester has not explained the inconsistency; or
(e) Is not supported by evidence, including  evidence to support calculations underpinning
the rule, that, taken  in isolation and not in light of the whole record, a reasonable person
could accept as adequate to support a conclusion.
(7) Notwithstanding subsection (5) of this section, in reviewing a rule under  this section,
the court may not:
[7]
HB 3103
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Consider whether the rule secures  the greatest permanent value of lands, as de-
scribed in ORS 530.050;
(b) Examine any interpretation by the State Forester, the State Board of Forestry or  the
State Forestry Department of the applicability  or requirements of federal or state legal re-
quirements, including a habitat  conservation plan approved by the National Marine Fisheries
Services or the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, pursuant to  the federal Endangered
Species Act (16 U.S.C. 1531 to 1544); or
(c) Declare the rule invalid more than two years after  the date the rule was filed in the
office of the Secretary of State solely because the  rule was adopted without compliance with
applicable rulemaking procedures, if the State Forester attempted  to comply with the pro-
cedures and the failure  to do so did not substantially prejudice the interests of the petitioner.
(8) The form and scope of the judgment of the court shall be as described in ORS 183.486.
(9) Notwithstanding ORS 183.497 (2), awards of costs and  attorney fees to a petitioner
shall be as described in ORS 183.497.
(10) Any party to the proceeding may appeal the judgment of the court as described in
ORS 183.500.
(11) Until the final resolution of a petition under this section:
(a) The sustainable harvest level that applied when the petition was filed shall remain  in
effect; and
(b) After the fifth year under the sustainable harvest level that applied when the  petition
was filed, the provisions of section 10 apply during the next five-year  period or the next
five-year harvest period under a new sustainable harvest level, whichever comes first.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 183.480 is amended to read:
183.480. (1) Except as provided in ORS 183.417 (3)(b), any person adversely affected or  aggrieved
by an order  or any party to an agency proceeding is entitled to judicial review of a final order,
whether such order is affirmative or negative in form. A petition  for rehearing or reconsideration
need not be filed as a condition of judicial review  unless specifically otherwise provided by statute
or agency rule.
(2) Judicial review of final orders of agencies shall be solely as provided by ORS 183.482,
183.484, 183.490 and 183.500.
(3) No action or suit shall be maintained as to the validity of any agency order  except a final
order as provided in this section and ORS 183.482, 183.484, 183.490 and  183.500 or except upon
showing that the agency is proceeding without probable cause, or that the party  will suffer sub-
stantial and irreparable harm if interlocutory relief is not granted.
(4) Judicial review of orders issued pursuant to ORS 813.410 shall be as provided  by ORS
813.410.
(5) Judicial review of rules described in ORS 526.041 (2)  shall be as provided by section
16 of this 2025 Act.
FOREST MANAGEMENT REPORTS
SECTION 18. ORS 526.255 and 526.265 are added to and made a part of sections 2 to 11
of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 19.  ORS 526.255 is amended to read:
526.255. (1) The State Forester shall :
[8]
HB 3103
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Submit a biennial report  on  forest management  to the Governor and to [ those] the  com-
mittees or interim committees  of the Legislative Assembly [ with responsibility for forestry
matters] that relate to natural resources .
(b) Present orally on the report to the committees  or interim committees of the Legis-
lative Assembly that relate to natural resources, after the end of each fiscal year, during:
(A) The following September;
(B) The following January; or
(C) The first 15 days of the following regular legislative session.
(2) The report [ shall contain matters that include, but are not limited  to ] must describe, at
minimum:
[(1)] (a)  [ The] Long range forest management plans based on current resource  descriptions and
technical assumptions, including [ sustained yield calculations for the purpose of maintaining economic
stability in each management region ] the timber inventory model described in section 3 of this
2025 Act.
(b) The applicable sustainable harvest level.
[(2)] (c)  Marketing, reforestation and intensive forest management programs for the  last com-
pleted biennium and the current biennium, and projected programs for the ensuing biennium.
(d) [ The marketing report shall  include ] The volume and value of new sales, the volume and
value of timber harvested [ and], timber  sales receipts distributed to counties and to the Common
School Fund  and the information described in section 3 (3) of this 2025 Act .
[(3)] (e)  The programmed harvest level on federal lands or federal policy changes  that would
impact that level of harvest on lands in Oregon.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 526.265 is amended to read:
526.265. (1) Before finalizing the report  described in ORS 526.255,  the State Forester [ may]
shall:
(a) Make a copy of a draft of the report publicly available;
(b) Provide the public with no less than 30 days to submit written comments on  the draft
of the report; and
(c) After the  period described in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  conduct biennial public
hearings in each  forest  management region  described in subsection (2) of this section, and  be-
fore the Forest Trust Land Advisory Committee described in ORS 526.156,  to [ report]:
(A) Describe  the matters included in [ ORS 526.255] the draft of the report;  and [ to]
(B) Accept public testimony  on the draft of the report .
(2) For the purpose of this section  [ and ORS 526.255 ], the following forest management regions
are established:
(a) Northwest  Region, consisting of Clatsop, Columbia, Tillamook, Washington and Yamhill
Counties.
(b) Willamette Region, consisting  of Multnomah, Clackamas, Marion, Polk, Lincoln, Benton, Linn
and Lane Counties.
(c) Southern Region, consisting of Douglas, Coos, Curry, Josephine and Jackson Counties.
(d) Eastern Region, consisting of Hood River, Wasco, Gilliam, Sherman, Morrow, Umatilla,  Un-
ion, Wallowa, Jefferson, Wheeler, Grant, Baker,  Deschutes, Crook, Klamath, Lake, Harney and
Malheur Counties.
APPROPRIATION
[9]
HB 3103
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
SECTION 21.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Forester, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of  the General
Fund, the amount of $______, for developing:
(1) A timber inventory model described in section 3 of this 2025 Act; and
(2) A sustainable harvest level, as defined in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 22.
The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 23. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[10]