Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 327.372 is amended to read:
327.372. (1) Activities  related to science, technology, engineering and mathematics education and
activities  related  to career and technical education that can lead to high wage and high demand jobs
shall be funded as provided by this section.
(2) The Department of Education shall distribute moneys in the Connecting Education to  Ca-
reers Account established by ORS 327.376 as follows:
(a) Forty percent for activities related  to science, technology, engineering and mathematics ed-
ucation that are described in subsection  (3) of this section. Moneys shall be distributed by the de-
partment under this paragraph based on recommendations of the STEM Investment Council.
(b) Sixty percent for activities related to career and technical education that can  lead to high
wage and  high demand jobs and that are described in subsection (4) of this section. Moneys shall
be distributed by the department under this paragraph based on recommendations of  the committee
established under ORS 344.075.
(3) Moneys distributed as provided by subsection  (2)(a) of this section to fund activities related
to science, technology, engineering and mathematics education shall be used to:
(a) Expand and sustain regional networks that support science, technology, engineering and
mathematics.
(b) Award grants that expand the implementation of  effective programs related to science,
technology, engineering and  mathematics, that propose innovative approaches or programs related
to science, technology, engineering and mathematics or that provide professional development re-
lated to teaching science, technology, engineering and mathematics.
(c) Provide funding to recruit, retain and support underserved students, as defined by  the State
Board of Education by rule, for programs that are offered at community colleges and public uni-
versities and that can lead to high wage  and high demand jobs related to science, technology, en-
gineering and mathematics.
(d) Develop a systematic survey of facility use to determine  how savings for science, technology,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4120
HB 3446
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
engineering and mathematics education can be achieved.
(e) Fund any other activities related to science, engineering and  mathematics education that are
identified by the STEM Investment Council.
(4) Moneys distributed as provided by subsection  (2)(b) of this section to fund activities related
to career and technical education that can lead to high  wage and high demand jobs shall be used
for:
(a) Programs that expose students  to career and technical education programs that can lead to
high wage and high demand jobs.
(b) Career and Technical Education Revitalization grants awarded under ORS 344.075.
(c) Student leadership  organizations related to career and technical education programs that can
lead to high wage and high demand jobs.
[(d) Distribution to  school districts to support career and technical education programs in the
school district that are approved by the Department of Education as  being high quality and that can
lead to high wage and high demand  jobs. Moneys must be distributed to each school and public charter
school in the school  district based on the number of students enrolled at the school with the following
characteristics: ]
[(A) Students who are enrolled in and earned three or more  credits for courses that are part of a
career and technical education program that  can lead to high wage and high demand jobs and that
are approved by the Department of Education. ]
[(B) Students who acquire an industry credential that can lead to a high wage and high demand
job and that is approved by the Department of Education. ]
[(C) Students described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of this  paragraph who are historically under-
served, as defined by the State Board of Education by rule. ]
(d) Distribution to school districts to  support career and technical education programs
in the school district that  are approved by the Department of Education as being high quality
and that can lead to high wage and high demand jobs. Moneys must  be distributed to each
school and public charter school in the school district based on:
(A) The number of students enrolled at the school  who are enrolled in and earned three
or more credits for courses that are part of a career and technical education  program that
can lead to high wage and high demand jobs and that are approved by the Department  of
Education; and
(B) The number of students enrolled at the school who are described  in subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph and who:
(i) Acquire  an industry credential that can lead to a high wage and high demand job and
that is approved by the Department of Education; or
(ii) Are historically underserved, as defined by the State Board of Education by rule.
(e) Administration of grants for the purpose of expanding teacher training programs  and oppor-
tunities related  to career and technical education that can lead to high wage and high demand jobs.
(f) Administration of a pilot  program to increase students’ exposure and access to career and
technical education that can lead to high wage and high demand jobs.
(g) Funding any other activities related to career and technical education  that can lead to high
wage and high demand jobs and that are identified by the committee established under ORS 344.075.
(5) Except as otherwise provided,  moneys distributed under subsections (3) and (4) of this section
shall be distributed to school districts, education service districts, public schools, public  charter
schools,  community  colleges, public universities or statewide nonprofit organizations promoting stu-
[2]
HB 3446
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
dent leadership in career and technical education or any combination thereof or in partnership with
youth job development organizations, as defined in ORS 344.415, other  nonprofit organizations or
other entities identified by the State Board of Education by rule.
(6) From the moneys available under subsection (2) of  this section, the Department of Education,
the STEM Investment Council and the committee established under ORS 344.075 combined  may re-
tain no more  than a total of five percent of all moneys distributed for a fiscal year for administrative
expenses incurred under this section.
(7) The Department of Education, in collaboration with the STEM  Investment Council and the
committee established under ORS 344.075, shall submit a biennial  report to the Legislative Assembly
related to distributions made under this section. The  report must include metrics that identify how
distributions made under  this section are contributing to the development of a skilled workforce that
is able to secure high wage and high demand jobs.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 327.372 by section  1 of this 2025 Act apply to dis-
tributions made to school districts on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[3]