Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The governing body of each county, in consultation  with local community
mental health  programs and the Oregon Health Authority, may establish county courthouse
colocated drug and alcohol abuse treatment services  and treatment navigation services in
county courthouses to facilitate treatment or access to treatment of  individuals with sub-
stance use disorders who are also interacting with the justice system.
(2) A county that establishes county courthouse colocated  drug and alcohol abuse treat-
ment services and treatment navigation services may  apply for grants under section 2 of this
2023 Act to recoup county costs incurred in establishing the courthouse colocated services.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Health  Authority shall by rule establish criteria for county
courthouse colocated drug and alcohol abuse treatment services and  treatment navigation
services described in section 1 of this  2023 Act that will qualify for grants awarded under this
section.
(2) A county  courthouse program of colocated drug and alcohol abuse treatment services
and treatment navigation services established by a county governing body qualifies for grants
described in this section if the program  meets the criteria established by the authority by
rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The authority shall  distribute grants to each county that applies for funding under
this section in an amount sufficient to reimburse the county  for the cost of operating county
courthouse colocated drug  and alcohol abuse treatment services and treatment navigation
services if the  colocated services the county is providing satisfy the criteria established by
the authority by rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The authority shall pay grants described in  this section to qualified county applicants
from amounts available to the authority under ORS 475C.726.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3077
HB 2670
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) Grants described in this section shall be sought and awarded biennially, to enable a
county to recoup the two-year costs for operating a qualified program  described in this sec-
tion.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 475C.726, as amended by section  1, chapter 15, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended
to read:
475C.726. (1) As used in this section,  “U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index” means the U.S.
City Average Consumer Price  Index for All Urban Consumers (All Items) as published by the Bureau
of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(2) There is  established the Oregon Marijuana Account, separate and distinct from the General
Fund. The account consists of moneys transferred to the account under ORS 475C.734.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly the amount of moneys available  in the
Oregon Marijuana Account.
(b)(A) Before making other transfers of moneys required by this  section, the department shall
transfer quarterly to  the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund all moneys in the Oregon
Marijuana Account in excess of $11,250,000.
(B) The department shall annually adjust the limitation in subparagraph (A) of  this paragraph.
The department shall multiply $11,250,000  by the percentage, if any, by which the monthly averaged
U.S. City Average  Consumer Price Index for the 12 consecutive months ending August 31 of the
prior calendar year exceeds the  monthly index for the fourth quarter of the calendar year 2020, and
shall add that product to $11,250,000. Any  increase in the limitation shall apply beginning with
transfers made in July of each year, based upon receipts in the second calendar quarter of  each
year.
(c) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, and after making the transfer of moneys required
by paragraph (b) of this subsection,  the department shall transfer quarterly 20 percent of the moneys
in the Oregon Marijuana Account as follows:
(A) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to the  cities of this state in
the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred  in shares that reflect the popu-
lation of each city of this state that is  not exempt from this paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)
of this section compared to the population of  all cities of this state that are not exempt from this
paragraph pursuant to subsection  (4)(a) of this section, as determined by Portland State University
under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately preceding the date of the transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five  percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093 and 475C.097 on the last business  day
of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located in each city compared
to the number of licenses  held pursuant to ORS 475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093 and 475C.097 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten  percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the following
shares:
(i) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the total  commer-
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant
to ORS 475C.065 on the last business day of  the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer
for all premises located in  each county compared to the total commercially available area of all
grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant to ORS 475C.065 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
[2]
HB 2670
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(ii) Fifty percent of  the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number of li-
censes held pursuant to ORS  475C.085, 475C.093 and 475C.097 on the last business day of the cal-
endar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located  in each county compared to
the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475C.085, 475C.093 and 475C.097 on the last business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
(d) After making the transfer  of moneys required by paragraph (b) of this subsection, 80 percent
of the remaining moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account must be used as follows:
(A) Forty  percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used;
(B) Twenty percent of the moneys in the account must  be used solely for mental health treat-
ment or for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment;
(C) Fifteen percent of  the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020 may be used; and
(D) Five percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for  purposes related to al-
cohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services[ .], including funding
grants described in section 2 of this 2023 Act for  county courthouse colocated drug and al-
cohol abuse treatment  services and treatment navigation services. Amounts for county
courthouse colocated drug  and alcohol abuse treatment services and treatment navigation
services are continuously appropriated to the  Oregon Health Authority for the purposes de-
scribed in section 2 of this 2023 Act.
(4)(a) A city that has an ordinance  prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS  475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097 is required is not eligible to
receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(c)(A) of this section.
(b) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which  issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475C.065  is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
subsection (3)(c)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475C.085, 475C.093 or  475C.097 is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(c)(B)(ii) of this section.
(d)(A) Paragraphs (b)  and (c) of this subsection do not apply to a county ordinance adopted on
or after January 1, 2018, that prohibits the establishment of a premises for  which a license under
ORS 475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097 is required but allows in the unincorporated area of
the county the continued  operation of an existing premises for which a license under ORS 475C.065,
475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097 is required.
(B) A county that adopts an ordinance described in subparagraph (A) of  this paragraph shall
certify the adoption of the ordinance under subsection (6) of this section.
(5)(a) A city or county that is ineligible under subsection (4) of this section to  receive a transfer
of moneys  from the Oregon Marijuana Account during a given quarter but has received a transfer
of moneys for that quarter shall return the amount transferred to the Department of Revenue,  with
interest as described  under paragraph (f) of this subsection. An ineligible city or county may vol-
untarily transfer the moneys to the Department of Revenue immediately upon receipt of the ineligi-
ble transfer.
(b) If the Director of the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services determines that a city
or county received a transfer of moneys under subsection (3)(c) of this section but was ineligible  to
receive that transfer under subsection (4) of this section, the director  shall provide notice to the
[3]
HB 2670
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
ineligible city or county and order the city or county to return the amount received to  the Depart-
ment of Revenue, with interest as  described under paragraph (f) of this subsection. A city or county
may appeal the order within 30 days of the date of  the order under the procedures for a contested
case under ORS chapter 183.
(c) As soon as the order under paragraph  (b) of this subsection becomes final, the director shall
notify the Department of Revenue and the ineligible city or county. Upon  notification, the Depart-
ment of Revenue immediately shall proceed to collect the amount stated in the notice.
(d) The Department of Revenue shall have the  benefit of all laws of the state pertaining to the
collection of income and  excise taxes and may proceed to collect the amounts described in the no-
tice under paragraph (c) of this subsection. An assessment of tax is not necessary and  the collection
described in this subsection is not precluded by any statute of limitations.
(e) If a city or county is subject to  an order to return moneys from an ineligible transfer, the
city or county shall  be denied any further relief in connection with the ineligible transfer on or after
the date that the order becomes final.
(f) Interest under this section shall accrue at the  rate established in ORS 305.220 beginning on
the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(g) Both the moneys and the interest collected from or returned by an  ineligible city or county
shall be redistributed to the cities  or counties that were eligible to receive a transfer under sub-
section (3)(c) of this section on the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(6)(a) Not later than July 1 of each year,  each city and county in this state shall certify with
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services whether the city or county  has an ordinance
prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issuance  of a license under ORS 475C.065,
475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097 is required and whether the county has an ordinance described in
subsection (4)(d) of this section. The certification shall be made  concurrently with the certifications
under ORS 221.770, in a form and manner prescribed by the Oregon  Department of Administrative
Services.
(b) If a city fails to comply with this subsection, the city is not eligible to receive transfers  of
moneys under subsection  (3)(c)(A) of this section. If a county fails to comply with this subsection,
the county is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(c)(B) of this section.
(c) A city or county that repeals an ordinance as provided  in ORS 475C.457 shall file an updated
certification with the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services in a form and manner pre-
scribed by the department, noting the effective date of  the change. A city or county that repeals an
ordinance as provided in ORS 475C.457 is  eligible to receive quarterly transfers of moneys under
this section for quarters where the repeal is effective for the entire quarter  and the updated certi-
fication was filed at least 30 days before the date of transfer.
SECTION 4.
This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]