Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department  of Fish and Wildlife, in consultation with the De-
partment of State Lands and the State Parks and Recreation Department, shall establish by
rule a grant program for the  purpose of encouraging the use of seaweed as feed for livestock.
(2) In administering the program, the State Department of Fish and Wildlife:
(a) Shall develop criteria for receiving a grant and a process for applying for  a grant; and
(b) May require a recipient  of a grant to report to the department on the use of the grant
funds.
SECTION 2.
(1) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife,  in consultation with the De-
partment of State Lands and the State Parks and Recreation Department, shall study  the
potential for developing commercial seaweed production to produce feed for livestock as  a
means to reduce methane emissions.
(2) The State Department of  Fish and Wildlife shall present the study in a report to an
appropriate committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly,  in the manner
provided under ORS 192.245, on or before September 15, 2024.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to the  State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $  for the
purpose of funding the grant program described  in section 1 of this 2023 Act and the study
described in section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on June 30, 2025.
(2) Section 2 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 5.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2045
SB 838
1
[2]