Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
REIMBURSEMENT FOR SERVICES PROVIDED
BY COORDINATED CARE ORGANIZATIONS
SECTION 1.
 ORS 414.572, as amended by section 14, chapter 489, Oregon Laws 2017, section
4, chapter 49, Oregon Laws  2018, section 8, chapter 358, Oregon Laws 2019, section 2, chapter 364,
Oregon Laws 2019, section 58, chapter 478, Oregon Laws  2019, section 7, chapter 529, Oregon Laws
2019, and section 14, chapter 453, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
414.572. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt  by rule the qualification criteria and re-
quirements for a coordinated care organization  and shall integrate the criteria and requirements
into each contract with a coordinated  care organization. Coordinated care organizations may be
local, community-based organizations  or statewide organizations with community-based participation
in governance or  any combination of the two. Coordinated care organizations may contract with
counties or with other public or private entities to provide services to members. The authority  may
not contract with only one statewide organization.  A coordinated care organization may be a single
corporate structure or a network of providers organized through contractual relationships. The  cri-
teria and requirements adopted by the authority under this section must include, but are  not limited
to, a requirement that the coordinated care organization:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 475
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Have demonstrated experience and a capacity for managing financial risk and  establishing
financial  reserves.
(b) Meet the following minimum financial requirements:
(A) Maintain restricted reserves of  $250,000 plus an amount equal to 50 percent of the coordi-
nated care organization’s total actual or projected liabilities above $250,000.
(B) Maintain capital or surplus of not less than  $2,500,000 and any additional amounts necessary
to ensure the solvency of the coordinated care organization, as specified by the authority by rules
that are consistent with ORS 731.554 (6), 732.225, 732.230 and 750.045.
(C) Expend a portion of the annual net income or reserves  of the coordinated care organization
that exceed the financial requirements specified in this paragraph  on services designed to address
health disparities and the social determinants of  health consistent with the coordinated care
organization’s community health improvement plan  and transformation plan and the terms and con-
ditions of the Medicaid demonstration project under section 1115 of the Social  Security Act (42
U.S.C. 1315).
(c) Operate within a fixed global budget  and other payment  mechanisms described in sub-
section (6) of this section  and spend on primary  care, as defined by the authority by rule, at least
12 percent of the coordinated care organization’s total  expenditures for physical and mental health
care provided to members, except for expenditures on prescription drugs, vision care  and dental
care.
(d) Develop and  implement alternative payment methodologies that are based on health care
quality and improved health outcomes.
(e) Coordinate the delivery of physical health  care, behavioral health care, oral health care and
covered long-term care services.
(f) Engage community members and health care providers in improving the health  of the com-
munity and addressing regional, cultural, socioeconomic  and racial disparities in health care that
exist among the coordinated care organization’s members and in the coordinated care organization’s
community.
(2) In addition to the criteria  and requirements specified in subsection (1) of this section, the
authority  must adopt by rule requirements for coordinated care organizations contracting with the
authority so that:
(a) Each  member of the coordinated care organization receives integrated person centered care
and services designed to provide choice, independence and dignity.
(b) Each member has a consistent and stable relationship with a care team  that is responsible
for comprehensive care management and service delivery.
(c) The supportive and therapeutic needs of each member  are addressed in a holistic fashion,
using patient centered primary  care homes, behavioral health homes or other models that support
patient centered primary care and behavioral  health care and individualized care plans to the extent
feasible.
(d) Members receive comprehensive  transitional care, including appropriate follow-up, when en-
tering and leaving an acute care facility or a long term care setting.
(e) Members are provided:
(A) Assistance in navigating the health care delivery system;
(B) Assistance in accessing community and social support services and statewide resources;
(C) Meaningful language  access as required by federal and state law including, but not limited
to, 42 U.S.C. 18116, Title VI of the  Civil Rights Act of 1964, Title VI Guidance issued by the United
[2]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
States Department of Justice and  the National Standards for Culturally and Linguistically Appro-
priate Services  in Health and Health Care as issued by the United States Department of Health and
Human Services; and
(D) Qualified health care interpreters or certified health care  interpreters listed on the health
care interpreter registry, as those terms are defined in ORS 413.550.
(f) Services  and supports are geographically located as close to where members reside as possi-
ble and are, if available, offered in  nontraditional settings that are accessible to families, diverse
communities and underserved populations.
(g) Each coordinated care organization uses health  information technology to link services and
care providers across the continuum of care to the greatest extent practicable and if financially vi-
able.
(h) Each coordinated care organization complies with the safeguards  for members described in
ORS 414.605.
(i) Each coordinated care organization convenes a community advisory council that meets  the
criteria specified in ORS 414.575.
(j) Each coordinated care organization  prioritizes working with members who have high health
care needs, multiple chronic conditions or behavioral health conditions and  involves those members
in accessing and managing appropriate preventive, health, remedial  and supportive care and ser-
vices, including the services  described in ORS 414.766, to reduce the use of avoidable emergency
room visits and hospital admissions.
(k) Members have a choice of providers within  the coordinated care organization’s network and
that providers participating in a coordinated care organization:
(A) Work together to develop best practices for care and service delivery to reduce  waste and
improve the health and well-being of members.
(B) Are educated about the integrated  approach and how to access and communicate within the
integrated system about a patient’s treatment plan and health history.
(C) Emphasize prevention, healthy lifestyle choices, evidence-based  practices, shared decision-
making and communication.
(D) Are permitted to participate in the networks of multiple coordinated care organizations.
(E) Include providers of specialty care.
(F) Are selected by coordinated care organizations using universal application and  credentialing
procedures and objective  quality information and are removed if the providers fail to meet objective
quality standards.
(G) Work together to develop best practices for culturally and linguistically  appropriate care
and service delivery to reduce waste, reduce health disparities and improve the  health and well-
being of members.
(L) Each coordinated care organization reports on [ outcome and ] quality measures [ adopted un-
der ORS 414.638 ] established under ORS 413.017 (4)  and participates in the health care data re-
porting system established in ORS 442.372 and 442.373.
(m) Each coordinated care organization uses best practices in the  management of finances,
contracts, claims processing, payment functions and provider networks.
(n) Each coordinated care  organization participates in the learning collaborative described in
ORS 413.259 (3).
(o) Each coordinated care organization has a  governing body that complies with ORS 414.584
and that includes:
[3]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) At least one member representing persons that share in  the financial risk of the organiza-
tion;
[(B) A representative of a dental care organization selected by the coordinated care organization; ]
[(C)] (B) The major components of the health care delivery system;
[(D)] (C) At least two health care providers in active practice, including:
(i) A physician licensed under  ORS chapter 677 or a nurse practitioner licensed under ORS
678.375, whose area of practice is primary care; and
(ii) A behavioral health provider;
[(E)] (D) At least two members from the community at large, to ensure that the organization’s
decision-making is consistent with the values of the members and the community; and
[(F)] (E) At least two members of the  community advisory council, one of whom is or was within
the previous six months a recipient of medical assistance and is at least 16 years  of age or a parent,
guardian or primary caregiver of an individual who is or was within the previous  six months a re-
cipient of medical assistance.
(p) Each coordinated care organization’s governing  body establishes standards for publicizing
the activities of the coordinated care organization and the organization’s community  advisory
councils, as necessary, to keep the community informed.
(q) Each coordinated care organization publishes on a website maintained by or on behalf of  the
coordinated care organization, in a manner determined by the authority, a document  designed to
educate members about best practices, care quality  expectations, screening practices, treatment
options and other support  resources available for members who have mental illnesses or substance
use disorders.
(r) Each coordinated  care organization works with the Tribal Advisory Council established in
ORS 414.581 and has a dedicated tribal liaison, selected by the council, to:
(A) Facilitate a resolution of any issues that arise between the  coordinated care organization
and a provider of Indian health services within the area served  by the coordinated care organiza-
tion;
(B) Participate in the community health assessment and the development of the health  im-
provement plan;
(C) Communicate regularly with the Tribal Advisory Council; and
(D) Be available for training by the office within  the authority that is responsible for tribal af-
fairs, any federally recognized tribe in Oregon and the urban Indian health program that is  located
within the area  served by the coordinated care organization and operated by an urban Indian or-
ganization pursuant to 25 U.S.C. 1651.
(3) The authority shall consider the participation of area agencies and other nonprofit agencies
in the configuration of coordinated care organizations.
(4) In selecting one or more coordinated care organizations to serve a  geographic area, the au-
thority  shall:
(a) For members and potential members, optimize access to care and choice of providers;
(b) For providers, optimize choice in contracting with coordinated care organizations; and
(c) Allow more than one coordinated  care organization to serve the geographic area if necessary
to optimize access and choice under this subsection.
[(5) On or before July 1, 2014, each coordinated care organization must have a formal  contractual
relationship with any dental  care organization that serves members of the coordinated care organiza-
tion in the area where they reside. ]
[4]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) In addition to global budgets,  the authority may employ other payment mechanisms
to reimburse coordinated care organizations for  specified health services during limited pe-
riods of time if:
(a) Global budgets remain the predominant means of reimbursing coordinated care  or-
ganizations for care and services provided to the  coordinated care organization’s members;
and
(b) The other payment mechanisms are consistent with the legislative intent  expressed
in ORS 414.018 and the system design described in ORS 414.570 (1).
SECTION 2.
 ORS 414.570 is amended to read:
414.570. (1) There is established the Oregon Integrated and Coordinated Health Care  Delivery
System. The system shall consist of state policies and actions that make coordinated care organiza-
tions accountable for care management and provision of integrated and coordinated health care  for
each organization’s members[ , managed within fixed global budgets, ] by providing care so that effi-
ciency and quality improvements reduce medical cost inflation while supporting the  development of
regional and community accountability for  the health of the residents of each region and community,
and while maintaining regulatory controls necessary  to ensure quality and affordable health care for
all Oregonians.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall seek input from groups and individuals who are part  of
underserved communities, including  ethnically diverse populations, geographically isolated groups,
seniors, people with disabilities and people  using mental health services, and shall also seek input
from providers, coordinated care organizations and communities, in the development of strategies
that promote person  centered care and encourage healthy behaviors, healthy lifestyles and pre-
vention and wellness activities and promote the development  of patients’ skills in self-management
and illness management.
(3) The authority shall regularly report to the  Oregon Health Policy Board, the Governor and
the Legislative Assembly on the progress of payment reform and delivery system change including:
(a) The achievement of benchmarks;
(b) Progress toward eliminating health disparities;
(c) Results of evaluations;
(d) Rules adopted;
(e) Customer satisfaction;
(f) Use of patient centered primary care homes and behavioral health homes;
(g) The involvement of local governments in governance and service delivery; and
(h) Other developments with respect to coordinated care organizations.
QUALITY MEASURES
SECTION 3.
 ORS 413.017 is amended to read:
413.017. (1) The Oregon Health Policy Board shall establish the committees described in sub-
sections (2) to (5) of this section.
(2)(a) The Public Health Benefit Purchasers Committee shall include  individuals who purchase
health care for the following:
(A) The Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(B) The Oregon Educators Benefit Board.
(C) Trustees of the Public Employees Retirement System.
[5]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(D) A city government.
(E) A county government.
(F) A special district.
(G) Any private nonprofit organization that receives the majority of its  funding from the state
and requests to participate on the committee.
(b) The Public Health Benefit Purchasers Committee shall:
(A) Identify and make specific recommendations to achieve uniformity across  all public health
benefit plan  designs based on the best available clinical evidence, recognized best practices for
health promotion and disease management, demonstrated  cost-effectiveness and shared demographics
among the enrollees within the pools covered by the benefit plans.
(B) Develop an action plan for ongoing collaboration to implement the benefit design alignment
described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph and shall leverage  purchasing to achieve benefit
uniformity if practicable.
(C) Continuously review and report to the  Oregon Health Policy Board on the committee’s
progress in aligning benefits while minimizing the cost shift to individual purchasers of  insurance
without shifting costs to the private sector or the health insurance exchange.
(c) The Oregon Health Policy Board shall work with  the Public Health Benefit Purchasers
Committee to identify uniform provisions for state and  local public contracts for health benefit plans
that achieve maximum quality and  cost outcomes. The board shall collaborate with the committee
to develop steps to implement joint contract provisions. The committee shall identify  a schedule for
the implementation of contract  changes. The process for implementation of joint contract provisions
must include a review process to protect against unintended cost shifts to enrollees or agencies.
(3)(a) The Health Care Workforce Committee  shall include individuals who have the collective
expertise, knowledge and experience in a broad range  of health professions, health care education
and health care workforce development initiatives.
(b) The Health Care Workforce Committee shall coordinate efforts to recruit and  educate health
care professionals and retain a quality workforce to meet the demand that will be created  by the
expansion in health care coverage, system transformations and an increasingly diverse population.
(c) The Health Care Workforce Committee shall conduct an inventory of all  grants and other
state resources available for addressing the need to expand the health care workforce to meet the
needs of Oregonians for health care.
[(4)(a) The Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee shall  include the following members appointed
by the Oregon Health Policy Board: ]
[(A) An individual representing the Oregon Health Authority; ]
[(B) An individual representing the Oregon Educators Benefit Board; ]
[(C) An individual representing the Public Employees’ Benefit Board; ]
[(D) An individual representing the Department of Consumer and Business Services; ]
[(E) Two health care providers; ]
[(F) One individual representing hospitals; ]
[(G) One individual representing insurers, large employers or multiple employer  welfare arrange-
ments;]
[(H) Two individuals representing health care consumers; ]
[(I) Two individuals representing coordinated care organizations; ]
[(J) One individual with expertise in health care research; ]
[(K) One individual with expertise in health care quality measures; and ]
[6]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(L) One individual with expertise in mental health and addiction services. ]
[(b) The committee shall work collaboratively with the Oregon Educators Benefit Board,  the Public
Employees’ Benefit Board, the authority and the department to adopt health outcome and  quality
measures that are focused on specific goals and  provide value to the state, employers, insurers, health
care providers and consumers. The committee shall be the single body  to align health outcome and
quality measures used in this state with the requirements of health care data  reporting to ensure that
the measures and requirements are coordinated, evidence-based and focused on  a long term statewide
vision.]
[(c) The committee shall use a public process that includes an opportunity  for public comment to
identify health outcome and quality measures that may  be applied to services provided by coordinated
care organizations or paid  for by health benefit plans sold through the health insurance exchange or
offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board or the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.  The authority,
the department, the Oregon Educators Benefit Board and  the Public Employees’ Benefit Board are not
required to  adopt all of the health outcome and quality measures identified by the committee but may
not adopt any health outcome and quality measures that are different from  the measures identified by
the committee. The measures must take into account the recommendations of the metrics  and scoring
subcommittee created in ORS 414.638 and the differences in the populations served by coordinated  care
organizations and by commercial insurers. ]
[(d) In identifying health outcome and quality measures, the committee shall  prioritize measures
that:]
[(A) Utilize existing state and national health  outcome and quality measures, including measures
adopted by the Centers  for Medicare and Medicaid Services, that have been adopted or endorsed by
other state or national organizations and have a relevant state or national benchmark; ]
[(B) Given  the context in which each measure is applied, are not prone to random variations based
on the size of the denominator; ]
[(C) Utilize existing data systems, to the extent practicable, for  reporting the measures to minimize
redundant reporting and undue burden on the state, health benefit plans and health care providers; ]
[(D) Can be meaningfully adopted for a minimum of three years; ]
[(E) Use a common format in the collection of the data and facilitate the  public reporting of the
data; and]
[(F) Can be reported in a timely manner and without significant delay  so that the most current and
actionable data is available. ]
[(e) The committee shall evaluate  on a regular and ongoing basis the health outcome and quality
measures adopted under this section. ]
[(f) The committee may convene subcommittees to focus on gaining expertise  in particular areas
such as data collection,  health care research and mental health and substance use disorders in order
to aid the committee in the development of health  outcome and quality measures. A subcommittee may
include stakeholders and staff from the authority, the Department of Human  Services, the Department
of Consumer  and Business Services, the Early Learning Council or any other agency staff with the
appropriate expertise in the issues addressed by the subcommittee. ]
[(g) This subsection does  not prevent the authority, the Department of Consumer and Business
Services, commercial insurers, the Public  Employees’ Benefit Board or the Oregon Educators Benefit
Board from establishing programs that provide financial incentives to providers for meeting  specific
health outcome and quality measures adopted by the committee. ]
(4)(a) The Health Equity Quality Metrics Committee shall have at  least 13 members ap-
[7]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
pointed by the Director of the Oregon Health Authority as follows:
(A) At least eight members who:
(i) Represent the interests of groups most affected  by health inequities, including indi-
viduals enrolled in the medical assistance program; or
(ii) Are health equity researchers or professionals;
(B) Four members who represent coordinated care organizations and health care pro-
viders; and
(C) One member from the Behavioral Health Committee established in this section.
(b) The Health Equity  Quality Metrics Committee shall establish quality measures and a
process for developing quality measures consistent with the:
(A) Terms  and conditions of the demonstration project approved for this state by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services under 42 U.S.C. 1315; and
(B) Written quality strategies approved by  the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Ser-
vices under 42 C.F.R. 438.340 and 457.1240.
(c) The Oregon Health Authority shall evaluate on a regular and ongoing basis the quality
measures established by the Health Equity  Quality Metrics Committee under this subsection
for members of coordinated care organizations.
(5)(a) The Behavioral Health Committee shall include the following members appointed by the
Director of the Oregon Health Authority:
[(A) The chairperson of the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee; ]
[(B)] (A)  The chairperson of the committee appointed by the board to address health equity,  if
any;
[(C)] (B)  A behavioral health director for a coordinated care organization;
[(D)] (C) A representative of a community mental health program;
[(E)] (D)  An individual with expertise in data analysis;
[(F)] (E)  A member of the Consumer  Advisory Council, established under ORS 430.073, that re-
presents adults with mental illness;
[(G)] (F)  A representative of the System of Care Advisory Council established in ORS 418.978;
[(H)] (G)  A member of the Oversight and Accountability Council, described in ORS 430.389, who
represents adults with addictions or co-occurring conditions;
[(I)] (H) One member representing a system of care, as defined in ORS 418.976;
[(J)] (I)  One consumer representative;
[(K)] (J) One representative of a tribal government;
[(L)] (K)  One representative of an organization that advocates on  behalf of individuals with in-
tellectual or developmental disabilities;
[(M)] (L)  One representative of providers of behavioral health services;
[(N)] (M)  The director of the division of the authority  responsible for behavioral health services,
as a nonvoting member;
[(O)] (N) The Director  of the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission appointed under ORS 430.220,
as a nonvoting member;
[(P)] (O)  The authority’s Medicaid director, as a nonvoting member;
[(Q)] (P)  A representative of the Department of Human Services, as a nonvoting member; and
[(R)] (Q)  Any other member that the director deems appropriate.
(b) The board may modify the membership of the committee as needed.
(c) The division of the authority responsible for behavioral  health services and the director of
[8]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the division shall staff the committee.
(d) The committee[ , in collaboration  with the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee, as needed, ]
shall:
(A) Establish quality metrics for  behavioral health services provided by coordinated care or-
ganizations, health care providers, counties and other government entities; and
(B) Establish incentives to improve the quality of behavioral health services.
(e) The quality metrics and incentives shall be designed to:
(A) Improve timely access to behavioral health care;
(B) Reduce hospitalizations;
(C) Reduce overdoses;
(D) Improve the integration of physical and behavioral health care; and
(E) Ensure individuals are supported in the  least restrictive environment that meets their be-
havioral health needs.
(6) Members of the committees described in subsections (2) to  (5) of this section who are not
members of the Oregon Health Policy Board [ are not entitled to ] may receive  compensation [ but] in
accordance with criteria prescribed by the authority by rule and  shall be reimbursed from funds
available to the board for actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred by them by their
attendance at committee meetings, in the manner and amount provided in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 413.032, as amended by section 3, chapter 87, Oregon Laws 2022, is  amended
to read:
413.032. (1) The Oregon Health Authority is established. The authority shall:
(a) Carry out policies adopted by the Oregon Health Policy Board;
(b) Administer the Oregon Integrated and  Coordinated Health Care Delivery System established
in ORS 414.570, the COFA Premium Assistance  Program established in ORS 413.610 and the COFA
Dental Program established in section 1, chapter 87, Oregon Laws 2022;
(c) Administer the Oregon Prescription Drug Program;
(d) Develop the  policies for and the provision of publicly funded medical care and medical as-
sistance in this state;
(e) Develop the policies for and the provision  of mental health treatment and treatment of ad-
dictions;
(f) Assess, promote and protect the health of the public as specified by state and federal law;
(g) Provide regular reports to the board  with respect to the performance of health services
contractors serving recipients of medical assistance, including reports of trends in  health services
and enrollee satisfaction;
(h) Guide  and support, with the authorization of the board, community-centered health initiatives
designed to address critical risk factors, especially those that contribute to chronic disease;
(i) Be the state Medicaid agency for the administration of  funds from Titles XIX and XXI of the
Social Security Act and administer medical assistance under ORS chapter 414;
(j) In consultation with the Director of the Department of Consumer and  Business Services, pe-
riodically review and recommend standards and methodologies to the Legislative Assembly for:
(A) Review of administrative expenses of health insurers;
(B) Approval of rates; and
(C) Enforcement of rating rules adopted by the Department of  Consumer and Business Services;
(k) Structure reimbursement rates for providers  that serve recipients of medical assistance to
reward comprehensive management of diseases,  quality outcomes and the efficient use of resources
[9]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and to promote cost-effective procedures, services and programs including, without  limitation, pre-
ventive health, dental and primary  care services, web-based office visits, telephone consultations and
telemedicine consultations;
(L) Guide and support community three-share agreements in which an  employer, state or local
government and an individual all contribute a portion  of a premium for a community-centered health
initiative or for insurance coverage;
(m) Develop, in consultation with the Department of  Consumer and Business Services, one or
more products designed to provide more affordable options for the small group market;
(n) Implement policies and programs to expand the skilled, diverse workforce as described in
ORS 414.018 (4); and
[(o) Implement a process for collecting the health outcome and quality measure data  identified by
the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee  and the Behavioral Health Committee and report the data
to the Oregon Health Policy Board. ]
(o) Report to the Oregon  Health Policy Board annually the quality measures established
by the Health Equity Quality Metrics Committee and the quality metrics established by the
Behavioral Health Committee under ORS 413.017.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority is authorized to:
(a) Create an  all-claims, all-payer database to collect health care data and monitor and evaluate
health care reform in Oregon and to  provide comparative cost and quality information to consumers,
providers and purchasers of health care  about Oregon’s health care systems and health plan net-
works in order to provide comparative information to consumers.
(b) Develop uniform contracting standards for the purchase of  health care, including the fol-
lowing:
(A) Uniform quality standards and performance measures;
(B) Evidence-based guidelines for major chronic disease  management and health care services
with unexplained variations in frequency or cost;
(C) Evidence-based effectiveness guidelines for select new technologies and medical equipment;
(D) A statewide drug formulary that may be used by publicly funded health benefit plans; and
(E) Standards that  accept and consider tribal-based practices for mental health and substance
abuse prevention, counseling and treatment for persons who are Native  American or Alaska Native
as equivalent to evidence-based practices.
(3) The enumeration of duties, functions and powers in this section is not  intended to be exclu-
sive nor to limit the duties, functions and powers imposed on  or vested in the Oregon Health Au-
thority by ORS 413.006 to 413.042, 413.610 to 413.613, 415.012 to  415.430, 415.501, 741.001 to 741.540,
741.802 and 741.900 or by other statutes.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 414.025 is amended to read:
414.025. As used in this chapter and ORS chapters 411 and 413,  unless the context or a specially
applicable statutory definition requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Alternative payment methodology” means a payment  other than a fee-for-services pay-
ment, used  by coordinated care organizations as compensation for the provision of integrated and
coordinated health care and services.
(b) “Alternative payment methodology” includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Shared savings arrangements;
(B) Bundled payments; and
(C) Payments based on episodes.
[10]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) “Behavioral health assessment” means an evaluation  by a behavioral health clinician, in
person or using telemedicine, to determine a patient’s need for immediate crisis stabilization.
(3) “Behavioral health clinician” means:
(a) A licensed psychiatrist;
(b) A licensed psychologist;
(c) A licensed nurse practitioner with a specialty in psychiatric mental health;
(d) A licensed clinical social worker;
(e) A licensed professional counselor or licensed marriage and family therapist;
(f) A certified clinical social work associate;
(g) An intern or resident who is working under a  board-approved supervisory contract in a
clinical mental health field; or
(h) Any other clinician whose  authorized scope of practice includes mental health diagnosis and
treatment.
(4) “Behavioral health crisis” means a disruption in an individual’s  mental or emotional stability
or functioning resulting in an  urgent need for immediate outpatient treatment in an emergency de-
partment or admission  to a hospital to prevent a serious deterioration in the individual’s mental or
physical health.
(5) “Behavioral health  home” means a mental health disorder or substance use disorder treat-
ment organization, as defined by the Oregon Health Authority  by rule, that provides integrated
health care to  individuals whose primary diagnoses are mental health disorders or substance use
disorders.
(6) “Category of  aid” means assistance provided by the Oregon Supplemental Income Program,
aid granted under ORS 411.877  to 411.896 and 412.001 to 412.069 or federal Supplemental Security
Income payments.
(7) “Community health worker”  means an individual who meets qualification criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in an urban or rural community, either for pay or as a volunteer  in association with
a local health care system;
(c) To the extent practicable, shares ethnicity, language, socioeconomic status and life  experi-
ences with the residents of the community the worker serves;
(d) Assists members of the community to improve their health  and increases the capacity of the
community to meet the health care needs of its residents and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides health education and information that is culturally appropriate to the  individuals
being served;
(f) Assists community residents in receiving the care they need;
(g) May give peer counseling and guidance on health behaviors; and
(h) May provide direct services such as first aid or blood pressure screening.
(8) “Coordinated care organization” means an organization meeting criteria adopted by the
Oregon Health Authority under ORS 414.572.
(9) “Dually eligible for Medicare and Medicaid” means, with respect to eligibility for enrollment
in a coordinated care organization, that an individual is eligible for health services funded by  Title
XIX of the Social Security Act and is:
(a) Eligible for or enrolled in Part A of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act; or
(b) Enrolled in Part B of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act.
[11]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(10)(a) “Family support specialist” means an individual who meets  qualification criteria adopted
by the authority  under ORS 414.665 and who provides supportive services to and has experience
parenting a child who:
(A) Is a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment; or
(B) Is facing or  has faced difficulties in accessing education, health and wellness services due
to a mental health or behavioral health barrier.
(b) A “family support specialist” may be a peer wellness specialist or a peer support specialist.
(11) “Global budget” means a total  amount established prospectively by the Oregon Health Au-
thority to be paid to a  coordinated care organization for the delivery of, management of, access to
and quality of the health care delivered to members of the coordinated care organization.
(12) “Health insurance  exchange” or “exchange” means an American Health Benefit Exchange
described in 42 U.S.C. 18031, 18032, 18033 and 18041.
(13) “Health  services” means at least so much of each of the following as are funded by the
Legislative Assembly based upon the prioritized list of health services  compiled by the Health Evi-
dence Review Commission under ORS 414.690:
(a) Services required by federal law to be included in the [ state’s] medical assistance  program
in order for the program to qualify for federal funds;
(b) Services  provided by a physician as defined in ORS 677.010, a nurse practitioner licensed
under ORS 678.375, a behavioral health clinician or other licensed practitioner  within the scope of
the practitioner’s practice as defined by state law, and ambulance services;
(c) Prescription drugs;
(d) Laboratory and X-ray services;
(e) Medical equipment and supplies;
(f) Mental health services;
(g) Chemical dependency services;
(h) Emergency dental services;
(i) Nonemergency dental services;
(j) Provider  services, other than services described in paragraphs (a) to (i), (k), (L) and (m) of
this subsection, defined by federal law that may be included in the [ state’s] medical assistance pro-
gram;
(k) Emergency hospital services;
(L) Outpatient hospital services; and
(m) Inpatient hospital services.
(14) “Income” has the meaning given that term in ORS 411.704.
(15)(a) “Integrated health  care” means care provided to individuals and their families in a pa-
tient centered primary care home or behavioral health home by licensed primary care clinicians,
behavioral health clinicians and other care team members, working together to address one or more
of the following:
(A) Mental illness.
(B) Substance use disorders.
(C) Health behaviors that contribute to chronic illness.
(D) Life stressors and crises.
(E) Developmental risks and conditions.
(F) Stress-related physical symptoms.
(G) Preventive care.
[12]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(H) Ineffective patterns of health care utilization.
(b) As used in this subsection, “other care team members” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Qualified mental health professionals or qualified  mental health associates meeting require-
ments adopted by the Oregon Health Authority by rule;
(B) Peer wellness specialists;
(C) Peer support specialists;
(D) Community health workers who have completed a state-certified training program;
(E) Personal health navigators; or
(F) Other qualified individuals approved by the Oregon Health Authority.
(16) “Investments and savings” means cash, securities as defined in  ORS 59.015, negotiable in-
struments as defined in ORS  73.0104 and such similar investments or savings as the department or
the authority may establish by rule that are available to the  applicant or recipient to contribute
toward meeting the needs of the applicant or recipient.
(17) “Medical assistance” means so  much of the medical, mental health, preventive, supportive,
palliative and remedial care and  services as may be prescribed by the authority according to the
standards established pursuant to ORS 414.065, including premium assistance under  ORS 413.610 to
413.613, 414.115 and 414.117, payments made  for services provided under an insurance or other
contractual  arrangement  and money paid directly to the recipient for the purchase of health services
and for services described in ORS 414.710.
(18) “Medical assistance”  includes any care or services for any individual who is a patient in
a medical  institution or any care or services for any individual who has attained 65 years of age
or is under 22 years of age, and who is a patient in a  private or public institution for mental dis-
eases. Except as provided in ORS 411.439 and 411.447, “medical assistance” does not include  care
or services for a resident of a nonmedical public institution.
(19) “Patient centered primary care home” means a health  care team or clinic that is organized
in accordance with the standards established by the Oregon  Health Authority under ORS 414.655
and that incorporates the following core attributes:
(a) Access to care;
(b) Accountability to consumers and to the community;
(c) Comprehensive whole person care;
(d) Continuity of care;
(e) Coordination and integration of care; and
(f) Person and family centered care.
(20) “Peer support specialist” means any  of the following individuals who meet qualification
criteria adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and  who provide supportive services to a cur-
rent or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment:
(a) An individual who is a current or former consumer of mental health treatment; or
(b) An individual who is in recovery, as defined by the Oregon Health Authority by rule, from
an addiction disorder.
(21) “Peer wellness specialist” means an  individual who meets qualification criteria adopted by
the authority under ORS 414.665 and who is responsible for assessing  mental health and substance
use disorder service and support needs of a member of a coordinated care organization through
community outreach, assisting members  with access to available services and resources, addressing
barriers to services and providing education and information about available resources for  individ-
uals with mental health  or substance use disorders in order to reduce stigma and discrimination
[13]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
toward consumers of mental health and substance use disorder services and to assist  the member
in creating and maintaining recovery, health and wellness.
(22) “Person centered care” means care that:
(a) Reflects the individual patient’s strengths and preferences;
(b) Reflects the clinical needs  of the patient as identified through an individualized assessment;
and
(c) Is based upon the patient’s goals and will assist the patient in achieving the goals.
(23) “Personal health navigator” means an individual who meets qualification criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who  provides information, assistance, tools and support to
enable a patient to make the  best health care decisions in the patient’s particular circumstances and
in light of the patient’s needs, lifestyle, combination of conditions and desired outcomes.
[(24) “Prepaid managed care health  services organization” means a managed dental care, mental
health or chemical dependency organization that contracts with  the authority under ORS 414.654 or
with a coordinated care organization on a prepaid capitated basis to provide health services to  medical
assistance recipients.]
[(25)] (24)  “Quality measure” means  [ the health outcome and quality measures and benchmarks
identified by the Health Plan Quality Metrics  Committee and the metrics and scoring subcommittee ] a
standard for measuring the performance of a coordinated care  organization or health care
provider in the provision of care and services, including, but not limited to, the quality
measures established by the Health Equity Quality Metrics Committee  in accordance with ORS
413.017 (4) [ and 414.638] and the quality metrics developed by the Behavioral Health Committee in
accordance with ORS 413.017 (5).
[(26)] (25) “Resources” has the meaning given that term in ORS  411.704. For eligibility purposes,
“resources” does not  include charitable contributions raised by a community to assist with medical
expenses.
[(27)] (26)  “Tribal traditional health worker” means an individual who meets  qualification cri-
teria adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in a tribal community or an urban Indian community, either for pay or as a volunteer
in association with a local health care system;
(c) To the extent practicable, shares ethnicity, language, socioeconomic status and life  experi-
ences with the residents of the community the worker serves;
(d) Assists members of the community to improve their health, including physical, behavioral and
oral health, and increases the capacity  of the community to meet the health care needs of its resi-
dents and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides  health education and information that is culturally appropriate to the individuals
being served;
(f) Assists community residents in receiving the care they need;
(g) May give peer counseling and guidance on health behaviors; and
(h) May provide direct services, such as tribal-based practices.
[(28)(a)] (27)  “Youth support specialist” means an individual who meets qualification criteria
adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and  who, based on a similar life experience, provides
supportive services to an individual who:
(A) Is not older than 30 years of age; and
(B)(i) Is a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment; or
[14]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(ii) Is  facing or has faced difficulties in accessing education, health and wellness services due
to a mental health or behavioral health barrier.
(b) A “youth support specialist” may be a peer wellness specialist or a peer support specialist.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 414.025, as amended by section 2, chapter 628, Oregon Laws 2021,  is amended
to read:
414.025. As used in this chapter and ORS chapters 411 and 413,  unless the context or a specially
applicable statutory definition requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Alternative payment methodology” means a  payment other than a fee-for-services pay-
ment, used by coordinated care organizations as compensation for the provision of integrated  and
coordinated health care and services.
(b) “Alternative payment methodology” includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Shared savings arrangements;
(B) Bundled payments; and
(C) Payments based on episodes.
(2) “Behavioral health assessment” means an evaluation  by a behavioral health clinician, in
person or using telemedicine, to determine a patient’s need for immediate crisis stabilization.
(3) “Behavioral health clinician” means:
(a) A licensed psychiatrist;
(b) A licensed psychologist;
(c) A licensed nurse practitioner with a specialty in psychiatric mental health;
(d) A licensed clinical social worker;
(e) A licensed professional counselor or licensed marriage and family therapist;
(f) A certified clinical social work associate;
(g) An intern or resident who  is working under a board-approved supervisory contract in a
clinical mental health field; or
(h) Any other clinician whose  authorized scope of practice includes mental health diagnosis and
treatment.
(4) “Behavioral health crisis” means a disruption in an individual’s  mental or emotional stability
or functioning resulting in an urgent need for immediate outpatient treatment  in an emergency de-
partment or admission to a hospital to prevent a serious deterioration in the individual’s  mental or
physical  health.
(5) “Behavioral health home” means a mental health disorder or substance use  disorder treat-
ment organization, as defined by the  Oregon Health Authority by rule, that provides integrated
health care to individuals whose primary diagnoses are mental health disorders or  substance use
disorders.
(6) “Category of aid” means assistance provided by the Oregon Supplemental  Income Program,
aid granted under ORS 411.877 to 411.896 and 412.001 to 412.069  or federal Supplemental Security
Income payments.
(7) “Community health worker” means an individual who meets  qualification criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in an  urban or rural community, either for pay or as a volunteer in association with
a local health care system;
(c) To  the extent practicable, shares ethnicity, language, socioeconomic status and life experi-
ences with the residents of the community the worker serves;
[15]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Assists members of the community to improve their health  and increases the capacity of the
community to meet the health care needs of its residents and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides  health education and information that is culturally appropriate to the individuals
being served;
(f) Assists community residents in receiving the care they need;
(g) May give peer counseling and guidance on health behaviors; and
(h) May provide direct services such as first aid or blood pressure screening.
(8) “Coordinated care organization” means an organization meeting criteria adopted by the
Oregon Health Authority under ORS 414.572.
(9) “Dually eligible for Medicare and Medicaid” means, with respect to eligibility for enrollment
in a  coordinated care organization, that an individual is eligible for health services funded by Title
XIX of the Social Security Act and is:
(a) Eligible for or enrolled in Part A of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act; or
(b) Enrolled in Part B of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act.
(10)(a) “Family support specialist” means an individual who meets  qualification criteria adopted
by the authority  under ORS 414.665 and who provides supportive services to and has experience
parenting a child who:
(A) Is a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment; or
(B) Is facing or  has faced difficulties in accessing education, health and wellness services due
to a mental health or behavioral health barrier.
(b) A “family support specialist” may be a peer wellness specialist or a peer support specialist.
(11) “Global budget” means a total  amount established prospectively by the Oregon Health Au-
thority to be paid to a  coordinated care organization for the delivery of, management of, access to
and quality of the health care delivered to members of the coordinated care organization.
(12) “Health insurance  exchange” or “exchange” means an American Health Benefit Exchange
described in 42 U.S.C. 18031, 18032, 18033 and 18041.
(13) “Health  services” means at least so much of each of the following as are funded by the
Legislative Assembly based upon the prioritized list of health services  compiled by the Health Evi-
dence Review Commission under ORS 414.690:
(a) Services  required by federal law to be included in the [ state’s] medical assistance program
in order for the program to qualify for federal funds;
(b) Services provided by a physician as defined in ORS 677.010, a nurse practitioner  licensed
under ORS 678.375, a behavioral  health clinician or other licensed practitioner within the scope of
the practitioner’s practice as defined by state law, and ambulance services;
(c) Prescription drugs;
(d) Laboratory and X-ray services;
(e) Medical equipment and supplies;
(f) Mental health services;
(g) Chemical dependency services;
(h) Emergency dental services;
(i) Nonemergency dental services;
(j) Provider services, other than services described in paragraphs (a) to (i), (k), (L) and (m)  of
this subsection, defined by  federal law that may be included in the [ state’s] medical assistance pro-
gram;
(k) Emergency hospital services;
[16]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(L) Outpatient hospital services; and
(m) Inpatient hospital services.
(14) “Income” has the meaning given that term in ORS 411.704.
(15)(a) “Integrated health care” means care provided to individuals and their families in  a pa-
tient centered primary care home or behavioral health home by licensed primary care clinicians,
behavioral health clinicians and other care team members, working together to address one or more
of the following:
(A) Mental illness.
(B) Substance use disorders.
(C) Health behaviors that contribute to chronic illness.
(D) Life stressors and crises.
(E) Developmental risks and conditions.
(F) Stress-related physical symptoms.
(G) Preventive care.
(H) Ineffective patterns of health care utilization.
(b) As used in this subsection, “other care team members” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Qualified mental health professionals or  qualified mental health associates meeting require-
ments adopted by the Oregon Health Authority by rule;
(B) Peer wellness specialists;
(C) Peer support specialists;
(D) Community health workers who have completed a state-certified training program;
(E) Personal health navigators; or
(F) Other qualified individuals approved by the Oregon Health Authority.
(16) “Investments and savings” means  cash, securities as defined in ORS 59.015, negotiable in-
struments as defined in ORS 73.0104 and such similar investments or savings  as the department or
the authority may establish by rule  that are available to the applicant or recipient to contribute
toward meeting the needs of the applicant or recipient.
(17) “Medical assistance” means so much of the medical,  mental health, preventive, supportive,
palliative and remedial care and services as may be prescribed by the  authority according to the
standards established pursuant to  ORS 414.065, including premium assistance under ORS 413.610 to
413.613, 414.115 and 414.117, payments made for services provided  under an insurance or other
contractual  arrangement  and money paid directly to the recipient for the purchase of health services
and for services described in ORS 414.710.
(18) “Medical assistance” includes any care or services for any individual who is a  patient in
a medical institution or any care or services for any individual who has attained 65 years of  age
or is under 22 years of age, and  who is a patient in a private or public institution for mental dis-
eases. Except  as provided in ORS 411.439 and 411.447, “medical assistance” does not include care
or services for a resident of a nonmedical public institution.
(19) “Mental health drug” means a  type of legend drug, as defined in ORS 414.325, specified by
the Oregon Health Authority by rule, including but not limited to:
(a) Therapeutic class 7 ataractics-tranquilizers; and
(b) Therapeutic class 11 psychostimulants-antidepressants.
(20) “Patient centered primary care home” means a health  care team or clinic that is organized
in accordance with the standards established by the Oregon  Health Authority under ORS 414.655
and that incorporates the following core attributes:
[17]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Access to care;
(b) Accountability to consumers and to the community;
(c) Comprehensive whole person care;
(d) Continuity of care;
(e) Coordination and integration of care; and
(f) Person and family centered care.
(21) “Peer support specialist” means any  of the following individuals who meet qualification
criteria adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and  who provide supportive services to a cur-
rent or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment:
(a) An individual who is a current or former consumer of mental health treatment; or
(b) An individual who is in recovery, as defined by the Oregon Health Authority by rule, from
an addiction disorder.
(22) “Peer wellness specialist” means an  individual who meets qualification criteria adopted by
the authority under ORS 414.665 and who is responsible for assessing  mental health and substance
use disorder service and support needs of a member of a coordinated care organization through
community outreach, assisting members  with access to available services and resources, addressing
barriers to services and providing education and information about available resources for  individ-
uals with mental health  or substance use disorders in order to reduce stigma and discrimination
toward consumers of mental health and substance use disorder services and to assist  the member
in creating and maintaining recovery, health and wellness.
(23) “Person centered care” means care that:
(a) Reflects the individual patient’s strengths and preferences;
(b) Reflects the clinical needs  of the patient as identified through an individualized assessment;
and
(c) Is based upon the patient’s goals and will assist the patient in achieving the goals.
(24) “Personal health navigator” means an individual who meets qualification criteria adopted
by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who  provides information, assistance, tools and support to
enable a patient to make the  best health care decisions in the patient’s particular circumstances and
in light of the patient’s needs, lifestyle, combination of conditions and desired outcomes.
[(25) “Prepaid managed care health  services organization” means a managed dental care, mental
health or chemical dependency organization that contracts with  the authority under ORS 414.654 or
with a coordinated care organization on a prepaid capitated basis to provide health services to  medical
assistance recipients.]
[(26)] (25)  “Quality measure” means  [ the health outcome and quality measures and benchmarks
identified by the Health Plan Quality Metrics  Committee and the metrics and scoring subcommittee ] a
standard for measuring the performance of a coordinated care  organization or health care
provider in the provision of care and services, including, but not limited to, the quality
measures established by the Health Equity Quality Metrics Committee in accordance with ORS
413.017 (4) [ and 414.638] and the quality metrics developed by the Behavioral Health Committee in
accordance with ORS 413.017 (5).
[(27)] (26) “Resources” has the meaning given that term in ORS  411.704. For eligibility purposes,
“resources” does not  include charitable contributions raised by a community to assist with medical
expenses.
[(28)] (27)  “Tribal traditional health worker” means an individual who meets  qualification cri-
teria adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who:
[18]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in a tribal community or an urban Indian community, either for pay or as a volunteer
in association with a local health care system;
(c) To the extent practicable, shares ethnicity, language, socioeconomic status and life  experi-
ences with the residents of the community the worker serves;
(d) Assists members of the community to improve their health, including physical, behavioral and
oral health, and increases the capacity  of the community to meet the health care needs of its resi-
dents and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides  health education and information that is culturally appropriate to the individuals
being served;
(f) Assists community residents in receiving the care they need;
(g) May give peer counseling and guidance on health behaviors; and
(h) May provide direct services, such as tribal-based practices.
[(29)(a)] (28)(a) “Youth  support specialist” means an individual who meets qualification criteria
adopted by the authority under ORS 414.665 and who,  based on a similar life experience, provides
supportive services to an individual who:
(A) Is not older than 30 years of age; and
(B)(i) Is a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment; or
(ii) Is facing or has faced difficulties in accessing education, health and wellness services  due
to a mental health or behavioral health barrier.
(b) A “youth support specialist” may be a peer wellness specialist or a peer support specialist.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 414.591 is amended to read:
414.591. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall use, to the greatest extent possible,  coordinated
care organizations to provide fully integrated physical health services, chemical dependency  and
mental health services and oral health services. This section, and any contract entered into pur-
suant to this section, does not affect and may  not alter the delivery of Medicaid-funded long term
care services.
(2) The authority shall execute contracts with coordinated  care organizations that meet the
criteria adopted by  the authority under ORS 414.572. Contracts under this subsection are not subject
to ORS chapters 279A and 279B, except ORS 279A.250 to 279A.290 and 279B.235.
(3)(a) The authority shall establish financial reporting requirements for coordinated care organ-
izations, consistent with ORS 415.115 and 731.574, no less  than 90 days before the beginning of the
reporting period. The authority shall prescribe requirements and  procedures for financial reporting
that:
(A) Enable the authority to verify that the coordinated care organization’s capital, surplus, re-
serves and other financial resources are adequate to ensure against the risk of insolvency;
(B) Include information on the three highest executive salary and benefit packages of each co-
ordinated care organization;
(C) Require quarterly reports to be filed with the  authority by May 31, August 31 and November
30;
(D) In addition  to the annual audited financial statement required by ORS 415.115, require an
annual report to be filed with the authority by  April 30 following the end of the period for which
data is reported; and
(E) Align, to  the greatest extent practicable, with the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners’ reporting forms to reduce the administrative costs of coordinated care  organizations
[19]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
that are also regulated by the Department of Consumer and  Business Services or have affiliates that
are regulated by the department.
(b) The authority shall provide information to coordinated care organizations  about the report-
ing standards of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and provide training  on the
reporting standards to the staff of coordinated care organizations who will be responsible for  com-
piling the reports.
(4)(a) The authority shall incorporate  the quality measures established by the Health
Equity Quality Metrics Committee  under ORS 413.017 into coordinated care organization
contracts to  hold the coordinated care organizations accountable for performance and cus-
tomer satisfaction requirements. The authority shall notify each coordinated  care organiza-
tion of any changes in the quality measures at least three months before  the beginning of
the contract period during which the new quality measures will be in place.
(b) The authority shall hold coordinated care organizations, contractors and providers account-
able for  timely submission of [ outcome and quality ] data  on quality measures and other data
prescribed by the authority by rule , including  but not limited to data described in ORS 442.373[ ,
prescribed by the authority by rule ].
(c) The authority may encourage compliance with quality  measures and data reporting
standards by withholding a percentage of each coordinated care organization’s  monthly
global payment during a calendar year and paying all  or a portion of the amount withheld
to the coordinated care organization  in the following year based on the coordinated care
organization’s compliance  with quality measures and data reporting standards. The with-
holdings and payments are not subject to the Oregon Department of Administrative Service’s
guidance on accounting and financial reporting for the withholding  of state payments or
distributions from nonstate entities as set forth in the Oregon Accounting Manual.
(5) The authority shall require compliance with the  provisions of subsections (3) and (4) of this
section as a  condition of entering into a contract with a coordinated care organization. A coordi-
nated care organization, contractor or provider that fails to comply with subsection (3) or (4) of  this
section may be subject to sanctions, including but not limited  to civil penalties, barring any new
enrollment in the coordinated care organization and termination of the contract.
(6)(a) The authority shall adopt rules and procedures to ensure that  if a rural health clinic
provides a health service  to a member of a coordinated care organization, and the rural health clinic
is not participating in the member’s coordinated care organization, the rural health clinic  receives
total aggregate payments from the member’s coordinated  care organization, other payers on the
claim and the authority that are no less than the  amount the rural health clinic would receive in
the authority’s fee-for-service payment system. The  authority shall issue a payment to the rural
health clinic in accordance with this subsection within 45 days of receipt by the authority of  a
completed billing form.
(b) “Rural health clinic,” as used in this subsection, shall be defined by the authority by rule
and shall conform,  as far as practicable or applicable in this state, to the definition of that term in
42 U.S.C. 1395x(aa)(2).
(7) The authority may  contract with providers other than coordinated care organizations to
provide integrated and coordinated health care in areas that are not served by a  coordinated care
organization or where the organization’s provider  network is inadequate. Contracts authorized by
this subsection are not subject to  ORS chapters 279A and 279B, except ORS 279A.250 to 279A.290
and 279B.235.
[20]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(8) The aggregate expenditures by the authority for  health services provided pursuant to this
chapter may not exceed the total dollars appropriated for health services under this chapter.
(9) Actions taken by providers, potential providers, contractors  and bidders in specific accord-
ance with this chapter in  forming consortiums or in otherwise entering into contracts to provide
health care services  shall be performed pursuant to state supervision and shall be considered to be
conducted at the direction of this state, shall be considered to be lawful trade practices and  may
not be considered to be the transaction of insurance for purposes of the Insurance Code.
(10) Health care  providers contracting to provide services under this chapter shall advise a pa-
tient of any service,  treatment or test that is medically necessary but not covered under the con-
tract if an ordinarily careful practitioner in the same or similar community would do  so under the
same or similar circumstances.
(11) A coordinated care organization shall provide information to a  member as prescribed by the
authority by rule, including but not  limited to written information, within 30 days of enrollment with
the coordinated care organization about available providers.
(12) Each coordinated care organization shall work  to provide assistance that is culturally and
linguistically appropriate to the needs of the member to  access appropriate services and participate
in processes affecting the member’s care and services.
(13) Each coordinated care organization shall provide upon the request of a member  or pro-
spective member annual summaries of the organization’s aggregate data regarding:
(a) Grievances and appeals; and
(b) Availability and accessibility of services provided to members.
(14) A coordinated care organization may  not limit enrollment in a geographic area based on the
zip code of a member or prospective member.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 414.686 is amended to read:
414.686. (1)  A coordinated care organization shall provide an initial health assessment on any
child enrolled in the coordinated care organization who is in the custody of  the Department of Hu-
man Services no later than 60 days after the date that the Oregon  Health Authority notifies the
coordinated  care  organization that the child has been taken into the department’s custody. [ The
assessment must be performed in accordance with metrics established by the metrics and  scoring sub-
committee created in ORS 414.638. ]
(2) If a child has not  received an initial health assessment by the date specified in subsection
(1) of this section, the coordinated care organization shall act affirmatively to  locate the child and
make arrangements for an initial health assessment.
SECTION 9.  ORS 417.721 is amended to read:
417.721. The Oregon Health Authority, the [ Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee ] committees
established under ORS 413.017  and the Early Learning  Council shall work collaboratively with
coordinated care organizations [ to develop performance metrics for prenatal  care, delivery and infant
care] on quality measures, as defined in ORS 414.025,  that align with early learning outcomes.
SECTION 10.  Section 2, chapter 575, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended by  section 1, chapter 384,
Oregon Laws 2017, and section 13, chapter 489, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Carrier” means an insurer that offers a health benefit plan, as defined in ORS 743B.005.
(b) “Coordinated care organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(c) “Primary care” means family  medicine, general internal medicine, naturopathic medicine,
obstetrics and gynecology, pediatrics or general psychiatry.
[21]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) “Primary care provider” includes:
(A) A physician, naturopath, nurse practitioner, physician assistant or  other health professional
licensed or certified in this state, whose clinical practice is in the area of primary care.
(B) A health care team or clinic that has been certified by  the Oregon Health Authority as a
patient centered primary care home.
(2)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall convene a primary care payment reform  collaborative
to advise and assist in the implementation of a Primary Care Transformation Initiative to:
(A) Use value-based payment methods that are not paid on a per claim basis to:
(i) Increase the investment in primary care;
(ii) Align primary care reimbursement by all purchasers of care; and
(iii) Continue to improve reimbursement methods, including by investing  in the social determi-
nants of health;
(B) Increase investment in primary care without increasing  costs to consumers or increasing the
total cost of health care;
(C) Provide technical assistance to clinics and payers in implementing the initiative;
(D) Aggregate the data from and align the metrics  used in the initiative with the work of the
[Health Plan Quality Metrics ] Health Equity Quality  Metrics  Committee established in ORS
413.017;
(E) Facilitate the integration of primary care behavioral and physical health care; and
(F) Ensure that the goals of the initiative are met by December 31, 2027.
(b) The collaborative is a governing body, as defined in ORS 192.610.
(3) The authority shall invite representatives from all of the following  to participate in the pri-
mary care payment reform collaborative:
(a) Primary care providers;
(b) Health care consumers;
(c) Experts in primary care contracting and reimbursement;
(d) Independent practice associations;
(e) Behavioral health treatment providers;
(f) Third party administrators;
(g) Employers that offer self-insured health benefit plans;
(h) The Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(i) Carriers;
(j) A statewide organization for mental health professionals who provide primary care;
(k) A statewide organization representing federally qualified health centers;
(L) A statewide organization representing hospitals and health systems;
(m) A statewide professional association for family physicians;
(n) A statewide professional association for physicians;
(o) A statewide professional association for nurses; and
(p) The Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(4) The primary care payment reform collaborative shall annually report to the Oregon  Health
Policy Board and to the Legislative Assembly on the achievement of the primary  care spending
targets in ORS [ 414.625] 414.572 and  743.010 and the implementation of the Primary Care Transfor-
mation Initiative.
(5) A coordinated care organization shall report to the authority, no later than October 1 of
each year, the proportion of the organization’s total medical costs  that are allocated to primary
[22]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
care.
(6) The authority, in collaboration with the Department of Consumer  and Business Services,
shall adopt rules prescribing the primary care services for which costs  must be reported under
subsection (5) of this section.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 413.011 is amended to read:
413.011. (1) The duties of the Oregon Health Policy Board are to:
(a) Be the policy-making and  oversight body for the Oregon Health Authority established in ORS
413.032 and all of the authority’s departmental divisions.
(b) Develop and  submit a plan to the Legislative Assembly to provide and fund access to af-
fordable, quality health care for all Oregonians.
(c) Develop a program to provide health insurance premium assistance to all low  and moderate
income individuals who are legal residents of Oregon.
(d) Publish [ health outcome and ] quality measure data  collected by the Oregon Health Authority
at aggregate  levels that do not disclose information otherwise protected by law. The information
published must report, for each coordinated care organization and each health  benefit plan sold
through the health insurance exchange or offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit  Board or the
Public Employees’ Benefit Board:
(A) Quality measures;
(B) Costs;
(C) Health outcomes; and
(D) Other information that is necessary for members of the public to evaluate the value of health
services delivered by each coordinated care organization and by each health benefit plan.
(e) Establish evidence-based clinical standards and practice  guidelines that may be used by
providers.
(f) Approve and monitor  community-centered health initiatives described in ORS 413.032 (1)(h)
that are consistent with public health goals, strategies, programs and  performance standards
adopted by the Oregon Health Policy Board to improve the  health of all Oregonians, and to regu-
larly report to the Legislative Assembly on the accomplishments and needed changes  to the initi-
atives.
(g) Establish cost containment mechanisms to reduce health care costs.
(h) Ensure that Oregon’s health care workforce is sufficient  in numbers and training to meet the
demand that will be created by the expansion  in health coverage, health care system transforma-
tions, an increasingly diverse population and an aging workforce.
(i) Work with the Oregon  congressional delegation to advance the adoption of changes in federal
law or policy to promote Oregon’s comprehensive health reform plan.
(j) Establish a health benefit package in accordance with ORS  741.340 to be used as the baseline
for all health benefit plans offered through the health insurance exchange.
(k) Investigate and report annually to the Legislative Assembly on the feasibility  and advis-
ability of future changes to the health insurance market in Oregon,  including but not limited to the
following:
(A) A requirement for every resident to have health insurance coverage.
(B) A payroll tax as a means to encourage employers to continue providing  health insurance to
their employees.
(L) Meet cost-containment goals by  structuring reimbursement rates to reward comprehensive
management of diseases,  quality outcomes and the efficient use of resources by promoting cost-
[23]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
effective procedures, services  and programs including, without limitation, preventive health, dental
and primary care services, web-based office visits,  telephone consultations and telemedicine consul-
tations.
(m) Oversee the expenditure  of moneys from the Health Care Provider Incentive Fund to support
grants to primary care providers and rural health practitioners,  to increase the number of primary
care educators and to support efforts to create and develop career ladder opportunities.
(n) Work with the Public Health Benefit Purchasers Committee, administrators of the  medical
assistance program and  the Department of Corrections to identify uniform contracting standards for
health benefit plans that  achieve maximum quality and cost outcomes and align the contracting
standards for all state programs to the greatest extent practicable.
(o) Work with the  Health Information Technology Oversight Council to foster health information
technology systems and practices that promote the  Oregon Integrated and Coordinated Health Care
Delivery System established by ORS 414.570 and  align health information technology systems and
practices across this state.
(2) The Oregon Health Policy Board is authorized to:
(a) Subject to the approval of the Governor, organize and  reorganize the authority as the board
considers necessary to properly conduct the work of the authority.
(b) Submit directly to the Legislative Counsel,  no later than October 1 of each even-numbered
year, requests for measures necessary to provide statutory authorization to carry out  any of the
board’s duties or to implement any of the board’s recommendations. The  measures may be filed prior
to the beginning of the legislative session in accordance with the  rules of the House of Represen-
tatives and the Senate.
(3) If the board or  the authority is unable to perform, in whole or in part, any of the duties
described  in ORS 413.006 to 413.042 and 741.340 without federal approval, the authority is authorized
to request,  in accordance with ORS 413.072, waivers or other approval necessary to perform those
duties. The authority shall implement any portions of  those duties not requiring legislative authority
or federal approval, to the extent practicable.
(4) The enumeration of duties, functions and powers in this section is not  intended to be exclu-
sive nor to limit the duties, functions and powers imposed on the board by ORS 413.006  to 413.042
and 741.340 and by other statutes.
(5) The board shall consult with the Department of Consumer and  Business Services in com-
pleting the tasks set forth in subsection (1)(j) and (k)(A) of this section.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 243.135, as amended by section 16, chapter 489, Oregon  Laws 2017, section
12, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2019, and section 2, chapter 484, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended  to read:
243.135. (1) Notwithstanding any other benefit plan contracted for and offered by the  Public
Employees’ Benefit Board, the board  shall contract for a health benefit plan or plans best designed
to meet the needs and  provide for the welfare of eligible employees, the state and the local gov-
ernments. In considering whether to enter into a contract for a plan, the board shall place  emphasis
on:
(a) Employee choice among high quality plans;
(b) A competitive marketplace;
(c) Plan performance and information;
(d) Employer flexibility in plan design and contracting;
(e) Quality customer service;
(f) Creativity and innovation;
[24]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(g) Plan benefits as part of total employee compensation;
(h) The improvement of employee health; and
(i) [Health outcome and ] Quality measures, [ described in ] established under ORS 413.017 (4), that
are reported by the plan.
(2) The board may approve  more than one carrier for each type of plan contracted for and of-
fered but the number of carriers shall be held  to a number consistent with adequate service to eli-
gible employees and their family members.
(3) Where appropriate for a contracted and offered health benefit plan,  the board shall provide
options under which an eligible  employee may arrange coverage for family members. The board shall
impose a surcharge in an amount determined by the board  on an eligible employee who arranges
coverage for the employee’s spouse or dependent under this  subsection if the spouse or dependent
has access to medical coverage as an employee in another health  benefit plan offered by the board
or the Oregon Educators Benefit Board.
(4) Payroll deductions for costs that are not payable by the state  or a local government may be
made upon receipt of a signed authorization from the  employee indicating an election to participate
in the plan or plans selected and the deduction of a certain sum from the employee’s pay.
(5) In developing any health benefit plan, the board may provide an  option of additional cover-
age for eligible employees and their family members at an additional cost or premium.
(6) Transfer of enrollment from one plan to another shall  be open to all eligible employees and
their family members under rules adopted by  the board. Because of the special problems that may
arise in individual instances  under comprehensive group practice plan coverage involving acceptable
provider-patient relations between a particular panel of providers  and particular eligible employees
and their family members, the board shall provide a procedure under  which any eligible employee
may apply at any time to substitute a  health service benefit plan for participation in a comprehen-
sive group practice benefit plan.
(7) The board shall evaluate a benefit plan that serves a limited geographic region of this  state
according to the criteria described in subsection (1) of this section.
(8)(a) The board shall  use payment methodologies in self-insured health benefit plans offered by
the board that are designed to limit the  growth in per-member expenditures for health services to
no more than 3.4 percent per year. The  assessment paid in accordance with section 3, chapter 538,
Oregon Laws 2017, shall be excluded in determining the 3.4 percent  annual increase in per-member
expenditures for health services.
(b) The board shall adopt policies and practices designed to  limit the annual increase in pre-
mium amounts paid for contracted health benefit plans to 3.4 percent.
(9) As frequently as is recommended as a  commercial best practice by consultants engaged by
the board, the board shall conduct an audit of the health benefit plan enrollees’ continued  eligibility
for coverage as spouses or dependents or any other basis that would  affect the cost of the premium
for the plan.
(10) If the  board spends less than 12 percent of its total medical expenditures in self-insured
health benefit plans on payments for primary care, the board  shall implement a plan for increasing
the percentage of total medical expenditures spent on payments for primary  care by at least one
percent each year.
(11) No later than February 1 of  each year, the board shall report to the Legislative Assembly
on any plan implemented under subsection (10) of  this section and on the board’s progress toward
achieving the target of spending at least 12 percent  of total medical expenditures in self-insured
[25]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
health benefit plans on payments for primary care.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 243.866, as amended by  section 17, chapter 489, Oregon Laws 2017, and
section 4, chapter 484, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
243.866. (1) The Oregon Educators Benefit Board shall contract for benefit plans best designed
to meet the needs and provide for the welfare of eligible  employees, the districts and local govern-
ments. In considering whether to enter into a contract for a benefit plan, the board shall place  em-
phasis on:
(a) Employee choice among high-quality plans;
(b) Encouragement of a competitive marketplace;
(c) Plan performance and information;
(d) District and local government flexibility in plan design and contracting;
(e) Quality customer service;
(f) Creativity and innovation;
(g) Plan benefits as part of total employee compensation;
(h) Improvement of employee health; and
(i) [Health outcome and ] Quality measures, [ described in ] established under ORS 413.017 (4), that
are reported by the plan.
(2) The board may approve  more than one carrier for each type of benefit plan offered, but the
board shall limit the number of carriers to  a number consistent with adequate service to eligible
employees and family members. The board shall impose a surcharge in an amount determined by  the
board on an eligible employee  who arranges coverage for the employee’s spouse or dependent under
this subsection if the spouse or dependent  has access to medical coverage as an employee in another
health benefit plan offered by the board or the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(3) When appropriate, the board shall  provide options under which an eligible employee may
arrange coverage for family members under a benefit plan.
(4) A district or a local government shall provide that payroll deductions  for benefit plan costs
that are not payable by the district or local government  may be made upon receipt of a signed au-
thorization from the employee indicating an election to participate in the benefit plan  or plans se-
lected and allowing the deduction of those costs from the employee’s pay.
(5) In developing any benefit  plan, the board may provide an option of additional coverage for
eligible employees and family members at an additional premium.
(6) The board shall adopt rules providing that transfer of enrollment from one benefit plan to
another is open to all  eligible employees and family members. Because of the special problems that
may arise involving acceptable provider-patient relations between a  particular panel of providers
and a particular eligible employee or family member under a comprehensive  group practice benefit
plan, the board shall provide a procedure under which any  eligible employee may apply at any time
to substitute another benefit plan for participation in a comprehensive group practice benefit plan.
(7) An eligible employee who is retired is not required to participate in a  health benefit plan
offered under this section in order to obtain dental benefit plan coverage.  The board shall establish
by rule standards of eligibility for retired employees to participate in a dental benefit plan.
(8) The board shall evaluate a benefit plan that serves a limited geographic region of this  state
according to the criteria described in subsection (1) of this section.
(9)(a) The board shall  use payment methodologies in self-insured health benefit plans offered by
the board that are designed to limit the  growth in per-member expenditures for health services to
no more than 3.4 percent per year.
[26]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The board shall adopt policies and practices designed to  limit the annual increase in pre-
mium amounts paid for contracted health benefit plans to 3.4 percent.
(10) As frequently as is recommended as a commercial best  practice by consultants engaged by
the board, the board shall conduct an audit of the health benefit plan enrollees’ continued  eligibility
for coverage as spouses or dependents or any other basis that would  affect the cost of the premium
for the plan.
(11) If the  board spends less than 12 percent of its total medical expenditures in self-insured
health benefit plans on payments for primary care, the board  shall implement a plan for increasing
the percentage of total medical expenditures spent on payments for primary  care by at least one
percent each year.
(12) No later than February 1 of  each year, the board shall report to the Legislative Assembly
on any plan implemented under subsection (11) of  this section and on the board’s progress toward
achieving the target of spending at least 12 percent of total medical expenditures on payments  for
primary care.
DISCONTINUANCE OF STAND-ALONE PREPAID
MANAGED CARE HEALTH SERVICES ORGANIZATIONS
SECTION 14.
 ORS 743B.470 is amended to read:
743B.470. (1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) “Health insurer” or “insurer” means an employee benefit plan, self-insured plan, managed
care organization or group health plan, a third party administrator, fiscal intermediary or pharmacy
benefit manager of the plan or organization, or other party that is  by statute, contract or agreement
legally responsible for payment of a claim for a health care item or service.
[(b) “Medicaid” means medical assistance provided under 42 U.S.C. 1396a (section 1902 of the  So-
cial Security Act). ]
(b) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(c) “State  Medicaid agency” means a state agency responsible for administering Medicaid
under 42 U.S.C. 1396a (section 1902 of the Social Security Act).
(2) A health insurer is prohibited from considering  the availability or eligibility for medical as-
sistance in this or any other  state [ under Medicaid ] when considering eligibility for coverage or
making payments under its group or  individual plan for eligible enrollees, subscribers, policyholders
or certificate holders.
(3) To the extent that payment for covered expenses has been made under the [ state Medicaid ]
medical assistance  program for health care items or services furnished to an individual,  in any
case when a third party has a legal liability to make  payments, the state is considered to have ac-
quired the rights of  the individual to payment by any other party for those health care items or
services.
(4) An insurer may not deny a claim submitted by  the state Medicaid agency[ , a prepaid man-
aged care health services organization,  as defined in ORS 414.025, ] or a coordinated care organiza-
tion, as defined in ORS 414.025, under subsection (3) of  this section based on the date of submission
of the claim,  the type or format of the claim form or a failure to present proper documentation at
the point of sale that is the basis of the claim if:
(a) The claim is submitted by the agency[ , the prepaid managed care health services
organization] or the coordinated care organization within the three-year  period beginning on the
[27]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
date on which the health care item or service was furnished; and
(b) Any action by the agency[ , the prepaid managed care health services organization ] or  the co-
ordinated care  organization to enforce its rights with respect to the claim is commenced within six
years of the agency’s or organization’s submission of the claim.
(5) An insurer must provide to the state Medicaid  agency[ , a prepaid managed care health ser-
vices organization ] or a coordinated care organization, upon request, the following information:
(a) The period during which a [ Medicaid] medical assistance  recipient, the  spouse or depen-
dents may be or may have been covered by the plan;
(b) The nature of coverage that is or was provided by the plan; and
(c) The name, address and identifying numbers of the plan.
(6) An insurer may not deny  enrollment of a child under the group or individual health plan of
the child’s parent on the ground that:
(a) The child was born out of wedlock;
(b) The child is not claimed as a dependent on the parent’s federal tax return; or
(c) The child does not reside with the child’s parent or in the insurer’s service area.
(7) When a child has group  or individual health coverage through an insurer of a noncustodial
parent, the insurer must:
(a) Provide such information  to the custodial parent as may be necessary for the child to obtain
benefits through that coverage;
(b) Permit the custodial parent or the provider, with the custodial  parent’s approval, to submit
claims for covered services without the approval of the noncustodial parent; and
(c) Make payments on claims submitted in  accordance with paragraph (b) of this subsection di-
rectly to the custodial parent, the provider  or, if a claim is filed by the state Medicaid agency[ , a
prepaid managed care health services organization ] or a coordinated care organization, directly to the
agency or the organization.
(8) When a parent is required by a court  or administrative order to provide health coverage for
a child, and the parent is eligible for family health coverage, the insurer must:
(a) Permit the parent to enroll, under the family coverage, a child who is otherwise eligible  for
the coverage without regard to any enrollment season restrictions;
(b) If the parent is enrolled but fails to make application to obtain coverage for the child, enroll
the child under family coverage upon application of the child’s  other parent, the state [ agency ad-
ministering the Medicaid program ] Medicaid agency or the state agency administering 42 U.S.C.  651
to 669, the child support enforcement program; and
(c) Not disenroll or eliminate  coverage of the child unless the insurer is provided satisfactory
written evidence that:
(A) The court or administrative order is no longer in effect; or
(B) The child is or will be enrolled in comparable  health coverage through another insurer
which will take effect not later than the effective date of disenrollment.
(9) An insurer may not impose requirements on a state agency that has been assigned  the rights
of an individual eligible for medical  assistance [ under Medicaid ] and covered for health benefits from
the insurer if the requirements are different  from requirements applicable to an agent or assignee
of any other individual so covered.
(10) The provisions of ORS 743A.001 do not apply to this section.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 192.395 is amended to read:
192.395. A record of an agency of the  executive department as defined in ORS 174.112 that
[28]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
contains the following information is a  public record subject to inspection under ORS 192.314 and
is not exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.345 or 192.355  except to the extent that the record
discloses information about an individual’s health or is proprietary to a person:
(1) The amounts  determined by an independent actuary retained by the agency to cover the
costs of providing each of the following health services under ORS [ 414.591, 414.631 and 414.688 to
414.745] chapter 414 for the six months preceding the report:
(a) Inpatient hospital services;
(b) Outpatient hospital services;
(c) Laboratory and X-ray services;
(d) Physician and other licensed practitioner services;
(e) Prescription drugs;
(f) Dental services;
(g) Vision services;
(h) Mental health services;
(i) Chemical dependency services;
(j) Durable medical equipment and supplies; and
(k) Other health services provided under a coordinated care organization contract under  ORS
414.591 [or a contract with a prepaid managed care health services organization, as  defined in ORS
414.025];
(2) The amounts the  agency and each contractor have paid under each coordinated care organ-
ization contract under  ORS 414.591 [ or prepaid managed care health services organization contract ]
for administrative costs  and the provision of each of the health services described in subsection (1)
of this section for the six months preceding the report;
(3) Any adjustments made to the amounts reported  under this section to account for geographic
or other differences in providing the health services; and
(4) The numbers of  individuals served under each coordinated care organization contract [ or
prepaid managed care health services organization contract ], listed by category of individual.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 192.579 is amended to read:
192.579. (1)  As used in this section, “entity” means a health care provider[ ,] or a coordinated
care organization, as defined in ORS 414.025 [ or a prepaid managed  care health services organization,
as defined in ORS 414.025 ], that provides health care to an individual, if the  care is paid for by a
state health plan.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 179.505,  an entity may disclose the identity of an individual who re-
ceives health care from the entity without obtaining an authorization from the individual, or  a per-
sonal representative  of the individual, to another entity for the purpose of coordinating the health
care and treatment provided to the individual by either entity.
SECTION 17.  ORS 413.550, as amended by  section 8, chapter 453, Oregon Laws 2021, is
amended to read:
413.550. As used in ORS 413.550 to 413.559:
(1) “Certified health care interpreter” means an individual  who has been approved and certified
by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 413.558.
(2) “Coordinated care organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(3) “Health care” means medical, surgical, oral or hospital care or  any other remedial care re-
cognized by state law, including physical and behavioral health care.
(4)(a) “Health care interpreter” means an individual who is readily able to:
[29]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Communicate in  English and communicate with a person with limited English proficiency
or who communicates in signed language;
(B) Accurately interpret  the oral statements of a person with limited English proficiency, or the
statements of a person who communicates in signed language, into English;
(C) Accurately interpret oral statements in English  to a person with limited English proficiency
or who communicates in signed language;
(D) Sight translate documents from a person with limited English proficiency; and
(E) Interpret the oral statements of other persons into the language of the  person with limited
English proficiency or into signed language.
(b) “Health  care interpreter” also includes an individual who can provide the services described
in paragraph (a) of this subsection using relay or indirect interpretation.
(5) “Health care interpreter registry” means the registry described in ORS 413.558 that is ad-
ministered by the authority.
(6) “Health care provider” means any of the following that  are reimbursed with public funds, in
whole or in part:
(a) An individual licensed or certified by the:
(A) State Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology;
(B) State Board of Chiropractic Examiners;
(C) State Board of Licensed Social Workers;
(D) Oregon Board of Licensed Professional Counselors and Therapists;
(E) Oregon Board of Dentistry;
(F) State Board of Massage Therapists;
(G) Oregon Board of Naturopathic Medicine;
(H) Oregon State Board of Nursing;
(I) Oregon Board of Optometry;
(J) State Board of Pharmacy;
(K) Oregon Medical Board;
(L) Occupational Therapy Licensing Board;
(M) Oregon Board of Physical Therapy;
(N) Oregon Board of Psychology;
(O) Board of Medical Imaging;
(P) State Board of Direct Entry Midwifery;
(Q) Respiratory Therapist and Polysomnographic Technologist Licensing Board;
(R) Board of Registered Polysomnographic Technologists;
(S) Board of Licensed Dietitians; and
(T) State Mortuary and Cemetery Board;
(b) An emergency medical  services provider licensed by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS
682.216;
(c) A clinical laboratory licensed under ORS 438.110;
(d) A health care facility as defined in ORS 442.015;
(e) A home health agency licensed under ORS 443.015;
(f) A hospice program licensed under ORS 443.860; or
(g) Any other  person that provides health care or that bills for or is compensated for health care
provided, in the normal course of business.
(7) “Interpretation service company” means an entity, or  a person acting on behalf of an entity,
[30]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
that is  in the business of arranging for health care interpreters to work with health care providers
in this state.
(8) “Person with limited English proficiency” means a  person who, by reason of place of birth
or culture, communicates in a language other than  English and does not communicate in English
with adequate ability to communicate effectively with a health care provider.
[(9) “Prepaid managed care health  services organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS
414.025.]
[(10)] (9)  “Qualified health care interpreter” means an individual who has been issued a valid
letter of qualification from the authority under ORS 413.558.
[(11)] (10)  “Sight translate” means to translate a written document into spoken or signed  lan-
guage.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 414.430 is amended to read:
414.430. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall prescribe by rule appropriate time frames within
which a pregnant medical assistance recipient whose medical  assistance is reimbursed on a fee-for-
service basis and who needs general or specialty dental care must have the opportunity to  be seen,
or referred for, and provided:
(a) Emergency dental services;
(b) Urgent dental services;
(c) Routine dental services; and
(d) An initial dental screening or examination.
(2) The time frames prescribed by the authority for recipients whose medical assistance is re-
imbursed on a fee-for-service basis shall be the same as  or shorter than the time frames for pregnant
recipients enrolled in coordinated care organizations [ and dental care organizations ].
SECTION 19.
 ORS 414.619 is amended to read:
414.619. (1) The Oregon Health Authority and the Department  of Human Services shall cooper-
ate with each other by coordinating actions and  responsibilities necessary to implement the Oregon
Integrated and Coordinated Health Care Delivery System established in ORS 414.570.
(2) The  authority and the department may delegate to each other any duties, functions or powers
that the authority or department are authorized to perform if necessary  to carry out this section
and ORS 414.572, 414.598, 414.605, 414.607, 414.632, [ 414.638, 414.654,] 414.655 and 414.665.
SECTION 20.  ORS 414.631 is amended to read:
414.631. (1) Except as provided in subsections [ (2), (3), (4) and (5) ] (2) and (3) of this section and
ORS 414.632 (2), a person who is eligible for or receiving health services  must be enrolled in a co-
ordinated care organization to receive the health services for which the person is eligible. For pur-
poses of this subsection, Medicaid-funded long term care services do not constitute health services.
(2) [Subsections (1) and (4) ] Subsection (1) of this section [ do] does not apply to:
(a) A person who is a noncitizen and who is eligible only for labor and delivery  services and
emergency treatment services;
(b) A person who is an American Indian and Alaska Native beneficiary;
(c) An individual described in ORS 414.632 (2) who is  dually eligible for Medicare and Medicaid
and enrolled in a program of all-inclusive care for the elderly; and
(d) A person whom the Oregon Health Authority may by rule exempt from the mandatory en-
rollment requirement of subsection (1) of this section, including but not limited to:
(A) A person who is also eligible for Medicare;
(B) A woman in her third trimester of pregnancy at the time of enrollment;
[31]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) A person under 19 years of age who has been placed  in adoptive or foster care out of state;
(D) A person under 18 years of age who is medically fragile and who has special  health care
needs;
(E) A person receiving services under  the Medically Involved Home-Care Program created by
ORS 417.345 (1); and
(F) A person with major medical coverage.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does  not apply to a person who resides in an area that is not
served by a coordinated care organization or  where the organization’s provider network is inade-
quate.
[(4) In any area that is  not served by a coordinated care organization but is served by a prepaid
managed care  health services organization, a person must enroll with the prepaid managed care health
services organization to receive any of the health services  offered by the prepaid managed care health
services organization. ]
[(5)] (4) As used in this section, “American Indian and Alaska Native beneficiary” means:
(a) A member of a federally recognized Indian tribe;
(b) An individual who resides in an urban center and:
(A) Is a member of a tribe, band or other organized group of Indians, including those tribes,
bands or groups whose recognition was terminated since  1940 and those recognized now or in the
future by the state  in which the member resides, or who is a descendant in the first or second de-
gree of such a member;
(B) Is an Eskimo or Aleut or other Alaska Native; or
(C) Is  determined to be an Indian under regulations promulgated by the United States Secretary
of the Interior;
(c) A person who is considered by  the United States Secretary of the Interior to be an Indian
for any purpose; or
(d) An individual who is considered by the United States  Secretary of Health and Human Ser-
vices to be  an Indian for purposes of eligibility for Indian health care services, including as a
California Indian, Eskimo, Aleut or other Alaska Native.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 414.764 is amended to read:
414.764. (1) The Oregon Health Authority may reimburse a  pharmacist or pharmacy for any
health service:
(a) Provided to a medical assistance recipient who is  not enrolled in a coordinated care organ-
ization [ or a prepaid managed care health services organization ];
(b) That is within the lawful scope of practice of a pharmacist; and
(c) If the authority determines the service is within the types and extent  of health care and
services to be provided to medical assistance recipients under ORS 414.065.
(2) A  coordinated care organization may reimburse a pharmacist or pharmacy for any health
service:
(a) Provided to a  medical assistance recipient who is enrolled in the coordinated care organ-
ization [ or a prepaid managed care health services organization ] that enters into a clinical pharmacy
agreement with the pharmacist or pharmacy; and
(b) That is within the lawful scope of practice of a pharmacist.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 414.880 is amended to read:
414.880. (1) As used in this section and ORS 414.882 and 414.902:
[(a) “Managed care organization” means: ]
[32]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(A) A coordinated care organization as defined in ORS 414.025; and ]
[(B) A prepaid managed care health services organization as defined in ORS 414.025. ]
(a) “Coordinated care organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(b) “Premium equivalent” means the payments made to [ the managed ] a coordinated  care or-
ganization by the Oregon Health Authority for providing health services under ORS chapter 414.
(2) No later than 45 days following the end of a  calendar quarter, a [ managed] coordinated care
organization shall pay an assessment at a  rate of two percent of the gross amount of premium
equivalents received during that calendar quarter.
(3) The assessment shall be paid to the authority in a manner and form  prescribed by the au-
thority.
(4) Assessments received by the authority under this section shall be paid into the State Treas-
ury and credited to the Health System Fund established under section 2, chapter 538, Oregon  Laws
2017.
(5) The assessment imposed under this section  is in addition to and not in lieu of any tax, sur-
charge or other assessment imposed on a [ managed] coordinated care organization.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 414.902 is amended to read:
414.902. (1) If a [ managed] coordinated care organization  fails to timely pay an assessment un-
der ORS 414.880, the Oregon Health Authority shall impose  a penalty on the [ managed] coordinated
care organization of up to $500 per day of delinquency. The total amount of  penalties imposed under
this section for a calendar quarter may not  exceed five percent of the assessment due for that cal-
endar quarter.
(2) Any penalty imposed under this section is in addition to and  not in lieu of the assessment
imposed under ORS 414.880.
(3) Penalties received by the authority under this section  shall be paid into the State Treasury
and credited to the Health System Fund  established under section 2, chapter 538, Oregon Laws 2017.
SECTION 24.  ORS 415.500 is amended to read:
415.500. As used in this section and ORS 415.501 and 415.505:
(1) “Corporate affiliation” has  the meaning prescribed by the Oregon Health Authority by rule,
including:
(a) Any relationship between two organizations that reflects, directly or  indirectly, a partial or
complete controlling interest or partial or complete corporate control; and
(b) Transactions that merge tax identification numbers or corporate governance.
(2) “Essential services” means:
(a) Services that are funded on the prioritized list described in ORS 414.690; and
(b) Services that are essential to achieve health equity.
(3) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(4)(a) “Health care entity” includes:
(A) An individual health professional licensed or certified in this state;
(B) A hospital, as  defined in ORS 442.015, or hospital system, as defined by the authority by rule;
(C) A carrier, as defined in ORS 743B.005, that offers a health benefit plan in this state;
(D) A Medicare Advantage plan;
(E) A coordinated care organization [ or a  prepaid managed care health services organization, as
both terms are ], as  defined in ORS 414.025; and
(F) Any other entity that has as  a primary function the provision of health care items or ser-
vices or that is a parent organization of, or is an entity closely related to, an entity  that has as a
[33]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
primary function the provision of health care items or services.
(b) “Health care entity” does not include:
(A) Long term care facilities, as defined in ORS 442.015.
(B) Facilities licensed and operated under ORS 443.400 to 443.455.
(5) “Health equity” has  the meaning prescribed by the Oregon Health Policy Board and adopted
by the authority by rule.
(6)(a) “Material change transaction” means:
(A) A transaction in which at least one party had average revenue of $25 million or more  in the
preceding three fiscal years and another party:
(i) Had an average revenue of at least $10 million in the preceding three fiscal years; or
(ii) In the case of a new entity, is projected to have at least  $10 million in revenue in the first
full year of operation at normal levels of  utilization or operation as prescribed by the authority by
rule.
(B) If a transaction involves a health care entity in this state and an out-of-state entity, a
transaction that otherwise qualifies as a material change transaction under this paragraph  that may
result in increases in the price of health care or limit access to health care services in this state.
(b) “Material change transaction” does not include:
(A) A clinical affiliation of health  care entities formed for the purpose of collaborating on clin-
ical trials or graduate medical education programs.
(B) A medical services contract or an extension of a medical services contract.
(C) An affiliation that:
(i) Does not impact the corporate leadership, governance or control of an entity; and
(ii) Is necessary, as prescribed by the  authority by rule, to adopt advanced value-based payment
methodologies to meet the health care cost growth targets under ORS 442.386.
(D) Contracts  under which one health care entity, for and on behalf of a second health care
entity, provides patient care  and services or provides administrative services relating to, supporting
or facilitating the provision of patient care and services, if the second health care entity:
(i) Maintains responsibility, oversight and control over the patient care and services; and
(ii) Bills and receives reimbursement for the patient care and services.
(E) Transactions in which  a participant that is a health center as defined in 42 U.S.C. 254b,
while meeting  all of the participant’s obligations, acquires, affiliates with, partners with or enters
into any agreement with another entity unless the transaction would  result in the participant no
longer qualifying as a health center under 42 U.S.C. 254b.
(7)(a) “Medical services contract”  means a contract to provide medical or mental health services
entered into by:
(A) A carrier and an independent practice association;
(B) A carrier, coordinated care organization, independent practice association  or network of
providers and one or more providers, as defined in ORS 743B.001;
(C) An independent practice association and an  individual health professional or an organization
of health care providers;
(D) Medical, dental, vision or mental health clinics; or
(E) A medical,  dental, vision or mental health clinic and an individual health professional to
provide medical, dental, vision or mental health services.
(b) “Medical services contract” does not include a contract  of employment or a contract creat-
ing a legal entity and ownership  of the legal entity that is authorized under ORS chapter 58, 60 or
[34]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
70 or under any other law authorizing the  creation of a professional organization similar to those
authorized by ORS chapter 58, 60 or 70, as may be prescribed by the authority by rule.
(8) “Net patient revenue” means  the total amount of revenue, after allowance for contractual
amounts, charity care and bad debt, received for patient care and services, including:
(a) Value-based payments;
(b) Incentive payments;
(c) Capitation payments or payments under any similar contractual arrangement  for the pre-
payment or reimbursement of patient care and services; and
(d) Any payment received by a hospital to reimburse a hospital assessment under ORS 414.855.
(9) “Revenue” means:
(a) Net patient revenue; or
(b) The gross amount of premiums  received by a health care entity that are derived from health
benefit plans.
(10) “Transaction” means:
(a) A merger of a health care entity with another entity;
(b) An acquisition of one or more health care entities by another entity;
(c) New contracts, new clinical  affiliations and new contracting affiliations that will eliminate
or significantly reduce, as defined by the authority by rule, essential services;
(d) A corporate affiliation involving at least one health care entity; or
(e) Transactions  to form a new partnership, joint venture, accountable care organization, parent
organization or management services organization, as prescribed by the authority by rule.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 416.510 is amended to read:
416.510. As used in ORS 416.510 to 416.610, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Action” means an action, suit or proceeding.
(2) “Alternative payment methodology” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(3) “Applicant” means an applicant for assistance.
(4) “Assistance” means moneys paid  by the Department of Human Services to persons directly
and moneys paid by the Oregon Health Authority  [ or by a prepaid managed care health services or-
ganization] or  by a coordinated care organization for services  provided under contract pursuant to
ORS 414.591 to others for the benefit of such persons.
(5) “Authority” means the Oregon Health Authority.
(6) “Claim” means a claim of a recipient of assistance for damages for  personal injuries against
any person or public body, agency or commission  other than the State Accident Insurance Fund
Corporation or Workers’ Compensation Board.
(7) “Compromise” means a  compromise between a recipient and any person or public body,
agency or commission against whom the recipient has a claim.
(8) “Coordinated care organization” means an organization that meets the criteria adopted  by
the authority under ORS 414.572.
(9) “Judgment” means a judgment  in any action or proceeding brought by a recipient to enforce
the claim of the recipient.
[(10) “Prepaid managed  care health services organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS
414.025.]
[(11)] (10) “Recipient” means a recipient of assistance.
[(12)] (11) “Settlement” means a settlement  between a recipient and any person or public body,
agency or commission against whom the recipient has a claim.
[35]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 26.
 ORS 416.540 is amended to read:
416.540. (1) Except as provided in subsection  (2) of this section and in ORS 416.590, the De-
partment of Human Services and the Oregon Health Authority shall have a lien upon  the amount
of any judgment in favor of a recipient or amount payable to the recipient under a  settlement or
compromise for all assistance received  by such recipient from the date of the injury of the recipient
to the date of satisfaction of such judgment or payment under such settlement or compromise.
(2) The lien  does not attach to the amount of any judgment, settlement or compromise to the
extent of attorney’s fees, costs and expenses incurred by a recipient in securing such  judgment,
settlement or compromise and to the extent of medical, surgical and hospital expenses incurred  by
the recipient on account of the personal injuries for which the recipient had a claim.
(3) The authority may assign the lien described in subsection (1) of  this section to a [ prepaid
managed care health services organization  or a ] coordinated care organization for medical costs in-
curred by a recipient:
(a) During a period for which the authority paid a capitation or enrollment fee  or a payment
using a global payment methodology; and
(b) On account of the personal injury for which the recipient had a claim.
(4) A [ prepaid managed care health services organization or a ] coordinated care organization  to
which the authority has assigned a lien shall notify the authority no later  than 10 days after filing
notice of a lien.
(5) For the purposes of ORS 416.510  to 416.610, the authority may designate the [ prepaid man-
aged care health services organization or the ] coordinated  care organization to which a lien is as-
signed as its designee.
(6) If the authority and a [ prepaid managed care health services  organization or a ] coordinated
care organization both have filed a lien, the authority’s lien shall be satisfied first.
SECTION 27.
 ORS 646.639 is amended to read:
646.639. (1) As used in this section and ORS 646A.670:
(a) “Charged-off debt” means a debt that  a creditor treats as a loss or expense and not as an
asset.
(b) “Consumer” means a natural person who purchases or  acquires property, services or credit
for personal, family or household purposes.
(c) “Consumer transaction” means a transaction between a  consumer and a person that sells,
leases or provides property, services or credit to consumers.
(d) “Credit” means a right that a creditor grants to a consumer to defer  payment of a debt, to
incur a debt and defer payment of the debt, or to purchase  or acquire property or services and defer
payment for the property or services.
(e) “Creditor” means a person that, in  the ordinary course of the person’s business, engages in
consumer transactions that result in a consumer owing a debt to the person.
(f) “Debt” means an obligation or alleged obligation that arises out of a consumer transaction.
(g)(A) “Debt buyer” means a person  that regularly engages in the business of purchasing
charged-off debt for the purpose  of collecting the charged-off debt or hiring another person to collect
or bring legal action to collect the charged-off debt.
(B) “Debt buyer” does not include a person that acquires charged-off debt as an  incidental part
of acquiring a portfolio of debt that is predominantly not charged-off debt.
(h) “Debt collector” means a person that by direct or  indirect action, conduct or practice col-
lects or attempts to collect a debt owed, or alleged to be owed, to a creditor or debt buyer.
[36]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) “Debtor” means a consumer who owes  or allegedly owes a debt, including a consumer who
owes an amount that differs from the amount that a debt collector attempts to collect  or that a debt
buyer purchased or attempts to collect.
(j) “Legal action” means a lawsuit, mediation, arbitration or  any other proceeding in any court,
including a small claims court.
(k) “Original creditor” means the last entity that extended credit to a consumer to purchase
goods or services, to lease goods or as a loan of moneys.
(L) “Person”  means an individual, corporation, trust, partnership, incorporated or
unincorporated association or any other legal entity.
(2) A debt collector engages in an unlawful collection practice if the  debt collector, while col-
lecting or attempting to collect a debt, does any of the following:
(a) Uses or threatens to use force or violence to  cause physical harm to a debtor or to the
debtor’s family or property.
(b) Threatens arrest or criminal prosecution.
(c) Threatens to seize, attach or sell a debtor’s property  if doing so requires a court order and
the debt collector does not  disclose that seizing, attaching or selling the debtor’s property requires
prior court proceedings.
(d) Uses profane, obscene or  abusive language in communicating with a debtor or the debtor’s
family.
(e) Communicates with a debtor or  any member of the debtor’s family repeatedly or continuously
or at times known to be inconvenient to the debtor  or any member of the debtor’s family and with
intent to harass or annoy the debtor or any member of the debtor’s family.
(f) Communicates or threatens to communicate with a debtor’s  employer concerning the nature
or existence of the debt.
(g) Communicates without a debtor’s permission or threatens  to communicate with the debtor
at the debtor’s place of employment if the place  of employment is other than the debtor’s residence,
except that the debt collector may:
(A) Write to the debtor at the  debtor’s place of employment if a home address is not reasonably
available and if the envelope does not reveal that the communication is from a  debt collector other
than the person that provided the goods, services or credit from which the debt arose.
(B) Telephone a debtor’s place of employment without informing any other  person of the nature
of the call or identifying the caller as  a debt collector but only if the debt collector in good faith
has made an unsuccessful attempt to telephone the debtor  at the debtor’s residence during the day
or during the evening between the hours of 6 p.m. and 9 p.m. The  debt collector may not contact
the debtor  at the debtor’s place of employment more frequently than once each business week and
may not telephone the debtor at the debtor’s place of employment if the debtor notifies the  debt
collector not to telephone at the debtor’s place of  employment or if the debt collector knows or has
reason to know that the debtor’s employer prohibits the debtor  from receiving such communication.
For the purposes of this subparagraph, any language in any agreement, contract or  instrument that
creates or is evidence of the debt and that purports to authorize telephone calls at the debtor’s place
of employment does not give permission to the debt collector to call the debtor at the  debtor’s place
of employment.
(h) Communicates with a debtor in writing without clearly identifying the  name of the debt
collector, the name of the person, if any, for whom the debt collector is attempting  to collect the
debt and the debt collector’s business address, on all initial communications. In  subsequent commu-
[37]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
nications involving multiple  accounts, the debt collector may eliminate the name of the person, if
any, for whom the debt collector is attempting to  collect the debt and substitute the term
“various” in place of the person’s name.
(i) Communicates with a debtor  orally without disclosing to the debtor, within 30 seconds after
beginning the communication,  the name of the individual who is initiating the communication and
the true purpose of the communication.
(j) Conceals the true purpose of the  communication so as to cause any expense to a debtor in
the form of long distance telephone calls, telegram fees,  additional charges for wireless communi-
cation or other charges the debtor might incur by using a medium of communication.
(k) Attempts or threatens to enforce a right or remedy while knowing or having reason to know
that the right or  remedy does not exist, or threatens to take any action that the debt collector in
the regular course of business does not take.
(L) Uses any form of communication that simulates  legal or judicial process or that appears to
be authorized, issued or approved by a governmental agency, governmental  official or an attorney
at law if the corresponding governmental agency, governmental official or attorney at law has not
in fact authorized or approved the communication.
(m) Represents that an existing  debt may be increased by the addition of attorney fees, investi-
gation fees or any other fees or charges  if the fees or charges may not legally be added to the ex-
isting debt.
(n) Collects  or attempts to collect interest or other charges or fees that exceed the actual debt
unless the agreement, contract or instrument that creates the debt expressly authorizes, or a  law
expressly allows, the interest or other charges or fees.
(o) Threatens to assign or sell a debtor’s account and misrepresents or implies that  the debtor
would lose any defense to the debt or would be subjected to harsh,  vindictive or abusive collection
tactics.
(p) Uses the seal or letterhead of a public official or a public agency, as those terms are  defined
in ORS 171.725.
(q) Collects or attempts  to collect any debt that the debt collector knows, or after exercising
reasonable diligence would know, arises  from medical expenses that qualify for reimbursement under
the Oregon Health Plan or under Medicaid, except that:
(A) The debt collector does not engage in an unlawful collection  practice if the debt collector
can produce an affidavit or certificate from the original  creditor that shows that the original cred-
itor complied with Oregon Health Authority rules barring payments  for services that Medicaid fee-
for-service plans or contracted health care plans cover; and
(B) For purposes of this paragraph, [ a prepaid managed care health  services organization, ] a co-
ordinated care organization or a public body, as defined in ORS 174.109, or an agent or assignee of
the organization or public body, is not a debt collector if the organization or public body seeks  to
collect a debt that arises under ORS 416.540.
(r) Files a legal action to collect or files a legal action to  attempt to collect a debt if the debt
collector knows, or after  exercising reasonable diligence would know, that an applicable statute of
limitations bars the collection or the collection attempt.
(s) Knowingly collects any amount, including any  interest fee, charge or expense incidental to
the principal obligation, unless the amount is expressly authorized  by the agreement creating the
debt or permitted by law.
(t) Collects or attempts to  collect a debt if the debt collector is a debt buyer, or is acting on a
[38]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
debt buyer’s behalf, and collects or attempts to collect purchased debt  before providing to a debtor,
within 30 days after the date of the debtor’s request, all of the  documents listed in subsection (4)(b)
of this section.
(u) Collects or attempts to collect a debt without complying with the  requirements of ORS
646A.677.
(3) A debt collector engages in an unlawful collection practice if  the debt collector, by use of
any direct  or indirect action, conduct or practice, enforces or attempts to enforce an obligation
made void and unenforceable by the provisions of ORS 759.720 (3) to (5).
(4) A debt buyer or debt collector  acting on behalf of a debt buyer engages in an unlawful col-
lection practice if the debt buyer or debt collector:
(a) Files legal action against a  debtor or files legal action to attempt to collect a debt if the debt
buyer or debt collector knows or after exercising reasonable diligence would know that an  applica-
ble statute of limitations bars the legal action to collect or the legal action  to attempt to collect the
debt;
(b) Brings a legal action  against a debtor or otherwise brings a legal action to attempt to collect
a debt without possessing business records that satisfy the requirements of ORS 40.460 (6), or of ORS
24.115, if the record is  a foreign judgment, that establish the nature and the amount of the debt and
that include:
(A) The original creditor’s name, written as the original creditor used the  name in dealings with
the debtor;
(B) The name and address of the debtor;
(C) The name,  address and telephone number of the person that owns the debt and a statement
as to whether the person is a debt buyer;
(D) The last four digits of the original creditor’s account  number for the debt, if the original
creditor’s account number for the debt had four or more digits;
(E) A detailed and itemized statement of:
(i) The amount the debtor last paid on the debt,  if the debtor made a payment, and the date of
the payment;
(ii) The amount and date  of the debtor’s last payment on the debt before the debtor defaulted
or before the debt became charged-off debt;
(iii) The balance due on the debt on the date on which the debt became charged-off debt;
(iv) The amount and rate of interest, any fees and any charges that  the original creditor im-
posed, if the debt buyer or debt collector knows the amount, rate, fee or charge;
(v) The amount and rate of interest, any fees and any charges that the debt buyer or any pre-
vious owner of the debt imposed, if the debt buyer or debt collector knows the amount, rate, fee  or
charge;
(vi) The attorney fees the debt buyer or  debt collector seeks, if the debt buyer or debt collector
expects to recover attorney fees; and
(vii) Any other fee, cost or charge the debt buyer seeks to recover;
(F) Evidence that the debt buyer and only the debt buyer owns the debt;
(G) The date on which the debt buyer purchased the debt; and
(H) A copy of the agreement between the original creditor and the debtor that is either:
(i) The contract or other writing the  debtor signed that created and is evidence of the original
debt; or
(ii) A copy of the most recent monthly statement that shows a purchase transaction  or balance
[39]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
transfer or  the debtor’s last payment, if the debtor made a payment, if the debt is a credit card debt
or other debt for which a contract or other writing that is evidence of the debt does not exist;
(c) Fails to provide to a debtor, after the debt buyer or  debt collector receives payment in cash
or the debtor requests the receipt, a receipt that:
(A) Shows  the name of the creditor or creditors for whom the debt buyer or debt collector re-
ceived the payment and, if the  creditor is not the original creditor, the account number that the
original creditor assigned; and
(B) States clearly whether the debt buyer or debt  collector accepts the payment as payment in
full or as a full and final compromise of the debt and, if not,  the balance remaining on the debt after
the payment;
(d) Collects or  attempts to collect a debt before providing, in response to a debtor’s request, the
documents required under paragraph (b) of this subsection. A debt  buyer or a debt collector that
acts on the debt buyer’s behalf does not engage  in an unlawful collection practice under this para-
graph if the debt buyer or debt collector collects or attempts to collect a  debt after providing the
required documents to the debtor; or
(e) Uses any  direct or indirect action, conduct or practice to violate a provision of this section
or ORS 646A.670.
(5) A debt collector is not acting on  a debt buyer’s behalf, and is not subject to the duties to
which a debt buyer is subject under this section and ORS 646A.670, if  the debt collector collects or
attempts to collect a debt on behalf of an owner  that retains a direct interest in the debt or if the
debt is not a debt that a debt buyer purchased.
SECTION 28.
 ORS 679.540 is amended to read:
679.540. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Dental provider” means a licensed  dentist, dental hygienist or other dental practitioner or
a dental care team or clinic that provides the following core services:
(A) Comprehensive dental care;
(B) Basic preventive dental services;
(C) Referral to dental specialists; and
(D) Family centered dental care.
(b) “Health worker” means  “traditional health worker” as defined by the Oregon Health Au-
thority by rule.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority, in consultation with coordinated  care organizations [ and
dental care organizations ] in this state, shall adopt rules and procedures for the  training and certi-
fication of health workers to provide oral disease prevention services and for the reimbursement  of
oral disease prevention services provided by certified health workers.
(3) The rules adopted under subsection (2)  of this section must prescribe the training required
for certification, including instruction on:
(a) The performance of dental risk assessments; and
(b) The provision of oral disease prevention services.
(4) The authority shall adopt rules requiring that a certified health worker:
(a) Refer patients to dental providers; and
(b) Recommend  to patients, or to the parent or legal guardian of a patient, that the patient visit
a dental provider at least once annually.
SECTION 29.
 ORS 741.300 is amended to read:
741.300. As used in ORS 741.001 to 741.540:
[40]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(1) “Coordinated care organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(2) “Essential health benefits” has the meaning given that term in ORS 731.097.
(3) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(4) “Health care service contractor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 750.005.
(5) “Health insurance” has the meaning  given that term in ORS 731.162, excluding disability
income insurance.
(6) “Health insurance exchange” or “exchange” means the division of  the Oregon Health Au-
thority that operates an American Health Benefit Exchange as described  in 42 U.S.C. 18031, 18032,
18033 and 18041.
(7) “Health plan” means a health benefit plan or dental only benefit plan offered by an insurer.
(8) “Insurer” means an  insurer as defined in ORS 731.106 that offers health insurance, a health
care service contractor[ , a prepaid managed care health services organization ] or  a coordinated care
organization.
(9) “Insurance producer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 731.104.
[(10) “Prepaid managed  care health services organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS
414.025.]
[(11)] (10)  “State program” means a program providing medical assistance, as  defined in ORS
414.025, and any self-insured health benefit plan or health plan offered  to employees by the Public
Employees’ Benefit Board or the Oregon Educators Benefit Board.
[(12)] (11)  “Qualified health plan” means a health benefit plan certified by the authority in ac-
cordance with the requirements, standards and criteria adopted by the authority  under ORS 741.310.
[(13)] (12) “Small Business Health Options  Program” or “SHOP” means a health insurance ex-
change for small employers as described in 42 U.S.C. 18031.
SECTION 30.
 ORS 743.029 is amended to read:
743.029. (1) The Department of Consumer and Business Services may adopt by rule  uniform
standards applicable to persons listed in subsection (2) of  this section for health care financial and
administrative transactions, including uniform standards for:
(a) Eligibility inquiry and response;
(b) Claim submission;
(c) Payment remittance advice;
(d) Claims payment or electronic funds transfer;
(e) Claims status inquiry and response;
(f) Claims attachments;
(g) Prior authorization;
(h) Provider credentialing; or
(i) Health care financial and administrative transactions identified  by the stakeholder work
group described in ORS 743.031.
(2) Any uniform standards adopted under subsection (1) of this section apply to:
(a) Health insurers.
[(b) Prepaid managed care health services organizations as defined in ORS 414.025. ]
[(c)] (b) Coordinated care organizations as defined in ORS 414.025.
[(d)] (c)  Third party administrators.
[(e)] (d) Any person or public body that either individually or jointly establishes a  self-insurance
plan, program or contract,  including but not limited to persons and public bodies that are otherwise
exempt from the Insurance Code under ORS 731.036.
[41]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(f)] (e)  Health care clearinghouses or other entities that process or facilitate the processing  of
health care financial and administrative transactions from a nonstandard format to a standard for-
mat.
[(g)] (f)  Any other person identified by the department that processes  health care financial and
administrative transactions between a health care provider and an entity described in  this sub-
section.
(3) In developing or updating any uniform standards adopted  under subsection (1) of this section,
the department shall consider recommendations from the Oregon Health Authority  under ORS
743.031.
SECTION 31.
 Section 1, chapter 61, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 1. (1) As used in this section:
[(a) “Dental care organization” means a prepaid managed  care health services organization, as
defined in ORS 414.025, that provides dental care to members of a coordinated care organization. ]
(a) “Coordinated care organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(b) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(c) “Veteran” means an individual who is a  veteran, as defined in ORS 408.225, except the in-
dividual may be discharged or released under honorable or other than honorable conditions.
(2) The Veterans Dental Program is established in the  Oregon Health Authority and shall be
administered in collaboration with  the Department of Consumer and Business Services. The purpose
of the program is to provide oral health care to eligible veterans who are residing in Oregon.
(3) The  authority shall contract with [ dental] coordinated care organizations throughout this
state and with individual oral health care providers  in areas of this state that are not served by
[dental] coordinated  care organizations to provide oral health care to veterans  enrolled in the
Veterans Dental Program.
(4) Enrollees in the Veterans Dental Program shall receive the types and  extent of oral health
care services that the authority determines will  be provided to medical assistance recipients in ac-
cordance with ORS 414.065, without any corresponding copayments, deductibles or  cost sharing re-
quired.
(5) An individual is eligible for the Veterans Dental Program if the individual:
(a) Is a resident of Oregon;
(b) Is ineligible for medical assistance;
(c) Has income that is at or below 400 percent of the federal poverty guidelines; and
(d) Is a veteran.
(6) The authority shall:
(a) Prescribe by rule a simple application process for the Veterans Dental Program.
(b) Provide assistance, in person or by telephone, to applicants for  and enrollees in the program.
(c) Require and accept as verification of eligibility:
(A) Documentation demonstrating that an applicant’s income is at or below 400  percent of the
federal poverty guidelines.
(B) An applicant’s federal DD Form 214 or 215.
SECTION 32.
 Section 1, chapter 87, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “COFA citizen” has the meaning given that term in ORS 413.611.
[(b) “Dental care organization” means a prepaid managed  care health services organization, as
defined in ORS 414.025, that provides dental care to members of a coordinated care organization. ]
[42]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) “Coordinated care organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(c) “Income” means the modified adjusted gross income that is attributed to  an individual in
determining the individual’s eligibility for the medical assistance program.
(2) The COFA Dental Program is established in the Oregon Health Authority. The purpose of
the program is to provide oral health care to low-income  citizens of the island nations in the Com-
pact of Free Association who are residing in Oregon.
(3) The authority shall contract with [ dental] coordinated care organizations throughout  this
state, and  with individual oral health care providers in areas of this state that are not served by
[dental] coordinated care organizations, to  provide oral health care to COFA citizens enrolled in
the COFA Dental Program.
(4) Enrollees in the COFA Dental Program shall receive  the types and extent of oral health care
services that the authority determines will be  provided to medical assistance recipients in accord-
ance with ORS 414.065, without any  corresponding copayments, deductibles or cost sharing required.
(5) An individual is eligible for the COFA Dental Program if the individual:
(a) Is a resident of Oregon;
(b) Is a COFA citizen;
(c) Has income that is less than 138 percent of the federal poverty guidelines; and
(d) Does not  qualify for Medicaid under Title XIX of the Social Security Act or the Children’s
Health Insurance Program under Title XXI of the Social Security Act.
(6) The authority may use the application process described in ORS 411.400 for the COFA Dental
Program. The authority shall provide  culturally and linguistically appropriate assistance, in person
and by telephone, to applicants for and enrollees in the program. The application process,  forms and
notices used in the COFA Dental Program  must conform to the guidance adopted by the United
States Department of Health and Human Services, in accordance with Title  VI of the Civil Rights
Act of 1964, regarding the prohibition against national origin discrimination  affecting persons with
limited English proficiency in federally funded programs.
(7) The authority shall accept as verification of eligibility the attestation of an applicant for  or
enrollee in the COFA Dental Program that the  applicant or enrollee meets the requirements of
subsection (5) of this section.
(8) The  authority shall conduct outreach as described in ORS 413.612 (4)(e) to facilitate appli-
cations for and enrollment in the COFA Dental Program.
(9) The authority may not disclose personally identifying information  about applicants for or
enrollees in the  COFA Dental Program except to the extent necessary to conduct outreach under
subsection (8) of this section or to comply with federal or state laws.
SECTION 33.
 ORS 413.181 is amended to read:
413.181. (1) The Department  of Consumer and Business Services and the Oregon Health Au-
thority may enter  into agreements governing the disclosure of information reported to the depart-
ment by  insurers with certificates of authority to transact insurance in this state and the disclosure
of information reported to the Oregon Health Authority by coordinated care organizations.
(2) The authority may use information disclosed under subsection  (1) of this section for the
purpose of carrying out ORS 413.032,  414.572, 414.591, 414.605, 414.609, [ 414.638,] 415.012 to 415.430
and 415.501.
SECTION 34.  ORS 414.607 is amended to read:
414.607. (1) The Oregon  Health Authority shall ensure the appropriate use of member informa-
tion by coordinated care organizations, including the use of electronic  health information and ad-
[43]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ministrative data that is available when and where the  data is needed to improve health and health
care through a secure, confidential health information exchange.
(2) A  member of a coordinated care organization must have access to the member’s personal
health information in the manner provided  in 45 C.F.R. 164.524 so the member can share the infor-
mation with  others involved in the member’s care and make better health care and lifestyle choices.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 179.505, a coordinated care organization, its provider network and
programs administered by the Department of Human Services for  seniors and persons with disabili-
ties shall use and  disclose member information for purposes of service and care delivery, coordi-
nation, service planning, transitional services and  reimbursement, in order to improve the safety and
quality of care, lower the cost of care and improve the health and well-being of  the organization’s
members.
(4) A coordinated care organization and its provider network shall use and  disclose sensitive
diagnosis information including blood-borne infections and  other health and mental health diagnoses,
within the coordinated care organization for the purpose of providing whole-person  care. Individ-
ually identifiable  health information must be treated as confidential and privileged information sub-
ject to ORS 192.553 to 192.581 and applicable federal  privacy requirements. Redisclosure of
individually identifiable information outside of the coordinated care organization  and the
organization’s providers for purposes  unrelated to this section or the requirements of ORS 413.032,
414.572, 414.598, 414.605, 414.632[, 414.638] or 414.655 remains subject to any applicable federal or
state privacy requirements.
(5) This section does not prohibit the disclosure of information between a coordinated care or-
ganization and the organization’s provider network,  and the Oregon Health Authority and the De-
partment of Human Services for the purpose of administering the laws of Oregon.
(6) The Health Information Technology Oversight Council shall develop readily available  infor-
mational materials that can be used by coordinated care organizations and  providers to inform all
participants in the health care workforce  about the appropriate uses and limitations on disclosure
of electronic health records, including need-based access and privacy mandates.
SECTION 35.
 ORS 414.882 is amended to read:
414.882. (1) A [ managed] coordinated care organization that has paid an amount that is not re-
quired under ORS 414.880 may file a claim for refund with the Oregon Health Authority.
(2) Any [ managed] coordinated care organization that  is aggrieved by an action of the authority
taken pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be entitled to notice and  an opportunity for a
contested case hearing under ORS chapter 183.
SECTION 36.  ORS 414.884 is amended to read:
414.884. ORS 414.880, 414.882 and 414.902  apply to any payments made to a [ managed] coordi-
nated care organization by the Oregon Health  Authority for the period beginning January 1, 2020,
and ending December 31, 2026.
REPEALS
SECTION 37.  (1) ORS 414.638 is repealed on January 2, 2025.
(2) ORS 414.654 is repealed.
APPLICABILITY
[44]
SB 967
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
SECTION 38.
Notwithstanding the amendments to ORS 413.017 and 414.025 by sections 3,
5 and 6 of  this 2023 Act and the repeal of ORS 414.638 by section 37 of this 2023 Act, the
metrics and scoring subcommittee created in ORS 414.638 shall  select the quality measures
that apply to coordinated care organization contracts in the calendar years  up to and in-
cluding the calendar year in which the Health Equity Quality  Metrics Committee establishes
quality measures.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 39. The unit captions used in this 2023 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 40. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[45]