Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Business Development Department shall study arts and culture
in this state. The department shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245,
and may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legisla-
tive Assembly related to arts and culture no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 348