Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
FLOATING OFFSHORE WIND ENERGY
SECTION 1.
(1) The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(a) A federal leasing process  led by the Bureau of Ocean Energy Management is under-
way for the development of floating offshore wind energy within the federal waters off the
Oregon and California coasts;
(b) A planning scenario for  developing three gigawatts of floating offshore wind energy
capacity within the  federal waters off the Oregon coast by 2030 would trigger immediate
economic benefits to this state, including economic  benefits related to planning activities at
the local, regional and state levels; and
(c) Proactive planning for floating offshore wind energy with effective engagement from
Oregon’s fishing communities, ports, conservation interests,  manufacturing industry, mari-
time industry, disaster recovery planning stakeholders, workforce development  stakeholders,
electricity ratepayers and  tribes will maximize the benefits to this state related to floating
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3711
HB 3391
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
offshore wind energy, while minimizing the conflicts between floating offshore wind energy,
the ocean ecosystem and ocean users.
(2) In furtherance of the findings  set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the Legisla-
tive Assembly declares that it is the goal of this state to plan for and pursue the development
of three gigawatts of commercial  scale floating offshore wind energy projects within the
federal waters off the Oregon coast by 2030. It is further the goal of this state that:
(a) At least  500 megawatts of the floating offshore wind energy capacity described in this
section be dedicated to powering an associated renewable hydrogen production facility; and
(b) The planning described in this subsection be conducted in a manner that will maxi-
mize benefits to this state while minimizing conflicts between floating offshore wind energy,
the ocean ecosystem and ocean users.
SECTION 2.
(1) As used in this section, “electric company” has  the meaning given that
term in ORS 757.600.
(2) The Legislative  Assembly finds and declares that floating offshore wind energy, as a
variable baseload power generation technology, should play a key role in this state’s efforts
to decarbonize the energy supply.
(3) Consistent with the finding set forth in subsection (2) of this section  and for the
purpose of ensuring prudent investments by an electric company in floating offshore wind
energy before the electric  company acquires other baseload generating resources, and in
order to foster the development of floating offshore wind energy in federal  waters off the
Oregon coast, each electric company in this state  shall, as directed by the Public Utility
Commission by rule or order, plan for and pursue the acquisition of cost-effective  energy or
energy and capacity that is delivered directly or indirectly from:
(a) Floating offshore wind energy facilities; or
(b) Renewable hydrogen production facilities that are  powered by floating offshore wind
energy.
SECTION 3.
(1) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife, in coordination with the State
Department of Energy and the Ocean Policy Advisory Council, shall develop a program for
assisting members of the commercial and sport ocean fishing industries  with avoiding con-
flicts with floating offshore wind energy facilities in federal waters off the Oregon  coast and
with related transmission and other facilities that transverse Oregon’s territorial sea.
(2)(a) In addition to the program required under subsection (1) of  this section, the State
Department of Fish and Wildlife,  in coordination with the State Department of Energy, shall
establish and implement an offshore energy  development fisheries loss compensation pro-
gram, using moneys  in the Offshore Energy Development Fisheries Loss Compensation Fund
established under section 4 of this 2021 Act.
(b) The  purpose of the program required by this subsection shall be to provide, subject
to available funding in the Offshore Energy Development Fisheries Loss Compensation  Fund
established under section 4 of this 2021 Act, compensation to persons who hold  licenses is-
sued pursuant to the commercial fishing laws for the loss of fisheries catch  due to conflicts
with offshore energy development in  federal waters off the Oregon coast and conflicts with
related transmission and other facilities that transverse Oregon’s territorial sea.
(c) The State Department of  Fish and Wildlife shall establish criteria for persons to
qualify for compensation under the program and procedures for  persons to apply for com-
pensation. The criteria and procedures must require  a person to provide evidence of the loss
[2]
HB 3391
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of fisheries catch due to offshore energy development. Evidence of the loss must include a
finding by the department or the department’s designated agent  that offshore energy devel-
opment, or related transmission and other facilities,  was the probable cause of the loss of
fisheries catch for which the compensation is claimed.
(3) The State Fish and Wildlife Commission shall adopt  rules as necessary to implement
the provisions of this section.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Offshore  Energy Development Fisheries Loss Compensation Fund is
established, separate and distinct from the General Fund.  Interest earned on the moneys in
the Offshore Energy Development Fisheries Loss Compensation Fund shall  be credited to the
fund. All moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the State Department of  Fish
and Wildlife for  the purpose of establishing and implementing the programs described in
section 3 of this 2021 Act.
(2) The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated  by the Legislative Assembly for the
purposes of the fund and any gifts,  grants, donations, endowments or bequests from any
public or private source. The State Department of Fish and Wildlife may seek out and receive
any gifts, grants, donations, endowments  or bequests for the purpose of establishing and
implementing the programs described in  section 3 of this 2021 Act. The department shall
deposit such moneys in the fund.
POLICY POSITION ON OCEAN RENEWABLE ENERGY PLANNING
SECTION 5. The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that, consistent  with applicable
federal law, it shall be the policy position of the State of Oregon that:
(1) Any federal  planning or permitting process for offshore energy research and devel-
opment in federal waters off the Oregon  coast and for any related transmission and other
facilities, particularly those that transverse Oregon’s territorial sea,  shall adequately con-
sider the prompt  decommissioning of any offshore facility after permanent cessation of use
of the facility; and
(2) Adequate consideration as described in this section must include  consideration of the
removal or  decommissioning of anchors, cables and any other equipment related to the fa-
cility in a manner that will serve to avoid future conflicts  between the equipment and fishing
operations conducted by persons who hold licenses issued pursuant to the commercial fishing
laws.
RENEWABLE PORTFOLIO STANDARD
(Acceleration for large utilities;
legacy carbon-free electricity treatment)
SECTION 6.  ORS 469A.005 is amended to read:
469A.005. As used in ORS 469A.005 to 469A.210:
(1) “Acquires service  territory” does not include an acquisition by a city of a facility, plant,
equipment or service territory within the boundaries of the city, pursuant to ORS  225.020 or city
charter, if the city:
(a) Already owns, controls or operates an electric light and power  system for supplying elec-
[3]
HB 3391
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tricity to the inhabitants of the city and for general municipal purposes;
(b) Provides fair, just and reasonable compensation to the electric  company whose service ter-
ritory is acquired that:
(A) Gives consideration for the service territory rights and the cost of the facility,  plant or
equipment acquired and for depreciation, fair market value, reproduction cost and any other  rele-
vant factor; and
(B) Is based on the present value of the service territory rights and  the facility, plant and
equipment acquired, including the value of poles, wires,  transformers and similar and related appli-
ances necessarily required to provide electric service; and
(c) Pays any stranded costs obligation established pursuant to ORS 757.483.
(2) “Banked renewable energy certificate” means  a bundled or unbundled renewable energy
certificate that is not used by an electric utility or electricity service supplier to comply with  a
renewable portfolio standard in a calendar year,  and that is carried forward for the purpose of
compliance with a renewable portfolio standard in a subsequent year.
(3) “BPA electricity” means electricity provided by the Bonneville Power Administration,  in-
cluding electricity  generated by the Federal Columbia River Power System hydroelectric projects
and electricity acquired by the Bonneville Power Administration by contract.
(4) “Bundled renewable energy certificate” means a renewable energy certificate  for qualifying
electricity that is acquired:
(a) By an  electric utility or electricity service supplier by a trade, purchase or other transfer
of electricity that includes the renewable energy certificate that was issued for the electricity; or
(b) By  an electric utility by generation of the electricity for which the renewable energy cer-
tificate was issued.
(5) “Compliance year” means the calendar  year for which the electric utility or electricity ser-
vice supplier seeks to establish compliance with the renewable portfolio  standard applicable to the
electric utility or electricity service supplier in the compliance  report submitted under ORS
469A.170.
(6) “Consumer-owned utility” means a municipal electric utility,  a people’s utility district or-
ganized under ORS chapter 261 that sells electricity or  an electric cooperative organized under ORS
chapter 62.
(7) “Distribution utility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(8) “Electric company” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(9) “Electric utility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(10) “Electricity service supplier” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(11)(a) “Legacy carbon-free electricity” includes electricity,  other than electricity de-
scribed in ORS 469A.060 (2), that:
(A) Is generated by a hydroelectric facility or a nuclear facility that:
(i) Became operational before the effective date of this 2021 Act; and
(ii) Was being used to serve the load of an electric utility on or before the  effective date
of this 2021 Act; and
(B) Does not otherwise constitute qualifying electricity.
(b) “Legacy  carbon-free electricity” does not include the amount of electricity generated
by a facility described in paragraph (a) of this subsection that  is in excess of the amount of
electricity generated by that facility that was historically used to serve the load of an  elec-
tric utility, calculated based on the lesser of:
[4]
HB 3391
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) The three-year average amount of  electricity generated by that facility and used to
serve the load of a  utility based on the three most recent years prior to the compliance year
in which the electric utility seeks to establish compliance with  the renewable portfolio
standard; or
(B) The three-year average amount of electricity generated by that  facility and used to
serve the load of a  utility based on the three most recent years prior to the effective date
of this 2021 Act.
[(11)] (12) “Qualifying electricity” means electricity described in ORS 469A.010.
[(12)] (13) “Renewable energy source” means a source  of electricity described in ORS 469A.025
(2)(g) or (7) .
[(13)] (14) “Retail electricity consumer”  means a retail electricity consumer, as defined in ORS
757.600, that is located in Oregon.
[(14)] (15)  “Unbundled renewable energy certificate” means a renewable energy certificate for
qualifying electricity that  is acquired by an electric utility or electricity service supplier by trade,
purchase or other transfer without acquiring the electricity that is associated with  the renewable
energy certificate.
(16) “Wind energy” includes floating offshore wind energy.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 469A.052 is amended to read:
469A.052. (1) The large utility  renewable portfolio standard imposes the following requirements
on an electric utility that makes sales of electricity to retail electricity consumers in an amount that
equals three percent or more of all electricity sold to retail electricity consumers:
(a) At  least five percent of the electricity sold by the electric utility to retail electricity con-
sumers in each of the calendar years 2011, 2012, 2013 and 2014 must be qualifying electricity;
(b) At least 15 percent of the electricity sold by the  electric utility to retail electricity con-
sumers in each of the calendar years 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018 and 2019 must be qualifying electricity;
(c) At least 20 percent of the electricity  sold by the electric utility to retail electricity con-
sumers in each of the calendar years [ 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023 and 2024 ] 2020 and 2021 must be  qual-
ifying electricity;
[(d) At least 25 percent of the electricity sold by a consumer-owned  utility to retail electricity con-
sumers in the calendar year 2025 and subsequent calendar years must be qualifying electricity; ]
[(e) At least 27 percent of the electricity sold by an electric company to retail  electricity consumers
in each of the calendar years 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028 and 2029 must be qualifying electricity; ]
[(f) At least 35 percent of the electricity sold by an electric company to retail  electricity consumers
in each of the calendar years 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033 and 2034 must be qualifying electricity; ]
[(g) At least 45 percent of the electricity sold by an electric  company to retail electricity consumers
in each of the calendar years 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038 and 2039 must be qualifying electricity; and ]
[(h) At least 50 percent of the electricity sold by an  electric company to retail electricity consumers
in the calendar year 2040 and subsequent calendar years must be qualifying electricity. ]
(d) At least 25 percent of the electricity  sold by the electric utility to retail electricity
consumers in the calendar year 2025 must be qualifying electricity; and
(e) In 2026 and in each following calendar year before 2045, the share of  qualifying elec-
tricity sold by an electric utility to retail electricity consumers must increase by a constant
amount such that,  by 2045, at least 85 percent of electricity sold by the electric utility to
retail electricity consumers is qualifying electricity.
(2) If, on June 6, 2007, an electric utility makes sales of electricity to retail  electricity consum-
[5]
HB 3391
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ers in an amount  that equals less than three percent of all electricity sold to retail electricity con-
sumers, but in any three consecutive  calendar years thereafter makes sales of electricity to retail
electricity consumers in amounts that average three percent or more of  all electricity sold to retail
electricity consumers, the electric utility is  subject to the renewable portfolio standard described in
subsection (3) of this section. The electric utility  becomes subject to the renewable portfolio stand-
ard described in subsection (3) of this section in the calendar year  following the three-year period
during which the electric utility makes sales  of electricity to retail electricity consumers in amounts
that average three percent or more of all electricity sold to retail electricity consumers.
(3) An electric utility described in subsection (2) of this section must comply  with the following
renewable portfolio standard:
(a) Beginning in the fourth calendar year after the calendar year in which  the electric utility
becomes subject to the renewable portfolio standard described in this subsection, at least  five per-
cent of the electricity sold by the electric utility  to retail electricity consumers in a calendar year
must be qualifying electricity;
(b) Beginning in the 10th calendar year after the calendar year in which the electric utility be-
comes subject to the renewable portfolio standard described in this subsection, at least  15 percent
of the  electricity sold by the electric utility to retail electricity consumers in a calendar year must
be qualifying electricity;
(c) Beginning in the 15th calendar year after the calendar year in which the electric utility  be-
comes subject to  the renewable portfolio standard described in this subsection, at least 20 percent
of the electricity sold by the electric utility to retail electricity consumers in a calendar year  must
be qualifying electricity; and
(d) Beginning in the 20th calendar year after the calendar year in which the electric utility be-
comes subject to  the renewable portfolio standard described in this subsection, at least 25 percent
of the electricity sold by the electric utility to retail electricity consumers in a calendar year  must
be qualifying electricity.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 469A.060 is amended to read:
469A.060. (1) Electric utilities are not required to comply  with the renewable portfolio standards
described in ORS 469A.052 and 469A.055 to the extent that:
(a) Compliance with the standard would require  the electric utility to acquire electricity in ex-
cess of the electric utility’s projected load requirements in any calendar year; and
(b) Acquiring the additional  electricity would require the electric utility to substitute qualifying
electricity for electricity derived from an energy source other than coal, natural gas or petroleum.
(2)(a) Electric utilities are not required to  comply with a renewable portfolio standard to the
extent that compliance would require the electric utility to substitute qualifying  electricity for
electricity available to the electric utility under contracts for electricity from dams that  are owned
by Washington public utility districts and that are located between the Grand Coulee  Dam and the
Columbia River’s junction with the Snake River. The provisions of this subsection  apply only to
contracts entered into before June  6, 2007, and to renewal or replacement contracts for contracts
entered into before June 6, 2007.
(b) If  a contract described in paragraph (a) of this subsection expires and is not renewed or re-
placed, the electric utility must comply, in the  calendar year following the expiration of the con-
tract, with the renewable portfolio standard applicable to the electric utility.
(3)(a) Electric utilities are not required to comply with a  renewable portfolio standard to
the extent that compliance would require the electric utility  to substitute qualifying elec-
[6]
HB 3391
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tricity for legacy carbon-free electricity that is available to  the electric utility by ownership
or contract. The provisions of this  subsection applicable to contracts apply only to contracts
entered into before the effective date of this 2021  Act and to renewal or replacement con-
tracts for contracts entered into before the effective date of this 2021 Act.
(b) If a contract described in paragraph (a) of this  subsection expires and is not renewed
or replaced, or if a legacy carbon-free electricity generating  facility is retired or removed
from service to retail electricity consumers,  beginning in the calendar year following the
expiration, retirement or removal,  the electric utility’s obligation to comply with the
renewable portfolio standard applicable to the electric utility  may no longer be reduced by
the amount of legacy carbon-free electricity  that was available to the electric utility prior
to the expiration, retirement or removal.
[(3)] (4) A  consumer-owned utility is not required to comply with a renewable portfolio standard
to the extent that  compliance would require the consumer-owned utility to reduce the consumer-
owned utility’s purchases of the lowest priced electricity from the  Bonneville Power Administration
pursuant to section  5 of the Pacific Northwest Electric Power Planning and Conservation Act of
1980, P.L. 96-501, as in effect on June  6, 2007. The exemption provided by this subsection applies
only to  firm commitments for BPA electricity that the Bonneville Power Administration has assured
will be available to a consumer-owned utility to meet agreed  portions of the consumer-owned
utility’s load requirements for a defined period of time.
(Direct energy resiliency or environmental benefits)
SECTION 9.
Section 10 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 469A.005 to
469A.210.
SECTION 10. (1) As used  in this section, “renewable energy certificates” means bundled
renewable energy certificates and unbundled renewable energy certificates.
(2)(a) The Legislative Assembly declares that  the State of Oregon has a substantial state
interest in:
(A) Creating a more resilient supply of electricity used to serve  retail electricity con-
sumers; and
(B) Ensuring that efforts to reduce the greenhouse gas emissions attributable  to this
state provide direct environmental benefits in this state.
(b) The Legislative Assembly further finds and declares that:
(A) Locating low-emissions and no-emissions electricity  generating and storage facilities
close to retail electricity consumers served with the electricity  generated or stored by those
facilities:
(i) Increases resilience without causing the harmful side effects of emissions  emitted
from electricity generating facilities;
(ii) Reduces the costs  and delays associated with constructing additional transmission
capacity to connect remote electricity generating and storage facilities; and
(iii) Reduces the  wildfire-related resiliency risks to the electricity grid that increase with
the remoteness of electricity generating and storage facilities; and
(B) Replacing electricity generating facilities that  utilize petroleum, natural gas or coal
as an energy source with electricity  generating and storage facilities that utilize renewable
energy sources can result in the reduction  or avoidance of emissions of air contaminants
[7]
HB 3391
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
other than greenhouse gases and can provide particular benefits to historically disadvantaged
communities that have been traditionally and disproportionately burdened  with the health,
financial and other adverse  impacts associated with air contaminants other than greenhouse
gases emitted from electricity generating facilities and other waste products from  power
generation.
(3) In pursuit of the substantial state  interests set forth in subsection (2)(a) of this sec-
tion and in addition to the requirements of ORS 469A.135, out of the  renewable energy cer-
tificates used by an electric utility to meet the  renewable portfolio standard applicable to
that electric utility in a compliance year, the following percentages in  the following years
of the renewable energy certificates that were issued for electricity generated by a facility
constructed on or after the  effective date of this 2021 Act must be for electricity generated
by a facility that provides direct energy resiliency or environmental benefits in this state:
(a) 25 percent by 2025; and
(b) 85 percent by 2045.
(4) For the purposes of this section, an electricity generating  or storage facility provides
direct energy resiliency or environmental benefits in this state if the facility:
(a) Provides direct local resiliency benefits to retail electricity consumers through  one
or more of the following:
(A) Increased reliability in parts of this state that typically experience more  frequent or
longer service disruptions or that are more likely to be impacted by a catastrophic event;
(B) Greater penetration of electricity generating and storage resources in remote  com-
munities;
(C) Reduced exposure to the costs of service disruptions;
(D) Modernization to the electrical grid in this state;
(E) Reduced reliance on long-distance transmission;
(F) Investment in communities and households in this state that are least able to  afford
technologies that improve the reliability of electricity service; or
(G) Other local resiliency augmenting benefits for retail electricity consumers  as may
be identified by rule by the State  Department of Energy, in consultation with the Public
Utility Commission;
(b) Contributes to a reduction in  or avoidance of emissions of any air contaminant or
water contaminant in this state other than a greenhouse gas; or
(c) Contributes to an  improvement in the health of natural and working lands in this
state.
(5) There  is a rebuttable presumption that an electricity generating or storage facility
provides direct energy resiliency or environmental benefits in this state for purposes of  this
section if the facility:
(a) Is directly interconnected in this state to the electrical grid of an electric  utility
serving retail electricity consumers;
(b) Is directly interconnected to the Bonneville Power Administration  contiguous trans-
mission grid serving this state;
(c) Is used to comply with the requirements of ORS 469A.210;
(d) Is a community solar project from which electricity is procured pursuant to the pro-
gram adopted under ORS 757.386;
(e) Is a solar  energy resource connected behind the meter of a retail electricity consumer
[8]
HB 3391
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
that includes battery storage capable of providing  temporary electric power in the event of
a power outage; or
(f) Relies on transmission facilities to transmit electricity for no more  than 50 miles to
reach the contiguous border of this state from  an adjoining state in order to serve retail
electricity consumers.
SECTION 11.
(1) The Public Utility  Commission may not cause delay, due to the pendency
of any rulemaking or other proceeding necessary  to implement one or more provisions of
section 10 of this 2021 Act,  to any procurement or request for proposals that will result in
the procurement by an electric  utility of electricity from a facility that meets the statutory
criteria set forth is section 10 (5) of this 2021 Act.
(2) The enactment of section 10 of this 2021 Act is not intended to modify, delay or  alter
the timeline for any procurement or request for proposals initiated on, before or after  the
effective date of this  2021 Act for which rulemaking is not necessary to determine whether
the procurement or request for proposals will count toward  compliance by an electric utility
with section 10 of this 2021 Act.
COMMUNITY-BASED RENEWABLE ENERGY
SECTION 12. ORS 469A.210 is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 757.
SECTION 13.  ORS 469A.210 is amended to read:
469A.210. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Electric company” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(b) “Retail electricity consumer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
[(1)] (2)  The Legislative Assembly finds that community-based  renewable energy projects, in-
cluding but not  limited to marine renewable energy resources that are either developed in accord-
ance with the Territorial Sea Plan  adopted pursuant to ORS 196.471 or located on structures
adjacent to the coastal shorelands, are an essential element of this state’s energy future.
[(2) For purposes related to the findings in subsection (1) of this  section, by the year 2025, at least
eight percent  of the aggregate electrical capacity of all electric companies that make sales of electricity
to 25,000 or more retail electricity consumers in this state  must be composed of electricity generated by
one or both of the following sources: ]
(3)(a) For  purposes related to the findings in subsection (2) of this section, by the fol-
lowing years the following percentages of electricity sold in  this state by each electric com-
pany that makes sales of electricity to 25,000 or  more retail electricity consumers in this
state must be composed of electricity generated by one or more  of the sources described in
paragraph (b) of this subsection:
(A) By 2025, eight percent; and
(B) By 2045, 28 percent.
(b) An electric company may comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection through sales
of electricity composed of electricity generated by:
[(a)] (A)  Small-scale renewable energy projects with  a generating capacity of 20 megawatts or
less, or that are  interconnected with the transmission system owned or managed by the
electric company at a voltage of 115  kilovolts or less, and  that generate electricity utilizing a
type of energy described in ORS 469A.025; [ or]
[(b)] (B)  Facilities that generate electricity  using biomass that also generate thermal energy for
[9]
HB 3391
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a secondary purpose[ .];
(C) Small modular reactors as defined in section 16 of this 2021 Act; or
(D) Small power production facilities  as defined in ORS 758.505 that generate electricity
utilizing a type of energy listed in ORS 469A.025 and that:
(i) Are located, with the  consent of the relevant tribal government as defined in ORS
181A.680, within the boundaries of an Indian reservation or land  held in trust by the United
States for the benefit of a federally recognized Oregon Indian tribe; or
(ii) Have executed a community benefits agreement with a local government as defined
in ORS 174.116, a school district as defined in ORS 332.002, a local  environmental or habitat
conservation organization or another entity that exists for  the public benefit as identified
by rule by the Public Utility Commission.
(4)(a) Out of the facilities described in subsection  (3) of this section that generate elec-
tricity used to meet the requirements of subsection (3)  of this section, at least 25 percent
must be:
(A) Located in the electric company’s service territory;
(B) Directly interconnected with the transmission system owned or  managed by the
electric company; or
(C) If not directly interconnected with  the transmission system owned or managed by the
electric company, designated as a network resource.
(b) An electric company must cooperate with  the efforts of a facility described in sub-
section (2) of this section to be designated as a network resource.
[(3)] (5)  Regardless of the facility’s nameplate capacity, any single facility  described in sub-
section [ (2)(b)] (3)(b)(B)  of this section may be used to comply with the requirement  specified in
subsection [ (2)] (3) of this section for up to 20 megawatts of capacity.
SECTION 14.
(1) The Public Utility  Commission may not cause delay, due to the pendency
of any rulemaking or other proceeding necessary  to implement one or more provisions of
ORS 469A.210, to any procurement or request  for proposals that will result in the procure-
ment by  an electric company of electricity generated from a facility described in ORS
469A.210 (3)(b)(A), (B) or (D)(i).
(2) The amendments to ORS 469A.210 by section 13 of this  2021 Act are not intended to
modify, delay or alter the timeline  for any procurement or request for proposals initiated
before, on or after the effective date of this 2021 Act for which rulemaking  is not necessary
to determine whether the procurement or request for proposals will count toward compliance
by an electric company with ORS 469A.210.
SMALL MODULAR REACTORS
SECTION 15.
Section 16 of this 2021 Act is added  to and made a part of ORS 469.590 to
469.619.
SECTION 16. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “High-level radioactive waste” means spent nuclear  fuel produced by a small modular
reactor and radioactive by-products from the reprocessing of spent nuclear  fuel produced by
a small modular reactor.
(b) “Small modular reactor” means a nuclear fission  reactor that has an electric output
that does not exceed 300 megawatts.
[10]
HB 3391
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
(2) Before issuing a site  certificate for a small modular reactor, the Energy Facility Sit-
ing Council must:
(a) Find that the site for the small modular reactor is located:
(A) Within the area subject to the jurisdiction of a city that  has adopted an ordinance
allowing for the  siting of small modular reactors pursuant to subsection (3) of this section;
or
(B) Within the unincorporated area subject  to the jurisdiction of a county that has
adopted an ordinance allowing  for the siting of small modular reactors pursuant to sub-
section (3) of this section;
(b) Find that the emergency planning zone established by the United States  Nuclear
Regulatory Commission for  the small modular reactor is located within the area, whether
incorporated or unincorporated, subject to the jurisdiction of  a county that has adopted an
ordinance allowing for the siting of small modular reactors pursuant to subsection (3)  of this
section; and
(c) Find that the proposed disposal of high-level radioactive waste by the small modular
reactor comports with a process approved or adopted by the United States  Nuclear Regula-
tory Commission for the disposal of high-level radioactive waste  under the same or similar
circumstances.
(3)(a) The governing body of a city that adopts an ordinance allowing for the siting  of
small modular reactors within the area subject to the jurisdiction of the city  must refer the
ordinance to electors of the county as described in paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(b) The governing body of a county that adopts  an ordinance allowing for the siting of
small modular reactors within the unincorporated area subject to  the jurisdiction of the
county must refer the ordinance to electors of the county as described in paragraph  (c) of
this subsection.
(c) If the governing body  of a city or county adopts an ordinance under this subsection,
the governing body shall refer the measure of the  ordinance to the electors of the city or
county for approval at the next statewide general election.
(4) ORS 469.595, 469.597, 469.599 and 469.601 do not apply to small modular reactors.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 17.
The unit captions used in this 2021 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
[11]