Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 341.481 is amended to read:
341.481. (1) A community college  district shall admit persons who are  high school graduates
and who are  residents of Oregon . [and may admit other residents who, in the judgment of the ad-
ministration of the  district, are capable of profiting from the instruction offered in a specific course or
program without regard to age. In the case of a student younger  than 16 years of age, the college ad-
ministration shall make the final determination. ]
(2) [Districts may also ] A community college district may  admit persons who are not residents
of the district or of the state, including persons who are not citizens of the United States,  if [ such
admission is considered suitable. ] the board  of education of the community college district
considers the admission suitable.
(3)(a) A community college district may admit persons who are residents  of Oregon and
who are not high  school graduates. A person may be admitted as provided by this subsection
if, in the judgment of the community  college, the person is capable of benefiting from the
instruction offered in a specific course or  program without regard to age. If the person is
younger than 16 years of age, the community college shall make  the final determination as
to admission.
(b) For  a person admitted as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection, if the person
otherwise would be enrolled in a public school in grade 11 or 12 and  the person scores at
college level on placement tests for  writing, reading and math, the person shall be considered
a student of the school district in which  the student resides for purposes of calculating
weighted average daily membership under ORS 327.013 and the school district shall:
(A) Except as provided by subparagraph (B)  of this paragraph, transfer to the community
college the amount per weighted average daily membership for the person,  which shall be
based on the amount of the school district’s General Purpose Grant  per ADMw and shall
include additional amounts attributable to the person under ORS 327.013 (1)(c)(A). Amounts
received under this subparagraph must be used  to pay for expenses incurred by the person
at the community college for books, tuition and fees.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2117
HB 2439
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
(B) For any amounts that would have  been transferred as provided by subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph but that exceed the expenses that would  be incurred by the person at the
community college for books, tuition and fees:
(i) Retain one-half of the amount; and
(ii) Transfer one-half of the amount to the  Superintendent of Public Instruction for de-
posit in and distribution through the State School Fund.
(c) Nothing in this  subsection requires a person to receive approval from the school dis-
trict in which the student resides.
[(3)] (4) Upon application of a qualified  high school student residing in this state and upon
agreement between the community college  district  and the school district in which the student
resides, the student may be admitted to the community college.
[(4)] (5)  Any community college  district may  contract with another community college  dis-
trict to admit students of either college to the college of the other.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 341.481 by section 1 of this 2017  Act first apply to
the 2017-2018 school year.
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
[2]