Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Pursuant to Article IX, section 14 (6)(a), of the  Oregon Constitution, the
Legislative Assembly increases the amount of the estimate of revenues that will be  received
from General Fund revenue sources  other than corporate income and excise taxes for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, to $24 billion.
SECTION 2. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of  this section, any positive differ-
ence between the actual amount of revenues collected from General Fund revenue sources
other than corporate income and excise taxes for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, and
the estimate made for that biennium pursuant to Article  IX, section 14 (1), of the Oregon
Constitution, shall be transferred to the State Fire Marshal Fund established in ORS 476.055,
for the purpose of wildfire prevention and response.
(2) If the actual amount of revenues collected from General Fund revenue sources  other
than corporate income and excise taxes for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  exceeds the
amount of the estimate made in section 1 of this 2025 Act by two percent or more:
(a) The difference between the actual amount  of revenues and the estimate made in
section 1 of this 2025 Act shall be  returned to personal income taxpayers in the manner
provided in ORS 291.349; and
(b) The  difference between the estimate of revenues made in section 1 of this 2025 Act
and the estimate made for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, pursuant to Article IX, sec-
tion 14 (1), of the Oregon Constitution, shall be transferred to the State  Fire Marshal Fund
established in ORS 476.055, for the purpose of wildfire prevention and response.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4725
HB 3947
1
[2]