Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The OregonFlora  Program is established at Oregon State University in
order to compile and provide data regarding vegetation  that grows without cultivation in this
state.
(2) The OregonFlora Program shall make the data to be provided under  subsection (1)
of this section available to state and federal agencies, educational institutions,  businesses,
scientists and the public through publications, a website maintained  by the program, maps,
photos and other tools developed by the program.
(3) The Higher Education Coordinating  Commission shall make a grant to Oregon State
University each biennium in the amount of $400,000 for purposes of  the program established
under this section.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $400,000, which shall be distributed to  Oregon
State University for purposes of administering the program established under section 1  of
this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1143