Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall  study stocking protocols for
salmon and other fish, including dissolved oxygen in water, water temperature, water flows
and backup secondary release locations. The department shall submit  a report in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and  may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to the  environment no later than September
15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1404