Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 448.119 to
448.285.
SECTION 2. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds and declares harmful algal  blooms to be
a threat to safe drinking water supplies and a menace to public health and welfare.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority, in  coordination with the Department of Environmental
Quality as further provided for in section 4 of this 2019 Act, shall:
(a) Determine and identify  water sources that are susceptible to harmful algal blooms
or that are downstream of or influenced  by water sources that are susceptible to harmful
algal blooms.
(b) Develop a  system for the regular monitoring and testing of water sources determined
to be susceptible to harmful algal blooms or that are  downstream of or influenced by water
sources that are susceptible to harmful algal blooms.
(c) Prioritize monitoring of water sources that are susceptible  to harmful algal blooms
and that are:
(A) Sources of domestic and municipal drinking water; or
(B) Bodies of water accessed by the public for recreational use.
(d) Develop a protocol for issuing hazard advisory alerts to  the public in the occurrence
of a harmful algal bloom.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS chapter 468B.
SECTION 4. The Department of Environmental Quality, in coordination with the Oregon
Health Authority, shall:
(1) Develop and maintain a coordinated state agency harmful  algal bloom response mon-
itoring and response strategy.
(2) Produce timely and high-quality data that allow the Oregon  Health Authority to de-
termine the level of risk of harm or injury to the public health.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3952
HB 3326
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
(3) Maintain a  publicly accessible clearinghouse of all data related to harmful algal
blooms.
(4) Identify sources of pollutants that contribute to the occurrences of harmful  algal
blooms.
(5) Develop strategies for reducing  pollutants that contribute to the occurrences of
harmful algal blooms and the frequency and severity of harmful algal blooms.
(6) Monitor and evaluate  the effectiveness of strategies implemented for reducing
pollutants that contribute to the occurrences of harmful algal blooms.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department  of Environmental Quality, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019,
out of the General Fund, the amount of  $983,919, which may be expended for carrying out the
provisions of section 4 of this 2019 Act.
[2]