Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 291.349 is amended to read:
291.349. (1) As soon as practicable after adjournment sine die of the odd-numbered  year regular
session of the Legislative Assembly, the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services shall report
to the Legislative Revenue Officer and the Legislative Fiscal Officer the estimate as of  July 1 of the
first year of the biennium of General  Fund and State Lottery Fund revenues that will be received
by the state during  that biennium. The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall base its
estimate on the last forecast given to the Legislative Assembly before adjournment sine die  of the
odd-numbered year regular  session on which the printed, adopted budget prepared in the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services is based, adjusted only insofar as necessary to  reflect
changes in laws adopted at that session. The  report shall contain the estimated revenues from cor-
porate income  and excise taxes separately from the estimated revenues from other General Fund
sources. The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may revise the estimate if  necessary
following adjournment sine die of a special session or an  even-numbered year regular session of the
Legislative Assembly, but any revision does  not affect the basis of the computation described in
subsection (3) [ or (4) ] of this section.
(2) As soon as practicable after the end  of the biennium, the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services shall report to  the Legislative Revenue Officer and the Legislative Fiscal Officer,
or the Legislative Assembly  if it is in session, the amount of General Fund revenues collected as
of the last June 30  of the preceding biennium. The report shall contain the collections from corpo-
rate income and excise taxes separately from collections from other sources.
(3) If the revenues received from the corporate income and excise taxes during  the biennium
exceed the amounts estimated to be received from  such taxes for the biennium, as estimated after
adjournment sine die of the odd-numbered year regular session, by two percent or  more, the total
amount of that excess shall be retained in the General Fund and used, in the manner described in
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1176
SB 573
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ORS 291.345, to provide additional funding for public education, kindergarten through grade 12.
[(4) If the revenues received  from General Fund revenue sources, exclusive of those described in
subsection (3) of this section, during the biennium exceed the  amounts estimated to be received from
such sources for the biennium, as estimated after adjournment sine die of the odd-numbered  year reg-
ular session, by  two percent or more, there shall be credited to personal income taxpayers an amount
equal to the  total amount of that excess, reduced by the cost certified by the Department of Revenue
under ORS  291.351 as being allocable to credits described under this subsection. The excess amount
to be credited shall be credited to personal income  taxpayers in a percentage amount of prior year
personal income tax liability as determined under subsection (5) of this section. ]
[(5)(a) If there is  an excess to be credited under subsection (4) of this section, on or before No-
vember 1, following the end of each biennium,  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall
determine and certify to the Department of Revenue the percentage amounts of  credit for purposes of
subsection (4) of this section.  The percentage amounts determined shall be percentage amounts to the
nearest one-tenth  of a percent that will distribute the excess to be credited to personal income
taxpayers.]
[(b) The percentage amount applicable to subsection  (4) of this section shall equal the amount dis-
tributed under subsection (4) of this section divided  by the estimated total personal income tax liability
for all personal  income taxpayers for tax years beginning in the calendar year immediately preceding
the calendar year in which the excess is determined. ]
[(c) The amount of the surplus credit under subsection (4) of this  section is determined by multi-
plying the percentage amount determined under paragraph (b) of this subsection by the total amount
of a personal income taxpayer’s  tax liability for the tax year beginning in the calendar year imme-
diately preceding the calendar year in which the excess is determined in order  to calculate the amount
to be credited to the taxpayer. ]
[(d) The credit shall be determined based on the tax liability as shown on the return of the taxpayer
or as corrected by the Department of Revenue. ]
[(e) The credit shall be computed after the allowance of a credit provided under ORS 316.082,
316.131 or 316.292, but before the allowance of any other credit or offset against tax liability  allowed
or allowable under any provision of law of this state, and before  the application of estimated tax pay-
ments, withholding or other advance tax payments. ]
[(f) For personal income taxpayers, if a credit applied against tax liability as described in para-
graph (e) of this subsection  reduces tax liability to zero and an amount of the credit remains unused,
the remaining unused amount shall be refunded to the taxpayer. For purposes of ORS chapters 305,
314, 315 and 316, refunds issued under  this paragraph are refunds of an overpayment of tax imposed
under ORS chapter 316. ]
[(g) The Department of Revenue may prescribe  by rule the manner of calculating and claiming a
credit if the filing status of a taxpayer changes between the tax year for which a credit may be  claimed
and the succeeding tax year. ]
[(6) A refund may not be made under this section to a taxpayer if  the amount of the refund is less
than $1.]
[(7) Not later than November 15 following the end of the biennium, the  Department of Revenue
shall provide information and guidance to taxpayers relating to the calculation  of the credit. The de-
partment may make the information and guidance available electronically or otherwise. ]
[(8) The Department of Revenue may adopt rules  specifying the manner for issuing refunds under
this section to taxpayers who filed returns for the tax year  on which the credit is computed but who
[2]
SB 573
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
are not required to file returns for the year in which the credit could be claimed. ]
SECTION 2.
ORS 291.351, 305.792 and 305.794 are repealed.
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 291.349 by  section 1 of this 2025 Act and the repeal
of ORS 291.351, 305.792 and 305.794 by section 2 of this 2025 Act apply to biennia ending on
or after June 30, 2027.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act does not take effect  unless the amendment to the Oregon
Constitution proposed by Senate Joint Resolution  15 (2025) is approved by the people at the
next regular general election  held in November 2026. This 2025 Act takes effect on the ef-
fective date of that constitutional amendment.
[3]