Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission to be  distributed to the University
of Oregon, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of
$40,000 for purposes of  a pilot program at the University of Oregon to train graduate-level
student clinicians who are studying to become speech-language pathologists to use a  family-
centered approach when serving children with augmentative  and alternative communication
needs in a traditional overnight summer camp setting.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2121