Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) This section applies to a  county that received payments under the federal
Secure Rural Schools program in calendar year 2008 in  an amount that was equal to at least
30 percent of all moneys deposited into the county general fund in the same period.
(2) The Department of Revenue  shall make a grant to a county described in subsection
(1) of this section in an amount not to exceed $150,000 for each project  described in sub-
section (3) of this  section that is approved by the department under subsection (5) of this
section.
(3) A county  may receive a grant under this section for a project for consolidation or
sharing of services among the county and the cities and special districts within the county.
(4)(a) A county wishing to receive a grant under this section must  submit an application
to the department that describes in detail the proposed consolidation or sharing  of services.
Preference shall be given  to an application that demonstrates the inclusion and support of
cities and special districts in the formulation of the project.
(b) The county shall provide additional information upon request of the department.
(5)(a) Within 60 days of receiving an application under subsection (4)  of this section, the
department shall reject or approve the application and notify the county of the decision.
(b) A rejection may not be appealed, but the county may apply for a grant at any time.
(c) If the department approves an application, the department  shall make the grant in
an amount determined by the department in its sole discretion from moneys  in the Oregon
County Assistance Fund established under section 2 of this 2021 Act.
(6) The department may adopt rules governing the implementation of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon County Assistance Fund is  established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund.  Interest earned by the Oregon County Assist-
ance Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Oregon County Assistance Fund shall consist of:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2431
HB 2765
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
(a) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the  Legislative As-
sembly;
(b) Other amounts deposited in or  donated to the fund from any source, public or private;
and
(c) Interest earned on moneys in the fund.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the  Department of Revenue for
the purpose of making grants under section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on July 1, 2029.
(2) Section 2 of this 2021 Act is repealed on July 1, 2030.
SECTION 4.
There is appropriated to the Department of Revenue,  for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $  for deposit in the
Oregon County Assistance Fund for the  purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1
of this 2021 Act.  This appropriation is available continuously until expended for the purpose
specified in this section.
SECTION 5. Any moneys  in the Oregon County Assistance Fund on July 1, 2030, that are
uncommitted for the purpose specified in section 1 of this 2021 Act shall  revert to the Gen-
eral Fund and be available for general governmental purposes.
SECTION 6. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]