Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Emergency Department Boarding Pilot Project is established in the
Oregon Health Authority. The authority shall  provide grants to hospitals to determine the
effectiveness of strategies for providing immediate access to appropriate treatment  for indi-
viduals experiencing behavioral health crises who are being held in an emergency room  due
to the lack of alternative treatment options.
(2) The authority shall award grants under subsection (1) of this section to hospitals that:
(a) Develop community-wide strategies for collaborating with community partners on  the
placement of individuals experiencing behavioral health crises;
(b) Collect and analyze data to  measure outcomes and evaluate the effectiveness of var-
ious strategies; and
(c) Encourage immediate and appropriate placement of  individuals experiencing behav-
ioral health crises outside of emergency department settings.
SECTION 2. (1) The Task Force on Emergency Department Boarding is established.
(2) The task force consists of 13 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall  appoint one member from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from  among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint:
(A) Two members representing rural and urban hospitals;
(B) One member representing community mental health programs;
(C) One member from the Department of Human Services;
(D) One member from the Department of Corrections;
(E) One member representing law enforcement agencies;
(F) One member from the Oregon Health Authority;
(G) One member representing individuals with developmental disabilities;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2047
HB 2624
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
(H) Two members representing community mental health professionals; and
(I) One member from an organization that advocates for persons with mental illness.
(3) In making appointments, the Governor shall ensure  equal representation from rural
and urban regions of this state with a focus on representing all of the state.
(4) The task  force shall develop long term recommendations to reduce the incidence of
patients experiencing behavioral health crises being held in hospitals due to the lack of al-
ternative community placements or services.
(5) A  majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority  of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a report, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, to  the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health:
(a) No later than February 1,  2020, that contains the initial recommendations of the task
force; and
(b) No later than  September 15, 2020, that contains the final recommendations of the task
force, including recommendations for legislation, if any.
(12) The Legislative Policy and Research  Director shall provide staff support to the task
force.
(13) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force  are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,000, which may be expended for providing  grants in the
Emergency Department Boarding Pilot Project established in section 1 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 4.
Section 1 of this 2019 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2019.
SECTION 5. Section 2 of this 2019 Act is repealed on December 31, 2020.
SECTION 6. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]