Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 757.386 is amended to read:
757.386. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) “Community solar project” means one or more solar photovoltaic energy  systems that pro-
vide owners and subscribers the  opportunity to share the costs and benefits associated with the
generation of electricity by the solar photovoltaic energy systems.
(b) “Electric company” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(c) “Owner” means a customer of an electric company who  has proportionate ownership of part
of a community solar project, such as  direct ownership of one or more solar panels or shared own-
ership of the infrastructure of the community solar project.
(d) “Project manager” means the entity identified as having responsibility  for managing the op-
eration of a community solar project and, if applicable, for maintaining contact with the electric
company that procures electricity from the community solar project. A project manager may be:
(A) An electric company; or
(B) An independent third party.
(e) “Solar photovoltaic energy system” means equipment and devices that have the primary
purpose of collecting solar energy and generating electricity by photovoltaic effect.
(f) “Subscriber” means a customer of an electric company who  proportionately leases part of a
community solar project for a minimum of 10 years.
(2)(a) The  Public Utility Commission shall establish by rule a program for the procurement of
electricity from community solar projects. As part of the program, the commission shall:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2571
SB 92
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Adopt rules prescribing what qualifies a community solar project to participate in the  pro-
gram;
(B) Certify qualified community solar projects for participation in the program;
(C) Prescribe the  form and manner by which project managers may apply for certification under
the program; and
(D) Require, by rule or order, electric companies to enter into a 20-year power  purchase agree-
ment with a certified community solar project.
(b) The commission  shall adopt rules under paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection that, at a mini-
mum:
(A) Incentivize consumers of electricity to be owners or subscribers;
(B) Minimize the shifting of costs from the program to ratepayers who do not own or subscribe
to a community solar project;
(C) Where an  electric company is the project manager, protect owners and subscribers from
undue financial hardship; and
(D) Protect the public interest.
(c) The commission may suspend the program [ adopted] established under this subsection if the
commission has good cause to suspend the program.
(3) A community solar project:
(a) Must  have at least one solar photovoltaic energy system with a minimum generating capacity
of 25 kilowatts;
(b) Must be located in this state; [ and]
(c) May be located anywhere in this state ;
(d) May be located within an electric company’s service territory  that is different from
the electric company’s service territory within which subscribers of the  community solar
project are located; and
(e) May have a nameplate capacity that is five megawatts or less .
(4) A project manager may offer  ownership in or subscriptions to a community solar project only
to consumers of electricity that are located:
(a) In this state; and
(b) In the service territory of an electric company.
(5)(a) A project manager may  offer proportional ownership in or proportional subscriptions to
a community solar project in any amount that does not exceed a  potential owner’s or potential
subscriber’s average annual consumption of electricity.
(b) Any value associated with the generation of electricity  in excess of an offer to own or sub-
scribe to a community solar project as limited  by paragraph (a) of this subsection must be used by
the electric company procuring electricity from the  community solar project in support of low-
income residential customers of the electric company.
(6)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, an electric company shall  credit
an owner’s or subscriber’s electric bill for the amount of electricity generated by a community solar
project for the owner or subscriber in a  manner that reflects the resource value of solar energy.
For purposes of this paragraph, the commission shall determine the resource value of solar energy.
(b) The commission may adopt a rate for an electric company to use in crediting an owner’s  or
subscriber’s electric bill other than the rate described in paragraph (a) of this subsection if the
commission has good cause to adopt the different rate.
(7) After public hearing, the Public Utility Commission  by order shall adopt a schedule
[2]
SB 92
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
establishing penalties that may be imposed on an electric company for  unreasonably delaying
the interconnection process for a community solar project and the time allowed for an elec-
tric company to take action necessary to correct the delay.
(8) The commission shall establish a cap on the total generating capacity of the  commu-
nity solar projects operating under the program established  under this section for which an
electric company is required to allow  to participate in the electric company’s service terri-
tory by the following amounts:
(a) For the calendar year 2026, no less than 4.5  percent of the electric company’s system
peak in the calendar year 2016.
(b) For the calendar year 2027, no less than 6.5  percent of the electric company’s system
peak in the calendar year 2016.
(c) For the calendar year 2028, no less than 8.5 percent  of the electric company’s system
peak in the calendar year 2016.
(d) For the calendar year 2029, no less than  10.5 percent of the electric company’s system
peak in the calendar year 2016.
(e) For the calendar year 2030, no less than 12.5  percent of the electric company’s system
peak in the calendar year 2016.
(f) For the calendar year 2031 and subsequent  calendar years, no less than 14.5 percent
of the electric company’s system peak in the calendar year 2016.
[(7)(a)] (9)(a) Except as  otherwise provided in this section, owners and subscribers shall bear the
costs and benefits of constructing and operating a community solar project.
(b) Costs incurred by an electric company under the terms of a power purchase agreement en-
tered into pursuant to subsection (2)(a)(D) of this section are recoverable in the rates of the  electric
company. Moneys collected pursuant to imposing those  rates, under the terms of a power purchase
agreement entered into pursuant to subsection (2)(a)(D) of  this section, may be transferred to a
project manager for the purpose of operating a community solar project.
(c) All start-up costs prudently incurred during the development or modification of the  program
established under this section are recoverable in the rates of an electric company.
(d) Owners and subscribers shall bear all ongoing  costs incurred during the continued adminis-
tration of the program established under this section.
[(8)] (10) Owners and subscribers own all renewable energy certificates established under  ORS
469A.130 that are associated with the generation of electricity by a community solar  project, in
proportion to the owner’s proportional ownership in  or the subscriber’s proportional subscription to
the community solar project.
[(9)] (11) As part of the program established under this section, the commission shall:
(a) Determine a methodology by which 10 percent of the total generating  capacity of the com-
munity solar  projects operated under the program will be made available for use by low-income
residential customers of electricity; and
(b) Periodically review and adjust the percentage described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
[(10)] (12) A subscription described in this section shall be considered a lease for  purposes of
ORS 307.092 and 307.112.
[3]