Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “southwest Oregon” means the  area composed
of:
(a) Coos County;
(b) Curry County;
(c) Douglas County;
(d) Jackson County;
(e) Josephine County;
(f) Klamath County; and
(g) Lane County.
(2) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall  establish a program to manage pop-
ulation levels of species that prey on salmon. The department shall operate the  program in
areas near waterways in southwest Oregon that:
(a) Contain locations used for the release of hatchery-raised  members of the family
Salmonidae, other than trout; or
(b) Are  used for a salmon enhancement project under ORS 496.435 to 496.455 or 496.458
conducted by the State Fish and Wildlife Commission.
(3) If the commission has determined  that a predator species described in subsection (2)
of this section is an endangered species or  a threatened species, notwithstanding ORS 496.171
to 496.182 the commission may not restrict the operation of the  department program de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section, alter salmon release sites or alter the operation of
salmon enhancement projects to protect the predator species.
(4) If a  predator species described in subsection (2) of this section has been listed as an
endangered species or a threatened species  under the Endangered Species Act of 1973 (P.L.
93-205), as amended, the department shall apply to  the appropriate federal agencies for any
waivers or permits necessary to allow the department to  carry out the program described
in subsection (2) of this section with regard to that species.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1382