Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. The Oregon Health Authority shall administer a program to provide match-
ing grants to sobering facilities registered under ORS 430.262. The authority  shall prescribe
the formula  for the allocation of moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly to carry
out this section. The formula shall take into account the community need  for sobering fa-
cilities and the availability of funding from other sources.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended for grants provided  under
section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 430.306 is amended to read:
430.306. As used in ORS 430.262, 430.315, 430.335, 430.342, 430.397, 430.399, 430.401,  430.402,
430.420 and 430.630 and section 1 of this 2019 Act , unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Alcoholic” means any person who has  lost the ability to control the use of alcoholic
beverages, or who  uses alcoholic beverages to the extent that the health of the person or that of
others is substantially impaired or endangered or the  social or economic function of the person is
substantially disrupted. An alcoholic  may be physically dependent, a condition in which the body
requires a continuing supply of alcohol  to avoid characteristic withdrawal symptoms, or
psychologically dependent, a condition characterized by an overwhelming mental  desire for contin-
ued use of alcoholic beverages.
(2) “Detoxification center” means a publicly or privately  operated profit or nonprofit facility
approved by the Oregon Health Authority that provides emergency  care or treatment for alcoholics
or drug-dependent persons.
(3) “Director of the treatment facility” means the person in charge of  treatment and rehabili-
tation programs at a treatment facility.
(4) “Drug-dependent person” means one who has lost the ability to control the personal use of
controlled substances or other substances with abuse potential, or who  uses such substances or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2395
HB 2339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
controlled substances to the extent  that the health of the person or that of others is substantially
impaired or endangered or the social or economic  function of the person is substantially disrupted.
A drug-dependent person may be physically dependent,  a condition in which the body requires a
continuing supply of a drug or controlled substance to avoid characteristic  withdrawal symptoms,
or psychologically dependent, a condition characterized by an overwhelming mental desire  for con-
tinued use of a drug or controlled substance.
(5) “Halfway house” means a  publicly or privately operated profit or nonprofit, residential fa-
cility  approved  by the authority that provides rehabilitative care and treatment for alcoholics or
drug-dependent persons.
(6) “Local planning committee” means a local  planning committee for alcohol and drug pre-
vention and treatment services appointed or designated by the county governing  body under ORS
430.342.
(7) “Police officer” means a member of a law enforcement unit  who is employed on a part-time
or full-time basis as a peace officer,  commissioned by a city, a county or the Department of State
Police and responsible  for enforcing the criminal laws of this state and any person formally
deputized by the law enforcement unit to take custody of a  person who is intoxicated or under the
influence of controlled substances.
(8) “Sobering facility” means a facility that meets all of the following criteria:
(a) The facility operates for the purpose of providing to individuals  who are acutely intoxicated
a safe, clean and supervised environment until the individuals are no longer acutely intoxicated.
(b) The  facility contracts with or is affiliated with a treatment program or a provider approved
by the authority to provide addiction treatment, and the  contract or affiliation agreement includes,
but is not limited  to, case consultation, training and advice and a plan for making referrals to ad-
diction  treatment.
(c) The facility, in consultation with the addiction treatment program or provider, has adopted
comprehensive written policies and procedures incorporating best practices for the  safety of
intoxicated individuals, employees of the facility and volunteers at the facility.
(d) The facility is registered with the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 430.262.
(9) “Treatment facility” includes outpatient facilities, inpatient facilities and other facilities the
authority determines suitable and that provide services that meet minimum standards  established
under ORS 430.357, any of which may provide diagnosis and evaluation, medical  care, detoxification,
social services or rehabilitation for alcoholics or drug-dependent persons and which operate in  the
form of a general hospital, a  state hospital, a foster home, a hostel, a clinic or other suitable form
approved by the authority.
SECTION 4.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
[2]