Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1238
SB 310
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 3 of this 2021 Act:
(1) “Face recognition” means the automated searching for a reference image in an image
repository by comparing the facial features of a probe image with the  features of images
contained in an image repository, and that typically results in either:
(a) One or more likely match candidates or candidate images, ranked by  computer-
evaluated similarity; or
(b) A negative result.
(2) “Face recognition technology” means an automated or semi-automated process using
face recognition that assists in identifying, verifying,  detecting or characterizing facial fea-
tures of an individual or capturing information about an  individual based on an individual’s
face.
(3) “Place of public accommodation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 659A.400.
(4) “Private entity” means a  nongovernmental entity, including but not limited to a cor-
poration, partnership, company, nonprofit organization or other legal entity or  natural per-
son.
(5) “Probe image” means a facial image captured from photo or video.
SECTION 2.
(1) Except as provided  in subsection (2) of this section, a private entity
within this state may not  use face recognition technology in a place of public accommo-
dation.
(2) A private entity may use face recognition technology:
(a) To the extent that such use is necessary to comply with federal, state or local laws;
(b) For verification purposes  to allow employees of the private entity to access their own
personal or employer-issued communication and electronic devices; or
(c) As part of automatic face detection services in social media applications.
(3) The Bureau  of Labor and Industries shall provide public education regarding the scope
and limitations of the provisions of this section.
(4) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor  and Industries may adopt rules to imple-
ment the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3.
(1)(a) A person injured by a material violation by a private entity of  section
2 of this 2021 Act may bring an action against the private entity in circuit court  for damages
or to obtain injunctive relief  or any other remedy that the court deems appropriate to re-
quire the private entity to comply with section 2 of this 2021 Act.
(b) The  court shall award to the prevailing plaintiff in an action under this section the
amount of damages sustained as a result of the violation or an amount  equal to $1,000 per
day for a continuing violation, whichever is greater.
(2) The court shall award reasonable  attorneys fees to the prevailing plaintiff in an action
under this section unless the court finds that:
(a) The plaintiff provided to the private entity defendant written  demand for the payment
of the claim not less than 30 days prior to the commencement of the action; and
(b) The private entity defendant tendered to the plaintiff, prior to the commencement of
the action, an amount not less than  the damages awarded to the plaintiff, exclusive of any
costs, interest and prevailing party fees.
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Face recognition technology” has the meaning given that term in section 1 of this
2021 Act.
[2]
SB 310
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
(b) “Place of public accommodation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 659A.400.
(c) “Private entity” has the meaning given that term in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
(2) The Bureau of Labor and Industries, in consultation with any relevant state  agencies,
shall study the adoption of a comprehensive framework for addressing  the appropriate use
or prohibition of face recognition technology and the information derived from face recogni-
tion technology in places of public accommodation.
(3) The study required by this section shall include:
(a) A review of the impacts  of the use of face recognition technology by private entities
in places of public accommodation, particularly with respect to the impacts such use has on
historically underserved communities;
(b) An assessment of the implications  the use of face recognition technology has on pri-
vate citizen rights to privacy and the protection of personal information;
(c) The identification of effective privacy assessment tools; and
(d) The evaluation of successful public engagement processes that  focus on historically
underserved communities.
(4) The bureau shall  provide the results of the study in a report that may include rec-
ommendations for legislation, in the  manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the interim Joint
Legislative Committee on  Information Management and Technology no later than September
15, 2023.
SECTION 5.
Section 4 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2024.
[3]