Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 408.425 is amended to read:
408.425. (1) Each county clerk who receives  a request to inspect veteran discharge papers that
are recorded under ORS 408.420 shall produce the recorded discharge papers for inspection if:
(a) The request for inspection is made in writing;
(b) The request sets forth the name, address and telephone number of the requester;
(c) The request sets forth the name and the date of birth or the last four digits of the Social
Security number of the veteran; and
(d) The request is made by:
(A) The veteran [ or the spouse, legal guardian or personal representative of the veteran ]; or
[(B) A county veterans’ service officer appointed under ORS 408.410; ]
[(C) A representative of the Department of Veterans’ Affairs; or ]
[(D)] (B)  A licensed funeral establishment seeking  to ascertain if a decedent was a veteran for
the purpose of obtaining veteran’s burial benefits.
(2) This section does not create a cause of action and  may not be asserted as the basis of a per
se negligence claim.
(3) Each county  clerk may adopt additional policies in order to protect recorded discharge pa-
pers from malicious or unlawful use and policies regarding copying of recorded discharge papers.
(4) Each county clerk shall maintain in the  records of the county clerk a copy of each request
for inspection of  recorded discharge information for a period of at least 10 years after the date the
request is received by the county clerk.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 192.390 is amended to read:
192.390. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 192.338,  192.345 and 192.355 and except as otherwise provided
in ORS 192.398, public records that are more than 25 years old shall be available for inspection.
(2) This section  does not apply to records that are exempt from disclosure pursuant to
ORS 192.355 (37) or 408.425.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 172