Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Teacher Standards and  Practices Commission shall by rule establish a
five-year pilot program to license teachers other than career and technical education teach-
ers in this state  in a manner similar to the career and technical education teaching license
program adopted by rule by the commission.
(2) The rules must:
(a) Allow for a school district, in partnership with a Regional  Educator Network estab-
lished by the Educator Advancement Council, to convene  an instructor appraisal committee.
(b) Target teacher candidates seeking to provide  classroom instruction on subjects other
than career and technical education, including but not limited to, math, science  and social
studies.
(c) Require teacher candidates to receive mentorship through the local Regional Educa-
tor Network.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed January 2, 2031.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1612