Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) This section applies to a county if:
(a) The county received  payments under the federal Secure Rural Schools Program for
the property tax year beginning on July 1, 2008, in an amount that was greater  than 10 per-
cent of the total ad valorem property taxes imposed by the county for  the property tax year
beginning on July 1, 2008; and
(b) The voters of the county approve a local option levy or a bond levy on or  after the
effective date of this 2017 Act and before January 1, 2020.
(2) The Department of Revenue shall make a grant for a property tax year to each county
described in subsection (1) of this section in an amount equal to the lesser of:
(a) The total amount of ad valorem property taxes imposed pursuant  to any local option
levy and bond levy of the county for the property tax year; or
(b) Fifty percent  of the payment received by the county under the federal Secure Rural
Schools Program during the property tax year beginning on July 1, 2008, less  any amount
received by the county under ORS 293.560 during  the property tax year beginning on July 1,
2008.
(3) The period  for which grants are made to any county under subsection (2) of this
section shall equal the lesser of:
(a) The number of property tax years for which the  local option levy or bond levy is ap-
proved by the voters; or
(b) Five consecutive property tax years.
(4) As soon as practicable after the assessor of a  county described in subsection (1) of
this section has made the certificate required under ORS  311.105 for any property tax year
in which the county imposes a local option levy or bond levy, the assessor shall notify  the
department of the information necessary  for the department to make a grant under this
section.
(5)(a) If, upon receipt of notice under subsection (4)  of this section, the department de-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4204
HB 3374
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
termines that the county is not  entitled to a grant, the department shall notify the county
of the determination.
(b) If  the department determines that the county is entitled to a grant, the department
shall make the grant in the amount determined  under subsection (2) of this section from
moneys in the Oregon County Assistance Fund established under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(6) The department may adopt rules governing the implementation of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon County Assistance Fund is  established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the fund shall be credited
to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Oregon County Assistance Fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the  Legislative As-
sembly;
(b) Other amounts deposited in or  donated to the fund from any source, public or private;
and
(c) Interest earned on moneys in the fund.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the  Department of Revenue for
the purpose of making grants under section 1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) Section 1 of this 2017 Act is repealed on July 1, 2025.
(2) Section 2 of this 2017 Act is repealed on July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4.
There is appropriated to the Department of Revenue, for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2017, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $  for deposit in the
Oregon County Assistance Fund for the purpose of carrying out  the provisions of section 1
of this 2017 Act. This appropriation is available continuously until expended  for the purpose
specified in this section.
SECTION 5. Any moneys  in the Oregon County Assistance Fund on July 1, 2026, that are
uncommitted for the purpose specified  in section 4 of this 2017 Act shall revert to the Gen-
eral Fund and be available for general governmental purposes.
SECTION 6. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]