Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 260.409 is amended to read:
260.409. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,  a candidate or principal
campaign committee  of a candidate may not use amounts received as contributions by the candidate
or committee to make an expenditure to or on behalf of :
(a) The candidate in consideration for the rendering of professional services  by the
candidate[ .]; or
(b) A business identified on the candidate’s statement of economic interest  that is re-
quired to  be listed under ORS 244.060 (1) or (2), in consideration for the rendering of profes-
sional services by the business.
(2) The prohibition set forth in subsection (1)(b) of this section does not apply to an ex-
penditure made by the candidate or committee to:
(a) A public body;
(b) A federal agency;
(c) A public utility;
(d) A  broadcasting station, newspaper, magazine or other regularly published news pub-
lication;
(e) A telecommunications service provider; or
(f) An Internet service provider that has a market share of greater than 50 percent  in
the area in which the Internet service is purchased.
(3) The Secretary of State may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.
SECTION 2.
The amendments  to ORS 260.409 by section 1 of this 2021 Act apply to
expenditures made by a candidate or principal campaign committee of a candidate on or after
the effective date of this 2021 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 953