Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Department of  Administrative Services shall study methods of
providing reparations for slavery to Black Oregonians and report to an appropriate commit-
tee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly no later than September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3022