Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 305.
SECTION 2. (1) A state contracting  agency, as defined in ORS 279A.010, as a condition
of the execution of a public  contract, as defined in ORS 279A.010, shall require the contractor
to demonstrate continued compliance with the personal income tax laws of this state or  the
corporate excise or income tax laws of this state, whichever are applicable.
(2) Any state contracting agency may, as  provided in section 4 of this 2025 Act, terminate
a public contract and seek damages and other relief available under  the terms of the public
contract or under applicable law if the  Department of Revenue determines that a contractor
has failed to demonstrate or maintain tax compliance as provided in this section.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 314.835 and 314.840, the  Department of Revenue may disclose to
a state contracting agency or a political subdivision of this state whether a proposer, bidder
or public contractor is in compliance.
(4) In determining compliance for purposes of this section, the  department may consider
whether the proposer, bidder or contractor:
(a) Has failed to timely  file returns with respect to taxes imposed by ORS chapter 316
or 317, whichever is applicable, for any of the three tax years  immediately preceding a year
for which a tax return was required to be filed;
(b) Has failed to pay any tax within 30  days from the date of mailing of a notice of defi-
ciency or otherwise  respond to a notice of deficiency within 30 days from the date of its
mailing; or
(c) Has been or is under investigation for possible criminal offenses related to the per-
sonal income tax laws of this state or the corporate excise and income tax  laws of this state,
whichever are applicable.
(5) The department may enter into agreements with any state contracting agency or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2235
HB 2084
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
political subdivision of this state in order to assist in  the administration of the tax compli-
ance requirement under this section.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2025 Act is added to and made  a part of ORS chapter 279A.
SECTION 4. (1) As used in  this section, “public contract” means a public contract, a
public improvement contract and a contract for public works, as defined in ORS 279C.800.
(2) Every public contract must include a representation and warranty  from the contrac-
tor that the contractor has complied with the tax laws of this state, or of a  political subdi-
vision of  this state, including but not limited to ORS 305.620 and ORS chapters 316, 317 and
318. Each public contract must also require a covenant from  the contractor to continue to
comply with the tax laws of this state, or of a political subdivision of this state, during the
term of the public contract and  provide that a contractor’s failure to comply with the tax
laws of this state, or of a political subdivision  of this state, before the contractor executed
the public contract or during the term of the public contract is a default for which a  con-
tracting agency may terminate the public contract and  seek damages and other relief avail-
able under the terms of the public contract or under applicable law.
(3) Before entering into a public contract, periodically during the  term of the public
contract and before terminating a public contract and seeking damages under  subsection (2)
of this section, a  contracting agency shall verify the contractor’s compliance with the tax
laws of this state, or of a political subdivision of  this state. The contracting agency shall
consult with the Department of Revenue  as provided in section 2 of this 2025 Act to verify
compliance with the tax laws of  this state. The contracting agency shall consult with the
appropriate agency of local government in the jurisdiction in which the contractor will per-
form the public  contract to verify compliance with the tax laws of a political subdivision of
this state.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 279B.110 is amended to read:
279B.110. (1) As part of a contracting agency’s  evaluation of a bid or proposal, the contracting
agency shall determine whether the bidder or proposer is responsible in accordance with the stan-
dards of responsibility  set forth in subsection (2) of this section. If the contracting agency deter-
mines that a bidder or proposer is not responsible,  the contracting agency shall provide the bidder
or proposer with written notice of the contracting agency’s determination.
(2) In order for a contracting agency to determine that a bidder or  proposer is responsible, the
bidder or proposer must demonstrate to the contracting agency that the bidder or proposer:
(a) Has available the appropriate financial, material, equipment, facility  and personnel resources
and expertise, or has the ability to obtain the resources and expertise, necessary  to meet all con-
tractual  responsibilities.
(b) Completed previous contracts of a similar nature with a  satisfactory record of performance.
For purposes of this paragraph, a satisfactory record of  performance means that to the extent that
the costs associated with and time available to perform a previous contract remained  within the
bidder’s or proposer’s control, the bidder or proposer  stayed within the time and budget allotted for
the procurement and otherwise performed the contract in a satisfactory manner. The  contracting
agency shall document the bidder’s or proposer’s record of performance if  the contracting agency
finds under this paragraph that the bidder or proposer is not responsible.
(c) Has a satisfactory record of integrity. The contracting agency in evaluating  the bidder’s or
proposer’s record of integrity may consider, among other things, whether the bidder or proposer  has
previous criminal convictions for offenses related  to obtaining or attempting to obtain a contract
[2]
HB 2084
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
or subcontract or in connection with the bidder’s or proposer’s performance of a contract or sub-
contract. The contracting agency shall document the bidder’s or proposer’s record of integrity if the
contracting agency finds under this paragraph that the bidder or proposer is not responsible.
(d) Is legally qualified to contract with the contracting agency.
(e) Complied with  the tax laws of the state or a political subdivision of the state, including ORS
305.620 and ORS chapters 316, 317 and 318  as provided in section 4 of this 2025 Act . [ The bidder
or proposer shall demonstrate compliance by attesting  to the bidder’s or proposer’s compliance in any
way the contracting agency deems credible and convenient. ]
(f) Possesses an  unexpired certificate that the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
issued under ORS 279A.167 if the bidder or  proposer employs 50 or more full-time workers and
submitted a bid or proposal for a procurement with an estimated contract price that  exceeds
$500,000 in response to an advertisement or solicitation from a state contracting agency.
(g) Supplied all necessary information in connection  with the inquiry concerning responsibility.
If a bidder or  proposer fails to promptly supply information concerning responsibility that the con-
tracting agency requests, the contracting agency shall determine the bidder’s  or proposer’s respon-
sibility based on available information or may find that the bidder or proposer is not responsible.
(h) Was not debarred by the contracting agency under ORS 279B.130.
(3) A contracting agency may refuse to disclose outside of  the contracting agency confidential
information furnished by a bidder or proposer under this section  when the bidder or proposer has
clearly identified in writing the information the bidder or proposer seeks to  have treated as confi-
dential and the contracting agency has authority under  ORS 192.311 to 192.478 to withhold the
identified information from disclosure.
SECTION 6.
ORS 279B.045 is repealed.
SECTION 7. Sections 2 and 4 of this 2025 Act, the amendments to ORS 279B.110 by sec-
tion 5 of this 2025 Act and the repeal of ORS 279B.045 by  section 6 of this 2025 Act apply to
procurements that  a contracting agency advertises on or after the operative date specified
in section 8 of this 2025  Act or, if the contracting agency does not advertise or solicit the
procurement, to  a public contract into which the contracting agency enters on or after the
operative date specified in section 8 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8. (1) Sections 2  and 4 of this 2025 Act, the amendments to ORS 279B.110 by
section 5 of this 2025 Act and the repeal of ORS  279B.045 by section 6 of this 2025 Act become
operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Attorney General, the Director of the Oregon  Department of Administrative
Services and a contracting agency that adopts rules under  ORS 279A.065 or 279A.070 may
adopt rules and take any other  action before the operative date specified in subsection (1)
of this section that is  necessary to enable the Attorney General, the director or the con-
tracting agency, on and after the operative date  specified in subsection (1) of this section,
to undertake and exercise  all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the Attorney
General, the director or the contracting agency by sections 2 and 4 of  this 2025 Act and the
amendments to ORS 279B.110 by section 5 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 9. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]