Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2024 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 660.002
to 660.210.
SECTION 2. (1) The Bureau of Labor and  Industries shall perform a comprehensive study
of youth apprenticeship programs in the United States.
(2) At a minimum, the study must examine:
(a) The connection  between youth apprenticeship programs designed exclusively for high
school students and adult apprenticeship programs designed  to include adults 18 to 24 years
of age to identify:
(A) Ways to increase coordination across those programs; and
(B) Flexible options to obtain industry-recognized credentials for students who enter into
a youth apprenticeship program during their junior or senior year of high school but who
will not complete the program before the student’s expected high school graduation date.
(b) The methods used to measure the term of apprenticeship, including:
(A) Time-based approaches that  require a specified minimum number of hours of on-
the-job learning;
(B) Competency-based approaches that measure skill acquisition  through an apprentice’s
successful demonstration of acquired skills and knowledge; and
(C) Hybrid approaches that combine the time-based and competency-based approaches.
(c) The potential for student representation  on local joint apprenticeship training com-
mittees.
(d) The feasibility of establishing a state-administered online portal for students  and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 255
HB 4118
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
employers to obtain information regarding youth apprenticeship programs, including  infor-
mation on how to participate in such programs as an apprentice or as a training agent.
(3) Using the findings of the study, the bureau shall:
(a) Identify best practices for registered youth apprenticeship programs; and
(b) Assess the  feasibility of establishing a youth apprenticeship framework that is capable
of being implemented on a statewide basis.
(4) The bureau may:
(a) Contract with a third party to assist  the bureau in conducting the study under this
section.
(b) Adopt rules necessary to carry out the requirements of this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) No later than June 30, 2024, the Bureau of Labor and Industries shall
provide a report to the interim committees  of the Legislative Assembly related to business
and labor. The report shall include  an evaluation and preliminary findings from the study
required under section 2 of this 2024 Act regarding youth apprenticeship programs  in other
states and regions that could serve as a  model for youth apprenticeship programs in this
state.
(2) No later than  November 15, 2024, the bureau shall provide a final report to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to business and labor.  The final report shall
include:
(a) The final and complete findings of the study carried out under section 2 of this 2024
Act;  and
(b) Recommendations for addressing barriers  to implementing a robust youth appren-
ticeship system in this state, including any recommendations  for changes to statutes, ad-
ministrative rules and education and outreach efforts conducted by the bureau.
SECTION 4. Sections 2 and 3 of this 2024 Act are repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 5.  This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]