Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The  Department of Transportation shall develop a corridor plan for
Interstate 5 and Interstate 205 between the  City of Portland and Vancouver, Washington.
The primary goal of this plan  is to develop proposed mitigation measures to substantially
reduce traffic congestion within the corridor. In developing  the plan, the department shall
evaluate existing transportation conditions along  the corridor and propose appropriate miti-
gation measures to address factors including, but not limited to, traffic congestion, safety,
environmental concerns and multimodal transportation needs.
(2) The plan must identify and prioritize potential improvements to enhance the  per-
formance of all modes of transportation along the corridor.
(3) In addition, the department shall develop a financing plan to finance the recommended
mitigation measures without imposing tolls.
(4) The  department shall submit the report on the corridor plan and financing plan re-
quired by subsections (1) and (3) of this section, and may include  recommendations for leg-
islation, to the Joint Committee on Transportation in the  manner provided under ORS
192.245 no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3021