Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The provisions of the Psychology  Interjurisdictional Compact are as follows:
PSYCHOLOGY INTERJURISDICTIONAL COMPACT (PSYPACT)
ARTICLE I. PURPOSE
Whereas states license psychologists, in  order to protect the public through verification
of education, training and experience and ensure  accountability for professional practice; and
Whereas this Compact is intended to regulate the day-to-day  practice of telepsychology
(i.e., the provision of psychological services using telecommunication technologies) by psy-
chologists across state  boundaries in the performance of their psychological practice as as-
signed by an appropriate authority; and
Whereas this Compact is intended  to regulate the temporary in-person, face-to-face
practice of  psychology by psychologists across state boundaries for 30 days within a calendar
year in the performance of their psychological practice as assigned  by an appropriate au-
thority; and
Whereas this Compact is intended  to authorize state psychology regulatory authorities
to afford legal recognition, in a manner  consistent with the terms of this Compact, to psy-
chologists licensed in other states; and
Whereas this Compact recognizes  that states have a vested interest in protecting the
public’s health and safety through their licensing and regulation of psychologists and that
such state regulation will best protect public health and safety; and
Whereas this Compact does not apply when a psychologist  is licensed in both the home
and receiving states; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4173
HB 3339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Whereas this Compact does not apply to permanent in-person, face-to-face practice,  this
Compact does allow for authorization of temporary psychological practice.
Consistent with these principles, this Compact is  designed to achieve the following pur-
poses and objectives:
(A) Increase  public access to professional psychological services by allowing for telepsy-
chological practice across state lines as  well as temporary in-person, face-to-face services
into a state in which the psychologist is not licensed to practice psychology;
(B) Enhance the states’ ability to protect the public’s health  and safety, especially
client/patient safety;
(C) Encourage the cooperation of Compact states in the areas of psychology licensure and
regulation;
(D) Facilitate the exchange of information between Compact states regarding  psychol-
ogist licensure, adverse actions and disciplinary history;
(E) Promote compliance with the laws governing psychological practice in each  Compact
state;  and
(F) Invest  all Compact states with the authority to hold licensed psychologists account-
able through the mutual recognition of Compact state licenses.
ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS
As used in this Compact, unless the context requires otherwise:
(A) “Adverse action” means any action taken by a state  psychology regulatory authority
which finds a  violation of a statute or regulation that is identified by the state psychology
regulatory authority as discipline and is a matter of public record.
(B) “Association of State  and Provincial Psychology Boards” or “ASPPB” means the re-
cognized membership organization composed of state and  provincial psychology regulatory
authorities responsible for the licensure and registration of psychologists throughout the
United States and Canada.
(C) “Authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology”  means a licensed
psychologist’s authority to practice  telepsychology, within the limits authorized under this
Compact, in another Compact state.
(D) “Bylaws” means the  bylaws established by the Psychology Interjurisdictional Com-
pact Commission pursuant to  Article X of this Compact for its governance, or for directing
and controlling its actions and conduct.
(E) “Client/patient” means  the recipient of psychological services, whether psychological
services are delivered in the context of health care, corporate, supervision or  consulting
services.
(F) “Commissioner” means the voting representative appointed by each state psychology
regulatory authority pursuant to Article X of this Compact.
(G) “Compact state”  means a state, the District of Columbia or a United States territory
that has enacted the Compact legislation  and which has not withdrawn pursuant to Article
XIII, Section C of this Compact, or been terminated  pursuant to Article XII, Section B of
this Compact.
(H) “Confidentiality” means the principle that data or information is not  made available
or disclosed to unauthorized persons or processes.
(I) “Coordinated  licensure information system” or “coordinated database” means an in-
tegrated process  for collecting, storing and sharing information on psychologists’ licensure
[2]
HB 3339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and enforcement activities related to psychology licensure  laws, which is administered by the
recognized membership organization composed of state and provincial psychology regulatory
authorities.
(J) “Day” means any part of a day in which psychological work is performed.
(K) “Distant state” means the Compact state where a psychologist is physically present
(not through the use of  telecommunications technologies), to provide temporary in-person,
face-to-face psychological services.
(L) “E.  Passport” means a certificate issued by the ASPPB that promotes standardization
in the criteria of interjurisdictional telepsychology practice and facilitates  the process for
licensed psychologists to provide telepsychological services across state lines.
(M) “Executive board” means a group of directors elected or appointed to  act on behalf
of, and within the powers granted to them by, the Commission.
(N) “Home state” means a Compact state where a psychologist  is licensed to practice
psychology. If the psychologist is licensed in more than one Compact state and  is practicing
under the authorization to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology, the home state  is the
Compact state where the psychologist is physically present when the telepsychological  ser-
vices are delivered. If  the psychologist is licensed in more than one Compact state and is
practicing under the temporary authorization  to practice, the home state is any Compact
state where the psychologist is licensed.
(O) “Identity history  summary” means a summary of information retained by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation, or another designee with similar  authority, in connection with ar-
rests and, in some instances, federal employment, naturalization or military service.
(P) “In-person, face-to-face” means interactions in which the psychologist and  the
client/patient are in the same physical space and which does not include  interactions that
may occur through the use of telecommunication technologies.
(Q) “Interjurisdictional practice certificate” or “IPC” means a  certificate issued by the
ASPPB that grants temporary authority to practice based on notification to the state psy-
chology regulatory authority  of intention to practice temporarily, and verification of one’s
qualifications for such practice.
(R) “License” means authorization by a state  psychology regulatory authority to engage
in the independent practice of psychology, which would be unlawful  without the authori-
zation.
(S) “Non-Compact state” means any state which is not at the time a Compact state.
(T) “Psychologist”  means an individual licensed for the independent practice of psychol-
ogy.
(U) “Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact Commission” or “Commission” means  the
national administration of which all Compact states are members.
(V) “Receiving state”  means a Compact state where the client/patient is physically lo-
cated when the telepsychological services are delivered.
(W) “Rule” means a written statement  by the Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact
Commission promulgated pursuant to  Article XI of this Compact that is of general applica-
bility, implements, interprets or prescribes a policy or provision of this Compact  or an or-
ganizational, procedural or practical requirement of the Commission, has the force and effect
of statutory law in a Compact state, subject  to Article XI, Section (B)(2) of this Compact,
and includes the amendment, repeal or suspension of an existing rule.
[3]
HB 3339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(X) “Significant investigatory information” means:
(1) Investigative  information that a state psychology regulatory authority, after a pre-
liminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity to respond if required by state
law, has reason  to believe, if proven true, would indicate more than a violation of state
statute or ethics  code that would be considered more substantial than a minor infraction;
or
(2) Investigative information  that indicates that the psychologist represents an immedi-
ate threat to public health  and safety regardless of whether the psychologist has been noti-
fied or had an opportunity to respond.
(Y) “State” means:
(1) A state, commonwealth, territory or possession of the United States; or
(2) The District of Columbia.
(Z) “State psychology regulatory authority” means the board, office or other agency  with
the legislative mandate to license and regulate the practice of psychology.
(AA)  “Telepsychology”  means the provision of psychological services using telecommu-
nication technologies.
(BB) “Temporary authorization to practice” means a licensed  psychologist’s authority to
conduct temporary in-person, face-to-face practice, within  the limits authorized under this
Compact, in another Compact state.
(CC) “Temporary in-person, face-to-face practice” means where a psychologist is phys-
ically present (not through the use of  telecommunications technologies) in the distant state
to provide for the  practice of psychology for 30 days within a calendar year and based on
notification to the distant state.
ARTICLE III. HOME STATE LICENSURE
(A) The home state shall be a Compact state where  a psychologist is licensed to practice
psychology.
(B) A psychologist may hold one or more Compact state licenses at a time. If the  psy-
chologist is licensed in more than one  Compact state, the home state is the Compact state
where the psychologist is  physically present when the services are delivered as authorized
by the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology under the terms of  this Com-
pact.
(C) Any  Compact state may require a psychologist not previously licensed in a Compact
state to obtain and retain a license  to be authorized to practice in the Compact state under
circumstances not authorized by the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology
under the terms of this Compact.
(D) Any Compact state  may require a psychologist to obtain and retain a license to be
authorized to practice in a Compact state  under circumstances not authorized by a tempo-
rary authorization to practice under the terms of this Compact.
(E) A home state’s license authorizes a psychologist to practice in a receiving state under
the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology only if the Compact state:
(1) Currently requires the psychologist to hold an active E. Passport;
(2) Has a mechanism  in place for receiving and investigating complaints about licensed
individuals;
(3) Notifies the Commission, in compliance with  the terms herein, of any adverse action
or significant investigatory information regarding a licensed individual;
[4]
HB 3339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) Requires an identity history summary of all applicants  at initial licensure, including
the use of the results of  fingerprints or other biometric data checks compliant with the re-
quirements of the Federal Bureau of Investigation,  or another designee with similar au-
thority, no later than 10 years after activation of this Compact; and
(5) Subject to Article XI, Section (B)(2) of this  Compact, complies with the bylaws and
rules of the Commission.
(F) A home state’s  license grants temporary authorization to practice to a psychologist
in a distant state only if the Compact state:
(1) Currently requires the psychologist to hold an active IPC;
(2) Has a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating  complaints about licensed
individuals;
(3) Notifies the Commission, in compliance with the  terms herein, of any adverse action
or significant investigatory information regarding a licensed individual;
(4) Requires an identity history  summary of all applicants at initial licensure, including
the use of the results of fingerprints or other biometric data  checks compliant with the re-
quirements of the Federal Bureau of Investigation,  or another designee with similar au-
thority, no later than 10 years after activation of this Compact; and
(5) Subject to Article XI, Section (B)(2)  of this Compact, complies with the bylaws and
rules of the Commission.
ARTICLE IV.
COMPACT PRIVILEGE TO PRACTICE TELEPSYCHOLOGY
(A) Compact states shall recognize the right of a  psychologist, licensed in a Compact
state in conformance with Article III of this Compact, to practice telepsychology in other
Compact states (receiving states) in which the  psychologist is not licensed, under the au-
thority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology as provided in this Compact.
(B) To  exercise the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology under the
terms and provisions of this Compact, a psychologist  licensed to practice in a Compact state
must:
(1) Subject to subsection  (9) of this Section, hold a graduate degree in psychology from
an institute of higher education that was, at the time the degree was awarded:
(a) Regionally accredited by an accrediting  body recognized by the United States De-
partment of Education to grant graduate degrees, or authorized by  provincial statute or
royal charter of Canada to grant doctoral degrees; or
(b) A foreign college or  university deemed to be equivalent to an institute described in
subsection (1)(a) of this Section  by a foreign credential evaluation service that is a member
of the National Association of Credential  Evaluation Services, or its successor organization,
or by a recognized foreign credential evaluation service;
(2) Hold a graduate degree in psychology from a program that meets the following crite-
ria:
(a) The program, wherever it may be administratively  housed, must be clearly identified
and labeled as a psychology program. Such a program  must specify in pertinent institutional
catalogues and brochures its intent to educate and train professional psychologists;
(b) The psychology program must stand as a  recognizable, coherent and organizational
entity within the institution;
(c) There must be a clear authority and primary  responsibility for the core and specialty
[5]
HB 3339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
areas whether or not the program cuts across administrative lines;
(d) The program must consist of an integrated, organized sequence of study;
(e) There must be an identifiable psychology faculty sufficient in size and breadth to
carry out its responsibilities;
(f) The designated director of the program must be a psychologist and a member of  the
core faculty;
(g) The program must  have an identifiable body of students who are matriculated in that
program for a degree;
(h) The program must include supervised practicum, internship or field  training appro-
priate to the practice of psychology;
(i) The curriculum  shall encompass a minimum of three academic years of full-time
graduate study for doctoral degrees and  a minimum of one academic year of full-time grad-
uate study for master’s degrees; and
(j) The  program includes an acceptable residency as defined by the rules of the Commis-
sion;
(3) Possess a current, full and  unrestricted license to practice psychology in a home state
which is a Compact state;
(4) Have no history of adverse action that violates the rules of the Commission;
(5) Have no criminal record  history reported on an identity history summary that vio-
lates the rules of the Commission;
(6) Possess a current, active E. Passport;
(7) Provide attestations in regard to areas of  intended practice, conformity with stan-
dards of  practice, competence in telepsychology technology, criminal background and
knowledge and adherence to legal requirements in the home and receiving states, and provide
a release of information to allow for primary source verification in  a manner specified by the
Commission and adopted by the Oregon Board of Psychology by rule; and
(8) Subject to Article XI, Section (B)(2) of this Compact, meet  other criteria as defined
by the rules of the Commission.
(9) The Oregon Board of Psychology may adopt by rule accreditation standards for in-
stitutes of higher education described in subsection (1) of this  Section. The State of Oregon
is subject only to accreditation standards adopted by the board by rule.
(C) The home state maintains authority over the license of  any psychologist practicing
into a receiving state under the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology.
(D) A psychologist practicing into  a receiving state under the authority to practice
interjurisdictional telepsychology will be subject to the receiving state’s scope of practice. A
receiving state may, in accordance with that state’s due process law, limit or  revoke a
psychologist’s authority to practice  interjurisdictional telepsychology in the receiving state
and may take any other necessary actions under the receiving  state’s applicable law to pro-
tect the health and safety of  the receiving state’s citizens. If a receiving state takes action,
the receiving state shall promptly notify the home state and the Commission.
(E) If a psychologist’s license in any home state or another Compact  state, or any au-
thority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology in any receiving state, is  restricted,
suspended or otherwise limited, the  psychologist’s E. Passport shall be revoked and therefore
the psychologist shall not  be eligible to practice telepsychology in a Compact state under the
authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology.
[6]
HB 3339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ARTICLE V.
COMPACT TEMPORARY AUTHORIZATION TO PRACTICE
(A) Compact states shall also recognize the right of a psychologist,  licensed in a Compact
state in conformance with Article III of this Compact,  to practice temporarily in other
Compact states  (distant states) in which the psychologist is not licensed, as provided in this
Compact.
(B) To exercise  the temporary authorization to practice under the terms and provisions
of this Compact, a psychologist licensed to practice in a Compact state must:
(1) Subject to Article  IV, Section (B)(9) of this Compact, hold a graduate degree in psy-
chology from an institute of higher education that  was, at the time the degree was awarded:
(a) Regionally accredited by an accrediting body recognized  by the United States De-
partment of Education to grant graduate degrees  or authorized by provincial statute or royal
charter of Canada to grant doctoral degrees; or
(b) A foreign college or  university deemed to be equivalent to an institute described in
subsection (1)(a) of this Section  by a foreign credential evaluation service that is a member
of the National Association of Credential Evaluation Services or by  a recognized foreign
credential evaluation service;
(2) Hold a graduate degree in psychology from a program that meets the following crite-
ria:
(a) The program, wherever it may  be administratively housed, must be clearly identified
and labeled as a psychology program. Such a program  must specify in pertinent institutional
catalogues and brochures its intent to educate and train professional psychologists;
(b) The psychology program must  stand as a recognizable, coherent and organizational
entity within the institution;
(c) There must be a clear authority and primary  responsibility for the core and specialty
areas whether or not the program cuts across administrative lines;
(d) The program must consist of an integrated, organized sequence of study;
(e) There must be an identifiable psychology faculty sufficient in size and breadth to
carry out its responsibilities;
(f) The designated director of the program must be a psychologist and a member of the
core faculty;
(g) The program must  have an identifiable body of students who are matriculated in that
program for a degree;
(h) The program  must include supervised practicum, internship or field training appro-
priate to the practice of psychology;
(i) The curriculum shall encompass a minimum of three academic years  of full-time
graduate study for doctoral degrees and a minimum of one  academic year of full-time grad-
uate study for master’s degrees; and
(j) The program includes an acceptable residency as defined by the rules of the  Commis-
sion and adopted by the Oregon Board of Psychology by rule;
(3) Possess a current, full and  unrestricted license to practice psychology in a home state
which is a Compact state;
(4) Have no history of adverse action that violates the rules of the Commission;
(5) Have no criminal record history that violates the rules of the Commission;
(6) Possess a current, active IPC;
[7]
HB 3339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(7) Provide attestations in regard  to areas of intended practice and work experience and
provide a release of information  to allow for primary source verification in a manner speci-
fied by the Commission and adopted by the board by rule; and
(8) Subject to Article XI, Section (B)(2) of this Compact, meet  other criteria as defined
by the rules of the Commission.
(C) A psychologist  practicing into a distant state under the temporary authorization to
practice shall practice within the scope of practice authorized by the distant state.
(D) A psychologist practicing into a distant state  under the temporary authorization to
practice will be subject to the  distant state’s authority and law. A distant state may, in ac-
cordance with that  state’s due process law, limit or revoke a psychologist’s temporary au-
thorization to practice in the distant state and may take any  other necessary actions under
the distant state’s applicable law to protect  the health and safety of the distant state’s citi-
zens. If a distant state takes action, the distant state shall promptly notify  the home state
and the Commission.
(E) If a psychologist’s license in any home state or another Compact  state, or any tem-
porary authorization to practice in any distant state, is restricted, suspended  or otherwise
limited, the psychologist’s IPC shall be revoked and therefore the psychologist  shall not be
eligible to practice in a Compact state under the temporary authorization to practice.
ARTICLE VI.
CONDITIONS OF TELEPSYCHOLOGY PRACTICE IN A RECEIVING STATE
A psychologist may practice in a receiving state under the authority to  practice interju-
risdictional telepsychology only in the performance of the  scope of practice for psychology
as assigned by an  appropriate state psychology regulatory authority, as defined in the rules
of the Commission, and under the following circumstances:
(A) The psychologist  initiates a client/patient contact in a home state via telecommuni-
cations technologies with a client/patient who is in a receiving state; and
(B) Subject to Article XI, Section (B)(2) of this Compact, other conditions regarding
telepsychology as determined by rules of the Commission.
ARTICLE VII. ADVERSE ACTIONS
(A) A home state shall have the power to impose adverse action against a  psychologist’s
license issued by the home  state. A distant state shall have the power to take adverse action
on a psychologist’s temporary authorization to practice within that distant state.
(B) A receiving state may take adverse action on a  psychologist’s authority to practice
interjurisdictional telepsychology within that receiving state.  A home state may take adverse
action against a psychologist based on an adverse action taken by a distant state regarding
temporary in-person, face-to-face practice.
(C) If a home state takes adverse  action against a psychologist’s license, that
psychologist’s authority  to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology is terminated and the
E. Passport is revoked. Furthermore, that psychologist’s temporary  authorization to prac-
tice is terminated and the IPC is revoked.
(1) All home state disciplinary orders which impose adverse action shall be reported  to
the Commission in accordance with the rules promulgated by  the Commission. A Compact
state shall report adverse actions in accordance with the rules of the Commission.
(2) In  the event discipline is reported on a psychologist, the psychologist will not be eli-
gible for telepsychology or temporary in-person, face-to-face practice  in accordance with the
[8]
HB 3339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
rules of the Commission.
(3) Subject to Article XI, Section (B)(2) of this Compact, other actions  may be imposed
as determined by the rules of the Commission.
(D) A home state’s state psychology regulatory  authority shall investigate and take ap-
propriate action with respect  to reported inappropriate conduct engaged in by a licensee
which occurred in a receiving state as it would if such conduct had occurred by a licensee
within the home state.  In such cases, the home state’s law shall control in determining any
adverse action against a psychologist’s license.
(E) A distant state’s state psychology regulatory authority shall investigate and take
appropriate action with respect to reported inappropriate conduct engaged in by a psychol-
ogist practicing under a temporary authorization to practice which  occurred in that distant
state as it would if such conduct had occurred by  a licensee within the home state. In such
cases, the distant state’s law shall control in determining  any adverse action against a
psychologist’s temporary authorization to practice.
(F) Nothing in this Compact shall override a Compact state’s decision that a
psychologist’s participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu of  adverse action
and that such participation shall remain nonpublic  if required by the Compact state’s law.
Compact states must require psychologists who  enter any alternative programs to not
practice telepsychology under the authority to practice interjurisdictional  telepsychology or
provide temporary psychological services under the temporary authorization  to practice in
any other Compact state during the term of the alternative program.
(G) No  other judicial or administrative remedies shall be available to a psychologist in
the event a Compact state  imposes an adverse action pursuant to Section (C) of this Article.
ARTICLE VIII.
ADDITIONAL AUTHORITIES INVESTED IN A COMPACT STATE’S STATE  PSYCHOL-
OGY REGULATORY AUTHORITY
(A) In addition to  any other powers granted under state law, a Compact state’s state
psychology regulatory authority shall have the authority under this Compact to:
(1) Issue subpoenas, for both hearings and  investigations, which require the attendance
and testimony of  witnesses and the production of evidence. Subject to ORS 24.500, subpoenas
issued by a Compact state’s state psychology  regulatory authority for the attendance and
testimony of witnesses or the production  of evidence from another Compact state shall be
enforced in the latter state by any  court of competent jurisdiction, according to that court’s
practice and procedure in considering subpoenas  issued in its own proceedings. The issuing
state psychology regulatory authority shall pay  any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage
and other fees required by the service statutes of the state where the witnesses  or evidence
are located; and
(2) Issue cease and desist or injunctive relief orders to revoke a psychologist’s authority
to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology or temporary authorization to practice.
(3) During the course of any investigation, a psychologist may  not change the
psychologist’s home state licensure. A home state’s state psychology  regulatory authority is
authorized to complete any pending investigations of a psychologist  and to take any actions
appropriate under  its law. The home state’s state psychology regulatory authority shall
promptly report the conclusions of such investigations to the Commission. Once an  investi-
gation has been completed, and  pending the outcome of said investigation, the psychologist
[9]
HB 3339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
may change the psychologist’s home state licensure.  The Commission shall promptly notify
the new home state of any such decisions  as provided in the rules of the Commission. All
information provided to the Commission or distributed by Compact states pursuant  to the
psychologist shall be confidential, filed under seal and used for investigatory  or disciplinary
matters. Subject to Article XI, Section (B)(2) of this Compact, the  Commission may create
additional rules for mandated or discretionary sharing of information by Compact states.
ARTICLE IX.
COORDINATED LICENSURE INFORMATION SYSTEM
(A) The Commission shall provide for the  development and maintenance of a coordinated
licensure information system (coordinated database) and reporting system containing
licensure and disciplinary action information on all psychologists to  whom this Compact is
applicable in all Compact states as defined by the rules of the Commission.
(B) Subject to ORS 676.177, but notwithstanding  any other provision of state law to the
contrary, a Compact state shall submit a uniform data  set to the coordinated database on
all licensees as required by the rules of the Commission, including:
(1) Identifying information;
(2) Licensure data;
(3) Significant investigatory information;
(4) Adverse actions against a psychologist’s license;
(5) An indicator that a psychologist’s authority to practice  interjurisdictional telepsy-
chology or temporary authorization to practice is revoked;
(6) Nonconfidential information related to alternative program  participation information;
(7) Any denial of application for licensure, and the reasons for such denial; and
(8) Subject to Article XI,  Section (B)(2) of this Compact, other information which may
facilitate the administration of this Compact, as  determined by the rules of the Commission.
(C) The coordinated database  administrator shall promptly notify all Compact states of
any adverse action  taken against, or significant investigatory information on, any licensee
in a Compact state.
(D) Compact states reporting  information to the coordinated database may designate in-
formation that may not be shared with the  public without the express permission of the
Compact state reporting the information.
(E) Any information  submitted to the coordinated database that is subsequently required
to be expunged by the law of the Compact  state reporting the information shall be removed
from the coordinated database.
ARTICLE X.
ESTABLISHMENT OF THE PSYCHOLOGY INTERJURISDICTIONAL  COMPACT COM-
MISSION
(A) The Compact states hereby create  and establish a joint public agency known as the
Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact Commission.
(1) The Commission is a body politic and an instrumentality of the Compact states.
(2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against  the Commission shall be
brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent  jurisdiction where the principal office
of the Commission  is located. The Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses
to the  extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution pro-
ceedings.
[10]
HB 3339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity.
(B) Membership, Voting and Meetings
(1) The Commission shall consist of one voting  representative appointed by each Compact
state who shall serve as that state’s commissioner.  The state psychology regulatory au-
thority shall  appoint its delegate. This delegate shall be empowered to act on behalf of the
Compact state. This delegate shall be limited to:
(a) An executive director, an executive secretary or a similar executive;
(b) A current member of the  state psychology regulatory authority of a Compact state;
or
(c) A designee empowered with  the appropriate delegate authority to act on behalf of the
Compact state.
(2) Any commissioner may be removed or suspended from office  as provided by the law
of the state from which the commissioner is appointed. Any vacancy  occurring in the Com-
mission shall be filled in accordance with the  laws of the Compact state in which the vacancy
exists.
(3) Each commissioner shall be entitled  to one vote with regard to the promulgation of
rules and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have an  opportunity to participate in the
business and affairs of the Commission. A  commissioner shall vote in person or by such
other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may  provide for commissioners’ partic-
ipation in meetings by telephone or other means of communication.
(4) The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional
meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws.
(5) All meetings shall be open to the public,  and public notice of meetings shall be given
in the same manner as required  under the rulemaking provisions in Article XI of this Com-
pact.
(6) The Commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic  meeting if the Commission must
discuss:
(a) Noncompliance of a Compact state with its obligations under this Compact;
(b) The employment, compensation, discipline or other personnel matters,  practices or
procedures related to specific  employees or other matters related to the Commission’s
internal personnel practices and procedures;
(c) Current, threatened or reasonably anticipated litigation against the Commission;
(d) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase or sale of goods, services or real estate;
(e) Accusation against any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
(f) Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or  financial information which is privileged
or confidential;
(g) Disclosure of  information of a personal nature when disclosure would constitute a
clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
(h) Disclosure of investigatory records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
(i) Disclosure of information related to any investigatory reports prepared by or on behalf
of or for the use of the Commission or another committee charged  with responsibility for
investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to this Compact; or
(j) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal and state statute.
(7) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant to  subsection (6) of this
Section, the Commission’s legal counsel or designee shall certify that the meeting may  be
[11]
HB 3339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
closed and shall reference each relevant exempting  provision. The Commission shall keep
minutes which fully  and clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide
a full and accurate summary of actions taken, of  any person participating in the meeting,
and the  reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed. All documents
considered in connection with  an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and
documents of a closed meeting  shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a majority
vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
(C) Subject to Article XI,  Section (B)(2) of this Compact, the Commission shall, by a
majority vote of the commissioners, prescribe bylaws and rules to govern its conduct  as may
be necessary or appropriate to  carry out the purposes and exercise the powers of this Com-
pact. The State of Oregon is subject to the bylaws only insofar as the Oregon  Board of Psy-
chology approves by  rule bylaws prescribed under this Section. The Commission shall
prescribe bylaws and rules including, but not limited to:
(1) Establishing the fiscal year of the Commission;
(2) Providing reasonable standards and procedures:
(a) For the establishment and meetings of other committees; and
(b) Governing any general or specific delegation  of any authority or function of the
Commission;
(3) Providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meetings of the Commis-
sion, ensuring reasonable advance notice of all meetings  and providing an opportunity for
attendance of such meetings by  interested parties, with enumerated exceptions designed to
protect the public’s interest, the privacy of individuals of such  proceedings, and proprietary
information, including trade secrets. The Commission may meet in  closed session only after
a majority  of the commissioners vote to close a meeting to the public in whole or in part.
As soon as practicable,  the Commission must make public a copy of the vote to close the
meeting revealing the vote of each commissioner with no proxy votes allowed;
(4) Establishing the titles, duties and authority and reasonable procedures  for the
election of the officers of the Commission;
(5) Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the establishment  of the personnel
policies and programs of the Commission. Notwithstanding any civil service or other similar
law of any  Compact state, the bylaws shall exclusively govern the personnel policies and
programs of the Commission;
(6) Promulgating a code of ethics to address permissible  and prohibited activities of
Commission members and employees;
(7) Providing a mechanism  for concluding the operations of the Commission and the eq-
uitable disposition of any surplus funds that may exist after the termination of this Compact
after the payment and reserving of all of its debts and obligations;
(8) The Commission  shall publish its bylaws in a convenient form and file a copy thereof
and a copy of  any amendment thereto with the appropriate agency or officer in each of the
Compact states;
(9) The Commission shall  maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
and
(10) The Commission shall  meet and take such actions as are consistent with the pro-
visions of this Compact and the bylaws.
(D) The  Commission shall have the following powers, except that an action undertaken
[12]
HB 3339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
by the Commission is binding on the State  of Oregon only if the board approves by rule the
action undertaken:
(1) The authority  to promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and coordinate implementa-
tion and administration of this Compact. Subject to Article XI, Section (B)(2) of this  Com-
pact, the rules shall have the force and effect of law and  shall be binding in all Compact
states;
(2) To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the  Commission,
provided that the standing of any state psychology  regulatory authority or other regulatory
body responsible for psychology licensure to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not
be affected;
(3) To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
(4) To borrow, accept or contract for services of personnel,  including, but not limited to,
employees of a Compact state;
(5) To hire employees, to elect or appoint officers, to fix  compensation, to define duties,
to grant such  individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of this Compact
and to  establish the Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of
interest, qualifications of personnel and other related personnel matters;
(6) To accept any  and all appropriate donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies,
materials and services, and to  receive, utilize and dispose of the same, provided that at all
times the Commission shall strive to  avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of in-
terest;
(7) To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of,  own, hold, improve or
use any property, real, personal  or mixed, provided that at all times the Commission shall
strive to avoid any appearance of impropriety;
(8) To sell, convey,  mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon or otherwise dispose of
any property, real, personal or mixed;
(9) To establish a budget and make expenditures;
(10) To borrow money;
(11) To appoint committees, including  advisory committees comprised of members, state
regulators, state legislators or their representatives, consumer representatives  and such
other interested persons as may be designated in this Compact and the bylaws;
(12) To provide and receive information from,  and to cooperate with, law enforcement
agencies;
(13) To adopt and use an official seal; and
(14) To perform such other functions as may be necessary  or appropriate to achieve the
purposes of this Compact consistent with the state regulation of  psychology licensure, tem-
porary in-person, face-to-face practice and telepsychology practice.
(E) The Executive Board
(1) The elected officers shall  serve as the executive board, which shall have the power
to act on behalf of the Commission according to the terms of this Compact.
(2) The executive board shall be comprised of six members:
(a) Five voting members who are  elected from the current membership of the Commis-
sion by the Commission; and
(b) One ex-officio,  nonvoting member from the recognized membership organization
composed of state and provincial psychology regulatory authorities.
[13]
HB 3339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) The ex-officio member must have served as  staff or a member on a state psychology
regulatory authority and will be selected by its respective organization.
(4) The Commission may remove any member of the executive board  as provided in the
bylaws.
(5) The executive board shall meet at least annually.
(6) The executive board shall have the following duties and responsibilities:
(a) Recommend to the entire Commission changes to the rules or bylaws,  changes to this
Compact legislation,  fees paid by Compact states such as annual dues and any other appli-
cable fees;
(b) Ensure Compact administration  services are appropriately provided, contractual or
otherwise;
(c) Prepare and recommend the budget;
(d) Maintain financial records on behalf of the Commission;
(e) Monitor Compact compliance of member states and provide compliance reports to the
Commission;
(f) Establish additional committees as necessary; and
(g) Other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws.
(F) Financing of the Commission
(1) The Commission  shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of
its establishment, organization and ongoing activities.
(2) The Commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources,  donations and
grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services.
(3)(a) The Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from  each Compact
state or impose fees on other parties to cover the cost of the operations and activities of  the
Commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient  to cover its annual
budget as approved each year for which revenue is not provided by other sources.  The ag-
gregate annual assessment  amount shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined
by the Commission which shall promulgate a rule binding upon all Compact States.
(b) An assessment levied, or any other financial obligation  imposed, under this Compact
is effective against the State of Oregon only to the extent  that moneys necessary to pay the
assessment or meet  the financial obligation have been deposited in the Psychology Interju-
risdictional Compact Account established under section 4 of this 2025 Act.
(4) The Commission shall not incur obligations of  any kind prior to securing the funds
adequate to meet the same, nor shall the Commission pledge the credit  of any of the Com-
pact states, except by and with the authority of the Compact state.
(5) The Commission shall keep accurate accounts  of all receipts and disbursements. The
receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be  subject to the audit and accounting
procedures established under  its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds
handled by the Commission shall be audited yearly by  a certified or licensed public account-
ant and the report  of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of
the Commission.
(G) Qualified Immunity, Defense and Indemnification
(1) The members, officers, executive director, employees and  representatives of the
Commission shall be  immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official ca-
pacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil li-
[14]
HB 3339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred,
or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis  for believing oc-
curred within the scope of Commission employment, duties or responsibilities, provided  that
nothing in this subsection shall be construed  to protect any such person from suit or liability
for any damage, loss, injury or liability caused by the intentional or  willful or wanton mis-
conduct of that person.
(2) The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director, employee  or
representative of the Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising  out
of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is made
had a  reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment,
duties or responsibilities, provided that nothing herein shall  be construed to prohibit that
person from retaining his or her own counsel,  and provided further that the actual or alleged
act, error  or omission did not result from that person’s intentional or willful or wanton
misconduct.
(3) The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless  any member, officer, executive
director, employee or representative of the Commission for the amount of  any settlement
or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual  or alleged act, error or
omission that occurred within the scope of Commission  employment, duties or responsibil-
ities, or that such person had a  reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act,
error or omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.
ARTICLE XI. RULEMAKING
(A) The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to  the criteria set
forth in this Article and the rules adopted thereunder. Subject to subsection  (2) of this Sec-
tion, rules and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in each proposed
rule or amendment.
(B)(1) If a majority of the legislatures of the Compact states rejects a  rule, by enactment
of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt this Compact, then such rule
shall have no further force and effect in any Compact state.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of  this Section, the Oregon Board of Psychology shall
review the rules of the Commission. The board may  approve and adopt the rules of the
Commission as rules of  the board. The State of Oregon is subject to a rule of the Commission
only if the rule of the Commission is adopted by the board.
(C) Proposed rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at  a regular or special
meeting of the Commission.
(D) Prior to promulgation and adoption of a proposed final rule or  rules by the Commis-
sion, and at least 60 days in advance of the meeting  at which the proposed rule will be con-
sidered and voted upon, the Commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking:
(1) On the website of the Commission; and
(2) On the website of each Compact state’s  state psychology regulatory authority or the
publication in which each state would otherwise publish proposed rules.
(E) The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
(1) The proposed time, date and location  of the meeting in which the proposed rule will
[15]
HB 3339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
be considered and voted upon;
(2) The text of the proposed rule or amendment and the reason for the proposed rule;
(3) A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and
(4) The manner in which interested persons may submit notice  to the Commission of
their intention to attend the public hearing and any written comments.
(F) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission shall allow persons to  submit
written data, facts, opinions and arguments, which shall be made available to the public.
(G) The Commission  shall grant an opportunity for a public hearing before it adopts a
proposed rule or amendment if a hearing is requested by:
(1) At least 25 persons who submit comments independently of each other;
(2) A governmental subdivision or agency; or
(3) A duly appointed person in an association that has at least 25 members.
(H) If a hearing is held on  the proposed rule or amendment, the Commission shall publish
the time, date and location of the scheduled public hearing.
(1) All persons wishing to be heard  at the hearing shall notify the executive director of
the Commission or another designated  member in writing of their desire to appear and tes-
tify at the hearing not less than five business days before  the scheduled date of the hearing.
(2) Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing  each person who wishes to com-
ment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing.
(3) No transcript of the hearing is required, unless a written request for a transcript is
made, in which case the person  requesting the transcript shall bear the cost of producing the
transcript. A recording may be made in lieu of a transcript under  the same terms and con-
ditions as a transcript. This subsection shall not preclude the Commission from making  a
transcript or recording of the hearing if the Commission so chooses.
(4) Nothing in this Section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each
proposed rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Commission at  hearings re-
quired by this Section.
(I) Following the scheduled  hearing date, or by the close of business on the scheduled
hearing date if the hearing was not held, the Commission shall consider all written  and oral
comments received.
(J) The Commission  shall, by majority vote of all members, take final action on the pro-
posed rule and shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking
record and the full text of the rule.
(K) If no written notice of intent to attend the public hearing  by interested parties is
received, the Commission may proceed with promulgation of  the proposed rule without a
public hearing.
(L) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission  may consider and
adopt an emergency  rule without prior notice, opportunity for comment or hearing, provided
that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in this Compact and in this Section shall be
retroactively applied to the emergency rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event  later
than 90 days after the effective date of the rule.  For the purposes of this provision, an
emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
(1) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare;
(2) Prevent a loss of Commission or Compact state funds;
(3) Meet a deadline for the  promulgation of an administrative rule that is established by
[16]
HB 3339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
federal law or rule; or
(4) Protect public health and safety.
(M) The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission  may direct revisions
to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors,
errors in format, errors  in consistency or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions
shall be posted on the  website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge
by any person for  a period of 30 days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on
grounds that  the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made
in writing, and delivered to the chair of the  Commission prior to the end of the notice period.
If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect  without further action. If the revision
is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the Commission.
ARTICLE XII.
OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION AND ENFORCEMENT
(A) Oversight
(1) The executive,  legislative and judicial branches of state government in each Compact
state shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to  effectuate
this Compact’s purposes and intent. The provisions of this Compact and the  rules
promulgated hereunder shall have standing as statutory law, subject to Article  XI, Section
(B)(2) of this Compact.
(2) All courts shall take  judicial notice of this Compact and the rules in any judicial or
administrative proceeding in a Compact state pertaining to the subject matter of this  Com-
pact which may affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the Commission.
(3) The Commission shall be entitled to receive  service of process in any such proceeding,
and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to  provide
service of  process to the Commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the Com-
mission, this Compact or the rules.
(B) Default, Technical Assistance and Termination
(1) If the Commission determines  that a Compact state has defaulted in the performance
of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or rules, the Commission shall:
(a) Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other Compact states of the nature
of the default, the proposed means of remedying the default  and any other action to be taken
by the Commission; and
(b) Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.
(2) If a state in default fails to  remedy the default, the defaulting state may be termi-
nated from this Compact upon an affirmative vote  of a majority of the Compact states, and
all rights,  privileges and benefits conferred by this Compact shall be terminated on the ef-
fective date of termination. A remedy of  the default does not relieve the offending state of
obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default. The State of Oregon’s  obli-
gations and liabilities under this subsection may not  exceed the maximum amount allowed
by the Oregon Constitution.
(3) Termination of membership in this Compact shall be imposed only after all other
means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend  or terminate
shall be submitted by the Commission to the governor of  the defaulting state, the majority
and minority leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature and each of the Compact states.
(4) A Compact state which has  been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obli-
[17]
HB 3339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
gations and liabilities incurred  through the effective date of termination, including obli-
gations which extend beyond the effective date  of termination. The State of Oregon’s
assessments, obligations and liabilities under this subsection  may not exceed the maximum
amount allowed by the Oregon Constitution.
(5) The Commission  shall not bear any costs incurred by the state which is found to be
in default or which has been terminated from this Compact, unless agreed upon in writing
between the Commission and the defaulting state.
(6) The defaulting state may appeal the  action of the Commission by petitioning a United
States District Court for  the State of Georgia or the federal district where this Compact has
its principal offices. The prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of such  litigation, in-
cluding reasonable attorney fees. The State of Oregon’s costs  under this subsection may not
exceed the maximum amount allowed by the Oregon Constitution.
(C) Dispute Resolution
(1) Upon request by a Compact state, the  Commission shall attempt to resolve disputes
related to this Compact which arise among Compact  states and between Compact and non-
Compact states.
(2) The Commission shall promulgate a rule  providing for both mediation and binding
dispute resolution for disputes that arise before  the Commission, to which the State of
Oregon is subject only insofar as the rule of the Commission is adopted by the Oregon  Board
of Psychology by rule.
(D) Enforcement
(1) The Commission, in the reasonable exercise  of its discretion, shall enforce the pro-
visions and rules of this Compact.
(2) By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal action in  a United States District
Court for the State of Georgia or the federal district where the  Compact has its principal
offices against a Compact state in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of  this
Compact and  its rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include injunctive relief. In the
event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing member shall be awarded all costs  of
such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees. The State of Oregon’s costs  under this
subsection may not exceed the maximum amount allowed by the Oregon Constitution.
(3) The remedies herein  shall not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission. The
Commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law, except that
the Commission may not pursue remedies against the State of Oregon that are not allowed
by Oregon state law.
ARTICLE XIII.
DATE OF IMPLEMENTATION OF THE  PSYCHOLOGY INTERJURISDICTIONAL COM-
PACT COMMISSION AND ASSOCIATED RULES, WITHDRAWAL AND AMENDMENTS
(A) This Compact shall come  into effect on the date on which this Compact is enacted
into law in the seventh Compact  state. The provisions which become effective at that time
shall be limited to the  powers granted to the Commission relating to assembly and the
promulgation of rules. Thereafter, the Commission shall meet and exercise rulemaking pow-
ers necessary to the implementation and administration of this Compact.
(B) Subject to  Article XI, Section (B)(2) of this Compact, any state which joins this
Compact subsequent to the Commission’s initial adoption of the rules shall  be subject to the
rules as they exist on the  date on which this Compact becomes law in that state. Any rule
[18]
HB 3339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
which has been previously adopted by the Commission shall have the full force  and effect of
law on the day this Compact becomes law in that state.
(C) Any Compact state may withdraw from this Compact by  enacting a statute repealing
the same.
(1) A Compact state’s withdrawal shall not  take effect until six months after enactment
of the repealing statute.
(2) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing  state’s
state psychology regulatory authority to comply  with the investigative and adverse action
reporting requirements of this Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
(D) Nothing  contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any
psychology licensure agreement or  other cooperative arrangement between a Compact state
and a non-Compact state which does not conflict with the provisions of this Compact.
(E) This Compact may be amended by the Compact states. No amendment to  this Com-
pact shall become  effective and binding upon any Compact state until it is enacted into the
law of all Compact States.
ARTICLE XIV. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes  thereof. If this
Compact shall  be held contrary to the constitution of any state member thereto, this Com-
pact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining Compact states.
SECTION 2. The Legislative Assembly  of the State of Oregon hereby ratifies the Psy-
chology Interjurisdictional Compact set forth in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 675.010 to
675.150.
SECTION 4. (1) There is established, within the Oregon Board of Psychology Account, the
Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact Account. All moneys received by the Oregon Board
of Psychology under the Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact set forth in section 1 of this
2025 Act  shall be paid into the State Treasury and deposited in the Psychology Interjuris-
dictional Compact Account. Subject to subsection (2) of  this section, the moneys in the ac-
count are continuously appropriated to the board  for the purpose of meeting financial
obligations imposed on the State of Oregon as a result of  this state’s participation in the
compact.
(2) At no time may the Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact Account contain  more
than $50,000. Any moneys in excess of $50,000  shall be transferred to the Oregon Board of
Psychology Account under ORS 675.140.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 675.090 is amended to read:
675.090. (1) ORS 675.010 to 675.150 do not apply to:
(a) A person who teaches psychology, conducts psychological research or provides  consulting
services to an organization or institution, provided that the person does  not supervise direct psy-
chological services and does not treat any behavioral, emotional or mental  disorder of an individual.
(b) The provision of expert testimony by a person described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) A graduate student enrolled in an approved psychology program  who is pursuing a graduate
degree in psychology, provided that the graduate  student renders services only for academic credit
as part of an organized and supervised training program.
[19]
HB 3339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) A person pursuing certification, licensure or a graduate degree in  any of the certified or li-
censed professions exempted from ORS 675.010 to 675.150.
(e) A person who is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized  by the State of Oregon to provide
mental health services, provided that the services are rendered within the  person’s lawful scope of
practice and that the person does not use  the title “psychologist” in connection with the activities
described in this paragraph.
(f) A person who is employed  by a local, state or federal government agency or a public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002, or employed by a community mental health program  or drug and al-
cohol treatment program licensed or certified by the State of  Oregon, to the extent that the person’s
activities and services are rendered within the person’s scope of employment and are performed
within the confines of the employing agency and provided that the person does not  use the title
“psychologist” in connection with the activities authorized under this paragraph.
(g) A person who is a recognized member of the clergy, provided that  the person is acting in the
person’s ministerial capacity and does not use the title “psychologist.”
(h) A person who has credentials as a school psychologist,  provided that the person is an em-
ployee of an educational institution and practices only within a school setting. A  person acting un-
der this paragraph may use the title “school psychologist.”
(i) A person who holds a valid authority to practice  interjurisdictional telepsychology or
an interjurisdictional practice certificate, as described in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1)(f) of this section, a person  with a doctoral degree in psy-
chology who is employed by and practicing psychology at a  local, state or federal government
agency, a public university listed in ORS 352.002 or  a community mental health program or drug
and alcohol treatment program licensed or certified by the State of Oregon may  practice psychology
without a license under ORS 675.010 to 675.150 for no more than 24  months after the person begins
practicing psychology at the agency or program.
(b) Before the person obtains a license under ORS 675.010 to 675.150:
(A) The person may practice psychology only within the scope of  the person’s employment and
within the confines of the employing agency or program; and
(B) The person may not use the title “psychologist.”
(3) A person performing the functions  described in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section may
use the title “psychologist” only if the person holds a doctoral degree  in psychology from an ap-
proved doctoral program in psychology.
(4) A person described in subsection (1)(c) of this section may use the title “psychological
intern” or “psychological trainee,” provided that the  training program described in subsection (1)(c)
of this section  is under the supervision and responsibility of a licensed psychologist in accordance
with rules adopted by the Oregon Board of Psychology.
(5) Nothing in this  section exempts from ORS 675.010 to 675.150 a person whose license to
practice psychology is revoked  or suspended because the person engaged in sexual activity with a
client.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 675.140 is amended to read:
675.140. Subject to section 4 of this 2025 Act,  on or before  the 10th day of each month, the
Oregon Board of Psychology shall pay into the State Treasury all moneys received by the board
during the preceding calendar month. The State Treasurer shall credit the  moneys to the Oregon
Board of Psychology Account. The moneys in  the Oregon Board of Psychology Account are contin-
uously appropriated to the board for the purpose of paying the expenses of  administering and en-
[20]
HB 3339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
forcing ORS 675.010 to 675.150, 675.172, 676.850 and 676.866.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 676.177 is amended to read:
676.177. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS 676.165 to 676.180 and  except as pro-
vided in subsection (5) of this section, a health professional regulatory board, upon a determination
by the board that  it possesses otherwise confidential information that reasonably relates to the
regulatory or enforcement function of another public entity, may disclose that  information to the
other public entity.
(2) Any public  entity that receives information pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall
agree to take  all reasonable steps to maintain the confidentiality of the information, except that the
public entity may use or disclose  the information to the extent necessary to carry out the regulatory
or enforcement functions of the public entity.
(3) For purposes of this section, “public entity” means:
(a) A board or agency of this state, or a board or agency of another  state with regulatory or
enforcement functions similar to the  functions of a health professional regulatory board of this state;
(b) A district attorney;
(c) The Department of Justice;
(d) A state or local public body of this state that licenses, franchises  or provides emergency
medical services; or
(e) A law enforcement agency of this state, another state or the federal government.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (3) of this section[ ,]:
(a) The Oregon Board of Physical Therapy may disclose information described in  subsection (1)
of this section to the Physical Therapy Compact Commission [ established] described in ORS 688.240.
(b) Except as prohibited by subsection  (5) of this section, the Oregon Board of Psychology
may disclose information described in subsection (1) of this section to the Psychology Inter-
jurisdictional Compact Commission described in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(5) A health professional  regulatory board may not disclose the information described in sub-
section (1) of this section to  another public entity if the information relates to the provision of or
referral for reproductive or gender-affirming health care services.
SECTION 8.
(1) The amendments to ORS 675.090 by  section 5 of this 2025 Act apply to
individuals who  hold a valid authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology or an
interjurisdictional practice certificate on or after the operative date specified in section  9 of
this 2025 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 675.140 by section 6 of this 2025 Act apply to moneys received
by the  Oregon Board of Psychology under section 1 of this 2025 Act on or after the operative
date specified in section 9 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The amendments to ORS 676.177 by section 7 of this 2025 Act apply to information
disclosed on or after the operative date specified in section 9 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 9. (1) Sections 1 to 4 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 675.090,
675.140 and 676.177 by sections 5 to 7 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2027.
(2) The Oregon Board of Psychology may take any action before the  operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section  that is necessary to enable the board to exercise,
on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of  the duties,
functions and powers conferred on the board by sections 1 to 4 of  this 2025 Act and the
amendments to ORS 675.090, 675.140 and 676.177 by sections 5 to 7 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 10. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
[21]
HB 3339
1
2
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[22]