Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The  Task Force on Containment of Petroleum Contamination is estab-
lished.
(2) The task force consists of 11 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the  Senate shall appoint two members from among members of the
Senate, each member being from a different political party.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives  shall appoint two members from among
members of the House of Representatives, each member being from a different  political
party.
(c) The Governor shall appoint seven members as follows:
(A) One member representing the petroleum industry;
(B) One member representing the trucking industry;
(C) One member representing unions that represent truck drivers;
(D) One member representing the State Department of Energy;
(E) One member representing the Department of the State Fire Marshal;
(F) One member representing the Department of Transportation; and
(G) One member representing the Department of Environmental Quality.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Study commercially available materials for petroleum  leakage containment and pe-
troleum carrier protection that are approved by the United States Department of Defense
to provide significant reduction or total containment of petroleum contamination;
(b) Identify available and affordable technology that prevents petroleum spills; and
(c) Determine a reasonable manner of transition  for industry and government petroleum
carriers to adopt the technology and minimize the risk  of environmental damage associated
with petroleum spills.
(4) The task force may  consult with experts, hear testimony from affected persons and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3400
HB 2661
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
collect data and information necessary to carry out the task force’s duties.
(5) A  majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority  of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include  recommendations for legislation, to the interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly related to transportation no later than December 15, 2026.
(12) The Legislative Policy and Research  Director shall provide staff support to the task
force.
(13) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force  are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]