Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education, in collaboration with the STEM Invest-
ment Council, shall:
(a) Conduct a review of:
(A) The academic content  standards adopted by the State Board of Education under ORS
329.045 that  are relevant to technology-based competitive student activities, as determined
by the department and council;
(B) The knowledge and skill  requirements for career and technical education programs
that are relevant to technology-based competitive student activities, as determined  by the
department and council; and
(C) The high school diploma requirements prescribed by ORS 329.451  and by rule of the
State Board of Education under ORS 329.451  that are relevant to technology-based compet-
itive student activities, as determined by the department and council.
(b) Based on the review conducted under paragraph (a)  of this subsection, develop and
recommend standards by which technology-based competitive  student activities may satisfy
credit requirements, including credit  requirements for a high school diploma or a career and
technical education program. The standards shall:
(A) Identify the maximum number of credits a student may earn  through an individual
technology-based competitive student activity  and in total for technology-based competitive
student activities. A student may not be denied the opportunity to participate in a
technology-based competitive student  activity solely because the student satisfied the maxi-
mum number of credits prescribed as provided by this subparagraph.
(B) Ensure that  technology-based competitive student activities that qualify for credits
also, to the greatest extent practicable, qualify for career and technical  education grants
awarded by the department, including grants awarded under ORS 327.372 and 344.075.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 890
SB 894
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
(C) Prescribe accessibility by technology-based competitive student activities to  school
district resources, including school facilities, equipment and transportation, in a manner that
is consistent with accessibility by other interscholastic activities.
(D) Include a process by which the Superintendent of Public Instruction approves an ac-
tivity on a general or specific basis.
(2) No later than February 28, 2026, the department and  council shall submit a report
that summarizes the review conducted under subsection (1) of this  section and the standards
developed and recommended under subsection (1) of this section to:
(a) The  State Board of Education. The report submitted under this paragraph may in-
clude recommendations for administrative rules.
(b) The interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education. The report
submitted under this paragraph must be submitted in the manner provided by ORS 192.245
and may include recommendations for legislation.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]