Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Revenue Officer shall study the corporate activity  tax. The
Legislative Revenue Officer shall  submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim  committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to revenue no later than December 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3630