Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) For  the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue  lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $15 million in net proceeds,
plus an additional amount estimated  by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-
related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section shall  be transferred to the
Oregon Business Development  Department for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of
section 2 of this 2023 Act.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will create  jobs,
further economic development, finance public  education or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding that
the development of housing on former landfill sites will enhance  the economic viability of the
region, create jobs and improve the quality of life for the community.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall use the net pro-
ceeds of the lottery bonds issued under section 1 of this 2023 Act to award grants to devel-
opers to fund the development of former landfill sites.
(2)(a) The site of the proposed development must be:
(A) A former landfill site that has been  approved by a local government for mixed use
development; and
(B) Located within an urban growth boundary.
(b) The majority of the proposed development site must:
(A) Be designated by the Department of Environmental Quality as a brownfield site; and
(B)(i) Have a hazardous waste site  identification number, also known as an RCRA Site
ID, from the United States Environmental Protection Agency; or
(ii) Be included in  the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Li-
ability Information System database.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2506
SB 630
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
(c) The proposed development must include at least 500 housing units.
(3)(a) The Oregon Business  Development Department shall prescribe the form and man-
ner in which developers may apply for grants under this section.
(b) An application must include:
(A) Information and documentation showing that the proposed development  and site
meet the requirements set forth in subsection (2) of this section; and
(B) Any other information or material the department requires.
(c) The application deadline is September 30, 2023.
(4)(a) The department  shall review all timely and complete applications and, not later
than December 31, 2023, notify each applicant of the approval or  rejection of the application.
(b) The rejection of an application may not be appealed.
(c) Work on the proposed development must begin within one year following the date  on
which a developer enters into a grant agreement with  the department pursuant to this sec-
tion and the grant agreement shall so provide.
(5) Not later than one year following the completion of cleanup and mitigation efforts  at
the site for which the grant  was awarded, the department, working with the grant recipient,
shall submit a report, in  the manner required under ORS 192.245, to the committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to economic development, that includes:
(a) A summary of the cleanup and mitigation efforts at the site;
(b) What the developers learned from the experience of developing the site;
(c) Recommendations for developers undertaking similar efforts in the future; and
(d) Any other information the department considers important to include in the report.
SECTION 3.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]