Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) For  the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, in consultation with the Department of Transporta-
tion, the  State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to
286A.585 in an amount that produces $  million in net  proceeds and interest earnings
for the purpose described in  subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued pursuant  to this section and interest earnings
must be transferred to the Department of Transportation for deposit  in the Connect Oregon
Fund established under ORS 367.080 in an amount sufficient  to provide $  million for
the department to finance grants for transportation projects as provided in ORS  367.080 to
367.089.
(3) Bond-related costs for the lottery  bonds authorized by this section must be paid from
the gross proceeds of the lottery bonds and from allocations for the purposes of ORS
286A.576 (1)(c).
(4) The Legislative Assembly finds that issuing lottery bonds to finance transportation
projects pursuant to this section is essential to promoting  the state’s economic development,
and the use of lottery bond proceeds is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) There  is an urgent need to improve and expand publicly owned and privately owned
transportation infrastructure to support economic development in this state.
(b) A safe, efficient and reliable transportation network supports the  long-term economic
development and livability of this state.
(c) A multimodal network of transportation options moves people and goods efficiently.
(d) Local  governments and private sector businesses often lack capital and the technical
capacity to undertake multimodal transportation projects.
(e) Public financial assistance can stimulate industrial growth and  commercial enterprise
and promote employment opportunities in this state.
(f) Public investment  in transportation infrastructure will create jobs and further eco-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 518
SB 59
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
nomic development in this state.
(g) The use of lottery bond proceeds as provided in this section will create  jobs, further
economic development, finance  public education or restore and protect parks, beaches,
watersheds and native fish and wildlife  within Oregon, and issuance of lottery bonds for the
purpose described in this section is therefore an appropriate use of state lottery funds under
Article XV, section 4, of the Oregon Constitution, and ORS 461.510.
SECTION 2. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]