Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The  office of the Rare Disease Ombudsman is established within the
Oregon Health and Science University.
(2)(a) The Governor, with recommendations by the Oregon Health and  Science University
Board of Directors, shall appoint the Rare Disease Ombudsman for a term  of four years. The
appointment of the Rare Disease Ombudsman is  subject to Senate confirmation under ORS
171.562 and 171.565.
(b) A vacancy shall be filled within  60 days in the same manner as an appointment is
made.
(c) The Rare Disease  Ombudsman shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor and may
be removed for just cause  upon recommendation to the Governor by the Oregon Health and
Science University Board of Directors.
(3) The Rare Disease Ombudsman shall:
(a) Advocate for persons diagnosed with rare diseases, including persons eligible  for en-
rollment in a medical assistance program.
(b) Ensure that necessary  medical services are provided to persons diagnosed with rare
diseases, either by a licensed health care provider or by referral to an appropriate  social
services provider.
(c) Perform other duties related to rare diseases as  determined necessary by the Rare
Disease Ombudsman and the Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors.
(4) The  Rare Disease Ombudsman may adopt rules to carry out this section, including
rules to define “rare disease.”
(5) The Rare Disease Ombudsman may  solicit and accept gifts, grants and donations from
public and private sources for the purpose of carrying  out the duties described in subsection
(3) of this  section, and the moneys shall be deposited in the Rare Disease Ombudsman Fund
established under section 2 of this 2019 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2921
HB 2529
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
SECTION 2. The Rare Disease Ombudsman Fund is  established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the  Rare Disease Om-
budsman Fund shall be credited  to the fund. Moneys in the Rare Disease Ombudsman Fund
are continuously appropriated to the office of the Rare Disease Ombudsman for  the purposes
described in section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this 2019 Act become operative on January 1, 2020.
(2) The Governor  and the Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors may
take any action before the operative date specified in subsection  (1) of this section that is
necessary to enable the Governor and the board to exercise, on and after the operative  date
specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers  conferred
on the Governor and the board by sections 1 and 2 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]