Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The University of Oregon shall conduct an Oregon  child abuse prevalence
study not less than once every five years.
(2) No later than September  15 of each even-numbered year, the university shall submit
a report on the Oregon child abuse prevalence study to the interim committees of the  Leg-
islative Assembly related to human services.
SECTION 2. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $700,000, for the  purposes specified in section
1 (1) of this 2021 Act.
(2) Moneys distributed to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  to implement
the University of Oregon’s duties under section 1 of this 2021 Act may  not be used to pay the
university for facilities and administrative costs  not directly related to the Oregon child
abuse prevalence study described in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3. The report described in section 1 of this 2021 Act is first due no later than
September 15, 2022.
SECTION 4. Sections 2 and 3 of this 2021 Act are repealed on July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2114