Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 469A.020 is amended to read:
469A.020. (1) Except as provided in this section, electricity may be used  to comply with a
renewable portfolio standard only if the electricity is generated  by a facility that becomes opera-
tional on or after January 1, 1995.
(2) Electricity from a generating facility, other than a hydroelectric facility, that became  oper-
ational before January 1, 1995, may be used to comply with a renewable portfolio standard  if the
electricity is attributable to capacity or efficiency upgrades made on or after January 1, 1995.
(3) Electricity  from a hydroelectric facility that became operational before January 1, 1995, may
be used to comply with a renewable portfolio standard if the electricity is attributable  to efficiency
upgrades made on or  after January 1, 1995. If an efficiency upgrade is made to a Bonneville Power
Administration facility, only that portion of the electricity generation attributable  to Oregon’s share
of the electricity may be used to comply with a renewable portfolio standard.
(4) Subject to  the limit imposed by ORS 469A.025 (5), electricity from a hydroelectric facility
that became operational before January 1, 1995, may be used  to comply with a renewable portfolio
standard if  the facility is certified as a low-impact hydroelectric facility on or after January 1, 1995,
by a national certification organization recognized by the State Department  of Energy by rule, and
if the facility is either:
(a) Owned by an electric utility; or
(b) Not owned by an electric utility and  located in Oregon and licensed by the Federal Energy
Regulatory Commission under the Federal Power Act, 16 U.S.C. 791a et  seq., or exempt from such
license.
(5) Electricity from a generating facility located in this state that uses biomass and  that became
operational before January 1, 1995, may be used to comply with a renewable portfolio standard  if
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2809
SB 17
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
the facility meets the requirements of  the federal Public Utility Regulatory Policies Act of 1978 (P.L.
95-617) on March 4, 2010.
(6) Electricity from  a generating facility located in this state that generates electricity from
direct combustion of municipal solid waste and that became operational before January 1,  1995, may
be used to comply with a renewable portfolio standard for up to 11 average megawatts of  electricity
[generated per  calendar year. ] generated, per calendar year, from the direct combustion of
biogenic material.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 469A.031 is amended to read:
469A.031. Notwithstanding ORS 469A.029, a facility described in either ORS 469A.020 (5) or (6)
is eligible for renewable energy certificates if the owner or operator  of the generating facility reg-
istered the generating facility with the Western Renewable Energy Generation Information System
on or after January 1, 2011.
[2]