Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “School-based health center” has the meaning given that term in ORS 413.225.
(b) “School nurse” has the meaning given that term in ORS 342.455.
(c) “Telehealth” means the use of  electronic and telecommunication technologies to de-
liver health care services to a patient.
(2) A school nurse may engage in the practice of telehealth if:
(a) The school-based health center with which  the school nurse is associated is techno-
logically capable of supporting the use of telehealth; and
(b) The practice of telehealth complies with  the rules adopted by the State Board of Ed-
ucation under this section.
(3) The State Board of Education, in  consultation with the Oregon State Board of Nurs-
ing, shall adopt rules related to the practice of telehealth.
SECTION 2.
(1) Section 1 of this 2019 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2020.
(2) The  State Board of Education and the Oregon State Board of Nursing may take any
action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section that is necessary
to enable the boards to exercise, on and  after the operative date specified in subsection (1)
of this  section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the boards by section 1
of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1036