Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $500,000 for
distribution to Curry County Parks to acquire real property adjacent to Euchre Creek for
addition to the Curry County park system.
SECTION 2.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3252