Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning  July 1,
2023, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $4,980,000, for distribution to the Oregon Office
for Community Dispute Resolution at the University  of Oregon for the purpose of increasing
eviction and homelessness prevention services and restorative  justice services. Moneys allo-
cated under this section may not be distributed to  the Oregon Consensus program at
Portland State University.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning  July 1,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $250,000, for distribution to the  Clinical Legal
Education Program.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3217