Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
PREDICTIVE SCHEDULING
SECTION 1.
 ORS 441.770 is amended to read:
441.770. (1) For  purposes of this section, “nursing staff” includes registered nurses, licensed
practical nurses, certified nursing assistants and other hospital nursing staff  members as defined by
the Oregon Health Authority by rule.
(2) When a  hospital learns about the need for replacement staff, the hospital shall make every
reasonable effort to obtain nursing staff for unfilled hours or shifts  before requiring a nursing staff
member to work overtime.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subsection (4)  of this section, a hospital may not require a nursing
staff member to work:
(A) Beyond the agreed-upon and prearranged shift, regardless of the length of the shift;
(B) More than 48 hours in any hospital-defined work week;
(C) More than 12 hours in a 24-hour period; or
(D) During the 10-hour period immediately following the 12th hour worked during a 24-hour  pe-
riod.
(b) For purposes  of paragraph (a)(D) of this subsection, a nursing staff member begins to work
when the nursing staff member begins a shift.
(4) A hospital may require an  additional hour of work beyond the work authorized under sub-
section (3) of this section if:
(a) A staff vacancy for the next shift becomes known at the end of the current shift; or
(b) There  is a potential harm to an assigned patient if the nursing staff member leaves the as-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 247
HB 4089
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
signment or transfers care to another nursing staff member.
(5) If a nursing staff member agrees to work overtime, the  nursing staff member is accountable
for the nursing staff member’s competency in practice and is responsible  for notifying the nursing
staff member’s supervisor when the nursing staff member’s ability to  safely provide care is compro-
mised.
(6)(a) Time spent  in required meetings or receiving education or training shall be included as
hours worked for purposes of subsection (3) of this section.
(b) Time spent on call or on standby when the nursing  staff member is required to be at the
premises of the employer  shall be included as hours worked for purposes of subsection (3) of this
section.
(c) Time spent on call but away from the premises of the  employer may not be included as hours
worked for purposes of subsection (3) of this section.
(7)(a) A hospital shall compensate a nursing staff member for time spent on call or on
standby when the nursing staff member is required to be at or  nearby the premises of the
hospital or such that the nursing staff member is  unable to use the scheduled hours effec-
tively for the nursing staff member’s personal purposes, regardless  of whether the nursing
staff member is asked by the hospital to perform work.
(b) A hospital shall pay a nursing staff member scheduled for an on-call shift  or standby
shift described in paragraph (a) of this subsection at least the applicable minimum wage rate
specified in ORS 653.025.
(c) The requirements  of this subsection apply to nursing staff members who are nonex-
empt employees under the federal Fair Labor Standards Act.
(8)(a) For nursing staff members who are nonexempt employees under  the federal Fair
Labor Standards Act, the hospital shall post a work schedule at  least 14 days in advance that
includes all work shifts and on-call shifts for the period.
(b) A work schedule described under paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) May not be changed without the voluntary consent of  the nursing staff member; and
(B) Must be posted in a conspicuous and accessible location.
[(7)] (9) If a nursing staff member believes that a hospital unit is engaging  in a pattern of re-
quiring direct care nursing staff to work overtime for  nonemergency care, the nursing staff member
may report that information to the hospital nurse  staffing committee established for the hospital
pursuant to ORS 441.762. The hospital  nurse staffing committee shall consider the information when
reviewing the written hospital-wide staffing plan as required by ORS 441.764.
[(8)] (10) The provisions of this section do not apply to nursing staff needs:
(a) In the event of a national or state emergency or circumstances requiring the implementation
of a facility disaster plan; or
(b) In emergency circumstances identified by the authority by rule.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 2.
 ORS 441.795 is amended to read:
441.795. (1) The Oregon Health Authority may adopt rules necessary to carry out ORS 441.761
to 441.795 only with respect to:
(a) The processing of complaints under ORS 441.791;
(b) The processing of complaints regarding meal breaks and rest breaks under ORS 441.790;
[2]
HB 4089
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) The  requirements for nurse-to-patient ratios in emergency departments under ORS 441.765
(2)(a); and
(d) The provisions of ORS 441.770 (1) and [ (8)(b)] (10)(b).
(2) The authority shall convene a subcommittee of the Nurse Staffing Advisory  Board estab-
lished in ORS 441.761 to advise the authority in the adoption of rules under this section.  The sub-
committee must have equal representation of hospital employees and hospital  managers and shall
include individuals representing labor organizations and organizations representing hospitals.
FINANCIAL TRANSPARENCY
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 442.
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section, “hospital system” means:
(a) A parent corporation of  one or more hospitals and any entity affiliated with the par-
ent corporation through ownership, governance, control or membership; or
(b) A hospital and any entity affiliated with the hospital through ownership, governance,
control or membership.
(2) A hospital licensed  in this state shall report the information prescribed by subsections
(3) and (4) of this section to the Oregon Health Authority in the form  and manner prescribed
by the authority.
(3)(a) On a quarterly basis, a hospital shall report its cash on hand. Cash on  hand is
calculated as total assets available for  general expenditures for the previous completed four
calendar quarters divided by the daily operating expenses during the same period.
(b) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Assets” means cash and cash equivalents such as securities.
(B) “Daily operating  expenses” means a hospital’s total operating expenses for the pre-
vious completed four calendar quarters divided by 365.25.
(4) On an annual basis, a hospital shall report:
(a) Using the format  of the Internal Revenue Service Form 990, the names, job titles and
total compensation,  including bonuses and benefits, of the hospital’s 10 highest paid employ-
ees.
(b) The percentage of medical assistance program payments and  the amount of other
public funds that were invested in stocks.
(c) If a hospital is part of a multistate health care system, how much of the  hospital’s
profits earned:
(A) In this state were expended on hospitals in other states; and
(B) In other states were expended on hospitals in this state.
(5) Hospitals licensed in this state and hospital systems operating in this  state must
make publicly available on the hospital’s or hospital system’s website the following informa-
tion for the preceding calendar year, updated annually:
(a) Income received for patient care broken out by:
(A) The classification of the care received; and
(B) The type of payer, such as patients, insurers or other third parties.
(b) Expenses, including salary and benefit information for each classification of employee
and for individual executives.
(c) Investments and investment returns broken out by:
[3]
HB 4089
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
(A) Asset class; and
(B) Associated investment prospectuses or asset management plans.
(d) Trusts or assets held for future use, including real  estate and any associated asset
management plans.
(6) If a hospital or hospital system does not have a website, the  information listed in
subsection (5)  of this section must be made available in hard copy form in each reception
area of the hospital or hospital system.
(7) The authority shall adopt rules  necessary to carry out the provisions of this section,
including but not limited to:
(a) Prescribing definitions for the classifications  of care, payer types and employees and
prescribing the trusts or assets held for future use and other terms used  in subsection (5)
of this section; and
(b) Civil penalties that may be imposed in accordance with ORS 183.745 for a hospital’s
or a hospital system’s failure to comply with the requirements of this section.
(8) The information that must be reported to the authority under this section  is in ad-
dition to and not in lieu of the reporting requirements in ORS 442.386  or 442.425 or other
similar provisions.
SECTION 5.
The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader  and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
[4]