Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
chapter 701.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “major residential  contractor” means a residen-
tial contractor that is:
(a) A general contractor; and
(b) A company that offers securities  registered with the United States Securities and
Exchange Commission for sale to the general public.
(2)(a) A major residential contractor may not, in a contract to remodel or repair an
owner-occupied one-family or two-family residential structure with a contract price that ex-
ceeds $40,000, collect or retain more than 50 percent  of the original contract price before
substantial completion of the remodeling or repair.
(b) If  a property owner agrees in writing to contract changes that result in a net increase
in the original contract price of $20,000  or more, the major residential contractor may collect
and retain not more than 50 percent of the contract price increase.
(3) If a major residential contractor’s costs of materials, supplies and payments  to sub-
contractors at the commencement of the remodel or repair  exceeds 50 percent of the total
contract price, the  major residential contractor may require the property owner to make
progress payments solely to cover the costs of materials, supplies and payments to  subcon-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3614
HB 3860
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tractors. If the major residential contractor requires progress  payments, the contract must
include:
(a) An itemized list of all materials, supplies and payments to subcontractors;
(b) A schedule of progress payments due that is linked to specific items of  work com-
pleted or a specific completed percentage of the total work specified in the contract; and
(c) A specification of the progress the major residential contractor must make  on the
renovation or repair before each progress payment is due.
(4) This section does not prohibit  a major residential contractor from retaining properly
collected amounts after a contract price decrease. Subject to  subsection (5) of this section,
this section does not prevent  a major residential contractor from obtaining payment for
completed construction work from  a property owner that unreasonably withholds approval
and acceptance.
(5) If a major residential contractor  believes that a property owner has unreasonably
withheld approval and acceptance of properly  completed construction work, the major resi-
dential contractor  may file a request with the Construction Contractors Board for mediation
of the dispute. The major  residential contractor may initiate an action or suit or pursue
other available remedies to collect the balance of the moneys due under a contract described
in subsection (2) of this section only if:
(a) The property owner refuses a board offer to mediate the dispute; or
(b) The board declares after reasonable effort that the board cannot resolve the dispute
by mediation.
(6) The board may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) A  business may not install, apply, repair or maintain, or offer to install,
apply, repair or maintain, spray-on fireproofing  material or a spray-on fireproofing system
in an essential facility  in this state unless the business has a current and valid certification
from the Construction Contractors Board as a spray-on fireproofing contractor.
(2) The board shall  certify a business as a spray-on fireproofing contractor if the business
meets the requirements of this section and of  any rule the board adopts under this section.
A certification as a spray-on fireproofing contractor expires three years after the date  on
which the board issues the certification.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph  (c) of this subsection, the board shall require that
a business that applies for initial certification, or for  renewal of a certification, as a spray-on
fireproofing contractor provide proof in the application that at least one individual who  is
an owner, manager or employee of the business has obtained a certification from  a program
that the board approves by rule. The program that the board  approves must, at a minimum:
(A) Use a nationally recognized  body of knowledge, techniques and best practices and
nationally recognized safety standards in the program’s design, contents and instruction;
(B) Examine and score or otherwise assess the knowledge and competence of an applicant
for certification;
(C) Assess an applicant’s knowledge of how  to correctly install, apply, repair and main-
tain spray-on fireproofing material and spray-on fireproofing systems; and
(D) Provide information about methods  of installation, application, repair and mainte-
nance that meet applicable occupational health and  safety standards and environmental
standards and  that otherwise minimize or eliminate adverse safety or environmental im-
pacts.
[2]
HB 3860
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The board by rule shall specify scores or demonstrations of knowledge  and compe-
tence required to  obtain a certification as a spray-on fireproofing contractor under this
section.
(c) The board may not require from a business that applies for certification, or for  re-
newal of a certification, assessments or practices that exceed or  are inconsistent with as-
sessments or practices required generally in the spray-on fireproofing industry.
(d) In lieu of  obtaining a certification from a program the board approves under para-
graph (a) of  this subsection, the board may accept a certification from another state, or from
a nationally recognized organization of spray-on fireproofing experts or practitioners, if the
board is satisfied that the other  certification meets standards and provides training and
content that is substantially similar to a program that the board approves by rule.
(4) The board may adopt rules to govern the administration of  the board’s certification
program under this section, including:
(a) Requiring an applicant to list  the applicant’s name and assumed business name, if
any, physical address and telephone number, along with any available electronic contact in-
formation, on the application for certification;
(b) Permitting a business to identify the  individuals within the business who obtained a
certification from a program the board approved under subsection (3)(a)  of this section or
who hold another certification described in  subsection (3)(d) of this section and who have
responsibility for the training, education and monitoring  of the spray-on fireproofing prac-
tices of the business;
(c) Identifying structures or infrastructure that constitutes an  essential facility for the
purposes of requiring  certification under this section, except that an essential facility may
not include a pipeline or compressor substation; and
(d) Establishing fees necessary to administer this section that do not exceed the following
amounts:
(A) $500 for an initial application for certification as a spray-on  fireproofing contractor;
and
(B) $150 for renewal of a certification as a spray-on fireproofing contractor.
(5) The board shall  maintain and make available and easily accessible on the board’s
website, or provide in response to a request, a list or  searchable database of businesses that
the board has certified under this section.
(6) A building official, as defined in  ORS 455.715, may require as a condition of issuing a
permit that  a business that installs, applies, repairs or maintains spray-on fireproofing ma-
terial or spray-on fireproofing systems provide the building official with a copy of a certi-
fication the business obtained under this section.
SECTION 4.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies to contracts into which a major residential
contractor and a property owner enter on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 5. (1) Section 3 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
(2) The Construction Contractors Board may adopt rules and take any  other action be-
fore the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this  section that is necessary to enable
the board, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1)  of this section, to
undertake and exercise all  of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the board by
section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6. Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies to contracts into which a major residential
[3]
HB 3860
1
2
3
4
contractor and a property owner enter on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 7.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]