Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 327.254 is amended to read:
327.254. (1) The Department of Education shall use  moneys in the Statewide Education Initi-
atives Account to provide funding for statewide education initiatives, including:
(a) Funding the High School Graduation and College and Career Readiness Act at the levels
prescribed by ORS 327.856;
(b) Expanding school breakfast and lunch programs;
(c) Operating youth reengagement programs or providing youth reengagement services;
(d) Establishing and maintaining  the Statewide School Safety and Prevention System under ORS
339.341;
(e) Developing and providing statewide equity initiatives, including the Black  or African-
American education plan developed under ORS 329.841, the American Indian or Alaska Native  edu-
cation plan developed under  ORS 329.843, the Latino or Hispanic education plan developed under
ORS 329.845 or any similar education plan identified by the department;
(f) Providing summer learning programs at schools  that are considered high poverty under Title
I of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965;
(g) Funding early warning systems to assist students in  graduating from high school, as de-
scribed in ORS 327.367;
(h) Developing and implementing professional development programs and  training programs, in-
cluding programs that increase educator diversity and retain diverse educators;
(i) Planning for increased transparency and accountability in the public  education system of this
state;
(j) Providing additional funding to school districts participating  in the intensive program under
ORS 327.222;
(k) Providing technical assistance, including costs incurred for:
(A) The coaching program described in ORS 327.214; and
(B) The intensive program described in ORS 327.222, including costs for student success teams;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3886
HB 3236
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(L) Funding public charter schools, as described in ORS 327.362;
(m) Funding education service districts, as described in subsection (2) of this section; [ and]
(n) Funding regional career and technical  education programs that are provided in part-
nership with an education service district or multiple school districts from the same  region;
and
[(n)] (o) Funding costs incurred by the department in implementing  this section and ORS 327.175
to 327.235 and 327.274.
(2)(a) The amount of a distribution to an education  service district under this section shall be
made as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection after calculating the  following for each edu-
cation service district:
(A) One percent of the total amount available for distribution to  education service districts in
each biennium.
(B) The education service district’s ADMw ×  (the total amount available for distribution to
education service districts in each biennium ÷  the total ADMw of all education  service districts
that receive a distribution).
(b) The amount of the distribution to an education service district shall be the greater of  the
amounts calculated under paragraph (a) of this subsection, except that, for distributions  made as
provided by paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, the  total amount available for distribution to edu-
cation service districts shall be the amount remaining after any  distributions required under para-
graph (a)(A) of this subsection have been made.
(c) For purposes  of this subsection, ADMw equals the ADMw as calculated under ORS 327.013,
except that the additional amount allowed for students who are in  poverty families, as determined
under ORS 327.013 (1)(c)(A)(v)(I), shall be 0.5.
(d) An education service district  shall use moneys received under this section as provided by a
plan developed by the school districts located within the education  service district. A school district
that declines to participate in the development of the plan or that has withdrawn from an education
service district as provided by  ORS 334.015 is not entitled to any moneys distributed to the educa-
tion service district under this subsection.
(e) A plan developed under this subsection must:
(A) Align with and support school districts  in meeting the performance growth targets of the
school districts developing the plan;
(B) Include the provision of technical assistance to school districts in  developing, implementing
and reviewing a plan for receiving a grant from the Student Investment Account;
(C) Provide for  coordination with the department in administering and providing technical as-
sistance to school  districts, including coordinating any coaching programs established under ORS
327.214; and
(D) Be  adopted and amended as provided for local service plans under ORS 334.175 and approved
by the department.
(f) Each education service district must submit an annual report to the department that:
(A) Describes how the education service district spent moneys received under  this subsection;
and
(B) Includes an evaluation of the education service district’s compliance with the plan  from the
superintendent of each school district that participated in the development of the plan.
(3) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules necessary for the distribution of moneys  un-
der this section.
[2]
HB 3236
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
SECTION 2.
For the 2023-2025 biennium, the Department of Education  shall expend
$2,850,000 from the Statewide  Education Initiatives Account to provide funding for the
Willamette Career Academy.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[3]