Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 195.505 is amended to read:
195.505. (1) A policy developed pursuant to  ORS 195.500 shall conform, but is not limited, to the
following  provisions.
(2) As used in  this section, “personal property” means any item that can reasonably be identified
as belonging to an individual and that has apparent value or utility.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, at least 72 hours before removing
homeless individuals from an established camping site, law enforcement officials shall post a  written
notice, in English and Spanish,  at all entrances to the camping site to the extent that the entrances
can reasonably be identified.
(4)(a) When a 72-hour notice is posted,  law enforcement officials shall inform the local agency
that delivers social services to homeless individuals as to where the notice has been posted.
(b) The local agency may arrange for outreach workers to visit the  camping site that is subject
to the notice to assess the need for social service assistance in arranging shelter  and other assist-
ance.
(5)(a) All personal property at [ the] a camping  site  on public property  that remains unclaimed
after removal shall be given to a law enforcement official, a local  agency that delivers social ser-
vices to homeless individuals, an outreach worker, a local agency official or a person authorized  to
issue a citation described in subsection (10) of this section, whether notice is required under sub-
section (3) of this section or not.
(b) The unclaimed personal property must be stored:
(A) For property removed from  camping sites in counties other than Multnomah County, in a
facility located in the same community as the camping site from which it was removed.
(B) For property removed from camping sites in Multnomah County, in a facility  located within
six blocks of a public transit station.
(c) Items that have no apparent value or utility or are in an insanitary  condition may be im-
mediately discarded upon removal of the homeless individuals from the camping site.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1253
HB 2696
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
(d) Weapons, controlled substances other than prescription medication and items  that appear to
be either stolen or evidence of a crime shall be given to or retained by law enforcement officials.
(6) The written notice required under subsection (3) of this section must state, at a minimum:
(a) Where unclaimed personal property will be stored;
(b) A phone number that individuals may call to find out where the property will be stored; or
(c) If a permanent storage location has not yet been determined,  the address and phone number
of an agency that will have the information when available.
(7)(a) The unclaimed personal property shall be stored in an orderly  fashion, keeping items that
belong to an individual together to the extent that ownership can reasonably be determined.
(b) The property shall be stored for a minimum of 30 days during which it shall be reasonably
available to any individual claiming ownership. Any  personal property that remains unclaimed after
30 days may be disposed of or donated to a corporation described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code as amended and in effect on December 31, 2020.
(8) Following the  removal of homeless individuals from a camping site on public property, the
law enforcement officials, local agency officials and outreach workers may meet to assess  the notice
and removal policy, to discuss whether  the removals are occurring in a humane and just manner and
to determine if any changes are needed in the policy.
(9)(a) The 72-hour notice requirement under subsection (3) of this section does not apply:
(A) When there are grounds for law enforcement officials to believe that illegal activities  other
than camping are occurring at an established camping site.
(B) In the event of  an exceptional emergency at an established camping site, including, but not
limited to, possible site contamination by hazardous materials, a  public health emergency or other
immediate danger to human life or safety.
(b) If a funeral service is scheduled with less than 72 hours’ notice  at a cemetery at which there
is a camping site, or a camping site is established  at the cemetery less than 72 hours before the
scheduled service, the written notice required under subsection (3) of this section may be posted at
least 24 hours before removing homeless individuals from the camping site.
(10) A person authorized  to issue a citation for unlawful camping under state law, administrative
rule or city or county ordinance  may not issue the citation if the citation would be issued within
200 feet of  a notice required under subsection (3) of this section and within two hours before or after
the notice was posted.
(11) Any law or policy  of a city or county that is more specific or offers greater protections to
homeless individuals subject to removal from an  established camping site preempts contrary pro-
visions of this section.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]