Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1)(a) A public  safety agency, as defined in ORS 181A.355, may establish
standards for the typical number of calls for public safety services to which the  public safety
agency responds and the typical public safety services required in response to calls. The
public safety agency may impose fees on an entity that, in the determination of the public
safety agency, makes calls in excess of  the typical number of calls or that require public
safety services in excess of those typically required in response to a call.
(b) A public safety agency that establishes standards and imposes fees  under this sub-
section shall publish on a website operated by or on behalf of the public safety  agency the
standards and fee schedule established under this subsection.
(2)(a) A public safety agency may, after  receiving calls from an entity in excess of the
typical number of calls established under  subsection (1) of this section or that require public
safety services in excess of the typical  public safety services required as established in sub-
section (1) of this section,  request that the governing body of the local jurisdiction in which
the entity is  located issue a notice in writing to the entity that the entity has overused public
safety services. The governing body may publish  a copy of the notice issued under this sub-
section on a website operated by or on behalf of the governing body.
(b) A governing body shall establish a reasonable period of time in which an entity that
receives a notice issued under this subsection has an opportunity  to cure the overuse of
public safety services,  and shall publish information about the period of time on the website
described in this subsection.
(3)(a) If, after the  period of time described in subsection (2) of this section, the entity
does not cure the overuse of public safety  services to the satisfaction of the governing body,
the governing body may petition the Secretary of State to:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3839
HB 3625
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
(A) If the entity is  a corporation or limited liability company, administratively dissolve
the corporation under ORS 60.647 or the limited liability company under ORS 63.647;
(B) If the entity is a foreign corporation or foreign limited  liability company, revoke the
authority of the foreign corporation to transact business in this state  under ORS 60.737 or
of the foreign limited liability company to transact business in this state under ORS 63.737;
(C) If the entity is a limited partnership  or foreign limited partnership, inactivate the
certificate of limited partnership or the  registration of the foreign limited partnership under
ORS 70.430;
(D) If the entity is a business trust, inactivate the trust instrument  of the business trust
under ORS 128.597; or
(E) If the entity is a nonprofit corporation  or foreign nonprofit corporation, administra-
tively dissolve  the nonprofit corporation under ORS 65.647 or revoke the authority of the
foreign nonprofit corporation to transact business in this state under ORS 65.737.
(b) The overuse of public safety services described in subsection (2) of this section  by an
entity is grounds for the Secretary of State to  take an action listed in paragraph (a) of this
subsection against the entity.
(4) Not later than September 15 of each year, a public  safety agency that collects fees
pursuant to a schedule described in subsection (1) of this section shall submit  a report in the
manner required in  ORS 192.245 to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to public safety. The report must include the fee schedule established by the  public
safety agency and the total amount of fees collected  in the year immediately preceding the
report.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2031.
[2]