Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Universal Health Plan Governance Board shall study universal health
care. The board shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS  192.245, and may in-
clude recommendations for  legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assem-
bly related to veterans, emergency management, federal and world affairs no  later than
September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1396