Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 657.
SECTION 2. (1)(a) Any employer whose tax rate for calendar year 2025  is less than the
employer’s tax rate for calendar year 2024 shall receive a nonrefundable credit  against the
taxes due from the employer for calendar  year 2025 according to the schedule set forth in
subsection (2) of this section.
(b) This section does  not apply to an employer who did not have a tax rate determined
in accordance with ORS 657.430, 657.435 or 657.480 for calendar year 2022.
(2) If the decrease in the tax rate described in subsection (1) of this section was:
(a) At least 0.5 percentage points and not more than 1.0 percentage point, 25  percent of
the taxes due from the employer for calendar year 2025 shall be credited.
(b) More than 1.0 percentage point and not more than 1.5 percentage  points, 50 percent
of the taxes due from the employer for calendar year 2025 shall be credited.
(c) More than  1.5 percentage points and not more than 2.0 percentage points, 75 percent
of the taxes due from the employer for calendar year 2025 shall be credited.
(d) More than 2.0 percentage points, 100 percent of  the taxes due from the employer for
calendar year 2025 shall be credited.
(3) An employer is not eligible for the credit against  taxes under this section unless the
employer:
(a) Files all  wage reports due under ORS 657.571 for calendar years 2024 and 2025 in a
timely manner;
(b) Pays  all tax liabilities imposed under this chapter for calendar years 2024 and 2025 in
a timely manner; and
(c) As of January 1, 2025:
(A) Had paid all outstanding unemployment insurance taxes and related liabilities; or
(B) Had paid all outstanding amounts due according to the terms of a payment plan ac-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 57
HB 4038
1
2
3
4
5
6
cepted by the Director of the Employment  Department for repayment of all outstanding
amounts described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 4. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]