Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Deaf, Deaf-Blind  and Hard of Hearing Fund is established in the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the Deaf,
Deaf-Blind and Hard of  Hearing Fund shall be credited to the fund. All moneys in the Deaf,
Deaf-Blind and Hard  of Hearing Fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of
Human Services for the purpose of administering programs of the department  for individuals
who are deaf, deaf-blind or hard of hearing.
(2) The Deaf,  Deaf-Blind and Hard of Hearing Fund consists of all moneys credited to the
fund, including:
(a) Moneys received from the federal government for purposes related to  the adminis-
tration of programs for individuals who are deaf, deaf-blind or hard of hearing;
(b) Moneys appropriated or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly; and
(c) Moneys designated to be transferred to the fund under the laws of the state.
SECTION 2.
(1) From moneys  collected as a surcharge under ORS 759.685, the Public
Utility Commission shall annually transfer an amount of moneys, not to exceed $500,000,  to
the Deaf,  Deaf-Blind and Hard of Hearing Fund established under section 1 of this 2021 Act
as is necessary to fund  programs of the Department of Human Services for individuals who
are deaf, deaf-blind or hard of hearing.
(2) For purposes of making a  transfer under this section, the commission and the de-
partment shall enter into an agreement that:
(a) Specifies the amount of moneys to be transferred and the purposes for which  the
moneys may be spent; and
(b) Establishes a plan for a biennial reduction  in moneys transferred pursuant to this
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3342
SB 724
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Department of  Human Services shall develop and issue a request for
proposals for, and select, an eligible nonprofit organization to provide  services, to be funded
through the Deaf, Deaf-Blind and Hard of Hearing Fund established  under section 1 of this
2021 Act, for individuals who are deaf, deaf-blind or hard of hearing.
(2) The department  shall complete selection of an eligible nonprofit organization pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section no later than January 1, 2022.
SECTION 4.  ORS 759.685 is amended to read:
759.685. (1)(a) In order to fund the programs provided  for in sections 2 to 6, chapter 290, Oregon
Laws 1987, and ORS 759.693 to 759.698[ ,] and sections 1 and  2 of this 2021 Act,  the Public Utility
Commission shall develop and implement a system  for assessing a surcharge in an amount not to
exceed 35 cents  per month against each paying retail subscriber who has telecommunications ser-
vice, or who has interconnected voice over internet protocol service,  with access to a telecommu-
nications relay service. The commission shall apply the surcharge on a  telecommunications circuit
designated for a particular subscriber. One subscriber line must be counted for each circuit  that
is capable of generating usage on the line side of the switched network  regardless of the quantity
of customer premises  equipment connected to each circuit. For providers of central office based
services, the surcharge must be applied to each line that has unrestricted  connection to the tele-
communications relay service or, for lines that have  restricted access to the telecommunications
relay service, on the  basis of software design. For cellular, wireless or other radio common carriers,
the surcharge must be applied on a per instrument basis and only to subscribers whose place  of
primary use, as defined and determined under 4 U.S.C. 116 to 126, is within this state.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the  commission shall adopt by rule the definition for
“interconnected voice over internet protocol service.” The rule defining “interconnected voice  over
internet protocol service” must be consistent with the  definition for “interconnected VoIP service”
in 47 C.F.R. 9.3.
(2) The surcharge imposed by subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) Services upon which the state  is prohibited from imposing the surcharge by the Constitution
or laws of the United States or the Constitution or laws of the State of Oregon.
(b) Interconnection  between telecommunications utilities, telecommunications cooperatives,
competitive telecommunications services providers certified  under ORS 759.020, radio common car-
riers and interexchange carriers.
(3) The commission annually shall review the surcharge and the balance  in the Residential
Service Protection Fund established under ORS 759.687 and may make adjustments to the  amount
of the surcharge to ensure that the fund has adequate resources, provided that the fund balance does
not exceed six months of projected expenses.
(4) Moneys collected pursuant to the surcharge may not be considered in any proceeding to  es-
tablish rates for telecommunication service.
(5) The commission shall direct telecommunications public utilities to identify separately in bills
to customers for service the surcharge imposed under this section.
(6) Notwithstanding ORS  314.835 and 314.840, the Department of Revenue may disclose infor-
mation received under ORS 403.200 to 403.230 to the commission to carry  out the provisions of
[chapter 290, Oregon  Laws 1987] sections 2 to 6, chapter 290, Oregon Laws 1987, and ORS 759.693
to 759.698.
(7) The  commission may disclose information obtained pursuant to [ chapter 290, Oregon Laws
[2]
SB 724
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
1987,] sections 2 to 6, chapter 290, Oregon Laws  1987, and ORS 759.693 to 759.698  to the de-
partment to administer the tax imposed under ORS 403.200 to 403.230.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 759.685, as amended by section 3, chapter 434, Oregon Laws 2017,  is amended
to read:
759.685. (1)(a) In order to fund the [ program described ] programs  provided for in ORS 759.693
to 759.698 and sections 1 and 2 of this 2021 Act , the Public Utility Commission shall develop and
implement a system for assessing a surcharge in an amount not to exceed 35  cents per month
against each paying retail subscriber who  has telecommunications service, or who has intercon-
nected voice over internet protocol service, with access to a telecommunications relay service.  The
commission shall apply the surcharge on a telecommunications  circuit designated for a particular
subscriber. One subscriber line  must be counted for each circuit that is capable of generating usage
on the line side of the switched network regardless of the quantity of  customer premises equipment
connected to each circuit.  For providers of central office based services, the surcharge must be ap-
plied to each line that has unrestricted connection to the telecommunications relay service  or, for
lines that have restricted access  to the telecommunications relay service, on the basis of software
design. For cellular, wireless or other  radio common carriers, the surcharge must be applied on a
per instrument basis and only to subscribers whose  place of primary use, as defined and determined
under 4 U.S.C. 116 to 126, is within this state.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the  commission shall adopt by rule the definition for
“interconnected voice over internet protocol service.” The rule defining “interconnected voice  over
internet protocol service” must be consistent with the  definition for “interconnected VoIP service”
in 47 C.F.R. 9.3.
(2) The surcharge imposed by subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) Services upon which the state  is prohibited from imposing the surcharge by the Constitution
or laws of the United States or the Constitution or laws of the State of Oregon.
(b) Interconnection  between telecommunications utilities, telecommunications cooperatives,
competitive telecommunications services providers certified  under ORS 759.020, radio common car-
riers and interexchange carriers.
(3) The commission annually shall review the surcharge and the balance  in the Residential
Service Protection Fund established under ORS 759.687 and may make adjustments to the  amount
of the surcharge to ensure that the fund has adequate resources, provided that the fund balance does
not exceed six months of projected expenses.
(4) Moneys collected pursuant to the surcharge may not be considered in any proceeding to  es-
tablish rates for telecommunication service.
(5) The commission shall direct telecommunications public utilities to identify separately in bills
to customers for service the surcharge imposed under this section.
(6) Notwithstanding ORS  314.835 and 314.840, the Department of Revenue may disclose infor-
mation received under ORS  403.200 to 403.230 to the commission to carry out the provisions of ORS
759.693 to 759.698.
(7) The commission may disclose information obtained pursuant to ORS 759.693 to  759.698 to the
department to administer the tax imposed under ORS 403.200 to 403.230.
SECTION 6.
This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]