Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall study:
(a) The effectiveness of current laws  and rules governing the certificate of need process
in this state in lowering the cost of and ensuring access to quality health care; and
(b) The ability of hospitals in this state to meet current and projected future needs.
(2) No later than September 15, 2026,  the authority shall report to the interim commit-
tees of the Legislative Assembly  related to health, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245,
on the potential benefits and risks of amending or repealing current  laws or rules governing
certificates of need.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4532