Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
On or before January 1, 2026, the Housing and Community Services  Depart-
ment shall amend the  Home Ownership Assistance Program and the Culturally Responsive
Organization Down Payment Assistance Program, including by  adopting rules, if necessary,
to require that organizations applying for grants under these programs  to be used for pro-
viding down payment assistance to households:
(1) Expand eligibility to households  with low or moderate income, as defined in ORS
458.610;
(2) Increase the maximum per household payment cap  to $100,000 for first-generation
home buyers; and
(3) Raise the maximum funding cap for first-time home buyers to $40,000.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 458.655 is amended to read:
458.655. (1) The Home Ownership Assistance Account is administered by the Housing and  Com-
munity Services  Department to expand this state’s supply of homeownership housing for [ families
and individuals with income at or below area median income] low and moderate income
households, including persons over 65 years of age, persons  of color, indigenous persons, members
of federally  recognized Indian tribes, persons with disabilities, veterans and agricultural workers.
An amount equal to 25  percent of moneys deposited in the account pursuant to ORS 294.187 is
dedicated for expenditure to  expand this state’s supply of homeownership housing for veterans and
families of veterans. The Oregon Housing Stability Council shall have a policy of distributing  funds
statewide while concentrating funds in those areas of this state  with the greatest need, as deter-
mined by the council. The council’s policy of distributing funds may  differ from the distribution
policy for the Housing Development and Guarantee Account.
(2) Funds in the Home Ownership Assistance Account must be used for:
(a) Grants to organizations that provide down payment assistance  to low or moderate  income
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2502
HB 3507
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
households;
(b) Grants to organizations that both  sponsor and manage homeownership programs for house-
holds with income at or below area median income; or
(c) Grants and technical assistance to organizations that, in working with  households with in-
come at or  below area median income, assist persons of color in obtaining homeownership under
ORS 458.658.
(3) The council shall develop a policy for disbursing grants or technical  assistance under sub-
section (2) of this section for any or all of the following purposes:
(a) To aid homeownership programs for [ households with income at or below area median
income] low or moderate income households , including by providing aid to support  program
administration, [ providing assistance with down payment costs ] down  payment assistance [,] or
[providing] homeownership training and qualification services [ or any combination thereof ]. Funds in
the [ Home Ownership Assistance ] account may not  be used by an organization to pay for its general
operations that do not support homeownership.
(b) To match public and private moneys available  from other sources to provide homeownership
assistance for households with income at or below area median income.
(c) To  administer the [ Home Ownership Assistance ] account as provided for in the legislatively
approved budget, as that term is defined in ORS 291.002, for the Housing and Community  Services
Department.
(4) The council, in developing policy  under subsection (3) of this section, shall give preference
in making grants to those entities that propose to:
(a) Ensure long-term affordability and opportunities for generational  wealth building, including
through loan forgiveness or shared equity;
(b) Ensure the longest use for the units as homeownership housing units  for households with
income at or below area median income, such as by including some form of  equity recapture, land
trust or shared equity provisions, as determined by the council;
(c) Include services for occupants and proposed occupants of  housing including homeownership
training, mortgage qualification service and financial literacy; and
(d) Support a comprehensive  strategy to reverse the decreasing rates of homeownership among
persons of color, giving priority to  activities that support and incorporate best practices or demon-
strate proven success in increasing homeownership  for persons of color or receive grants or tech-
nical assistance under ORS 458.658.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 458.658 is amended to read:
458.658. (1) The Housing  and Community Services Department, in consultation with the Oregon
Housing Stability Council, shall provide grants and  technical assistance to organizations that, in
working with [ households with income at or below  area median income ] low or moderate income
households, attempt to increase access  for persons of color to programs and services that assist
with homeownership, including counseling, financial literacy, post-purchase counseling and down
payment assistance.
(2) Technical  assistance and grants provided to organizations under this section should prioritize
organizations that have an identified commitment and capacity to:
(a) Provide services to persons  of color through services that incorporate the cultural values
of the persons’ communities;
(b) Support or expand culturally specific homeownership counseling  and education programs for
those populations with disparities in homeownership;
[2]
HB 3507
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
(c) Leverage partnerships with the private sector, credit unions or other financial institutions;
(d) Leverage funding from other nonprofit sources; or
(e) Identify and use best practices in  establishing course content guidelines and in exploring
ways to systematically deliver certain services,  including language access, program materials and
counseling, to both increase service availability and reduce costs to individual providers,  especially
in rural areas.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]