Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT SYSTEM
COST CONTAINMENT
(Employee contributions)
SECTION 1.
 ORS 238A.330 is amended to read:
238A.330. [ (1) A member of the  individual account program must make employee contributions to
the individual account program of six percent of the member’s salary. ]
[(2) Employee contributions made by a member of the individual account program under  this sec-
tion shall be credited  by the board to the employee account established for the member under ORS
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 114
SB 1561
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
238A.350 (2).]
(1) A member of  the individual account program shall make employee contributions to
the individual account program of:
(a) Six percent of the member’s salary, which the Public  Employees Retirement Board
shall credit to the employee account established for the  member under ORS 238A.350 (2) and
to the member pension contribution account established for the member  under ORS 238A.350
(3), as directed by the member under subsection (2) of this section; and
(b)(A) For a member  who established membership in the Public Employees Retirement
System before August 29, 2003, as described in ORS 238A.025,  six percent of the member’s
salary, which the board shall credit to the member pension contribution  account established
for the member under ORS 238A.350 (3).
(B) For a member who established membership  in the system on or after August 29, 2003,
as described in ORS 238A.025, four percent of the member’s salary,  which the board shall
credit to the member pension contribution account established for the member under ORS
238A.350 (3).
(2) The board shall allow a member to  direct that all or part of the employee contribution
required under subsection (1)(a) of this section be used to make the  employee contribution
required under subsection (1)(b)  of this section. The amount used from the contribution
made under subsection (1)(a) of this section to make the  employee contribution under sub-
section (1)(b) of this section must be a percentage of salary, may not be less  than one per-
cent of salary and must be a whole number.
(3) A new member of the individual  account program shall first make contributions under this
section for those wages that are attributable to  services performed by the employee during the first
full pay period  following the six-month probationary period required under ORS 238A.300, without
regard to when those wages are considered earned for other purposes under this chapter.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 238A.335 is amended to read:
238A.335. (1) A participating public employer may  agree, by a written employment policy or by
a collective bargaining agreement, to pay the employee  contribution required under ORS 238A.330
(1)(a). The policy or agreement need not include  all members of the individual account program
employed by the employer.
(2) An agreement  under this section to pay the required employee contribution may provide that:
(a) Employee compensation be reduced to generate the funds needed to make  the employee
contributions; or
(b) Additional amounts  be paid by the employer for the purpose of making the employee contri-
butions, and employee compensation not be reduced for the purpose of generating the  funds needed
to make the employee contributions.
(3) A participating public employer must  give written notice to the Public Employees Retirement
Board at the time that  a written employment policy or collective bargaining agreement described
in subsection (1) of this section is adopted or changed. The notice must specifically indicate  whether
the agreement is as  described in subsection (2)(a) or (b) of this section. Any change in the manner
in which employee contributions are to be paid applies  only to employee contributions made on and
after the date the notice is received by the board.
SECTION 3.  ORS 238A.340 is amended to read:
238A.340. (1)  A participating public employer may agree, by a written employment policy or
agreement, to make employer contributions  for members of the individual account program employed
[2]
SB 1561
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
by the employer. The percentage of salary paid as employer contributions may not  be less than one
percent of salary or more than six percent of  salary, and must be a whole number. A participating
public employer may make an  agreement under this section for specific groups of employees em-
ployed by the public employer.
(2) If a participating public employer makes employer contributions under this  section and the
member for  which the contributions are made fails to vest in the employer account under the pro-
visions of ORS 238A.320, the Public Employees Retirement Board  shall apply the contributions in
the employer  account against other obligations of the employer under the Oregon Public Service
Retirement Plan.
(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a participating public employer
may not make contributions under this section on or after the later of:
(a) January 1, 2019; or
(b) The expiration of any collective bargaining agreement in effect on January 1, 2019,
under which a participating public employer makes contributions under this section.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 238A.350 is amended to read:
238A.350. (1) Upon any contributions being made to the individual  account program by or on
behalf of a member of the program, the Public Employees  Retirement Board shall create the account
or accounts  described in this section. Each account shall be adjusted at least annually in accordance
with rules adopted by the board to reflect any net earnings or losses on those contributions and  to
pay the reasonable administrative costs of maintaining the program to the extent the  earnings on
the assets of the program are insufficient to pay those costs. The  adjustments described in this
subsection shall continue  until the account is distributed to the member [ or], forfeited  or applied
to pay the costs of a pension  or other retirement benefits under subsection  (3) of this
section.
(2)(a) The board shall establish  an employee account, which shall consist of the employee con-
tributions made by or on behalf of the member under ORS 238A.330 (1)(a),  as adjusted under sub-
section  (1) of this section , that are not allocated under ORS 238A.330 (2) to the member pension
contribution account established for the member .
(b) The board shall create a separate employee account for a member who becomes an  active
member for the purpose of service in the Legislative Assembly under ORS 237.650, which shall
consist of the employee contributions made by or on behalf of the member that are attributable  to
the member’s legislative service, as adjusted under subsection (1) of this section.
(3)(a) The board  shall establish a member pension contribution account, which shall
consist of the employee contributions made by or on behalf of the  member under ORS
238A.330 (1)(b), as adjusted under subsection (1) of this section.
(b) Unless the amounts in  a member pension contribution account established under this
subsection are withdrawn under ORS 238A.375, the amounts in the  account shall be applied
by the  board to pay the costs of the pension or other retirement benefits payable to the
member or the member’s beneficiary under this chapter  or ORS chapter 238 that are earned
on or after January 1, 2019.
(c) If the amounts in the member pension contribution account established  under this
subsection exceed the actuarially projected costs of  the pension or other retirement benefits
payable to the  member or the member’s beneficiary under this chapter or ORS chapter 238
that are earned on or after January 1, 2019, the board shall refund  the excess amounts to
the member upon retirement.
[3]
SB 1561
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(3)] (4) If the public employer agrees to make employer contributions under ORS 238A.340, the
board shall establish an employer account, which shall consist of the employer contributions  made
on behalf of the member as adjusted under subsection (1) of this section.
[(4)] (5) If the board  accepts rollover contributions on behalf of the member, the board shall
establish a rollover account,  which shall consist of the rollover contributions made by the member
as adjusted under  subsection (1) of this section. Contributions and the earnings attributable to the
contributions must be accounted for separately.
[(5)] (6) The board shall provide  an annual statement to each active and inactive member of the
program that reflects the amount credited to the  accounts established under this section. The
statement shall reflect whether the member is vested in the employer account  under the provisions
of ORS 238A.320.
SECTION 5.  ORS 238A.320 is amended to read:
238A.320. (1)  A member of the individual account program becomes vested in the employee ac-
count established for the member under ORS 238A.350 (2) on the date the  employee account is es-
tablished.
(2) A member who makes rollover contributions becomes vested  in the rollover account estab-
lished for the member under ORS 238A.350 [ (4)] (5) on the date the rollover account is established.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section,  if an employer makes employer contri-
butions for a member  under ORS 238A.340 the member becomes vested in the employer account es-
tablished under ORS 238A.350 [ (3)] (4) on the earliest of the following dates:
(a) The date on which the member completes at least 600  hours of service in each of five cal-
endar years. The five calendar years  need not be consecutive, but are subject to the provisions of
subsection (5) of this section.
(b) The date on which an active member  reaches the normal retirement age for the member
under ORS 238A.160.
(c) If the individual account program is terminated, the date on which termination becomes  ef-
fective, but only to the extent the account is then funded.
(d) The date on which an active member becomes disabled, as described in ORS 238A.155 (5).
(e) The date on which an active member dies.
(4) If on the date that a person  becomes an active member the person has already reached the
normal retirement age for  the person under ORS 238A.160, and the employer makes employer con-
tributions  for  the member under ORS 238A.340, the person is vested in the employer account es-
tablished under ORS 238A.350 [ (3)] (4) on that date.
(5) If a member of the individual account program who is not vested in the  employer account
performs fewer than 600 hours of service  in each of five consecutive calendar years, hours of service
performed before the first calendar year of the period of five  consecutive calendar years shall be
disregarded for purposes of determining whether the member  is vested under subsection (3)(a) of this
section.
(6) Solely for purposes of determining whether a member is vested  under subsection (3)(a) of this
section, hours of service include creditable service, as defined  in ORS 238.005, performed by the
person before the person became  an eligible employee, as long as the membership of the person
under ORS chapter 238 has not been terminated under the provisions of ORS 238.095 on the date
the person becomes an eligible employee.
(7) A member becomes  vested in the member pension contribution account established
for the member under ORS 238A.350 (3) on the date the account is established.
[4]
SB 1561
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 6.  ORS 238A.375 is amended to read:
238A.375. (1)(a) An inactive member of the individual  account program may elect to receive a
distribution of the amounts in the member’s employee account, rollover account  and employer ac-
count to the extent the member is vested in those accounts under ORS  238A.320 if the inactive
member has separated from all service with participating public employers and  with employers who
are treated as part of a participating public employer’s controlled  group under the federal laws and
rules governing the status of the system and the fund as a  qualified governmental retirement plan
and trust.
(b)(A) An inactive member of the individual account program may elect to receive a dis-
tribution of the amounts in the  member’s member pension contribution account established
for the member under ORS 238A.350 (3) if:
(i) The inactive member has separated from all service with participating  public employ-
ers and  with employers who are treated as part of a participating public employer’s con-
trolled group under the federal laws and rules governing the status  of the system and the
fund as a qualified governmental retirement plan and trust; and
(ii) The member is eligible  to withdraw and withdraws from the pension program under
ORS 238A.120.
(B) The withdrawal of the member’s accounts under this  paragraph cancels all member-
ship rights in the Public Employees Retirement System.
(2) If an inactive member of the individual account program who  is not vested in the employer
account receives a distribution under subsection  (1) of this section, the employer account of the
member is permanently forfeited as of the date of the distribution.
(3) A member may not make an election under this section for less than all of the member’s in-
dividual accounts described in ORS 238A.350 in which the member is vested.
(4) A member who is vested in the pension program established under this chapter and who is
eligible to withdraw from the  pension program under ORS 238A.120 may make an election under this
section only if the member also withdraws from the pension program.
(5) A member who has a member account established under ORS chapter 238 may make an
election under this section only if the member also withdraws that member account in  the manner
provided by ORS 238.265. A member who  has an account established under ORS 238.440 may make
an election under this section only if the member  also withdraws the account established under ORS
238.440.
[(5)] (6) If an inactive member receives a distribution under subsection  (1) of this section and is
subsequently reemployed by a participating public employer, any  service performed before the date
the member became an inactive member may not be used  toward the period of service required for
vesting in the employer account under ORS 238A.320.
SECTION 7.  ORS 238A.410 is amended to read:
238A.410. (1) (a) If a member of the individual account program dies before retirement, the
amounts in the  member’s employee account, rollover account and employer account, to the extent
the member is vested in those accounts under ORS 238A.320,  shall be paid in a lump sum to the
beneficiary or beneficiaries designated by the member for the purposes of this section.
(b) If a member of the individual account  program dies before retirement, the amounts
in the member pension contribution account established for the member under ORS  238A.350
(3) shall be applied by the Public Employees Retirement Board  to pay the costs of any benefit
payable under ORS 238A.230. If the amounts in the member pension  contribution account
[5]
SB 1561
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
exceed the costs of the benefit payable under ORS 238A.230, the excess  amounts shall be paid
in a lump sum  to the beneficiary or beneficiaries designated by the member for the purposes
of this section.
(2) If a  member of the individual account program is married at the time of death, or there exists
at the time of death any other person  who is constitutionally required to be treated in the same
manner as a spouse for the purpose of retirement benefits, the spouse or  other person shall be the
beneficiary for purposes  of the death benefit payable under this section unless the spouse or other
person consents to the designation  of a different beneficiary or beneficiaries before the designation
has been made and the consent has not been revoked by the  spouse or other person as of the time
of the  member’s death. Consent and revocation of consent must be in writing, acknowledged by a
notary public, and submitted to the [ Public Employees Retirement ] board  in accordance with rules
adopted by the board. If the member’s spouse is designated  as the member’s beneficiary and the
marriage of the member and spouse is subsequently dissolved, the former  spouse shall be treated as
predeceasing the member for  purposes of this section, unless the member expressly designates the
former spouse as beneficiary after the effective date of the dissolution or  the former spouse is re-
quired to be designated as a beneficiary under the provisions of ORS 238.465.
(3) For purposes of this section and ORS  238A.400 (3), if a member fails to designate a benefi-
ciary, or if the person or persons designated do not survive the member, the death  benefit provided
for in this section shall be paid to the following  person or persons, in the following order of priority:
(a) The member’s surviving spouse or  other person who is constitutionally required to be treated
in the same manner as a spouse;
(b) The member’s surviving children, in equal shares; or
(c) The member’s estate.
(4) The entire amount  of a deceased member’s vested accounts must be distributed by December
31 of the fifth calendar  year after the year in which the member died. Notwithstanding any other
provision of this chapter, distributions of death benefits under the individual account  program must
comply with the minimum distribution requirements of 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9) and  the regulations im-
plementing that section, as in  effect on December 31, 2016. The [ Public Employees Retirement ] board
shall adopt rules implementing those minimum distribution requirements.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 243.800 is amended to read:
243.800. (1)  Notwithstanding any provision of ORS chapter 238 or 238A or ORS 243.910 to
243.945, the governing board of  a public university listed in ORS 352.002 shall establish and admin-
ister an Optional Retirement Plan for administrative and academic employees of the public univer-
sity. The Optional Retirement Plan must be  a qualified plan under the Internal Revenue Code,
capable of accepting funds transferred under subsection  (7) of this section without the transfer being
treated as a taxable event under the Internal Revenue Code, and willing to  accept those funds.
Retirement and death benefits shall be provided under the plan by the purchase of annuity contracts,
fixed or variable or a combination thereof, or by contracts for investments in mutual funds.
(2) An administrative or academic employee who is eligible to remain or  become a member of
the Public Employees Retirement System may elect to participate in the  Optional Retirement Plan
upon completion of:
(a) Six  hundred hours of employment, or the equivalent as determined by the governing board;
and
(b) Six months of employment that is not interrupted by more than  30 consecutive working days.
(3) An administrative or academic  employee who is eligible to remain or become a member of
[6]
SB 1561
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the Public Employees Retirement System, including an  administrative or academic employee who
previously participated in the Optional  Retirement Plan because of employment in a position clas-
sified as a post-doctoral scholar position under ORS 350.370, may make an irrevocable election  to
participate in the Optional Retirement Plan within six months  after being employed. An election
under this subsection is  effective on the first day of the month following the completion of the re-
quirements of subsection (2) of this section.
(4) An administrative or academic employee who is eligible to remain or  become a member of
the Public Employees Retirement System and who does not  elect to participate in the Optional Re-
tirement Plan:
(a) Remains or becomes a member of the Public Employees Retirement System  in accordance
with ORS chapters 238 and 238A; or
(b) Continues to be assisted by the governing board under ORS 243.920  if the employee is being
so assisted.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (6)  of this section, employees who elect to participate in the
Optional Retirement  Plan are ineligible for active membership in the Public Employees Retirement
System or for any assistance by the governing board  under ORS 243.920 as long as those employees
are employed in the public university and the plan is in effect.
(6)(a) An  administrative or academic employee who elects to participate in the Optional Retire-
ment Plan, who has creditable service under ORS chapter 238 as defined by ORS  238.005 and who
is not vested shall be considered by the Public Employees Retirement Board  to be a terminated
member under the provisions of ORS 238.095 as of the effective date of the election,  and the
[amount] amounts  credited to the  member [ account] accounts of the member  established under
ORS 238.250 and 238.260 shall be  transferred directly to the Optional Retirement Plan by the Public
Employees Retirement Board in the manner provided by subsection (7) of this section.
(b) An administrative or academic employee who elects to participate in the Optional Retirement
Plan, who has creditable service under ORS chapter 238 as defined by ORS 238.005 and  who is
vested shall be considered to be an inactive member by the Public Employees Retirement Board and
shall retain all the rights, privileges  and options under ORS chapter 238 unless the employee makes
a written request  to the Public Employees Retirement Board for a transfer of the amounts credited
to the member  [ account] accounts  of the member established under ORS 238.250 and 238.260  to
the Optional Retirement Plan. A request for a transfer must  be made at the time the member elects
to participate in  the Optional Retirement Plan. Upon receiving the request, the Public Employees
Retirement Board shall transfer  all amounts credited to the member [ account] accounts of the
member established under ORS 238.250 and 238.260 directly to the Optional Retirement  Plan, and
shall terminate all rights, privileges and options  of the employee [ under ORS chapter 238 ] as pro-
vided in ORS 238.095.
(c) [ An administrative or academic employee who elects  to participate in the Optional Retirement
Plan, and who is not a vested member of the pension program of the Oregon Public  Service Retirement
Plan as described in ORS 238A.115 ] An administrative or academic  employee who elects to
participate in the  Optional Retirement Plan and who is a member of the pension program
of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan as described in ORS 238A.100  on the date that
the election becomes effective, but who has  not vested in the program under ORS 238A.115
on the date that the election becomes effective, shall  be considered to be a terminated member of
the pension program by the Public Employees Retirement Board as of the effective date  of the
election.  The board shall transfer the amounts credited to the member accounts of  the
[7]
SB 1561
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
member directly to the Optional Retirement Plan in the  manner provided by subsection (7)
of this section.
(d) An administrative or academic employee who elects to participate in the Optional Retirement
Plan, and who is a vested member of the pension program of the Oregon Public Service Retirement
Plan as described in ORS 238A.115 on the date that the election becomes effective, shall  be consid-
ered an inactive member of the pension program by  the Public Employees Retirement Board as of
the effective  date of the election. An employee who is subject to the provisions of this paragraph
retains all the rights, privileges and options of an inactive member  of the pension program. If the
actuarial equivalent of the employee’s benefit under the pension program at the time that  the
election becomes effective is $5,000 or less, the employee may make a written request  to the Public
Employees Retirement Board for a transfer of the  employee’s interest under the pension program to
the Optional Retirement Plan. The request must be made  at the time the member elects to partic-
ipate in the Optional Retirement Plan. Upon receiving the  request, the Public Employees Retirement
Board shall transfer the amount determined to be the actuarial  equivalent of the employee’s benefit
under the pension program  directly to the Optional Retirement Plan, and shall terminate the mem-
bership of the employee in the pension program.
(e) An  administrative or academic employee who elects to participate in the Optional Retirement
Plan, and who is a vested member of the individual account program of the  Oregon Public Service
Retirement Plan as  described in ORS 238A.320 on the date that the election becomes effective, shall
be considered an inactive member of  the individual account program by the Public Employees Re-
tirement Board as of the effective date of the election. An employee who is  subject to the provisions
of this paragraph retains all the rights, privileges and options  of an inactive member of the indi-
vidual account  program. An administrative or academic employee who elects to participate in the
Optional Retirement Plan, and who is a member of the individual account program of the Oregon
Public Service Retirement Plan, may make a  written request to the Public Employees Retirement
Board that all  amounts [ in the member’s employee account, rollover account and employer account ]
credited to the member accounts of the member established under ORS 238A.350 , to the extent
the member is vested in those accounts under ORS 238A.320, be transferred to the Optional  Retire-
ment Plan. The request must be made at the time  the member elects to participate in the Optional
Retirement Plan. Upon receiving the request, the Public  Employees Retirement Board shall transfer
the amounts directly to the Optional Retirement Plan, and shall  terminate the membership of the
employee in the individual account program upon making the transfer.
(f) Notwithstanding paragraphs (b), (d) and  (e) of this subsection, the Public Employees Retire-
ment Board may not treat any employee as  an inactive member under the provisions of this sub-
section for the purpose of receiving any benefit under ORS chapter 238 or  238A that requires that
the employee be separated from all service with participating  public employers and with employers
who are treated  as part of a participating public employer’s controlled group under the federal laws
and rules  governing the status of the Public Employees Retirement System and the Public Employees
Retirement Fund as a qualified governmental retirement plan and trust.
(7) Any amounts transferred from the Public Employees Retirement Fund under subsection (6)
of this section shall be  transferred directly to the Optional Retirement Plan by the Public Employees
Retirement Board and may not be made available to the employee.
(8) An employee participating in the Optional Retirement  Plan who was hired before July 1,
2014, shall contribute monthly an amount equal to the percentage of the employee’s salary that the
employee would otherwise have contributed as  an employee contribution to the Public Employees
[8]
SB 1561
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Retirement System if the employee had not elected to participate in the Optional Retirement Plan.
(9) For an employee participating in the Optional Retirement Plan who was hired before  July
1, 2014, the governing board shall  contribute monthly to the Optional Retirement Plan the percent-
age of salary of the employee equal to the percentage of salary that would otherwise  have been
contributed as an employer contribution on behalf  of the employee to the Public Employees Retire-
ment System, before  any offset under ORS 238.229 (2), if the employee had not elected to participate
in the Optional Retirement Plan.
(10) For an  employee participating in the Optional Retirement Plan who was hired on or after
July 1, 2014, the governing board shall contribute monthly to the Optional Retirement Plan:
(a) Eight percent of the employee’s salary; and
(b) A percentage of  the employee’s salary equal to the percentage of salary contributed by the
employee to the public university’s Tax-Deferred Investment 403(b) Plan under ORS  243.820, up to
four percent of the employee’s salary in each pay period.
(11)(a) Unless otherwise prohibited by  law, a person employed in a position classified as a
post-doctoral scholar position under ORS 350.370 is an academic employee under subsection (1) of
this section and becomes a  participant in the Optional Retirement Plan when the person participates
in the public university’s Tax-Deferred Investment 403(b) Plan under ORS 243.820.
(b) Participation in the Optional Retirement Plan under this subsection becomes effective  on the
first day of the month following the later of:
(A) Enrollment in the public university’s  Tax-Deferred Investment 403(b) Plan under ORS
243.820; or
(B) Completion of:
(i) Six hundred hours of employment, or the equivalent  as determined by the governing board;
and
(ii) Six months of employment that is not interrupted  by more than 30 consecutive working days.
(c) For a post-doctoral scholar  participating in the Optional Retirement Plan, the governing
board shall contribute monthly to  the Optional Retirement Plan a percentage of the post-doctoral
scholar’s salary equal to the percentage  of salary contributed by the post-doctoral scholar to the
public university’s Tax-Deferred Investment 403(b) Plan under  ORS 243.820, up to four percent of the
post-doctoral scholar’s salary in each pay period.
(d) A post-doctoral scholar is an academic employee who elects to participate in the  Optional
Retirement Plan for purposes of subsection (6) of this section.
(e) Subsections (8) to (10) of this section  do not apply to a post-doctoral scholar participating in
the Optional Retirement Plan.
(12) Both employee and employer contributions to  an Optional Retirement Plan shall be remitted
directly to the companies that have  issued annuity contracts to the participating employees or di-
rectly to the mutual funds.
(13) Benefits  under the Optional Retirement Plan are payable to employees who elect to partic-
ipate in the plan and their beneficiaries by the selected annuity provider or mutual fund  in accord-
ance with the terms of the annuity contracts or the terms of the contract with  the mutual fund.
Employees electing to participate in the Optional Retirement Plan agree that  benefits payable under
the plan are not obligations of the State of Oregon or of the Public Employees Retirement System.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 341.551 is amended to read:
341.551. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of ORS chapter 238  or 238A, the Office of Community
Colleges and Workforce Development  may establish and administer an optional retirement plan for
[9]
SB 1561
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
administrative employees of  community college districts who are eligible for membership in the
Public Employees Retirement System. Any community  college district may participate in the plan
by giving written notice to the office.
(2) An administrative employee may make an election to participate in the optional retirement
plan if the community  college district that employs the employee is participating in the plan. The
election must be made in the following manner:
(a) An administrative employee who is  an active member of the Public Employees Retirement
System may make an election to participate in the plan within 180 days after the  community college
district  commences  participation in the plan, effective on the first day of the month following the
election.
(b) An administrative employee who is  hired after the community college district commences
participation in the  plan may make an election to participate in the plan within the first six months
of employment, effective on the first day of the month following six full months of employment.
(3) An administrative employee who does not elect to participate in the  optional retirement plan
remains or becomes a member of the Public Employees Retirement System in accordance with  ORS
chapters 238 and 238A.
(4) An administrative employee may elect to participate in the optional retirement plan  only if
at the time the election becomes  effective the employee is not concurrently employed in a position
with any participating public  employer other than the community college district in a position that
entitles the employee to membership in the Public Employees Retirement System. Except  as pro-
vided in subsection (9) of this section,  employees who elect to participate in the optional retirement
plan are ineligible for active membership in the Public Employees  Retirement System for as long as
those employees are employed by a community college district that participates  in the plan, whether
by reason of employment by the district or any other participating public employer.
(5)(a) An administrative  employee who elects to participate in the optional retirement plan, who
has creditable service under ORS chapter 238 as defined by ORS 238.005  and who is not vested shall
be considered by the  Public Employees Retirement Board to be a terminated member under the
provisions of ORS 238.095 as of the effective date of the election, and the [ amount] amounts credited
to the member [ account] accounts of the member established under ORS 238.250 and 238.260 shall
be transferred directly to  the optional retirement plan by the Public Employees Retirement Board
in the manner provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(b) An administrative employee who elects to participate in the optional retirement plan,  who
has creditable service under ORS chapter 238 as defined by ORS 238.005  and who is vested shall
be considered to be an inactive  member by the Public Employees Retirement Board and shall retain
all the rights, privileges and options under ORS chapter  238 unless the employee makes a written
request to the Public Employees Retirement Board for a transfer of  the amounts credited to the
member [ account] accounts of the member established under ORS 238.250 and 238.260 to the  op-
tional retirement plan. A request for a transfer  must be made at the time the member elects to
participate in the  optional retirement plan. Upon receiving the request, the Public Employees Re-
tirement Board  shall transfer all amounts credited to the member [ account] accounts  of the member
established under ORS 238.250 and 238.260 directly to the optional  retirement plan and shall ter-
minate all rights, privileges  and options of the employee [ under ORS chapter 238 ] as provided in
ORS 238.095.
(c) [ An administrative employee who  elects to participate in the optional retirement plan and who
is not a vested member of the pension program of the Oregon Public  Service Retirement Plan as de-
[10]
SB 1561
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
scribed in ORS 238A.115 ] An administrative employee  who elects to participate in the optional
retirement plan and who is a member of the pension program of the Oregon Public  Service
Retirement Plan as described in ORS 238A.100 on the  date that the election becomes effec-
tive, but who has not vested in the program under ORS 238A.115  on the date that the election
becomes effective , shall be considered  to be a terminated member of the pension program by the
Public Employees  Retirement Board as of the effective date of the election.  The board shall
transfer the amounts credited to the member accounts of the member directly to  the op-
tional retirement plan in the manner provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(d) An  administrative employee who elects to participate in the optional retirement plan and
who is a vested  member of the pension program of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan as
described in ORS 238A.115 on the date that the election becomes effective shall be considered  an
inactive member of the pension  program by the Public Employees Retirement Board as of the ef-
fective date of  the election. An employee who is subject to the provisions of this paragraph retains
all the rights, privileges and options of an inactive member of the pension  program. If the actuarial
equivalent of the employee’s benefit under the pension program at the time that the  election be-
comes effective is $5,000 or less, the employee  may make a written request to the Public Employees
Retirement Board for a transfer of the employee’s interest under the pension program to the optional
retirement plan. The request must be made at the time the member elects to  participate in the op-
tional retirement plan. Upon receiving the request, the Public Employees Retirement Board  shall
transfer the amount determined to be the actuarial equivalent  of the employee’s benefit under the
pension program directly to the optional retirement plan and shall  terminate the membership of the
employee in the pension program.
(e) An administrative  employee who elects to participate in the optional retirement plan and
who is a vested member of  the individual account program of the Oregon Public Service Retirement
Plan as described in ORS 238A.320 on  the date that the election becomes effective shall be consid-
ered an inactive member of the individual account  program by the Public Employees Retirement
Board as of the effective date of the election. An employee  who is subject to the provisions of this
paragraph retains all the rights, privileges and options of an inactive member of the  individual ac-
count program. An administrative employee who  elects to participate in the optional retirement plan
and who is a member of the individual account program of the Oregon Public Service Retirement
Plan may make a written request to the Public Employees  Retirement Board that all amounts [ in the
member’s employee account, rollover account and  employer account ] credited to the member ac-
counts of  the member established under ORS 238A.350 , to the extent the member is vested in
those accounts under ORS 238A.320, be transferred to the optional retirement plan.  The request
must be made at the time the member elects to participate in the optional  retirement plan. Upon
receiving the request, the  Public Employees Retirement Board shall transfer the amounts directly
to the optional retirement  plan and shall terminate the membership of the employee in the individual
account program.
(f) Notwithstanding paragraphs (b), (d) and (e) of this  subsection, the Public Employees Retire-
ment Board shall not treat any employee as an inactive member under the provisions of this  sub-
section for the purpose of  receiving any benefit under ORS chapter 238 or 238A that requires that
the employee be separated from all  service with participating public employers and with employers
who are treated  as part of a participating public employer’s controlled group under the federal laws
and rules  governing the status of the Public Employees Retirement System and the Public Employees
Retirement Fund as a qualified governmental retirement plan and trust.
[11]
SB 1561
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) Any amounts transferred from the Public Employees Retirement Fund under subsection (5)
of this section shall be transferred directly to  the optional retirement plan by the Public Employees
Retirement Board and shall not be made available to the employee.
(7) An employee participating  in the optional retirement plan shall contribute monthly an
amount equal  to the percentage of the employee’s salary that the employee would otherwise have
contributed as an employee contribution to the Public Employees  Retirement System if the employee
had not elected to participate in the optional retirement plan.
(8) A participating community college district shall contribute monthly to  the optional retire-
ment plan the percentage of salary for each employee participating in the plan that  is equal to the
percentage of salary that is required to be made as the employer contribution  under ORS 238A.220,
less any contributions made  by reason of unfunded liabilities. The district may make contributions
under this subsection only during periods  of time in which the employee would be eligible for
membership in the Public Employees Retirement  System if the employee had not elected to partic-
ipate in the optional retirement plan.
(9) An administrative employee who elects  to participate in the optional retirement plan may
make an election to withdraw from the plan. An employee may make an  election under this sub-
section only once. Upon withdrawing from the plan:
(a) All contributions made to the plan before the effective date of  the withdrawal remain cred-
ited to the employee;
(b) The employee becomes a member of  the Public Employees Retirement System under ORS
chapter 238A if the member meets all requirements for membership under ORS chapter 238A; and
(c) The employee is barred from ever again electing to participate in  the optional retirement
plan.
(10) For the purposes of this  section, “administrative employee” means a president, vice presi-
dent or dean, or  a person holding a position that is the equivalent of a president, vice president or
dean.
SECTION 10. (1) The amendments to ORS 238A.320, 238A.330, 238A.335, 238A.340, 238A.350,
238A.375, 238A.410, 243.800 and 341.551 by sections 1 to 9 of this  2018 Act become operative
on January 1, 2019.
(2) The Public Employees Retirement Board may take any  action before the operative
date specified in subsection (1) of this section to enable the board to  exercise, on and after
the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all the duties,  functions and
powers conferred on the board by the amendments to ORS  238A.320, 238A.330, 238A.335,
238A.340, 238A.350, 238A.375, 238A.410, 243.800 and 341.551 by sections 1 to 9 of this 2018 Act.
(Determination of unfunded actuarial liability)
SECTION 11.  ORS 238.605 is amended to read:
238.605. (1) At least once  every two years the Public Employees Retirement Board shall cause
a competent actuary familiar with  public systems of retirement and death benefits to prepare a re-
port evaluating the current and prospective assets and  liabilities of the system and indicating its
current and prospective financial condition. In  preparing the report the actuary shall investigate the
mortality, disability, service and other  experience of the members of, and employers participating in
the system, shall state fully the condition of the  system, and shall make such recommendations as
the actuary deems advisable to facilitate administering it properly.  The board shall publish and
[12]
SB 1561
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
distribute a summary of the  report to all the public employers participating in the system. The board
may authorize the transfer of any portion of the funds collected under the  provisions of ORS 238.225
to carry out the recommendations of the actuary.
[(2) For the purpose of evaluating the system under this section and for the purpose  of issuing re-
ports on the system, the actuary and the board shall determine the unfunded actuarial liability  of the
system by  calculating the difference between the actuarial value of the current and prospective liabilities
of the system and the actuarial value of the assets of the system,  including any lump sum payments
made under ORS 238.229. When reporting on the unfunded actuarial liability in any official documen-
tation or report, the board shall report on the  unfunded actuarial liability as determined under this
subsection.]
(2)(a) For the purpose of  evaluating the system under this section and for the purpose
of issuing reports on the system,  the actuary and the board shall determine the unfunded
actuarial liability of the system by at least the following two methods:
(A) The board shall  calculate the difference between the actuarial value of the current
and prospective liabilities of the system and the actuarial value of the  assets of the system,
including any lump sum payments made under ORS 238.229; and
(B) The board shall calculate  the difference between the actuarial value of the current
and prospective liabilities of the system and the actuarial value of the  assets of the system,
excluding any lump sum payments made under ORS 238.229.
(b) When reporting on the unfunded actuarial  liability in any official documentation or
report, the board shall provide the results of both calculations of the unfunded actuarial li-
ability as described in this subsection.
(Surplus funds above inflation and population)
SECTION 12.
As used in sections 12 to 15 of this 2018 Act:
(1) “General government revenue” means revenue other  than revenue the expenditure
of which is dedicated or restricted to certain  purposes by a constitutional provision, statute,
charter or other law.
(2) “Population growth ratio” means the ratio of the projected  population of the public
body in the upcoming budget period to the population of the  public body in the current
budget period.
(3) “Qualified public body” means any entity in this state that has employees that are
members of the Public  Employees Retirement System, except for an entity that is a school
district.
(4) “Unfunded actuarial liability” means the aggregate  unfunded actuarial accrued liabil-
ity, if any, of the Public Employees Retirement System using the actuarial  cost allocation
method and assuming a rate of return on investments of assets of no more than the average
rate of return for the previous ten years.
SECTION 13.
(1) No later than three months before the beginning of each  budget period,
a qualified public body shall calculate a general budget limit for  the upcoming budget period
as described in this section.
(2) A general budget limit is determined by  multiplying the general government revenue
projected to be available to the qualified public body for expenditure in  the current budget
period by the population growth ratio of the public body, then adding the product  of the total
[13]
SB 1561
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and the percentage change in the U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index for  All Urban
Consumers (All Items) as  published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States
Department of Labor from January 1 of the preceding year to  January 1 of the current year
or, if such index is not available, a substantially similar index.
SECTION 14. (1) At the  end of each budget period, a qualified public body shall remit all
general government revenue that it collected in excess  of its general budget limit determined
under section 13 of this 2018 Act to the State Treasurer.
(2) A qualified public body shall make the remittance required by subsection (1) of this
section within 90 days of the end of the budget period.
(3) The State Treasurer shall  transfer the moneys remitted under this section to the
Public Employees Retirement Fund  established under ORS 238.660, to be applied against the
unfunded actuarial liability of the system.
SECTION 15. (1) Before February 1 of each  year, the State Treasurer shall calculate, or
cause to be calculated, the unfunded actuarial liability.
(2) Sections 13 and 14 of this 2018 Act do not apply if the liability  calculated under sub-
section (1) of this section is less than $1 billion.
REDUCTION OF FUNDING DUE TO LONG-TERM VACANCIES
SECTION 16.  ORS 291.263 is amended to read:
291.263. (1) As used in this section, “state agency” includes any state officer, department,  board,
commission or court, the Legislative Assembly, its committees, officers and employees.
(2) A state agency shall inform the Oregon Department of Administrative Services  of any posi-
tion that has remained vacant for  a continuous period of six months by including a report on the
position in the estimate submitted to  the department under ORS 291.242. The department [ may] shall
consider the vacancy in its determinations under ORS 291.244 and [ may] shall  reduce the  amount
allotted to the state agency.
(3) The department shall, on or before February 1 of each year, provide a report  to the Legis-
lative Fiscal Officer  of any position that has remained vacant for a continuous period of at least six
months. The department shall include in  the report the amount and source of funds for the position.
For each position included on  a previous report under this subsection, the department shall notify
the Legislative Fiscal Officer of conditions that affect  the position, including recruitment actions,
filling the position or using the position for purposes  other than what was anticipated in the
legislatively approved budget. The Legislative Fiscal Officer shall review the list and make  recom-
mendations on adjustments  to agency position authority to the Joint Committee on Ways and Means.
REDUCTION OF ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS
SECTION 17. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Administrative costs” means expenses of  a state agency that are related to man-
agement, supervision, budgeting or execution of the affairs of the state agency  and that are
not directly related to carrying out the core functions and duties of the state agency.
(b) “State agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 291.227, except that the  term
also includes school districts, as defined in ORS 332.002.
(2) In the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, each state agency may spend an amount for
[14]
SB 1561
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
administrative costs that is no greater than 90 percent of the amount the  state agency spent
for administrative costs in the biennium beginning July 1, 2017.
(3) The Oregon  Department of Administrative Services may, by rule, determine which
expenses of a state agency constitute administrative costs.
LIMITATION ON COMPENSATION INCREASES
SECTION 18. (1) For each  biennium, the Legislative Assembly may not approve a total
amount of appropriations for compensation of personnel of state  agencies that is greater
than 101 percent of the total amount of appropriations for compensation of personnel of state
agencies in the preceding biennium.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “Appropriations” has the meaning given that term in ORS 291.357 (3).
(b) “State agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 291.002.
ELIMINATION OF STANDARD INFLATION
SECTION 19.
 ORS 291.216 is amended to read:
291.216. (1) The Governor’s budget shall include  a budget message prepared by the Governor,
including recommendations of  the Governor with reference to the fiscal policy of the state govern-
ment for the coming biennium,  describing the important features of the budget, embracing a general
budget summary setting forth the aggregate figures of the budget so  as to show a balanced relation
between the total proposed expenditures and the total  anticipated income, with the basis and factors
on which the estimates  are made, the amount to be borrowed, and other means of financing the es-
timated expenditures for the ensuing biennium, compared with the corresponding figures for at least
the last completed biennium and the current biennium.
(2) The Governor’s budget shall  be supported by explanatory schedules or statements, classifying
the expenditures reported in the budget, both past and proposed, by organization  units, objects and
funds, and the income by organization units, sources and funds, and  the proposed amount of new
borrowing as well as proposed new tax  or revenue sources, including a single comprehensive list
of all proposed increases in fees, licenses and assessments assumed in the budget.
(3) The Governor’s budget shall be submitted for all dedicated funds, as well as the state Gen-
eral Fund, and shall include the estimated amounts of federal and other aids or grants to  state
agencies or activities provided for any purpose whatever, together with estimated  expenditures
therefrom.
(4) The Governor’s budget shall embrace the detailed  estimates of expenditures and revenues.
It shall include:
(a) Statements of the bonded indebtedness of the state government, showing the  actual amount
of the debt  service for at least the past biennium, and the estimated amount for the current
biennium and the ensuing biennium, the debt authorized and unissued, the condition of  the sinking
funds and the borrowing capacity.
(b) The Governor’s recommendations concerning tax expenditures identified under ORS 291.214.
(c) Any statements relative to the financial plan which the Governor may consider desirable or
which may be required by the Legislative Assembly.
(5) The Governor’s budget shall use the estimated revenues under ORS 291.342  for the fiscal
[15]
SB 1561
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
year in which the budget is submitted as the basis  for total anticipated income under subsection (1)
of this section, subject to adjustment as may be necessary to reflect accurately projections  for the
next biennium.
(6)(a) The Governor’s budget shall present information  regarding the expenses of the state in the
following categories:
(A) Personnel expenses, including compensation and benefits for  state employees, but excluding
costs of services contracted out and temporary service costs.
(B) Supplies, equipment and the costs of services contracted out.
(C) Special payments.
(D) Capital construction.
(E) Capital outlay.
(F) Debt service.
(b) For each category described in paragraph (a) of  this subsection, the budget shall show actual
expenditures for the prior biennium and estimated expenditures for the current biennium.
(c) As supplemental information to the budget, the Governor shall include an  estimate of the
projected costs of  continuing currently authorized programs in the next biennium. The estimate shall
include, but is not limited to the projected costs of:
(A) Removing one-time expenditures;
(B) Program phase-ins and phase-outs;
(C) Personnel expenses compared to existing compensation  plan agreements, including position
vacancy experience calculations;
(D) Inflation [ for services, supplies and medical costs ], except for standard inflation for ser-
vices and supplies;
(E) Transfers between state funds or accounts;
(F) Mandated caseload changes; and
(G) Debt service for previously issued debt.
(d) The budget shall show  the total increase in the cost of salaries and benefits for all state
positions.
(7) The Governor’s budget shall include:
(a) The total number of positions and full-time equivalent positions included in the budget.
(b) The average vacancy rate in the present biennium.
(c) The number of  permanent, full-time equivalent vacancies as of July 1 of even-numbered years.
(8) The Governor’s budget shall include  computations showing budget figures as a percentage
of the total General Fund, federal fund, fee or other source category, as may be appropriate.
(9) The Governor’s budget shall include,  in a format that provides side-by-side comparison with
the State Debt Policy Advisory Commission report of net debt capacity, a six-year forecast,  by debt
type and repayment source, of:
(a) That portion  of the capital construction program required to be reported by ORS 291.224 that
will be financed by debt issuance.
(b) The acquisition of equipment or technology in excess of  $500,000 that will be financed by
debt issuance.
(c) Other state agency debt issuance for grant or loan purposes.
(10) The Governor’s budget shall include the outcomes-based  budgeting information required by
ORS 291.217 (2) and (3).
(11) The Governor’s budget  shall include recommendations regarding available funds that could
[16]
SB 1561
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
be used to make lump sum payments to  the Public Employees Retirement System under ORS 238.229.
(12) The Governor’s budget may not include a standard inflation factor for  services and
supplies.
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING
SECTION 20. Section 21 of this 2018 Act is added  to and made a part of ORS 243.650 to
243.782.
SECTION 21. A collective  bargaining agreement entered into under ORS 243.650 to 243.782
shall:
(1) Be negotiated and entered into no later than October 1 of the  even year immediately
preceding the biennium in which the agreement takes effect;
(2) Take effect on July 1 of  the year immediately following the date on which the agree-
ment was entered into; and
(3) Remain in effect for a period no longer than two years, but may be renewed.
SECTION 22.
Section 21 of this 2018 Act applies to collective bargaining agreements  en-
tered into or renewed on or after the effective date of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 23.  ORS 243.696 is amended to read:
243.696. (1) (a) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall represent all state
agencies which have bargaining units in collective bargaining negotiations  with the certified or re-
cognized exclusive representatives of  all appropriate bargaining units of exempt, unclassified and
classified employees, except those unclassified employees governed  by the provisions of ORS 240.240.
The department may delegate such collective bargaining responsibility to operating agencies as  may
be appropriate.
(b) The  Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall submit any
collective bargaining agreement negotiated  by the department to the Legislative Assembly
for approval. If the negotiated agreement is not approved by three-fifths of the  members
serving in each house of  the Legislative Assembly, the negotiated agreement shall be re-
turned to the director for further bargaining.
(2) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall represent the  judicial department in collective
bargaining negotiations with the certified or recognized exclusive representatives of  all appropriate
bargaining units of officers and employees of the courts of this state who are state officers or  em-
ployees. The Chief  Justice may delegate such collective bargaining responsibility to the state court
administrator.
STATE AGENCY EMPLOYMENT
SECTION 24. (1) As used in this section, “state agency” means the:
(a) Bureau of Labor and Industries;
(b) Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(c) Department of Education;
(d) Department of Environmental Quality;
(e) Department of Land Conservation and Development;
(f) Department of Transportation;
(g) Oregon Department of Administrative Services; and
[17]
SB 1561
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(h) State Department of Energy.
(2) Notwithstanding any  other provision of law, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019,
and the biennium beginning July 1, 2019:
(a) All cost-of-living increases to salaries of state agency employees are suspended;
(b) All step increases within the salary range of each state agency employee are  sus-
pended;
(c) All upward reclassifications of state agency employees are suspended;
(d) Vacant positions  within a state agency may not be filled except when necessary to
protect essential services of the state agency;
(e) New positions within a  state agency may not be created except when necessary to
protect essential services of the state agency;
(f) If allowed by terms of the agreement or contract and notwithstanding any other law,
the terms of any collective bargaining agreement  or services contract entered into by a state
agency concerning cost-of-living increases, salary  step increases, reclassifications and the
filling of vacant positions are suspended;
(g) Payments by state agencies for out-of-state travel by employees  of the state agency
are prohibited;
(h) Purchases of goods and supplies for which payment is not already  obligated are sus-
pended; and
(i) Expenditures by the state agency may not exceed the levels of expenditures  allowed
under the  legislatively approved budget for the agency during the biennium ending June 30,
2017.
(3) When a salary increase suspension under  this section is no longer in effect, the salary
increase applies only prospectively. A state  agency may not retroactively pay a salary in-
crease suspended under this section for  any period during which the salary increase was
suspended.
(4) This section does not apply to state officers elected by popular vote, or appointed to
fill vacancies in elective offices, whose salaries are fixed by law.
SECTION 25.
Section 24 of this 2018 Act is repealed on June 30, 2021.
TASK FORCE ON EDUCATION COST REDUCTION
SECTION 26. (1) The Task Force on Education Cost Reduction is established.
(2) The task force consists of nine members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint one  member from among members of the
Senate;
(b) The Senate Minority Leader  shall appoint one member from among members of the
Senate;
(c) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from among
members of the House of Representatives;
(d) The House Minority Leader shall appoint one  member from among members of the
House of Representatives; and
(e) The Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction shall appoint five  members who
represent public school teachers, public school administrators, district school board members
and personnel of education service districts.
[18]
SB 1561
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) The task force shall  identify effective and efficient uses of state education resources
and shall make recommendations regarding the elimination of unnecessary administrative
requirements.
(4) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(5) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the members
of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a report  on the findings and recommendations described
in subsection (3) of this section to the regular committees  of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to education no later than March 1, 2020.
(11) The Legislative Policy and Research Director may employ persons necessary for the
performance of the functions of the task force. The Legislative Policy and Research Director
shall fix the duties and amounts of  compensation of these employees. The task force shall
use the services of continuing  legislative staff, without employing additional persons, to the
greatest extent practicable.
(12) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to  confidentiality, to furnish the information and advice the members of the
task force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 27.
Section 26 of this 2018 Act is repealed on January 2, 2021.
REVIEW BY SUPREME COURT
SECTION 28. (1) Jurisdiction is conferred upon the Supreme Court to determine in the
manner provided by this section whether this 2018 Act breaches any contract between
members of the Public Employees Retirement System and their employers or violates any
provision of the Oregon Constitution or  of the United States Constitution, including but not
limited to impairment of contract rights  of members of the Public Employees Retirement
System under Article  I, section 21, of the Oregon Constitution, or Article I, section 10, clause
1, of the United States Constitution.
(2) A person who is  adversely affected by this 2018 Act or who will be adversely affected
by this 2018 Act may institute a proceeding for review by filing  with the Supreme Court a
petition that meets the following requirements:
(a) The petition must be filed within 60 days after the effective date of this 2018 Act.
(b) The petition must include the following:
(A) A statement of the basis of the challenge; and
(B) A statement and supporting affidavit showing  how the petitioner is adversely af-
fected.
(3) The petitioner shall serve a copy of the petition by registered  or certified mail upon
[19]
SB 1561
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
the Public Employees Retirement Board, the Attorney General and the Governor.
(4) Proceedings for review under this  section shall be given priority over all other mat-
ters before the Supreme Court.
(5) The Supreme Court shall allow public  employers participating in the Public Employees
Retirement System to intervene in any proceeding under this section.
(6)(a) The Supreme  Court shall allow members of the Legislative Assembly to intervene
in any proceeding relating to this 2018 Act. After a member intervenes in a proceeding re-
lating to this 2018 Act, the member has standing to participate in the  proceeding even if the
member ceases to be a member of the Legislative Assembly.
(b) A member of the Senate or the House of  Representatives who intervenes in or par-
ticipates in a proceeding under this subsection may not use public funds to pay legal  ex-
penses incurred in intervening in or participating in the proceeding.
(7) In the event  the Supreme Court determines that there are factual issues in the peti-
tion, the Supreme Court  may appoint a special master to hear evidence and to prepare re-
commended findings of fact.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 29. The unit captions used in this 2018 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2018 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 30. This 2018 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2018 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[20]