Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
PRELIMINARY PROVISIONS
SECTION 1.
(1) Sections 2 to 5 of this 2020 Act are added to and made a part  of ORS
161.290 to 161.373.
(2) ORS 161.360, 161.365 and 161.370 are added to and made a  part of sections 2 to 5 of this
2020 Act.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 2 to 5 of this 2020 Act:
(1) “Certified evaluator” has the meaning given that term in ORS 161.309.
(2) “Community restoration  services” means services and treatment necessary to safely
allow a defendant to gain or regain fitness to proceed in the community.
(3) “Hospital level of care” means that a defendant requires the type of care  provided by
an inpatient hospital in order to gain or regain fitness to proceed.
(4) “Public safety concerns” means that the defendant presents a risk to the  public if not
hospitalized or in custody.
SECTION 3.
(1) A  recommendation provided by a certified evaluator, pursuant to sections
2 to 5 of this 2020 Act, that a defendant requires a hospital level of care  due to the acuity
of the defendant’s symptoms  must be based upon a review of appropriate community resto-
ration services, the defendant’s current  diagnosis and symptomology, the defendant’s cur-
rent ability to engage in treatment and general safety concerns relating to the defendant.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 70
SB 1575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
The recommendation must state the relevant  considerations supporting the determination
that a hospital level of care is required and why a hospital level of care is appropriate.
(2) A determination by a  community mental health program director, or director’s
designee, pursuant to sections 2  to 5 of this 2020 Act, that appropriate community restora-
tion services are not provided in the community must include  information concerning the
community restoration  services necessary to safely restore the defendant in the community
and must specify those services that are not provided in the community.
(3) An entity or evaluator conducting an examination of a  defendant under sections 2 to
5 of this 2020 Act shall provide a copy of  any report resulting from the examination to the
community mental health program director or designee in:
(a) The county in which the defendant is charged; and
(b) The county of the defendant’s last known residence.
(4)(a) Reports resulting from examinations performed by a certified  evaluator, and doc-
uments containing the recommendations  of or resulting from consultations with a commu-
nity mental health program director or the director’s designee, prepared  under sections 2 to
5 of this 2020 Act are confidential and may be made available only:
(A) To the court, prosecuting  attorney, defense attorney, agent of the prosecuting or
defense attorney, defendant, community mental health program director or designee  and any
facility in which the defendant is housed; or
(B) As ordered by a court.
(b) Any facility  in which a defendant is housed may not use a report or document de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection to support a disciplinary  action against the de-
fendant.
(c) Nothing in this subsection prohibits the  prosecuting attorney, defense attorney or
agent of the prosecuting or defense attorney from discussing the contents of a report  or
document described in paragraph (a)  of this subsection with witnesses or victims as other-
wise permitted by law.
(5) The court shall ensure that an order entered under sections 2 to 5 of this 2020 Act
is provided, by the end of the next  judicial day, to any entity ordered to provide community
restoration services.
(6) Unless the court orders otherwise or either party objects, a defendant committed to
a state mental hospital or other  facility, or a certified evaluator or other expert witness,
may attend hearings held under sections 2 to 5 of this 2020 Act via simultaneous  electronic
transmission.
FITNESS TO PROCEED GENERALLY
SECTION 4.
(1) If at any time the court  determines that the defendant lacks the capacity
to stand trial, the court shall further determine  whether there is a substantial probability
that the defendant, in the foreseeable future, will  gain or regain the capacity to stand trial.
If the court determines that there is no substantial probability that the defendant, in  the
foreseeable future, will gain or  regain the capacity to stand trial, the court shall dismiss,
without prejudice, all charges against the defendant and:
(a) Order that the defendant be discharged; or
(b) Initiate commitment proceedings under ORS 426.070 or 427.235 to 427.290.
[2]
SB 1575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) When the court, on its own motion or upon the application of the  superintendent of
the hospital or director of the facility in which  the defendant is committed under ORS
161.370, a person examining the defendant as a condition  of release to community restoration
services or either party, determines, after a hearing, if a hearing is requested, that the de-
fendant has gained or regained fitness to proceed, the criminal proceeding  shall be resumed.
If, however, the court is of the view that so  much time has elapsed since the commitment
or release of the defendant to community restoration services that it would be unjust  to
resume the criminal proceeding, the  court on motion of either party may dismiss the charge
and may order the defendant to be discharged  or cause a proceeding to be commenced
forthwith under ORS 426.070 to 426.170, 426.701 or 427.235 to 427.290.
(3) If the defendant  gains or regains fitness to proceed, the term of any sentence received
by the defendant for conviction  of the crime charged shall be reduced by the amount of time
the defendant was committed under ORS 161.370 to the custody of a state  mental hospital,
or to the custody of a secure intensive community inpatient facility designated by the Oregon
Health Authority.
(4) Notwithstanding the suspension of the criminal  proceeding under ORS 161.370 (2), the
fact that the defendant is unfit to proceed does not preclude any objection through  counsel
and without the personal participation of the defendant on the grounds that the  indictment
is insufficient, that the statute of limitations has run, that double jeopardy principles apply
or upon any other ground at  the discretion of the court which the court deems susceptible
of fair determination prior to trial.
(5) At the time that the court  determines that the defendant lacks fitness to proceed
under ORS  161.370 (2), the court shall notify the defendant that federal law prohibits the
defendant from purchasing or possessing a firearm unless  the person obtains relief from the
prohibition under federal law. The court shall again notify the defendant of the prohibition
if the court finds that the defendant has gained or regained fitness to  proceed under sub-
section (2) of this section.
COMMITTED DEFENDANTS
SECTION 5.
(1) The superintendent of a state mental hospital or director of a  facility to
which the defendant is committed under ORS 161.370 shall cause the defendant to  be evalu-
ated within 60 days from the defendant’s delivery into the  superintendent’s or director’s
custody, for the purpose of determining whether there is a  substantial probability that, in
the foreseeable future, the defendant will have the capacity to stand trial.  In addition, the
superintendent or director shall:
(a) Immediately notify the committing court if the defendant, at any  time, gains or re-
gains the capacity to stand trial or will never have the capacity to stand trial.
(b) Within 90 days of the defendant’s delivery  into the superintendent’s or director’s
custody, notify the committing court that:
(A) The defendant has the present capacity to stand trial;
(B) There is no  substantial probability that, in the foreseeable future, the defendant will
gain or regain the capacity to stand trial; or
(C) There  is a substantial probability that, in the foreseeable future, the defendant will
gain or  regain the capacity to stand trial. If the probability exists, the superintendent or di-
[3]
SB 1575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
rector shall give the court an estimate of the time in which the defendant, with  appropriate
treatment, is expected to gain or regain capacity.
(c) Notify the court if court-ordered  involuntary medication is necessary for the defend-
ant to gain or regain the capacity to stand trial and, if appropriate,  submit a report to the
court under ORS 161.372.
(2)(a) If the superintendent or director determines that there is  a substantial probability
that, in the foreseeable future, the defendant will  gain or regain the capacity to stand trial,
unless the court otherwise  orders, the defendant shall remain in the superintendent’s or
director’s custody where the defendant shall receive treatment designed for  the purpose of
enabling the defendant to gain or regain capacity. In keeping with the notice requirement
under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the superintendent or director shall,  for the duration
of the defendant’s period of commitment, submit a  progress report to the committing court,
concerning the defendant’s capacity or  incapacity, at least once every 180 days as measured
from the date of the defendant’s delivery into the superintendent’s or director’s custody.
(b) A progress report described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may consist of  an
update to:
(A) The original examination report conducted under ORS 161.365; or
(B) An evaluation conducted  under subsection (1) of this section, if the defendant did not
receive an examination under ORS 161.365.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, if the  most serious offense in the
charging instrument is a felony, and the superintendent  or director determines that a hos-
pital level of care is no longer necessary due to present public safety concerns, or no  longer
necessary due to the acuity  of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder, the
superintendent or director shall file notice of the determination with the court.
(b) Upon receipt of the notice, the court shall order:
(A) That a community mental health program director or the director’s designee,  within
five judicial days:
(i) Consult with the defendant and with any  local entity that would be responsible for
providing community restoration services, if the  defendant were to be released in the com-
munity, to determine whether community restoration services are provided in the commu-
nity; and
(ii) Provide the court and the parties with recommendations from the consultation.
(B) That the superintendent or director, within five judicial days:
(i) Evaluate the defendant to determine whether a hospital level  of care is no longer
necessary due to present public  safety concerns, or no longer necessary due to the acuity
of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder; and
(ii) Provide the court and the parties with recommendations from the evaluation.
(c) Within 10 judicial days of receiving  the recommendations described in paragraph (b)
of this subsection, the court shall hold a hearing  to determine an appropriate action in ac-
cordance with ORS 161.370 (2)(c) as follows:
(A) If, after  consideration of the factors and possible actions described in ORS 161.370
(2)(c) and the recommendations  from the consultation and evaluation described in paragraph
(b) of this subsection, the court determines that a hospital  level of care is necessary due to
present public safety concerns and the acuity of symptoms  of the defendant’s qualifying
mental disorder, and that based on the consultation and evaluation  described in paragraph
[4]
SB 1575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) of this subsection, any information provided by community-based mental  health providers
or any other sources, and primary and secondary  release criteria as defined in ORS 135.230,
the appropriate community restoration services are not provided in  the community, the
court may continue the commitment of the defendant.
(B) If the court does not  make the determination described in subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph, the court shall terminate the commitment and  shall set a review hearing seven
days from the date  of the commitment termination for any defendant remaining in custody.
At the  review hearing, the court shall consider all relevant information, determine an ap-
propriate action in the case as  described in ORS 161.370 (2)(c) and enter an order in accord-
ance with the defendant’s constitutional rights to due process.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, if the  most serious offense in the
charging instrument is a misdemeanor, and the superintendent or  director determines that
the acuity of  symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder is not severe and there
are not present public  safety concerns, the superintendent or director shall file notice of that
determination with the court, along with recommendations regarding the community  resto-
ration services that would mitigate any risk presented by the defendant.
(b) Upon  receipt of the notice, the court shall order that a community mental health
program director or the director’s designee, within five judicial days:
(i) Consult with the defendant and with any  local entity that would be responsible for
providing community restoration services, if the defendant were to  be released in the com-
munity, to determine whether community restoration services are provided in the commu-
nity; and
(ii) Provide the court and the parties with recommendations from the consultation.
(c) Within 10 judicial days of receiving  the recommendations described in paragraph (b)
of this subsection, the court shall hold a  hearing to determine an appropriate action in ac-
cordance with ORS 161.370 (2)(c) as follows:
(A) After consideration of the factors  and possible actions described in ORS 161.370 (2)(c),
and any recommendations  from the consultation described paragraph (b) of this subsection,
the court may continue  the commitment of the defendant if the court makes written findings
that appropriate community restoration services  are not provided in the community and that
there are present public safety concerns.
(B) If the court does not make the  findings described in subparagraph (A) of this para-
graph, the court shall terminate the commitment and shall  set a review hearing seven days
from the date of the commitment termination for any  defendant remaining in custody. At
the review hearing, the court shall consider all relevant information, determine  an appro-
priate action in the case as described in ORS 161.370 (2)(c) and enter an  order in accordance
with the defendant’s constitutional rights to due process.
(5)(a) A defendant who remains committed under  this section shall be discharged within
a period of time that is reasonable for making a determination concerning whether, and
when, the defendant may gain  or regain capacity. However, regardless of the number of
charges with which the defendant is accused, in no event shall the defendant be  committed
for longer than whichever of the following, measured  from the defendant’s initial custody
date, is shorter:
(A) Three years; or
(B) A period of time equal  to the maximum sentence the court could have imposed if the
[5]
SB 1575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
defendant had been convicted.
(b) For purposes of calculating  the maximum period of commitment described in para-
graph (a) of this subsection:
(A) The initial custody date is  the date on which the defendant is first committed under
this section on any charge alleged in the accusatory instrument; and
(B) The  defendant shall be given credit against each charge alleged in the accusatory
instrument:
(i) For each day the defendant is committed  under this section, whether the days are
consecutive or are interrupted by a period of time during which the  defendant has gained or
regained fitness to proceed; and
(ii) Unless the defendant is charged on  any charging instrument with aggravated murder
or a crime listed in ORS 137.700 (2), for each day the defendant  is held in jail before and after
the date the  defendant is first committed, whether the days are consecutive or are inter-
rupted by a period of time during which the defendant lacks fitness to proceed.
(c) The  superintendent or director shall notify the committing court of the defendant’s
impending discharge 30 days before the date  on which the superintendent or director is re-
quired to discharge the defendant under this subsection.
(6)(a) All notices required under this  section shall be filed with the court and may be filed
electronically. The clerk of the court shall cause copies of the notices to be delivered to both
the district attorney and the counsel for the defendant.
(b) When the committing court receives a notice from the superintendent or director
under subsection (1) of  this section concerning the defendant’s progress or lack thereof, or
under subsection (5) of this  section concerning the defendant’s impending discharge, the
committing court shall determine, after a hearing if a hearing is requested, whether the de-
fendant presently has the capacity to stand trial.
(7) If at any time the court determines that  the defendant lacks the capacity to stand
trial, the court shall further determine whether the defendant is  entitled to discharge under
subsection (5) of this section. If  the court determines that the defendant is entitled to dis-
charge under subsection (5) of this section, the court shall  dismiss, without prejudice, all
charges against the defendant and:
(a) Order that the defendant be discharged; or
(b) Initiate commitment proceedings under ORS 426.070 or 427.235 to 427.290.
EXAMINATION OF DEFENDANT
SECTION 6.
 ORS 161.365 is amended to read:
161.365. (1)(a) When the court has reason to doubt the defendant’s  fitness to proceed by reason
of incapacity as described in ORS 161.360, the court may call any witness  to assist it in reaching
its decision and shall order that a community mental  health program director, or the director’s
designee, consult with the defendant and with any  local entity that would be responsible for
[supervising] providing community restoration services to  the defendant if the defendant were
to be released in the community, to determine whether [ services  and supervision necessary to safely
allow the defendant to gain or  regain fitness to proceed ] community restoration services  are
[available] provided in the community. After the consultation, the program  director or the director’s
designee shall provide to the  court a copy of the findings resulting from the consultation. If the
[6]
SB 1575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
court determines the assistance of a psychiatrist or psychologist would be helpful, the court may:
(A) Order that a psychiatric or  psychological examination of the defendant be conducted by a
certified evaluator and a report of the examination be prepared; or
(B) Order the defendant to be committed for the purpose of an examination to a state mental
hospital or other facility designated by the Oregon Health Authority if  the defendant is at least 18
years of age, or to a secure intensive community inpatient facility designated by the authority  if the
defendant is under 18 years of age. The  state mental hospital or other facility may retain custody
of a defendant committed  under this paragraph for the duration necessary to complete the exam-
ination of the  defendant, not to exceed 30 days. The examination may include a period of observa-
tion.
(b) The court shall provide a copy of any order entered  under this subsection to the community
mental health program director or designee and  to the state mental hospital or other facility by the
end of the next judicial day.
(2)(a) A defendant committed under  subsection (1)(a)(B) of this section shall be transported to
the state mental hospital or other facility for the examination.
(b) At the conclusion of the examination, the superintendent of the state mental hospital  or the
superintendent’s designee or the director of the facility may:
(A) Return the defendant to the facility from which the defendant was transported; or
(B) Inform the court and the parties that the defendant requires a hospital level  of care due to
[the defendant’s  dangerousness and ] the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental
disorder and request that the defendant remain at the state  mental hospital or other facility pending
a hearing or order under ORS 161.370.
(c) If both parties consent, the court may, without holding a hearing, enter  any order authorized
by ORS 161.370 based on a report resulting from an examination conducted under this section.
(3) The report of an examination described in this section  must include, but is not necessarily
limited to, the following:
(a) A description of the nature of the examination;
(b) A statement of the mental condition of the defendant;
(c) If the defendant suffers from a qualifying mental disorder, an opinion as  to whether the de-
fendant is incapacitated within the description set out in ORS 161.360; and
(d) If the defendant is incapacitated  within the description set out in ORS 161.360, a recom-
mendation of treatment  and services necessary to allow the defendant to gain or regain capacity,
including whether a hospital level  of care is required due to [ the defendant’s dangerousness and ] the
acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder.
(4) Except when the defendant and the court both request to the contrary, the report may  not
contain any findings or conclusions as to whether the defendant as a result of a qualifying mental
disorder was subject to the provisions of ORS 161.295 or 161.300 at the time of the  criminal act
charged.
(5) If the examination by the certified evaluator cannot be conducted by  reason of the unwill-
ingness of the defendant to participate in the  examination, the report must so state and must in-
clude, if possible, an opinion as to whether the  unwillingness of the defendant was the result of a
qualifying mental disorder affecting capacity to proceed.
(6)[(a)] The report resulting from  the examination of a defendant under this section may be filed
electronically and must be filed with the clerk of the court,  who shall cause copies to be delivered
to the district attorney and to counsel for defendant.
[7]
SB 1575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(b) The entity or evaluator conducting the examination shall provide a copy of the report resulting
from the examination to the community mental health program director or designee in: ]
[(A) The county in which the defendant is charged; and ]
[(B) The county of the defendant’s last known residence. ]
[(c) Reports prepared under this section are confidential and may be made available only: ]
[(A) To the court, prosecuting attorney, defense attorney, agent of the prosecuting or defense attor-
ney, defendant, community  mental health program director or designee and any facility in which the
defendant is housed; or ]
[(B) As ordered by a court. ]
[(d) Any facility in which a defendant is housed may not use a report prepared under  this section
to support a disciplinary action against the defendant. ]
[(e) Nothing in this subsection prohibits the prosecuting attorney, defense attorney or  agent of the
prosecuting or defense attorney from  discussing the contents of a report prepared under this section
with witnesses or victims as otherwise permitted by law. ]
(7)(a) When upon motion of the court or a financially eligible defendant, the  court has ordered
a psychiatric or psychological examination of the defendant, a county or justice court shall order
the county to pay, and a circuit court shall order the  public defense services executive director to
pay from funds available for the purpose:
(A) A reasonable fee if the examination  of the defendant is conducted by a certified evaluator
in private practice; and
(B) All costs including transportation of the defendant if the examination is conducted by  a
certified evaluator in the employ of the Oregon  Health Authority or a community mental health
program established under ORS 430.610 to 430.670.
(b) When an examination is ordered  at the request or with the acquiescence of a defendant who
is determined not to be financially eligible, the examination shall be performed at the defendant’s
expense. When an examination is ordered at the request of the prosecution, the county shall pay for
the expense of the examination.
(8) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish by rule  standards for the consultation described
in subsection (1) of this section.
[(9) As used in this section and ORS  161.370, “certified evaluator” has the meaning given that term
in ORS 161.309. ]
DISPOSITION UPON FINDING OF LACK OF FITNESS
SECTION 7.
 ORS 161.370 is amended to read:
161.370. (1)(a) When the defendant’s fitness to  proceed is drawn in question, the issue shall be
determined by the court.
(b) If neither the prosecuting attorney nor counsel for the defendant contests the finding of the
report filed under  ORS 161.365, the court may make the determination on the basis of the report.
If the finding  is contested, the court shall hold a hearing on the issue. If the report is received in
evidence in the hearing, the party who contests the finding has the right to summon and to  cross-
examine any certified evaluator who submitted the  report and to offer evidence upon the issue.
Other evidence regarding the defendant’s fitness to proceed may be introduced by either party.
(2)(a) If the court determines that the defendant lacks fitness to proceed, the criminal proceeding
against the defendant shall be suspended and the  court shall, at a hearing, proceed in accordance
[8]
SB 1575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
with this subsection.
(b) After making the determination under  paragraph (a) of this subsection, the court shall re-
ceive a recommendation, to be considered at the hearing, from a community mental health  program
director or the  director’s designee, and from any local entity that would be responsible for super-
vising the defendant if the defendant were  to be released in the community, concerning whether
[services and supervision necessary to safely allow the defendant  to gain or regain fitness to proceed
are available ] community restoration services are provided  in the community.
(c) The court and the parties shall at the hearing [ determine] consider an appropriate action in
the case, and the court shall determine the appropriate action and enter an order necessary to
implement the action. In determining the appropriate action, the court shall  consider the primary
and secondary release criteria as defined in ORS 135.230, the least restrictive  option appropriate for
the defendant, the needs of the defendant and the interests of justice. Actions  may include but are
not limited to:
(A) Commitment for the defendant to gain or regain fitness to proceed  under subsection (3) or
[(5)] (4) of this section;
(B) Community restoration as recommended by the community  mental health program director
or designee;
(C) Release [ on supervision ] under subsection (6) of this section ;
(D) Commencement of a civil commitment proceeding under ORS 426.070 to 426.170, 426.701 or
427.235 to 427.290;
(E) Commencement of protective proceedings under ORS chapter 125; or
(F) Dismissal of the charges pursuant to ORS 135.755.
(d) If the court, while considering or ordering an appropriate  action under this subsection, [ de-
termines that the defendant does not require a hospital level of care  due to the defendant’s
dangerousness and the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s  qualifying mental disorder, but that ser-
vices and supervision necessary to safely allow the defendant to gain or regain fitness to proceed are
not available ] does not order the defendant committed to a state mental hospital or other fa-
cility, but finds that community restoration services are not provided  in the community, for
any defendant remaining in custody  after such determination, the court shall set a review hearing
seven days from the date of  the determination under paragraph (a) of this subsection. At the review
hearing, the court shall consider all relevant information and determine [ an appropriate action in the
case as described  in paragraph (c) of this subsection. If the defendant remains in custody following the
initial review hearing, the court shall hold further  review hearings every seven days thereafter until the
defendant is no longer in custody. ] if commitment to the state mental  hospital or other facility
is appropriate under subsection (3) or (4) of this section, or if another  action described in
paragraph (c) of this subsection is appropriate. At the conclusion of  the hearing the court
shall enter an order in accordance with the defendant’s constitutional  rights to due process.
[(3)(a) Unless the court orders an action  other than commitment under subsection (2) of this section,
and except as otherwise provided in subsections  (4) and (5) of this section, if the court finds that the
defendant is dangerous to  self or others as a result of a qualifying mental disorder, that a hospital level
of care is necessary due to  the defendant’s dangerousness and the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s
qualifying mental disorder, and that, based on the findings resulting from the consultation described
in ORS 161.365 (1) and from any  information provided by community-based mental health providers
or any other sources, the services and supervision necessary to allow the defendant to gain or regain
fitness to proceed are not available  in the community, the court shall commit the defendant to the cus-
[9]
SB 1575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tody of the superintendent of a state mental hospital or director of a facility designated by  the Oregon
Health Authority  if the defendant is at least 18 years of age, or to the custody of the director of a secure
intensive community inpatient facility designated by the authority  if the defendant is under 18 years
of age.]
(3)(a) If the most serious offense in  the charging instrument is a felony, the court shall
commit the defendant to the custody  of the superintendent of a state mental hospital or di-
rector of a facility designated by the Oregon Health Authority if the defendant is at least  18
years of age, or to the custody of the director  of a secure intensive community inpatient
facility designated by  the authority if the defendant is under 18 years of age, if the court
makes the following findings:
(A) The defendant  requires a hospital level of care due to public safety concerns if the
defendant is not hospitalized or in custody or  the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s
qualifying mental disorder; and
(B) Based on the findings resulting from  the consultation described in ORS 161.365 (1),
from any information provided by community-based mental health providers or any other
sources, and primary and secondary release criteria as defined in ORS 135.230, the appropri-
ate community restoration services are not provided in the community.
(b) If the defendant is committed under this  subsection, the community mental health program
director , or director’s designee,  shall at regular intervals, during any  period of commitment, re-
view available community [ resources ] restoration services  and maintain communication with the
defendant and the superintendent of the state mental hospital or director of the facility  in order to
facilitate an efficient transition to treatment in the community when ordered.
(c) If the  court does not order the commitment of the defendant under this subsection,
the court shall proceed in accordance with subsection (2)(c) of this  section to determine and
order an appropriate action other than commitment.
[(4)(a) If the court does  not make a finding described in subsection (3) of this section, if commitment
is precluded under subsection (5) of this section or if the court determines that care other than com-
mitment for incapacity to stand trial would better serve the defendant and  the community, the court
shall release the defendant on supervision for as long as the unfitness endures. ]
[(b) The court may order a community mental health program director providing treatment to  the
defendant in the community to provide the court with  status reports on the defendant’s progress in
gaining or regaining fitness to proceed. ]
[(c) A community mental health program director providing treatment to the defendant in the com-
munity shall notify the court if the defendant gains or regains fitness to proceed. ]
[(5)(a) If the most serious offense in the charging instrument is a violation,  the court may not
commit the defendant under subsection (3) of this section. ]
[(b)] (4)(a) If the most serious offense in the charging instrument is a  misdemeanor, the court
may not commit the defendant [ under subsection (3) of this section ] to  a state mental hospital or
other facility  unless the [ finding that the  defendant requires a hospital level of care due to the
defendant’s dangerousness and the acuity of symptoms of the  defendant’s qualifying mental disorder is
based on a recommendation by a certified evaluator as defined in ORS 161.309, or a  community mental
health program  director or the director’s designee, that the defendant requires such level of care. ]
court:
(A)(i) Receives a  recommendation from a certified evaluator that the defendant requires
a hospital level of care due to  the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental
[10]
SB 1575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
disorder; and
(ii) Receives a recommendation from a community mental health program director, or
director’s designee, that the appropriate community restoration services are  not provided in
the community; or
(B) Determines that the defendant requires a hospital level  of care after making all of
the following written findings:
(i) The acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder are severe;
(ii) There are present public safety concerns if the  defendant is not hospitalized or in
custody; and
(iii) The appropriate community restoration services are not provided in  the community.
[(c)] (b)  If at the time of determining the appropriate action for the case , the court is consid-
ering commitment under paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection and:
(A) Has not received a recommendation  from a certified evaluator  as to whether the defend-
ant requires a hospital level of care  due to [ the defendant’s dangerousness and ] the acuity of symp-
toms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder, the court shall  order a certified evaluator [ or a
community mental health program director, or the director’s designee, ] to make  such a recommen-
dation.
(B) Has not received a recommendation from the community  mental health program di-
rector or designee that appropriate community restoration services are not provided  in the
community, the court shall order the director or designee to make such a recommendation.
[(d)] (c)  If the court does not order the  commitment of [ a] the  defendant [ described in this sub-
section to the state mental hospital or other facility ] under this  subsection , the court shall [ hold a
hearing] proceed in  accordance with subsection (2)(c) of this section to determine and order an ap-
propriate action other than commitment.
(5) If the most serious offense in the charging instrument is a violation,  the court may
not commit the defendant to a state mental hospital or other facility.
(6)(a) If the court does not  order the commitment of the defendant under subsection (3)
or (4) of this section, if commitment is precluded under subsection (5) of this section or if
the court determines that care other than commitment for incapacity to stand trial would
better serve the defendant and the  community, the court shall release the defendant for
community restoration services for as long as the unfitness endures.
(b) The court may  order a community mental health program director providing treat-
ment to the defendant in the  community to provide the court with status reports on the
defendant’s progress in gaining or regaining fitness to proceed.
(c) A  community mental health program director providing treatment to the defendant
in the community shall notify the court if the defendant gains or regains fitness to  proceed.
The notice shall be filed with the  court and may be filed electronically. The clerk of the court
shall cause copies of the notice to be delivered to both the district attorney and the  counsel
for the defendant.
[(6)] (d)  When a defendant is released  [ on supervision ] to community restoration services
under [ subsection (4) of this section ] this subsection , the court may place  conditions that the court
deems appropriate on the release, including the requirement that the  defendant regularly report to
the authority or a community mental health program for examination to determine  if the defendant
has gained or regained capacity to stand trial.
[(7) When the court, on its own motion or upon the application of  the superintendent of the hospital
[11]
SB 1575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or director of the facility in which  the defendant is committed, a person examining the defendant as a
condition of release  on supervision, or either party, determines, after a hearing, if a hearing is re-
quested, that the defendant has gained or regained fitness to proceed, the criminal proceeding shall be
resumed. If, however, the court is of the view that so much time has elapsed  since the commitment or
release of the defendant on supervision that it would  be unjust to resume the criminal proceeding, the
court on motion  of either party may dismiss the charge and may order the defendant to be discharged
or cause a proceeding to be commenced forthwith under ORS 426.070 to  426.170, 426.701 or 427.235 to
427.290.]
[(8) The  superintendent of a state hospital or director of a facility to which the defendant is com-
mitted shall cause the defendant to be evaluated  within 60 days from the defendant’s delivery into the
superintendent’s or director’s custody, for the purpose of determining whether there is a  substantial
probability that, in the foreseeable future, the defendant will have  the capacity to stand trial. In addi-
tion, the superintendent or director shall: ]
[(a) Immediately notify the committing court if the defendant, at any time, gains or regains the ca-
pacity to stand trial or will never have the capacity to stand trial. ]
[(b) Within 90 days  of the defendant’s delivery into the superintendent’s or director’s custody, notify
the committing court that: ]
[(A) The defendant has the present capacity to stand trial; ]
[(B) There is no  substantial probability that, in the foreseeable future, the defendant will gain or
regain the capacity to stand trial; or ]
[(C) There is a substantial probability that, in the  foreseeable future, the defendant will gain or
regain the capacity to stand trial.  If the probability exists, the superintendent or director shall give the
court an estimate of the time in which the defendant, with appropriate treatment, is expected  to gain
or regain capacity. ]
[(c) Notify the court if court-ordered involuntary medication is necessary for  the defendant to gain
or regain the capacity to proceed and, if appropriate, submit a report to  the court under ORS
161.372.]
[(9)(a) If the superintendent  or director determines that there is a substantial probability that, in
the foreseeable future, the defendant will gain  or regain the capacity to stand trial, unless the court
otherwise orders,  the defendant shall remain in the superintendent’s or director’s custody where the
defendant shall receive  treatment designed for the purpose of enabling the defendant to gain or regain
capacity. In keeping with the notice requirement under subsection (8)(b) of this  section, the superinten-
dent or director shall, for the duration of  the defendant’s period of commitment, submit a progress re-
port to the committing court, concerning the defendant’s capacity or incapacity, at least once  every 180
days as measured from the date of the defendant’s delivery  into the superintendent’s or director’s cus-
tody.]
[(b)(A) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, if the superintendent or  director deter-
mines that a defendant committed under this section is no  longer dangerous to self or others as a result
of a qualifying mental disorder, that a hospital level of care is not  necessary due to the defendant’s
dangerousness and the acuity  of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder, or that the
services and supervision necessary to allow the defendant  to gain or regain fitness to proceed are
available in the community, the superintendent  or director shall file notice of that determination with
the court. ]
[(B) Upon receipt of the notice,  the court shall order that a community mental health program di-
rector or the director’s designee, within five judicial days: ]
[12]
SB 1575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(i) Consult with the defendant and with any local  entity that would be responsible for supervising
the defendant if the defendant were to be released in the community to  determine whether services and
supervision necessary to safely allow the defendant to  gain or regain fitness to proceed are available
in the community; and ]
[(ii) Provide the court and the parties with recommendations from the consultation. ]
[(C) Within 10 judicial days of receiving the  recommendations from the consultation, the court shall
hold a hearing to determine an appropriate action in accordance with subsection (2)(c) of  this section
as follows: ]
[(i) If, after consideration  of the factors and possible actions described in subsection (2)(c) of this
section, and any recommendations from the  consultation described in this paragraph, the court deter-
mines that the defendant remains dangerous to self or  others as a result of a qualifying mental disor-
der, a hospital level of care  is necessary due to the defendant’s dangerousness and the acuity of
symptoms of the defendant’s  qualifying mental disorder, and the services and supervision necessary to
allow the defendant to gain or regain  fitness to proceed are not available in the community, the court
may, after making specific findings to that effect, continue the commitment. ]
[(ii) If the court  does not make the findings described in sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph,
the court shall terminate the commitment and shall set  a review hearing seven days from the date of
the commitment termination for any defendant remaining in custody. At the review hearing, the  court
shall consider all relevant information and  determine an appropriate action in the case as described in
subsection (2)(c) of this  section. If the defendant remains in custody following the initial review hearing,
the court shall hold further review  hearings every seven days thereafter until the defendant is no longer
in custody.]
[(c) A progress report described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may consist of an update to: ]
[(A) The original examination report conducted under ORS 161.365; or ]
[(B) An evaluation conducted under subsection (8) of this section, if the defendant  did not receive
an examination under ORS 161.365. ]
[(10)(a) A defendant  who remains committed under subsection (9) of this section shall be discharged
within a period of time that is reasonable for making a  determination concerning whether or not, and
when, the  defendant may gain or regain capacity. However, regardless of the number of charges with
which the defendant is accused, in no event shall the defendant be  committed for longer than whichever
of the following, measured from the defendant’s initial custody date, is shorter: ]
[(A) Three years; or ]
[(B) A period of time equal to the maximum sentence the court could have imposed if  the defendant
had been convicted. ]
[(b) For purposes of calculating the maximum period of commitment described in paragraph (a)  of
this subsection: ]
[(A) The initial custody date is the date on which the  defendant is first committed under this sec-
tion on any charge alleged in the accusatory instrument; and ]
[(B) The defendant shall be given credit against  each charge alleged in the accusatory
instrument:]
[(i) For each day the defendant is committed under this section, whether the days are  consecutive
or are interrupted by a period of time during which the defendant has gained or regained fitness to
proceed; and]
[(ii) Unless the defendant is charged on  any charging instrument with aggravated murder or a
crime listed in ORS 137.700 (2),  for each day the defendant is held in jail before and after the date the
[13]
SB 1575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
defendant is first committed, whether the days are  consecutive or are interrupted by a period of time
during which the defendant lacks fitness to proceed. ]
[(11) The superintendent or director shall notify the committing  court of the defendant’s impending
discharge 30 days before the date on which the superintendent or director is required to discharge  the
defendant under subsection (10) of this section. ]
[(12) When the committing court receives a notice from the superintendent or  director under sub-
section (8) or (11) of this section concerning the defendant’s progress or lack  thereof, the committing
court shall determine, after a hearing, if a hearing is  requested, whether the defendant presently has
the capacity to stand trial. ]
[(13) If at any time the court determines that the defendant lacks the capacity to stand trial, the
court shall further determine  whether there is a substantial probability that the defendant, in the fore-
seeable future, will gain or regain  the capacity to stand trial and whether the defendant is entitled to
discharge under  subsection (10) of this section. If the court determines that there is no substantial
probability that the defendant, in the foreseeable future, will gain or regain the capacity  to stand trial
or that the defendant is entitled to discharge under subsection (10) of  this section, the court shall dis-
miss, without prejudice, all charges against the defendant and: ]
[(a) Order that the defendant be discharged; or ]
[(b) Initiate commitment proceedings under ORS 426.070 or 427.235 to 427.290. ]
[(14) All notices required under this section shall be filed with the  court and may be filed elec-
tronically. The clerk of the court  shall cause copies of the notices to be delivered to both the district
attorney and the counsel for the defendant. ]
[(15) If the defendant gains or regains  fitness to proceed, the term of any sentence received by the
defendant for conviction of the crime  charged shall be reduced by the amount of time the defendant
was committed under this section to the custody of a state mental hospital, or  to the custody of a secure
intensive community inpatient facility designated by the Oregon Health Authority. ]
[(16) Notwithstanding the  suspension of the criminal proceeding under subsection (2) of this section,
the fact that the defendant is  unfit to proceed does not preclude any objection through counsel and
without the personal participation of the defendant  on the grounds that the indictment is insufficient,
that the statute of limitations has run, that  double jeopardy principles apply or upon any other ground
at the discretion of the court which the court deems susceptible of fair determination prior to trial. ]
[(17) At the time that the court determines that the defendant  lacks fitness to proceed under sub-
section (2) of this section, the court shall notify  the defendant that federal law prohibits the defendant
from purchasing or possessing a firearm unless the  person obtains relief from the prohibition under
federal law. The court shall again notify  the defendant of the prohibition if the court finds that the
defendant has gained or regained fitness to proceed under subsection (7) of this section. ]
[(18)(a) The entity or evaluator conducting an  examination of a defendant under this section shall
provide a  copy of any report described in this section to the community mental health program director
or designee in: ]
[(A) The county in which the defendant is charged; and ]
[(B) The county of the defendant’s last known residence. ]
[(b) Reports prepared under this section are confidential and may be made available only: ]
[(A) To the court, prosecuting attorney, defense attorney, agent of the prosecuting or defense attor-
ney, defendant, community mental health program director or designee and any facility in  which the
defendant is housed; or ]
[(B) As ordered by a court. ]
[14]
SB 1575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(c) Any facility in which a defendant  is housed may not use a report prepared under this section
to support a disciplinary action against the defendant. ]
[(d) Nothing in this subsection prohibits the prosecuting  attorney, defense attorney or agent of the
prosecuting or defense attorney from discussing the contents of a report  prepared under this section
with witnesses or victims as otherwise permitted by law. ]
[(19) The court shall ensure that an order entered under  this section is provided, by the end of the
next judicial day,  to any entity ordered to provide services and supervision necessary to restore the
defendant’s fitness to proceed. ]
[(20) Unless the court orders otherwise or either party objects,  a defendant committed to a state
hospital or other facility, or a certified evaluator or other expert witness, may attend hearings  held
under this section via simultaneous electronic transmission. ]
[(21)] (7) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish by rule standards  for the recommendation
provided to the court described in subsection (2) of this section.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 8.
 ORS 161.372 is amended to read:
161.372. (1) If, at any point while the defendant is in the custody of  the superintendent of the
state mental hospital after commitment  under ORS  161.370, the superintendent determines that
medication is the recommended treatment in order to allow the defendant  to gain or regain fitness
to proceed, the defendant is  refusing to take the recommended medication and the defendant cannot
be involuntarily medicated without a court order, the superintendent shall  submit a report of the
determination to the court.
(2) The report described in subsection (1) of this section shall include:
(a) Information regarding the benefits and side effects of each recommended medication;
(b) Information concerning the defendant’s refusal to take the recommended medication; and
(c) The likelihood that  the medication will allow the defendant to gain or regain fitness to pro-
ceed.
(3)(a) Based upon the report  described in subsection (1) of this section, the prosecuting attorney
may file a motion  requesting that the court authorize the involuntary administration of medication
to the defendant. The prosecuting attorney shall provide a copy of the motion to the defendant.
(b) The court shall hold a hearing on the motion if either the prosecuting  attorney or the de-
fendant requests a hearing. At the hearing, the  court shall determine whether to issue an order
authorizing the involuntary administration of medication to the defendant.
(c) In order to enter an order authorizing the involuntary administration of medication  to the
defendant, the court must find that:
(A) Involuntary medication of the defendant is not otherwise authorized by law;
(B) There are important state interests at stake in the prosecution of the defendant;
(C) The recommended medication will significantly  further the important state interests because:
(i) It is substantially likely that the medication will render the defendant fit to proceed; and
(ii) It is substantially unlikely that the medication will cause side effects that  will impair the
fairness of the criminal proceeding;
(D) Involuntary administration of medication is necessary to further  the important state inter-
ests because there are no alternative, less intrusive treatments that would produce the  same result
as the medication; and
[15]
SB 1575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(E) Administration of the medication is medically appropriate  because it is in the defendant’s
best medical interest in light of the defendant’s medical condition.
(d) A court order  authorizing the involuntary administration of medication to a defendant under
this section must specify:
(A) The specific medication or type of medications permitted to be administered to  the defend-
ant;
(B) The maximum dosage that may be administered; and
(C) The duration of time  that the state mental hospital may involuntarily medicate the defendant
before reporting back to the court on the  defendant’s mental condition and progress toward gaining
or regaining fitness to proceed. The duration of time shall not exceed the maximum period of  the
defendant’s commitment to the state mental hospital, or 180 calendar days, whichever is shorter.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 161.373 is amended to read:
161.373. (1) Unless otherwise prohibited by law or for good cause, all public  bodies, as defined
in ORS 174.109, and any private medical provider in possession of records concerning the  defendant,
shall, within five  business days of receipt of the order, comply with a court order for the release
of records to the state mental hospital or other facility designated by the Oregon Health  Authority
for the purpose of conducting an examination or evaluation  under [ ORS 161.365 or 161.370] sections
2 to 5 of this 2020 Act .
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the Oregon Youth Authority, the  Department
of Corrections, a community college  district, a community college service district, a public univer-
sity, a school district or an education service district may,  after notifying the state hospital or other
facility designated by the Oregon Health Authority, comply with the court  order within 15 business
days of receipt of the order without good cause.
(3) As used in this section, in the case of a community college district, a community  college
service district, a public university, a school district or an education service  district,  “business
day” does not include any day on which the central administration offices of the district  or univer-
sity are closed.
SECTION 10.  ORS 161.390 is amended to read:
161.390. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules for the assignment of persons to state
mental hospitals or secure intensive community inpatient  facilities  after commitment  under ORS
161.365 and 161.370 and for establishing  standards for evaluation and treatment of persons commit-
ted to a  state hospital or a secure intensive community inpatient facility or ordered to a community
mental health program under ORS 161.315 to 161.351.
(2) When the  Psychiatric Security Review Board requires the preparation of a predischarge or
preconditional release plan before  a hearing or as a condition of granting discharge or conditional
release for a person committed under ORS 161.315 to 161.351 to a state  hospital or a secure inten-
sive community inpatient facility for custody, care and treatment, the  authority is responsible for
and shall prepare the plan.
(3) In carrying out a conditional release plan prepared  under subsection (2) of this section, the
authority  may  contract with a community mental health program, other public agency or private
corporation or an individual to provide  supervision and treatment for the conditionally released
person.
(4)(a) The board shall maintain and keep current the medical, social  and criminal history of all
persons committed to its jurisdiction. The confidentiality of records  maintained by the board shall
be determined pursuant to ORS 192.338, 192.345, 192.355 and 192.398.
[16]
SB 1575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Except as otherwise provided by law, upon request  of the board, a state hospital, a commu-
nity mental health program and  any other health care service provider shall provide the board with
all medical records pertaining to a person committed to the jurisdiction of the board.
(5) The evidentiary phase of  a hearing conducted by the board under ORS 161.315 to 161.351 is
not a deliberation for purposes of ORS 192.690.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 161.392 is amended to read:
161.392. (1) The Oregon Health  Authority shall adopt rules necessary to certify psychiatrists and
licensed psychologists for the  purpose of performing evaluations and examinations described in ORS
161.309[, 161.365] and 419C.524  and sections 2 to  5 of this 2020 Act . The rules must include a de-
scription of the standards and qualifications  necessary for certification. The authority may charge
a fee for certification under this section in an amount determined by rule.
(2) The authority shall consult with the Psychiatric Security  Review Board about proposed rules
described in subsection (1) of this section before issuing the proposed rules for public comment and
before adopting the rules.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 181A.290 is amended to read:
181A.290. (1) The Department of Human Services, the Oregon Health  Authority, the Psychiatric
Security Review Board and  the Judicial Department shall provide the Department of State Police
with the minimum information necessary to identify persons who:
(a) Have been committed by a court to the  Oregon Health Authority under ORS 426.130, based
on a finding that the person is dangerous to self or others;
(b) Are subject to a court order  under ORS 426.130 or 426.133 prohibiting the person from pur-
chasing or possessing a firearm;
(c) Have been  committed by a court to the Department of Human Services under ORS 427.290,
based on a finding that the person is dangerous to self or others;
(d) Have been found by a court to lack fitness to proceed under ORS 161.370;
(e) Have been found  guilty except for insanity of a crime under ORS [ 161.295 to 161.370] 161.290
to 161.373;
(f) Have been found responsible except for insanity for an act under ORS 419C.411;
(g) Have been  placed under the jurisdiction of the Psychiatric Security Review Board under ORS
161.315 to 161.351; or
(h) Have been committed to a state hospital or  facility under ORS 161.315 to 161.351 or 419C.529
to 419C.544.
(2) Upon receipt of  the information described in this section, the Department of State Police
shall access and maintain  the information and transmit the information to the federal government
as required under federal law.
(3) The Department of Human Services, the Oregon Health Authority, the Psychiatric Security
Review Board and the Judicial Department shall enter into agreements with the Department of State
Police describing the access to information provided under this section.
(4) The Department of State Police shall adopt rules:
(a) After consulting with the Department of Human Services, the Oregon Health  Authority, the
Psychiatric Security Review Board  and the Judicial Department, describing the type of information
provided to the Department of State Police under this section; and
(b) Describing  the method and manner of maintaining the information described in this section
and transmitting the information to the federal government.
(5) As used in this section, “minimum information  necessary” means data elements or nominal
[17]
SB 1575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
information that is necessary or  required under federal law to accurately identify a person described
in this section and includes the person’s name, date of birth, gender and reference information that
identifies the originating agency or court  and enables the originating agency or court to locate an
underlying record or file of a person described in this section. “Minimum  information necessary”
does not include any medical,  psychiatric or psychological information, case histories or files of a
person described in this section or any record or file of an originating agency or court.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 430.230 is amended to read:
430.230. As used in ORS 430.230 to 430.236:
(1) “Comprehensive community supports and services” includes:
(a) Community-based mental health or substance use disorder treatment programs;
(b) [ Community-based services necessary to restore a  defendant’s fitness to proceed, as described
in ORS 161.370 (2)(a) ] Community restoration services as defined in section 2 of this  2020
Act;
(c) Evidence-based and tribal-based programs  designed to reduce hospital and jail utilization by
target populations; and
(d) Programs aimed at diverting individuals with nonperson criminal charges  experiencing men-
tal illness or substance use disorders from the criminal justice system.
(2) “County” includes a single county or a regional consortium of counties.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 14.
The unit captions used in this 2020 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2020 Act.
[18]