Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 677.
SECTION 2. (1)(a) The Oregon Medical Board shall adopt rules requiring that a physician
or a physician associate complete at least two hours every six  years of continuing education
regarding suicide risk assessment, treatment and management as described in ORS 676.860
that includes lethal means counseling as defined by the board.
(b) The rules adopted under this subsection must require a physician or physician asso-
ciate to report the completion of the continuing education described in  this subsection to the
board.
(2)(a) The board shall document completion of  the continuing education described in
subsection (1) of this section by a physician or physician  associate as required by ORS
676.860. The board shall  remove any personally identifiable information from the data sub-
mitted to the board under  this subsection, except for the personally identifiable information
of physicians and physician associates willing to share  such information with the Oregon
Health Authority.
(b) In the manner and at the time required by ORS  676.860, the board shall report to the
authority on the data documented under this subsection.
(3) The board shall approve continuing education opportunities that meet the require-
ments of subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 3.
The requirements of section 2 of this 2025 Act apply to licenses to practice
as a physician or physician associate issued or renewed on or after the  effective date of this
2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3227