Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $20,000 to be
expended to support the Reedsport Public Library in Douglas County.
SECTION 2. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3721