Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
OFFICE OF WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
SECTION 1.
(1) The  Office of Workforce Development is established within the Bureau
of Labor and Industries. The office shall function under the direction and  control of the bu-
reau, with the Director of the Office of Workforce Development serving as  an administrative
officer for workforce development matters.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the bureau may adopt any rules
necessary for the effective and  efficient administration of the office or for the administration
of laws that the office is charged with administering.
(3) The bureau, in consultation with the State Workforce and  Talent Development Board,
workforce partners and the Education and Workforce Policy Advisor and pursuant to  ORS
chapter 183,  may adopt any rules necessary for the administration of laws related to the
federal Workforce Innovation  and Opportunity Act that the bureau is charged with admin-
istering.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3114
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) The bureau is authorized to request, as part of the funding request  relating to duties
authorized under ORS 660.300 to 660.420, appropriations for budgetary items, including but
not limited to workforce  development and coordination of the state workforce development
system.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Office of Workforce Development Account is established  in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the  General Fund. Except for moneys otherwise desig-
nated by statute, all fees, assessments and  other moneys received by the Office of Workforce
Development shall be deposited into the State Treasury and credited to  the account. All
moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the Bureau of Labor and  Industries
for purposes authorized by law.
(2) The office may accept gifts, grants and donations from any source to  carry out the
duties imposed upon the office. Moneys received under this subsection shall be paid into  the
account.
(3) The office shall  keep a record of all moneys deposited into the account. The record
shall indicate by separate cumulative subaccounts the sources from  which the moneys are
derived and the individual activity or program against which each withdrawal is charged.
(4) Disbursements from the account shall be made as directed by the bureau.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries shall appoint
a Director of the Office  of Workforce Development who shall serve at the pleasure of the
commissioner.
(2) The director shall:
(a) Be the executive head of the Office of Workforce Development.
(b) Direct and supervise all activities of the office.
(c) Hire staff, as authorized by  the commissioner, to assist in carrying out the duties of
the office. The staff shall be considered employees of the office for purposes of  ORS chapters
240 and 243.
(d) Be responsible directly to the commissioner.
(3) The commissioner shall be responsible for submitting budget requests for the office
to the Legislative Assembly. The Bureau of Labor and Industries shall  ensure that the
budget request for the office is separate and distinct from the  bureau’s other requests to the
Legislative Assembly.
TRANSFER
SECTION 4.
(1) The  duties, functions and powers of the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission that pertain  to the administration of the federal Workforce Innovation and Op-
portunity Act  and related workforce development matters are imposed upon, transferred to
and vested in the Bureau of Labor and Industries.
(2) The duties, functions and powers of the Office of  Community Colleges and Workforce
Development that  pertain to the administration of the federal Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act and related workforce development matters are imposed  upon, transferred
to and vested in the Office of Workforce Development.
SECTION 5. (1)(a) The executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating  Com-
mission shall:
(A) Deliver to the Bureau of Labor and Industries all records and property within the
[2]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
jurisdiction of the executive director that relate to the duties,  functions and powers trans-
ferred by section 4 of this 2025 Act; and
(B) Transfer to the Bureau of Labor and Industries those employees engaged primarily
in the exercise of the duties, functions and powers transferred by section 4 of this 2025 Act.
(b) The Commissioner of the  Bureau of Labor and Industries shall take possession of the
records and property, and shall take charge of the employees and  employ them in the exer-
cise of the duties, functions  and powers transferred by section 4 of this 2025 Act, without
reduction of  compensation but subject to change or termination of employment or compen-
sation as provided by law.
(c) The Governor shall resolve any  dispute between the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission and the Bureau of Labor and Industries  relating to transfers of records, prop-
erty and employees under this section, and the Governor’s decision is final.
(2)(a) The Director of the Office  of Community Colleges and Workforce Development
shall:
(A) Deliver  to the Office of Workforce Development all records and property within the
jurisdiction of the  director that relate to the duties, functions and powers transferred by
section 4 of this 2025 Act; and
(B) Transfer to the Office of Workforce Development  those employees engaged primarily
in the exercise of the duties, functions and powers transferred by section 4 of this 2025 Act.
(b) The Director of the Office of Workforce Development shall take possession of the
records and property, and shall take  charge of the employees and employ them in the exer-
cise of the duties, functions and powers transferred by section 4 of  this 2025 Act, without
reduction of compensation but subject to change or termination of employment or  compen-
sation as provided by law.
(c) The Governor shall resolve any dispute  between the Office of Community Colleges and
Workforce Development and the Office of Workforce Development relating to transfers of
records, property and employees under this section, and the Governor’s decision is final.
SECTION 6.
(1)(a) The unexpended balances of amounts authorized to be expended  by the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  from
revenues dedicated, continuously appropriated, appropriated or otherwise made available for
the purpose of administering and enforcing the duties, functions and powers  transferred by
section 4 of this 2025 Act are transferred to and are  available for expenditure by the Bureau
of Labor and Industries  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for the purpose of adminis-
tering and enforcing the duties, functions and powers transferred by section  4 of this 2025
Act.
(b) The expenditure classifications, if any, established by Acts authorizing  or limiting
expenditures by the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission remain applicable to expen-
ditures by the Bureau of Labor and Industries under this section.
(2)(a) The  unexpended balances of amounts authorized to be expended by the Office of
Community Colleges and Workforce Development  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
from revenues dedicated, continuously appropriated, appropriated or  otherwise made avail-
able for  the purpose of administering and enforcing the duties, functions and powers trans-
ferred by section 4 of this 2025 Act are transferred to and are  available for expenditure by
the Office of Workforce Development for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for the purpose
of administering and enforcing the duties, functions and powers transferred  by section 4 of
[3]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
this 2025 Act.
(b) The expenditure classifications, if any, established by Acts authorizing  or limiting
expenditures by the Office  of Community Colleges and Workforce Development that relate
to the duties, functions  and powers transferred by section 4 of this 2025 Act remain appli-
cable to expenditures by the Office of Workforce Development under this section.
SECTION 7.
(1) The transfer of duties, functions and powers to  the Bureau of Labor and
Industries by section 4 of  this 2025 Act does not affect any action, proceeding or prosecution
involving or with respect to the duties, functions and powers  begun before and pending at
the time of the transfer, except that the Bureau  of Labor and Industries is substituted for
the Higher Education Coordinating Commission in the action, proceeding or prosecution.
(2) The transfer of duties, functions and powers to the Office  of Workforce Development
by section 4 of this 2025 Act does not  affect any action, proceeding or prosecution involving
or with respect to the duties, functions and powers begun before and pending at the time  of
the transfer, except  that the Office of Workforce Development is substituted for the Office
of Community Colleges and Workforce Development in  the action, proceeding or prosecution.
SECTION 8. (1) Nothing in sections 4 to 6 of  this 2025 Act relieves a person of a liability,
duty or obligation accruing under or with respect to the duties,  functions and powers
transferred by  section 4 of this 2025 Act. The Bureau of Labor and Industries or the Office
of Workforce Development may undertake the collection or enforcement of  any such liabil-
ity, duty or obligation.
(2) The rights and obligations of the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission legally
incurred under contracts, leases and business transactions  executed, entered into or begun
before the operative date specified in section 82 of this 2025 Act accruing under or with re-
spect to the duties, functions and powers transferred by  section 4 of this 2025 Act are
transferred to the Bureau of Labor and Industries. For the purpose of succession to these
rights and obligations, the Bureau of Labor and Industries is  a continuation of the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission and not a new authority.
(3) The  rights and obligations of the Office of Community Colleges and Workforce De-
velopment legally incurred under contracts, leases  and business transactions executed, en-
tered into or begun before the operative date specified in section 82 of this 2025 Act accruing
under or with respect to the duties, functions and powers transferred by  section 4 of this
2025 Act are transferred to the Office of Workforce  Development. For the purpose of suc-
cession to these rights and obligations, the Office of Workforce Development is a  continua-
tion of the Office of Community Colleges and Workforce Development and not  a new
authority.
SECTION 9.
Notwithstanding the transfer of duties, functions and powers by  section 4
of this 2025 Act, the rules of the Higher  Education Coordinating Commission with respect to
such duties, functions or powers that are in effect on the operative date specified in  section
82 of this 2025 Act continue in effect until superseded  or repealed by rules of the Bureau of
Labor and Industries. References in  such rules of the Higher Education Coordinating Com-
mission to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission or an officer or employee of the
Higher Education  Coordinating Commission are considered to be references to the Bureau
of Labor and Industries or an officer or employee of the Bureau of Labor and Industries.
SECTION 10. (1) Whenever, in any uncodified law or resolution of the Legislative As-
sembly or in any rule, document, record or proceeding authorized by the Legislative Assem-
[4]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
bly, in the context of the duties, functions and powers transferred by section  4 of this 2025
Act, reference is made  to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, or an officer or
employee of the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission, whose duties, functions or
powers are transferred by section 4  of this 2025 Act, the reference is considered to be a
reference to the Bureau of Labor and Industries or an  officer or employee of the Bureau of
Labor and Industries who by this  2025 Act is charged with carrying out the duties, functions
and powers.
(2) Whenever, in  any uncodified law or resolution of the Legislative Assembly or in any
rule, document, record or proceeding authorized by the Legislative Assembly, in the  context
of the duties, functions and powers transferred by section 4 of this 2025 Act,  reference is
made to  the Office of Community Colleges and Workforce Development, or an officer or
employee of the Office of Community  Colleges and Workforce Development, whose duties,
functions or  powers are transferred by section 4 of this 2025 Act, the reference is considered
to be a reference to the Office of Workforce Development or  an officer or employee of the
Office of Workforce Development who by this 2025 Act is  charged with carrying out the du-
ties, functions and powers.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 11.
 ORS 285A.516 is amended to read:
285A.516. The [ Higher Education Coordinating Commission ] Office of Workforce Development
is the state agency that shall be notified when an employer is required to provide written  notice of
a plant closing or mass layoff under section 3 of the  Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification
Act (P.L. 100-379).
SECTION 12.  ORS 285A.519 is amended to read:
285A.519. (1) The [ Higher Education Coordinating Commission ] Office of Workforce Develop-
ment shall notify employers subject to  the Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act (P.L.
100-379) that the [ commission] office is the state agency that must be notified when  the employers
are required to provide  notice of a plant closing or mass layoff under the Worker Adjustment and
Retraining Notification Act (P.L. 100-379).
(2) When notifying employers  as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the [ commission] of-
fice shall provide employers  with a statement of the programs, projects, expenditures and other
forms of assistance the [ commission] office and other state agencies can provide  to communities,
employers and workers affected by a plant closing or mass layoff.
SECTION 13.  ORS 285A.522 is amended to read:
285A.522. (1) The [ Higher Education Coordinating Commission ] Office of Workforce Develop-
ment shall prepare an annual report concerning plant closings and mass layoffs in  this state. The
report shall describe  in detail each plant closing or mass layoff during the period covered by the
report and the assistance and services provided  to the affected employers, workers and communities.
The report shall also contain the most recent information available relating to the current  status
of the employer, workers and community affected by each plant closing or mass layoff.
(2) The report prepared under  this section shall be presented to the Governor, the President of
the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives and appropriate legislative committees.
SECTION 14.  ORS 576.871 is amended to read:
576.871. (1) The report submitted by the Oregon Wine Board under ORS 182.472 must  include a
[5]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
description of the long term strategic plan created  by the board and a description of the progress
made in implementing  the statewide strategic objectives of the board during the most recent
biennium.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 182.462:
(a) The board shall prepare and submit annual plans and  a budget recommended by the board
for promotion and for research during the next fiscal year.
(b) The board shall adopt rules specifying the procedures, criteria and timelines  for the prepa-
ration and approval of the annual plans and budget for promotion and for research.
(c) The Director of the Oregon Business Development Department shall review the budget  and
plans submitted under this  section. In reviewing the annual plans and budget, the director shall
consider whether the information supplied by the board is  factual and consistent with ORS 576.850
to 576.877 and the positive development of the Oregon wine grape  growing and wine making indus-
tries. The director shall either approve the budget and plans prior to the commencement of the  next
fiscal year or disapprove and return the budget and plans to the board with conditions necessary
for approval prior to the commencement of the next fiscal year. In reviewing the budget  and plans,
the director may consult with and receive coordinated support from:
(A) The State Department of Agriculture;
(B) The Oregon Tourism Commission;
(C) Oregon State University;
(D) The Office of Workforce Development;
[(D)] (E) The Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ]; and
[(E)] (F) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 660.318 is amended to read:
660.318. (1) To implement and  oversee state implementation of the federal Workforce Innovation
and Opportunity Act, the [ Higher Education Coordinating Commission ] Bureau of Labor  and In-
dustries may:
(a) Receive federal youth  activities funds allotted to this state by the Secretary of Labor pur-
suant to  the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act and allocate those funds that are
not reserved according to an allocation formula recommended by the State  Workforce and Talent
Development Board and approved by the Governor.
(b) Receive federal adult  employment and training activities funds allotted to this state by the
Secretary of Labor pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act and allocate
those funds that  are not reserved according to an allocation formula recommended by the State
Workforce and Talent Development Board and approved by the Governor.
(c) Receive federal dislocated worker funds allotted to this state  by the Secretary of Labor
pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act  and allocate those funds that are
not reserved according to an allocation formula recommended by the State  Workforce and Talent
Development Board and approved by the Governor.
(d) Establish a procedure for use  by local workforce development boards to identify eligible
providers of training services  according to section 3174 of the federal Act and to maintain the list
of providers identified as eligible by the  boards in all local workforce development areas in this
state.
(e) Receive the  comprehensive strategic plan developed and implemented by each local
workforce development board and review  the plan, with input from representatives of state and local
workforce programs, to determine if the plan meets the requirements  of section 3123 of the federal
[6]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Act and state policy.
(f) Approve the plans, after review by the State Workforce  and Talent Development Board, that
are found to meet the  requirements of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act and
review and approve any amendments to the plans.
(g) Carry out the required and allowable activities described  in section 3174 of the federal Act
with the advice of the Education and Workforce Policy Advisor.
(h) Pursuant to ORS 660.339, establish procedures to maintain the confidentiality of  the names
and records of participants in workforce programs for which  the [ commission] bureau is responsible,
including circumstances under which the names and records may be disclosed.
(i) Establish a  method to set performance standards for the Secretary of Labor as required under
section 3141 of the federal Act.
(j) Perform planning functions related to programs and performance reporting under  the federal
Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.
(2)(a) Subject to the availability of funds  from the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity
Act, the [ commission] bureau shall create and operate a summer youth employment program that
reestablishes meaningful summer work experience for persons between  the ages of 14 and 24 and
that meets the requirements for funding under the federal Act.
(b) Programs funded under this subsection:
(A) Must include representatives of the business community in  the planning, implementation and
evaluation of the program.
(B) May provide for private and public sector employment opportunities.
(C) Shall be managed by  local workforce development boards in a manner that coordinates re-
gional state-sponsored youth work experience programs.
(c) Local workforce development boards responsible for managing programs  created under this
subsection shall provide training  for business, labor and education leaders in use of best practices
that ensure positive summer work experiences for participants.
(3) The [ commission] bureau shall collaborate with the State Workforce and Talent Development
Board and local workforce development boards  to collect data on summer work experience programs
that identify successful summer work experiences and  allow for the identification and dissemination
of promising practices.
(4) The [ commission] bureau, in consultation with the State  Workforce and Talent Development
Board, may adopt rules pursuant to ORS chapter 183 to implement this section.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 660.324 is amended to read:
660.324. (1) The State Workforce and Talent Development Board shall identify:
(a) Key industries in  this state and the workforce skills needed for key industries to grow and
thrive;
(b) In collaboration with workforce representatives, needs for education, training, work experi-
ence, and job preparation to ensure Oregonians  access to stable high-wage jobs and employment
advancement; and
(c) Opportunities for  partnerships with key industry sectors to coordinate workforce develop-
ment, economic development and education in response to industry and workforce needs.
(2) The board shall assist the Governor in:
(a) Developing Oregon’s workforce development system;
(b) Ensuring  timely consultation and collaboration with chief elected officials, local workforce
development boards and other  workforce stakeholders, including but not limited to business and la-
[7]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
bor organizations and organizations working with persons  with disabilities, persons living at or be-
low 100 percent of the federal poverty guidelines and the chronically unemployed  and
underemployed;
(c) Reviewing and approving local workforce plans;
(d) Developing, as required by the  federal Act, allocation formulas for the distribution of funds
to local workforce development  areas for adult employment and training activities and for youth
activities that are developed by the local workforce development boards;
(e) Working with local  workforce development boards to increase efficiencies and align
workforce programs and services with local needs;
(f) Recommending the duties and responsibilities of state  agencies to implement the federal Act,
to avoid  conflicts of interest and to capitalize on the experience developed by workforce partners
that are efficient and effective at meeting the requirements of the federal Act;
(g) Participating  in the development of a coordinated statewide system of activities and services
that includes both mandatory and optional partners of the one-stop delivery system,  as provided in
the federal Act;
(h) Providing  for the development, accountability and continuous improvement of comprehensive
workforce performance measures to assess the  effectiveness of the workforce development activities
in this state;
(i) Developing a statewide employment statistics system, as described in section 15(e)  of the
Wagner-Peyser Act (29 U.S.C. 49L-2(e)); and
(j) Preparing an annual report and submitting it to the United States Department of Labor.
(3) The State Workforce and Talent Development Board, in partnership with the  Governor, shall
establish criteria for use by chief elected officials in appointing members to local workforce devel-
opment boards  in accordance with the requirements of section 3122 of the federal Workforce Inno-
vation and Opportunity Act. The State Workforce and Talent Development Board shall establish  the
following requirements:
(a) To transact business at a  meeting of a local workforce development board, a quorum of
members must participate. A  quorum shall consist of a majority of the members. At least 25 percent
of the members participating must be representatives of business.
(b) When appropriate and upon a request from the chief elected official of a county or the  City
of Portland, the State Workforce  and Talent Development Board shall consider the county or the
City of Portland to be a candidate for designation as a local  workforce development area. The board
shall consult with the county or the City of Portland before designating the  county or the City of
Portland as a local workforce development area. After  considering the criteria in section 3121 of the
federal Act for designating local workforce development areas, chief elected officials  may submit a
request to the board to combine their  units of government into a local workforce development area.
The board shall make recommendations to the Governor about the designation  of local workforce
development areas. Only the Governor may  designate local workforce development areas. The Gov-
ernor must show just cause  for not designating a requested local workforce development area. A
county or the City of Portland may submit an appeal to the board, as  provided in section 3121 of
the federal Act, if the  Governor does not grant the county’s or the city’s request to designate a local
workforce development area.
(4) The State Workforce and Talent Development Board shall  provide guidance and direction to
local  workforce  development boards in the development of local workforce plans. The State
Workforce and Talent Development Board shall adopt policies that:
[8]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Require each local workforce development board, in partnership with its chief  elected offi-
cials and in  accordance with section 3123 of the federal Act, to develop and submit to the Governor
and the State Workforce and Talent Development Board a  strategic local workforce plan that in-
cludes, but is not limited to, performance goals; and
(b) Permit each  local workforce development board, in consultation with its chief elected offi-
cials:
(A) To determine, consistent with the requirements of the federal Act, the appropriate level of
services based on the workforce needs in the local workforce development area; and
(B) To designate or certify  one-stop operators and to terminate for cause the eligibility of such
operators.
(5) The State Workforce and Talent Development Board  may charter and enter into performance
compacts with local workforce development boards.
(6) The State Workforce and Talent Development Board shall:
(a) Function as the primary advisory committee to the Employment Department in conjunction
with the Employment Department Advisory Council established under ORS 657.695;
(b) Collaborate with other advisory bodies also tasked with workforce  development, including
but not limited to the Oregon State Rehabilitation Council, the Commission for the Blind, the  State
Apprenticeship and Training Council , [and] the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission  and the
Bureau of Labor and Industries ;
(c) Work with the Oregon Business Development Commission to identify areas  of common in-
terest to efficiently align resources, recommend  common strategies and provide accountability for
reaching statewide goals; and
(d) Hold state workforce agencies  and local workforce development boards accountable for
meeting performance goals and system outcomes.
(7) The  State Workforce and Talent Development Board shall convene, engage and coordinate
with senior executives of identified key industries in this state,  the Oregon Business Development
Commission, the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, the Department of Education,  the Bu-
reau of Labor and Industries, the STEM Investment Council, local workforce development boards,
the Employment Department, the Department of Human Services, the  Commission for the Blind, the
Youth Development Council and any other partners from training or  workforce development entities
in this state to:
(a) Determine needs across identified key industries in  this state, including challenges and op-
portunities in developing and growing relevant talent pipelines;
(b) Ensure that the talent pipeline development infrastructure includes:
(A) A listening  process to collect workforce needs of employers from identified key industries
in this state;
(B) Curriculum alignment for high-demand occupation skill needs;
(C) Prediction and monitoring of national  trends relating to high-demand industries and occu-
pations;
(D) Occupation-aligned education and training options with a clearly articulated progression;
(E) Skills assessments; and
(F) Academic career counseling;
(c) Utilize sector partnerships to:
(A) Advise the development of career pathway programs for critical occupations in identified
key industries in this state; and
[9]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Ensure the coordination of education,  economic development, business and workforce initi-
atives between key partners to develop a strong talent pipeline;
(d) Leverage and optimize existing measures and  data systems to improve systems alignment and
interagency communication; and
(e) Ensure state alignment and coordination  between industry sector partnerships and initiatives
in the local workforce development areas.
(8)(a) Every biennium, the State Workforce and Talent Development  Board shall coordinate and
collaborate  with  entities listed under subsection (7) of this section to create a single, unified state
Workforce and Talent Development Plan.
(b) The Workforce and Talent Development Plan must include:
(A) A strategy, with quantitative goals, for the statewide workforce  development system for the
State of Oregon in accordance with section 3111  of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportu-
nity Act;
(B) Quantifiable goals designed to  promote Oregonians’ self-sufficiency and that will empower
Oregonians to gain independence from public assistance and move up the socioeconomic ladder;
(C) Expectations for performance and the priorities for delivery  of services to local workforce
development boards and state workforce agencies;
(D) Industry-based information and data from the Employment Department and  other agencies
and entities listed in subsection (7) of this section related to talent needs and gaps;
(E) Analysis of data regarding the skills required for identified key industry jobs;
(F) Information regarding the status of  career pathway programs targeted at identified key in-
dustries in this state;
(G) Recommendations related to  advancing talent pipeline and career pathways development
based on the identified talent issues and trends;
(H) Recommendations regarding the alignment and consistency of data nomenclature,  collection
practices and data sharing;
(I) Utilization and, as appropriate, expansion of existing data-sharing  agreements between
agencies and partners;
(J) Identification of talent issues and trends related to identified  key industries in this state that
are in strategic alignment with state and local workforce and economic priorities;
(K) Identification and prioritization of the urgent talent gaps of identified key  industries in this
state;
(L) A response to immediate talent needs through  the creation of additional opportunities for
Oregonians to pursue education and training in disciplines critical to the advancement of  identified
key industries in this state;
(M) Ways to strengthen efforts to enhance student work experience  and job preparedness in
high-demand and critical occupations;
(N) New means of  delivering workforce training and proficiency-based education to enhance
program efficiency, upgrading and sharing resources and facilities and improving  student outcomes
and access to typically underrepresented populations while meeting talent needs of traded  sector
and high growth industries; and
(O) Ways to increase the skills of the existing professional and  technical workforce, including
the issuance of certifications, badges and industry-based credentials.
(c) The State Workforce and Talent Development Board shall:
(A) Update the plan every biennium; and
[10]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Submit a report about the plan every year to:
(i) The Governor; and
(ii) The Legislative Assembly in the manner provided by ORS 192.245.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 660.339 is amended to read:
660.339. (1) All participant records maintained by the local workforce development boards or any
public or private agency involved  in programs under the federal Workforce Innovation and Oppor-
tunity Act shall be confidential and except as provided in ORS 660.300 to  660.420 shall be open for
inspection only in accordance with policies adopted by the [ Higher Education Coordinating  Com-
mission] Bureau of Labor and Industries .
(2) A participant may provide written consent for  the examination or release of any record
pertaining to the participant.
(3) All information contained in participant  files shall be available for inspection by the partic-
ipant and by the participant’s parent or legal guardian if the participant is under 18  years of age.
Participant  behavioral  records shall be released only in the presence of an individual qualified to
explain or interpret the records.
(4) The [ commission] bureau may adopt policies and rules to provide the circumstances under
which participant names or records may be made available for inspection when:
(a) Ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(b) Necessary to protect the health or safety of a participant or another.
(c) Necessary to provide information to state and  local agencies administering ORS 412.001 to
412.161 and 412.991 and ORS chapters 418 and  657, other programs under the federal Workforce
Innovation and Opportunity Act and other mandatory  programs under this state’s one-stop service
delivery  system.
(d) Necessary for program staff work or studies of a statistical or demographic nature.
(e) Necessary to carry out  the planning and coordinating functions between state and local
agencies under the federal  Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, other applicable state laws
or those functions assigned by the Education and Workforce Policy Advisor.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 660.340 is amended to read:
660.340. (1) There is created in the [ Higher Education Coordinating  Commission ] Bureau of
Labor and Industries  the Oregon Employer Workforce Training Program. Subject to the availabil-
ity of funding, and in consultation with the State Workforce and Talent  Development Board, the
[commission] bureau shall operate, and local workforce development boards shall manage, the pro-
gram for the purpose of:
(a) Assisting businesses and consortia of  businesses in implementing projects that identify and
provide cost-effective solutions to the issues of employee training, retention and advancement;
(b) Maximizing the utilization of public and private resources for providing training  to employed
persons in skills that are responsive to the need of businesses and industries in Oregon  to become
and to remain competitive on the national and international level; and
(c) Responding to the need of workers in Oregon to develop current job skills necessary to  meet
the current and future needs of employers.
(2)(a) Businesses in industries identified in the plans developed  by local workforce development
boards as required by ORS  660.327 are eligible to participate in projects selected for participation
in the program.
(b) Priority  for approval of projects submitted under this subsection shall be given to businesses
in industries that have the greatest impact on the local economy and emerging green jobs.
[11]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) Local workforce development boards shall:
(a) Identify businesses and consortia of businesses for potential participation in the program;
(b) Develop and implement an application process for projects proposed for the program;
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of the  Public Contracting Code, use an open and competitive
procurement process for agreements entered into with participants in the program;
(d) Require that businesses participating in a project provide private sector funding  equal to the
amount of state funding provided for the project; and
(e) Track and report to the [ commission] bureau the outcomes of projects implemented in the
local workforce development area, including, but not limited to:
(A) The number of businesses participating in approved projects;
(B) The number and types of projects completed;
(C) The number of employees receiving training;
(D) The number of jobs retained or created by the businesses participating in the project; and
(E) The value of the private sector funding provided.
(4) The [ commission] bureau shall adopt rules necessary  for the implementation and operation
of the program created under subsection (1) of  this section. The rules shall include, but are not
limited to, a process by which moneys may be appropriated and allocated to the local  workforce
development boards to support projects identified by the local workforce development boards  under
subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 660.341 is amended to read:
660.341. The Oregon Employer Workforce Training Fund  is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the Oregon Employer Workforce
Training Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated to
the [ Higher Education Coordinating Commission ] Bureau of Labor and Industries  for the purposes
of ORS 660.340.
SECTION 20.  ORS 660.343 is amended to read:
660.343. (1) There is created in the [ Higher Education Coordinating  Commission ] Bureau of
Labor and Industries  the Oregon  National Career Readiness Certification Program to certify the
workplace and college readiness  skills of Oregonians and to better prepare Oregonians for continued
education and workforce training, successful employment and career advancement  in a demand-
driven, skills-based economy.
(2) Program services may be offered through public high schools, community colleges, local  and
regional career centers and any other institutions determined to be  appropriate by the
[commission] bureau to residents of Oregon and to employees of businesses located in Oregon.
(3) Services provided by the program shall include, but are not limited to:
(a) An assessment process that identifies the proficiency level  of program participants in work-
ready skills including, but not limited to, reading,  applied mathematics, locating information and any
additional skills determined by the [ commission] bureau to be necessary to meet business and in-
dustry skill demands;
(b) Targeted instruction  and remedial skills training to provide work-ready skills in which pro-
gram participants are not proficient, as  determined by the assessment process described in para-
graph (a) of this subsection, and that have been  identified by the [ commission] bureau as work-ready
skills required by local employers;
(c) Issuance of a National Career Readiness Certificate to program  participants who demon-
strate proficiency in work-ready skills, as determined by the assessment process described in para-
[12]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
graph (a) of this  subsection, and who satisfy any other requirements for certification adopted by the
[commission] bureau by rule;
(d) Providing information to school districts, community  colleges and community college service
districts about the National Career  Readiness Certificate and the assessments, targeted instruction
and remedial skills training available through the program; and
(e) An online database that:
(A) Serves as the repository for National Career Readiness Certificate attainment data.
(B) Provides online access to program data that enables employers  to determine the work skill
proficiency level of individual  program participants and to locate certified individuals on a statewide
or regional basis.
(C) Provides individual  program participants the opportunity for career exploration, continuing
education, job readiness practice and job searches.
(D) Provides individual program participants the opportunity to opt out of  the database in ac-
cordance with rules adopted by the [ commission] bureau.
(4) The [ commission] bureau, after consultation with  the State Workforce and Talent Develop-
ment Board and the  Department of Education, shall adopt rules for the implementation and admin-
istration of the program created under subsection (1) of this section.
(5) By September 1 of each year, school districts, community colleges and community  college
service districts shall report to the  [ commission] bureau the rate of participation in and the total
number of students enrolled in the district or community college who utilized the services provided
by the program in the most recently concluded school year.
(6) The [ commission] bureau shall submit a report on program outcomes and recommendations
for improving and funding the program to the appropriate interim legislative committees and  to the
Governor by January 1 of  each year. The report shall include a summary of the information required
under subsection (5) of this section.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 660.346 is amended to read:
660.346. (1)(a) The [ Higher Education Coordinating Commission ] Bureau of Labor and Indus-
tries, in collaboration with the Employment  Department and the State Workforce and Talent De-
velopment Board, shall develop and implement a demand-driven, skills-based  integrated workforce
delivery system focused on skills and talent development.
(b) The integrated workforce  delivery system implemented under paragraph (a) of this subsection
must include, and the [ commission] bureau shall maintain, a workforce training inventory  of prior-
itized occupations.
(c) The [ commission] bureau shall prioritize recommendations for the  allocation of workforce
training resources by the integrated workforce delivery system based on occupational  prioritization
data developed by the Employment Department.
(2) The [ commission] bureau shall adopt rules necessary for the implementation and adminis-
tration of the integrated workforce delivery system developed under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 22.  ORS 660.349 is amended to read:
660.349. (1)(a) There is created in the [ Higher Education Coordinating Commission ] Office of
Workforce Development  a program to make grants to pilot  projects to promote hands-on experi-
ence and education in the fundamentals and core competencies  in architecture, construction trades
and engineering for high school juniors and seniors.
(b) Pilot projects funded by the program  created under this subsection shall be based on
collaborative  efforts  between local school districts, community colleges, business organizations and
[13]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
labor organizations that provide participants the opportunity for education  and training in skills
required to meet the workforce development needs of local, regional and statewide employers.
(c) The [ commission] office may apply for and receive grants and gifts from public and private
sources to fund grants provided under this section.
(2) The  program created under subsection (1) of this section for making grants to pilot projects
shall ensure that:
(a) Local communities are informed about the availability of the grants;
(b) The pilot projects are geographically distributed throughout Oregon;
(c) Urban and rural participants have equal opportunity to access quality educational opportu-
nities;
(d) Representatives of related, ongoing community efforts  assist in the implementation of archi-
tecture, construction trades and engineering education and training; and
(e) The program and timelines are designed to minimize barriers to receiving funds.
(3) When considering applications for grants, the program  shall give priority to pilot projects
that:
(a) Provide access for high school  juniors and seniors to architecture, construction trades and
engineering education and training through the  efforts of local and regional career centers and
public-private consortia;
(b) In combination with other projects receiving funds, contribute to  architecture, construction
trades and engineering education and training opportunities in every part of the state;
(c) Use private and federal funds;
(d) Facilitate sharing of resources  through public-private partnerships including collaboration
among local school districts, community colleges, business organizations and labor organizations;
(e) Have a long-term strategic plan and lack only the necessary financial resources;
(f) Help students connect education and  training with career planning and job opportunities
through local and regional career centers implemented under the federal Workforce Innovation  and
Opportunity  Act;
(g) Provide articulated secondary and post-secondary education programs that are designed to
lead to a degree or industry-specific skills certification; and
(h) Establish short-term training programs that meet the  immediate needs of local and regional
employers.
(4)(a) The  [ commission] office shall include in the program created under subsection (1) of this
section a process for the certification of instructors for the program to  provide education and
practical experience in architecture, construction trades and engineering.
(b) The [ commission] Bureau of Labor and  Industries shall adopt by rule requirements for the
certification of instructors described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) Notwithstanding the requirements adopted under paragraph (b) of  this subsection, a person
qualified to serve as an instructor in a state-recognized apprenticeship program is qualified for cer-
tification as an instructor for projects implemented under this section.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 660.352 is amended to read:
660.352. The Youth Employment  Enhancement Fund is established in the State Treasury, sepa-
rate and distinct from the General Fund. Moneys in the Youth Employment Enhancement Fund are
continuously appropriated to the [ Higher Education Coordinating Commission ] Bureau of Labor and
Industries for the purposes of ORS 660.349.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 660.353 is amended to read:
[14]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
660.353. (1)(a) There is created in the [ Higher Education Coordinating Commission ] Bureau of
Labor and Industries  the Oregon Youth Employment Program, which  shall operate subject to the
availability of funds, including eligible federal funds, for the purpose of providing meaningful  work
experience and workforce training for persons between the ages of 14 and 24.
(b) The [ commission] bureau shall, pursuant to criteria  established by the [ commission]
bureau, and after allocating a portion of program funds  to the Oregon Youth Corps described in
ORS 418.653, provide grants  to local workforce development boards. The [ commission] bureau shall
award grants in a manner that ensures no less than 20 percent of  program funds are available to
organizations with direct experience serving communities of color.
(2) The program shall:
(a) Ensure that at least 75  percent of program participants are from communities of color, rural
communities, communities that have faced generational poverty or other communities that have been
historically underrepresented in youth employment as identified by the commission by rule;
(b) Create an individual development plan for each program participant that outlines work
readiness, career and educational goals;
(c) Provide work readiness instruction;
(d) Provide at  least five weeks of paid internships, preapprenticeships or other work experience;
(e) Pay at least minimum wage  for work performed by program participants while in the pro-
gram, or, if a program participant is prohibited by other state or federal law or  agreement from
receiving wages from the program provider, provide an award valued at an amount equal to at least
the payment of minimum wage;
(f) Provide academic support for earning high school  graduation credit, completion of approved
high school equivalency programs such as the  General Educational Development (GED) certificate
program or earning college credit for work experience or internships provided through the  program;
(g) Expose program participants to in-demand occupations and targeted sectors;
(h) Require program providers to submit a community engagement plan that  details how the
program providers will partner with and serve communities identified in paragraph  (a) of this sub-
section; and
(i) Require program providers to offer  English language learner and accessibility services that
are compliant with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. 12101 et seq.).
(3) The program may provide for public and private sector employment opportunities.
(4)(a) The [ commission] bureau shall collect data on the program, identify successful work ex-
periences and allow for the identification and dissemination of the most promising practices.
(b) The data collected shall be disaggregated by:
(A) The race and ethnicity of program participants;
(B) Whether program participants come from urban or rural areas;
(C) The family income of program participants; and
(D) Any other characteristic of program participants that the  [ commission] bureau determines
by rule would be useful in evaluating the success of the program.
(c) The data collected shall include:
(A) The number of participants in the program;
(B) The number of participants that complete the program;
(C) The cost of internships and other work experiences provided;
(D) The academic credit earned by participants; and
(E) The number of  certificates for passing approved high school equivalency tests such as the
[15]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
General Educational Development (GED) test earned by participants.
(5) The [ commission] bureau shall conduct culturally responsive outreach and engagement and
offer technical assistance to prospective program providers.
(6) In a manner determined by  the [ commission] bureau by rule, the [ commission] bureau shall
assist identified  program providers in recruiting program participants across diverse communities
by providing:
(a) Translation and accessibility services for marketing materials; and
(b) Training to program providers in culturally  responsive, social emotional health and mental
health practices.
(7) The [ commission] bureau shall adopt  rules necessary for the implementation and operation
of the program created under subsection (1) of this section.  The rules shall include, but are not
limited to, establishing eligibility criteria for persons participating in the program.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 660.354 is amended to read:
660.354. The Oregon  Youth Employment Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate and
distinct from the General  Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon Youth Employment Fund shall be
credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the [ Higher Education
Coordinating Commission ] Bureau of Labor and Industries  for the purposes of ORS 660.353.
SECTION 26.  ORS 418.653 is amended to read:
418.653. Subject to the  availability of funds, there is created within the Oregon Youth Employ-
ment Program established under ORS 660.353 an Oregon Youth Corps that shall provide  emergency
services, public conservation, rehabilitation  and improvement programs. The corps shall be headed
by a program director, and shall be  administered through the [ Higher Education Coordinating Com-
mission] Bureau of Labor and Industries . The program director shall operate  the corps in con-
sultation with the Oregon Youth Works Advisory Board created under ORS 660.320.
SECTION 27.  ORS 418.657 is amended to read:
418.657. (1) In  consultation with the Oregon Youth Works Advisory Board created under ORS
660.320 and the [ executive ] Director of the [ Higher Education Coordinating Commission ] Office of
Workforce Development , or the designee of the [ executive ] director, the  program director of the
Oregon Youth Corps shall:
(a) Establish eligibility criteria  for participants. Such criteria shall not render the program in-
eligible for federal funds. Participants shall be lawful permanent residents of this state.
(b) Establish criteria in order  to make the required determination that enrollment in the corps
was not the reason that an individual ceased attendance at a secondary school.
(c) Assume that  application of the eligibility and participation criteria results in enrollment of
at least 75 percent disadvantaged and at-risk youth among the total number of participants.
(2) The program  director, in consultation with the [ executive ] director, or the designee of the
[executive ] director, may take the following actions, including but not limited to:
(a) Applying for and accepting grants or contributions of funds  from any public or private
source;
(b) Making agreements  or entering into contracts or other agreements with any local, state or
federal agency, or with  any private or public organization or tribal government, to utilize, pay for
or support any service, material or property of any such entity, where such agreements  are consid-
ered reasonable and necessary; and
(c) Purchasing, contracting or making payment for necessary services, awards,  equipment, ma-
terials and property where such are  needed to carry out the projects approved for and undertaken
[16]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
by the corps.
(3) The [ commission] bureau may adopt all necessary rules to carry out the purposes and ob-
jectives of the program and to regulate the standards of conduct and other operating  guidelines for
corps members and other personnel.
(4) Corps members are exempt from:
(a) State Personnel Relations Law; and
(b) ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870.
SECTION 28.
 ORS 418.658 is amended to read:
418.658. (1) The program director of  the Oregon Youth Corps shall establish within the Oregon
Youth Employment Program established under ORS 660.353 a separate program  known as the
Oregon Community Stewardship Corps. In addition to  the established purposes of the Oregon Youth
Corps, the purpose of the Oregon Community Stewardship Corps is to promote  community service
activities throughout the state for a broad cross section of Oregon disadvantaged and  at-risk youth
through programs that also include  appropriate educational and job training opportunities for par-
ticipants.
(2) In addition to projects submitted under ORS 418.660 (1), projects of the Oregon Community
Stewardship Corps may include, but shall not be limited to:
(a) Child care services.
(b) Elderly and disabled care services.
(c) Literacy education programs.
(d) Recycling and other waste reduction services.
(3) The Oregon Community Stewardship Corps shall  offer employment and educational opportu-
nities of at least three but not more than 12 months’ duration for selected participants.
(4) Under rules adopted by the  [ Higher Education Coordinating Commission ] Bureau of Labor
and Industries, participants  who successfully complete any program under this section shall be el-
igible for up to $1,500 in support vouchers that can be  used to pay for tuition, books or other items
or services that enhance and support education or employment.
(5) All Oregonians who are at  least 13 years of age and under 25 years of age are eligible to
participate in the program. To ensure that Oregon Community Stewardship Corps  participants rep-
resent a broad  cross section of Oregonians, special emphasis shall be given to recruiting school
dropouts  and  other disadvantaged and at-risk youth, according to criteria established by the Oregon
Youth Works Advisory Board created under ORS 660.320.
(6) To the extent practicable, the program director shall enlist state and federal agencies, local
government, nonprofit organizations and private businesses,  and any combination of such entities,
to act as sponsors for programs administered under  this section. Selection of sponsors shall be based
on criteria that include the following:
(a) The availability of other  resources on a matching basis, including contributions from private
sources, other federal, state and local agencies, and moneys  available through the federal Workforce
Innovation and Opportunity Act;
(b) The provision  of related educational and job training programs to participants, including but
not limited to school and college coursework, training for approved high  school equivalency tests
such as the General  Educational Development (GED), project-related education and professional
training;
(c) Assurances that proposed projects will not displace existing employees or duplicate  existing
private or government programs; and
[17]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Assurances that proposed projects are devoted  to the enhancement of the community and are
not based in maintenance activities and that these projects meet an identified need.
(7) In consultation  with the advisory board, the program director shall make grants for programs
administered under this section.
SECTION 29.
 ORS 418.660 is amended to read:
418.660. (1) The programs established under ORS  418.650 to 418.663 may include, but shall not
be limited to, projects such as:
(a) Rangeland conservation, rehabilitation and improvement;
(b) Endangered species and other wildlife habitat conservation, rehabilitation and improvement;
(c) Urban revitalization;
(d) Historical and cultural site preservation and maintenance;
(e) Recreational area development, maintenance, improvement and beautification;
(f) Road and trail maintenance and improvement;
(g) Soil conservation work, including erosion control;
(h) Flood, drought and storm damage assistance and relief;
(i) Stream, lake, waterfront harbor and port improvement and pollution control;
(j) Fish culture and habitat maintenance and improvement;
(k) Insect, disease, rodent and other pestilence control;
(L) Improvement of abandoned railroad land and right of way;
(m) Land reclamation and improvement, including  strip-mined lands, public landscape work and
tree planting programs;
(n) Energy conservation projects including assistance in the performance of energy efficiency
audits, weatherization and renewable resource enhancement;
(o) Emergency assistance in times of natural or other disaster;
(p) Recycling projects; and
(q) Garden, greenhouse and farming programs.
(2) In consultation with the Oregon Youth Works  Advisory Board created under ORS 660.320
and the [ executive ] Director of the [ Higher Education Coordinating Commission ] Office of
Workforce Development , or the designee of the [ executive ] director, the  program director of the
Oregon Youth Corps shall ensure  that projects selected under ORS 418.650 to 418.663 shall be con-
sistent with all other provisions of applicable  state and federal law relating to the management,
oversight and administration of affected public lands.
SECTION 30.
 ORS 476.696 is amended to read:
476.696. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Eligible  organization” includes Oregon-based nonprofit youth development organizations,
federally recognized Indian tribes  in this state, nonprofit associations engaged in workforce devel-
opment and public entities that provide programs of job training, skill  development and forest-
related or rangeland-related career path training.
(b) “Tribe” means a federally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon.
(2) The Oregon Youth Works Advisory Board created under ORS 660.320 shall, in  collaboration
with a qualified nonprofit foundation, actively seek and source  private donations to support the
Oregon Conservation Corps Program.
(3) The advisory board may direct the expenditure of moneys from the  Oregon Conservation
Corps Fund for a promotional website and materials to solicit private funds.
(4) The advisory board shall advise the [ Higher Education Coordinating Commission ] Bureau of
[18]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Labor and Industries  on the implementation of a grant process that:
(a) Provides funding to support the work conducted by the  Oregon Conservation Corps Program.
(b) Defines and uses an equity lens in awarding  grants by identifying and supporting populations
with greater vulnerability, including communities  of color, indigenous communities, communities
with members who have limited proficiency in English and communities  with lower-income members.
(c) Awards grants to eligible organizations.
(d) Ensures that grant awards support activities described  in ORS 476.694 (1) and subsection (5)
of this section.
(e) Establishes guidelines  for prioritizing grant-supported projects to reduce community fire
risks, promote youth and young adult workforce development and educational experiences  and re-
duce hazardous fuels.
(5) The [ commission] bureau shall consult  with the State Forestry Department to ensure that
the grant process awards funds to proposals that:
(a) Protect at-risk  communities and infrastructure within the wildland-urban interface, as de-
scribed in ORS 477.503.
(b) Meet standards for fuel treatment established by the department.
(6) The advisory board shall biennially submit a report,  on the timeline described in ORS
293.640, to an appropriate committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly, as described
in ORS  192.245, and to the State Wildfire Programs Director and Wildfire Programs Advisory
Council, regarding the expenditure of moneys deposited in the Oregon Conservation Corps Fund.
SECTION 31.
 ORS 476.698 is amended to read:
476.698. (1) The Oregon Conservation Corps Fund is established in the  State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon Conservation Corps Fund  shall
be credited to the fund.
(2) The fund may receive contributions from individuals and private organizations.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the [ Higher Education Coordinating
Commission] Bureau of Labor and Industries  to be  used as directed by the Oregon Youth Works
Advisory Board created under ORS 660.320  and for related administrative expenses of the [ commis-
sion] bureau.
(4) The [ commission] bureau shall  keep records of all moneys credited to and deposited in the
fund and the activity or program against which each withdrawal from the fund is charged.
SECTION 32.
 ORS 660.320 is amended to read:
660.320. (1) There is created in the [ Higher Education Coordinating  Commission ] Bureau of
Labor and Industries the Oregon Youth Works Advisory Board. The purpose of the  advisory board
is to provide advice on and oversight of  the implementation and alignment of youth workforce de-
velopment programs for which the [ commission] bureau is responsible, including but not limited to:
(a) The Oregon Youth Corps created under ORS 418.653;
(b) The Oregon Conservation Corps Program established under ORS 476.694; and
(c) The Oregon Youth Employment Program created under ORS 660.353.
(2) The Governor, in consultation with the [ commission] bureau, shall determine the number of
members on the advisory board. In determining the number of members on the advisory  board, the
Governor shall ensure that membership consists of at least seven but not more than 12 members.
(3) The Governor shall appoint the members of the advisory board. The members must be resi-
dents of this state who reflect the geographic, racial, ethnic and gender diversity of this  state and
who have necessary  experience that will enable the advisory board to meaningfully advise the
[19]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[commission] bureau on topics including, but not limited to:
(a) Career-connected learning that  provides learners with career awareness, exploration, prepa-
ration and training in connection with professional and industry-based expectations;
(b) Development of career pathways;
(c) Youth education programs;
(d) Workforce development programs;
(e) Rural workforce needs; and
(f) Workforce issues affecting underrepresented communities.
(4) The advisory board must include representation from:
(a) The forestry or wildfire sector;
(b) The natural resources sector;
(c) Workforce sectors that are experiencing workforce demands;
(d) Communities in which the wildland-urban interface faces a high risk of wildfire exposure;
(e) Underrepresented communities, including communities of color, rural communities and  com-
munities that have  faced generational poverty or other communities that have been historically
underrepresented in youth employment as determined by the [ commission] bureau by rule;
(f) Tribal communities; and
(g) Local workforce development boards.
(5) Members of the advisory board serve for a  term of four years at the pleasure of the Gover-
nor.
(6) Members may not receive compensation  for service on the advisory board, but, subject to
any applicable laws regulating travel and other expenses of state  officers and employees, may be
reimbursed for actual and necessary  travel and other expenses incurred in the performance of offi-
cial duties, as provided in ORS 292.495, with moneys available to the advisory board for  the purpose
of reimbursing members.
(7) The [ commission] bureau shall provide the advisory board with necessary staff support.
SECTION 33.
 ORS 660.348 is amended to read:
660.348. (1) Once every even-numbered year, the Committee for  Continuous Improvement estab-
lished under ORS 660.347 shall identify and contract with  an independent third-party entity to con-
duct a comprehensive assessment  of the public workforce system in this state and to make
recommendations for improvements.
(2) The  comprehensive assessment shall include a review of the workforce programs and services
administered by the following entities through the public workforce system:
(a) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission;
(b) Local workforce development boards;
(c) The Employment Department;
(d) The Commission for the Blind;
(e) The Department of Human Services;
(f) The Housing and Community Services Department; [ and]
(g) The Bureau of Labor and Industries; and
[(g)] (h) Any other entities deemed appropriate by the committee.
(3) The comprehensive assessment shall be conducted with a focus on:
(a) Advancing racial justice, equity, diversity and inclusion through the programs and  services
delivered through the public workforce system;
(b) Aligning state and local efforts to improve the public workforce system in this state;
[20]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Supporting improvements that create a more comprehensive public workforce system;
(d) Providing quality employment experiences and equitable outcomes for job seekers and  busi-
nesses participating in workforce programs;
(e) Improving the  quality of workforce resources, programs and services made available through
the public workforce system and the transparency of information  regarding performance metrics and
outcomes related to those resources, programs and services; and
(f) Building on any current workforce program assessments that are required by law.
(4)(a) The committee shall present the results of each assessment, along  with any recommen-
dations for improvements, in reports to  the Governor and to the interim committees of the Legisla-
tive Assembly related to workforce development, in  the manner provided under ORS 192.245, on or
before December 15 of each even-numbered year.
(b) The committee  shall include in the committee’s first report, an update regarding the imple-
mentation of the recommendations from the assessment  of the public workforce system conducted
under section 3, chapter 280, Oregon Laws 2021.
SECTION 34.
 ORS 660.380 is amended to read:
660.380. (1) The  Prosperity 10,000 Program is established in the [ Higher Education Coordinating
Commission] Bureau of Labor and Industries  for the following purposes:
(a) To provide career coaching, occupational training and job placement services;
(b) To provide wraparound supports and  services that are necessary to facilitate reengagement
in the workforce, including, but not limited to, transportation, child care and rental assistance;
(c) To provide paid work experiences, including stipends and wages and other  income supports
for individuals from priority populations; and
(d) To support targeted recruitment and engagement efforts.
(2) The goals of the Prosperity 10,000 Program are to:
(a) Include at least 10,000 total individuals who participate in the program;
(b) Improve the capacity and responsiveness of the public workforce system in this state by
providing assistance for workforce development program navigation,  expanding access to
community-based career counseling and wraparound supports and services, and  providing opportu-
nities to earn industry-recognized certificates,  credentials and degrees through work-based learning
experiences;
(c) Ensure that services and  benefits available through workforce programs are provided to in-
dividuals from priority populations;
(d) Provide increased access for priority populations to services and benefits  available through
workforce programs;
(e) Ensure that at least 50 percent of the individuals who  participate in the program are women;
(f) Ensure that  at least 80 percent of the individuals who participate successfully complete the
program;
(g) Ensure that  at least 75 percent of the individuals who participate in the program successfully
obtain employment; and
(h) Ensure that at least 75  percent of the individuals who participate in the program earn at
least $17 per hour.
(3)(a) The Prosperity 10,000 Program shall be administered by local workforce  development
boards. The local workforce development boards shall:
(A) Distribute resources and available funds to nonprofit community-based organizations,  edu-
cational institutions, labor organizations and other workforce service providers  to facilitate the
[21]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
provision of workforce  development services and wraparound supports to individuals who participate
in the program;
(B) Coordinate with state workforce agencies and other workforce partners to  expand regional
community-based partnerships that work to support and sustain workforce development services  and
wraparound supports; and
(C) Connect with  businesses and organizations in targeted industry sectors to identify training
needs and ensure that business needs relating to a skilled workforce are met.
(b) An entity that collaborates with a local workforce development  board to accomplish the
workforce development activities described under this subsection shall, in accordance  with ORS
660.327, participate with local workforce development boards in developing a proposed local plan.
(4)(a) If  an entity receives funds distributed from a local workforce development board under
this section and provides paid work experience to individuals who participate in the  program es-
tablished under this section, the entity shall:
(A) Notwithstanding ORS 653.025 and subsection (2)(h) of this section, pay wages  to individuals
participating in the program at a rate that is:
(i) Equivalent to an entry-level training wage as determined by  the entity pursuant to paragraph
(b) of this subsection; and
(ii) In alignment with the  wage progression schedule established by the entity under subpara-
graph (B) of this paragraph;
(B) Establish  a wage progression schedule that includes the step progression requirements and
the rate  calculation formula upon which the entity shall make determinations about a participating
individual’s eligibility to increase the individual’s wage rate  from an entry-level training wage to a
wage rate that  is equivalent to the average area wage standard for an hour’s work in the same trade
or occupation in the locality where the labor is performed;
(C) Develop  a training plan for individuals participating in the program that includes, at a
minimum:
(i) The entry-level training wage that will be paid to the individual;
(ii) A statement that the individual shall  be paid according to the wage progression schedule
established by the entity, along with a description of the requirements  that the individual must meet
in order to progress to a higher wage rate under the wage progression schedule;
(iii) A statement that the entry-level training wage paid to  the individual may not be less than
the federal minimum wage rate or the applicable state  minimum wage rate, whichever is greater;
and
(iv) A statement explaining that the entry-level  training wage paid to the individual is a mini-
mum standard  and that a higher wage rate shall be paid to the individual if so required under other
applicable federal or state laws, regulations or a collective bargaining agreement; and
(D) Provide each individual participating in the program with  a copy of the training plan de-
scribed in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph on the date on  which the individual first begins par-
ticipating in the program.
(b) For purposes of paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection, the entry-level training  wage shall be a
percentage amount of the average area wage standard for an hour’s  work in the same trade or oc-
cupation in the locality  where the labor is performed, but in no event may the entry-level training
wage be less than the applicable state minimum wage rate under ORS 653.025.
(c) Each individual who performs work  for an entity described in this subsection shall be con-
sidered an employee  of the entity for purposes of state wage and hour laws and state laws prohib-
[22]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
iting employment discrimination and retaliation.
(5)(a) As used in this subsection, “SNAP Employment and Training Program”  means the em-
ployment and training component of the federal  Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program under
7 U.S.C. 2015(d)(4).
(b) To the extent possible, the Department of Human Services shall:
(A) Incorporate the Prosperity 10,000 Program into the statewide plan  for the SNAP Employ-
ment and Training Program;
(B) Seek federal reimbursement for 50 percent of  the Prosperity 10,000 Program’s costs and for
other eligible activities as reported by the local workforce development boards;
(C) Refer individuals who receive supplemental nutrition assistance under ORS 411.806 to
411.845 to participate in the Prosperity 10,000 Program; and
(D) Distribute moneys received as reimbursement under  subparagraph (B) of this paragraph to
local workforce development boards, not later than 60 days after the  department receives an invoice
that is consistent with  requirements under the SNAP Employment and Training Program, for rein-
vestment in workforce development and wraparound supports and  services provided under the
Prosperity 10,000 Program.
(6) The State Workforce and  Talent Development Board, in consultation with the Committee for
Continuous Improvement, shall:
(a) Oversee the progress of the Prosperity 10,000 Program;
(b) Ensure that program goals are met; and
(c) Identify areas for program improvement.
SECTION 35.
 ORS 660.385 is amended to read:
660.385. [(1)(a) Not  later than 60 days following March 17, 2022, the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission shall distribute the funds specifically appropriated  to the commission under section
13, chapter 28, Oregon Laws 2022, to local workforce development boards to administer the  Prosperity
10,000 Program. ]
[(b)] (1) The [ commission] Bureau of Labor and Industries  shall distribute all moneys received
from moneys made available [ under sections 13 and 14, chapter 28,  Oregon Laws 2022, ] by the Leg-
islative Assembly for the Prosperity 10,000 Program established under  ORS 660.380  to local
workforce development boards using  the same formula as required under the federal Workforce In-
novation and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C. 3101 et seq.) for the allocation of funds to  local workforce
development  boards.
(2) Each  local workforce development board shall compile data on the progress made toward
carrying  out  the Prosperity 10,000 Program. The boards shall prepare and submit a joint report that
includes data, disaggregated by race, gender and geography, to the  [ commission] bureau and the
State Workforce and Talent Development Board  no later than October 31 of each year, in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245.
SECTION 36.  ORS 660.400 is amended to read:
660.400. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Community-based organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.390.
(b) “Community college” has the meaning given that term in ORS 341.005.
(c) “Workforce service provider” includes:
(A) Nonprofit and public workforce education, training and career services providers.
(B) Governmental entities that are providers of workforce development services.
(2) There is established in the [ Higher Education Coordinating Commission ] Bureau of Labor
[23]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and Industries  a program to award grants to workforce service providers  and community-based
organizations that administer workforce programs  in the health care, manufacturing and technology
industry sectors and that prioritize equitable program participation  by individuals from priority
populations.
(3) The [ commission] bureau shall establish criteria and standards by which a  workforce service
provider or a community-based organization may submit a proposal to receive a  grant under this
section. In establishing criteria and standards, the [ commission] bureau shall consider federal non-
discrimination and equal  opportunity provisions of the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.
The [ commission] bureau shall award grants on a competitive basis, taking into consideration  pro-
posals that:
(a) Describe how the workforce service  provider or the community-based organization intends
to engage with employers in the  targeted industry sectors to provide workforce development op-
portunities to individuals from priority populations.
(b) Demonstrate the workforce service  provider’s or the community-based organization’s experi-
ence serving individuals from priority populations.
(c) Describe how the workforce service  provider or the community-based organization intends
to collaborate with one  or more of the following entities to increase accessibility for priority popu-
lations to workforce programs and opportunities:
(A) Other workforce service providers or community-based organizations;
(B) Kindergarten through grade 12 schools;
(C) Community colleges;
(D) Education and training partners;
(E) Local workforce development boards;
(F) Economic development organizations;
(G) Industry associations; and
(H) Universities, as defined in ORS 660.350.
(d) Demonstrate that a workforce  partner with which a workforce service provider or a
community-based organization intends  to partner possesses specific qualifications, including the or-
ganizational and technical capacity,  necessary to carry out the purposes described under subsection
(5)(a) to (d) of this section.
(e) Prioritize opportunities to leverage the use of other funding sources, including federal funds
and private sector contributions, toward workforce programs and opportunities.
(4) In awarding grants under this section, the [ commission] bureau shall consult with  the State
Workforce and Talent Development Board and shall incorporate input from  local workforce devel-
opment boards and industry consortia convened under ORS 660.410.
(5) Grant  moneys awarded under this section shall be expended for one or more of the following
purposes:
(a) To provide paid work experience, including stipends and wages;
(b) To offer tuition and fee assistance for workforce programs;
(c) To provide wraparound workforce development services;
(d) To develop culturally and linguistically specific career pathways for obtaining  certificates,
credentials or degrees recognized by targeted industry sectors; and
(e) To fund organizational investments, including, but not limited to:
(A) Hiring staff;
(B) Developing organizational development strategies;
[24]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Purchasing equipment, technology or other training-related supplies;
(D) Covering administrative costs; and
(E) Any other activities identified  in a grant proposal as necessary to administer workforce
programs described under this section.
(6)(a) If  a grant recipient expends moneys to provide paid work experience to individuals par-
ticipating in a workforce program administered by the grant recipient, the grant recipient shall:
(A) Notwithstanding ORS 653.025, pay wages to individuals participating in the  program at a
rate that is:
(i) Equivalent to an entry-level training wage as  determined by the grant recipient pursuant to
paragraph (b) of this subsection; and
(ii) In alignment with the  wage progression schedule established by the grant recipient under
subparagraph (B) of this paragraph;
(B) Establish  a wage progression schedule that includes the step progression requirements and
the rate  calculation formula upon which the grant recipient shall make determinations about a
participating individual’s eligibility to increase the individual’s wage rate from  an entry-level train-
ing wage to a wage rate  that is equivalent to the average area wage standard for an hour’s work
in the same trade or occupation in the locality where the labor is performed;
(C) Develop  a training plan for individuals participating in the program that includes, at a
minimum:
(i) The entry-level training wage that will be paid to the individual;
(ii) A statement that the individual shall  be paid according to the wage progression schedule
established by the grant recipient  entity, along with a description of the requirements that the in-
dividual must meet in order to progress to a higher wage rate under the wage progression schedule;
(iii) A statement that the entry-level training wage  paid to the individual may not be less than
the federal minimum wage rate or the  applicable state minimum wage rate, whichever is greater;
and
(iv) A statement explaining that the entry-level training wage paid  to the individual is a mini-
mum standard  and that a higher wage rate shall be paid to the individual if so required under other
applicable federal or state laws, regulations or a collective bargaining agreement; and
(D) Provide each individual participating in the program  with a copy of the training plan de-
scribed in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph  on the date on which the individual first begins par-
ticipating in the program.
(b) For purposes of paragraph  (a)(A) of this subsection, the entry-level training wage shall be a
percentage amount of the average area wage standard  for an hour’s work in the same trade or oc-
cupation in the locality where the labor is performed, but in no event may  the entry-level training
wage be less than the applicable state minimum wage rate under ORS 653.025.
(c) An individual who performs work for  grant recipient described in this subsection shall be
considered an employee of the grant  recipient for purposes of state wage and hour laws and state
laws prohibiting employment discrimination and retaliation.
(7) The  [commission] bureau shall compile information from each recipient of a grant under this
section regarding the status and use of grant funds to ensure funding is expended  for permissible
purposes. At a minimum, the information must include, where applicable:
(a) The number of individuals who have registered for  or completed a workforce program in
health care, manufacturing or technology;
(b) The number of workforce programs developed and  administered by a workforce service pro-
[25]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vider or a community-based organization;
(c) The job placement rate for and income earnings  by individuals participating in a workforce
program described under this section;
(d) The number of individuals from priority populations who  receive services or benefits from
workforce programs administered by a workforce service provider or a community-based  organiza-
tion; and
(e) A description of the  types and amount of wraparound workforce development services pro-
vided by a workforce service provider or a community-based organization.
(8) The [ commission] bureau may adopt  any rules necessary for carrying out the provisions of
this section.
SECTION 37.
 ORS 660.405 is amended to read:
660.405. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Community-based organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.390.
(b) “Comprehensive one-stop center” has the meaning given that term in 34 C.F.R. 361.305.
(c) “Workforce benefits navigator” means an individual who:
(A) Is employed at a comprehensive  one-stop center or a community-based organization to advise
and assist individuals from priority populations in accessing workforce programs and  applying for
benefits and services that are available under the programs;
(B) Has comprehensive  knowledge and understanding of workforce programs and the benefits
and services that are available under those programs;
(C) Is aware of the cultural and linguistic differences of individuals from priority populations,
including knowledge of the lived experiences of such individuals; and
(D) Is trained in trauma-informed practices.
(2) The [ Higher Education Coordinating Commission ] Bureau of  Labor and Industries , in con-
sultation with the State Workforce and Talent Development Board,  shall establish and administer
a program to award grants for  pilot projects implemented by local workforce development boards
that partner with comprehensive one-stop centers or community-based organizations to  employ a
workforce benefits navigator to connect individuals from priority  populations to workforce programs
and to increase access for such  individuals to services and benefits made available under those
workforce programs.
(3) The [ commission] bureau shall establish criteria and standards by which local workforce
development boards may submit proposals to receive a grant under this section.
(4) The [ commission] bureau may adopt  any rules necessary for carrying out the provisions of
this section.
SECTION 38.
 ORS 660.410 is amended to read:
660.410. (1) As used in this section, “community-based  organization” has the meaning given that
term in ORS 660.390.
(2)(a) The [ Higher Education Coordinating Commission ] Bureau of Labor and Industries , in
consultation with the  State Workforce and Talent Development Board, shall establish a program to
convene statewide industry consortia that represent the health care, manufacturing  and technology
industry sectors. Each individual consortium established under  this section shall represent a single
targeted industry sector.
(b) The purpose of the program is to:
(A) Establish strategic partnerships to align workforce development activities that  aim to in-
crease participation in workforce programs by individuals from priority populations;
[26]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Develop structured processes to address mutual goals and promote consensus  in decision-
making;
(C) Identify industry-specific workforce needs in this state, including the need for high-value
credentials, to inform the development and implementation of culturally  and linguistically diverse
workforce education and training curricula;
(D) Develop targeted recruitment strategies to increase equitable  participation by individuals
from priority populations in statewide workforce programs;
(E) Promote workforce development programs and activities in  the targeted industry sectors;
and
(F) Establish wage rate standards, varied by locality, for  each skilled occupation within each
of the sectors specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(3) Once every two years, each industry consortium established under this section shall:
(a) Recalculate the wage rate standards  described in subsection (2)(b)(F) of this section using
relevant economic and  employment data made available by the Employment Department. If there is
no such data available, the consortium shall recalculate the wage rate standards  using relevant
economic and employment data made available from other resources, as identified  by the [ commis-
sion] bureau by rule.
(b) Submit a statement to the [ commission] bureau summarizing the methodology  used to recal-
culate the wage rate standards and the date  on which the new wage rate standards shall take effect.
(4)(a) An industry consortium established under this  section shall operate under the direction
of a leadership team composed of the following representatives from the consortium’s  targeted in-
dustry sector:
(A) A representative who is a business leader.
(B) A representative of  a community-based organization that administers one or more workforce
programs.
(C) One or more representatives of workforce education and training providers.
(D) A representative of a labor organization.
(b) To the extent practicable, members of the leadership team shall include individuals who  are
representative of priority populations.
(c) The membership of an industry consortium established under  this section must include, in
addition to the members of the leadership team, the following:
(A) One or more representatives from the State Workforce and Talent Development Board.
(B) One or more representatives of the Racial Justice  Council within the Office of the Governor.
(C) One or more representatives of employers.
(D) One or more representatives of an industry association.
(E) One or more representatives of labor organizations.
(F) One or more representatives of local workforce development boards.
(G) One or more representatives of economic developers.
(5) The State Workforce and Talent Development Board, or any other neutral entity designated
by the board, shall serve as the intermediary between the industry consortia members.
(6) The [ commission] bureau may adopt any  rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 39.
 ORS 660.415 is amended to read:
660.415. (1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission, [ in collaboration with ] the State
Workforce and Talent Development Board, the Bureau of Labor and Industries and the Department
[27]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of Education[ ,] shall collaborate and review each of the  programs established under ORS 660.175,
660.350, 660.351, 660.380, 660.390, 660.400, 660.405 and 660.410 to assess performance and expenditure
outcomes of the programs. In  evaluating the programs, the commission and the bureau, as appli-
cable, shall compile the following information:
(a) For  the programs established under ORS 660.175, 660.350, 660.380, 660.390, 660.400, 660.405
and 660.410:
(A) The number of individuals from priority populations who have  registered for and who have
completed a workforce program, including apprenticeship and preapprenticeship training programs;
(B) Data on job placement rates, wages and salary earnings  and health and retirement benefits
provided for individuals who participated in an established program;
(C) A description of any  new or expanded workforce programs, including training programs,
career pathway programs and apprenticeship and preapprenticeship training programs, established
as a result of the programs described under ORS 660.175, 660.350,  660.380, 660.390, 660.400, 660.405
and 660.410; and
(D) The types and amounts of any wraparound supports  and services provided to individuals
from priority populations.
(b) For the program established under ORS 660.351:
(A) The  number of youth or young adults from priority populations who have registered for or
completed a youth workforce program;
(B) Data on job placement rates for youth or young adults from priority populations who  have
completed a youth workforce program; and
(C) A description  of any new or expanded paid work experiences, workforce readiness training
or job placement services created as a result of grants awarded under ORS 660.351.
(2) In carrying out  the duties described under subsection (1) of this section, the commission and
the bureau shall coordinate [ its] their activities with relevant state  agencies and other workforce
partners to:
(a) Identify opportunities for leveraging existing partnerships to align data  collection standards
and practices and to integrate data with any common data system among those partnerships;
(b) Support the [ commission’s] assessment efforts described under this section  and identify
areas for future workforce development investments; and
(c) Facilitate communication with workforce stakeholders, including but not  limited to job
seekers, employers,  community-based organizations and workforce service providers, in an inclusive
manner and, when appropriate, provide stakeholders with access to the results and findings resulting
from the [ commission’s] review described under subsection (1) of this section .
(3) By December 31 of each year, the commission and the bureau shall prepare and submit a
joint report that includes the information described in subsection (1) of this  section, disaggregated
by race, age, gender and geographical area, including any recommendations for  future investments
and opportunities to leverage private and federal funding to support  investments, to the Governor
and to the interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to workforce development, in the
manner provided in ORS  192.245. In addition to including the information described under subsection
(1) of this section, the report shall:
(a) Provide baseline estimates of statewide labor force  participation rates that include, at a
minimum:
(A) Long-term employment projections for health care and manufacturing;
(B) The progress made toward achieving the statewide educational  attainment goals established
[28]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under ORS 350.014 and 350.018; and
(C) Projections related to post-secondary educational attainment needs; and
(b) Describe how the programs  established under ORS 660.175, 660.350, 660.380, 660.390, 660.400,
660.405 and 660.410 contributed  to statewide labor force participation by demonstrating, at a mini-
mum, the following:
(A) The percentage of individuals  who participated in an established program as compared to
the share of the statewide labor force, by race;
(B) The percentage of individuals who participated in  an established program as compared to
the share of the statewide labor force, by gender;
(C) The percentage of individuals who participated in an established program and  who received
a post-secondary certificate, credential or degree as compared to the share of the statewide  labor
force, disaggregated by race, age, gender and geographical area;
(D) The number of individuals who participated in an established program and  who received a
post-secondary certificate, credential or degree as compared to  the statewide educational attainment
goals described under ORS 350.014 and 350.018, disaggregated by race, age,  gender and geographical
area; and
(E) The job  placement rates of individuals who participated in an established program as com-
pared to long-term employment projections for health care and manufacturing, disaggregated  by
race, age, gender and geographical area.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Community-based organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.390.
(b) “Workforce service provider” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.400.
(c) “Youth workforce program” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.351.
SECTION 40.
 ORS 660.420 is amended to read:
660.420. (1) There is established a  program in the [ Higher Education Coordinating Commission ]
Bureau of Labor and  Industries  to support strategic investments in workforce development pro-
grams and activities in Oregon’s maritime sector, in coordination with:
(a) Local workforce development boards in regions with a high demand for maritime workers;
(b) Community colleges operated under ORS chapter 341; and
(c) Other workforce partners that support maritime workforce  development, including but not
limited to school  districts and regional networks that support science, technology, engineering and
mathematics.
(2) At a minimum, the program shall:
(a) Make targeted investments  in workforce development programs designed to advance the
growth, qualifications and availability of Oregon’s maritime workforce.
(b) Identify and develop  specific sectors within the maritime workforce to initiate new workforce
education and job skills programs and to increase participation in existing maritime programs.
(c) Promote growth and development of maritime workforce development  programs in school
districts and community colleges by  hiring faculty and staff with maritime expertise to assist with
curriculum selection for educational  programs and the development of such programs to prepare
individuals for careers in the maritime sector.
(d) Foster industry involvement in apprenticeship programs,  mentorship and other programs that
provide training for entry into the maritime workforce.
(e) Support activities that prepare individuals for careers in the maritime sector,  including but
not limited to educating, training and mentoring activities related to maritime construction and  en-
[29]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
gineering and mariner training.
(f) Conduct outreach and promote awareness  about opportunities to receive maritime training
and education.
(3) The [ commission] bureau may adopt any  rules necessary for the implementation and admin-
istration of this section.
RENAMING OFFICE OF COMMUNITY COLLEGES AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
SECTION 41.
(1) The amendments  to ORS 294.393, 294.456, 341.005, 341.019, 341.021,
341.039, 341.102, 341.105, 341.440, 341.446, 341.455, 341.487,  341.526, 341.551, 341.626, 341.655,
341.665, 341.670, 344.070, 344.080, 344.090,  344.125, 350.150, 350.155, 350.160, 350.170, 350.175,
350.432, 353.606, 408.506, 413.600, 417.799, 421.084 and 576.871 by sections 14 and 44 to 76 of this
2025 Act are intended to change the name of the “Office of Community  Colleges and
Workforce Development” to the “Office of Community Colleges.”
(2) For the purpose of harmonizing and clarifying statutory  law, the Legislative Counsel
may substitute for words designating the “Office of Community Colleges and  Workforce De-
velopment,” wherever they occur in statutory law, other  words designating the “Office of
Community Colleges.”
SECTION 42. (1) The  amendments to ORS 350.155 by section 45 of this 2025 Act are in-
tended to change the name of the “Office of Community Colleges and Workforce Develop-
ment Account” to the “Office of Community Colleges Account.”
(2) For the purpose of  harmonizing and clarifying statutory law, the Legislative Counsel
may substitute for  words designating the “Office of Community Colleges and Workforce De-
velopment Account,”  wherever they occur in statutory law, other words designating the
“Office of Community Colleges Account.”
SECTION 43.
 ORS 350.095 is amended to read:
350.095. (1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission is authorized to:
(a) Request, as part of  the funding request under ORS 350.090, appropriations for budgetary
items, including but not limited to education and general operations, statewide public services,  state
funded debt service,  capital improvements, deferred maintenance, special initiatives and investments
or any other purpose listed under ORS 350.075 (3)(e);  and
(b) Allocate moneys, from funds appropriated to the commission and  other available moneys, to
public universities listed in ORS 352.002 .[; and ]
[(c) Request, as part of the funding request relating to duties authorized under ORS 660.300  to
660.420, appropriations for  budgetary items, including but not limited to workforce development and
coordination of the state workforce development system. ]
(2) The  commission shall certify to the Legislative Assembly, in any funding request pursuant
to subsection (1)(a) of this section  for state bonds under Article XI-F(1) of the Oregon Constitution
for the benefit  of a public university listed in ORS 352.002, its evaluation of the revenue sufficiency,
as defined in ORS 286A.830, of the public university that will receive the proceeds of  any Article
XI-F(1) bonds approved by the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 44.
 ORS 350.150 is amended to read:
350.150. (1) The Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] is established within
the Higher Education Coordinating Commission. The office shall  function under the direction and
control of the commission, with the Director  of the Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce
[30]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Development] serving as an administrative officer for community college matters.
(2) [ Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, ] The commission may adopt any  rules
necessary for the effective and efficient administration of the office  or for the administration of laws
that the office is charged with administering.
[(3) The commission, in consultation with the State  Workforce and Talent Development Board,
workforce partners and the Education and Workforce Policy Advisor and pursuant to ORS  chapter
183, may adopt any rules necessary  for the administration of laws related to the federal Workforce
Innovation and Opportunity Act that the commission is charged with administering. ]
SECTION 45.
 ORS 350.155 is amended to read:
350.155. (1) The Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] Account is estab-
lished in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Except for  moneys oth-
erwise designated by statute, all fees, assessments and other moneys received by  the Office of
Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] shall be  deposited into the State Treasury and
credited to the account. All moneys in the account are continuously  appropriated to the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission for purposes authorized by law.
(2) The office may accept gifts, grants and donations from any source to carry out  the duties
imposed upon the office. Moneys received under this subsection shall be paid into the account.
(3) The office shall keep a record of all moneys deposited into the account.  The record shall
indicate by separate cumulative subaccounts the  sources from which the moneys are derived and the
individual activity or program against which each withdrawal is charged.
(4) Disbursements from the account shall be made as  directed by the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission.
SECTION 46.  ORS 350.160 is amended to read:
350.160. (1) The executive  director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall ap-
point a Director of the  Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] who shall serve
at the pleasure of the executive director.
(2) The director shall be a person  who by training and experience is well qualified to perform
the duties of the office and to assist  in carrying out the functions of the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission  under this section and ORS 341.015, 341.440, 341.455, 341.626, 341.655 and 341.933.
(3) The director shall:
(a) Be the executive head of the Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ].
(b) Direct and supervise all activities of the Office of  Community Colleges [ and Workforce De-
velopment].
(c) Hire staff, as authorized by the executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission to assist in carrying out the  duties of the director. The staff shall be considered em-
ployees of the  Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] for purposes of ORS
chapters 240 and 243.
(d) Be responsible directly to  the executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission for those duties enumerated in ORS chapter 341.
(4) The director, with  approval of the executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission, shall  be responsible for the representation of community college interests to the Gov-
ernor, the Legislative Assembly, state agencies and others.
(5) The executive director of  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall be responsi-
ble for submitting community college budget requests for the  Office of Community Colleges [ and
Workforce Development ] to the Legislative Assembly. The Higher Education Coordinating Commis-
[31]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sion shall ensure that the budget request  for community colleges and for the Office of Community
Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] are separate and distinct from the commission’s other requests
to the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 47.
 ORS 350.170 is amended to read:
350.170. (1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall establish by rule a  process for
making grants or loans to public-private partnerships to provide advanced technology education and
training opportunities. The purpose of the grants and loans is  to support the development and im-
plementation of public-private partnerships to  provide advanced technology education and training
opportunities in all business and industry sectors for individuals in communities throughout Oregon.
The partnerships shall  be between public and private entities and may include joint ventures among
business and industry, school districts, education service districts,  eligible post-secondary insti-
tutions as defined in ORS 348.180 and public bodies as defined in ORS 174.109.
(2) A public-private partnership that receives a grant or loan under this section must  provide
advanced technology education and training opportunities that:
(a) Address current and future workforce development needs dictated by Oregon’s  rapidly
changing economy;
(b) Facilitate sustainable  and dynamic economic development in communities by creating flexible
opportunities for workforce development;
(c) Establish results oriented, collaborative investments of public and private  resources in com-
munities throughout Oregon;
(d) Ensure that Oregon’s  capacity for economic growth and vitality is not limited by a lack of
opportunities for workforce development; and
(e) Provide  support to existing community efforts to establish innovative strategies for delivering
advanced technology education and training.
(3) The process established by the commission for making grants and loans shall ensure that:
(a) Local communities are informed about the availability of the grants and loans;
(b) Advanced technology  education and training projects are geographically distributed
throughout Oregon;
(c) There is equal opportunity for urban and rural access  to quality education and training op-
portunities;
(d) Representatives  of related, ongoing community efforts assist in the implementation of ad-
vanced technology education and training projects; and
(e) Procedures and timelines are designed to minimize barriers to receiving funds.
(4) When  considering applications for grants and loans, the Office of Community Colleges [ and
Workforce Development ] shall give priority to advanced  technology education and training projects
that:
(a) Provide or increase access for  individuals to advanced technology education and training
through the efforts of local and regional career  centers and partnerships and distance education
technology available locally and regionally;
(b) In  combination with other projects receiving funds, contribute to advanced technology edu-
cation and training opportunities in every part of the state;
(c) Use federal funds;
(d) Have widespread community support as evidenced by a memorandum of  agreement or similar
documentation;
(e) Represent an  effective sharing of resources through public-private partnerships among busi-
[32]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ness and industry, school  districts, education service districts, eligible post-secondary institutions
as defined in ORS 348.180 and public bodies as defined in ORS 174.109;
(f) Have a long-term strategic plan and lack only the necessary financial resources;
(g) Provide state-of-the-art technology that meets current standards of business  and industry and
addresses local and regional economic development priorities;
(h) Help individuals connect education  and training with career planning and job opportunities
through local and regional career centers as implemented under  the federal Workforce Innovation
and Opportunity Act;
(i) Provide articulated education programs  that lead to a degree or an industry-specific skills
certification; and
(j) Establish short-term training programs that meet the immediate needs of local employers  in
their communities.
(5)(a) A  public-private partnership awarded a grant or loan under this section shall use the grant
or loan for any of the following:
(A) Infrastructure construction or reconstruction.
(B) Equipment or technology purchases.
(C) Curriculum development.
(D) Expansion  or revision of a current project to increase the capacity of the project, alter the
project plan, change the members of the partnership or  address education or employment deficien-
cies in the community served by the public-private partnership.
(b) A grant or loan awarded under this  section for the purpose described in paragraph (a)(D)
of this subsection may not exceed $25,000.
(6) The application for a grant or loan under this section shall include:
(a) The names of the members of the public-private partnership;
(b) A description of standards used to assess the performance of the project;
(c) An estimate of the number of individuals who will be served by the project;
(d) The name of the fiscal agent of the public-private partnership;
(e) A project plan covering at least the first two years after receipt of a grant or loan; and
(f) The name of the person who will be responsible for convening the public-private  partnership
on a regular basis.
(7) The commission may accept contributions of funds  and assistance from the United States
Government or its agencies  or from any other source, public or private, and agree to conditions
placed on the funds not inconsistent with the purposes of this section.
(8) Any moneys received by the  commission through repayment of a loan awarded under this
section, or received by the commission under subsection (7) of this section, shall be  deposited by the
commission in the Advanced Technology Education and  Training Fund established under ORS
350.165.
SECTION 48.
 ORS 350.175 is amended to read:
350.175. (1) The Director of the Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] may
issue certificates for passing approved high school equivalency  tests such as the General Educa-
tional Development (GED) test to persons who demonstrate  satisfactory performance in tests pre-
scribed under subsection (2) of this  section or meet the requirements of any prescribed evaluative
procedure.
(2) The Higher  Education Coordinating Commission by rule may prescribe tests and other ap-
propriate evaluation procedures for the purposes of subsection (1) of this section and may  establish
[33]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
age, residence and other relevant qualifications for applicants.
(3) The Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] may utilize its personnel and
facilities for the administration of this section, and the commission may establish  by rule a
nonrefundable application fee. The fee may be waived by the commission in case of hardship.
(4) Subject to prior approval of the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, the fee es-
tablished under subsection (3) of this section [ shall] may not exceed the cost of administering the
program, as authorized by the Legislative Assembly within the office’s budget, as  the budget may
be modified by the Emergency Board.
(5) All  moneys received under this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit
of the Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] and shall be used exclusively for
administration of this section. The Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] shall
keep a record of all moneys deposited  in such account. The record shall indicate by separate cu-
mulative accounts  the source from which the moneys are derived and the individual activity against
which each withdrawal is charged.
(6) The Director of the Office of Community  Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] shall consult
with the Superintendent of Public Instruction on all matters related to evaluation procedures used
to measure equivalent achievement under this section.  The superintendent is authorized to make
independent recommendations on evaluation procedures to the office in those  cases where the
superintendent’s judgment differs from that of the director.
SECTION 49.
 ORS 294.393 is amended to read:
294.393. (1) Each school district and each education service district shall  prepare the estimates
of expenditures required under ORS 294.388 in accordance with the classification of revenue and
expenditure accounts prescribed by the Department of Education in consultation with the Depart-
ment of Revenue. The  Department of Revenue is responsible for determining the district’s compli-
ance with this subsection.
(2) Each  community college district shall prepare the estimates of expenditures required under
ORS 294.388 in accordance with the classification of  revenue and expenditure accounts prescribed
by the Office of  Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] in consultation with the Depart-
ment of Revenue. The  Department of Revenue is responsible for determining the district’s compli-
ance with this subsection.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS  294.388 (2), each municipal corporation that operates a public utility
or hospital shall prepare estimates for  the operations of each public utility or hospital in accordance
with:
(a) The applicable generally accepted system of accounts for the operations; or
(b) The general system of accounts in ORS 294.305 to 294.565.
SECTION 50.
 ORS 294.456 is amended to read:
294.456. (1)(a) After the public hearing required under ORS 294.453 (1)  and consideration of
matters discussed at the  public hearing, the governing body of a municipal corporation shall enact
the ordinances or resolutions necessary to adopt  the budget, to make the appropriations, to deter-
mine, make and declare the ad valorem property tax amount or  rate to be certified to the assessor
for either the ensuing year or  each of the years of the ensuing budget period and to itemize and
categorize the ad valorem property tax amount or rate as required under ORS 310.060.
(b) The governing body may amend the budget estimates and proposed ad valorem  property tax
amount or rate in the budget document before adoption under paragraph  (a) of this subsection and
after adoption if the post-adoption  amendments are adopted prior to the commencement of the fiscal
[34]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
year or budget period to which the budget relates.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection, unless the amended  budget document is
republished pursuant to ORS 294.438 or 294.448 in the same  manner as the original budget and an-
other public  hearing is held pursuant to ORS 294.453 (1), or except to the extent ad valorem prop-
erty taxes may be increased under ORS 294.476:
(A) The amount of  estimated expenditures for each fund in an annual budget may not be in-
creased by more than $5,000 or 10 percent of the estimated expenditures, whichever is greater;
(B) The amount of estimated expenditures  for each fund in a biennial budget may not be in-
creased by more than $10,000 or 10 percent of the estimated expenditures, whichever is greater;  and
(C) The amount or rate of the total  ad valorem property taxes to be certified by the municipal
corporation to the assessor may not exceed the amount approved by the budget committee.
(2)(a) After a  public hearing under ORS 294.453 (2) or (3), receipt of the certification of the tax
supervising and conservation commission, if required,  and consideration of any orders, recommen-
dations or objections  made by the tax supervising and conservation commission in accordance with
law, the  governing body of a municipal corporation shall enact the ordinances or resolutions nec-
essary to adopt the budget, to make the appropriations,  to determine, make and declare the ad
valorem property tax amount or rate for either the ensuing  fiscal year or each of the fiscal years
of the ensuing budget period and to itemize and categorize the ad  valorem property tax amount or
rate as required under ORS 310.060.
(b) The action taken by the governing body under paragraph (a) of this subsection on each order,
recommendation or objection made by  the commission, with the reasons for the action, must be in-
cluded in the ordinance or resolution adopting the budget.
(c) The governing body shall  send a certified copy of the ordinance or resolution to the com-
mission within 15 days after the date the ordinance or resolution is adopted.
(d) The governing body may  amend the budget estimates, appropriations and ad valorem prop-
erty tax amount or rate in the budget  document before adoption under paragraph (a) of this sub-
section and after adoption if the post-adoption amendments are adopted prior to  the commencement
of the fiscal year or budget period to which the budget relates.
(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (d) of this subsection, unless the amended  budget document is
resubmitted to the tax supervising and conservation  commission for another public hearing and for
recommendations or objections of the commission, or except to  the extent ad valorem property taxes
may be increased under ORS 294.476:
(A) The amount of estimated expenditures for each fund in an annual budget may  not be in-
creased by more than $5,000 or 10 percent of the estimated expenditures, whichever is greater;
(B) The amount of estimated expenditures  for each fund in a biennial budget may not be in-
creased by more than $10,000 or 10 percent of the estimated expenditures, whichever is greater;  and
(C) The amount or rate of the total  ad valorem property taxes to be certified by the municipal
corporation to the assessor may not exceed the amount approved by the budget committee.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subsections (4)  and (5) of this section, the appropriations required
under subsections (1) and (2) of this section must contain:
(A) One amount for each organizational  unit or program of each fund that is the total of all
amounts for personnel services, materials and services and capital outlay attributable to the organ-
izational unit or program; and
(B) Separate amounts in  each fund for operating expenses for personnel services, materials and
services and capital outlay that cannot be  allocated to a particular organizational unit or program
[35]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and for debt service, special payments, interfund revenue transfers and operating contingencies.
(b) Separate amounts for activities within an organizational unit or program  may be appropri-
ated separately.
(c) For a municipal corporation to which the terms “organizational unit” and “program”  do not
apply, the appropriations must contain separate amounts for personnel services,  materials and ser-
vices, capital outlay,  debt service, special payments, interfund revenue transfers and operating con-
tingencies for each fund.
(4) For a school district or an education service district, the appropriations required under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section must contain separate amounts in each  major fund for each
major function, as prescribed by the Department of  Education in consultation with the Department
of Revenue, including instruction, support services, enterprise and community services, facilities
acquisition and construction, interfund revenue transfers, debt service and operating contingencies.
(5) For a community college district, the appropriations required under  subsections (1) and (2)
of this section must contain separate amounts in each fund for:
(a) Each major function, as prescribed by the Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce De-
velopment] in consultation with the Department of Revenue,  including instruction, instructional
support, student services, community services, college support services, interfund transfers, debt
service and operating contingencies;
(b) Each major function as required under subsection (4) of this section; or
(c) Each organizational unit or program and  each object classification required under subsection
(3) of this section.
(6) Except as provided in ORS 294.338, 294.463, 294.466, 294.471,  294.473 and 294.478, after the
governing body has enacted the ordinances or resolutions necessary to adopt the budget  as required
under this section, an expenditure, or encumbrance if  encumbrance accounting is used, of public
money may not be made for any purpose in an amount greater than the amount appropriated.
(7) The governing body of  a municipal corporation shall record the amount or rate of ad valorem
property taxes to be certified and the purposes for which  the taxes will be used. Except as provided
in ORS 294.476, the municipal  corporation may not certify ad valorem property taxes in an amount
or rate greater than the amount or rate recorded for the purposes indicated.
(8)(a) The governing body of a municipal corporation shall determine, make  and declare ad
valorem property taxes under subsections (1) and (2) of this section as a  rate per $1,000 of assessed
value if the taxes are  operating taxes as defined in ORS 310.055 (1) or rate-based local option taxes.
(b) The governing body shall determine, make and  declare ad valorem property taxes under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section as an amount if the taxes  are certified as amount-based local
option taxes, to  pay principal and interest on exempt bonded indebtedness or to pay other govern-
ment obligations described in Article XI, section 11 (5), of the Oregon Constitution.
(c) Notwithstanding  paragraph (a) of this subsection, the governing body may certify operating
taxes as defined in ORS 310.055  (1) as a rate or an amount if less than the full authority is needed
to balance the fund that will receive the taxes.
SECTION 51.
 ORS 341.005 is amended to read:
341.005. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Academic year” means the year beginning July  1 of each year and ending June 30 of the
following year running concurrently with the fiscal year.
(2) “Board” means the board of education of a community college district.
(3) “Board member” means a member of the board of education of a  community college district.
[36]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4)(a) Except as provided in  paragraph (b) of this subsection, “community college” means a
public institution operated by a community college district for the purposes of  providing courses of
study limited to not more than  two years’ full-time attendance and designed to meet the needs of a
geographical  area  by providing educational services, including but not limited to career and tech-
nical education programs or lower division collegiate programs.
(b) The two-year limitation described in paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply to:
(A) Technical programs in which the curriculum may require  more than two years of attendance
but less than four years;
(B) Applied baccalaureate degree programs approved under ORS 341.013; or
(C) Bachelor of Science: Nursing degree programs approved under ORS 341.013.
(5) “Community college  district” or “district” means a district formed under this chapter to op-
erate one or more community colleges or to  secure educational services available at a community
college. “Community college district” includes a community college service district.
(6) “Director”  means the Director of the Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Develop-
ment] appointed under ORS 350.160 by the executive director of the Higher Education  Coordinating
Commission.
(7) “Full-time equivalent student” means a  student or combination of several students who car-
ries or carry  among them, within a single academic year, a minimum number of clock hours of in-
struction, in any  program, to be specified by rule by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(8) “Paying agent and registrar” means the county treasurer or county fiscal officer of the
county  in  which the chief administrative officer of the community college district maintains the ad-
ministrative office.
(9) “Petitioning territory” means a community college district petitioning to  have an area out-
side the district included in the district or to have an area inside the district  excluded from the
district, or an area outside the district petitioning to be included within the district.
(10) “Principal county” means the county in which the chief  administrative officer of the com-
munity college district maintains the administrative office.
SECTION 52.
 ORS 341.019 is amended to read:
341.019. (1) All areas  within this state shall be served by a community college district. Such
services may be provided either:
(a) Directly by formation of a community college district; or
(b) Indirectly by contract with an existing community college district.
(2) The Office  of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] shall fix responsibility for
serving each area that is not within a community college  district. Where feasible, each area shall
be a whole county or a group of counties or that part of a  county not already in a community col-
lege district.
(3) In order to obtain the services described in subsection (1)(b) of this  section, residents of a
nondistrict area must indicate their  interest in receiving services by requesting formation of a local
advisory committee and seeking the advice and counsel of the Office of Community  Colleges [ and
Workforce Development].
(4) The  Higher Education Coordinating Commission by rule shall establish standards for the
Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] to  use determining when there is suffi-
cient interest among the  residents of a nondistrict area to warrant appointment of a local advisory
committee.
(5) When the Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] has  made the determi-
[37]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
nation under subsection (4) of this section, the office and the interested residents of the nondistrict
area shall apply jointly to the governing body of the county  for the appointment of a local advisory
committee.
(6) Upon application, the governing body  of the county shall appoint a local advisory committee
and shall ensure that the committee is broadly representative of the nondistrict area.
(7) If the nondistrict area involves two or more counties, the governing body of each county
shall appoint members  to the local advisory committee in proportion to the number of county resi-
dents within the nondistrict area.
(8) The governing body  of a county making appointments under subsection (6) or (7) of this
section shall not be obligated to fund any part of the budget described in ORS 341.021 (3).
(9) The duties  of the local advisory committee shall include, but need not be limited to, advising
the officials of the community college district serving the nondistrict area  on the educational needs
of the area.
(10) As used in ORS 341.019 to 341.022, “community college district”  includes a community col-
lege service district.
SECTION 53.
 ORS 341.021 is amended to read:
341.021. (1) The Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] shall invite  existing
community college districts to submit proposals for the provision of  service to an area that has of-
ficially indicated its interest in receiving service.
(2) The responsibilities of the host community college district shall include:
(a) Preparing a  written agreement for services to be provided to nondistrict areas using a format
specified by the office; and
(b) Acting as the fiscal agent for agreements including  establishing tuition and fees for services
offered under terms of an agreement.
(3) Agreements between the community college district  and nondistrict entities as listed in ORS
341.315 shall include an  annual budget setting forth both revenue and expenditures. The budget shall
be based upon the following conditions:
(a) Subject to ORS 341.022, eligible full-time equivalent student enrollment  produced under the
agreement may be claimed  for state reimbursement purposes by the community college district.
Such reimbursement shall come from the Community College Support Fund established in  ORS
341.620 and shall be distributed as directed  in ORS 341.626 and the rules of the Higher Education
Coordinating  Commission.
(b) A share of  the budget shall be provided by those individuals or agencies receiving service
under this agreement as specified by rule of the commission adopted under ORS 341.024 (3).
(4) Agreements developed under  this section shall be wholly supported by Community College
Support Fund reimbursement, nondistrict student tuition and nondistrict resources.
SECTION 54.
 ORS 341.039 is amended to read:
341.039. (1) A petition submitted  pursuant to ORS 341.025 may specify that the proposed district
be organized as a community college service district. The formation of a community college  service
district shall comply with the provisions  of ORS 341.025 to 341.125. A petition affecting a territory
that, in the judgment of the Director of the Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Develop-
ment], will not generate an annual enrollment in excess of 1,000 full-time  equivalent students after
three years of operation shall be considered to be a petition for the  formation of a community col-
lege service district.
(2) If formed, a community college service district shall in all respects be governed by the  laws
[38]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
applicable to community college districts with the following exceptions:
(a) Notwithstanding ORS 341.675, community  college service districts formed on or after July
1, 1997, may not incur bonded indebtedness for any purpose. This limitation  shall not be construed
to prohibit lease-purchase arrangements or  other lawful forms of capital financing. A community
college service district may hold and  own buildings and grounds acquired through gifts or financing
methods authorized by this section.
(b) The board of education for  a community college service district shall annually review the
programs and services of the service district. This review shall have as  its purpose a determination
of which services  can most effectively and economically be delivered directly and which services can
best be delivered through contracting  arrangements. The direct hiring of faculty and staff is ex-
pressly permitted.
(3) After having been in operation for at least three years, a community  college service district
may submit to the electors of the district the question of whether the  district shall operate as a
community college district.
(4) Prior to submitting the question to the electors, the community  college service district must
have been in operation for three years, and must  have secured the approval of the Higher Education
Coordinating Commission to hold the election. Before granting approval, the commission must find:
(a) The service district has acquired stability as demonstrated by  a continuity of management,
regularly adopted policies and procedures and adequate financial resources; and
(b) The service district has adopted a sound comprehensive plan that sets out the district’s in-
structional and capital plans for five years.
SECTION 55.
 ORS 341.102 is amended to read:
341.102. If the Legislative Assembly approves the recommendation submitted under  ORS 341.076,
341.565 or 341.579, the Legislative Assembly shall appropriate to the Higher  Education Coordinating
Commission for the  purpose of allocation to the Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce De-
velopment] moneys necessary to pay the expenses of the election under  ORS 341.085, 341.565, 341.569
or 341.579 (1) if the election is to occur within 24 months  of the appropriation or allocation. If the
election does not occur within the biennium immediately following the appropriation or  allocation,
the question shall be brought before the next Legislative Assembly.  The state shall fund the election
without regard to the outcome of the election.
SECTION 56.  ORS 341.105 is amended to read:
341.105. When at  the request of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission the county clerk
of the  principal county, in consultation with county clerks of the affected counties, prepares a list
or lists of names and addresses of the electors registered in the proposed district, the Office of
Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] is authorized to pay the charge as determined
under ORS 255.305.
SECTION 57.
 ORS 341.440 is amended to read:
341.440. (1) A community college district may contract with another  community college district,
a common or union high school district, an education service district,  a public university listed in
ORS 352.002, the Oregon Health and Science University, a private  educational institution accredited
by the Northwest Commission on Colleges and Universities or its successor or  a career school as
defined in ORS 345.010 to obtain educational services  for students enrolled in the community college
of the district. However, the educational services so obtained must meet  the standards for educa-
tional services  provided by the college and the contract price to the college for such services must
not exceed the costs that  would otherwise be incurred by the college to provide its students the
[39]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
same or similar services.
(2) Educational services for which a district operating a community college may contract include
services offered by correspondence and services offered electronically or through  telecommuni-
cations if such services are accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting association.
(3) For purposes of ORS 341.626,  costs incurred under subsection (1) of this section shall be
considered operating expenses of the district if the contract is approved by  the Director of the Of-
fice of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ].
SECTION 58.
 ORS 341.446 is amended to read:
341.446. (1) At the  beginning of each school year, the Office of Community Colleges [ and
Workforce Development ] shall  make the following information available for distribution to public
school students who are in grades 11 and 12:
(a) The academic programs and services provided by community colleges;
(b) Recommendations for successful completion of community college programs; and
(c) Any other information identified by the office as being necessary  to assist students in pre-
paring to succeed in community colleges.
(2) Representatives of the State Board of  Education and the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission shall  regularly meet for the purpose of improving coordination between public second-
ary schools and community colleges.
SECTION 59.
 ORS 341.455 is amended to read:
341.455. (1) A community college may give  credit for courses or programs taken in a career
school. The courses or programs for which  credit may be given must meet the standards adopted
by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission under ORS 345.325, must be taken at a  career
school domiciled in this state and must be  approved for credit by the Director of the Office of
Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ].
(2) A community college board may charge a transcripting fee to a  student for courses taken
at a career school and accepted  by the community college under subsection (1) of this section. Such
a fee is to be set by the board and is to be consistent with other student fees.
(3) Time spent by students on such courses shall not be considered as clock hours of  instruction
in determining full-time equivalency for purposes of ORS 341.626.
SECTION 60.  ORS 341.487 is amended to read:
341.487. (1) Community  colleges in Oregon shall admit students from other states at the same
tuition rate assessed against Oregon residents who are residents of the  community college district
if:
(a) The state in which the student resides agrees to pay and pays its per capita state aid for
comparable students in the state to the community college;
(b) The state in which  the students reside agrees to permit and permits one-for-one full-time
enrollment exchange arrangements that allow an equal number of Oregon residents to be  admitted
to community colleges or comparable institutions in the  state at the same tuition rate assessed
against residents  of the state and community colleges or comparable institutions in the state in
which the students reside agree to  admit and admit approved Oregon residents without assessing
nonresident tuition; or
(c) The board of the community college determines out-of-state residents are  essential to pro-
viding the critical mass to offer programs that would otherwise be unavailable  to Oregon residents.
(2) The Higher Education  Coordinating Commission shall enter into agreements with such other
states as are willing to agree to  the provisions of this section to establish reimbursement procedures
[40]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or one-for-one exchange procedures.
(3) In cases described in subsection (1)(a) of  this section, the Office of Community Colleges [ and
Workforce Development ] shall pay from funds available  therefor to the state that agrees to pay and
does pay its per capita state aid to eligible Oregon community colleges to the credit of the commu-
nity college or comparable institution educating the Oregon  resident an amount equal to the amount
that would be available under ORS 341.626 if the Oregon resident were enrolled in a community
college in this  state. From these same funds, the Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce De-
velopment] shall pay to the  Oregon community colleges admitting approved one-for-one exchange
students as provided by  subsection (1)(b) of this section, from other states, an amount equal to the
amount that would be available under ORS 341.626 as if the  enrolled one-for-one students were
Oregon residents. The Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] shall not reim-
burse Oregon community colleges  that admit students from other states under subsection (1)(c) of
this section.
(4) If a state that has entered into the agreement to pay the per capita state  aid to eligible
Oregon community colleges as described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section does not make  any
payment agreed to, the  agreement terminates after the affected community college notifies the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission of  the lack of payment. The termination is effective 30
days after  the commission notifies the appropriate agency of the other state that the agreement is
terminated if no payment is received by the end of the academic period for which  tuition is assessed
and no payment is received at that time. The agreement may be reinstated by mutual consent of the
parties.
(5) The Higher Education Coordinating  Commission shall adopt rules governing attendance in
community colleges or comparable institutions in other  states for purposes of the reimbursement
authorized under subsections (1) and (2) of this section  to ensure that Oregon residents shall not be
the object of such reimbursement if they can obtain the  same education within the state without
undue hardship.
SECTION 61.
 ORS 341.526 is amended to read:
341.526. (1) The Office of Community Colleges  [ and Workforce Development ] and the Higher Ed-
ucation Coordinating Commission shall jointly establish a  grant program for the purpose of distrib-
uting moneys to community  colleges, or any foundations of community colleges, to increase the
number of underserved, low-income  and first-generation college-bound students who enroll in com-
munity college and make progress toward a degree or a certificate.
(2) Moneys distributed under subsection  (1) of this section may be used by a community college,
or a foundation of a community college, for services that are designed to increase  student enroll-
ment, retention and degree and certificate completion, including counseling programs,  college initi-
atives, advising services and assistance in obtaining financial aid.
(3) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may  adopt rules necessary for the adminis-
tration of this section, including rules that  set standards for awarding grants. The standards shall
give priority to community colleges, or foundations of  community colleges, that have student en-
rollment, retention and degree and certificate completion programs with demonstrated  support from
the private sector, the community and local government.
SECTION 62.  ORS 341.551 is amended to read:
341.551. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of ORS chapter 238  or 238A, the Office of Community
Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] may  establish and administer an optional retirement plan for
administrative employees of community college districts who are eligible for membership  in the
[41]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Public Employees Retirement System. Any community college district  may participate in the plan
by giving written notice to the office.
(2) An administrative employee may make an election to participate in the optional retirement
plan if the community college district that employs the employee is participating in  the plan. The
election must be made in the following manner:
(a) An administrative employee who is an active member  of the Public Employees Retirement
System may make an election to participate in the plan within 180 days after the  community college
district commences participation in the plan, effective on the first day of the month following  the
election.
(b) An administrative employee who is hired after  the community college district commences
participation in the  plan may make an election to participate in the plan within the first six months
of employment, effective on the first day of the month following six full months of employment.
(3) An administrative employee who does not elect to participate in the  optional retirement plan
remains or  becomes a member of the Public Employees Retirement System in accordance with ORS
chapters 238 and 238A.
(4) An administrative employee may elect to participate in the optional retirement plan  only if
at the time the election becomes  effective the employee is not concurrently employed in a position
with any participating public  employer other than the community college district in a position that
entitles the employee to membership in the Public Employees Retirement System. Except  as pro-
vided in subsection (9) of this section,  employees who elect to participate in the optional retirement
plan are ineligible for active membership in the Public Employees  Retirement System for as long as
those employees are employed by a community college district that participates  in the plan, whether
by reason of employment by the district or any other participating public employer.
(5)(a) An administrative  employee who elects to participate in the optional retirement plan, who
has creditable service under ORS chapter 238 as defined by ORS 238.005  and who is not vested shall
be considered by the  Public Employees Retirement Board to be a terminated member under the
provisions of ORS 238.095 as of the effective date of the election, and the amounts credited  to the
member accounts  of the member established under ORS 238.250, 238.260, 238A.350 and 238A.353 shall
be transferred directly to the optional retirement plan by the Public  Employees Retirement Board
in the manner provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(b) An  administrative employee who elects to participate in the optional retirement plan, who
has creditable service under ORS chapter  238 as defined by ORS 238.005 and who is vested shall
be considered to be an inactive  member by the Public Employees Retirement Board and shall retain
all the rights, privileges and options under ORS  chapter 238 unless the employee makes a written
request to the Public Employees Retirement  Board for a transfer of the amounts credited to the
member accounts of the member established under ORS 238.250, 238.260, 238A.350 and  238A.353 to
the optional retirement plan. A request for a transfer must be  made at the time the member elects
to participate in the optional retirement plan.  Upon receiving the request, the Public Employees
Retirement Board shall transfer all  amounts credited to the member accounts of the member estab-
lished under ORS 238.250, 238.260, 238A.350 and 238A.353 directly to the optional retirement  plan
in the manner provided by subsection (6) of  this section and shall terminate all rights, privileges and
options of the employee under the Public Employees Retirement System.
(c) An administrative  employee who elects to participate in the optional retirement plan and
who is a member of the pension program of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan as described
in ORS 238A.100 on the date that the election becomes effective, but who  has not vested in the
[42]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
program under ORS  238A.115 on the date that the election becomes effective, shall be considered
to be a terminated member of the Public Employees Retirement System by the Public  Employees
Retirement Board as of the  effective date of the election. The board shall transfer the amounts
credited  to  the member accounts of the member established under ORS 238A.350 and 238A.353 di-
rectly to the optional retirement plan in the manner provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(d) An  administrative employee who elects to participate in the optional retirement plan and
who is a vested  member of the pension program of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan as
described in ORS 238A.115 on the date that the election becomes effective shall be considered  an
inactive member of the pension  program by the Public Employees Retirement Board as of the ef-
fective date of the election. A member who is  subject to the provisions of this paragraph retains all
the rights, privileges and options of an inactive member of the pension  program, unless the member
makes a written request to the Public Employees Retirement Board for a transfer of the amounts
credited to the member accounts  of the member established under ORS 238A.350 and 238A.353 to the
optional retirement plan. The request must be made at the time the member  elects to participate in
the optional retirement plan. Upon receiving the request, the Public Employees  Retirement Board
shall transfer the amounts credited to  the member accounts of the member established under ORS
238A.350 and 238A.353 directly to the  optional retirement plan in the manner provided by subsection
(6) of this section and shall terminate the membership of the employee in the Public Employees  Re-
tirement System.
(e) Notwithstanding paragraphs (b) and (d) of  this subsection, the Public Employees Retirement
Board shall not treat any employee as an inactive member under  the provisions of this subsection
for the purpose of receiving any benefit under  ORS chapter 238 or 238A that requires that the em-
ployee be separated from all service with  participating public employers and with employers who
are treated as part of a participating public employer’s controlled  group under the federal laws and
rules governing the status of the Public Employees Retirement System and the Public  Employees
Retirement Fund as a qualified governmental retirement plan and trust.
(6) Any amounts transferred from the Public Employees Retirement Fund under subsection (5)
of this section shall be transferred directly to  the optional retirement plan by the Public Employees
Retirement Board and shall not be made available to the employee.
(7) An employee participating  in the optional retirement plan shall contribute monthly an
amount equal  to the percentage of the employee’s salary that the employee would otherwise have
contributed as an employee contribution to the Public Employees  Retirement System if the employee
had not elected to participate in the optional retirement plan.
(8) A participating community college district shall contribute monthly to  the optional retire-
ment plan the percentage of salary for each employee participating in the plan that  is equal to the
percentage of salary that is required to be made as the employer contribution  under ORS 238A.220,
less any contributions made  by reason of unfunded liabilities. The district may make contributions
under this subsection only during periods  of time in which the employee would be eligible for
membership in the Public Employees Retirement  System if the employee had not elected to partic-
ipate in the optional retirement plan.
(9) An administrative employee who elects  to participate in the optional retirement plan may
make an election to withdraw from the plan. An employee may make an  election under this sub-
section only once. Upon withdrawing from the plan:
(a) All contributions made to  the plan before the effective date of the withdrawal remain cred-
ited to the employee;
[43]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The employee becomes a member of the  Public Employees Retirement System under ORS
chapter 238A if the member meets all requirements for membership under ORS chapter 238A; and
(c) The employee is  barred from ever again electing to participate in the optional retirement
plan.
(10) For the purposes of this section, “administrative employee”  means a president, vice presi-
dent or dean, or a person holding a position that is the equivalent of a president,  vice president or
dean.
SECTION 63.
 ORS 341.626 is amended to read:
341.626. (1) Subject to rules adopted by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission and to
ORS 291.232 to 291.260, the Director of the Office  of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Develop-
ment] shall distribute state aid to each community college  district and community college service
district.
(2) The rules adopted by the commission shall provide:
(a) No state aid for hobby and recreation classes;
(b) Procedures for proper and accurate record keeping;
(c) Procedures that will ensure reasonable year-to-year  stability in the delivery of appropriated
moneys to the colleges; and
(d) Procedures to ensure that the full state appropriation is distributed to the colleges.
SECTION 64.
 ORS 341.655 is amended to read:
341.655. (1) As used in this section, “approved  expenses” means the operating expenses of com-
munity college districts for career  and technical education programs that have been approved by the
Director of the Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ].
(2) Federal moneys received for  purposes of reimbursing community college districts for career
and technical education programs may be used by the districts to pay approved expenses.
SECTION 65.  ORS 341.665 is amended to read:
341.665. (1) The receiving community college  shall be awarded funds from the contracted out-
of-district  funds  allocated to the Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] if the
college operates the program under a contract with an apprenticeship training  committee and the
contract is approved by the office.
(2) A community college district may  submit full-time equivalencies generated by apprenticeship
programs to the office for reimbursement from the Community College Support Fund  for purposes
of ORS 341.626 but may not submit  for reimbursement those full-time equivalencies generated
through contracts under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 66.  ORS 341.670 is amended to read:
341.670. (1) The community college districts of this state shall use the same  system for reporting
finances.
(2) The Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] shall:
(a) Select the system, which may be an existing system; and
(b) Provide guidelines for implementation of the system.
(3) The system selected by the office shall include uniform identification of:
(a) Funds;
(b) Revenues by source; and
(c) Expenditures by function and object classification, as that term is defined in ORS 294.311.
(4) The office shall place data gathered from the system on the website of the office to ensure
timely access to the information by the public.
[44]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 67.
 ORS 344.070 is amended to read:
344.070. (1)  The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may draw warrants upon any
state fund to which federal funds for training or education have been credited, in  payment of
vouchers  approved  by the Superintendent of Public Instruction or the Director of the Office of
Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] pursuant to rules of the Higher  Education Coor-
dinating Commission,  in favor of school districts, education service districts and community college
districts, for such sums, not exceeding $100,000 for a single district in the aggregate, as the  com-
mission, by rule, shall determine. The warrants, upon delivery to  the districts, shall constitute ad-
vances from state funds  to enable the districts more readily to effectuate the purposes set forth in
any federal law or regulation pertaining to career and technical education  or other education or
training sponsored by the federal government.
(2) The districts to which moneys are advanced shall be responsible for the full repayment to
the state of all sums advanced. The advances are not within any limitation upon indebtedness  pre-
scribed by law for districts. The moneys advanced to districts may not exceed in  the aggregate the
moneys to the credit of the state fund from which they  are paid, and shall constitute advances to
the recipient district in anticipation of  verified vouchers to be supplied therefor. The advances are
to be used as revolving funds for the payment of the costs of career and  technical education pro-
grams, including but not limited to job training, skill development and academic programs  offered
by youth job development organizations as defined in ORS 344.415. The advances shall be made  only
in those cases in which the federal government defrays all or part of the cost of such programs.
SECTION 68.  ORS 344.080 is amended to read:
344.080. (1) All reimbursement vouchers  for claims paid from the revolving funds described in
ORS 344.070 shall be approved by the Superintendent of Public Instruction or the Director of  the
Office of Community  Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] pursuant to rules of the Higher Educa-
tion Coordinating Commission. When vouchers are so approved, warrants covering the  same shall
be drawn by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, payable from  the appropriate fund,
and be used to reimburse the revolving funds.
(2) The districts receiving the advances shall maintain their accounts  and records so as to dis-
close at all times the true status of the unpaid vouchers issued for the reimbursement of the  funds,
the district warrants drawn against the funds advanced and the balances to the credit  of the funds.
(3) The revolving funds and accounts shall be subject to examination and audit  by the state in
the manner provided by law for other state funds and accounts. The commission may  require an
audit of the revolving accounts and shall take proper precautions as to the  safety of, and account-
ability for, all funds advanced.
(4) The commission may require the filing with it of a bond of a  corporate surety duly licensed
to transact business in this state to ensure the proper handling of and responsibility  for any funds
advanced. The bond shall be  cumulative and supplemental to fidelity insurance coverage already
held by the district concerned. The state may have recourse  to any and all fidelity bonds of clerks
or other financial officers of the district to protect such advances.
SECTION 69.  ORS 344.090 is amended to read:
344.090. When it appears to the Superintendent of  Public Instruction or the Director of the Of-
fice of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] that the training and  educational programs
for which  funds are advanced under ORS 344.070 have been completed, or that the need for the ad-
vances  or  revolving funds no longer exists, or that the sums advanced are not being properly han-
dled or accounted for, the superintendent or director may require that all or part of the  amounts
[45]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
advanced to any district shall be returned, with any interest earned, to the state funds or accounts
from which the amounts  originally were withdrawn. Upon receipt of notification from the super-
intendent or director that funds advanced are to  be returned, the district concerned shall imme-
diately repay the same to the  State Treasurer, for credit to the proper fund or account. To the
extent that funds advanced are so repaid, security or protection theretofore required by  the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission under  ORS 344.080 (4) to ensure the safety of such funds may
be released.
SECTION 70.
 ORS 344.125 is amended to read:
344.125. (1) Representatives from the  Department of Education, the Office of Community Col-
leges [ and Workforce Development ] and the Bureau of Labor  and Industries shall meet at least four
times each year for the purpose of promoting collaboration among the  agencies on issues related to
career and technical education.
(2) Issues to be  addressed by the agencies shall include the development and implementation of
long-term goals that:
(a) Ensure that  career and technical education programs are available at the public schools of
this state and through youth job development  organizations as defined in ORS 344.415, are founded
on partnerships with business and industry and receive appropriate investments of time,  money and
other resources.
(b) Develop regional centers that establish any appropriate partnerships between public schools,
community colleges, public universities, businesses,  unions and other entities and that ensure that
every student of this state has access to a regional center in person or online.
(c) Encourage the establishment of joint  high school and community college advisory committees
that may include representatives of  public schools, community colleges, public universities, busi-
nesses and unions to:
(A) Make more effective use of resources;
(B) Promote articulation and pathways between high school programs and post-secondary  school
programs;
(C) Ensure that current industry workforce  needs are considered and that curriculum is kept
current with state standards; and
(D) Increase opportunities for internships, apprenticeships  and other opportunities that may lead
to employment in the region.
(d) Address academic requirements and regulatory barriers that  inhibit successful movement of
students in career and technical education from high schools to post-secondary school programs  and
the workforce.
(e) Implement accelerated college credit programs  that allow students to move seamlessly from
public schools to post-secondary education or training to the workforce.
(f) Increase  professional development opportunities for teachers and learning opportunities for
students through industry mentorships, internships, summer programs, after-school programs and
career-based student leadership opportunities.
(g) Establish partnerships between public and private entities for the  purpose of educating stu-
dents, parents, teachers, school advisors, policymakers and the general  public about the benefits and
opportunities related to career and technical education.
(3) The agencies identified in subsection (1) of this section shall make a joint  report by Decem-
ber 31 of each year to the appropriate legislative committees concerning  progress on the develop-
ment and implementation of the goals described in subsection (2) of this section and  may submit
[46]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
recommendations for legislation that will promote opportunities related  to career and technical ed-
ucation.
SECTION 71.
 ORS 353.606 is amended to read:
353.606. (1) There is created the Oregon Nursing Shortage Coalition Committee.
(2) The committee consists of 10 members, as follows:
(a) Two members who represent the Oregon State Board of Nursing appointed by the board.
(b) Two members who  represent the Northwest Organization of Nurse Executives appointed by
the Oregon State Board of Nursing from  a list of persons submitted to the board by the Northwest
Organization of Nurse Executives.
(c) Two members who represent the Oregon Nurses  Association appointed by the Oregon State
Board of Nursing from a list of persons submitted to the board by the Oregon Nurses Association.
(d) One member appointed by the Oregon State Board of Nursing who  represents Oregon-based,
generally accredited, not-for-profit private  institutions of higher education from a list of persons
submitted to the board by the Oregon Independent Colleges Association.
(e) Two members appointed  by the Director of the Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce
Development] from a list  of persons submitted to the director by the Oregon Community College
Association.
(f) One member who represents Oregon Health and  Science University appointed by the uni-
versity.
(3) When appointing  members to the committee, the Oregon State Board of Nursing, the Director
of the Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] and Oregon Health  and Science
University shall ensure that there  is at least one member from each of the following areas of the
state:
(a) Rural western Oregon.
(b) Coastal Oregon.
(c) Eastern Oregon.
(d) Urban areas.
(4) The term of office of each member is four years, but a member serves  at the pleasure of the
appointing authority. Before the expiration of  the term of a member, the appointing authority shall
appoint a  successor whose term begins on July 1 next following. A member is eligible for reap-
pointment. If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appointment
to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(5) The committee shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson and another  to serve
as vice chairperson, for the terms and with the duties  and powers necessary for the performance
of the functions of such offices as the committee determines.
(6) The committee shall meet at times and places specified by the call  of the chairperson or of
a majority of the members of the committee.
(7) A majority of  the members of the committee constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business.
(8) Members of the committee are entitled to actual  and necessary travel expenses in the man-
ner and amounts provided for in ORS 292.495. Claims for expenses incurred in  performing functions
of the committee shall be paid out of funds received by Oregon Health  and Science University for
that purpose.
(9) Oregon Health and Science University shall provide staff support to the committee.
SECTION 72.
 ORS 408.506 is amended to read:
[47]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
408.506. The Department of Human  Services, the Department of Transportation, the Housing and
Community Services Department, the  Employment Department, the Department of Justice, the Ju-
dicial Department, public universities listed in ORS 352.002, the Bureau of Labor and  Industries, the
Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ] and the Department of Veterans’ Affairs
shall partner with the Oregon Military Department  to provide reintegration services for veterans
throughout this state through regional strategies.
SECTION 73.
 ORS 413.600 is amended to read:
413.600. (1) There is established within the Oregon  Health Authority the Traditional Health
Workers Commission.
(2) The  Director of the Oregon Health Authority shall appoint the following 24 members to serve
on the commission:
(a) Fourteen members, of which a majority must be appointed from nominees selected by  the
Oregon Community Health  Workers Association, who represent traditional health workers, including
at least one member to represent each of the following:
(A) Community health workers, as defined in ORS 414.025;
(B) Personal health navigators, as defined in ORS 414.025;
(C) Peer wellness specialists, as defined in ORS 414.025;
(D) Peer support specialists, as defined in ORS 414.025;
(E) Doulas;
(F) Family support specialists, as defined in ORS 414.025;
(G) Youth support specialists, as defined in ORS 414.025; and
(H) Tribal traditional health workers, as defined in ORS 414.025;
(b) One member who represents the Office of Community  Colleges [ and Workforce
Development];
(c) One member who is a nurse who represents the Oregon Nurses Association;
(d) One member who is a physician licensed in this state;
(e) One member selected from nominees provided by the Home Care Commission;
(f) One member who represents coordinated care organizations;
(g) One member who represents a labor organization;
(h) One member who supervises traditional health workers  at a community-based organization,
local health department, as defined in ORS 433.235, or agency, as defined in ORS 183.310;
(i) One member who represents community-based organizations or agencies, as  defined in ORS
183.310, that provide for the training of traditional health workers;
(j) One member who represents a consumer of services provided by  health workers who are not
licensed by this state; and
(k) One member who represents providers of Indian  health services that work with traditional
health workers qualified under ORS 414.665, a federally recognized tribe or a tribal organization.
(3) In appointing members under subsection (2) of this section, the director  shall consider
whether the composition of the  Traditional Health Workers Commission represents the geographic,
ethnic, gender, racial, disability status, gender  identity, sexual orientation and economic diversity
of traditional health workers.
(4) The term of office of each member of the commission is three years, but a member  serves
at the pleasure of the director. Before the expiration  of the term of a member, the director shall
appoint a successor whose term begins on  January 1 next following. A member is eligible for re-
appointment. If there is a vacancy  for any cause, the director shall make an appointment to become
[48]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(5) A majority of the members of the commission constitutes a  quorum for the transaction of
business.
(6) Official action by the commission requires the approval of a majority of the  members of the
commission.
(7) The commission shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) The commission shall  meet at times and places specified by the call of the chairperson or
of a majority of the members of the commission.
(9) The commission may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the commission.
(10) A member of the commission is entitled  to compensation and expenses as provided in ORS
292.495.
SECTION 74.
 ORS 417.799 is amended to read:
417.799. (1) The Department of Human Services is responsible  for coordinating statewide plan-
ning for delivery of services to runaway and homeless youth and their families.
(2) The department  shall recommend policies that integrate a system of services and support for
runaway and homeless youth into the state’s continuum of care for children who are 0 through  17
years of age. The department shall recommend policies for a system of services and  support for
youth who are 18 through 20 years of age and who continue to be or who become homeless.
(3) The department may work with the Youth  Development Division, the Employment Depart-
ment, the Housing and Community Services Department, the Office  of Community Colleges [ and
Workforce Development ], the Office of Workforce Development,  the  Department of Education and
the Oregon Youth Authority to develop  a comprehensive and coordinated approach for services and
support for runaway and homeless youth and their families, including youth who  are 18 through 20
years of age and who continue to be or who become homeless.
(4) In addition to the entities listed  in subsection (3) of this section, the department shall include
representatives of youth, nonprofit organizations and statewide coalitions related  to runaway and
homeless youth services and supports, including services and supports for youth who are 18  through
20 years of age and who continue  to be or who become homeless, in the joint process described in
subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The department  may enter into and renew contracts with providers for the provision of ser-
vices to runaway and homeless youth and their families,  including services to youth who are 18
through 20 years of age and who continue to be or who become homeless.
(6) The department shall appoint an advisory committee to advise the department with respect
to policies and procedures to coordinate statewide planning for  delivery of services to runaway and
homeless youth and their  families. The advisory committee shall meet with and advise the depart-
ment on a regular basis, provide the department with information regarding the  status of existing
services and make recommendations for improvements and additional services. The department  shall
include as members of the advisory committee stakeholders with expertise in housing, mental health
and addictions, sex trafficking, child welfare and law enforcement.
(7) The department shall report annually on or before September 15 of each  year to the interim
legislative committees on child welfare  regarding the status of the system of services and support
for runaway and homeless youth developed by  the department, and the advice and information pro-
vided by the advisory committee appointed by the department, pursuant to this section.
SECTION 75.
 ORS 421.084 is amended to read:
421.084. (1) The Administrator of Correctional  Education shall administer an adult basic skills
[49]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
development  program  for all individuals in the custody of the Department of Corrections. The pro-
gram shall:
(a) Test individuals for basic reading and mathematics skills  or, for individuals with limited
English language  proficiency, English speaking skills. Testing for basic intelligence, learning disa-
bilities, developmental disabilities and adaptive behavior skills shall be administered  as needed ex-
cept that the administrator may accept equivalent test results from other sources.
(b) Except as  provided in subsection (2) of this section, be mandatory for all individuals testing
below a 8.0 grade  equivalency on a standardized reading test approved by the National Reporting
System for Adult  Education of the United States Department of Education and by the Adult Basic
Skills Program of the Office of Community Colleges [ and Workforce Development ].
(c) Provide progress testing and certification.
(d) Provide strong incentives for entering the program and for  achieving the minimum reading
level and, for those individuals with demonstrated ability, provide incentives for making  progress
toward earning a certificate for passing an approved high school equivalency test such  as the Gen-
eral Educational Development (GED) test.
(e) Maintain records of an individual’s achievement  in the program and make those records
available to the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision.
(2) Testing for basic skills and participation in the adult basic skills  development program are
not required for adults in custody:
(a) Sentenced to or otherwise confined by the department for less than one year;
(b) Sentenced to life imprisonment without parole;
(c) Sentenced to death;
(d) With developmental disabilities; or
(e) Who are specifically exempted by the Department of  Corrections for security or health rea-
sons.
SECTION 76.
 ORS 350.432 is amended to read:
350.432. (1) As used in this section, “public institution of higher  education” has the meaning
given that term in ORS 350.350.
(2)(a) Each public institution of higher education must have the same developmental  educational
requirements and require the same placement tests for each subject area for:
(A) An  incoming student who has completed high school and who the institution determines is
college ready; and
(B) An incoming student who has:
(i) Received a certificate for passing an approved high school equivalency test  such as the
General Educational Development (GED) test as provided in ORS 350.175; and
(ii) Received a grade indicating that the student is college ready.
(b) A student shall be considered college ready in  a subject area in which the student has re-
ceived a score designated “GED College Ready” on a General Educational Development (GED)  test
for which the Director of the Office of Community Colleges  [and Workforce Development ] has issued
a certificate under ORS 350.175.
(3) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may adopt rules to implement this section.
OREGON WORKFORCE CORPS
SECTION 77.
(1) Subject to the availability of funds, there is created the Oregon
[50]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Workforce Corps that shall provide  workforce development and employment programs. The
corps shall be headed by a program director  and shall be administered through the Bureau
of Labor and Industries.
(2) Upon implementation of subsection (1) of this section, there shall  be created the
Oregon Workforce Corps Advisory  Board to consist of nine members, three to be appointed
by the President of the Senate, three to be appointed by the Speaker of the House  of Rep-
resentatives and three public members to be appointed by the Governor.
(3) Board members may receive reimbursement of necessary and actual expenses  under
ORS 292.495 (2), but may not receive compensation under  ORS 292.495 (1) or otherwise for
participation as a board member.
(4) Board members may be removed by the appointing authority. Vacancies shall be filled
by the appointing authority. Board members shall serve for a term of three  years and may
be reappointed for an additional consecutive term.
(5) The advisory  board shall advise the program director on the implementation of
sections 77 to 79 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 78.
(1) In consultation with the Oregon Workforce  Corps Advisory Board and
the Director of the Office of Workforce Development, or the designee of the director, the
program director  of the Oregon Workforce Corps shall establish eligibility criteria for par-
ticipants in the corps’s workforce development and employment programs. The program di-
rector may not establish any criteria that would render the programs ineligible for federal
funds. Participants shall be lawful permanent residents of this state.
(2) The program director, in consultation with the  Director of the Office of Workforce
Development, or the designee of  the director, may take the following actions, including but
not limited to:
(a) Applying for and accepting grants or contributions of funds from any public or private
source;
(b) Making agreements with any local, state or federal agency to utilize  any service,
material or property of any such agency,  where the agreements are considered reasonable
and necessary; and
(c) Purchasing or  contracting for necessary private services, equipment, materials and
property, if needed to carry out the projects approved for and undertaken by the corps.
(3) The Bureau of Labor and Industries may adopt all necessary rules to carry  out the
purposes and objectives of the programs and to regulate the standards of conduct and  other
operating guidelines for program participants and other personnel.
(4) Program participants are exempt from:
(a) State Personnel Relations Law; and
(b) ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870.
SECTION 79.
(1) The programs established under  sections 77 to 79 of this 2025 Act shall
provide selected participants with paid workforce development and employment  opportu-
nities:
(a) In the areas of:
(A) Agriculture, fisheries and forestry;
(B) Natural resources sustainability; or
(C) Technology innovation.
(b) Of at least three but not more than 12 months’ duration.
[51]
HB 2708
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) To the extent practicable, the program director of the Oregon Workforce Corps  shall
enlist state and federal agencies, local government, nonprofit organizations and  private
businesses, and any combination  of such entities, to act as sponsors for programs adminis-
tered under sections  77 to 79 of this 2025 Act. Selection of sponsors shall be based on criteria
that include the following:
(a) The availability of other resources on a matching basis, including  contributions from
private sources, other federal, state  and local agencies, and moneys available through the
federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act;
(b) The provision of related educational and job training programs to participants, in-
cluding but not limited to school  and college coursework, training for approved high school
equivalency tests such as  the General Educational Development (GED) test, project-related
education and professional training; and
(c) Assurances that proposed projects will not displace existing employees or duplicate
existing private or government programs.
(3) In  consultation with the Oregon Workforce Corps Advisory Board, the program di-
rector shall make grants for programs administered under this section.
SECTION 80.
Notwithstanding the term of  office specified by section 77 of this 2025 Act,
of the members first appointed to the Oregon Workforce Corps Advisory Board:
(1) Three shall serve for a term ending June 30, 2027.
(2) Three shall serve for a term ending June 30, 2028.
(3) Three shall serve for a term ending June 30, 2029.
OPERATIVE DATE
SECTION 81.
The Director of the Office of Workforce Development may  be appointed
before the operative date specified in section 82 of this 2025 Act. The Bureau  of Labor and
Industries, the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, the Office  of Community Col-
leges and Workforce  Development and the Director of the Office of Workforce Development
may take any action before that date that is necessary to enable the bureau, the commission,
the office and the director to exercise, on and after the operative date  specified in section
82 of this 2025 Act, the duties,  functions and powers conferred on the bureau, the commis-
sion, the office and the  director by sections 1 to 10, 41, 42 and 77 to 80 of this 2025 Act and
the amendments to statutes by sections 11 to 40 and 43 to 76 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 82. Sections 1 to 10, 41, 42 and 77  to 80 of this 2025 Act and the amendments
to statutes by sections 11 to 40 and 43 to 76  of this 2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2026.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 83. The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 84. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
[52]
HB 2708
1
2
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[53]