Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall study the rates of recidivism
for persons convicted of drug enforcement misdemeanors. The commission  shall submit a
report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for  legis-
lation, to the interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to the judiciary no
later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3269