Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 181A.820 and 181A.822 to 181A.829,  when a person
is arrested for delivery or manufacture of a controlled substance, the  arresting officer shall
immediately notify federal immigration authorities.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 135.230 to 135.290, a person arrested for delivery or manufacture
of a controlled substance is not eligible for  any form of release, except as required by the
Oregon or United States Constitutions,  until the notification described in subsection (1) of
this section has occurred and federal  immigration authorities have confirmed that the per-
son does not need to be detained for violating federal immigration law.
(3) As used  in this section, “federal immigration authorities” means agents of the United
States Immigration and  Customs Enforcement, or a successor agency, who receive reports
of and investigate violations of federal immigration law.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3512