Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 58.375 is amended to read:
58.375. (1) In a professional corporation organized for the purpose of practicing medicine:
(a) Physicians who are licensed in this state to practice  medicine must hold the majority of each
class of shares that are entitled to vote.
(b) Physicians who are licensed in this state to  practice medicine must be a majority of the di-
rectors.
(c) All officers except the  secretary and treasurer, if any, must be physicians who are licensed
in this state to practice medicine. The same person may hold any two or more offices.
(d) Except as otherwise provided by law, the Oregon Medical Board may expressly  require that
physicians who are licensed in this state  to practice medicine hold more than a majority of each
class of shares that is entitled to vote.
(e) Except as otherwise provided by law, the Oregon Medical Board may expressly require  that
physicians who are licensed in this state to practice medicine be more  than a majority of the di-
rectors.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of  this subsection, a professional corporation
organized for the purpose of practicing medicine may not provide  in the professional
corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws,  or by means of a contract or other ar-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4389
HB 3574
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
rangement, for removing a director described in subsection (1)(b) of this section from  the
professional corporation’s board of directors,  or an officer described in subsection (1)(c) of
this section from  an office of the professional corporation, except by a majority vote of the
shareholders described in subsection (1)(a) of this section  or, as appropriate, a majority vote
of the directors described in subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(b) A professional corporation organized  for the purpose of practicing medicine may re-
move a director or officer by means other than a  majority vote of the shareholders described
in subsection (1)(a) of this section or a majority vote of the directors described in subsection
(1)(b) of this section if the director or officer that is subject to removal:
(A) Violated a duty of care, a duty  of loyalty or another fiduciary duty to the professional
corporation;
(B) Was the subject of a disciplinary proceeding  by the Oregon Medical Board that re-
sulted in a suspension or revocation of the director’s or officer’s license to  practice medicine
in this state; or
(C) Engaged in fraud, misfeasance or malfeasance  with respect to the director’s or
officer’s performance of duties for or on behalf of the professional corporation.
[(2)] (3) A professional corporation may be a  shareholder of a professional corporation organized
for the purpose of practicing medicine solely for the purpose of effecting a reorganization as  defined
in the Internal Revenue Code.
[(3)(a)] (4)(a)  The provisions of subsections (1) [ and (2)] to (3)  of this section do not apply to:
(A) A nonprofit corporation  that is organized under Oregon law to provide medical services to
migrant, rural, homeless or other  medically underserved populations under 42 U.S.C. 254b or 254c,
as in effect on January 1, 2018;
(B) A health center that is qualified under 42 U.S.C. 1396d(1)(2)(B), as in effect on  January 1,
2018, that operates in compliance with other applicable state or federal law; or
(C) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a for-profit or nonprofit business en-
tity that is incorporated or organized under the laws of this state, that provides the entirety of the
business entity’s medical services through one or more rural health clinics, as  defined in 42 U.S.C.
1395x, as in effect on January 1, 2018, and that operates in  compliance with state and federal laws
that apply to rural health clinics.
(b) A business entity is exempt under this subsection for a period of up to one  year after the
business entity establishes a rural health clinic, even  though the rural health clinic that the busi-
ness entity establishes does not meet all of the elements of the definition set  forth in 42 U.S.C.
1395x, as in effect on January 1, 2018, if during the one-year period  an applicable certification for
the rural health clinic is pending.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 63.074 is amended to read:
63.074. (1) Except  as otherwise provided by the laws of the state and in this section, a limited
liability company formed under this chapter may conduct or promote any lawful business  or purpose
that a partnership, corporation or professional corporation as defined in ORS  58.015 may conduct
or promote, unless the articles of organization set forth a more limited purpose. A  person may not
organize a limited liability company under this chapter for any illegal purpose or  with an intent to
fraudulently conceal any business activity from another person or a governmental agency.
(2)(a) Subject to the laws of the state, the rules and regulations of a regulatory board of  a
profession,  if  any, and the standards of professional conduct of the profession, if any, a limited li-
ability company or members of the limited liability company  may render professional service in this
[2]
HB 3574
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
state.
(b) Notwithstanding  any other law, members of a limited liability company, including members
who are managers, and who are also professionals, as defined  in ORS 58.015, are personally liable
as members of the limited liability  company to the same extent and in the same manner as provided
for shareholders of  a professional corporation in ORS 58.185 and 58.187 and as otherwise provided
in this chapter.
(c) A limited liability company that is organized  for the purpose of practicing medicine,
or for the purpose of holding  or owning a majority of the shares of a professional corporation
that is organized  for the purpose of practicing medicine, must comply with the requirements
of ORS 58.375 with respect to  the limited liability’s company’s ownership, control and man-
agement and the qualifications of the limited liability  company’s members, directors and of-
ficers. For the purposes of this paragraph, a member of a limited  liability company organized
for the purpose of practicing medicine or for the purpose of holding or owning a majority of
the shares of a professional corporation that is organized  for the purpose of practicing
medicine is equivalent to a shareholder  in a professional corporation described in ORS 58.375
and the member’s rights and obligations in the  limited liability company are equivalent to a
shareholder’s rights and obligations in a professional corporation described in ORS 58.375.
(3) A business  that is subject to regulation under another statute of the state may not be or-
ganized under this chapter if the business is required to be organized only under the other statute.
SECTION 3.
Sections 4 and 5 of  this 2023 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 677.
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section and in section 5 of this 2023 Act:
(a) “Disciplinary action”  means discrimination, dismissal, demotion, transfer, reassign-
ment, supervisory reprimand, warning of possible dismissal or withholding of work,  whether
the action affects or will affect a licensee’s compensation.
(b) “Hospital” has the meaning given that term in ORS 442.015.
(c) “Management service organization”  means an entity that under a written agreement
and in return for compensation  provides to or on behalf of a licensee business management
services including, but not limited to, payroll, human resources, employment screening, em-
ployee relations and other similar or related services that do not constitute  the practice of
medicine.
(d) “Noncompetition agreement” means a written agreement between  a licensee and an-
other person under which  the licensee agrees that the licensee, either alone or as an em-
ployee, associate or affiliate of a third person, will not compete with the other person  in
providing products, processes  or services that are similar to the other person’s products,
processes or services for a period of time or within a  specified geographic area after termi-
nation of employment or termination of a contract under which the licensee supplied goods
to or performed services for the other person.
(e) “Nondisclosure agreement” means a written agreement under the terms of which a
licensee must refrain from disclosing partially, fully, directly  or indirectly to any person,
other than another party to the written agreement or to a person specified in  the agreement
as a third-party beneficiary of the agreement:
(A) A policy, practice, process or technique the  licensee used, or that a party to the
agreement required the licensee to use, in patient care, other than individually  identifiable
health information that the licensee may not disclose under the Health  Insurance Portability
[3]
HB 3574
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and Accountability  Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, as in effect on the effective date of this 2023
Act;
(B) A policy, practice or other information about  or associated with the licensee’s em-
ployment, conditions of employment or rate or amount of pay or other compensation; or
(C) Any other information the licensee possesses or to which  the licensee has access by
reason of the licensee’s employment by, or provision of  services for or on behalf of, a party
to the agreement, other than information that is subject to protection under applicable  law
as a trade secret of, or as otherwise proprietary to, another party to the  agreement or to a
person specified in the agreement as a third-party beneficiary of the agreement.
(f) “Nondisparagement agreement” means  a written agreement under which a licensee
must refrain from making to a third party  a statement about another party to the agree-
ment or about another person  specified in the agreement as a third-party beneficiary of the
agreement, the effect of which causes  or threatens to cause harm to the other party’s or
person’s reputation, business relations or other economic interests.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 653.295 (1) and (2),  and except as provided in paragraph (b)
of this subsection, a noncompetition agreement between a licensee and another person  is
void and unenforceable.
(b) A noncompetition  agreement that a licensee executes in connection with the
licensee’s sale, as owner, of at least 25 percent of a medical practice, or  a sale of all or
substantially all of the operating  assets of the medical practice, is enforceable to the extent
provided in ORS 653.295.
(3)(a) A nondisclosure agreement or nondisparagement  agreement between a licensee and
a hospital or a licensee and a management service organization is void and unenforceable.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not limit  or otherwise affect any cause of action
that:
(A) A party  to, or third-party beneficiary of, the agreement may have with respect to a
statement of a licensee that constitutes libel, slander, a tortious interference with contrac-
tual relations or another tort for which the party has  a cause of action against the licensee;
and
(B) Does not depend upon or derive from a breach or violation of an  agreement described
in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 5.
(1) A hospital,  a management service organization or a professional corpo-
ration organized for the purpose of  practicing medicine may not take disciplinary action
against a licensee as retaliation for, or as a consequence  of, the licensee’s violation of a
nondisclosure agreement or nondisparagement agreement  or because the licensee in good
faith disclosed or reported information  that the licensee believes is evidence of a violation
of a federal or state law, rule or regulation.
(2) A hospital, management service organization  or professional corporation that takes
disciplinary action against a licensee in the circumstances described  in subsection (1) of this
section engages in an unlawful employment practice, as defined in ORS 659A.001, that is
subject to enforcement under ORS chapter 659A.
SECTION 6.
Section 7 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 58.
SECTION 7. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Management service  organization” means an entity that under a written agreement
and in return for compensation  provides to or on behalf of a licensee business management
[4]
HB 3574
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
services including, but not limited to, payroll, human resources, employment screening, em-
ployee relations and other similar or related services that do not constitute  the practice of
medicine.
(b) “Professional corporation organized for the purpose of practicing  medicine” means a
professional corporation that meets the requirements set forth in ORS 58.375.
(2) A professional corporation organized for the purpose of practicing  medicine shall
disclose to the Oregon Health Authority the identity of, and a summary of  each written
contract, agreement or other arrangement the  professional corporation has with, each of the
following persons:
(a) A management service  organization that provides business services to the profes-
sional corporation;
(b) A person  that owns 10 percent or more of the outstanding shares of the professional
corporation or that under the articles of incorporation or bylaws  of the professional corpo-
ration or under a contract, agreement or other arrangement has the power  to manage or
exercise significant control over the operations and policies of the professional corporation;
(c) An insurer, as defined in ORS 731.106; or
(d) Any other  person that sells products or services to the professional corporation that
the professional corporation uses, recommends or sells to patients  to whom the professional
corporation provides health care services.
(3) The authority by rule  shall prescribe the form, format, contents and manner of the
disclosure required under this section. The rules may not require a professional corporation
organized for the  purpose of practicing medicine to summarize provisions of an agreement
that are trade secrets or the disclosure of which would jeopardize the  professional
corporation’s contractual relationships or competitive position in the market.
(4) The authority shall make the information that  a professional corporation discloses
under this section publicly available on the authority’s website.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 441.025 is amended to read:
441.025. (1)(a) Upon receipt of a license fee and an application to operate  a health care facility
other than a long term care facility, the  Oregon Health Authority shall review the application and
conduct an in-person site inspection of the health care facility. The authority  shall issue a license
if it finds  that the applicant and health care facility comply with ORS 441.015 to 441.087 and the
rules of the authority  provided that the authority does not receive within the time specified a cer-
tificate of noncompliance issued  by the State Fire Marshal, deputy, or approved authority pursuant
to ORS 479.215.
(b) The authority shall, following payment of the fee, annually renew  each license issued under
this subsection unless:
(A) The health care facility’s license has been suspended or revoked; or
(B) The State Fire Marshal, a deputy or an approved authority has issued a  certificate of non-
compliance pursuant to ORS 479.215.
(2)(a) Upon receipt of a license fee  and an application to operate a long term care facility, the
Department of Human Services shall review the application and conduct  an in-person site inspection
of the long term care facility, including  an inspection of the kitchen and other areas where food is
prepared for residents. The department shall issue a license if the department finds that  the appli-
cant and long term care facility comply with ORS 441.015 to  441.087 and the rules of the department
provided that it does not receive  within the time specified a certificate of noncompliance issued by
[5]
HB 3574
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the State Fire Marshal, deputy, or approved authority pursuant to ORS 479.215.
(b) The department shall, following an in-person site inspection and payment of  the fee, annually
renew each license issued under this subsection unless:
(A) The long term care facility’s license has been suspended or revoked;
(B) The long term care facility is found not to be in substantial  compliance, following the in-
person site inspection, with ORS 441.015 to 441.087 and 443.012 and the rules of the department;
(C) The long term care facility has failed an inspection of the kitchen or other  areas where food
is prepared for residents that was conducted by the department  in accordance with ORS 443.417,
except as provided in ORS 443.417 (2); or
(D) The State Fire Marshal, a  deputy or an approved authority has issued a certificate of non-
compliance pursuant to ORS 479.215.
(3) Each license shall be issued only for the premises and  persons or governmental units named
in the application and shall not be transferable or assignable.
(4) Licenses shall be  posted in a conspicuous place on the licensed premises as prescribed by
rule of the authority or the department.
(5) No license shall be issued or renewed for any health  care facility or health maintenance
organization that is required to  obtain a certificate of need under ORS 442.315 until a certificate
of need has been granted. An ambulatory surgical center is not subject  to the certificate of need
requirements in ORS 442.315.
(6) No license shall be issued or renewed for  any  hospital, as defined in ORS 442.015,  skilled
nursing facility or intermediate care facility, unless  the applicant has included in the application the
name and such other information as  may be necessary to establish the identity and financial inter-
ests of any person who has incidents of ownership  in the  hospital or  facility representing an in-
terest of 10 percent  or more thereof. If the person having such interest is a corporation, the name
of any stockholder holding stock representing an interest in the facility of  10 percent or more shall
also be  included in the application. If the person having such interest is any other entity, the name
of any member  thereof having incidents of ownership representing an interest of 10 percent or more
in the facility shall also be included in the application.
(7) A license may be denied to any applicant for a license or renewal  thereof or any stockholder
of any such applicant who has incidents of ownership in the health care facility representing an
interest of 10 percent or more thereof, or an interest of 10 percent or more of a lease agreement for
the facility, if during the five years prior to the application the applicant or any stockholder of  the
applicant had an interest of 10 percent or more in the facility or of a lease for the facility  and has
divested that interest after  receiving from the authority or the department written notice that the
authority or the department  intends to suspend or revoke the license or to decertify the facility from
eligibility to receive payments for services provided under this section.
(8) The Department of Human Services may not issue or renew a license  for a long term care
facility, unless the applicant has included in the application the  identity of any person who has in-
cident of ownership in the long term care facility who also has  a financial interest in any pharmacy,
as defined in ORS 689.005.
(9) The authority shall adopt rules for each type of health care facility, except long  term care
facilities, to carry out the purposes of ORS 441.015 to 441.087 including, but not limited to:
(a) Establishing classifications and descriptions for the different types of health care facilities
that are licensed under ORS 441.015 to 441.087; and
(b) Standards for patient care and safety,  adequate professional staff organizations, training of
[6]
HB 3574
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
staff for whom no other state  regulation exists, suitable delineation of professional privileges and
adequate staff analyses of clinical records.
(10) The  department shall adopt rules for each type of long term care facility to carry out the
purposes of ORS 441.015 to 441.087 including, but not limited to:
(a) Establishing classifications and descriptions  for the different types of long term care facili-
ties that are licensed under ORS 441.015 to 441.087;
(b) Standards for patient care and safety,  adequate professional staff organizations, training of
staff for whom no other state  regulation exists, suitable delineation of professional privileges and
adequate staff analyses of clinical records; and
(c) Rules to ensure that a long term care facility complies with ORS 443.012.
(11) The  authority or department may not adopt a rule requiring a health care facility to serve
a specific food as long as the necessary  nutritional food elements are present in the food that is
served.
(12) A health care facility licensed by the authority or department may not:
(a) Offer or provide services beyond  the scope of the license classification assigned by the au-
thority or department; or
(b) Assume a descriptive title or represent itself under a descriptive  title other than the classi-
fication assigned by the authority or department.
(13) A health care facility must  reapply for licensure to change the classification assigned or the
type of license issued by the authority or department.
(14) The authority  shall make available to the public on the authority’s website the in-
formation that an applicant  must submit under subsection (6) of this section as part of an
application to obtain or renew a license.
SECTION 9.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, sections 4,  5 and 7
of this 2023 Act and the amendments to  ORS 58.375, 63.074 and 441.025 by sections 1, 2 and
8 of this  2023 Act apply to contracts that a person enters into or renews on and after the
operative date specified in section 10 of this 2023 Act.
(2) A noncompetition agreement, nondisclosure agreement  or nondisparagement agree-
ment into which a licensee enters before, on or after the  operative date specified in section
10 of this 2023 Act may not be enforced.
SECTION 10. (1) Sections 4, 5 and 7 of this 2023 Act and the amendments to ORS  58.375,
63.074 and 441.025 by sections 1, 2 and 8 of this 2023 Act become  operative on January 1, 2024.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may adopt rules and take  any other action before the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the au-
thority, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this  section, to under-
take and exercise all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the authority by
sections 4, 5 and 7 of this 2023 Act and the amendments to ORS 58.375, 63.074 and  441.025 by
sections 1, 2 and 8 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 11.
This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[7]