Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 418.041 is amended to read:
418.041. (1) The Governor’s Child Foster Care Advisory Commission is established[ , consisting ].
(2) The commission consists  of [ 11] 13 members appointed by the Governor.
[(2)] (3) The term of office of each member of the commission is four years, but  a member serves
at the pleasure of the Governor. Before the expiration of the term of a member, the  Governor shall
appoint a successor whose term begins on July 1 next following. A member is eligible for  reap-
pointment. If there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make an appointment  to become
immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, if a member of the commission
is a representative of the Judicial Department, the Chief Justice of the Supreme  Court shall
appoint that member.
[(3)] (5) The appointment of  each member of the commission  who is appointed by the Governor
is subject to confirmation by the Senate in the manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
[(4)] (6)  A member of the  commission is entitled to compensation and expenses [ as provided in
ORS 292.495. ] in the manner and amounts  provided for in ORS 292.495. Claims for compen-
sation and expenses incurred in performing the functions  of the commission shall be paid out
of funds appropriated to the commission for that purpose.
SECTION 2.  ORS 418.043 is amended to read:
418.043. (1) The members of the Governor’s Child  Foster Care Advisory Commission must be
residents of this state with  experience and expertise in the foster care system in this state, including
but not limited to:
(a) Current or former  foster [ and biological ] parents and  current or former foster  children
[involved in the foster care system in this state ];
(b) Family members of individuals described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(c) Biological parents involved in the foster care system in this state;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1373
HB 2467
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
[(b)] (d) Representatives of advocacy organizations that advocate regarding issues pertaining  to
the foster care system in this state;
[(c)] (e) Representatives of public, private, profit and  nonprofit agencies, organizations and other
entities with experience in,  interest in and responsibility for the provision of care to children in the
foster care system in this state;
[(d)] (f)  Members of the Oregon State Bar with expertise in family and juvenile dependency law;
[(e)] (g)  Representatives of law enforcement agencies and district attorneys;
[(f)] (h)  Former  employees of the Department of Human Services, Oregon Health Authority and
Department of Justice who were responsible for the administration and oversight  of the child wel-
fare and foster care systems in this state, including but not  limited to former caseworkers and for-
mer court appointed special advocates;
[(g)] (i)  Representatives of the  Judicial Department [ in consultation with the Chief Justice of the
Supreme Court ]; and
[(h)] (j)  Representatives of federally recognized  Indian tribes in Oregon and organizations serv-
ing Native Americans.
(2) The members of the commission shall select one of  the commission’s members to serve as
chairperson and another to serve as vice chairperson,  for terms and with duties and powers neces-
sary for the performance of the functions of the offices as the commission determines.
(3) A majority of the members of the commission constitutes a  quorum for the transaction of
business.
(4) The commission shall meet at least once every three months  at a time and place determined
by the chairperson of the commission.  The commission also may meet at other times and places
specified by the call of the chairperson or of a majority of the members of the commission.
(5) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist the com-
mission in  the performance of the commission’s duties, powers and obligations and, to the extent
permitted by  laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information that the members of the com-
mission consider necessary in order to further the work of the commission. [ The assistance under this
subsection may constitute the provision of staffing resources to the commission. ]
(6) The Department of Human Services shall provide the commission with  the necessary
clerical and administrative staff support, including, at a minimum, one  full-time equivalent
(FTE) policy analyst.
SECTION 3.
There is appropriated to the Governor’s Child Foster Care Advisory Com-
mission, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of
$_______ for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of ORS 418.041.
[2]