Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Department of Emergency Manage-
ment, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of
$20,000,000 for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Department of Emergency Management shall  develop and
implement a program  to award grants for improvement of fairgrounds that are used as
emergency evacuation sites.
(2) Grants awarded under this section may  be used only for the purposes of improving
fairgrounds in Oregon that are  designated as emergency evacuation sites by a local govern-
ment, as defined in ORS 174.116.
(3) Grants awarded under this section must be used to construct or improve  fairground
infrastructure that is  essential for emergency needs, including power, water, telecommuni-
cations and sewer infrastructure.
(4) The department shall prescribe the form and process by which owners or  operators
of fairgrounds may apply for and be awarded grants under the program.
(5) The department  shall require recipients of grants under this section to report annu-
ally to the department on the progress of projects funded  by the grants until the projects
are completed.
(6) In awarding  grants under this section, the department shall seek to maximize the
overall emergency preparedness of communities that  have designated a fairground as an
emergency evacuation site.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1438