Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “cannabis” includes hemp and marijuana.
(2) The State Department of Agriculture shall advance the design of standards and iden-
tification of pilot sites for the implementation of a cannabis business certification program.
(3) The cannabis business certification program must:
(a) Promote market-based approaches that create incentives for cannabis  business oper-
ations to use low-carbon cultivation techniques that use energy and water efficiently; and
(b) Address energy, environmental and natural resource  issues associated with cannabis
business operations, including electrical grid disruption, water consumption, air  quality and
light, noise and odor pollution.
(4) The department may contract with a third-party  nonprofit organization that has
technical expertise in the measurement of  and best practices associated with energy and
water usage in cannabis businesses.
SECTION 2.
The Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall  allocate to the State Depart-
ment of Agriculture, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the Marijuana Control
and Regulation Fund established under ORS 475B.296, the  amount of $300,000 for the pur-
poses described in section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1632