Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 138.510 (3) and (4), at any time within one  year af-
ter the effective date of this 2022 Act, a  person may file a petition for post-conviction relief
under ORS 138.510 to 138.680 claiming,  as grounds for relief, that the person was convicted
of, or found guilty except for insanity  for, a criminal offense as the result of a nonunanimous
jury verdict.
(2) ORS 138.550 does not apply to petitions  for post-conviction relief described in this
section.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 138.530, in  a post-conviction relief proceeding based on a pe-
tition described in this section, the petitioner  has the burden of proving, by a preponderance
of the evidence, that the conviction or finding of guilty  except for insanity resulted from a
nonunanimous jury verdict.
(b) Evidence that a jury verdict was nonunanimous shall consist of:
(A) Court transcripts;
(B) Court or case records;
(C) Contemporaneous recordings; or
(D) Any similar evidence the court determines to be credible.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 138.530, in  a post-conviction relief proceeding based on a pe-
tition described in this section, if the court finds  that the petitioner has established by a
preponderance of  the evidence that a conviction or finding of guilty except for insanity re-
sulted from a nonunanimous jury verdict, the court shall grant post-conviction relief on  that
conviction or finding.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 138.520, if post-conviction relief  is granted under paragraph (a)
of this subsection, the court shall vacate the  specific judgment of conviction, or of guilty
except for insanity, that resulted from the nonunanimous jury verdict.
(5) If a  judgment of conviction or of guilty except for insanity is vacated under subsection
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 98
SB 1511
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) of this section, and the  prosecuting attorney proceeds with either the same criminal
charges, or charges based on the same criminal episode as the original charges, upon con-
viction or finding of guilty  except for insanity of those charges, the petitioner shall receive
credit for time served under ORS 137.370. If the petitioner is convicted  of a different offense
based on the same criminal episode as  the original conviction, the court shall indicate in the
judgment that the new crime of conviction was committed as part of the same criminal epi-
sode as the original crime of conviction.
(6) The filing of a  petition for post-conviction relief described in this section does not
preclude or affect the filing of other concurrent or subsequent post-conviction relief petitions
claiming grounds for relief other than a conviction or finding of guilty  except for insanity
resulting from a nonunanimous jury verdict, if such petitions  are otherwise permitted to be
filed under ORS 138.510 to 138.680.
(7) Except as otherwise  provided in this section, all provisions of ORS 138.510 to 138.680
apply to petitions for post-conviction relief described in this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) Section 1 of this 2022 Act is repealed on January 1, 2025.
(2) The repeal of section 1 of this 2022 Act does not affect a  petition for post-conviction
relief described in section 1 of  this 2022 Act filed within one year of the effective date of this
2022 Act.
SECTION 3.  ORS 135.815 is amended to read:
135.815. (1) Except as otherwise  provided in ORS 135.855 and 135.873, the district attorney shall
disclose to a represented defendant the following material and information within the possession or
control of the district attorney:
(a) The names, addresses and telephone  numbers of persons whom the district attorney intends
to call as witnesses at any stage of the trial, together with their relevant written or recorded
statements or memoranda of any oral statements of such persons.
(b) Any written or recorded statements or memoranda  of any oral statements made by the de-
fendant, or made by a codefendant if the trial is to be a joint one.
(c) Any reports or statements  of experts, made in connection with the particular case, including
results of physical  or mental examinations and of scientific tests, experiments or comparisons which
the district attorney intends to offer in evidence at the trial.
(d) Any books, papers, documents, photographs or tangible objects:
(A) Which the district attorney intends to offer in evidence at the trial; or
(B) Which were obtained from or belong to the defendant.
(e) If actually known to the district attorney,  any record of prior criminal convictions of persons
whom the  district attorney intends to call as witnesses at the trial; and the district attorney shall
make a good faith effort to determine if such convictions have occurred.
(f) All prior convictions of the defendant known to the state that would affect the determination
of the defendant’s criminal history for  sentencing under rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Com-
mission.
(g) Any material or information that tends to:
(A) Exculpate the defendant;
(B) Negate or mitigate the defendant’s guilt or punishment; or
(C) Impeach a person the district attorney intends to call as a witness at the trial.
(2)(a) The disclosure required by subsection (1)(g) of this section:
(A) Shall occur regardless of whether the material or information is recorded or in writing.
[2]
SB 1511
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Shall  occur without delay in accordance with ORS 135.845 and prior to the entry of any
guilty plea pursuant to an agreement with the state. If the existence of the material or information
is not known at that time, the disclosure shall be made upon discovery without regard to  whether
the represented defendant has entered or agreed to enter a guilty plea.
(b) Nothing in subsection (1)(g) of this section:
(A) Expands any obligation under a statutory  provision or the Oregon or United States Consti-
tution to disclose, or right  to disclosure of, personnel or internal affairs files of law enforcement
officers.
(B) Imposes any obligation  on the district attorney to provide material or information beyond
the obligation imposed by the Oregon and United States Constitutions.
(3) Except as otherwise provided  in ORS 135.855 and 135.873, in prosecutions for violation of
ORS 813.010 in which an  instrument was used to test a person’s breath, blood or urine to determine
the alcoholic  content of the person’s blood the district attorney shall disclose to a represented de-
fendant at least  the following material and information within the possession or control of the dis-
trict  attorney:
(a) Any report prepared by  a police officer relating to field tests, interviews, observations and
other information relating to the charged offense;
(b) Any report relating to the test results;
(c) A copy of the form provided to the defendant under ORS 813.100 (2)(b); and
(d) Any checklist prepared by the operator of the instrument for the test.
(4)(a) If a defendant  is not represented by a lawyer, the district attorney shall disclose to the
defendant all  of the information described in subsections (1) and (3) of this section except for the
personal identifiers of the victim and any witnesses.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)  of this subsection, the district attorney shall disclose the
personal identifiers of the victim and any witnesses if the trial court orders the disclosure. A trial
court  shall  order the district attorney to disclose the personal identifiers of the victim and any
witnesses if the trial court finds that:
(A) The defendant has requested the information; and
(B)(i) The victim or witness is a business or institution and disclosure of the information would
not represent a risk of harm to the victim or witness; or
(ii) The need for the information cannot reasonably be met by other means.
(5) The district attorney may charge a reasonable reimbursement fee for the cost of
providing copies of materials required to  be disclosed under this section, including but not
limited to documents,  photographs, reports, audio recordings, video recordings or electron-
ically stored information.
[(5)(a)] (6)(a)  Unless authorized by the trial court to disclose the information, a lawyer repre-
senting a defendant, or a representative of the lawyer, may not disclose  to the defendant personal
identifiers of a victim or witness obtained under subsections (1) and (3) of this section.
(b) The trial court shall order the lawyer, or representative of the lawyer,  to disclose to the
defendant the personal identifiers of a victim or witness if the court finds that:
(A) The defendant’s lawyer has requested the district attorney to disclose the  information to the
defendant;
(B) The district attorney has refused to disclose the information to the defendant; and
(C) The need for the information cannot reasonably be met by other means.
[(6)] (7) As used in this section:
[3]
SB 1511
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
(a) “Personal identifiers” means:
(A) In relation to a  witness, the witness’s address, telephone number, Social Security number
and date of birth and the identifying number  of the witness’s depository account at a financial in-
stitution, as defined in ORS 706.008, or credit card account.
(B) In relation to a  victim, the victim’s address, electronic mail address, telephone number, So-
cial Security number, date of birth,  any user names or other identifying information associated with
the victim’s social media  accounts and the identifying number of the victim’s depository account at
a financial institution, as defined in ORS 706.008, or credit card account.
(b) “Representative of the lawyer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 40.225.
(c) “Represented defendant” means a defendant who  is represented by a lawyer in a criminal
action.
(d) “Social media” has the meaning given that term in ORS 659A.330.
SECTION 4.
This 2022 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2022
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]