Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 530.010 to
530.170.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “forest lands”:
(a) Means any lands, or interest in lands, that constitute a state forest or  a portion of
a state forest.
(b) Does not include lands that  are Common School Forest Lands or are described in ORS
530.450.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 530.010 and 530.050, the State Board  of Forestry shall convey
forest lands within a county to the county if:
(a) The  board of county commissioners of the county determines that conveyance of the
forest lands to the county would secure the greatest permanent value of  the forest lands to
the county; and
(b) The board of county commissioners requests that the State Board of Forestry convey
the forest lands to the county.
(3) Forest lands conveyed under this section are conveyed subject to:
(a) Any encumbrance allowed by the state under ORS 530.020;
(b) Any covenants of the state under ORS 530.130 or 530.147;
(c) Any easement under ORS 530.050; and
(d) Any lease agreement under ORS 530.055.
(4) Forest lands conveyed under this  section constitute county lands pursuant to ORS
chapter 275.
(5) The county shall pay all transaction  and closing costs related to a conveyance under
this section, including recording fees, escrow fees or the costs of title insurance.
(6) The county shall pay  to the state as consideration for the transfer not more than the
total of the following:
(a) Any purchase price or value received by the county from the  state when the state
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1348
SB 404
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
acquired the forest lands;
(b) Any costs to the state to partition the forest lands to achieve the transfer;
(c) Any expenses  incurred by the state in suits by the state to quiet title to the forest
lands; and
(d) Any transaction costs paid by the state.
(7) Funds received by  the state under subsection (6) of this section must be deposited in
the State Forestry Department Account.
(8) The Oregon Department of Administrative  Services shall assist the State Board of
Forestry with the conveyance of forest lands under this section.
SECTION 3.
Forest lands,  as defined in section 2 of this 2025 Act, that are conveyed un-
der section 2 of this 2025 Act are subject to the provisions of  ORS 527.610 to 527.770, 527.990
and 527.992.
[2]