Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Developmental disability” and “intellectual disability” have the meanings given those
terms in ORS 427.005.
(b) “Personal agent”  means a person employed by a support service brokerage who de-
livers case management services or person-centered  planning for individuals with intellectual
or developmental disabilities.
(c) “Person-centered planning” has the meaning given that term in ORS 427.101.
(d) “Service coordinator” means a person employed by a  community developmental disa-
bilities program described in ORS 430.620 who delivers case management services or person-
centered planning for individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities.
(e) “Support service brokerage” has the meaning given that term in ORS 427.101.
(2) No later than January 1, 2026, the Department of  Human Services shall adopt by rule
minimum staffing requirements to ensure that community developmental disabilities pro-
grams described in ORS 430.620 and support service brokerages are staffed  with sufficient
service coordinators and personal agents to meet the needs of the individuals they serve.
(3) The  staffing requirements adopted under this section shall ensure that, at all times,
a service coordinator or personal agent is assigned to serve no more than 30 individuals.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. The Department of Human Services may take any action before  the opera-
tive date specified in section 2 of this 2025 Act that is necessary to enable the  department
to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in  section 2 of this 2025 Act, all of the
duties, functions and powers conferred on the department by section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1999
SB 725
1
2
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]