Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 339.341 is amended to read:
339.341. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Cyberbullying” has the meaning given that term in ORS 339.351.
(b) “Harassment, intimidation or bullying” has the meaning given that term in ORS 339.351.
(c) “Suicidal behavior” includes:
(A) Self-directed, injurious behavior with an intent to die as a result of the behavior;
(B) Nonfatal, self-directed, potentially injurious behavior with an  intent to die as a result of the
behavior that may not result in injury; or
(C) Thinking about, considering or planning suicide.
(d) “Violence” means aggressive behavior with  the intention to cause, or an outcome that poses
a risk of causing, serious or lethal injury.
(2) The Department of Education shall establish and maintain the Statewide School Safety and
Prevention  System.
(3) The system required under this section shall consist of the following:
(a) Assistance to school districts  and education service districts in decreasing acts of
harassment, intimidation or bullying and acts of  cyberbullying through the implementation of effec-
tive prevention programs that:
(A) Incorporate evidenced-based, multitiered practices; and
(B) Support resiliency building and trauma-informed care practices.
(b) Assistance to school districts  and education service districts in decreasing youth suicidal
behavior through the implementation of  effective prevention programs and student wellness pro-
grams that focus on early identification and intervention  by school safety and prevention specialists,
as described in subsection (4) of this section, who:
(A) Provide training, outreach and technical assistance  related to youth suicidal behavior pre-
vention and wellness;
(B) Support coordination between schools  and health agencies, including public and private be-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1992
HB 2646
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
havioral health providers; and
(C) Support school districts and  education service districts in the establishment of suicidal be-
havior prevention programs.
(c)(A) An evidence-based program to train school employees on:
(i) Recognizing signs and symptoms  of a mental illness, psychiatric or psychological dis-
order, depression or substance use disorder;
(ii) Safely de-escalating a mental health or substance use disorder crisis;
(iii) Skills and resources for assisting students in crisis;
(iv) Available mental health and substance use disorder services and resources;
(v) When and how to refer  youth and their families to appropriate mental health or
substance use disorder services; and
(vi) Maintaining a youth’s privacy  and confidentiality in accordance with applicable fed-
eral and state privacy laws.
(B) The program must:
(i) Measure training outcomes  by assessing the knowledge of school employees before and
after the school employees participate in the program; and
(ii) Include in-person and online training by instructors who are certified by a  nationally
recognized behavioral health training  program to provide training related to mental health
or substance use disorders.
(C) The  department shall contract with a nonprofit organization that is nationally re-
cognized as an authority in training related to mental illness and substance use  disorder to
provide the training under the program.
[(c)] (d) Assistance to  school districts and education service districts in implementing a multi-
disciplinary student safety assessment system to identify, assess  and support students who present
a potential risk for violence to others. Multidisciplinary school safety  assessment teams shall be
made available to assist  each school district and education service district in assessing students who
are engaged in violence or who are posing a threat of violence to others. The teams shall:
(A) Assess potential danger and identify circumstances and risk factors that may increase  risk
for potential violence;
(B) Develop management and intervention plans in collaboration with community partners; and
(C) Connect students and families to community resources and supports.
[(d)] (e) Promotion and use of the statewide  school safety tip line established by ORS 339.329.
School safety and prevention specialists, as  described in subsection (4) of this section, shall work
collaboratively with the Oregon State Police to  support school districts and education service dis-
tricts in accessing and implementing the school safety tip line.
(4) The system required under this section shall be supported by  school safety and prevention
specialists  who:
(a) Serve regions of this state;
(b) Are cross-trained in safety assessments and in the prevention of youth suicide, of  acts of
bullying, intimidation or harassment and of acts of cyberbullying; and
(c) Provide or facilitate training, the development of programs and plans, the coordination  of
local teams and the provision  of ongoing consultation to regional partners, school districts and ed-
ucation service districts.
(5) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the Oregon Health  Authority and other
representatives of school districts, education service districts, school employees, human  services,
[2]
HB 2646
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mental health professionals and law enforcement agencies, shall adopt rules related to the  system
required under this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 339.343 is amended to read:
339.343. (1) This section shall be known and may be cited as Adi’s Act.
(2) In accordance  with rules adopted by the State Board of Education in consultation with the
Oregon Health Authority, each school district shall adopt a policy requiring a comprehensive dis-
trict plan on student suicide prevention for students in kindergarten through grade 12.
(3) A plan required under this section must include:
(a) Procedures relating to suicide prevention, intervention  and activities that reduce risk and
promote healing after a suicide;
(b) Identification of the school officials responsible for responding to reports of suicidal risk;
(c) For each school in  the school district, designation of a mental health point of contact
who has knowledge of appropriate services and resources related  to mental health or sub-
stance use and whose  duties are to coordinate and facilitate access for youth and their
families to those services and resources;
[(c)] (d) A procedure by which a person may request a school district to review the actions of
a school in responding to suicidal risk;
[(d)] (e) Methods to address the needs of high-risk groups, including:
(A) Youth bereaved by suicide;
(B) Youth with disabilities, mental illness or substance use disorders;
(C) Youth experiencing homelessness or out-of-home settings, such as foster care; and
(D) Lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer and other minority gender identities  and sexual
orientations;
[(e)] (f) A description of, and  materials for, any training to be provided to school employees as
part of the plan, which must include:
(A) When and how to refer  youth and their families to appropriate mental health services;
[and]
(B) Programs that can be completed through self-review of suitable suicide  prevention materials;
and
(C) The training program described in ORS 339.341 (3)(c); and
[(f)] (g) Any other requirement prescribed by the  State Board of Education by rule, based on
consultations with state and national suicide prevention organizations, suicide experts  and school-
based mental health providers, and based on reviews of national models.
(4) A school district may consult with state or national suicide prevention organizations,  the
Department of Education, school-based mental  health professionals, parents, guardians, school em-
ployees, students, administrators and  school board associations when developing the plan required
under this section.
(5) The plan required under this section:
(a) Must be written to ensure that a school employee acts only within the  authorization and
scope of the  employee’s credentials or licenses. Nothing in this section shall be construed as au-
thorizing or encouraging a school employee to diagnose or treat mental illness unless the  employee
is specifically licensed and employed to do so.
(b) Must be:
(A) Made available annually to the  community of the school district, including students of the
school district, parents and  guardians of students of the school district, and employees and volun-
[3]
HB 2646
1
2
3
4
5
teers of the school district.
(B) Readily available at the school district office and on the school district website, if applicable.
(6) A school district that does not comply  with the requirements of this section is considered to
be nonstandard under ORS 327.103.
[4]