Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Moderate income housing infrastructure. (1) The  Oregon Business Develop-
ment Department shall:
(a) Make loans to developers of moderate income housing to develop  infrastructure or
public improvements supporting the housing,  including transportation and utility improve-
ments or extensions.
(b) Provide grants to  local governments to create, improve or extend infrastructure,
utilities or public services to support the development of moderate income housing.
(2) Loans made under this section must have a term of 40 years.
(3) Proceeds received by the state for the repayment of loans  made under this section
must be deposited in the General Fund.
(4) As used in sections 1 to 4 of this 2023 Act,  “moderate income housing” means housing
subject to an affordability restriction as described in ORS 456.270 to 456.295 for a  term of no
less than 30 years for a household with income less  than or equal to 120 percent of and
greater than 60 percent of the area median income.
SECTION 2.
Land and predevelopment costs for moderate income housing. (1) The
Oregon Business Development Department  shall provide grants to one or more nonprofit
organizations.
(2) The nonprofit must use the grant to develop a revolving fund that  may be used only
to make loans for the acquisition of lands and the  predevelopment costs, including costs of
planning, design, engineering and permitting, to develop moderate income housing.
(3) The term of a loan made under this section may not exceed five years.
(4) The department and state  are not guarantors of any loan made by a nonprofit cor-
poration under this section.
(5) To be eligible for a grant under this section or section 3 of this 2023 Act,  a nonprofit
corporation must:
(a) Be exempt from income taxes under section  501(c)(3) or (4) of the Internal Revenue
Code; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2240
HB 2981
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
(b) Demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the  corporation is a commu-
nity development financial institution that operates statewide to support  investment in the
construction of affordable housing.
SECTION 3.
Moderate income housing construction loan  guarantee funds. (1) The Oregon
Business Development Department shall provide grants to one or more  nonprofit organiza-
tions to develop a fund.
(2) The moneys in the fund may be used only to guarantee the  repayment of loans to fi-
nance the construction of moderate income housing.
(3) The term of a loan guaranteed under this section may not exceed five years.
(4) The department and the state are not guarantors of any loan guaranteed by a
nonprofit corporation under this section.
SECTION 4.
Factory-built housing production capacity. (1) The  Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department shall provide grants and loans to entities to begin or expand  production
capacity for the development of modular housing and components to support home builders
and developers in meeting housing demand.
(2) The department shall establish a temporary advisory committee under ORS 285A.060
to advise the department on providing grants and loans under this section.
(3) The department  shall establish the terms for any loans under this section. Proceeds
from loans must be deposited in the General Fund.
(4) Entities receiving loans or grants under this section must agree  to terms established
by the department requiring  that the entities prioritize supplying modular housing compo-
nents to meet demand from:
(a) First, state and local governments following a wildfire or other disaster;
(b) Second, low income housing construction in this state; and
(c) Third, moderate income housing construction in this state.
SECTION 5.
Sunset. Sections 1 to 4 of this 2023 Act are repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 6. Appropriations. In addition to and not in lieu  of any other appropriation,
there is appropriated to the Oregon Business Development Department,  for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of:
(1) $20,000,000 to make loans and grants  to support moderate income housing
infrastructure under section 1 of this 2023 Act.
(2) $20,000,000 to provide grants to support land and predevelopment costs  for moderate
income housing under section 2 of this 2023 Act.
(3) $20,000,000 to provide grants for moderate  income housing guarantee funds under
section 3 of this 2023 Act.
(4) $20,000,000 to make loans and grants to entities to develop modular housing  compo-
nent capacity under section 4 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 7. Captions. The section captions used in  this 2023 Act are provided only for
the convenience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory  law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 8. Effective date. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on
which the 2023 regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]