Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 1 to 17 of this 2025 Act shall be known and may be cited as the
Oregon Partnership for Resilience Act.
SECTION 2. As used in the Oregon Partnership for Resilience Act:
(1) “Partnership”  means the Oregon Partnership for Resilience, a public corporation es-
tablished under section 3 of this 2025 Act.
(2) “Public corporation”  means an entity that is created by the state to carry out public
missions and services by participating in activities or providing  services that are also par-
ticipated in or provided by private enterprise, and  which has operational flexibility while re-
taining principles of public accountability and fundamental public policy.
SECTION 3. The Oregon Partnership for Resilience  is established as a public corporation
and may exercise and carry out all powers, rights and privileges that  are expressly conferred
upon it, are implied by law or are incident to such powers, rights  and privileges. In carrying
out its powers, rights and privileges, the partnership is  a governmental entity performing
governmental functions and exercising  governmental powers. The partnership is an inde-
pendent public corporation with statewide purposes  and missions and without territorial
boundaries. The partnership is a governmental entity but  is not a unit of local or municipal
government or a state agency for purposes of state law.
SECTION 4. (1) The public policy of the Oregon Partnership for  Resilience is to enhance
the emergency preparedness of this state by seeking or creating innovative  technologies,
methods, organizational concepts or other means. The partnership may make full use  of the
power given to  it under the Oregon Partnership for Resilience Act to carry out any of the
following activities:
(a) Acquire any and all interests in property, real or personal,  necessary or convenient
to its mission.
(b) Enter into agreements with public or private entities for equipment, facilities  or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3809
HB 3629
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
technology necessary or convenient to enable public  or private entities within the state to
carry out emergency support functions, as described by the Federal Emergency  Management
Agency.
(c) Participate in intellectual property development activities,  independently or in col-
laboration with public or private entities, and  receive and expend revenues derived from such
activities.
(d) Receive funding from public or private sources  and expend such funding for general
partnership operations or for specific projects.
(e) Enter into collaborations for  project development with public universities, as defined
in ORS 352.002, or other private or public entities.
(2) The partnership shall  carry out its public purposes and missions in the manner that,
in the determination of the partnership, best promotes  the public welfare of the people of the
State of Oregon.
(3) The partnership does not have any regulatory  duties except as specifically provided
in the Oregon Partnership for Resilience Act.
SECTION 5.
The Oregon Partnership for Resilience  Act shall be liberally construed to
effect the  purposes and intent of the Act. If any provision of this Act, or the application of
that provision to  any particular circumstance or person, is held invalid, the remainder of this
Act, and the application  of that provision to circumstances or persons other than those to
which it is held invalid, are not affected thereby.
SECTION 6. (1) There is established a board of  directors of the Oregon Partnership for
Resilience consisting of five voting directors. The board consists of:
(a) The Director of the Oregon Department of Emergency Management;
(b) The Director of Human Services or designee;
(c) The Adjutant General; and
(d) Two individuals appointed by the Governor to represent the private sector.
(2) The term  of office of each director, except for those appointed ex officio, is four years.
Before the expiration of  the term of a director, the Governor shall appoint a successor whose
term begins upon the expiration of  the term of the predecessor. A director is eligible for
reappointment. If there is a vacancy or imminent vacancy  for any cause, the Governor shall
make an appointment, to become effective immediately, for the unexpired term.
(3) Directors must be citizens of the United States. No  director may be an employee of
the partnership. No director may be a member of the Legislative Assembly.
(4) The board shall select one of its members as chairperson and another as vice  chair-
person for such  terms and with such duties and powers as the board considers necessary for
performance of the functions of those offices.  The board shall adopt bylaws concerning its
operations and procedures, including how a quorum is be constituted  and when a quorum is
necessary.
(5) The board shall meet at least once every two months  at times and places specified
by the chairperson or by a majority of the members of the board.
(6) The Governor may remove a director, except for those appointed ex officio, at any
time for any cause.
(7) The following individuals shall serve as nonvoting advisors to the board of directors:
(a) The Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services or designee;
(b) The Director of the Oregon Business Development Department or designee;
[2]
HB 3629
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) The State Resilience Officer; and
(d) Any other individuals, as appointed by  the Governor, with expertise in emergency
preparedness, the military, public safety or resilience.
SECTION 7.
Except as otherwise provided in  the Oregon Partnership for Resilience Act,
the board of  directors of the Oregon Partnership for Resilience, and officials acting under
the authority of the board, shall  exercise all the powers of the partnership and shall govern
the partnership. The partnership may, within  or outside the state, carry out the following
activities:
(1) Establish policies for the organization, administration  and development of the part-
nership.
(2) Appoint and employ  administrative, professional, trade, occupational and other per-
sonnel as necessary  or appropriate to carry out the missions of the partnership, and pre-
scribe their compensation and terms of office or employment.
(3) Make contracts and agreements, enter into  any joint venture or other business ar-
rangement and create and participate fully in the operation of  any business structure with
any government, nonprofit or for-profit person or entity, whether public or  private, that in
the judgment of the partnership is necessary or appropriate to carry out  the partnership’s
missions and goals.
(4) Acquire, purchase, receive, hold, control, convey, sell, manage,  operate, lease, license,
lend, invest, improve, develop, use, dispose of and hold title to real and personal  property of
any nature, including intellectual property, in its own name.
(5) Sue in its own name and  be sued, plead and be impleaded in all actions, suits or pro-
ceedings in any forum brought by it or against it by any and all private or state, local, federal
or other public entities, agencies or persons.
(6) Encourage gifts and donations for the  benefit of the partnership, and subject to the
terms of the gift, retain, invest and use such gifts as deemed appropriate by  the partnership.
Gifts or donations may  not be used to benefit directors or employees of the partnership. The
intent of  the Legislative Assembly is to allow the partnership to receive gifts or donations
in the same fashion and nature as gifts or donations  to an organization that is tax exempt
under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(7) Acquire, receive, hold, keep, pledge,  control, convey, manage, use, lend, expend and
invest funds, appropriations, gifts, bequests, stock and revenue from any source.
(8) Borrow money for the needs of the partnership, in  such amounts and for such time
and upon such terms as may be determined by the partnership or the board.
(9) Erect,  construct, improve, develop, repair, maintain, equip, furnish, lease, lend, con-
vey, sell, manage, operate, use, dispose of and hold title to buildings, structures and lands.
(10) Purchase insurance, operate a self-insurance program or otherwise arrange  for the
equivalent of  insurance coverage of any nature and the indemnity and defense of its officers,
agents and employees or other persons designated by the partnership to carry out  or further
the missions of the partnership.
(11) Establish, charge, collect and use charges and fees  for partnership services and the
use of partnership facilities.
(12) Impose fines or fees as convenient or necessary to deter  illegal activity that may
hinder the mission or goals of the partnership.
(13) Enforce and recover for payment to the partnership any charges, fines or fees.
[3]
HB 3629
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(14) Adopt,  amend or repeal bylaws, policies and standards as convenient or necessary
to carry out the mission of the partnership.
(15) Contract with  any state agency for the performance of such duties, functions and
powers as is appropriate. A state agency may  not charge the partnership for such services
an amount that is greater than the actual cost of the services.
(16) Make available, by lease or otherwise, or control access to, partnership facilities or
services or other of its properties  or assets on such terms as considered appropriate by the
partnership, charge and collect rent or other fees or charges for such availability or access,
and terminate or deny any such availability or access for any reason.
(17) Contract for the operation of any department, section, equipment or holdings of  the
partnership and enter into any agreements with any  person for the management of any
partnership properties or for the more efficient  or economical performance of clerical, ac-
counting, administrative or other functions relating to the partnership.
(18) Interact, consult, and cooperate with any agency of the federal government.
(19) Perform any other acts that  in the judgment of the partnership are necessary or
appropriate in accomplishing the purposes described in or carrying out the powers granted
by the Oregon Partnership for Resilience Act.
SECTION 8.
The board of directors of the Oregon Partnership for Resilience shall appoint
a president of the partnership. The president is the  executive and governing officer of the
partnership. Subject to the supervision of the board, the president is authorized  to direct the
affairs of the partnership.
SECTION 9. The president of the Oregon Partnership for Resilience shall file with the
Legislative Assembly and the Governor, not later than April 15 of each year, a report de-
scribing the partnership’s activities and operations during the preceding calendar  year and
its plans for the upcoming calendar year, including its priorities, projects,  accomplishments,
failures and successes.
SECTION 10.
(1) The provisions of ORS chapters 190, 192,  244 and 295 and ORS 30.260 to
30.460, 236.605 to 236.640, 243.650 to 243.809, 297.040, 307.090 and 307.112 apply to the Oregon
Partnership for Resilience  to the same extent and on the same terms that they apply to
public bodies other than the state.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the provisions of ORS chapter 35
apply to the partnership  to the same extent and on the same terms that they apply to public
bodies other than the state.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, the provisions of ORS  chapters 182, 183, 240, 270,
273, 276, 279A, 279B, 279C, 282, 283, 291, 292, 293, 294 and 297 and ORS 35.550 to  35.575, 180.060,
180.210 to 180.235, 183.710 to 183.730, 183.745, 183.750, 190.430, 190.480 to  190.490, 192.105,
200.035, 243.105 to 243.585, 243.696, 278.011 to 278.120, 279.835 to 279.855, 283.085  to 283.092,
357.805 to 357.895 and 656.017 (2) do not apply to the partnership.
(4) The partnership is  not subject to any provision of law enacted after the effective date
of this 2025 Act with respect to any governmental entity,  unless the provision specifically
provides that it applies to the partnership.
SECTION 11. The Oregon Partnership  for Resilience may acquire, by condemnation or
otherwise, private property that is necessary or convenient in carrying out  any power
granted to the partnership. The right to acquire property by  condemnation shall be exercised
as provided by ORS chapter 35.
[4]
HB 3629
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 12.
(1) By September 1 of each even-numbered year  the Oregon Partnership for
Resilience shall submit to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services a funding re-
quest for each biennium. The department shall include and submit  the partnership’s request
to the Legislative Assembly as part of  the Governor’s biennial budget required under ORS
291.202. Any such  request approved by the Legislative Assembly shall be appropriated to the
department for direct allocation to  the partnership. The legislatively appropriated funds are
subject to any restrictions or  conditions imposed by the Legislative Assembly, but such
conditions and restrictions do  not apply to other funds in the partnership’s budget and op-
erations.
(2) The partnership budget shall  be prepared in accordance with generally accepted ac-
counting principles and adopted by the board of directors of the partnership  in accordance
with ORS 192.610 to 192.705.
SECTION 13. The Oregon Partnership for Resilience may conduct independent audits if
considered advisable by the partnership. The partnership shall file any completed audits with
the Division of Audits of the  Secretary of State. Such audits are subject to disclosure pur-
suant to ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
SECTION 14. (1) The Oregon  Partnership for Resilience shall adopt policies governing
access to personnel records of the partnership that are less than 25 years old.
(2) Policies adopted under subsection (1) of this section must require that access  to per-
sonnel records  be restricted unless the president of the partnership finds that the public in-
terest in maintaining individual rights to privacy  would not suffer from disclosure of such
records. Access to such records may be limited to  designated classes of information or per-
sons, or to stated times and conditions, or both.
(3) The partnership may not limit access to personnel records that are  more than 25
years old.
(4) The partnership may  not limit access by an employee to the employee’s personnel file
or records kept by the partnership.
SECTION 15. (1) The Oregon Partnership for Resilience may authorize any officer  or
employee of the partnership to receive compensation from private or public resources, in-
cluding compensation for:
(a) Consulting;
(b) Appearances and speeches;
(c) Intellectual property conceived,  reduced to practice or originated within and therefore
owned by the partnership;
(d) Providing services or other  valuable consideration to a private entity, whether paid
in cash, stock or other  equity interest, or anything else of value regardless of whether there
is a licensing agreement between the partnership and the private entity; and
(e) Performing public duties  paid by private organizations, including corporate affiliates
of the partnership, that augment an officer’s or employee’s salary.
(2) The partnership may  not authorize compensation under this section if, in the
partnership’s judgment, the compensation or the activities  compensated do not comport with
the missions of  the partnership or substantially interfere with an officer’s or employee’s
duties to the partnership.
(3) Any compensation authorized under this  section is considered official compensation
or reimbursement of expenses for purposes  of ORS 244.040 and is not considered an
[5]
HB 3629
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
honorarium prohibited by ORS 244.042. If authorization  or receipt of the compensation cre-
ates a potential conflict of interest, the officer or employee  shall report the potential conflict
in writing in accordance with policies  adopted by the partnership. The disclosure is a public
record subject to public inspection.
(4) The partnership shall adopt  standards governing outside employment and activities
of employees,  including actual or potential conflicts of interest, as defined in ORS 244.020,
and the public disclosure thereof, and  procedures for reporting and hearing complaints re-
garding potential or actual conflicts of interest.
SECTION 16.
No political or sectarian test may be allowed or applied  in the appointment
of employees of the Oregon Partnership for Resilience.
SECTION 17. Nothing in the Oregon Partnership for Resilience Act may be construed  to
impair in any way the obligations or agreements of the  State of Oregon or any other public
body with respect to bonds, certificates  of participation, financing agreements or other
agreements for the borrowing of money issued prior to the effective date  of this 2025 Act by
the State of Oregon or  any other public body. The Oregon Partnership for Resilience shall
take all actions  necessary to ensure full compliance with all indentures, resolutions, decla-
rations, agreements and other documents issued with respect to the bonds, certificates of
participation, financing agreements or other agreements for the borrowing of money issued
prior to the effective date of this 2025 Act by the  State of Oregon or any other public body.
The partnership shall establish, in a written agreement that is subject to the approval of the
State Treasurer, the responsibility of the partnership  for the payment of moneys sufficient
to pay when due all principal, interest and any other  charges on bonds, certificates of par-
ticipation, financing agreements or other  agreements for the borrowing of money issued
prior to the  effective date of this 2025 Act by the State of Oregon or any other public body
for purposes related to the mission of the partnership.
[6]