Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Parks and Recreation Department, for the biennium  beginning on July 1,
2021, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $ , to complete development of the
Oregon Coast Trail.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2087