Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 676.185 is amended to read:
676.185. As used in ORS 676.185 to 676.200:
(1) “Direct supervisor” means the individual who is responsible for:
(a) Supervising a licensee enrolled in the impaired health professional program;
(b) Monitoring the licensee’s compliance with the requirements of the impaired health profes-
sional program; and
(c) Periodically reporting to the impaired health professional program on the licensee’s  com-
pliance with the requirements of the program.
(2) “Health profession licensing board” means:
(a) A health professional regulatory board as defined in ORS 676.160; or
(b) The Health Licensing Office for a board or council listed in ORS 676.583.
[(3) “Impaired professional” means a licensee who  is unable to practice with professional skill and
safety by reason of habitual or excessive use or abuse of drugs, alcohol or other  substances that impair
ability or by reason of a mental health disorder. ]
[(4)] (3) “Licensee” means a health professional licensed or  certified by or registered with a
health profession licensing board.
(4) “Physical  health condition” means a medical condition, chronic or otherwise, that the
Oregon Health Authority deems  appropriate for inclusion in the impaired health professional
program.
(5) “Substantial noncompliance” includes the following:
(a) Criminal behavior;
(b) Conduct that causes injury, death or harm to the public, or  a patient, including sexual
impropriety with a patient;
(c) Impairment in a health care setting in the course of employment;
(d) A positive toxicology test  result as determined by federal regulations pertaining to drug
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2406
HB 2394
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
testing;
(e) Violation of a  restriction on a licensee’s practice imposed by the impaired health professional
program [ established under ORS 676.190 ] or the licensee’s health profession licensing board;
(f) Civil commitment for mental illness;
(g) Failure  to participate in the impaired health professional  program after entering into a
diversion agreement under ORS 676.190; or
(h) Failure to enroll in the impaired health professional  program after being referred to the
program.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 676.190, as amended by section 1, chapter 5, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended
to read:
676.190. (1) The health profession licensing boards may establish or contract to establish  an
impaired health professional program[ .] to assist licensees who are unable to practice with pro-
fessional skill and safety by reason of:
(a) Habitual or excessive use or abuse of drugs, alcohol  or other substances that impair
ability;
(b) A mental health disorder; or
(c) A physical health condition.
(2) [ A] An impaired health professional  program established or contracted for under this sec-
tion must:
(a) Enroll licensees of participating health profession licensing boards who have been :
(A) Diagnosed with alcohol or substance  abuse [ or], a mental health disorder or a physical
health condition; or
(B) Referred to the impaired health professional program  by a participating health pro-
fession licensing board for a conviction of driving under the influence  of intoxicants under
ORS 813.010 or 813.011, or another alcohol- or drug-related crime, but who have not been di-
agnosed with alcohol or substance  abuse, a mental health disorder or a physical health con-
dition;
(b) Require that a licensee sign a written  consent prior to enrollment in the impaired health
professional program allowing disclosure  and exchange of information between the program, the
licensee’s board, the licensee’s employer, evaluators and treatment entities in compliance with ORS
179.505 and 42 C.F.R. part 2;
(c) Enter into diversion agreements with enrolled licensees;
(d) If the enrolled licensee has a direct supervisor, assess the ability of the  direct supervisor to
supervise the licensee, including an assessment of  any documentation of the direct supervisor’s
completion of specialized training;
(e) Report substantial noncompliance  with a diversion agreement to a noncompliant licensee’s
board within one business day after the impaired health professional  program learns of the sub-
stantial noncompliance; and
(f) At least weekly, submit to licensees’ boards:
(A) A list of licensees who were  referred to the impaired health professional  program by a
health profession licensing board and who are enrolled in the program; and
(B) A list of licensees who were referred  to the impaired health professional  program by a
health profession licensing board and who successfully complete the program.
(3) The lists submitted under subsection (2)(f) of this  section are exempt from disclosure as a
public record under ORS 192.410 to 192.505.
[2]
HB 2394
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) When  the impaired health professional  program reports substantial noncompliance under
subsection (2)(e) of this section to a licensee’s board, the report must include:
(a) A description of the substantial noncompliance;
(b) A copy of a  report from the independent third party who diagnosed the licensee under ORS
676.200 (2)(a) or subsection (7)(a) of this section stating the licensee’s diagnosis;
(c) A copy of the licensee’s diversion agreement; and
(d) The licensee’s employment status.
(5) The impaired health professional program may not diagnose or treat licensees enrolled in
the program.
(6) The diversion agreement required by subsection (2) of this section must:
(a) Require the  licensee to consent to disclosure and exchange of information between the im-
paired health professional  program, the licensee’s board, the licensee’s employer, evaluators  and
treatment programs or providers, in compliance with ORS 179.505 and 42 C.F.R. part 2;
(b) Require , for successful completion  of the impaired health professional program,  that
the licensee comply continuously with the agreement for at least :
(A) Two years [ to successfully complete the program ], if the licensee is diagnosed with alcohol
or substance abuse, a mental health disorder or a physical health condition; or
(B) One year, if the licensee was  referred because of a conviction of driving under the
influence of intoxicants under ORS 813.010 or 813.011 or another alcohol-  or drug-related
crime;
(c) Require that the licensee abstain from mind-altering  or intoxicating substances or potentially
addictive drugs, unless the drug is:
(A) Prescribed for  a documented medical condition by a person authorized by law to prescribe
the drug to the licensee; and
(B) Approved by the impaired health professional program if the licensee’s board  has granted
the program that authority;
(d) Require the licensee to report use of mind-altering  or intoxicating substances or potentially
addictive drugs within 24 hours;
(e) Require the licensee to agree to participate in a recommended treatment plan;
(f) Contain limits on the licensee’s practice of the licensee’s health profession;
(g) Require the licensee to submit to random drug or  alcohol testing in accordance with federal
regulations, unless the licensee is diagnosed with solely a mental health disorder or a physical
health condition and the licensee’s board does not  otherwise require the licensee to submit to
random drug or alcohol testing;
(h) Require the licensee to report to the impaired health professional program regarding  the
licensee’s compliance with the agreement;
(i) Require the licensee to report any arrest for or  conviction of a misdemeanor or felony crime
to the impaired health professional  program within three business days after the licensee is  ar-
rested or convicted;
(j) Require the licensee to report applications for licensure in other states, changes in employ-
ment and changes in practice setting; and
(k) Provide that the licensee is responsible for the cost  of evaluations, toxicology testing and
treatment.
(7)(a) A health profession licensing board may  establish by rule an option to permit licensees
of the health profession licensing board to self-refer to the impaired health professional program.
[3]
HB 2394
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The  impaired health professional  program shall require a licensee  who self-refers to the
program to attest that the licensee is not, to the best of the licensee’s  knowledge, under investi-
gation by the licensee’s board. The impaired health professional program shall enroll the licensee
on the date on which the licensee attests that the licensee, to the best of the licensee’s  knowledge,
is not under investigation by the licensee’s board.
(c) When a licensee self-refers to the impaired health professional program, the  program shall:
(A) Require that an  independent third party approved by the licensee’s board to evaluate alcohol
or substance abuse or mental  health disorders evaluate the licensee for alcohol or substance abuse
or mental health disorders; and
(B) Investigate to determine whether  the licensee’s practice while impaired has presented or
presents a danger to the public.
(d) When a  licensee self-refers to the impaired health professional program, the program may
not report the licensee’s enrollment in  or successful completion of the program to the licensee’s
board.
(8) The  health profession licensing boards shall arrange for an independent third party to con-
duct an audit every four  years of an impaired health professional program for the licensees of those
health profession licensing boards  to ensure compliance with program guidelines. The health pro-
fession licensing boards shall report the  results of the audit to the Legislative Assembly in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245 and to the Governor. The  report may not contain individually
identifiable information about licensees.
(9) The health profession licensing boards, in consultation with  one another, may adopt rules to
carry out this section.
SECTION 3.  ORS 676.200 is amended to read:
676.200. (1)(a) A health profession licensing board that is authorized by law  to take disciplinary
action against licensees may adopt rules opting  to participate in the impaired health professional
program [ established under ORS 676.190 ] and may contract  with or designate one or more programs
to deliver therapeutic services to its licensees.
(b) A board may  not establish the board’s own impaired health professional program for the
purpose of monitoring licensees of the board that have been referred to the program.
(c) A  board may adopt rules establishing additional requirements for licensees referred to the
impaired health professional program [ established under ORS 676.190 ] or a  program with which the
board has entered into a contract or designated to  deliver therapeutic services under subsection (1)
of this section.
(2) If a board participates  in the impaired health professional program, the board shall establish
by rule a procedure for referring licensees to the  program. The procedure must provide that, before
the board refers a  licensee to the  impaired health professional  program, the board shall ensure
that:
(a) An independent third party approved by the board to evaluate alcohol or  substance abuse
or mental health disorders has diagnosed the licensee with  alcohol or substance abuse or a mental
health disorder and provided the diagnosis and treatment options to the licensee and the board;
(b) The board has investigated  to determine whether the licensee’s professional practice while
impaired has presented or presents a danger to the public; and
(c) The licensee has agreed to report any arrest for or  conviction of a misdemeanor or felony
crime to the board within three business days after the licensee is arrested or convicted.
(3) A board that participates  in the impaired health professional program shall review reports
[4]
HB 2394
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
received from the program. If the board finds that a licensee  is substantially noncompliant with a
diversion agreement entered  into under ORS 676.190, the board may suspend, restrict, modify or
revoke the licensee’s license or end the licensee’s participation in the impaired  health professional
program.
(4) A board may not discipline a licensee solely because the licensee:
(a) Self-refers to or participates in the impaired health professional program;
(b) Has been diagnosed with alcohol or substance abuse [ or], a mental health disorder  or  a
physical health condition; or
(c) Used controlled substances before entry into the impaired health professional  program, if the
licensee did not practice while impaired.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 675.583 is amended to read:
675.583. (1)  Unless state or federal laws relating to confidentiality or the protection of health
information prohibit disclosure, a regulated social worker shall report to the State Board  of Li-
censed Social Workers any information the  regulated social worker has that appears to show that
a regulated social worker [ is or may be an impaired professional as defined  in ORS 676.185, or ] may
have engaged in unprofessional conduct according to the guidelines of the code  of ethics, to the
extent that disclosure does not conflict with the requirements of ORS 675.580.
(2) A regulated social worker shall report any prohibited conduct  as defined in ORS 676.150 in
the manner provided in ORS 676.150.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS  676.175, any information that the board obtains pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section is confidential and may not be disclosed except as provided by the  board by rule.
(4) A person who reports or provides information  to the board under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion in good faith is not subject to an action for civil damages as a result  of reporting or providing
information to the board.
SECTION 5. (1) The amendments to  ORS 676.185, 676.190 and 676.200 by sections 1 to 3
of this 2017 Act become operative on January 1, 2018.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take any  action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1)  of this section that is necessary to enable the authority to exercise, on or
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the authority by the amendments to ORS 676.185, 676.190 and 676.200
by sections 1 to 3 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 6.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2017.
[5]