Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Treasurer shall study  State Treasury savings programs. The State
Treasurer shall submit a report on the findings in the manner provided by  ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim  committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to ways and means no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 264