Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
If the Legislative Assembly for  any biennium appropriates to the Depart-
ment of Corrections, for distribution to the Northern Oregon Regional Correctional  Facility,
at least $1,640,000, the  Northern Oregon Regional Correctional Facility may not renew or
renegotiate a contract, or negotiate a new contract,  with United States Immigration and
Customs Enforcement during that biennium.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 147