Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Forestry  Department shall study the establishment of a perma-
nent trust fund for  wildfire programs. The department shall submit a report in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and  may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to natural resources no later than September
15, 2024.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1818