Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 192.610 to
192.705.
SECTION 2. The governing body of a public body shall provide for a period of public
comment at the beginning of every public meeting, except for meetings described in  ORS
192.660. The public comment period shall be of reasonable duration.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1002