Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department  of Consumer and Business Services shall study the feasi-
bility of providing discounts on mortgage loans to home buyers who install renewable energy
generation systems, including photovoltaic cells and wind power generation facilities or
equipment, that are capable  of ensuring the homeowner’s energy security and providing
electricity to local  utilities for use in the utilities’ power grid. The department shall submit
a report, in the manner  provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for
legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to energy re-
sources no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2407