Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
A law enforcement agency, as defined in ORS 181A.010, shall designate a
police oversight board composed of public members with  diverse perspectives. The police
oversight board shall annually  review the policies of the law enforcement agency and report
to the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training on the review.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2369