Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made  a part of ORS chapter 197A.
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of Land Conservation and Development shall  award
grants to local governments for the purposes of infrastructure improvements, including for
transportation or water or sewer infrastructure, that  are necessary to support the develop-
ment of middle housing that the recipient  local government must allow under ORS 197A.420
(2) or (3).
(2) A local government is not required to allow middle  housing under ORS 197A.420 (2)
or (3) for lands for which a grant has been sought under this section from  the date that the
local government submits a grant application until the earlier of:
(a) The award of a grant to the local government under this section; or
(b) The repeal date of this section.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Land  Conservation and Development, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $50 million, to award grants under
section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1117