Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 4, chapter 50, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  (1) Section 2 [ of this 2024 Act ], chapter 50, Oregon Laws 2024,  applies to declarations
and executive orders issued on  or after January 1, 2018, and before January 1, [ 2026] 2028, and,
notwithstanding ORS 315.037, to amounts received in all tax years  beginning on or after January
1, 2018.
(2) Section 3 [ of this 2024 Act ], chapter 50, Oregon Laws 2024,  applies to:
(a) Declarations and executive orders issued on or after  January 1, 2018, and before January
1, 2026; and
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 315.037, losses incurred and legal fees paid or incurred  in all tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2018.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4824