Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2022 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 316.
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of Revenue shall attach to  the returns required to be
filed under this chapter a schedule that allows taxpayers to  provide to the department, at
the time of filing the return and on a voluntary basis, self-reported identification of the
taxpayer’s race and ethnicity.
(2) The data collection schedule required under subsection (1) of this section must:
(a) Allow each  taxpayer to select from the full list of demographic data categories of
racial or ethnic identity adopted as  uniform standards by the Oregon Health Authority pur-
suant to ORS 413.161.
(b) Allow each individual listed on a return to select one primary identifier and as many
as two additional identifiers.
(c) Provide that individuals filing a  joint return may each elect whether to indicate
identifiers on the schedule.
(d) Be accompanied by the statement that the collection of data is voluntary  and self-
reported and that the  department may not use the collected data for the purposes of audit,
collection or other enforcement activities.
(e) Be accompanied  by a statement explaining the purpose of collecting data for use in
racial justice related analysis of revenue policy.
(f) Be optional to complete, but provide that individuals shall  opt out of completion of the
schedule.
(3) The department shall establish policies and procedures to enable individuals who are
not required to  file an income tax return under this chapter for a given tax year to elect to
complete the schedule provided under this section without filing a return.
SECTION 3.
Sections 4 to 7 of this 2022 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 80
SB 1569
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
305.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Department of Revenue shall ensure that all data collected pursuant
to section 2 of this 2022 Act is used only for the purposes described in  section 2 of this 2022
Act.
(2) The department shall maintain and store data collected  pursuant to section 2 of this
2022 Act separately from other information provided on tax  returns filed under ORS chapter
316, and the data shall be accessible only to the following:
(a) Research section staff of the department.
(b) Other department staff  that are assigned to process the data and process or program
the underlying systems for the  data collection schedule, but only to the extent necessary for
that purpose.
(c) The staff of the Legislative Revenue Office.
(d) The division of the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services that serves as of-
fice of economic analysis.
(3) Tax practitioners and tax preparation software  vendors may use and retain data col-
lected pursuant to section 2  of this 2022 Act only to the extent necessary to assist taxpayers
in the filing of returns required under ORS chapter 316 and may not use the data, or  allow
it to be used, for any other reason, including for commercial purposes.
(4) Notwithstanding  any intergovernmental reciprocal agreements entered into by the
Department of Revenue, the department may not allow the Internal Revenue Service  access
to the data collected under section 2 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 5.
Not later than September 15 of each year, the Department of Revenue  shall
report, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, on  the status of the development and imple-
mentation of the data collection schedule required under section 2 of this  2022 Act and on
the use of the data collected, to an appropriate committee or  interim committee of the
Legislative Assembly related to information management and technology. The report  re-
quired by this section shall include  an update of the effectiveness of measures undertaken
by the department to ensure data security. The report shall address the prevention of  any
sharing of data collected pursuant to section 2 of this 2022 Act:
(1) Within the department, between research staff and audit and collection staff.
(2) Between the department and the Internal Revenue Service.
(3) Between tax practitioners and commercial interests.
(4) Between tax preparation software vendors and commercial interests.
SECTION 6.
The Department of Revenue shall use data  collected on the data collection
schedule required under section 2 of this 2022 Act, in aggregated and anonymized form, to:
(1) Develop racial impact statements;
(2) Perform analysis of proposed administrative rules and budget requests; and
(3) Respond to requests for information from the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 7.
(1) The Department of Revenue shall first attach the data collection schedule
required under section 2 of this 2022 Act to income tax returns filed for the 2022 tax year.
(2) The department shall  develop programming and forms for the implementation of the
schedule and, by rule, shall adopt policies  and procedures for the implementation of the use
of the schedule.
SECTION 8. This 2022 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2022
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]
SB 1569
1
[3]