Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Add-on payment”  means an amount paid by the Department of Human Services to
an adult foster home provider, in addition to a base rate, for  an individual residing in the
adult foster home who:
(A) Requires full assistance in mobility, eating or toileting;
(B) Demonstrates behavior that poses a risk  to the individual or to others, and the adult
foster home provider must consistently intervene to supervise or redirect the resident;
(C) Requires daily observation and monitoring of medical treatment, with  oversight by a
licensed health care professional at least quarterly, and the  provider has staff members who
are trained to provide, and are providing, the daily observation and monitoring of medical
treatment; or
(D) Meets other criteria adopted by the department by rule.
(b) “Adult foster home” means an adult  foster home, as defined in ORS 443.705, that is
licensed according to rules adopted by the department under ORS 443.734 (1)(a) or (b).
(c) “Base rate” means the room and board standard rate paid by  the department to an
adult foster home provider for an individual residing in the adult foster home.
(d) “Exceptional payment” means a service payment that is made by the  department to
an adult foster home provider for  a resident who requires additional hours of services that
are not paid for by the base rate or add-on payments.
(e) “Service payment” means an amount paid by the department  for a resident of an
adult foster home that is based on the resident’s level of impairment and need for services.
(2) No later than January 1, 2026, the department shall restructure the rate methodology
for payments to adult foster home providers by increasing base rates  and adopting an
acuity-based payment method that reduces the need for exceptional payments.
SECTION 2.
No later than February 1, 2026, the Department of Human Services shall
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 357
HB 2560
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
report to the interim  committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health, in the man-
ner provided in ORS 192.245, on the adoption of a new rate structure for  adult foster home
providers in accordance with section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
Sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]