Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,500,000, for distribution to the University
of Oregon for the purposes of:
(1) Extending to additional high schools the Oregon Research  Schools Network, which is
a program that strives to  improve high school graduation rates through collaborative part-
nerships between faculty members of the university and teachers in the high schools; and
(2) Evaluating the program described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 2.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3377