Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Except as provided by subsection (2) of this  section, a school district may
not allow for the promotion of a student in the third grade to the next grade  level if the
student does not demonstrate grade-level proficiency on a statewide assessment in language
arts.
(2) A student  in the third grade who does not demonstrate grade-level proficiency on a
statewide assessment in language arts may be promoted to the next grade level  if the stu-
dent:
(a) Demonstrates proficiency  on an alternative assessment administered to students who
have an individualized education program or an education plan developed in  accordance with
section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794, when the program or plan ad-
dresses a condition that impacts the student’s ability  to demonstrate proficiency on a
statewide assessment in language arts;
(b) Has an individualized education program  and the student’s individualized education
program team determines that retention in the  third grade is not appropriate for the stu-
dent;
(c) Is  an English language learner and has received less than three years of instruction
in the English language;
(d) Has been retained previously for any grade from kindergarten through grade three;
or
(e) Demonstrates grade-level proficiency on a statewide  assessment in language arts ad-
ministered:
(A) Before the beginning of the school year  for which the student is not allowed to be
promoted; or
(B) Before the middle of the school  year for which the student is not allowed to be pro-
moted.
(3) A school district must administer  a statewide assessment in language arts, at a
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3921
HB 3440
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
minimum:
(a) At the end of the school year for all students in the third grade; and
(b) For a student who does not demonstrate grade-level proficiency on a statewide as-
sessment in language arts  at the end of the school year in which the student is in the third
grade:
(A) Before the beginning of the school year for which  the student is not allowed to be
promoted; and
(B) Before the middle of the school year for which the student  is not allowed to be pro-
moted.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act first  applies to student promotion decisions for the
2026-2027 school year.
[2]