Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The People’s Republic of China, an  agency of the People’s Republic of
China or any entity organized under the  laws of, or otherwise subject to the jurisdiction of,
the People’s Republic of China may not acquire real property or any interest in real property,
including a tenancy, if the property is zoned for exclusive farm use.
(2) An instrument or agreement in violation of this section is void and without  legal ef-
fect.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act  applies to instruments or agreements executed on
or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2975