Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Housing and Community Services  Department shall establish a pro-
gram to provide grants to persons for  safely decommissioning, and disposing of, a manufac-
tured dwelling, as defined in ORS 446.003.
(2) The department may award grants under the program only to a person that is:
(a)(A) An individual who owns a manufactured dwelling sited in  a manufactured dwelling
park that has registered with  the Office of Manufactured Dwelling Park Community Re-
lations and has entered into a regulatory agreement with the department; or
(B) An entity described in paragraph (b)(B) of this subsection that  has a controlling in-
terest, including a controlling interest in a general partner of a limited partnership, in:
(i) The manufactured dwelling; or
(ii) A manufactured dwelling park where the manufactured dwelling slated  for disposal
is sited; and
(b)(A) An individual who is a member of a household with income that  complies with in-
come restrictions determined at the advice and consent of  the Oregon Housing Stability
Council, but not to exceed the greater of 100 percent of  the statewide or local area median
income adjusted for household size as determined annually by the Housing  and Community
Services Department using United States Department of Housing and Urban Development
information; or
(B) A nonprofit corporation  as defined in ORS 317.097, a manufactured dwelling park
nonprofit cooperative as defined in ORS  62.803, a housing authority as defined in ORS 456.005,
a local unit of government as defined in ORS 466.706, or a state governmental entity.
(3) Grants awarded under the program may  not exceed 80 percent of the cost of decom-
missioning and disposing of the manufactured dwelling.
(4) The Oregon Housing  Stability Council may establish priorities for the evaluating grant
applications and shall consider prioritizing grant awards:
(a) For the safe remediation of dwellings with environmental and public health  hazards
and risks, including asbestos, lead paint and mold;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2788
HB 2895
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
(b) To owners from low income households; and
(c) For the decommissioning of manufactured dwellings that are  older or less resource
and energy efficient.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $500,000, for administering  and funding
grants under section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]