Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 171.745, as amended by section 2, chapter 701, Oregon Laws 2013,  is amended
to read:
171.745. (1) A lobbyist registered with the Oregon Government Ethics Commission  or required
to register with the commission shall, according to the schedule described in ORS  171.752, file with
the commission a statement showing for the applicable reporting period:
(a) The total amount of all moneys expended for food,  refreshments and entertainment by the
lobbyist for the purpose of lobbying.
(b) The name of any legislative official or executive official to whom or for whose benefit,  on
any one  occasion, an expenditure is made for the purposes of lobbying, and the date, name of payee,
purpose and amount of that expenditure. This paragraph applies if the  total amount expended on the
occasion by one or more persons exceeds $50.
(2) Statements required by this section need not include :
(a) Amounts expended by  the lobbyist for personal living and travel expenses and office over-
head, including salaries  and wages paid for staff and secretarial assistance, and maintenance
expenses[.]; or
(b) Amounts expended by the lobbyist on lobbying another lobbyist who  is registered with
the commission or required to  register with the commission, or on lobbying any person on
whose behalf a lobbyist is registered  or required to register. This paragraph does not apply
if the person lobbied is a legislative official, an executive official or a member of  a state
board or commission.
(3) If the  amount of any expenditure required to be included in a statement is not accurately
known at the time the statement is required to be filed, an estimate  of the expenditure shall be
submitted in the statement and designated as an estimate.  The exact amount expended for which a
previous estimate was made shall be submitted in a subsequent report when the information  is
available.
(4) A statement required by this section shall include a copy of any notice provided to a  public
official or candidate under ORS 244.100.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1797
HB 2870
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
SECTION 2. Section 3, chapter 701, Oregon Laws 2013, is repealed.
SECTION 3. If this 2017 Act does not become effective until after June 30, 2017, the re-
peal of section 3, chapter 701, Oregon Laws 2013, by section 2 of this 2017 Act revives section
1, chapter 701, Oregon Laws 2013. If this 2017 Act does not  become effective until after June
30, 2017, this 2017 Act shall be operative retroactively to that date, and the operation and
effect of section 1, chapter 701, Oregon Laws 2013, shall continue unaffected from  June 30,
2017, to the effective date of this 2017 Act  and thereafter. Any otherwise lawful action taken
or otherwise lawful obligation incurred  under the authority of section 1, chapter 701, Oregon
Laws 2013, after June 30,  2017, and before the effective date of this 2017 Act, is ratified and
approved.
SECTION 4.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]