Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 181A.840 is amended to read:
181A.840. As used in ORS 181A.360, 181A.840 to 181A.918, 181A.895 and 181A.995:
(1) “Certification”  means recognition by the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training
that a private security professional meets all of the qualifications listed in ORS 181A.855.
(2) “Executive manager” means a person:
(a) Who is authorized to act on behalf of a company or business in matters of licensure and
certification;
(b) Who is authorized to hire and terminate personnel;
(c) Whose primary responsibility is the management of certified private security  professionals;
and
(d) Who has final responsibility for a company’s or business’s compliance with ORS  181A.840 to
181A.918.
(3) “Instructor” means any person who has been certified by the department as  meeting the re-
quirements to provide instruction to private security providers or applicants.
(4) “License” means recognition by the department that  an executive manager or supervisory
manager meets the requirements adopted by the Board  on Public Safety Standards and Training as
necessary to provide private security services.
(5) “Primary responsibility” means an  activity that is fundamental to, and required or expected
in, the regular course of employment and is not merely incidental to employment.
(6)(a) “Private security entity” means a person engaged in the business  of providing private se-
curity professionals for contracted private security services  [ that:]
[(A) Employs private security providers; or ]
[(B) Contracts or subcontracts with an existing licensed private security  entity to provide private
security services ].
(b) “Private security entity”  does not include a special campus security provider commissioned
under ORS 352.118, [or] a private security provider on a campus of an institution of higher education
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1507
HB 2012
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
regulated under ORS 181A.972 or persons who contract with a private security entity for  pri-
vate security services .
(7) “Private security professional”  means an individual who performs, as the individual’s primary
responsibility, private security services  for consideration, regardless of whether the individual, while
performing the private security services, is armed or  unarmed or wears a uniform or plain clothes,
and regardless of whether the individual  is employed part-time or full-time to perform private secu-
rity services.
(8) “Private security provider” means any individual who performs the functions of a  private
security professional, executive manager, supervisory manager or instructor.
(9) “Private security services” means  the performance of at least one of the following activities:
(a) Observing and reporting unlawful activity.
(b) Preventing or detecting theft or misappropriation of goods, money or other items of value.
(c) Protecting individuals or  property, including but not limited to proprietary information, from
harm or misappropriation.
(d) Controlling access to premises being protected or, with respect to a  licensee of the Oregon
Liquor and Cannabis Commission, controlling access to  premises at an entry to the premises or any
portion of the premises where minors are prohibited.
(e) Securely moving prisoners.
(f) Taking enforcement action  by detaining persons or placing persons under arrest under ORS
133.225.
(g) Providing canine services  for guarding premises or for detecting unlawful devices or sub-
stances.
(10) “Supervisory manager” means an employee of or a person supervised by an executive man-
ager who has as a primary responsibility the supervision of certified private security professionals.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]