Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 757.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in  this section, “electric utility” means a public utility, a people’s
utility district organized under ORS chapter 261, a municipal utility operating under ORS
chapter 225 or a cooperative organized under ORS chapter  62 that provides or delivers elec-
tricity service.
(2) An electric utility shall disclose to  its customers the costs of storing the waste
produced by an energy facility in generating electricity that the electric utility recovers in
the rates of the electric utility.
(3) Prior to developing the energy  facility, a person who seeks to develop an energy fa-
cility to generate electricity that is to be sold by an electric utility  shall disclose to the
electric utility and the public the costs  of storing the waste that will be produced by the
energy facility in generating electricity.
SECTION 3.
This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 260