Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3782
HB 2124
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “land value taxation” means, for all taxable  real
property, a property tax system that imposes a higher uniform rate of tax on land assess-
ments than on improvement assessments.
(2) The Legislative Revenue Officer shall  conduct a study of land value taxation. The
study must include:
(a) An examination of the tax burden effects of a  change from the current system of
property taxation under Ballot  Measure 5 (1990) and Ballot Measure 50 (1997) to land value
taxation.
(b) Simulation model comparisons of tax applications using true market assessments and
a revenue-neutral framework.
(c) An examination of comparative economic incentive effects on classes of land use in
selected local urban and rural jurisdictions.
(d) An examination of comparative economic incentive  effects on property in selected
jurisdictions currently utilizing rural enterprise zone tax incentives.
(e) An evaluation of tax burden relief measures  that might accompany land value taxa-
tion, including a homestead exemption and property tax deferral for  homeowners who are
financially overburdened.
(3) The Legislative Revenue Officer shall submit a report on the study, in the  manner
provided by ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to
revenue no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this  2025 Act is repealed on the date of the convening of the 2027
regular session of the Legislative Assembly as specified in ORS 171.010.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]