Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 469.161 is amended to read:
469.161. (1) The State Department of Energy shall create a single resource that  provides to in-
terested persons information, technical assistance and assistance in identifying contractors and  fi-
nancing options, related to available energy efficiency incentives and programs.
(2) The department shall :
(a) Coordinate  information and data exchanges between federal and state agencies, private and
public utility providers, and energy efficiency incentive or program providers as may  be necessary
to:
[(a)] (A) Create and maintain the single resource described under subsection (1) of this section;
and
[(b)] (B) Support the implementation and reporting requirements  of available energy efficiency
incentives and programs.
(b) Coordinate with trade organizations, labor  organizations and industry professionals
to understand current technologies and programs.
(c) Ensure  that the single resource described under subsection (1) of this section provides
all information and assistance, including  information and assistance that the single resource
provides through an Internet website, in the five most commonly spoken languages in this
state other than English.
(d) Conduct outreach across this state in a culturally accessible manner using resources,
as needed, for non-English speakers, and prioritize outreach efforts toward households that
have participated or are on a wait  list to participate in other programs that are primarily
focused on assisting households that are low income, energy burdened,  multifamily, living in
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3645
HB 3081
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
rental housing or at risk  of utility service disconnection. The department shall incorporate
targeted education opportunities to provide information on:
(A) The resources and options that are available;
(B) How energy and energy efficiency technologies work;
(C) Financial costs and benefits; and
(D) Maintenance, upkeep and repair.
(e) Develop a preferred contractors list  that a person may use to connect with high
quality, preapproved contractors.
(f) Establish a  statewide navigation and support system, including a call center that uses
natural persons, to assist interested persons to use the single resource described  under
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The department may contract with [ a nonprofit ] nonprofit organizations or  other [ entity]
entities as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
(4) Entities that exchange,  compile or maintain information or data under this section or that
are involved  in carrying out the provisions of this section shall use best practices to maintain the
confidentiality and security of the information and data as required by federal and state law, in-
cluding the Oregon Consumer Information Protection Act and ORS 192.355.
SECTION 2.
(1) The  State Department of Energy shall create a statewide clearinghouse
for energy and energy efficiency incentive programs that focus on:
(a) Increasing household energy efficiency;
(b) Reducing greenhouse gas emissions; and
(c) Reducing utility costs for retail utility customers.
(2) Under the statewide clearinghouse, the  department shall, to the greatest extent pos-
sible:
(a) Develop a single,  universal application form and application process that can be used
to apply for all energy and energy efficiency incentive programs;
(b) Qualify all residential units within a multifamily residential building  if one unit qual-
ifies for an energy or energy efficiency incentive program;
(c) Cross check eligibility between energy and energy efficiency  incentive programs to
ensure a person uses all available resources offered by all energy and energy efficiency in-
centive programs;
(d) Maintain a list of households that have been verified as income eligible  for an energy
or energy  efficiency incentive program and use the list to verify income eligibility for all
other energy and energy  efficiency incentive programs that have income eligibility require-
ments;
(e) Support consumer energy audits and consultations that use a whole-home approach
to identify cost-effective home upgrades, and match a home  energy project with all available
funding sources, including utility bill financing and other lending products; and
(f) Establish  a uniform list of qualified appliance models across energy and energy effi-
ciency incentive programs.
(3) The department shall coordinate with and encourage local  governments, federal and
state agencies, private and public utility  providers, and energy and energy efficiency incen-
tive or program providers to participate in the statewide clearinghouse.
(4) The department and entities that are involved  in carrying out the provisions of this
section shall use best practices to maintain the confidentiality and security of the  informa-
[2]
HB 3081
1
2
3
tion and data as  required by federal and state law, including the Oregon Consumer Infor-
mation Protection Act and ORS 192.355.
[3]