Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $10,000,000, to provide a grant to each city
in this  state, in an amount based on city population but no less than $25,000 per city, to be
used for the removal of graffiti and vandalism within the city.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3854