Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 757.600 to
757.689.
SECTION 2. (1) The Public Utility Commission, upon entering  into or renewing an
agreement with a nongovernmental entity described  in ORS 757.612 (3)(g) involving the re-
ceipt of moneys as authorized by ORS 757.612  (3)(d), shall require the nongovernmental en-
tity, as a condition of receiving the moneys, to use not  less than 10 percent of the moneys
for the purpose of issuing loans in accordance with section 4 of this 2017 Act.
(2) Except as provided in section 4 (7) of this 2017 Act:
(a) All loans issued in accordance with section 4  of this 2017 Act must be repaid to the
nongovernmental entity in full; and
(b) All moneys that are repaid to the  nongovernmental entity as required by paragraph
(a) of this subsection must be invested by the nongovernmental entity in public purposes
described in ORS 757.612 (1).
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 465.600 to
465.621.
SECTION 4. (1) A nongovernmental entity described in ORS 757.612 (3)(g) that has  en-
tered into an agreement with  the Public Utility Commission for the receipt of moneys as
authorized by ORS 757.612 (3)(d) shall:
(a) Solicit from authorities proposals to  fund projects through which authorities will ac-
quire, rehabilitate, redevelop, reutilize and restore brownfield properties; and
(b) Make  loans to authorities for the purposes of acquiring, rehabilitating, redeveloping,
reutilizing or restoring brownfield properties.
(2) The nongovernmental entity shall make the loans  described in subsection (1) of this
section from moneys available to the nongovernmental entity pursuant to ORS 757.612  (3)(d)
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3467
HB 3142
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(3) To  receive a loan under this section, an authority must submit to the nongovern-
mental entity a proposal to fund a project. The proposal:
(a) Must include a description of  the proposed project, including any details related to the
authority:
(A) Acquiring brownfield properties;
(B) Rehabilitating brownfield properties;
(C) Redeveloping brownfield properties;
(D) Reutilizing brownfield properties; and
(E) Restoring brownfield properties.
(b) Must include a description of any aspect of  the proposed project related to funding
public purposes described in ORS 757.612 (1), including any funding of:
(A) New cost-effective local energy conservation;
(B) New market transformation efforts; and
(C) The above-market costs of constructing and operating new  renewable energy re-
sources.
(c) Must include the estimated cost of the proposed project and the  estimated amount
of loan moneys that the authority needs to complete the proposed project.
(d) Must include a proposed schedule  for repayment of the estimated amount of loan
moneys requested by the authority for the proposed project.
(4) The nongovernmental entity shall prescribe the form and  manner of making a pro-
posal under this section.
(5) Upon receiving a proposal under this section, the nongovernmental entity shall eval-
uate the proposal  to determine whether to make a loan, in whole or in part, to the authority
that submitted the proposal. In evaluating the  proposal, the nongovernmental entity shall
consider:
(a) The proposed project’s potential to benefit brownfield properties;
(b) The proposed project’s potential to fund public purposes described in ORS 757.612 (1);
(c) The plan and processes that the authority has set forth  for executing the proposed
project;
(d) The type of expertise and workforce that the authority will use to execute the  pro-
posed project;
(e) The feasibility of the authority completing the proposed project;
(f) The feasibility  of the authority completing the proposed project for the estimated cost;
(g) Whether  the proposed project is partly funded by other moneys available for acquir-
ing, rehabilitating, redeveloping, reutilizing and restoring brownfield properties; and
(h) If the proposed project  is partly funded by other moneys, whether additional moneys
are necessary to complete the proposed project.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, all loans issued in accordance with
this section must be repaid to the nongovernmental entity in full.
(7) An authority is not required to repay any loan moneys  received by the authority un-
der this section that  the authority exclusively used to fund a public purpose described in ORS
757.612 (1). An authority must prove  a claim for relief under this subsection to the satisfac-
tion of the nongovernmental entity.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 757.612 is amended to read:
[2]
HB 3142
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
757.612. (1) There is established an annual public purpose  expenditure standard for electric
companies  and  Oregon Community Power to fund new cost-effective local energy conservation, new
market transformation efforts, the above-market costs of new renewable energy resources and  new
low-income weatherization. The public purpose expenditure standard shall be funded  by the public
purpose charge described in subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) Beginning on the date an electric company or Oregon  Community Power offers direct ac-
cess to [ its] retail electricity consumers, except residential electricity consumers, the electric com-
pany or Oregon Community  Power shall collect a public purpose charge from all of the retail
electricity consumers located within [ its] the electric company’s or  Oregon Community Power’s
service area until January 1, 2026. Except as provided in paragraph (b)  of this subsection, the public
purpose charge shall be equal to three percent of the total revenues  collected by the electric com-
pany, Oregon Community Power or the  electricity service supplier from [ its] retail electricity con-
sumers for electricity services, distribution  services , ancillary  services, metering and billing,
transition charges and other types of costs included in electric rates on July 23, 1999.
(b) For an aluminum plant that averages  more than 100 average megawatts of electricity use
per year, [ beginning on March 1, 2002, ] the electric company or Oregon Community Power [ whose],
whichever serves territory  that  abuts the greatest  percentage of the site of the aluminum plant ,
shall collect from  the aluminum company a public purpose charge equal to one percent of the total
revenue from the sale of electricity [ services ] to the aluminum plant [ from any source ].
(3)(a) The Public Utility  Commission shall establish rules implementing the provisions of this
section relating to electric companies and Oregon Community Power.
(b) [ Subject to paragraph (e) ] Except as provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection, funds
collected [ by an electric company or Oregon Community Power ] through public purpose charges  un-
der subsection (2) of this section  shall be allocated as follows:
(A) Sixty-three percent for new cost-effective local energy  conservation[ ,] and new market
transformation efforts.
(B) Nineteen percent for the above-market costs of constructing and operating new  renewable
energy resources with a nominal electric generating capacity, as defined in ORS 469.300,  of 20
megawatts or less.
(C) Thirteen percent for new low-income weatherization.
(D) Five percent  [ shall be transferred to ] for deposit in  the Housing and Community Services
Department Electricity Public  Purpose Charge Fund established by ORS 456.587 (1) [ and used ] for
the purpose of providing grants as described in ORS 458.625 (2).
(c) The costs of administering subsections (1) to (6) of this section for  an electric company or
Oregon Community Power  shall be paid out of the funds collected through public purpose charges.
The commission may require [ that] an electric company or  Oregon Community Power to direct funds
collected through public  purpose charges to [ the] state agencies responsible for implementing sub-
sections  (1)  to (6) of this section in order to pay the costs of [ administering such responsibilities ]
implementation.
(d) The commission  shall direct the manner in which public purpose charges are collected and
spent by an electric company or Oregon Community  Power and may require an electric company
or Oregon Community Power to expend funds through  competitive bids or other means designed to
encourage competition, except that funds dedicated for new low-income weatherization shall be  di-
rected to the Housing and Community Services Department [ as provided in subsection (7)  of this
section] for purposes related to new low-income weatherization . The commission  [may also direct
[3]
HB 3142
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
that] may also require  funds collected [ by an electric company or Oregon Community Power ] through
public purpose charges to be paid to  a nongovernmental entity for investment in public purposes
described in subsection (1) of this section  and for making loans  as described in section 4 of this
2017 Act. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection:
(A) If an electric company collected the funds, at least 80 percent of the funds allocated for
new cost-effective local energy  conservation shall be spent  within the service area of the electric
company [ that collected the funds ]; or
(B) If Oregon Community  Power collected the funds, at least 80 percent of the funds allocated
for new cost-effective local energy  conservation shall be spent within the service area  of Oregon
Community Power.
(e)(A) The first  10 percent of [ the] funds collected [ annually] each year by an electric company
or Oregon Community Power under subsection (2)  of this section shall be distributed to school dis-
tricts that are located in the service territory of the electric company or Oregon  Community Power.
The funds shall be distributed to  individual school districts according to the weighted average daily
membership (ADMw) of  each school district for the prior fiscal year as calculated under ORS
327.013. The commission shall establish by rule a methodology for distributing a  proportionate share
of funds under this paragraph to school districts that are only partially located in  the service ter-
ritory of the electric company or Oregon Community Power.
(B) A school district that receives funds under this paragraph shall use the funds  first to pay
for energy audits for schools located within the school district. A  school district may not expend
additional funds received under this  paragraph on a school [ facility] until an energy audit has been
completed for that school  [facility]. To the extent practicable, a school district shall coordinate with
the State Department  of Energy and incorporate federal funding in complying with this paragraph.
Following completion of an energy audit for an individual school, the school district  may expend
funds received under this paragraph to implement the energy audit. Once an energy audit has been
conducted  and  completely implemented for each school within the school district, the school district
may expend funds received under this paragraph for any of the following purposes:
(i) Conducting additional energy audits. A school district shall conduct an energy audit prior
to expending funds on any other purpose authorized under this paragraph unless the  school district
has performed an energy audit within the three years immediately prior to receiving the funds.
(ii) [ Weatherization ] Weatherizing school  district facilities  and upgrading the energy effi-
ciency of school district facilities.
(iii) Energy conservation education programs.
(iv) Purchasing electricity from [ environmentally focused ] sources that protect the environ-
ment. [and]
(v) Investing in renewable energy resources.
(f) The commission  may not establish a different public purpose charge than the public purpose
charge described in subsection (2) of this section.
(g) If  the commission [ directs] requires funds collected through public purpose charges to be
paid to a nongovernmental entity, the entity shall , pursuant to an  agreement entered into or
renewed between the commission and the entity :
(A) Include on the  entity’s board of directors an ex officio member designated by the commis-
sion, who shall also serve on the entity’s nominating committee for filling board vacancies.
(B) Require the entity’s officers and directors to provide an annual disclosure of economic  in-
terest to be filed  with the commission on or prior to April 15 of each calendar year for public review
[4]
HB 3142
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in a form similar to  the statement of economic interest required for public officials under ORS
244.060.
(C) Require  the entity’s officers and directors to declare actual and potential conflicts of interest
at regular  meetings of the entity’s governing body when such conflicts arise, and require an officer
or director to abstain from participating in any discussion  or [ vote] voting on any item where that
officer or director has an actual conflict of interest. For the purposes of this subparagraph,  “actual
conflict of interest” and “potential conflict of interest” have the meanings given those terms  in ORS
244.020.
(D) Annually, arrange  for an independent auditor to audit the entity’s financial statements
[annually], and direct the auditor to file an audit opinion with the commission for public review.
(E) Annually file with the commission [ annually] the entity’s  budget, action plan and quarterly
and annual reports for public review.
(F) At least once  every five years, contract for an independent management evaluation to review
the entity’s operations, efficiency and effectiveness, and direct the independent reviewer to  file a
report with the commission for public review.
(h) The commission may remove from the board of directors of a nongovernmental entity  an of-
ficer or director who fails to provide an annual disclosure of economic interest , or who fails  to
declare an actual or potential conflict of interest, as  described in paragraph (g)(B) and (C) of this
subsection, [ in connection with ] if the failure is connected to  the allocation or expenditure of funds
collected through public purpose charges and [ directed] paid to the entity.
(4)(a) An electric company that satisfies its obligations under this section [ shall have ]:
(A) Has  no further obligation to invest in new cost-effective local energy  conservation, new
market transformation or new low-income weatherization , or to provide a commercial energy con-
servation services program ; and
(B) Is not subject to ORS 469.631 to 469.645 and 469.860 to 469.900.
(b) Oregon Community Power, for any period during which Oregon Community  Power collects
a public purpose charge under subsection (2) of this section:
(A) [ Shall have ] Has no [ other] further obligation to invest in new cost-effective local energy
conservation, new market transformation or new low-income weatherization , or to provide a com-
mercial energy conservation services program; and
(B) Is not subject to ORS 469.631 to 469.645 and 469.860 to 469.900.
(5)(a) A retail electricity consumer that uses more  than one average megawatt of electricity at
any site in the prior year shall receive a credit  against public purpose charges billed by an electric
company or Oregon Community Power for that site. The amount of the credit  shall be equal to the
total amount of qualifying expenditures for new cost-effective local  energy conservation, not to
exceed 68 percent of the annual public purpose charges, and the above-market costs  [ of purchases ]
of new renewable energy  resources incurred by the retail electricity consumer, not to exceed 19
percent of the  annual public purpose charges, less administration costs incurred under this para-
graph and paragraphs (b) and (c) of  this subsection. The credit may not exceed, on an  annual
basis, the lesser of:
(A) The amount of the retail electricity consumer’s qualifying expenditures; or
(B) The portion of the public purpose charge billed to the retail electricity consumer  that is
dedicated to new  cost-effective local  energy conservation, new  market transformation or the
above-market costs of new renewable energy resources.
(b) To obtain a credit under paragraph (a) of  this subsection, a retail electricity consumer shall
[5]
HB 3142
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
file with the State Department of Energy a description of the  proposed conservation project or new
renewable energy resource and a declaration that the retail electricity consumer  plans to incur the
qualifying expenditure. The  State Department of Energy shall issue a notice of precertification
within 30 days of receipt of the filing, if such filing is consistent with paragraph (a) of  this sub-
section. The credit may be taken  after a retail electricity consumer provides a letter from a certified
public accountant to the  State Department of Energy verifying that the precertified qualifying ex-
penditure has been made.
(c) Credits earned by a retail electricity consumer  as a result of qualifying expenditures that
are not used in one year may be carried forward for use in subsequent years.
(d)(A) A retail electricity consumer that uses more than one average megawatt of electricity  at
any site in the prior year may  request that the State Department of Energy hire an independent
auditor to assess the potential  for conservation investments at the site. If the independent auditor
determines there is  no available conservation measure at the site that would have a simple payback
of one to 10 years, the retail electricity consumer shall be relieved of 54 percent of its payment
obligation for public purpose charges related to the site. If the independent  auditor determines that
there are potential conservation measures available  at the site, the retail electricity consumer shall
be entitled to a  credit against public purpose charges related to the site equal to 54 percent of the
public purpose charges less the estimated cost of available conservation measures.
(B) A retail electricity consumer shall be entitled each year to  the credit described in this
[subsection] paragraph unless  a subsequent independent audit determines that new conservation
investment opportunities are available. The State Department  of Energy may require that a new
independent audit be performed on the  site to determine whether new conservation measures are
available, provided that the independent audits [ shall] occur no more than once every two years.
(C) The retail electricity consumer shall pay the cost of the independent audits  described in this
[subsection] paragraph.
(6) Electric utilities and retail electricity consumers shall  receive a fair and reasonable credit
for the public purpose expenditures of  their energy suppliers. The State Department of Energy shall
adopt rules to determine eligible expenditures and the [ methodology] method by which such  credits
are accounted for and used. The  [ rules] State Department of Energy  also shall adopt methods to
account for eligible public purpose expenditures made through consortia or collaborative projects.
(7)(a) In addition to the public purpose charge  provided under subsection (2) of this section, an
electric company or Oregon Community Power  shall collect funds for low-income electric bill pay-
ment assistance in an amount determined under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The commission shall establish the amount to be  collected by each electric company in cal-
endar year 2008 from  retail electricity consumers served by the company, and the rates to be
charged to retail electricity consumers served by  the company, so that the total anticipated col-
lection for low-income electric bill  payment assistance by all electric companies in calendar year
2008 is $15  million. In calendar year 2009 and subsequent calendar years, the commission may not
change the rates established for retail electricity consumers, but the total amount collected  in a
calendar year for low-income electric bill payment assistance may vary  based on electricity usage
by retail electricity consumers and changes in the number of retail electricity  consumers in this
state. In no event shall a retail electricity consumer be required to  pay more than $500 per month
per site for low-income electric bill payment assistance.
(c) Funds collected [ by] through the  low-income electric bill payment assistance charge shall
be paid into the Housing and Community Services Department Low-Income  Electric Bill Payment
[6]
HB 3142
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
Assistance Fund established by ORS 456.587 (2). Moneys  deposited in the fund under this paragraph
shall be used by the Housing and  Community Services Department solely for [ the purpose of
funding] purposes related to  low-income electric bill payment assistance[ .] and  for  the Housing
and Community Services  Department’s cost of administering  this subsection . [ shall be paid out of
funds collected by the  low-income electric bill payment assistance charge. Moneys deposited in the fund
under this paragraph shall be expended solely for low-income electric bill payment assistance. ] Funds
collected [ from] by an  electric company or Oregon Community Power under this subsection  shall
be expended in the service area of the electric  company or Oregon Community Power from which
the funds are collected.
(d)(A) The Housing and Community  Services Department shall determine the manner in which
funds collected under this subsection will be allocated  by the Housing and Community Services
Department to energy assistance program providers for the purpose of providing low-income  bill
payment [ and crisis ] assistance.
(B) The Housing and Community Services  Department , in consultation with electric com-
panies, shall investigate and may implement  alternative delivery models [ in consultation with electric
companies] to effectively  reduce service disconnections and related costs to retail electricity con-
sumers and electric utilities.
(C) Priority assistance shall  be directed to low-income electricity consumers who are in danger
of having their electricity service disconnected.
(D) The Housing and Community Services  Department shall maintain  records and provide
those records upon request to an  electric company, Oregon Community Power and the Citizens’
Utility Board established under ORS chapter  774 on a quarterly basis. Records maintained must
include the numbers of low-income electricity consumers served, the  average amounts paid to low-
income electricity consumers  and the type of assistance provided to low-income electricity
consumers. Electric companies and Oregon  Community Power shall, if requested, provide the
Housing and Community Services  Department  with aggregate data relating to  low-income elec-
tricity consumers served on a quarterly basis to support program development.
(e) Interest on moneys deposited in  the Housing and Community Services Department Low-
Income Electric Bill Payment Assistance Fund established by ORS 456.587 (2) may  be used to pro-
vide bill payment  [ and crisis ] assistance to electricity consumers whose primary source of heat is
not electricity.
(f) Notwithstanding  ORS 757.310, the commission may allow an electric company or Oregon
Community Power to provide  reduced rates or other  bill payment [ or crisis ] assistance or low-income
program assistance to a low-income household eligible for assistance under the federal Low Income
Home Energy Assistance Act of 1981, as amended and in effect on July 23, 1999.
(8) For purposes of this section, “retail electricity consumers” includes any direct service  in-
dustrial consumer that purchases electricity without purchasing distribution services from the  elec-
tric  utility.
(9) For purposes of this section, [ amounts] funds collected  by Oregon Community Power through
public purpose charges are not considered moneys received from electric utility operations.
SECTION 6.
This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[7]