Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Legislative Policy and Research  Office shall conduct a study to ex-
amine the water service  rates and rate schedules of water utilities and municipal corpo-
rations and districts that provide water services. The study must include,  at a minimum, an
examination of:
(a) Recent trends in water service rates and rate schedules;
(b) Sufficiency of water service rates and rate schedules to cover a water system’s op-
eration, maintenance and upgrade costs;
(c) Water  service rates and rate schedules of water utilities and municipal corporations
and districts  that provide water services in comparison to similarly sized water utilities and
municipal corporations and districts that provide water services;
(d) Current and best practices for structuring  water service rates and rate schedules;
and
(e) Recommendations for state guidance around water service rates and rate schedules.
(2) In conducting the study, the office shall consult with:
(a) The Public Utility Commission and any other relevant agency;
(b) Water  utilities and municipal corporations and districts that provide water services;
and
(c) The Oregon Association of Water Utilities.
(3) The Public Utility Commission and all other agencies of state government, as  defined
in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist the office in conducting the study and, to the extent
permitted by laws related to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice necessary for
the office to complete its study.
(4) The office shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may in-
clude recommendations for  legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assem-
bly related to utilities no later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3378
HB 3002
1
2
3
4
5
ated to the Legislative Policy and Research Committee, for the biennium beginning  July 1,
2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $500,000, which may be expended for carrying
out the provisions of section 1 of this 2023 Act. Moneys that are not expended for carrying
out section 1 of this 2023 Act by September 15, 2024, shall revert to the General Fund.
[2]