Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 (1) As used in this section, “movie theater” means a commercial indoor
theater whose primary business use is the exhibition of motion pictures  to the general public
for a fee.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department  shall develop and implement a grant
program to award grants to operators of movie theaters in Oregon.
(3) To be eligible for a grant under the program,  a person must be an operator of a movie
theater in Oregon that was closed to the general public for any period of time  on or after
March 13, 2020, as a result of public health restrictions related to COVID-19.
(4) The amount of a grant under the program is $50,000 for each  movie theater, plus an
additional $10,000 for each screen of the movie theater in excess of two screens.
(5) The department may award a maximum of one grant per movie theater.
(6) The department may adopt rules as necessary or  convenient for the development and
implementation of the program pursuant to this section.
SECTION 2.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $8,700,000 to
carry out the provisions of section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3668