Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 7 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Abortion” means the use or  prescription of a drug, instrument, medicine or other
substance or device to intentionally terminate the pregnancy  of a person known to be preg-
nant with a purpose other than:
(a) After viability, to produce a live birth  and preserve the life and health of the child
born alive; or
(b) To remove a dead unborn child.
(2) “Chemical abortion” means the use or prescription of an abortion-inducing drug dis-
pensed with the intent to cause the death of an unborn child.
(3)(a) “Medical emergency” means a condition that, in reasonable medical judgment, so
complicates the medical condition  of the pregnant person as to necessitate the immediate
termination of the pregnancy to avert the person’s death or for which a delay will  create
serious risk  of substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function,
not including psychological or emotional functions.
(b) “Medical emergency” does  not include a claim that the pregnant person will engage
in conduct that would result in the person’s  death or in substantial and irreversible physical
impairment of a major bodily function.
SECTION 2.
(1) Except in the case of a medical emergency, a chemical  abortion involving
the administration of mifepristone  and misoprostol may not be performed or induced, or at-
tempted to be performed or induced, unless  the prescribing physician or an agent of the
prescribing physician informs, in person  or by telephone, the pregnant person to whom the
drugs described in this subsection are prescribed, at  least 24 hours in advance of the chem-
ical abortion, that:
(a) There is a possibility of reversing  a chemical abortion after the administration of
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3750
SB 1031
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mifepristone if the person who is pregnant changes  the person’s mind, but that time is of
the essence; and
(b) A website developed and  maintained by the Oregon Health Authority, as described in
section 3 of this 2025 Act,  provides further information on and assistance in the reversal of
a chemical abortion following the administration of mifepristone.
(2) Following the dispensation of mifepristone, the prescribing physician or agent of the
prescribing physician shall provide to the person to whom  mifepristone was prescribed the
following written statement:
Recent developing research has indicated that mifepristone alone  is not always effective
in ending a pregnancy. It may be possible to avoid, to  cease, or even to reverse the intended
effects of a chemical abortion using mifepristone if the second pill, misoprostol,  has not been
taken. Please consult with a knowledgeable health care  provider regarding the abortion pill
reversal or call the Abortion Pill Reversal Hotline at (877)  558-0333 or visit
https://www.abortionpillreversal.com as soon as possible.
(3) A civil penalty may not be imposed on a  physician for failure to comply with sub-
section (1)(b) of this section if  the website or information described in subsection (1)(b) of
this section is  not available at the time the physician or physician’s agent is required to
provide the information to the pregnant person.
SECTION 3. (1)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall develop and  maintain a website
that, to the  extent reasonably practicable, is safeguarded from having the content of the
website altered by a person other than the authority. The authority shall use the website  to
provide the information described in subsection (2) of this section.
(b) Information regarding individuals who use  or view the website may not be collected
or maintained.
(c) The authority shall monitor the website daily to prevent and correct tampering.
(d) The website must be maintained at a minimum resolution  of 70 dots per inch. Any
images appearing on the website must be a minimum of 200 x 300 pixels, and the font  size
used on the website must be a minimum of 12 points. All  information and images on the
website must be accessible with an industry-standard Internet browser and may not  require
additional plug-ins.
(2) The authority shall publish, on the website described  in subsection (1) of this section,
materials designed to inform a pregnant person of the possibility of  reversing the effects of
a chemical abortion if  the person no longer wishes to complete the chemical abortion and
information about and assistance with resources available to reverse the effects of a chemi-
cal abortion.
(3) The information described in subsection (2) of this section must be:
(a) Published in English and in each language that is the primary language of two percent
or more of the state’s population; and
(b) Easily comprehensible.
SECTION 4.
If a medical emergency requires the performance of  an abortion, the physi-
cian who performs the abortion  shall, prior to the performance of the abortion if possible,
[2]
SB 1031
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
inform the pregnant person upon whom the abortion is to be performed  of the medical indi-
cations supporting the physician’s judgment that  an abortion is necessary to avert the
person’s death or that a delay of 24 hours or more  will create a serious risk of substantial
and irreversible physical impairment  of a major bodily function, not including psychological
or emotional conditions.
SECTION 5.
A penalty may not be assessed against the person  upon whom an abortion
is performed or induced, or attempted to be performed  or induced, in violation of section 2
or 4 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the following
persons may maintain an action against the  person who performed or induced an abortion,
or attempted to perform or induce an abortion, in violation of section  2 or 4 of this 2025 Act
for actual, economic, noneconomic or punitive damages:
(A) The person upon whom the abortion was performed or induced, or attempted to  be
performed or induced;
(B) The person  responsible for the fertilization that resulted in the pregnancy that is the
subject of the abortion; or
(C) A grandparent of the unborn child that would have been born but for  the abortion if
the person described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph was  under 18 years of age at the
time of the abortion or died as a result of the abortion.
(b) Damages may not  be awarded under this subsection if the pregnancy described in
paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection was the  result of criminal conduct by the person main-
taining the action described in paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection.
(2) If the plaintiff prevails in the action  described in this section, the court shall also
award reasonable attorney fees to the plaintiff.
SECTION 7. (1) In any action brought under section 6 of this 2025 Act, the  court shall
determine whether the identity of the person upon whom an abortion was performed  must
be exempt from public disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478 if the person does not  consent
to disclosure.
(2) If the court determines that the  person’s anonymity must be preserved, the court
shall issue orders to  the parties, witnesses and counsel, direct the sealing of the record and
order exclusion from the courtroom of all persons who are not parties, witnesses or counsel.
The orders described in this subsection  must be accompanied by written findings that explain
why the person’s anonymity must be preserved, why the orders are essential to that end,
how the orders are narrowly tailored to serve that interest and why no  reasonable less-
restrictive alternative exists.
(3) If the person described in subsection (1) of this  section does not consent to disclose
the person’s identity, any person other than  a public official who brings an action under
section 6 of this 2025 Act that is related to the person’s pregnancy  shall bring the action
under a pseudonym.
(4) This section shall not be construed to  conceal the identity of the plaintiff or witnesses
from the defendant or defendant’s counsel.
SECTION 8.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]