Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 172.130 is amended to read:
172.130. The Commission on Indian Services :
(1) May employ an Executive Officer and other staff as may be necessary to carry out the pur-
poses of ORS 172.100 to 172.140 ; and
(2) Shall employ a natural resources management tribal liaison officer to facilitate op-
portunities for integrated natural resources management  between Indian tribes in Oregon
and those state agencies charged with natural resources management and water  resources
management.
SECTION 2. Section 3 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 172.100 to
172.140.
SECTION 3. The natural resources management tribal liaison officer described in ORS
172.130 (2) shall:
(1) Identify and promote opportunities for improved integration and coordination between
tribes and state  agencies or other governmental entities on natural resources-related issues;
and
(2) Assist with advancing the recommendations of the  Oregon Tribal Water Task Force
and support continued facilitation of the work of the task force.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Commission on Indian  Services, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended to perform  the duties
described in section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2602
HB 3531
1
2
on July 1, 2025.
[2]