Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 327.006 to
327.133.
SECTION 2. (1) Each even-numbered  year, the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services shall prepare a tentative budget for funding the State  School Fund for the next
biennium.
(2)(a) For the purpose of preparing the tentative budget, the department  shall form a
committee. The committee must include:
(A) Four representatives of  state government, which must include one representative
from each of the following:
(i) The Department of Education;
(ii) The Legislative Fiscal Officer, or the designee of the officer;
(iii) The Legislative Revenue Officer, or the designee of the officer; and
(iv) The Governor’s office;
(B) Four representatives of professional  educator organizations, which must include one
representative from each of the following:
(i) School district administrators;
(ii) School district boards;
(iii) A licensed school employees labor union; and
(iv) A classified school employees labor union;
(C) Three representatives of educator professionals, which must include one designee of
each of the following:
(i) School business officials;
(ii) School district human resources personnel; and
(iii) Education service districts; and
(D) The cochairs of the Joint Committee on Ways and Means.
(b) The Legislative Fiscal Officer  and the Legislative Revenue Officer, or their designees,
and the cochairs of the Joint Committee on Ways and Means shall serve as  nonvoting
members on the committee formed under this subsection.
(3)(a) The Oregon Department  of Administrative Services shall review with the commit-
tee formed under subsection (2) of this section the components of the methodology that will
be used to prepare the tentative budget and the calculations for the tentative budget.
(b) The methodology used for the tentative budget must calculate the  current service
level based on:
(A) The methodology identified by the committee; and
(B) The presumption  that the current service level for the first year of the next biennium
will be at least 51 percent of the amount appropriated to the State School Fund for the cur-
rent biennium.
(c) For any components of the methodology not described in paragraph (b) of  this sub-
section, the Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall collaborate  with the com-
mittee to refine the methodology by considering alternative  approaches to the calculations
and other factors  the committee believes may be pertinent to the preparation of the tenta-
tive budget.
(d) The tentative budget shall include:
(A) Projected changes in the cost of personnel services, other services, supplies and
[2]
SB 284
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
capital expenditures, based on:
(i) Anticipated expenses; and
(ii) Projections of roll-up costs provided by school districts that  represent at least two-
thirds of the number of weighted students (ADMw) in the most recent State School  Fund
calculations;
(B) Forecasted local revenues, as described in  ORS 327.011 and as calculated by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the Legislative  Fiscal Officer, the Legislative
Revenue Officer and the Department of Revenue; and
(C) Projected cost factors that may arise from new laws and administrative rules.
(4) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall collaborate with the com-
mittee formed under subsection (2) of this section prior  to finalizing the tentative budget
required under this section.
(5) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall present the tentative  budget
prepared under this section to the Governor and  to the Legislative Assembly in conjunction
with the submittal of the agency request budget of the Department of Education.
[3]