Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 314.
SECTION 2. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, the provisions of ORS chapters 314,  316 and 317 governing the
determination of net income, including the  apportionment and sourcing of income, apply to
any tax imposed upon or measured  by net income and imposed by a political subdivision of
this state.
(2) This section does not apply to any business license  tax, or the subsequent amend-
ments to the provisions of any tax,  that is imposed by a city on net income and is in effect
and operative on January 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. ORS 268.505 is repealed.
SECTION 4.  ORS 268.710 is amended to read:
268.710. (1) The electors of any metropolitan service district, by majority vote of such electors
voting thereon at any legally called election, may adopt, amend, revise or repeal a charter for the
district. The charter, or legislation passed by the district pursuant thereto, shall provide a  method
whereby the electors of the district, by majority vote of such electors voting thereon  at any legally
called election, may amend, revise or repeal the charter.
(2) Provisions of a district charter and district legislation  that relate to the amendment, revision
or repeal of a district charter are matters of metropolitan concern and shall prevail over  conflicting
provisions of state law that are first effective after January 1, 1999, unless such law  specifically
provides otherwise. After January 1, 1997, no person may commence or maintain an  action to
challenge  the  validity of a district charter existing and effective on January 1, 1997, on the basis
of inconsistency or conflict between the district charter  and ORS 268.030, 268.300, 268.310, 268.317,
268.318, 268.320, 268.330,  268.340, 268.345, 268.357, 268.360, 268.370, 268.500, [ 268.505,] 268.507,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2197
HB 2110
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
268.520, 268.525, 268.530, 268.590, 268.600 to 268.660 and 268.990. To the  extent that provisions of a
district charter limit the exercise of a power granted by  the statutes listed in this subsection, the
provisions of the  district charter shall be given full force and effect. In addition to any authority
expressly  granted  to a metropolitan service district by the Legislative Assembly, a district charter
is an independent grant of authority by the affected electorate pursuant to section 1 (5), Article IV
and section 2, Article XI of the Oregon Constitution.
(3) A charter of a metropolitan service district shall prescribe the organization of  the district
government and shall provide directly, or by its authority, for the number, election or  appointment,
qualifications, tenure, compensation, powers and duties of  such officers as the district considers
necessary.  Such  officers shall among them exercise all the powers and perform all the duties, as
granted to, imposed upon or distributed among district officers by the  Constitution or laws of this
state, by the district charter or by its authority.
(4) Any reference to the executive officer of a metropolitan service district in  statutes of this
state relating to  elections or government ethics shall be construed to include any district officer
who serves in an elective office and performs executive functions. Any reference in a district charter
to a district court judge may be construed as referring to a judge of the circuit court.
(5) As used  in this section, “legally called election” means an election held on the same date
as a primary election or general election held throughout this state.
(6) Consistent  with ORS 197.013, the land use planning authority granted to a district under ORS
chapter 268 is a matter of  statewide concern. Provisions of a district charter and implementing or-
dinances adopted and  effective on January 1, 1997, that establish procedural requirements relating
to the exercise of land use planning authority  of the district, including but not limited to require-
ments for local government advisory committees, are supplementary to ORS  268.380, 268.385, 268.390
and ORS chapters 197 and 197A. After January 1, 1997, no person may commence or  maintain an
action to challenge the validity of such district charter provisions or implementing  ordinances on
the basis of inconsistency or conflict with the procedural requirements  of ORS 268.380, 268.385 or
268.390 or the procedural requirements of ORS chapters 197 and 197A existing on January 1, 1997.
(7) If a district charter  is repealed, the provisions of the charter providing for district officers,
their powers and duties and  the election of such officers shall continue in effect until the Legislative
Assembly provides by law for the restructuring or dissolution of the district.
SECTION 5.
Except as provided in section 2 (2) of this 2025 Act,  section 2 of this 2025
Act, the amendments to ORS 268.710 by section 4 of  this 2025 Act and the repeal of ORS
268.505 by section 3 of this 2025 Act apply to all ordinances that impose a local  tax, whenever
enacted.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]