Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS  396.135, the Adjutant General may not assist, fa-
cilitate, communicate or allow communications between  the United States Department of
Defense or any branch thereof and individual  service members or units of the Oregon Na-
tional Guard on any matter associated with the individual or  unit being called into active
service under Title  10 or 32 of the United States Code unless the active service is for one of
following reasons:
(a) In support of a congressionally authorized military contingency.
(b) In support of operations in  response to a national catastrophe or disaster as declared
in a formal declaration  of war, congressional authorization for the use of military force or
presidential declaration.
(c) In support of a  congressionally authorized mission with the United States Department
of Homeland Security that  is consistent with federal law on the appropriate use of the Armed
Forces of the United States within or without the continental United States.
(d) For training for duties that are part of the primary duties of the individual or unit.
(e) For military support of the civil authorities of another  state or territory with the
express permission of the state’s or territory’s governor or executive civil authority.
(f) For military support of civil authorities for other duties  supported by congressional
action, federal law  or tradition, except not law enforcement or immigration enforcement
duties other than indirect support  or surveillance duties that are part of a border security
operation.
(2) Notwithstanding the reasons listed under subsection (1)(a) to (f) of this  section, the
Adjutant General  may not allow an individual or unit of the Oregon National Guard to be
called into active service under Title 10 or  32 of the United States Code if allowing the call
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4739
HB 3954
1
2
3
4
5
6
into active service results in the Oregon National Guard  being effectively incapable of re-
sponding to a statewide emergency, such as a natural disaster or terrorism event.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 396.150  (1), an Adjutant General who violates subsection (1) or
(2) of this section shall be immediately suspended from all duties and subject to  dismissal for
cause.
[2]