Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Water Resources Department shall study  groundwater permit require-
ments for small agricultural  parcels. The department shall submit a report on the study in
the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to
the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to natural resources no later
than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1962