Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Vehicle
Code.
SECTION 2. (1) There is appropriated to the Department of Transportation, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $  for the
purpose of initiating the breast cancer awareness registration  plate program established
under ORS 805.283, including but not limited to  the breast cancer awareness registration
plate design, computer programming and production setup. Any portion of the  appropriation
not used for initiating the breast cancer awareness registration plate program  shall be
transferred to the account described in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Notwithstanding  ORS 805.285, after deduction of the cost of administration of the
Oregon breast cancer awareness registration plate program, as described in ORS 805.285, the
department shall transfer the moneys from the surcharge imposed by ORS 805.283  to an ac-
count in the General Fund  until sufficient funds have accumulated for the purpose described
in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) When the department determines that moneys in sufficient amount are available in
the account described in subsection (2) of this section, but  no later than June 30, 2019, the
department shall reimburse the General Fund, without interest, in an  amount equal to the
amount appropriated from the General Fund under subsection (1) of this section. The moneys
used to reimburse the General Fund under this  subsection may not be considered a budget
item on which a limitation is otherwise fixed by law, but shall  be in addition to any specific
biennial appropriation or amount authorized to be expended from continuously appropriated
moneys for any biennial period.
(4) Any moneys remaining in  the account described in subsection (2) of this section after
the reimbursement required under  subsection (3) of this section shall be transferred to the
Oregon Health Authority Fund as provided in ORS 805.285.
SECTION 3.
 Section 8, chapter 806, Oregon Laws 2015, is repealed.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3836
HB 3182
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding the repeal of section 8, chapter 806, Oregon Laws  2015, by
section 3 of this 2017 Act, the amounts received by the Department of Transportation during
the period beginning August 12, 2016, and ending on the effective  date of this 2017 Act under
section 8, chapter 806, Oregon Laws  2015, shall continue to be used to cover the department’s
costs of  initiating the breast cancer awareness registration plate program established under
ORS 805.283.
SECTION 5. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
[2]