Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 430.383 is amended to read:
430.383. (1)(a) The people of Oregon find that drug addiction and overdoses  are a serious prob-
lem in Oregon and that Oregon needs to expand access to drug treatment.
(b) The people of Oregon further find that a health-based  approach to addiction and overdose is
more effective, humane and cost-effective  than criminal punishments. Making people criminals be-
cause they suffer from addiction is  expensive, ruins lives and can make access to treatment and
recovery more difficult.
(2)(a) The purpose of  the Drug Addiction Treatment and Recovery Act of 2020 is to make
screening, health assessment, treatment and recovery services  for drug addiction available to all
those who need and  want access to those services and to adopt a health approach to drug addiction
by removing criminal penalties for low-level drug possession.
(b) It is the policy of the State of Oregon:
(A) That screening, health assessment,  treatment and recovery services for drug addiction are
available to all those who need and want access to those services; and
(B) To encourage treatment and recovery for people struggling with substance use.
(3) The provisions of ORS 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394 shall be interpreted consistently  with
the findings, purposes and policy objectives stated in this section and shall not be limited by  any
policy set forth in Oregon law that could conflict with or be interpreted to conflict with the  pur-
poses and policy objectives stated in this section.
(4) As used in ORS 430.383 to 430.390 and 430.394, “recovery” means [ a process of change
through which individuals improve their  health and wellness, live a self-directed life and strive to reach
their full potential ] a  voluntarily maintained lifestyle characterized by sobriety and personal
health.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4385