Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 807.750 is amended to read:
807.750. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Driver license” means a license or permit issued by this state  or any other jurisdiction as
evidence of a grant of driving privileges.
(b) “Financial institution” has the meaning given that term in ORS 706.008.
(c) “Identification card” means the card issued under ORS 807.400  or a comparable provision in
another state.
(d) “Personal  information” means an individual’s name, address, date of birth, photograph, fin-
gerprint, biometric data, driver license  number, identification card number or any other unique
personal identifier or number.
(e) “Private entity” means any nongovernmental entity, such as a corporation,  partnership,
company or nonprofit organization, any other legal entity or any natural person.
(f) “Swipe” means the act of passing a  driver license or identification card through a device that
is capable of deciphering, in an electronically  readable format, the information electronically en-
coded in a magnetic strip or bar code on the driver license or identification card.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a private  entity may not swipe an
individual’s driver license or identification card, except for the following purposes:
(a) To verify the authenticity of a driver license or  identification card or to verify the identity
of the individual if the individual  pays for a good or service with a method other than cash, returns
an item or requests a refund.
(b) To verify the individual’s age when providing an  age-restricted good or service to any person
[about whom there is any reasonable doubt of the person’s having reached 21 years of age ].
(c) To prevent fraud or other criminal activity  if an individual returns an item or requests a
refund and the private entity uses a fraud prevention service company or system.
(d) To transmit information to a check  services company for the purpose of approving negotiable
instruments, electronic funds transfers or similar methods of payment.
(e) To collect information about the individual for the purpose of processing  an application for
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3119
HB 2055
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a deposit account or loan for the individual, if the private entity is a financial institution.
(f) To enable a  pharmacist, pharmacy technician or intern, as those terms are defined in ORS
689.005, to submit  information to the electronic system described in ORS 475.230 for the purpose of
transferring  a  drug containing pseudoephedrine or ephedrine or a salt, isomer or salt of an isomer
of pseudoephedrine or ephedrine without a prescription from a practitioner to a person who  is 18
years of age or older.
(3) A private entity that swipes  an individual’s driver license or identification card under sub-
section (2)(a) or (b) of this section  may not store, sell or share personal information collected from
swiping the driver license or identification card.
(4) A private entity that swipes  an individual’s driver license or identification card under sub-
section (2)(c) or  (d) of this section may store or share the following information collected from
swiping an individual’s driver license or identification card for  the purpose of preventing fraud or
other criminal activity against the private entity:
(a) Name;
(b) Address;
(c) Date of birth; and
(d) Driver license number or identification card number.
(5)(a) A person other than an entity regulated by the  federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15
U.S.C. 1681 et seq.,  who receives personal information from a private entity under subsection (4) of
this section may use the personal information received only to prevent fraud or other criminal  ac-
tivity against the private entity that provided the personal information.
(b) A person who is regulated by the  federal Fair Credit Reporting Act and who receives per-
sonal information from a private entity under  subsection (4) of this section may use or provide the
personal information received only  to effect, administer or enforce a transaction or prevent fraud
or other criminal activity, if the  person provides or receives personal information under contract
from the private entity.
(6)(a) Subject to the provisions of  this subsection, a private entity that is a commercial radio
service  provider  that provides service nationally and that is subject to the Telephone Records and
Privacy Protection Act of  2006 (18 U.S.C. 1039) may swipe an individual’s driver license or identifi-
cation card if the entity  obtains permission from the individual to swipe the individual’s driver li-
cense or identification card.
(b) The private entity may swipe the individual’s driver license or identification card only  for
the purpose of establishing or maintaining a contract between  the private entity and the individual.
Information collected by swiping an individual’s driver license  or identification card for the estab-
lishment or maintenance of a contract shall be limited to the following information from the  indi-
vidual:
(A) Name;
(B) Address;
(C) Date of birth; and
(D) Driver license number or identification card number.
(c) If the individual does not want the private entity  to swipe the individual’s driver license or
identification card, the  private entity may manually collect the following information from the indi-
vidual:
(A) Name;
(B) Address;
[2]
HB 2055
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
(C) Date of birth; and
(D) Driver license number or identification card number.
(d) The private entity may not withhold the provision of goods  or services solely as a result of
the individual requesting  the collection of the following information from the individual through
manual means:
(A) Name;
(B) Address;
(C) Date of birth; and
(D) Driver license number or identification card number.
(7) A governmental entity may swipe an individual’s driver license  or identification card only
if:
(a) The individual knowingly makes the driver license or identification  card available to the
governmental entity;
(b) The governmental entity lawfully confiscates the driver license or identification card;
(c) The governmental entity is providing emergency assistance to the  individual who is uncon-
scious or otherwise unable to make the driver license or identification card available; or
(d) A court  rule requires swiping of the driver license or identification card to facilitate accu-
rate linking of court records pertaining to the individual.
(8) In addition to any other remedy  provided by law, an individual may bring an action to re-
cover actual damages or $1,000, whichever is greater,  and to obtain equitable relief, if equitable
relief is available, against an entity that swipes, stores,  shares, sells or otherwise uses the
individual’s personal information in violation of this  section. A court shall award a prevailing
plaintiff reasonable costs  and attorney fees. If a court finds that a violation of this section was
willful or knowing, the court may increase the amount of the award  to no more than three times the
amount otherwise available.
(9) Any waiver of a provision of this section is contrary to public policy and is void and
unenforceable.
[3]