Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the  State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the
biennium beginning July 1,  2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $100,000 for the
purpose of funding programs that award $5  for each take of a pikeminnow, if the take com-
plies with  the wildlife laws. This appropriation is available continuously until expended for
the purpose specified in this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2012