Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 147.450 to
147.471.
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of Justice may  assist victims of domestic violence and
sexual assault with housing needs, including through homelessness prevention, housing
search assistance, tenant education and funding for rent, utilities,  moving costs, deposits,
application fees or safe emergency housing.
(2) No later than September 15, 2024, the Department of  Justice shall provide a report
to an appropriate interim  committee of the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided in
ORS 192.245 on the expenditures of the department under this section.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is repealed January 2, 2026.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to  the Department of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, to assist victims of domestic violence and sexual assault
with housing needs under section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3145