Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Psychiatric Security Review Board shall study the board’s progress
in developing a restorative justice program under ORS 161.398.
(2) The board shall provide the results of the study, including  any recommended legisla-
tive changes, in a report to the appropriate interim committees  of the Legislative Assembly
in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than December 31, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2885