Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “serious emotional disturbance” means  a mental,
behavioral or emotional disorder, regardless of origin, that:
(a) Is of sufficient duration to be diagnosed by a qualified licensed health provider utiliz-
ing the diagnostic  criteria specified in the fifth edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical
Manual of Mental Disorders published by the American Psychiatric Association; and
(b) Has resulted in a functional impairment that  substantially interferes with or limits
the individual’s role or functioning in family, school or community activities.
(2) The  Oregon Health Authority shall provide flexible and innovative home and
community-based services and supports that will  allow individuals under 21 years of age who
qualify for  Medicaid-funded services and have a serious emotional disturbance to be suc-
cessful living with their families or in other home and community-based settings. The ser-
vices and supports must include, but are not limited to, the following:
(a) Specialized respite care;
(b) Job coaching and employment supports;
(c) Family counseling;
(d) Person-centered planning;
(e) Specialized peer support for individuals under 21  years of age and their parents,
guardians, personal representatives or families, including siblings;
(f) Crisis support networks;
(g) Professional resource family care;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2750
SB 909
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(h) Case management;
(i) Targeted case management; and
(j) The facilitation of wraparound services.
SECTION 2.
In determining eligibility for medical  assistance, as defined in ORS 414.025,
the Oregon Health  Authority and the Department of Human Services shall disregard the
parental income of an individual who is under 18 years of age and has a physical disability
or chronic illness that requires a hospital or nursing home level of care.
SECTION 3.
In determining eligibility for medical  assistance, as defined in ORS 414.025,
the Oregon Health Authority and the Department of Human Services shall  disregard the
parental income of an individual who is  under 18 years of age and meets the level of care
criteria, as prescribed by the Oregon Health Authority under section 5 of this 2025 Act, for
admission to a facility providing psychiatric services to individuals under 21 years of age.
SECTION 4.
If an individual under 18 years of age is determined eligible for medical as-
sistance, as defined in ORS 414.025,  based on a disregard of parental income, the Oregon
Health Authority or the Department of Human Services shall notify  the individual’s parents
that the disregard of  parental income constitutes parental consent for an education provider
to:
(1) Be notified that the individual receives medical assistance; and
(2) Bill for the cost of school-based health services provided to the individual.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall:
(a) Prescribe by rule the level of care criteria for admission  to a facility providing psy-
chiatric services to individuals under 21 years of age;
(b) Adopt an assessment tool to determine whether an individual meets the level of care
criteria prescribed under this subsection; and
(c) Adopt an assessment tool to establish the level of services necessary to  support an
individual who meets the level of care criteria prescribed under this  subsection to be suc-
cessful outside of an institutional setting.
(2) An individual who meets the level of care criteria prescribed under subsection (1)  of
this section is  eligible for medical assistance, as defined in ORS 414.025, if home and
community-based services  are necessary to prevent the individual from being placed in an
institutional setting.
(3) An individual who has been determined to meet the  level of care criteria prescribed
under subsection (1) of this section shall continue to meet the criteria if:
(a) The provision of  home and community-based services stabilized the individual and
removal of the home and community-based services is likely to put the  individual at risk of
placement in an institutional setting; or
(b) The individual has been discharged from an  institutional setting and requires home
and community-based services to prevent the risk of returning to an institutional setting.
SECTION 6.  ORS 417.345 is amended to read:
417.345. (1) The Medically  Involved Home-Care Program is created in the Department of Human
Services.  The  department shall provide all State Plan Medicaid and waivered services available un-
der state and federal law that are necessary to enable a medically involved child  to be cared for in
the child’s home. The waivered services that must be available include but are not  limited to home
nursing care, durable medical equipment and respite care.
(2) The department shall adopt by rule criteria for determining the need for and extent  of as-
[2]
SB 909
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sistance to be provided to a medically involved child enrolled in the Medically  Involved Home-Care
Program [ created by subsection (1) of this section ]. The criteria  shall include, but are not limited to,
consideration  of:
(a) The medical needs of the child;
(b) The needs of any  other family member with a disability or chronic illness in the child’s home;
(c) Family and community support available to the child and family caregivers; and
(d) The assistance necessary for  the family to care for the child in the child’s home, disregarding
parental or legal guardian income.
(3) [Subject to limits on enrollment required by state or  federal law, ] Services offered through the
Medically Involved Home-Care Program shall be made available to children meeting the criteria
established by the department by rule. Priority for enrollment shall be given to:
(a) A child transferring  to the child’s home from nursing home placement, foster care placement
or other out-of-home placement;
(b) A child living at  home who is at risk of nursing home placement, foster care placement or
other out-of-home placement;
(c) A child who  does not otherwise qualify for medical assistance under ORS chapter 414 and
for whom the department pays family support  payments pursuant to ORS 430.215 that exceed $10,000
per year; and
(d) A child who is at risk of losing  eligibility for medical assistance under ORS chapter 414 due
to a caregiver’s employment or an increase in a caregiver’s earnings.
[(4) The department shall enroll  no fewer than 125 medically involved children in the Medically
Involved Home-Care Program beginning January 1, 2008. The department  shall enroll an additional
25 medically involved children each calendar year  thereafter, to the maximum number allowed by fed-
eral law or under the terms of the federal approval. ]
[(5)] (4) Moneys appropriated to the department  for the Medically Involved Home-Care Program
may not be used to supplant moneys appropriated to the department for the  Children’s Intensive
In-Home Services program.
[(6)] (5) As used in this section, “child” means a person under 18 years of age.
SECTION 7.
 Section 3, chapter 96, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Child” means an individual under 18 years of age.
(b) “Medicaid/CHIP  Operations Coordination Steering Committee” means the committee com-
prised of executive  level staff and subject matter experts that is required by the terms of the state’s
Home and Community-Based Services waiver, under 42 U.S.C.  1396n(c),  to meet  at least quarterly
to coordinate all mutual policy issues  related to the operation and administration of the state’s
medical assistance  programs, including state plan amendments, waiver requests, rules, procedures
and interpretive guidance.
(c) “Multi-system involved child or youth” means a child or youth  who is concurrently involved
in two or more of the child welfare, mental health, juvenile  justice, special education, developmental
disability services or aging and persons with disabilities services systems.
(d) “Serious emotional disturbance” means a mental, behavioral or emotional disorder,  regard-
less of origin, that:
(A) Is of sufficient duration to be diagnosed by a qualified  licensed health provider utilizing the
diagnostic  criteria  specified in the fifth edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental
Disorders published by the American Psychiatric Association; and
[3]
SB 909
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Has resulted in a functional impairment that substantially interferes  with or limits the
individual’s role or functioning in family, school or community activities.
(e) “Wraparound team” means a group of people chosen  by a child or youth and connected to
the child  or youth through natural, community and formal support systems, who develop and imple-
ment the child or youth and the family’s plan to address unmet needs and work toward  the child
or youth and family’s vision and team mission.
(f) “Youth” means an individual 18 through 20 years of age.
(2) In consultation with the Medicaid/CHIP  Operations Coordination Steering Committee, the
Department of Human Services and the Oregon Health Authority shall  adopt rules necessary to fa-
cilitate cross-agency coordination that supports each multi-system involved child or youth who  is
eligible for services and supports funded through the Community  First Choice Option under 42
U.S.C. 1396n(k) or the state plan for medical assistance to  have all of the assessed needs of the child
or youth fully met, including through the  use of available natural and community supports, while
avoiding the duplication of services. At a minimum, the rules must:
(a) Clarify the  roles of wraparound teams, community developmental disabilities programs,
children’s intensive in-home services providers, schools,  child welfare programs and other relevant
entities in the determination of a multi-system involved child  or youth’s level of care needs and an
assessment of the functional and service coordination needs of each child or youth;
(b) Streamline the application  and eligibility determination process by allowing each multi-
system involved child or  youth’s assessment, application and service plan to be shared across all
relevant systems to the maximum extent permitted by state and federal law;
(c) Ensure that  each child or youth who experiences intellectual or developmental disabilities
in addition  to mental illness or a substance use disorder is provided simultaneous access to services
and support offered by each agency serving the child or youth without delay;
(d) Prohibit any agency, program or  provider from denying mental or behavioral health services
to a child  or youth because the child or youth has an intellectual or developmental disability or a
substance use disorder, including alcohol use disorder, in addition to the child or youth’s mental
illness or serious emotional disturbance;
(e) Ensure coordination between public agencies that serve multi-system  involved children or
youth:
(A) To  support each multi-system involved child or youth to enable the child or youth to remain
in the community and avoid health crises, hospitalizations or out-of-home placements;  and
(B) With a focus of the coordination being  on prevention, recovery and support, recognizing the
unique strengths and potential of each multi-system involved child or youth; and
(f) Support children or  youth and their families to access the appropriate comprehensive home
and community-based services and supports that prevent crises from happening or reoccurring  and
that provide support and stabilization in the event of a crisis.
(3) In adopting rules under this  section, the department and the authority shall appoint a rules
advisory committee that includes youth who  are or who were multi-system involved children or
youth, and their families.
(4) The authority shall:
(a) Collaborate with the Department of Human Services and the Department of Educa-
tion on the sharing of information regarding children who are eligible for  medical assistance.
(b) Establish billing codes for the reimbursement of medical assistance provided to chil-
dren at school.
[4]
SB 909
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
SECTION 8.
(1) No later than October 1, 2025, the  Oregon Health Authority shall seek
any waiver or other necessary authority from the  Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Ser-
vices to carry out section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The  authority shall notify the Legislative Counsel immediately upon receipt of the
approval or denial of the request under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 9. (1) No later than  December 1, 2025, the Oregon Health Authority shall seek
any waiver or other necessary authority from the  Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Ser-
vices to carry out sections 1 and 3 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The  authority shall notify the Legislative Counsel immediately upon receipt of the
approval or denial of each request under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 10. (1) Sections 1 to 3 and 5 of this 2025 Act become operative on the date on
which the Legislative Counsel receives notice of the federal approval as provided  under
sections 8 and 9 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority and the Department of  Human Services may take any
action before the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary
for the authority and the  department to exercise, on and after the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section, all of the powers, duties and functions conferred on the
authority and department under sections 1 to 3 and 5 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 11.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[5]