Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Policy and Research Office or any employee  of the Legisla-
tive Policy and Research Office may not  reveal to any person not an employee of the Legis-
lative Policy and Research Office the contents or nature of any research requested, collected,
maintained or  utilized by the Legislative Policy and Research Office, unless the person pro-
viding the data or information to the Legislative Policy and Research Office has  consented
in writing to disclosure.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2303