Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Community health worker” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(b) “Social services”  means services provided to a family to support the family’s need for
subsistence, including but not limited to:
(A) Temporary assistance for needy families under ORS 412.006;
(B) Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits under ORS 411.816;
(C) Women, Infants and Children Program benefits under ORS 413.500;
(D) Public housing or federal, state or local housing assistance; or
(E) Medical assistance, as defined in ORS 414.025.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority  shall administer a two-year demonstration project in
Marion and Polk Counties designed  to reduce the overall burden and cost on social services
systems while improving outcomes for low-income families, including  by keeping children out
of the foster care system. The  demonstration project will give community health workers
flexibility in working with families with children who are receiving or eligible to receive so-
cial services, or who are at risk of entering the foster care system, by enabling the com-
munity health workers to be compensated  for providing services to the families that are
based on and focused on  addressing an assessment of a family’s social determinants of health
and that are otherwise not reimbursed by the state.
(3) The demonstration project will use the  Activate Care technology platform or a similar
platform that allows for the tracking of data and referrals across all state and local  agencies
and community-based organizations working  with a family or available to serve a family’s
needs. The authority shall use the data from the platform to associate services that are  not
currently reimbursed with existing billing codes so that, if  the project is successful, the
services can be integrated into the state billing system to be reimbursed in the future.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2635
HB 2751
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
(4) The authority shall  track the data and referrals and conduct assessments of families
working with community health workers in the  demonstration project to monitor health
outcomes and other measures of well-being developed by the authority.
(5) No later than September 15, 2029, the authority  shall report to interim committees
of the Legislative  Assembly related to human services, in the manner provided in ORS
192.245, on the effectiveness of the demonstration project in:
(a) Improving health outcomes for and financial stability of families;
(b) Reducing overall costs to and burdens on state agencies; and
(c) Improving the safety and well-being of children.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 2, 2026. The Oregon
Health Authority shall enter into contracts and take all  steps prior to January 2, 2026, that
are necessary to begin the demonstration project described in section  1 of this 2025 Act on
January 2, 2026.
SECTION 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2030.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be  expended for carrying out section 1 of
this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]