Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 403.235 is amended to read:
403.235. (1) The Emergency Communications  Account is established separate and distinct from
the General Fund in the State Treasury. All moneys received by the Department of Revenue pursu-
ant to ORS 403.200 to 403.230 and interest thereon must be paid to the State  Treasurer to be held
in a suspense account established under ORS  293.445. After payment of refunds, the balance of the
moneys received must be paid into the  State Treasury and credited to the Emergency Communi-
cations Account. All moneys in the account  are continuously appropriated to the Office of Emer-
gency Management and must be used for the purposes described in ORS 403.240.
(2) The 9-1-1 Subaccount is established as a subaccount of the Emergency Communications  Ac-
count. Thirty-five percent of the amount in the Emergency Communications Account on the  date of
distribution must be credited to  the 9-1-1 Subaccount. All moneys in the [ account] subaccount are
continuously appropriated to the Office of Emergency Management and must be used for  the pur-
poses described in ORS 403.240 (3), (4) and (5).
(3) Except in case of fiscal emergency, moneys  in the Emergency Communications Ac-
count, including any subaccounts thereof, may be used only  for the purposes described in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section, and may not be transferred out of the account.
(4) As  used in this section, “fiscal emergency” means a projected deficit for the biennium,
as most recently projected by  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, of at least
12 percent below the revenue estimated to be received for the biennium, as  estimated pur-
suant to ORS 291.349 (1) after  adjournment sine die of the odd-numbered year regular session
of the Legislative Assembly.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1197