Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Marine Board shall study issues related  to the safe operation of
boats. The board shall submit  a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may in-
clude recommendations for legislation, to the appropriate interim committees  of the Legis-
lative Assembly no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3283