Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Education shall study methods for improving the social
emotional health of students  and staff in public schools. The department shall submit a re-
port in the manner provided by  ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legis-
lation, to the interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to education no later
than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 534