Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall study health  care
benefits for part-time faculty at public universities  and community colleges in this state. The
commission shall submit a report  in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include
recommendations for  legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to higher education no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4054