Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) March of each year is designated as Plastics Appreciation Month.
(2) Each day of March is further designated for celebration of a specific type or use  of
plastics:
(a) March 1, single-use plastics. This day recognizes the value of all varieties of single-use
plastics, including such uses as disposable  utensils and other kitchenware and bags and in
preserving food and soaps;
(b) March 2, polypropylene (PP). The second most commonly used polymer, varieties  of
PP are  found in straws, bottle caps, compact disc jewel cases, packing tape, disposable
diapers and signage;
(c) March 3, polyvinyl chloride (PVC). The third most widely used polymer, PVC is used
widely in plumbing, credit cards, rain gutters and many other applications;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4855
SB 1208
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) March 4, polystyrene (PS).  This plastic is most recognizable in everyday use as a
lightweight insulated product. Expanded polystyrene is used widely in such items as coffee
cups, egg cartons and takeout food containers;
(e) March 5, polytetrafluoroethylene (PTFE). Commonly known  as Teflon, PTFE is an
unusually stable plastic.  It is very unreactive due to the strength of the carbon-fluorine
bonds and is used (along with its many variations) throughout industry in applications  that
require stable plastics, including tape for sealing pipes,  nonstick pans, bearing seals and
lubricants;
(f) March 6, polychlorotrifluoroethylene (PCTFE). Commonly known as Kel-F, it  is very
stable but forms a stiffer plastic, like  Teflon. It is also very unreactive and is used in
cryogenic seals  and corrosion-resistant containers. Because it is machinable, Kel-F is the
main component of liquid hydrogen fluoride equipment used in laboratory settings for peptide
synthesis and other reactions;
(g) March 7, perfluoroelastomer (FFKM). Commonly known as Kalrez,  it is flexible and
inert. It is used widely in corrosion-resistant valves, O-rings and gaskets;
(h) March  8, polyethylene terephthalate (PET or PETE). Widely used in such items as
beverage bottles, peanut butter jars and polyester clothing, PET is a very  strong plastic and
can be molded so that light can travel  through it with a minimum of distortion. It makes
excellent transparent containers;
(i) March 9, acrylonitrile butadiene styrene  (ABS). ABS is used widely in piano keys and
children’s toys. Perhaps less visible, but critical to modern society, is its use in drain pipes
and sewer systems;
(j) March 10, polylactic acid (PLA). PLA is the  most common plastic used in 3D printers,
due to its low  melting point, high strength and low thermal expansion. It is also very com-
mon in items such as laptop computers and automotive floor mats;
(k) March 11, polyvinyl alcohol  (PVA). PVA is an extremely widely used polymer in glue
and as a wetting agent in contact lenses;
(L) March  12, polyvinyl butyral (PVB). PVB is commonly used in automobile safety glass,
solar modules and 3D printers;
(m) March 13, polycarbonates (PC).  Easily molded, strong and able to be clear,
polycarbonates are found in dome  lights, capacitors, roofing sheets, swimming goggles,
eyeglasses and safety glasses;
(n) March 14, polyisobutylene (PIB). A gummy and flexible plastic, PIB is commonly
found in O-rings, caulks and inner tubes;
(o) March 15, polyvinyl fluoride  (PVF). A water-repellent plastic with low flammability,
PVF is found in airplane interiors, photovoltaic module backsheets and raincoats;
(p) March 16,  ethylene tetrafluoroethylene (ETFE). Commonly known as Tefzel, ETFE is
an inert, chemically resistant polymer that has many Teflon-like  properties. It is very strong
and resistant to ultraviolet light, and it is used in corrosion liners, skylights  and specialized
wire coatings;
(q) March 17,  ethylene chlorotrifluoroethylene (ECTFE). This inert and strong plastic is
stable at high temperatures and in corrosive environments.  It is widely used for acid con-
tainment and hazardous materials transport;
(r) March 18, poly(azanediyl-1,4-phenyleneazanediylterephthaloyl). Commonly known  as
Kevlar, this extremely strong plastic makes incredibly  lightweight fibers and is best known
[2]
SB 1208
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
for its use in bulletproof vests. It is also used in bicycle tires and racing sails;
(s) March 19, polyacrylates. These are flexible and strong and can be transparent.  Com-
mon uses are cosmetics, nail polish and adhesives;
(t) March 20, polysulfone (PSU).  PSU is stable at high temperatures and strong. It is used
in wastewater recovery membranes, flame retardants and food pans;
(u) March 21, ethylene-vinyl acetate (EVA). EVA is a soft rubber compound that  is used
in glues and flexible shoes like flip-flops;
(v) March  22, acrylic resin. Acrylic resin is an excellent thermosetting plastic that can
be found in dentures, solar energy systems and surfboards;
(w) March 23, polyvinyl formals. Commonly known as Formvar,  this polymer is widely
used as electrical insulation on magnet wire  and as a backing on magnetic tape. It is also
used in aircraft adhesives;
(x) March 24, low-density polyethylene (LDPE). LDPE is widely used in  cling wrap, bread
bags, garbage bags and grocery bags. Polyethylene in its different varieties is the  most
commonly used plastic polymer;
(y) March  25, high-density polyethylene (HDPE). HDPE is commonly found in milk car-
tons, buckets and children’s toys;
(z) March 26, polyoxymethylene (POM). POM is used in precision plastic parts. It is  easy
to machine, chemically resistant, very strong and low friction, so it is well-suited to appli-
cations involving moving parts;
(aa) March 27, polyphthalamide (PPA). Commonly used in coolant pumps, LED  headlights
and bearing pads, PPA is easily molded and resistant to high temperatures;
(bb) March 28, poly(methyl methacrylate) (PMMA). A very strong and clear
thermoplastic, PMMA is used in plastic windows as acrylic  glass and also in coatings and
inks;
(cc) March 29, poly(allyl diglycol carbonate) (PADC or CR-39). This  strong, clear plastic
is very common in eyeglass  lenses. It was also used in the fuel tanks of World War II B-17
bombers;
(dd) March 30,  nylon. Nylon is a family of synthetic polymers known for their strength,
durability and softness. It is widely used in clothing and many other consumer goods; and
(ee) March 31, all other types of plastics and their uses not celebrated on  a previous day
of the month.
[3]