Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Office of Child Care, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $350,000 to increase access to child care services in  Oregon House Dis-
trict 1.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1921