Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “home care worker” has the  meaning given that
term in ORS 410.600.
(2) The Department of Human Services  shall establish by rule an Exceptional Home Care
Worker Certification program to provide training and support for  home care workers who
care for individuals with complex  behavioral health needs. The rules shall identify the cir-
cumstances under which a home care worker certified under the program may  be eligible for
a higher payment rate.
SECTION 2. The Department of Human Services shall adopt the  rules described in sec-
tion 1 of this 2025 Act no later than July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. The Oregon Department of  Administrative Services shall study the feasibil-
ity of implementing a new  classification and payment rate for case managers who serve
seniors and persons with physical disabilities who have acute behavioral  health needs. The
department shall submit a report of the department’s  findings in the manner provided by
ORS 192.245 to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health no  later
than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 4. (1) The  Department of Human Services, in collaboration with the Oregon
Health Authority, shall conduct a study to:
(a) Identify potential funding pathways, including  under a 42 U.S.C. 1396n(i) state plan
amendment, to provide behavioral  health services to individuals who are served by the divi-
sion of the department that provides services for seniors and persons with disabilities.
(b) Develop a  shared functional needs assessment tool for functional needs assessments
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 635
HB 2678
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
conducted by the department or the authority and identify any updates to  existing technol-
ogy needed to implement the shared assessment tool.
(c) Identify a process for incorporating eligibility applications for housing  benefits, in-
cluding housing supports approved for the demonstration project under  section 1115 of the
Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1315), into the Oregon Eligibility (ONE) system.
(2) The department,  in collaboration with the authority, shall submit a report in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related  to health no later than September
15, 2026.
SECTION 5.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(b) “Service priority level” means the category of assistance that a senior or person with
a physical disability has been assessed to need to perform activities of daily living.
(2) The Department of  Human Services shall conduct a study to develop a data-driven
argument for  expanding the service priority levels for which an individual may be eligible for
medical assistance.
(3) The department shall submit a report in the manner provided  by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim  committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to health no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 6.
Sections 3 to 5 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2027.
[2]