Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the  biennium ending June 30,
2025, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000 for the purpose of making matching
deposits into individual development accounts, as provided in ORS 458.690.
SECTION 2. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 151