Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 458.665 is amended to read:
458.665. (1) The  Housing and Community Services Department shall administer the General
Housing Account.
(2)(a) The department shall  [ disburse] distribute moneys credited to the account to accomplish
the purposes  described in ORS 456.515 to 456.725, except that an amount equal to  25 percent of
moneys deposited in the account pursuant  to ORS 294.187  (2)(b) is dedicated for expenditure to meet
the critical housing needs of veterans in this state.
(b) In making the distributions under  paragraph (a) of this subsection, the department
shall take into account the counties  from which the fees deposited in the account were
charged and collected.
(3) The department may [ disburse] distribute moneys in the  account by contract, grant, loan or
otherwise as the department determines necessary.
(4) The department may set interest rates on loans made with moneys in the account.
(5) The department shall establish guidelines for the types of  loans financed with moneys in the
account by rule.
(6) The department may use moneys in the account to pay allowable administrative expenses
incurred under ORS 456.515 to 456.725.
(7) The  department may, in the director’s discretion, return moneys received for deposit in the
account to the original source of the moneys.
(8) The department  may accept moneys for deposit in the account pursuant to ORS 458.620 (4)
and enter into agreements regarding the  use of moneys deposited with the original source of the
moneys.
(9) The department shall adopt rules that:
(a) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, govern the  allocation of moneys deposited in the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2067
HB 2520
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
account to best meet critical  housing needs and build organizational capacity of partners throughout
this state; and
(b) Consistent with subsection (10) of this section,  require equitable distribution of resources
over  time based on objective measures of need, including the number and percentage of low and very
low income households in an area.
(10) The Oregon Housing Stability Council shall adopt a  policy that provides for distribution by
the department  of account moneys and account investment revenue statewide while concentrating
account moneys and  account investment revenue in those areas of this state with the greatest need,
as determined by the council, for housing for persons with a low or very low income.
SECTION 2.  ORS 458.650 is amended to read:
458.650. (1) (a) The Emergency Housing Account shall be  administered by the Housing and
Community Services Department to assist homeless persons and  those persons who are at risk of
becoming homeless[ .], except that  an amount equal to 25 percent  of moneys deposited in the ac-
count pursuant to ORS 294.187  (2)(b)  is dedicated  for expenditure for assistance to veterans who
are homeless or at risk of becoming homeless. [ For purposes of this  section, “account” means the
Emergency Housing Account. ]
(b) In administering the account and making  distributions pursuant to paragraph (a) of
this subsection, the department shall take into account the counties from  which the fees
deposited in the account were charged and collected.
(2) The Oregon Housing Stability Council shall  develop policy for awarding grants to organiza-
tions that shall use the funds to  provide to low and very low income persons, including but not
limited to, persons more than 65 years of age,  persons with disabilities, farmworkers and Native
Americans:
(a) Emergency shelters and attendant services;
(b) Transitional housing services designed to assist persons to  make the transition from
homelessness to permanent housing and economic independence;
(c) Supportive housing  services to enable persons to continue living in their own homes or to
provide in-home services for such persons for whom suitable  programs do not exist in their ge-
ographic area;
(d) Programs that provide emergency payment of home payments, rents or utilities; or
(e) Some or all of the needs described in paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection.
(3)(a) The council shall  require as a condition of awarding a grant that the organization dem-
onstrate  to  the satisfaction of the council that the organization has the capacity to deliver any
service proposed by the organization.
(b) Any funds granted under this section shall not be  used to replace existing funds. Funds
granted under this section may be used to supplement existing  funds. An organization may use funds
to support existing programs or to establish new programs.
(c) The council, by policy, shall give preference  in granting funds to those organizations that
coordinate services with those programs established under ORS 458.625.
(4) The department may expend funds from  the account for administration of the account as
provided for in the legislatively approved budget, as that term is defined  in ORS 291.002, for the
department.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 458.655 is amended to read:
458.655. (1)(a) The Home Ownership Assistance Account  shall be administered by the Housing
and Community Services Department  to expand this state’s supply of homeownership housing for low
[2]
HB 2520
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and very low income families and individuals, including, but not limited to, persons over 65  years
of age, persons with disabilities, minorities, veterans and farmworkers[ .], except that  an amount
equal to 25 percent of moneys deposited in the account pursuant to ORS 294.187  (2)(b) is dedicated
for expenditure to expand this state’s supply of homeownership  housing for low and very low income
veterans and families of veterans. [ The Oregon Housing Stability Council shall have a policy of dis-
tributing funds statewide while concentrating funds in those areas of this state with  the greatest need,
as determined by the council, for low and very low income homeownership housing. However,  the
council’s policy  of distributing funds may differ from the distribution policy for the Housing Develop-
ment and Guarantee Account. ]
(b) In administering the account and making  distributions pursuant to paragraph (a) of
this subsection, the department  shall take into account the counties from which the fees
deposited in the account were charged and collected.
(2) Funds in the Home Ownership  Assistance Account shall be granted to organizations that
both sponsor and manage low income homeownership programs,  including lease-to-own programs, for
the construction of new homeownership housing or for the acquisition or rehabilitation  of existing
structures for homeownership housing for persons of low or very low income, or both.
(3) The [ council] Oregon Housing Stability Council shall develop a policy for [ disbursing] dis-
tributing grants for any or all of the following purposes:
(a) To aid low  income homeownership programs, including program administration, in purchas-
ing land, providing assistance  with down payment costs, or providing homeownership training and
qualification services or any  combination thereof. Funds in the Home Ownership Assistance Account
may not be used  by an organization to pay for its general operations or to pay for more than 25
percent of construction or rehabilitation costs.
(b) To match public and private moneys available from other sources for purposes of  the pro-
vision of low or very low income homeownership housing.
(c) To administer the Home  Ownership Assistance Account as provided for in the legislatively
approved budget, as that term is defined in ORS 291.002, for the department.
(4) The council, in developing policy under subsection (3) of  this section, shall give preference
in making grants to those entities that propose to:
(a) Provide the greatest number  of low and very low income homeownership housing units con-
structed, acquired or rehabilitated for the amount of account money expended by matching  account
funds with other grant, loan or eligible in-kind contributions;
(b) Ensure the  longest use for the units as low or very low income homeownership housing units,
such as by including some form  of equity recapture, land trust or shared equity provisions, as de-
termined by the council;
(c) Include social services for occupants and proposed occupants of the proposed  housing, in-
cluding but not limited to, programs  that address home health care, mental health care, alcohol and
drug treatment and post-treatment care, child care, homeownership training,  mortgage qualification
service, credit repair and case management; and
(d) Support a comprehensive strategy to reverse the decreasing rates  of homeownership among
minorities, giving  priority to activities that support adopted comprehensive community plans that
incorporate recognized best practices or demonstrate proven success in  increasing homeownership
for minorities.
SECTION 4. (1) Any moneys in the General Housing Account on the effective date  of this
2017 Act that were deposited pursuant to ORS 294.187 (2)(b), that  are not used or committed
[3]
HB 2520
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
for use as provided in ORS 458.665 (2)(a),  as amended by section 1 of this 2017 Act, within two
years after the effective date  of this 2017 Act, shall be paid over to the county treasurer of
the county from which the fees were charged and  collected, and shall be credited to the
general fund of the county for purposes of affordable housing.
(2) Any moneys  in the Emergency Housing Account on the effective date of this 2017 Act
that were deposited pursuant to ORS 294.187 (2)(b), that are not used or committed for  use
as provided in ORS 458.650 (1)(a), as amended by section 2 of this 2017 Act, within  two years
after the effective date of this 2017 Act, shall be paid over to the  county treasurer of the
county from which the fees were charged and collected, and shall be credited  to the general
fund of the county for purposes of affordable housing.
(3) Any moneys in the Home Ownership Assistance Account on the effective date  of this
2017 Act that were deposited pursuant to ORS 294.187 (2)(b), that  are not used or committed
for use as provided in ORS 458.655 (1)(a),  as amended by section 3 of this 2017 Act, within two
years after the effective date of this 2017 Act, shall be paid over to  the county treasurer of
the county from which the fees were charged  and collected, and shall be credited to the
general fund of the county for purposes of affordable housing.
SECTION 5.  ORS 458.620 is amended to read:
458.620. (1) There is created, separate and distinct from the General Fund  of the State Treasury,
the Oregon Housing Fund, which consists of six separate revolving accounts:
(a) The Housing Development and Guarantee Account;
(b) The Emergency Housing Account;
(c) The Home Ownership Assistance Account;
(d) The Farmworker Housing Development Account;
(e) The General Housing Account; and
(f) The Wildfire Damage Housing Relief Account.
(2) Earnings on investment of moneys in:
(a) The Housing Development and Guarantee Account accrue to that account.
(b) The Emergency Housing Account accrue to that account.
(c) The Home Ownership Assistance Account accrue to that account.
(d) The Farmworker Housing Development Account accrue to that account.
(e) The General Housing Account accrue to that account.
(f) The Wildfire Damage Housing Relief Account accrue to that account.
(3)(a) Moneys  in the Housing Development and Guarantee Account are continuously appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department to  carry out the provisions of ORS 458.625
and 458.630.
(b) Moneys in the Emergency Housing Account are continuously  appropriated to the department
to carry out the provisions of ORS 458.650.
(c) Moneys in the Home Ownership Assistance Account are continuously appropriated to the
department to carry out the provisions of ORS 458.655.
(d) Moneys  in the Farmworker Housing Development Account are continuously appropriated to
the department to carry out the provisions of ORS 458.660.
(e) Moneys in the General Housing  Account are continuously appropriated to the department
to carry out the provisions of ORS [ 456.515 to 456.725] 458.665.
(f) Moneys in the Wildfire Damage Housing Relief Account are continuously appropriated to  the
department to carry out the provisions of ORS 458.667.
[4]
HB 2520
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
(4) Individuals and corporations, both  for profit or nonprofit, may make monetary contributions
to be credited to:
(a) The Housing Development and Guarantee Account; or
(b) The General Housing Account.
SECTION 6.
Section 4 of this 2017 Act and  the amendments to ORS 458.620, 458.650,
458.655 and 458.665 by sections 1 to 3 and 5 of this 2017 Act apply  to moneys deposited in the
General Housing  Account, the Emergency Housing Account and the Home Ownership As-
sistance Account on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
[5]