Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 (1) Notwithstanding  the time limitation for filing a complaint under ORS
659A.820, for a period of one year after the effective date of this 2020 Act,  a person who was
employed in the office of the President of the Senate and who was separated or  terminated
from employment as a result of unlawful conduct that constitutes  discrimination,
harassment or retaliation prohibited  by ORS chapter 659A, at any time on or after January
1, 2015, and before the effective date of this 2020  Act, may file a complaint with the Com-
missioner of the Bureau  of Labor and Industries in the same manner as provided by ORS
659A.820.
(2) A complaint authorized under subsection (1) of  this section must be commenced
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 174
SB 1505
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
within one year from the effective date of this 2020 Act to be considered timely.
SECTION 2.
 (1)(a) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries shall  have
the authority to conduct investigations and resolve complaints filed under  section 1 of this
2020 Act to the extent provided under ORS 659A.830.
(b) The commissioner shall investigate a complaint filed under section 1  of this 2020 Act
in the same manner as provided under ORS 659A.835.
(2) If, after the completion of an investigation under this section, the  commissioner is-
sues a finding of substantial  evidence, the commissioner shall take immediate steps to settle
the matter in the same manner as provided under ORS 659A.840, except that:
(a) The terms and conditions included in any  settlement agreement entered into under
this section may  not impose more stringent terms or conditions than the terms or conditions
included in any settlement  agreement entered into on March 5, 2019, that arose out of com-
plaints alleging conduct in violation of ORS chapter 659A.
(b) Notwithstanding the confidentiality limitations provided in ORS  17.095 and 36.230 or
any other law governing confidentiality of settlements,  the commissioner may not disclose
any terms  and conditions of a settlement agreement entered into under this section that
reveal the identity of a person to whom the settlement is paid.
(c) The commissioner shall notify the Legislative Administration Committee each time a
settlement agreement has been entered into under this section.
(d) Any moneys paid under a settlement agreement entered into under this section shall
be paid in accordance with section 4 of this 2020 Act.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of ORS chapter 183, a finding of substantial  evidence
under this  section shall be final and is not subject to further administrative or judicial re-
view.
SECTION 3.  (1) Notwithstanding ORS  659A.880, if, after completion of an investigation
of a complaint under section 2 of this 2020 Act, the  Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor
and Industries does not issue a finding  of substantial evidence and dismisses the complaint
filed under section 1 of this 2020 Act, the commissioner shall send written notice  of the dis-
missal to the complainant by mail, along  with a notice that the complainant may bring a civil
action for damages against the Legislative Assembly within  one year after the date of mail-
ing of the notice and that any right  to bring an action under this subsection will be lost if
the action is not commenced within one year after the date of mailing of the notice.
(2) A person seeking to  file an action against the Legislative Assembly under this section:
(a) May not bring an action until after the person has filed a compliant under section  1
of this 2020  Act and the commissioner has completed an investigation under section 2 of this
2020 Act and failed to issue a finding of substantial evidence.
(b) Shall file a notice of  claim within 180 days of the date of the mailing of the notice
under subsection (1) of this section in the manner proved by ORS 30.275.
(c) May bring the action in the manner provided by ORS  659A.885 and recover the same
relief as provided by ORS 659A.885 (3) for unlawful practices.
(3) Notwithstanding any time limitation for the commencement of an action provided in
ORS 30.275 (9) or 659A.875, an action under this section must be commenced not later than
one year after the date of mailing of the notice under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 4.
(1) There is established for the Legislative Assembly a  Settlement Funds
Account,  separate  and distinct from the General Fund. The Settlement Funds Account shall
[2]
SB 1505
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
consist of moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly  under section 7 of this 2020 Act.
(2) Moneys credited to the account are continuously appropriated to the Legislative Ad-
ministration Committee to be used solely for the purpose of  transferring funds to the Com-
missioner of the  Bureau of Labor and Industries, in increments of $100,000, to pay up to eight
separate settlements payable to persons who filed a complaint under  section 1 of this 2020
Act and who entered a settlement agreement under section 2 of this 2020 Act.
(3)(a) Within 30 days after the Legislative Administration  Committee has received notice
from the commissioner that a settlement agreement has  been entered into under section 2
of this 2020 Act, the committee shall transfer an amount equal to $100,000  to the commis-
sioner for payment for settlement.
(b) The Legislative Administration Committee may transfer  funds to the commissioner
for payments for settlement only after the commissioner  has issued a finding of substantial
evidence and the commissioner has notified the committee that a settlement agreement has
been entered into under section 2 of this 2020 Act.
(4) Payments for settlement made by the  commissioner under this section shall be lim-
ited to eight separate settlements. Each settlement payment may not exceed $100,000.
(5) The Legislative Administration Committee shall transfer to the  General Fund any
moneys remaining in the account after the payments for settlement under this  section have
been made.
SECTION 5.
Not later than 30 days after the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor  and
Industries has issued a payment for settlement to a person from the Settlement Funds  Ac-
count under section 4 of this 2020 Act, the commissioner shall,  subject to the confidentiality
requirements under section 2 of this 2020  Act, provide to each member of the Legislative
Assembly a report that summarizes the details of the settlement agreement and  indicates
whether the commissioner has  received more that eight complaints under section 1 of this
2020 Act.
SECTION 6. The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries shall adopt any
rules necessary to administer and enforce  the provisions of sections 1, 2 and 3 of this 2020
Act.
SECTION 7. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Legislative Administration Committee, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2021, out
of the General Fund, the  amount of $800,000, which shall be paid into the Settlement Funds
Account established under section 4 of this 2020 Act to be expended for the  purposes de-
scribed in section 4 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 8. This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]