Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 1 to 5 of this 2017 Act may be  cited as the Family Leave Benefits
Insurance Act.
SECTION 2. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(a) Although family leave laws have assisted employees to balance the demands of the
workplace with their family responsibilities, more needs to be done to achieve the  goals of
workforce stability and economic security.
(b) Many employees do not have  access to family leave, and those who do may not be in
a financial position to take leave that is unpaid.
(c) Employer-paid benefits meet only a small part of this need.
(d) The establishment  of paid family leave benefits will reduce the impact on state income
support programs by increasing the  ability of workers to recover from illness or provide
caregiving services for family members while maintaining employment.
(2) Sections 1 to 5 of this 2017 Act are enacted to allow an employee:
(a) To care for an infant or newly adopted child under 18 years of  age, or for a newly
placed foster child under 18 years of  age, or for an adopted or foster child older than 18 years
of age if the child is incapable of self-care because of a mental or physical disability.
(b) To care for a family member with a serious health condition.
(c) To recover  from or seek treatment for a serious health condition that renders the
employee unable to perform at least one of the essential functions  of the employee’s regular
position.
SECTION 3.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Application year” means the 12-month period  beginning on the first day of the cal-
endar week  in which an employee files an application for family leave benefits and, there-
after, the 12-month period beginning with the first day of the calendar week in which  the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3676
HB 3052
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
employee files a subsequent application for family  leave benefits after the expiration of the
employee’s last preceding application year.
(b) “Employer” means a covered employer as defined in ORS 659A.150.
(c) “Family leave” means a leave of absence described in ORS 659A.159 (1)(a), (b) or (c).
(d) “Family member” has the meaning given that term in ORS 659A.150.
(e) “Health care provider” has the meaning given that term in ORS 659A.150.
(f) “Paid family  leave” includes family leave with pay from the employer and family leave
during which the employee  uses any other type of paid leave, such as paid vacation leave or
paid sick leave.
(g) “Premium” means  the payments required by subsection (8) of this section to be made
for the Family Leave Benefits Insurance Account.
(h) “Qualifying year” means the first four  of the last five completed calendar quarters
or the last four completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the first day of  the
employee’s application year.
(i) “Serious health condition” has the meaning given that term in ORS 659A.150.
(2)(a) The Bureau of Labor and Industries  shall administer a Family Leave Benefits In-
surance Account and establish procedures and forms for filing  benefit claims. The bureau
shall notify the employer within five business days of a claim being filed.
(b) The bureau may require that a claim  for benefits under this section be supported by
a certification issued by a health care provider who is providing care to  the employee or the
employee’s family member, as applicable.
(c) Information contained in the files  and records pertaining to an employee under this
section is confidential and not open to public inspection, other than to public employees  in
the performance of their official duties. However, the employee or an authorized  represen-
tative of an employee may review the records  or receive specific information from the re-
cords on the presentation of  the signed authorization of the employee. An employer or the
employer’s duly authorized representative may review the records of an  employee in con-
nection with a pending claim. At  the bureau’s discretion, other persons may review records
when those persons  are rendering assistance to the bureau at any stage of the proceedings
on any matter pertaining to the administration of this section.
(3) Family leave benefits are  payable to an employee during a period in which the em-
ployee is on unpaid family leave if the employee does all of the following:
(a) Files a claim for benefits as required by rules adopted by the bureau.
(b) Establishes the employee’s eligibility to take family leave under ORS 659A.156.
(c) Establishes an application year. An application  year may not be established if the
qualifying year includes hours worked before establishment of a previous application year.
(d) Documents that the employee has notified the employer  as provided in ORS 659A.165.
(4)(a) In an application year, family leave benefits are payable for a maximum of six
weeks.
(b) The first  payment of benefits shall be made to an employee within two weeks after
the claim is filed or the family leave began, whichever is later. Subsequent payments  shall
be made twice a month thereafter.
(c) Family leave benefits shall be paid as follows:
(A) For family leave  beginning before July 1, 2020, benefits shall be $___ per week for an
employee who at the time family leave began was  regularly working 40 hours or more per
[2]
HB 3052
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
week, or  a prorated amount based on the weekly hours regularly worked for an employee
regularly working less than 40 hours per week.
(B) Family leave benefits are payable only in weekly amounts for  one or more full weeks
of family leave  taken by an employee. The minimum period of family leave for which benefits
may be paid is one week. The bureau may not pay a claim for benefits for  a period of family
leave of less than one week.
(d) If an employee dies before receiving payment of  benefits, the payment shall be made
by the bureau to the surviving spouse or to the  child or children if there is no surviving
spouse. If there is no surviving spouse and no child or children, the payment  shall be made
and distributed consistent with the  terms of the decedent’s will or, if the decedent dies
intestate, consistent with the provisions of ORS chapter 112.
(5)(a) This section may not  be construed to limit an employee’s right to take leave from
employment under other laws or employer policy.
(b) An employee is not eligible  for benefits under this section for any week for which the
employee receives paid family leave or  temporary disability benefits, or for any week for
which compensation is payable to the employee under ORS chapter 656 or under other federal
or state workers’ compensation programs. If  an employer provides paid family leave or an
employee is covered by disability insurance, the employee may  elect whether first to use the
paid family leave or to receive temporary disability benefits. An employee may not be re-
quired to use paid family leave to which the employee is entitled before receiving  benefits
under this section.
(c) The eligibility of an  employee for benefits is not affected by a strike or lockout at the
factory, establishment or other premises at which the employee is or was last employed.
(d) An employee who has  received benefits under this section may not lose any other
employment benefits,  including seniority or pension rights, accrued before the date that
family leave commenced. However, this section does not  entitle an employee to accrue em-
ployment benefits during a  period of family leave or to a right, benefit or position of em-
ployment other than  a right, benefit or position to which the employee would have been
entitled had the employee not taken family leave.
(e) This section may not be construed to diminish an employer’s obligation  to comply
with a collective bargaining agreement  or an employment benefits program or plan that
provides greater benefits to employees than the benefits provided under this section.
(f) An agreement by an  employee to waive the employee’s rights under this section is
void as contrary to public policy. The benefits under this  section may not be diminished by
a collective  bargaining agreement or another employment benefits program or plan entered
into or renewed after the effective date of this section.
(6)(a) Every employer required to pay premiums under this section  shall make and file
a report of employee hours worked and amounts due  under this section upon a combined
report form prescribed by the Department of  Revenue. If the employer is a temporary em-
ployment agency that provides employees on  a temporary basis to its customers, the tem-
porary employment agency is considered the employer for purposes  of this section. The
report shall be filed with the Department of Revenue:
(A) At the times and in the manner prescribed in ORS 316.168 and 316.171; or
(B) Annually as required or allowed pursuant to ORS 316.197 or 657.571.
(b) An employer must keep  at its place of business records of employment from which
[3]
HB 3052
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the information needed by the bureau  for purposes of this section may be obtained. The re-
cords shall at all times be open to the inspection  of the bureau pursuant to rules adopted
by the bureau.
(c) Information obtained from employer records  under this section is confidential and not
open to public inspection, other than to public  employees in the performance of their official
duties. However, an interested party shall be supplied with information from employer re-
cords to the extent necessary for the proper presentation  of the case in question. An em-
ployer may authorize inspection of the employer’s records by written consent.
(7)(a) When an employer quits business or sells out, exchanges or otherwise disposes of
the business or stock  of goods, any premium payable under this section is immediately due
and payable, and the employer shall, within 10 days  thereafter, pay the premium due. Any
person who becomes a successor to the business is liable for the full amount of the premium
and shall withhold from the purchase price a sum sufficient to pay any  premium due from
the employer until the employer produces a receipt from the bureau showing payment in full
of any premium due or a certificate that no premium is due. If the premium is not paid by
the employer within 10 days from the date of the sale, exchange  or disposal, the successor
is liable for the payment  of the full amount of premium. The successor’s payment of the
premium is, to the extent of the payment, a payment upon the purchase price, and if  the
payment is greater in amount than  the purchase price, the amount of the difference is a debt
due the successor from the employer.
(b) A successor is not liable for any premium due from the person from whom the suc-
cessor has acquired a business or stock of goods if the successor gives  written notice to the
bureau of the acquisition and no assessment is issued by the bureau within one year  after
receipt of the notice against the former operator of the business.
(8) Each employer shall withhold from the post-tax earnings of  each employee a premium
of ________ per hour worked. The employer  shall pay the withheld amounts with the report
required by subsection (6)(a) of this section. All withheld amounts  paid by employers under
this subsection shall be deposited in the Family Leave Benefits Insurance Account estab-
lished under section 4 of this 2017 Act.
(9) The bureau shall provide a  tax form to each employee who has received family leave
benefits for the employee’s use in paying federal income tax on the benefits and  shall advise
an employee filing a new  claim for family leave benefits, at the time of filing the claim, that:
(a) Benefits are subject to federal income tax; and
(b) Requirements exist pertaining to estimated tax payments.
(10) It is an  unlawful employment practice for an employer, temporary employment
agency, employment agency, employee organization or other  person to discharge, expel or
otherwise discriminate against a person because  the person has filed or communicated to the
employer an intent to file a claim, a complaint or an appeal or has testified or is about  to
testify or has assisted in any proceeding under this section.
(11)(a) Family leave benefits are payable under this section only to the extent  that mon-
eys are available in the Family Leave Benefits Insurance  Account for that purpose. Neither
the state nor the bureau is liable for any amount in excess of this limit.
(b) This section does not create a continuing entitlement or contractual right.
(12) The bureau may adopt rules as  necessary to implement this section. In adopting
rules, the bureau shall maintain consistency with the  rules adopted to implement ORS
[4]
HB 3052
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
659A.150 to 659A.186, to the extent those rules are not in conflict with this section.
(13) The bureau may  assess a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 against an employer that:
(a) Fails to withhold premiums or fails to pay when due  the moneys withheld under this
section; or
(b) Fails to comply with this section or rules adopted under this  section relating to re-
ports or other requirements necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.
(14) All civil penalties collected under this section shall be applied first toward re-
imbursement of the costs incurred in investigating violations,  conducting hearings and as-
sessing and collecting  penalties. All remaining amounts shall be paid into the State Treasury
and credited to the Family Leave Benefits Insurance Account established under  section 4 of
this 2017 Act.
(15) An employee  is disqualified from family leave benefits under this section if the em-
ployee:
(a) Willfully makes a false  statement or misrepresentation regarding a material fact, or
willfully fails to disclose a material fact, to obtain benefits;
(b) Seeks benefits based on an intentionally self-inflicted serious health condition; or
(c) Seeks benefits based on  a serious health condition that resulted from the employee’s
commission of a felony.
(16) A disqualification for benefits under subsection (15) of this section is for  a period of
two years, and commences on the first day of  the calendar week in which the employee filed
an application for  benefits under this section. Any employee who is disqualified for benefits
under subsection (15) of  this section is also liable to the bureau for a penalty in an amount
equal to 15 percent of the amount of benefits received by the employee.
(17) If an employee receives  benefits under this section to which the employee is not
entitled:
(a) The employee is liable to the bureau for the amount of benefits received; and
(b) The amount of benefits  received may be deducted by the bureau from any future
benefits otherwise payable to the employee under this section.
(18) If the  bureau decides that an employee has been paid benefits to which the employee
is not entitled because of an error, and that the  employee is not subject to disqualification
under subsection (15) of  this section, the amounts received in error may be recovered by the
bureau only by deductions from benefits  otherwise payable to the employee under this sec-
tion during the 52 weeks following the date on which the order establishing the amount of
the erroneous payment becomes final. If amounts  determined to be recoverable have not
been paid within that time, the liability shall be canceled by the bureau and charged against
the Family Leave Benefits Insurance Account established under section 4 of this 2017 Act.
(19) Except as provided  in subsection (18) of this section, if benefits determined to be
recoverable under this section have not been paid within three years after the date that  the
order of the bureau establishing the liability of the employee becomes final,  and no payments
have been received on the liability for at least three months, the  liability shall be canceled
by the bureau and charged against the Family Leave Benefits Insurance Account.
(20) Any amount due under this section  may be collected by the bureau in a civil action
against the employee brought in the name of the bureau.
(21) Interest on any benefits recoverable under this section shall be paid  and collected
at the same time repayment of benefits is  made by the employee. Interest on an amount
[5]
HB 3052
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
recoverable under this section accrues at the rate specified in ORS  82.010, beginning on the
first day of the month following 60 days after  entry of the order establishing the amount of
the overpayment.
(22) Any amount collected under this section by the bureau shall  be paid into the Family
Leave Benefits Insurance Account.
SECTION 4. The Family Leave Benefits Insurance Account is  established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Interest earned by the account shall
be credited to the account. All moneys from premiums received  by the Department of Re-
venue shall be credited to  the account. Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated
to the Bureau of Labor and Industries for the purposes authorized by section 3 of  this 2017
Act.
SECTION 5. (1) An employer that is not subject to section 3 of this 2017 Act or a self-
employed person may elect to provide benefits to the employer’s  employees or to the self-
employed person under section 3 of this 2017 Act for  an initial coverage period of not less
than three years and subsequent coverage periods of not less  than one year. The employer
or self-employed person must file a written notice  of election with the Bureau of Labor and
Industries. The election becomes effective on the date the notice is filed.
(2) An employer or  self-employed person who makes an election under this section may
withdraw the election not more than 30 days after the end of the initial  three-year coverage
period, or at such other times as the bureau by rule  may prescribe. An election to withdraw
must be made by written notice to the bureau and takes effect no sooner than  30 days after
the filing of the notice.
(3) The bureau may cancel an  election under this section if the employer or self-employed
person fails to remit required premiums or reports. The bureau may collect unpaid premiums
and may levy an additional premium for the remainder  of the coverage period. A cancellation
under this subsection becomes effective 30 days after the issuance of a  written notice of the
cancellation to the employer or self-employed person or such earlier time as specified  in the
notice.
SECTION 6. Section 5 of this 2017 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2020.
SECTION 7. Sections 1 to 5 of this 2017 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
659A.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding section 3 of this 2017 Act:
(1) Employers shall first withhold premiums from employees’  earnings for hours worked
on and after January 1, 2019.
(2) Employees  may first file claims for benefits under section 3 of this 2017 Act on or
after July 1, 2019, for family leave taken on or after July 1, 2019.
SECTION 9.  ORS 316.168 is amended to read:
316.168. (1) Except as otherwise provided by law,  every employer subject to the provisions of
ORS 316.162 to 316.221[ ,] or 656.506 [ and], sections 1 to 5 of this  2017 Act or  ORS chapter 657,
or a payroll-based tax imposed by a mass transit district and administered by the Department of
Revenue under ORS 305.620, shall make and file a combined  quarterly tax and assessment report
upon a form prescribed by the department.
(2) The report shall be filed with  the Department of Revenue on or before the last day of the
month following the quarter  to which the report relates and shall be deemed received on the date
of mailing, as provided in ORS 305.820.
[6]
HB 3052
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
(3) The  report shall be accompanied by payment of any tax or assessment due and a combined
tax and assessment payment coupon prescribed  by the department. The employer shall indicate on
the coupon the amount of the total payment and the  portions of the payment to be paid to each of
the tax or assessment programs.
(4) The  Department of Revenue shall credit the payment to the tax or assessment programs in
the amounts indicated by the employer on the coupon  and shall promptly remit the payments to the
appropriate taxing or assessing body.
(5) If the employer fails to allocate the payment on the coupon, the department shall allocate
the payment to the proper tax or assessment programs on  the basis of the percentage the payment
bears to the total amount due.
(6) The Department of Revenue  shall distribute copies of the combined quarterly tax and as-
sessment report and the necessary tax or assessment payment information  to each of the agencies
charged with the administration of a tax or assessment covered by the report.
(7) The Department of Revenue, the Employment Department and  the Department of Consumer
and Business Services shall  develop a system of account numbers and assign to each employer a
single account number  representing all of the tax and assessment programs included in the combined
quarterly tax and assessment report.
SECTION 10.  ORS 316.171 is amended to read:
316.171. Except  as provided in this section and ORS 314.840, 316.168, 316.197, 316.202 and 657.571
and sections 1 to 5 of this 2017 Act , the statutes  and regulations applicable to each agency, re-
quiring a report and imposing a tax, shall govern the audit and examination  of reports and returns,
determination  of  deficiencies, assessments, claims for refund, penalties, interest, administrative and
judicial appeals and the procedures relating thereto.
[7]