Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 338.125 is amended to read:
338.125. (1) Student enrollment in a public charter school is voluntary.
(2)(a) All students who reside in the school district in which the public charter  school is located
are eligible for enrollment in the public charter school if space is available.
(b) Students  who do not reside in the school district in which the public charter school is lo-
cated are eligible for enrollment in the public charter school if  space is available [ and subject to
subsection (5) of this section ].
(c) A public charter  school may not limit student enrollment based on race, religion, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, ethnicity, national origin, disability, the terms of an  individualized ed-
ucation  program,  income level, proficiency in the English language or athletic ability. A public
charter school may implement a weighted lottery  that favors historically underserved students as
provided by subsection (3)(a) of this section.
(3)(a) Except as provided by paragraphs (b) and (c)  of this subsection, if the number of applica-
tions from students exceeds the capacity  of a program, class, grade level or building, the public
charter school shall select  students through an equitable lottery selection process. For the purpose
of ameliorating the impact of discrimination against  historically underserved students, an equitable
lottery selection process may include weights that  favor historically underserved students. As used
in this  paragraph, “historically underserved students” are students who are at risk because of any
combination of their race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ethnicity, disability, income  level,
proficiency in the English language, socioeconomic status or geographic location.
(b)(A) A  public charter school may give priority for admission to students who reside within the
attendance boundaries that were in effect at  the time a school district closed a nonchartered public
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1127
HB 2185
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
school if:
(i) The public charter school began to operate  not more than two years after the nonchartered
public school was closed;
(ii) The school district that closed the nonchartered  public school is the sponsor of the public
charter school;
(iii) The public charter school  is physically located within the attendance boundaries of the
closed nonchartered public school; and
(iv) The school district board, through board action, approved the public charter school  giving
priority as described in this paragraph.
(B) Nothing in this paragraph requires an amendment to a charter.  A school district board may
take an action described in subparagraph (A)(iv) of this  paragraph at any time during the term of
a charter.
(c) After a public charter school has been in operation for one or more  years, the public charter
school may give priority for admission to students who:
(A) Were enrolled in the prior year in the public charter school;
(B) Were enrolled  in a public preschool or prekindergarten program operated by the public
charter school;
(C) Have siblings who are presently enrolled in the school and who were  enrolled in the school
in the prior year;
(D) Are at risk because the student has an economic  or academic disadvantage that requires
special services or assistance, including students who:
(i) Are from economically disadvantaged families;
(ii) Are identified as having special educational needs;
(iii) Are limited in proficiency in the English language;
(iv) Are at risk of dropping out of high school; or
(v) Do not meet minimum standards of academic proficiency; or
(E) If the public charter school is  a party to a cooperative agreement described in ORS 338.080,
reside in the school  district that is the sponsor of the public charter school or in a school district
that is a party to the cooperative agreement.
(4) A student who wishes to enroll in a virtual public charter school does not need the approval
of the school district where the  student is a resident before the student enrolls in the virtual public
charter school. If a student wishes  to enroll in a virtual public charter school, the parent, legal
guardian or person in parental relationship with the student must provide the following  notices to
the school district where the student is a resident:
(a) Intent to enroll the student in a virtual public charter school; and
(b) Enrollment of the student in a virtual public charter school.
[(5)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this section and ORS 339.133,  if more than three percent
of the students who reside in  a school district are enrolled in virtual public charter schools that are
not sponsored by the  school district, a student who is a resident of the school district must receive
approval from the school district before enrolling in a virtual public charter school.  A school district
is not required to give approval if more than three  percent of the students who reside in the school
district are enrolled in virtual public charter schools that are not sponsored by  the school district. A
school district must provide notice of the decision to not give approval within 10  calendar days of re-
ceiving notice of intent for the student to enroll in a virtual public charter school. ]
[(b) For the purpose of determining whether more than three percent of the students who  reside in
[2]
HB 2185
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the school district are enrolled in virtual public charter schools  that are not sponsored by the school
district, the school district board shall: ]
[(A) Include any students who: ]
[(i) Reside in the school district, regardless of  whether the students are considered residents of
different school districts as provided by ORS 339.133 (5); and ]
[(ii) Are enrolled in virtual public charter schools that are not sponsored by the school district. ]
[(B) Calculate, at least twice each  year, the school district’s percentage of students attending virtual
public charter schools that are not sponsored by the school district. ]
[(c)(A) Except as provided by subparagraph (B) of this paragraph,  students who reside in the
school district, regardless of whether the students are  considered residents of different school districts
as provided by ORS 339.133 (5), must receive approval from the school district before enrolling  in a
virtual public charter school if the limit described in paragraph (a) of this subsection has been met. ]
[(B) A  student is not required to receive approval from the school district in which the student
resides if the student: ]
[(i) Previously lived in another school district; ]
[(ii) While living in the other school district, was enrolled in a virtual public charter school; and ]
[(iii) Has maintained continuous enrollment in the virtual public charter school since  moving into
the school district where the student currently resides. ]
[(d) If the school district does not give approval under paragraph (a)  of this subsection, the school
district must provide to the parent, legal guardian  or person in parental relationship with the student
information about: ]
[(A) The percentage  of students in the resident district that attend virtual public charter schools
that are not sponsored by the school district, based on the most recent calculation; ]
[(B) The right to appeal the decision to the State Board of Education; and ]
[(C) Other online options available to the student. ]
[(e) If an appeal is made to the State Board of Education as described in  paragraph (d) of this
subsection, the board must issue a decision within 14 days of the submission of the appeal. ]
[(6)] (5) Within 10 days of a student’s enrollment in a public  charter school, the public charter
school shall provide written notice of the student’s enrollment to the school district in which  the
public charter school is located if the student does not reside in the school  district where the public
charter school is located.
[(7)] (6) Within 10 days  of receiving the notice described in subsection [ (6)] (5) of this section,
the school district  in which the public charter school is located shall provide to the student’s parent,
legal guardian or person in parental relationship written information about:
(a) The school district’s responsibility to  identify, locate and evaluate students enrolled in the
public charter school to determine which students may be in  need of special education and related
services as provided by ORS 338.165; and
(b) The methods by which  the school district may be contacted to answer questions or provide
information related to special education and related services.
[(8)] (7) When a student described in subsection [ (6)] (5) of this section withdraws from a public
charter school for a reason  other than graduation from high school, the school district in which the
public charter school is located shall:
(a) Provide to the school district in which the student resides written notice that the student
has withdrawn.
(b) Provide to the student’s parent, legal guardian or  person in parental relationship written
[3]
HB 2185
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
information about:
(A) The responsibility of the school  district in which the student resides to identify, locate and
evaluate students who reside in the school district to determine which students may be in need  of
special education and related services as provided by ORS 338.165; and
(B) The methods by  which the school district in which the student resides may be contacted to
answer questions or provide information related to special education and related services.
[(9)(a)] (8)(a) If  a student described in subsection [ (6)] (5)  of this section enrolls in a public
charter  school  and has an individualized education program, the school district in which the public
charter school is  located must implement the individualized education program and follow the terms
of the individualized education program until a new individualized education program is developed.
(b) If a student described in subsection [ (6)] (5) of this section withdraws  from a public charter
school and has  an individualized education program, the school district in which the student resides
must implement the  individualized education program and follow the terms of the individualized ed-
ucation program until a new individualized education program is developed.
[(10)] (9) When a virtual public charter school enrolls a student or a student no longer  is en-
rolled in a virtual public charter school, the virtual public charter school shall  provide the written
notices described in ORS 338.120 (1)(m) and (n)  to the school district where the student is a resident.
[(11)] (10) A public charter  school may conduct fund-raising activities but may not require a
student to participate in fund-raising activities as a  condition of admission to the public charter
school.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 338.025 is amended to read:
338.025. (1) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for  the implementation
of this chapter. The rules shall follow the intent of this chapter.
(2) Upon application by a public charter school, the State  Board of Education may grant a
waiver of any provision of this chapter if the waiver promotes the  development of programs by
providers, enhances the equitable access by underserved families to the public education of  their
choice, extends the equitable access to  public support by all students or permits high quality pro-
grams of unusual cost.  The State Board of Education may not waive any appeal provision in this
chapter or any provision under ORS  338.115 (1)(a) to (aa), 338.120, [ 338.125 (5),] 338.135 (2)(b) or
339.122.
SECTION 3. (1) The amendments to ORS 338.025 and  338.125 by sections 1 and 2 of this
2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2025.
(2) The amendments to ORS 338.125 by section 1 of this 2025 Act first  apply to the
2025-2026 school year.
(3) Notwithstanding the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section,  a stu-
dent is not required to receive approval from the student’s resident  school district before
enrolling in a virtual public charter school  that is not sponsored by the student’s resident
school district  before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section if the en-
rollment is for the 2025-2026 school year or any other subsequent school year.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]