Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Distant site” means the site where  a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677, or
other licensed health  care practitioner, who provides health care services through telehealth
is located at the time the physician or licensed health care practitioner provides the  health
care service through telehealth.
(b) “Originating site” means the site where the patient  is located at the time the patient
receives health care services provided through telehealth.
(c) “School-based health center” has the meaning given that term in ORS 413.225.
(d) “School nurse” means:
(A) A school nurse as defined in ORS 342.455; or
(B) A registered nurse who is an employee or contractor of a  school district and who
practices nursing in a school setting.
(e) “Telehealth” means the use of  electronic and telecommunication technologies to de-
liver health care services to a patient.
(2)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall award grant moneys to an  eligible school-based
health center pilot project to expand student access to mental  and physical health care ser-
vices and to  improve the health and education outcomes of students through the use of
telehealth.
(b) To be eligible for a grant under this subsection, a school-based health  center shall
enter into a pilot project  agreement with a school district. The pilot project agreement must
provide that:
(A) The school-based health center is the distant site that provides telehealth  in con-
junction with a school nurse located at the originating site; and
(B) The school-based health  center will allocate to the school district a portion of funds
received under this subsection to increase school nurse capacity and assist in offsetting costs
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3224
HB 2841
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
incurred by the  school district as a result of the school district’s participation in the pilot
project.
(c) Funds described in this subsection may be used to:
(A) Compensate the following individuals for services provided pursuant to a pilot project:
(i) A school nurse;
(ii) A licensed health care practitioner located at a school-based health center; and
(iii) Administrative or technical staff at a school-based health center;
(B) Cover the costs of:
(i) Technical equipment necessary to provide telehealth; and
(ii) Technical assistance related to the use and function of equipment  necessary to pro-
vide telehealth; and
(C) Cover other costs related to the pilot project’s provision of telehealth.
(3) The authority:
(a) Shall assist school-based health centers and school districts that enter into pilot
project agreements in the efficient use of funds distributed  under subsection (2) of this sec-
tion.
(b) May coordinate with one or more statewide nonprofit organizations that have  expe-
rience in supporting school-based health  centers and school nurses to carry out this section.
(4) A school-based health center that operates a pilot project  shall report, on an interval
determined by the authority, to the authority on the progress of  the pilot project in a man-
ner that allows the authority to determine the effectiveness of the pilot project.
(5) The authority shall establish a process  to evaluate at least the following information
regarding a pilot project established under this section:
(a) Billing practices and reimbursements;
(b) Access to health care services;
(c) Impact on student absence from schools; and
(d) Workflow practices.
(6) Not later than December 31, 2025, the authority shall submit a report, in  the manner
provided in ORS 192.245, to an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related  to
health care, on the effectiveness and success of  pilot projects established under this section.
The authority may include in the report submitted under  this subsection recommendations
for legislation.
SECTION 2.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium  be-
ginning July 1, 2021, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $950,000 for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 4. (1) Section 1 of this 2021 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2022.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take any  action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the authority to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the authority by section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]