Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Business Development Department shall conduct a study  of the
security upgrade needs of small businesses in Oregon. The department  shall submit a report
of its findings to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to economic
development in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4494