Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 809.235 is amended to read:
809.235. (1)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 809.409 (2), the  court shall order that a person’s driving
privileges be permanently revoked if the person is convicted of any degree of murder  and the court
finds that the person intentionally used a motor  vehicle as a dangerous weapon resulting in the
death of the victim, or if the person is  convicted of aggravated vehicular homicide, manslaughter in
the first or second  degree resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle, criminally negligent
homicide resulting from the operation of a  motor vehicle or assault in the first degree resulting from
the operation of a motor vehicle.
(b) The court shall order that a person’s driving privileges be permanently  revoked if the person
is convicted of felony driving while under the influence of intoxicants in  violation of ORS 813.010
or if the person is convicted  for a third or subsequent time of any of the following offenses in any
combination:
(A) Driving while under the influence of intoxicants in violation of:
(i) ORS 813.010; or
(ii) The statutory counterpart to ORS 813.010 in another jurisdiction.
(B) A driving under the influence of intoxicants offense in another jurisdiction that involved the
impaired driving of a vehicle due to the use of an intoxicant or a combination of intoxicants.
(C) A driving offense  in another jurisdiction that involved operating a vehicle while having a
blood alcohol content above that jurisdiction’s permissible blood alcohol content.
(c) For the purposes of paragraph (b) of  this subsection, a conviction for a driving offense in
another jurisdiction based solely on a  person under 21 years of age having a blood alcohol content
that is lower than the permissible blood alcohol  content in that jurisdiction for a person 21 years
of age or older does not constitute a prior conviction.
(2)(a) A person whose  driving privileges are revoked as described in subsection (1) of this sec-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4144
SB 932
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tion may file a petition in the  circuit court of the county in which the person’s driving privileges
were revoked for an order restoring the person’s driving privileges.  A petition may be filed under
this subsection no sooner than 10 years after the person is:
(A) Released on parole or  post-prison supervision for the crime for which the person’s driving
privileges were revoked and any other crimes arising out of the same criminal episode;
(B) Sentenced to probation for the crime for which the person’s driving privileges were  revoked,
unless the probation is revoked, in which case  the petition may be filed no sooner than 10 years
after the date probation is revoked; or
(C) Sentenced for the crime for which the  person’s driving privileges were revoked, if no other
provision of this paragraph applies.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)  of this subsection, if during the revocation period for the
crime for which the person was convicted the person is  convicted of a criminal offense involving a
motor vehicle, the person may file a petition to  restore driving privileges as described in paragraph
(a) of  this subsection no sooner than  the amount of time described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection, [ 10 years from the date of the  most recent conviction involving a motor vehicle. ] plus an
additional amount of time consecutive to the time described  in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section. The additional amount of time shall  equal the amount of time between the date of
the most recent conviction involving a motor vehicle and the time remaining  before a person
may file a petition under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) The district attorney of the county in which the person’s driving privileges were  revoked
shall be named and served as the respondent in the petition.
(3) The court shall hold a hearing on a petition filed in accordance with  subsection (2) of this
section. In determining whether to grant the petition, the court shall consider:
(a) The nature of the offense for which driving privileges were revoked.
(b) The degree of violence involved in the offense.
(c) Other criminal and relevant noncriminal  behavior of the petitioner both before and after the
conviction that resulted in the revocation.
(d) The recommendation  of the person’s parole officer, which shall be based in part on a psy-
chological evaluation ordered by the court to  determine whether the person is presently a threat to
the safety of the public.
(e) Any other relevant factors.
(4) The court shall order a petitioner’s driving privileges restored if, after  a hearing described
in subsection (3) of this section, the court  finds by clear and convincing evidence that the petitioner:
(a) Is rehabilitated;
(b) Does not pose a threat to the safety of the public; and
(c) If the sentence for the crime for which  the petitioner’s driving privileges were revoked re-
quired the petitioner to complete an alcohol or drug treatment program, has  completed an alcohol
or drug treatment program in a facility approved by the  Director of the Oregon Health Authority
or a similar program in another jurisdiction.
(5) Upon receiving a court order to restore a person’s driving privileges,  the department may
reinstate driving privileges in accordance with ORS 809.390, except that the department  may not
reinstate driving privileges of any person whose privileges are revoked under  this section until the
person complies with future responsibility filings.
(6) The provisions of this section do not apply to  convictions of driving while under the influ-
ence of intoxicants if the offense was committed while the person was riding a bicycle.
[2]
SB 932
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
(7) For the purposes of this section, “bicycle” does not include an electric assisted bicycle.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 809.235  by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to indi-
viduals whose most recent conviction involving a motor vehicle occurred  on or after January
1, 2023.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]