Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Land Conservation and Development shall  study
Oregon’s land use system and shall submit a report in the manner  provided by ORS 192.245,
and may include recommendations for legislation, to the  interim committees of the Legisla-
tive Assembly related to land use no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3233