Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 336.059 is amended to read:
336.059. (1)  Each school district board shall adopt a child sexual abuse and child sex traffick-
ing prevention [ instructional program ] curriculum for students in kindergarten through grade 12.
(2) School districts must include in the program:
(a) Developmentally appropriate, culturally sensitive and evidence-based instruction for each
grade level;
(b) [ A minimum of four instructional sessions ] An instructional  lesson offered a minimum of
four times  per school year, with each year’s instruction building on the previous  year’s instruction;
(c) Age-appropriate curriculum including  role-playing, discussion, activities and books to educate
students regarding child sexual abuse and child sex trafficking  prevention;
(d) Instruction providing  students with the knowledge and tools to communicate incidents of
sexual abuse  and child sex trafficking ;
(e) Instruction regarding “safe touch,”  “unsafe touch,” [ “safe secrets,” “unsafe secrets,” and how
to escape and report a sexual abuse situation ] “safe secrets” and “unsafe secrets” and how to set
healthy boundaries;
(f) Techniques for how to escape and report  a sexual abuse or child sex trafficking situ-
ation;
[(f)] (g) Techniques to recognize child sexual abuse  and child sex trafficking , skills to reduce
vulnerability and encouragement to report child sexual abuse  and child sex trafficking ;
[(g)] (h) An evaluation component with measurable outcomes;
[(h)] (i) A professional training component  for administrators, teachers and other school per-
sonnel regarding :
(A) Communicating child sexual abuse and child sex trafficking  prevention techniques to
students[,];
(B) Understanding the  effects of child sexual abuse and child sex trafficking  on children[ ,];
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1223
SB 767
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
(C) Making and receiving child sexual abuse and child sex trafficking reports and disclosures
and mandated reporting; and
(D) Coordinating with relevant state and local agencies on reporting and procedural pro-
tocols;
[(i)] (j) A parental  involvement component to inform parents about child sexual abuse and child
sex trafficking  topics, including characteristics of  offenders, “grooming” behaviors and how to
discuss child sexual abuse and child sex trafficking  prevention with children[ .]; and
(k) The prevalence, nature and strategies used for child sex trafficking, including  peer
recruitment, familial trafficking and online solicitation.
(3) Program instruction may be  delivered by instructors including teachers, school counselors
and outside agency prevention educators, provided  the instructors have knowledge of and training
in child sexual abuse and child sex trafficking  prevention.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 336.059 by section 1 of this 2025  Act first apply to
the 2025-2026 school year.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]