Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The  Department of Education shall conduct a study to identify sources
of funding to  pay for costs of establishing a secure, single point of entry for each public
school in this state. The study shall consider existing grants  and funding sources for school
rehabilitation and capital costs.
(2) The department shall report  the results of the study in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may include recommendations for  legislation, to an interim committee of the
Legislative Assembly related to education no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 907