Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 244.060 is amended to read:
244.060. The statement of economic interest filed under ORS  244.050 shall be on a form pre-
scribed by the  Oregon Government Ethics Commission. The public official or candidate filing the
statement shall supply the information required by this section and ORS 244.090, as follows:
(1) The names of  all positions as officer , director, manager, member or partner  of a business
[and business  directorships ] held by the public official or candidate or a member of the household
of the public  official or candidate during the preceding calendar year, and the principal address and
a brief description of each business.
(2) [All] The names of all other businesses not  supplied under subsection (1) of this section
under which the public official or candidate and  members of the household of the public official or
candidate do business and the principal address and a brief description of each business.
(3) The names,  principal addresses and brief descriptions of the sources of income received
during the preceding calendar year by the public official or candidate or a member of the household
of the public official or candidate that produce 10 percent or  more of the total annual household
income.
(4)(a) A list of all real property in which the  public official or candidate or a member of the
household of the public official or candidate has or has had  any personal, beneficial ownership in-
terest during the  preceding calendar year, any options to purchase or sell real property, including
a land sales contract, and any other rights  of any kind in real property located within the ge-
ographic boundaries of the governmental agency of which the public  official holds, or the candidate
if elected would  hold, an official position or over which the public official exercises, or the candidate
if elected would exercise, any authority.
(b) This subsection does not require  the listing of the principal residence of the public official
or candidate.
(5) All expenses with an aggregate value  exceeding $50 received by the public official during the
preceding calendar year when participating  in a convention, mission, trip or other meeting described
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 428
HB 2923
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in ORS 244.020 (7)(b)(F),  including the name and address of the organization, unit of government,
tribe or corporation paying the expenses, the nature of the event  and the date and amount of the
expense.
(6) All expenses with an aggregate value  exceeding $50 received by the public official during the
preceding calendar year when participating in a mission, negotiations  or economic development ac-
tivities described in ORS 244.020 (7)(b)(H), including the name and address of the  person paying the
expenses, the nature of the event and the date and amount of the expenditure.
(7) All honoraria and other items allowed under ORS 244.042 with a  value exceeding $15 that
are received by the public official, candidate or member of the household of the public official  or
candidate during the preceding calendar year, the provider of each honorarium or item and  the date
and time of the event for which the honorarium or item was received.
(8) The name, principal address and brief description  of each source of income exceeding an
aggregate amount of $1,000, whether or not taxable, received by the public official or  candidate, or
a member of the household  of the public official or candidate, during the preceding calendar year,
if the source of that income is derived from an individual or business that has  a legislative or ad-
ministrative interest or that has been doing business, does business or could reasonably be expected
to do business with the governmental agency of which the public official holds,  or the candidate if
elected would hold, an official position or over which the public official exercises,  or the candidate
if elected would exercise, any authority.
(9)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of  this subsection, the name, principal address and
brief description of each source of  income received during the preceding calendar year by a business
identified under subsections (1) and (2) of this section if:
(A) The source of income has a legislative or administrative interest  or has been doing business,
does business or  could reasonably be expected to do business with the governmental agency of
which the public official holds, or the candidate if elected would hold,  an official position or over
which the public official exercises, or the candidate if elected would exercise, any authority; and
(B) Ten percent or more of the total gross annual income of the business identified under sub-
sections (1) and (2) of this section comes from the source of income.
(b)(A) This  subsection does not require the public official or candidate filing the statement to
supply information that the public  official or candidate has a statutory duty to keep privileged or
confidential if the public official or candidate complies with the procedure set forth  in subparagraph
(B) of this paragraph.
(B) If the  public official or candidate has a statutory duty to keep privileged or confidential in-
formation otherwise required to be disclosed under this subsection, the public official or candidate
shall:
(i) Make a formal request to each source of income  for which the statutory duty exists, asking
if the public official or candidate has the  permission of the source of income to make the disclosure
required under this subsection;
(ii) File a signed statement  with the commission stating that the public official or candidate has
made the formal request described in sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph; and
(iii) Report each  source of income that responds in the affirmative to the request made under
sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph within 10 business days of receiving the request.
(c) A public official or candidate shall be  deemed to be in compliance with supplying the infor-
mation required under this subsection if the public official or candidate:
(A) Accurately submits the information required under this subsection; or
[2]
HB 2923
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
(B)(i) Makes a formal request to each source of income that provided  10 percent or more of the
total gross annual income of the business identified under subsections (1) and (2) of this  section,
asking if that source of income has a legislative or administrative interest or has been doing  busi-
ness, does business or  could reasonably be expected to do business with the governmental agency
of which the public official  holds, or the candidate if elected would hold, an official position or over
which the public official exercises, or the candidate if elected would exercise, any authority; and
(ii) Reports each source of income that responds in the  affirmative to the request made under
sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 244.060 by section 1 of this 2025  Act apply to
statements of economic interest filed on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[3]