Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Voter Inactivation  and Voter Registration Mainte-
nance is established, consisting of nine members as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint one  member from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Senate Minority Leader  shall appoint one member from among members of the
Senate.
(c) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(d) The House Minority Leader shall appoint one  member from among members of the
House of Representatives.
(e) The Governor shall appoint:
(A) One citizen member from a rural community; and
(B) Three citizen members from the population at large.
(f) The Secretary of State or the secretary’s designee.
(2) The task force shall study how to:
(a) Prevent the inadvertent or incorrect designation of an elector’s voter registration as
inactive; and
(b) Increase the accuracy of the registration information maintained for each elector.
(3) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(4) Official action  by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the members
of the task force.
(5) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(6) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(7) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2675
HB 2431
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(8) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(9) The task force shall  submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may
include recommendations for legislation, to a joint  interim committee of the Legislative As-
sembly related to elections no later than September 15, 2017.
(10) The Secretary of State shall provide staff support to the task force.
(11) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(12) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of its duties and, to the extent permitted  by laws relating
to confidentiality, to furnish such information and advice as the members of the task  force
consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this  2017 Act is repealed on the date of the convening of the 2018
regular session of the Legislative Assembly as specified in ORS 171.010.
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]