Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Human Services shall establish and administer  the
Youth Support and Repayment Grant Program as described in this section.
(2) No later than September 15, 2026, the department shall:
(a) Identify each person from whom, during the period of time beginning January 1, 1998,
and ending on the effective date of this  2025 Act, while the person was under 21 years of age
and in the care or custody of the department, the state seized Social  Security benefits, death
benefits, survivor benefits, crime  victim impact payments or any other benefits or resources
intended for the person and used the seized  funds or resources to pay for services that were
provided to the person and that the person would otherwise have been entitled to or  eligible
for through any state or federal agency or public or private program.
(b) Send each person identified in paragraph (a) of this  subsection notification of the
following:
(A) That they were impacted by the state’s seizure of funds;
(B) How to obtain more information regarding which funds were seized, when  the seizure
occurred and the total value of the funds that were seized;
(C) That the person may be eligible to participate in the Youth Support  and Repayment
Grant Program; and
(D) Instructions for submitting an application to the program.
(3) Using  funds in the Youth Support and Repayment Grant Fund established in section
2 of this 2025 Act, the department shall award  grants to persons described in subsection
(2)(a) of this section.
(4) The department shall by  rule establish the application process for the grant program.
(5) Grant recipients may make multiple  applications for grants. The cumulative value of
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1497
SB 740
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
grants awarded to a specific grant recipient may not exceed 125 percent of the total  funds
seized by the state for  services provided to the person while in the care or custody of the
department.
(6) Grants may be awarded under this section for:
(a) Services and expenses to support the grant  recipient’s success in completing high
school or post-secondary education, including tutoring, summer courses or  other similar
services, and for activities fees, supplies and equipment for extracurricular activities,  when
no other funding is available to the recipient for those expenses.
(b) Post-secondary  education and training, including books, tuition, fees, equipment, ap-
plications and placement exams not covered through other  programs for which the recipient
is eligible.
(c) Housing, including a down payment for a house.
(d) Training, including training based on a peer  support model, related to financial liter-
acy, home ownership, parenting, safe relationships and other subjects related  to successful
independent living.
(e) One-time purchases  of essential household supplies, including furniture, kitchen
equipment, linens and cleaning supplies.
(f) Medical, dental and vision services  and supplies not otherwise covered by insurance,
including comprehensive reproductive health services.
(g) Child care for the recipient’s minor child.
(h) Start up costs for a business.
(i) Transportation, including the purchase of  a reliable vehicle or bicycle, to work,
training or affordable housing.
(j) Mental health services and  treatment when those services and treatment are volun-
tary, not otherwise covered by insurance and selected by the recipient.
(k) Travel for education purposes.
(L) Other purposes, determined by the department by rule, designed to further the  suc-
cess of the recipient in high school completion,  post-secondary education and training,
housing stability, professional growth, home ownership and safe and successful parenting.
(7) A grant awarded under this section may supplement but not supplant  other resources
and services available to the  grant recipient, or for which the grant recipient is entitled or
eligible, through any state or federal agency or public or private program.
(8) If moneys remain in the Youth Support  and Repayment Grant Fund established in
section 2 of this 2025 Act on January 1, 2055, the department, by  rule, may expand eligibility
for grants awarded under this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) There is established the Youth Support  and Repayment Grant Fund,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Youth  Support and
Repayment Grant Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The moneys in  the fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of Human
Services for purposes of the grant program established in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. Sections 1  and 2 of this 2025 Act are repealed on the later of the date the
moneys in the Youth Support and Repayment Grant Fund are depleted or January 2, 2055.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]