Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Impact statement” means a written statement that describes the impact that the
establishment or revision of a scope  of practice may have on the health care providers who
practice the health care profession  that is the subject of the scope of practice request, on
the health care providers who  practice other health care professions and on the public, and
that contains any other information required by the Oregon Health Authority by rule.
(b) “Scope of practice” means the activities within a health care profession that an indi-
vidual authorized to practice that health care profession is allowed to perform.
(c) “Scope of practice request” means a written request to  establish or revise the scope
of practice for a health care profession.
(2) The authority shall establish by rule a process to receive and review scope of  practice
requests for the following health care professions:
(a) Physicians licensed under ORS chapter 677;
(b) Physician associates licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525;
(c) Podiatric physicians and surgeons, as defined in ORS 677.010;
(d) Naturopathic physicians licensed under ORS chapter 685;
(e) Optometrists licensed under ORS 683.010 to 683.340;
(f) Psychologists licensed under ORS 675.010 to 675.150;
(g) Chiropractic physicians licensed under ORS chapter 684;
(h) Direct entry midwives licensed under ORS 687.405 to 687.495; and
(i) Acupuncturists licensed under ORS 677.757 to 677.770.
(3) The scope of practice review process established under subsection (2) of  this section
must:
(a)(A) Allow any person or entity acting on  behalf of health care providers who practice
the health care profession that is the subject of the scope  of practice request to submit a
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 244
HB 2585
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
request for review of the scope of practice request; and
(B) Allow any person or  entity acting on behalf of health care providers who practice a
health care profession that may be directly impacted by the  scope of practice request to
submit an impact statement;
(b) Establish a process to convene a  temporary scope of practice review panel as de-
scribed in subsection (4) of this section; and
(c) Facilitate the report required under subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Upon receipt of a scope of practice request,  the authority shall convene a tempo-
rary scope of practice review panel that consists of the following members:
(A) Two members who are recommended by  the person who or entity that submitted the
scope of practice request to represent health  care providers who practice the health care
profession that is the subject of the scope of practice request;
(B) Two members recommended by each  person who or entity that submitted an impact
statement to represent health care providers who practice a health care profession that  may
be impacted by the scope of practice request as described in the impact statement; and
(C) The Director of the Oregon Health Authority, or a designee of the director.
(b) In conducting the scope of practice  review, a panel convened under this subsection
may consult with  a health professional regulatory board that regulates a health care pro-
fession described in subsection (2) of this section.
(c) A panel convened under this subsection shall:
(A) Review the scope of practice request and any impact statements;
(B) Consider factors including, but not limited to, the safety of patients or clients of  the
health care providers who practice the health care profession that is  the subject of the scope
of practice request and access to the health care profession and to health care in  general;
and
(C) Not later  than six months after the date on which the panel is convened, submit a
report to the authority regarding the findings  and recommendations for the scope of practice
reviewed by the panel.
(d) A panel convened under this subsection is abolished six months  after the date on
which the report described in paragraph (c) of this subsection is submitted.
(5) A scope of practice reviewed by a panel under subsection (4) of  this section may not
be reduced or diminished as compared to the scope of practice in effect as  of the operative
date specified in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(6) The authority shall  submit a report, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, including
any findings and recommendations for legislation in addition to those of a panel convened
under subsection (4) of this section, to the interim  committees of the Legislative Assembly
related to health care not later  than September 15 next following the date on which the panel
is convened.
(7) The authority may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) Section 1 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take any  action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the authority to exercise,  on or
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the authority by section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
[2]
HB 2585
1
2
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]