Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 184.752 is amended to read:
184.752. As used in ORS 184.752 to 184.766:
(1) “Public transportation service provider” includes a qualified entity and a city, county, special
district, intergovernmental entity or any other political subdivision or municipal or  public corpo-
ration that provides public transportation services and is not otherwise described in  subsection (2)
of this section.
(2) “Qualified entity” means the following:
(a) Counties  in which no part of a mass transit district or transportation district exists  or
counties in which a mass transit  district or transportation district does exist and that have
opted to be designated as a qualified entity in the manner provided  by the Oregon Trans-
portation Commission by rule ;
(b) Mass transit districts organized under ORS 267.010 to 267.394;
(c) Transportation districts organized under ORS 267.510 to 267.650; and
(d) Federally recognized Indian tribes.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 184.758 is amended to read:
184.758. (1) The Oregon Transportation Commission shall distribute the moneys in the  Statewide
Transportation Improvement Fund established  under ORS 184.751 to the Department of Transporta-
tion to pay for:
(a) Program administration; and
(b) Projects of statewide significance that support the transit  network and manage the operation
of public transportation services.
(2) The moneys described in subsection (1) of this section that  remain after the distribution of
moneys described in subsection (1) of this section shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Conditioned upon the commission’s approval  of a public transportation improvement plan, 90
percent to qualified entities;
(b) Five percent to  public transportation service providers based on a competitive grant program
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2467
HB 2795
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
adopted by the commission by rule;
(c) Four percent to  public transportation service providers to provide funding assistance to
cover the costs of improving public transportation services between two or more communities; and
(d) One  percent to the Department of Transportation to establish a statewide public transpor-
tation technical resource center, the purpose of which is to  assist public transportation service
providers in rural  areas with technical assistance, training, transportation planning and information
technology.
(3) A portion  of the 90 percent distribution under subsection (2)(a) of this section shall be dedi-
cated to transit services for older adults and individuals with disabilities.  Each biennium the com-
mission shall first distribute the moneys transferred to the fund under ORS 184.751 as needed  to
maintain funding that benefits older adults and individuals with disabilities in the  amount distrib-
uted during the 2019-2021 biennium.  Each biennium thereafter, the commission shall adjust this
amount upward or downward based on  the rate of growth or decline of the Statewide Transportation
Improvement Fund. Moneys dedicated to transit services for older  adults and individuals with disa-
bilities under this subsection shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Each transportation district and mass transit district shall receive that share of  the moneys
as the population of the counties in which the district is  situated, determined under ORS 190.510 to
190.610 last preceding apportionment of the moneys, bears to the total population of  this state.
However, if two or more districts are situated in a single county, distribution of moneys under  this
subsection shall be determined as though only the mass transit  district is located in that county or,
if there are two or more transportation districts in the county, as though only the transportation
district with the highest population is located in that county.
(b) Each county in which no part of a mass transit district  or transportation district is located
shall receive that share of the  moneys as its population, determined under ORS 190.510 to 190.610
last preceding apportionment of the moneys, bears to the total population of this state.
(c) Each federally recognized  Indian tribe shall receive that share of the moneys as the popu-
lation of the tribe residing in Oregon, determined by the commission by rule,  bears to the total
population of this state.
(4) Each  qualified entity under subsection (3) of this section shall receive an annual target
amount of $67,700. Each biennium, the commission shall adjust this amount  upward or downward
based on the rate of growth or decline of the Statewide Transportation Improvement Fund.
(5) After a  portion of the 90 percent distribution under subsection (2)(a) of this section is dis-
tributed to transit services for older adults and  individuals with disabilities under subsection (3) of
this section, the commission shall distribute the remaining amount to qualified entities as follows:
(a) Each distribution must be in such shares that the amount of  tax paid, as required under ORS
320.550, in the area of each qualified entity bears to the total amount of the tax paid statewide,
provided that each qualified entity  receives an annual target amount of $100,000. Each biennium, the
commission  shall  adjust this amount upward or downward based on the rate of growth or decline
of the Statewide Transportation Improvement Fund.
(b) Unless a county opts to  be designated as a qualified entity, if more than one mass transit
district or transportation  district is located within a single county, the commission shall distribute
the moneys to the larger district. If a  county opts to be designated as a qualified entity, the
commission shall distribute to  the county the moneys for the county and all public trans-
portation service providers that have jurisdictional  boundaries wholly within the county’s
jurisdictional boundaries or that have  jurisdictional boundaries partially within the county’s
[2]
HB 2795
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
jurisdictional boundaries and not within any other mass  transit district’s or transportation
district’s jurisdictional boundaries.
(6) The commission shall adopt by rule:
(a) A competitive grant program, by which  a public transportation service provider may apply
for a percentage distribution under subsection (2)(b) of this section, and  the terms and conditions
of grants.
(b) A competitive grant program, by which  a public transportation service provider may apply
for a percentage distribution under subsection (2)(c) of this section,  and the terms and conditions
of grants.
(c) A process to  review and approve a public transportation improvement plan submitted under
subsection (7) of this section.
(d) Procedures for appealing a  rejection of a public transportation improvement plan submitted
under subsection (7) of this section.
(e) Any other provisions or procedures that are necessary for the commission to carry out  the
provisions of ORS 184.758 to 184.766.
(7) To be eligible to receive a percentage distribution under subsection (2)(a) of this section,  a
qualified entity shall prepare and submit a public  transportation improvement plan to the commis-
sion. The commission must approve the plan submitted by the qualified entity before the  commission
may make a percentage distribution to the qualified entity.
(8) At a minimum,  a public transportation improvement plan submitted under this section must
include:
(a) For each proposed project, the amount of moneys from the percentage distribution that would
be allocated to the project to fund the following:
(A) Increased frequency of  bus service schedules in communities with a high percentage of
low-income households;
(B) Procurement of buses that are powered by natural  gas or electricity for use in areas with
a population of 200,000 or more;
(C) Implementation of programs  to reduce fares for public transportation in communities with
a high percentage of low-income households;
(D) Expansion of bus routes and  bus services to reach communities with a high percentage of
low-income households;
(E) Improvement in the frequency and reliability of service connections between communities
inside and outside of the qualified entity’s service area;
(F) Coordination  between public transportation service providers to reduce fragmentation in the
provision of transportation services;
(G) Implementation of programs to  provide student transit services for students in grades 9
through 12; and
(H) Services for older adults and people with disabilities;
(b) For the current fiscal year, a summary of any plans and  project proposals approved by an
advisory committee under ORS 184.761; and
(c) If a qualified entity was a  recipient of a percentage distribution in the preceding fiscal year,
the amount of moneys  received from the distribution that were allocated to a project for the pur-
poses described under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(9) If practicable, as determined by the commission by rule each  qualified entity shall spend at
least one percent of the amount received each year under subsection (2)(a) of this  section to imple-
[3]
HB 2795
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
ment programs to provide student transit services for students in grades 9 through 12.
(10) After the commission makes a distribution under subsection  (2) of this section, qualified
entities may  enter into intergovernmental agreements under ORS chapter 190 to combine the mon-
eys received for public transportation improvements.
(11) If the commission rejects  a public transportation improvement plan or a grant application
submitted under this section, the commission shall  notify the entity or provider in writing and state
the reasons for the rejection.
(12) The Department of Transportation shall make all grant  applications submitted under this
section available to the public.
SECTION 3.
On or before December 31, 2026, the Oregon Transportation Commission
shall adopt or update rules in conformance with the amendments to ORS 184.752  and 184.758
by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. Section 3 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]