Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) There is allocated for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, from the Ad-
ministrative Services Economic Development Fund, to  the Oregon Military Department, the
amount of $500,000.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures:
(a) The amount of $475,000 is established for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the
maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Oregon Military  Department from lottery
moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund  for the
purpose of providing tuition waivers to  members of the Oregon National Guard as provided
in ORS 399.275.
(b) The amount of $25,000 is established  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the
maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Oregon Military  Department from lottery
moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund  for the
purpose of paying administrative costs  associated with providing tuition waivers to members
of the  Oregon National Guard as provided in ORS 399.275 from the funds allocated under
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The department may not pay  for a tuition waiver for a member of the Oregon Na-
tional Guard from the funds allocated under subsection (1) of  this section unless the member
has exhausted all federal tuition assistance programs available to the member.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1793