Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries shall appoint
a long term care wage board to examine factors that may present challenges to  recruiting
and retaining long term care employees including, but not  limited to, compensation, work
schedules and other working conditions. The board shall consist of nine  members appointed
by the commissioner from the recommendations and nominations received  under subsection
(2) of this section.
(2)(a) The commissioner shall solicit recommendations of qualified individuals from any
source including a  labor organization, provided that the labor organization maintains a
membership of at least 100 members.  The commissioner shall select members from the rec-
ommendations as follows:
(A) Three members who represent long term care employees;
(B) Three members who are employers who hire long term care employees; and
(C) Three members who represent the interests  of individuals who receive long term care
services.
(b) If the commissioner does not receive a sufficient number of recommendations,  the
commissioner may appoint any remaining positions  on the board, in any combination, from
among the following:
(A) An employer who employs long term care employees;
(B) A labor organization that represents the interests of long term care employees; and
(C) A representative of a long term care facility or other facility that is responsible  for
individuals receiving long term care services.
(3) The commissioner may employ the services of a professional researcher to serve in
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2404
HB 2490
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
an advisory capacity to the board.
(4) The board may employ and compensate employees and other advisors as  the board
deems necessary and  appropriate. Members of the board shall receive such compensation as
the board determines is necessary and shall be reimbursed for expenses they incur in the
exercise of board duties.
(5)(a) Employers that employ long term care employees who  serve as members of the
board shall grant reasonable leave to the employees to participate in board activities  without
loss of compensation.
(b) An employer may not penalize or retaliate against a long term care  employee because
of the employee’s participation in any of the activities of the board.
(6)(a) The  commissioner may assess a civil penalty in an amount determined by the
commissioner against an employer who violates subsection (5) of this section.
(b) All moneys collected as  penalties under this subsection shall be paid to the Bureau
of Labor and Industries to reimburse the board for the costs  incurred by the board in per-
forming its duties under this section.
(7) The term of a member of  the board is two years. A member of the board may be re-
appointed.
(8) After the appointment of the initial  board members, successor board members shall
be appointed by a majority vote of the board members, before the expiration  of the term of
a member, but not later than January 1 of each even-numbered year.
(9)(a) The board shall adopt rules for conducting meetings and any other rules as  neces-
sary for carrying out the duties of the board.
(b) All meetings of the board shall be held as public meetings, in  all regions of the state,
and the board shall receive oral and written testimony at the meetings.
(10) The board shall:
(a) Evaluate and make findings  regarding factors that may contribute to a shortage of
a skilled long term care workforce including, but not limited to:
(A) Compensation rates; and
(B) Lack of health care benefits or other paid benefits including, but not limited to, paid
family leave, sick leave or retirement benefits; and
(b) Make recommendations regarding:
(A) Strategies that  define uniform standards for training and education for long term
care employees;
(B) Proposed increases to the hourly minimum wage paid to  long term care employees;
and
(C) Improvements to  working conditions, including work schedules and workplace stan-
dards relating to safety.
(11) In addition to the duties prescribed to the board under subsection (10) of this section,
the board shall  annually review the compensation rates paid to long term care employees in
this state. The board shall prepare and approve by  a majority vote a recommended compen-
sation schedule for long term care employees.
(12)(a) The board shall submit to the  commissioner no later than December 31 of each
year a report that includes the findings  and recommendations of the board. The board shall
include in the annual report the recommended compensation schedule described in  sub-
section (11) of this section.
[2]
HB 2490
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
(b) The  commissioner, in consideration of the compensation schedule submitted under
paragraph (a) of this section, establish  by rule a minimum rate at which long term care
employees shall be paid, provided that  the rate established by the commissioner is not less
than the hourly minimum wage rate that is required under ORS 653.025.
(13) As used in this section:
(a) “Long term care employee” means an employee or agent who provides long  term care
services at a long term care facility.
(b) “Long term care facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 442.015.
SECTION 2.
The long term care wage board shall submit the first report required under
section 1 (12) of this 2019 Act no later than December 31, 2020.
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]