Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “School district” means  a common or union high school district, an education service
district or a community college district.
(b) “State-related debt agreements” means:
(A) Funds diversion agreements under ORS 238.698 or 328.284;
(B) Guarantees of school bonds under ORS 328.321 to 328.356; and
(C) Any other agreements under which moneys payable from the  State of Oregon may
be diverted to repay moneys borrowed by a school district.
(2) Before a  school district may enter into a funds diversion agreement under ORS
238.698 for bonds issued to finance pension liabilities, the school district must:
(a) Submit to the Department of Education information regarding  all state-related debt
agreements of the school district;
(b) Certify to the department that, on an annual basis, anticipated  moneys payable from
the State of Oregon  are sufficient to pay debt service on all bonds subject to state-related
debt agreements and the bonds for which a new funds diversion agreement is proposed; and
(c) Receive approval from the department to enter into the funds diversion agreement.
(3) The  department may approve a proposed funds diversion agreement of a school dis-
trict under ORS 238.698 only if the department determines that the annual debt  service on
bonds of the school district described in subsection (2)(b) of this section, averaged  over the
remaining life of the bonds, is no greater than 80 percent of the total amount of state school
moneys that the department anticipates will be available to the school district  in the current
fiscal year.
(4) The State Treasurer shall provide to the department any data that  is necessary or
useful in making the determination described in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The department may adopt rules necessary to  carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) Section 1 of this 2017 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3111
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
(2) The Department  of Education may take any action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of  this section that is necessary to enable the department to exercise, on
and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all the duties, func-
tions and powers conferred on the department by section 1 of this 2017 Act.
[2]