Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the  State Workforce Investment Board, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, for Worksystems, Inc. for training and case
management of 1,000 potential job  applicants in East Portland and East Multnomah County
in advanced electronics, advanced metal and machinery manufacturing and distribution.
SECTION 2. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1615