Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The  Legislative Policy and Research Director, in consultation with the
Legislative Fiscal Officer, shall conduct a study of the changes that would be necessary to
adopt a policy in Oregon that the Legislative Assembly must pass biennial budget  bills before
passing other bills in an odd-numbered year regular session of the Legislative Assembly.
(2) The study conducted under this section must include, without limitation:
(a) Analysis of any necessary  statutory, constitutional, procedural, administrative or
other changes;
(b) Analysis  of possible timelines for submission and approvals of proposed budgets within
the executive branch;
(c) Analysis of possible timelines for submission  of a proposed budget from the executive
branch to the Legislative Assembly; and
(d) Proposals for legislative committee structures appropriate for  analysis and prepara-
tion of budget bills.
(3) All agencies of  state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist the
director in conducting the study and, to the extent permitted by laws related  to
confidentiality, to furnish information and advice necessary for the director to complete the
study.
(4) The  director shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the in-
terim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to ways and means no later than June
1, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4485