Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Campaign Review Commission  is established independently
within the Office of the Secretary of State.
(2) The commission consists of eight members appointed by the Governor, subject to
confirmation by the Senate in the manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565. The Gov-
ernor shall appoint four members from each of the two major political parties.
(3) The members of the commission must be residents of this state who are well informed
on the principles of fair and truthful elections. Each member, before assuming the duties  of
the commission, shall take an oath  or affidavit to remain nonpartisan and independent while
executing the duties of the commission.
(4) The term  of office of each member of the commission is seven years, and the Gover-
nor may remove a  member only for cause as provided in ORS 182.010 or 236.010. Before the
expiration of the  term of a member, the Governor shall appoint a successor whose term be-
gins on July 1 next following. A member may serve only one term  and is not eligible for re-
appointment. If there is a  vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make an appointment
to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(5) The commission shall select two of its members,  one from each major political party,
to serve as cochairpersons for a term of one year, with duties and powers necessary  for the
performance of the functions of the office as the commission determines. Members may
serve no more than two terms as cochairperson.
(6) A majority of the members of the commission constitutes a quorum  for the trans-
action of business.
(7) A member of the commission is entitled  to compensation and expenses as provided in
ORS 292.495.
(8) In accordance with applicable provisions of ORS chapter  183, the commission may
adopt rules necessary for the administration of section 3 to 5 of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2057
HB 2870
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(9)(a) The commission shall appoint a  director to serve at the pleasure of the commis-
sion.
(b) The designation of the director must be by written order filed with the Secretary  of
State.
(c) Subject to any applicable provisions of ORS chapter 240, the director  shall appoint all
subordinate officers and  employees of the commission, prescribe their duties and fix their
compensation.
(d) The director shall oversee the officers and employees of the commission.
(10) The commission,  the director and authorized representatives of the commission may
investigate, administer oaths, take depositions and issue  subpoenas to compel the attendance
of witnesses  and the production of documents or other written information necessary to
carry out the provisions of sections 3 to 5 of this 2025 Act.  If any person fails to comply with
a subpoena issued  under this section or refuses to testify on matters on which the person
lawfully may be interrogated, the procedure set forth in ORS 183.440 shall  be followed to
compel obedience.
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding the term of office specified in section 1 of this 2025 Act, of
the members first appointed to the commission:
(1) Two shall serve for terms ending June 30, 2028.
(2) Two shall serve for terms ending June 30, 2030.
(3) Two shall serve for terms ending June 30, 2032.
(4) Two shall serve for terms ending June 30, 2033.
SECTION 3.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 260.532 (10), a candidate or  political committee
aggrieved by a violation of  ORS 260.532 may file a complaint with the Oregon Campaign Re-
view Commission.
(2)(a) When a complaint is filed, the commission shall conduct an initial review of  the
complaint. Using objective standards  established by rule, the commission shall make an ini-
tial finding as to whether the complaint is frivolous or merits investigation.
(b) If the commission finds the complaint to be frivolous, the  commission shall make a
report that summarizes the complaint, the commission’s  finding and the commission’s rea-
soning. The commission may issue sanctions against the candidate or political committee  for
filing a frivolous complaint.
(c) If the commission finds  the complaint merits investigation, the commission shall open
an investigation.
(3)(a) When the commission opens an investigation,  the commission shall assign one or
more persons to  act as an investigator of the complaint. An investigator shall collect evi-
dence and interview witnesses and shall make a report to the commission.  An investigator
shall have all investigatory powers possessed by the commission.
(b) The  report to the commission must describe the evidence gathered, the results of
witness interviews and any other information considered in preparing the report.
(4) Upon receiving the investigator’s report,  the commission may hold a hearing on the
matter.
(5) At  the close of the investigation or after a hearing, the commission shall issue a final
decision. The decision must contain:
(a) A statement summarizing the complaint;
(b) A statement of factual findings that supports, refutes or explains the complaint;
[2]
HB 2870
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
(c) A finding as to whether there is a violation of ORS 260.532; and
(d) Any sanctions issued under section 4 of this 2025 Act.
(6) A  candidate or political committee that has been sanctioned by the commission may
appeal for review with the Secretary of State.
SECTION 4.
When the Oregon Campaign Review Commission  finds that a candidate or
political committee has violated ORS 260.532,  the commission shall sanction the candidate
or political committee as follows:
(1) For the first offense, publish a  written statement describing the violation committed
by the candidate or political committee.
(2) For the  second offense, suspend the candidate or political committee from filing a
statement in a voters’  pamphlet prepared under ORS chapter 251 for one or more election
cycles and publish a written statement explaining the reason for the suspension.
(3) For the third offense, permanently ban the candidate or political  committee from fil-
ing a statement in a  voters’ pamphlet prepared under ORS chapter 251 and publish a written
statement explaining the reason for the ban.
SECTION 5. If a complaint is filed under section 3 of this 2025 Act:
(1) Within the seven days immediately preceding an election, the  Oregon Campaign Re-
view Commission shall issue a final decision within three days of the filing,  but before the
day the election is held.
(2) Not more than  14 days and not less than eight days before an election, the commis-
sion shall issue a final decision within five days of the filing.
(3) Not more  than 30 days and not less than 15 days before an election, the commission
shall issue a final decision within seven days of the filing.
(4) Not more than 60 days and not less than 31 days before an election,  the commission
shall issue a final decision within 10 days of the filing.
(5) At least 61 days before an election, the commission shall issue a final  decision within
14 days of the filing.
SECTION 6. Sections 3 to 5 of this 2025 Act apply to campaigns  conducted for elections
held on or after January 1, 2026.
[3]