Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 260.054 is amended to read:
260.054. (1) Each political committee shall establish a single exclusive  campaign account and
each petition committee organized under ORS 260.118  shall establish a single exclusive petition ac-
count in a financial institution, as defined in ORS 706.008. The financial  institution must be located
in this state and must ordinarily conduct business with the general public in this state.
(2) A political committee shall maintain the campaign account in  the name of the political
committee. A petition committee shall maintain the petition account in the name  of the petition
committee.
(3)(a) Except as provided  in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the total amount of moneys
in a campaign account or petition account established under this section may not at any time
exceed $1 million. A political committee or petition committee  shall refuse to accept any
contribution that would cause the total amount of  moneys in the account to exceed $1
million.
(b) A political committee,  other than a principal campaign committee or a controlled
committee, that supports or opposes more than one candidate, measure  or political party
may create a subaccount for each candidate, measure or political party that the  political
committee supports or opposes. The total amount of moneys in  each subaccount created
under this paragraph may not at any time exceed  $1 million. A political committee shall re-
fuse to accept any contribution that would cause the total amount of moneys in the subac-
count to exceed $1 million.
[(3)] (4) Except as provided in subsection [ (4)] (5) of this section:
(a) All expenditures made by the political committee shall  be drawn from the campaign account
and:
(A) Issued on  a check signed by the candidate on whose behalf the account is established, by
the treasurer  of the political committee or by an individual designated by the candidate or treasurer;
or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2555
SB 661
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
(B) Paid using a debit card or other form of electronic transaction.
(b) All expenditures made by the petition committee shall be drawn from the  petition account
and:
(A) Issued on a check signed by  the chief petitioner or treasurer of the petition committee or
by an individual designated by the chief petitioner or treasurer; or
(B) Paid using a debit card or other form of electronic transaction.
[(4)] (5)  Subsection [ (3)] (4)  of this section does not prohibit  a person from making a cash or
other expenditure on behalf of the political committee or  petition committee and receiving re-
imbursement from the campaign or petition account.
[(5)(a)] (6)(a)  Not later than seven business days after the date the contribution is received:
(A) A contribution received by a candidate  or the treasurer of a political committee, directly
or indirectly, shall be deposited into the campaign account.
(B) A contribution received  by a chief petitioner or treasurer of a petition committee, directly
or indirectly, shall be deposited into the petition account.
(b) This subsection does  not apply to in-kind contributions received by a candidate, political
committee or petition committee.
[(6)] (7)  This section does not prohibit the transfer of any amount deposited  in a campaign or
petition account into a certificate of deposit, stock fund or other investment instrument.
[(7)] (8)  A campaign or petition account may not include any private moneys, other than con-
tributions received by the political committee or petition committee.
[(8)] (9)  A political committee or petition committee shall retain a copy of each  financial insti-
tution account statement  from the campaign or petition account described in this section for not less
than two years after the date the statement is issued by the financial institution.
[(9)] (10) This section does not apply to candidates described in ORS 260.043.
[(10)] (11)  As used in this section, “contribution” and “expenditure” include  a contribution or
expenditure to or on behalf of an initiative, referendum or recall petition.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 260.054 by section 1  of this 2019 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2020.
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]