Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
LIMITS PERCENTAGE OF MONEYS SCHOOLS MAY USE ON
ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 327.
SECTION 2. A school district or an  education service district may not expend more than
10 percent of the amounts received by the district as a  general purpose grant, as calculated
under ORS 327.013 or 327.019, on the administrative expenses of the district.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2019 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2020.
REMOVAL OF ENROLLMENT LIMITATION FOR
VIRTUAL PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOLS
SECTION 4.  ORS 338.125 is amended to read:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1357
SB 601
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
338.125. (1) Student enrollment in a public charter school is voluntary.
(2)(a) All students who reside in the school district in which the public charter  school is located
are eligible for enrollment in the public charter school if space is available.
(b) Students who do not reside in the school district in which the public charter school is  lo-
cated are eligible for enrollment in the  public charter school if space is available [ and subject to
subsection (4) of this section ].
(c) A public charter  school may not limit student enrollment based on race, religion, sex, sexual
orientation, ethnicity, national origin, disability, the  terms of an individualized education program,
income level, proficiency in the English language  or athletic ability but may implement a weighted
lottery for historically underserved students as provided by subsection (3)(d) of this section.
(3)(a) Except as provided by paragraphs (b) and (c)  of this subsection, if the number of applica-
tions from students who reside in the school district exceeds the capacity of a program, class, grade
level or building, the public charter school shall select  students through an equitable lottery se-
lection  process.  An equitable lottery selection process may incorporate the provisions described in
paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(b)(A) A  public charter school may give priority for admission to students who reside within the
attendance boundaries that were in effect at  the time a school district closed a nonchartered public
school  if:
(i) The public charter school began to operate  not more than two years after the nonchartered
public school was closed;
(ii) The school district that closed the nonchartered  public school is the sponsor of the public
charter school;
(iii) The public charter school  is physically located within the attendance boundaries of the
closed nonchartered public school; and
(iv) The school district board, through board action, approved the public charter school  giving
priority as described in this paragraph.
(B) Nothing in this paragraph requires an amendment to a charter.  A school district board may
take an action described in subparagraph (A)(iv) of this  paragraph at any time during the term of
a charter.
(c) After a public charter school has been in operation for one or more  years, the public charter
school may give priority for admission to students who:
(A) Were enrolled in the school in the prior year;
(B) Have siblings who are presently enrolled in the school and who were  enrolled in the school
in the prior year; or
(C) If the public charter school is  a party to a cooperative agreement described in ORS 338.080,
reside in the school  district that is the sponsor of the public charter school or in a school district
that is a party to the cooperative agreement.
(d) For the purpose of ameliorating the  impact of discrimination against historically underserved
students, a  public charter school may select students through a weighted lottery that favors histor-
ically underserved students. As used in this paragraph, “historically underserved students”  are at
risk because of  any combination of two or more factors including their race, ethnicity, English lan-
guage proficiency, socioeconomic status, gender, sexual  orientation, disability and geographic lo-
cation.
[(4)(a)] (4) A student who wishes to enroll in a virtual public charter  school does not need the
approval of the school  district where the student is a resident before the student enrolls in the
[2]
SB 601
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
virtual public charter school. If a student wishes  to enroll in a virtual public charter school, the
parent, legal guardian or person  in parental relationship with the student must provide the following
notices to the school district where the student is a resident:
[(A)] (a) Intent to enroll the student in a virtual public charter school; and
[(B)] (b) Enrollment of the student in a virtual public charter school.
[(b)(A) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection and ORS 339.133,  if more than three
percent of the students who reside in a  school district are enrolled in virtual public charter schools that
are not sponsored by the school district, a student who is a resident of the  school district must receive
approval from the school district before enrolling in a virtual public charter school.  A school district
is not required to give approval if more than three  percent of the students who reside in the school
district are enrolled in virtual public charter schools that are not sponsored by the school district. ]
[(B) For the purpose of determining whether more  than three percent of the students who reside in
the school district are enrolled in virtual public charter schools  that are not sponsored by the school
district, the school district board shall include any students who: ]
[(i) Reside in the school district, regardless of  whether the students are considered residents of
different school districts as provided by ORS 339.133 (5); and ]
[(ii) Are enrolled in virtual public charter schools that are not sponsored by the school district. ]
[(C) Students who reside in the school district, regardless of  whether the students are considered
residents of  different school districts as provided by ORS 339.133 (5), must receive approval from the
school district before enrolling in a virtual public charter school if the limit described in subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph has been met. ]
[(c) If the school district does not give approval under paragraph (b) of this subsection, the  school
district must provide information to the parent, legal guardian or person in parental relationship  with
the student about the right to appeal the decision to the  State Board of Education and other online
options available to the student. If an appeal is made to the State  Board of Education, the board must
issue a decision within 30 days of the submission of the appeal. ]
(5) Within 10 days of a student’s enrollment in a public charter  school, the public charter school
shall provide written notice of the student’s enrollment to the school  district in which the public
charter school is located if the student does not reside in the school district where the public
charter school is located.
(6) Within 10 days of receiving the notice described in subsection (5) of this section,  the school
district in which the public charter school  is located shall provide to the student’s parent, legal
guardian or person in parental relationship written information about:
(a) The school district’s responsibility to  identify, locate and evaluate students enrolled in the
public charter school to determine which students may be in  need of special education and related
services as provided by ORS 338.165; and
(b) The methods by which  the school district may be contacted to answer questions or provide
information related to special education and related services.
(7) When a student  described in subsection (5) of this section withdraws from a public charter
school for a reason other than graduation from high school,  the school district in which the public
charter school is located shall:
(a) Provide to the school district in which the student resides written notice that the student
has withdrawn.
(b) Provide to the student’s parent, legal guardian or  person in parental relationship written
information about:
[3]
SB 601
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) The responsibility of the school  district in which the student resides to identify, locate and
evaluate students who reside in the school district to determine which students may be in need  of
special education and related services as provided by ORS 338.165; and
(B) The methods by  which the school district in which the student resides may be contacted to
answer questions or provide information related to special education and related services.
(8)(a) If a student described in subsection (5)  of this section enrolls in a public charter school
and has  an individualized education program, the school district in which the public charter school
is located must implement  the individualized education program and follow the terms of the indi-
vidualized education program until a new individualized education program is developed.
(b) If a student described  in subsection (5) of this section withdraws from a public charter school
and has an individualized education program, the school district in which the  student resides must
implement the individualized education program and follow the terms  of the individualized education
program until a new individualized education program is developed.
(9) When a virtual public  charter school enrolls a student or a student no longer is enrolled in
a virtual public charter  school, the virtual public charter school shall provide the written notices
described in ORS 338.120 (1)(m) and (n) to the school district where the student is a resident.
(10) A  public charter school may conduct fund-raising activities but may not require a student
to participate in fund-raising activities as a condition of admission to the public charter school.
SECTION 5.  ORS 338.125, as amended by section 2,  chapter 585, Oregon Laws 2015, and section
2, chapter 218, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
338.125. (1) Student enrollment in a public charter school is voluntary.
(2)(a) All students who reside in the school district in which the public charter  school is located
are eligible for enrollment in the public charter school if space is available.
(b) Students  who do not reside in the school district in which the public charter school is lo-
cated are eligible for enrollment in the public charter school if  space is available [ and subject to
subsection (4) of this section ].
(c) A public charter  school may not limit student enrollment based on race, religion, sex, sexual
orientation, ethnicity, national origin, disability, the terms  of an individualized education program,
income level, proficiency in the English language or athletic ability.
(3)(a) Except as provided by paragraphs (b) and (c)  of this subsection, if the number of applica-
tions from students who reside in the school district exceeds the capacity of a program, class, grade
level or building, the public charter school shall select  students through an equitable lottery se-
lection process.
(b)(A) A  public charter school may give priority for admission to students who reside within the
attendance boundaries that were in effect at  the time a school district closed a nonchartered public
school  if:
(i) The public charter school began to operate  not more than two years after the nonchartered
public school was closed;
(ii) The school district that closed the nonchartered  public school is the sponsor of the public
charter school;
(iii) The public charter school  is physically located within the attendance boundaries of the
closed nonchartered public school; and
(iv) The school district board, through board action, approved the public charter school  giving
priority as described in this paragraph.
(B) Nothing in this paragraph requires an amendment to a charter.  A school district board may
[4]
SB 601
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
take an action described in subparagraph (A)(iv) of this  paragraph at any time during the term of
a charter.
(c) After a public charter school has been in operation for one or more  years, the public charter
school may give priority for admission to students who:
(A) Were enrolled in the school in the prior year;
(B) Have siblings who are presently enrolled in the school and who were  enrolled in the school
in the prior year; or
(C) If the public charter school is  a party to a cooperative agreement described in ORS 338.080,
reside in the school  district that is the sponsor of the public charter school or in a school district
that is a party to the cooperative agreement.
[(4)(a)] (4) A student who wishes to enroll in a virtual public charter  school does not need the
approval of the school  district where the student is a resident before the student enrolls in the
virtual public charter school. If a student wishes  to enroll in a virtual public charter school, the
parent, legal guardian or person  in parental relationship with the student must provide the following
notices to the school district where the student is a resident:
[(A)] (a) Intent to enroll the student in a virtual public charter school; and
[(B)] (b) Enrollment of the student in a virtual public charter school.
[(b)(A) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection and ORS 339.133, if more than three
percent of the students who reside in a  school district are enrolled in virtual public charter schools that
are not sponsored by the school district, a student who is a resident of the  school district must receive
approval from the school  district before enrolling in a virtual public charter school. A school district
is not required to give approval if more than three  percent of the students who reside in the school
district are enrolled in virtual public charter schools that are not sponsored by the school district. ]
[(B) For the purpose of determining whether more  than three percent of the students who reside in
the school district are enrolled in virtual public  charter schools that are not sponsored by the school
district, the school district board shall include any students who: ]
[(i) Reside in the school district, regardless of  whether the students are considered residents of
different school districts as provided by ORS 339.133 (5); and ]
[(ii) Are enrolled in virtual public charter schools that are not sponsored by the school district. ]
[(C) Students who reside in the  school district, regardless of whether the students are considered
residents of different school districts as provided by ORS 339.133 (5), must receive approval from  the
school district before enrolling in a virtual public charter school if the limit described in subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph has been met. ]
[(c) If the school district does not give approval under paragraph (b) of this subsection, the  school
district must provide information to the parent, legal guardian or person in parental relationship with
the student about the right to appeal the  decision to the State Board of Education and other online
options available to the student. If an appeal is made to the State  Board of Education, the board must
issue a decision within 30 days of the submission of the appeal. ]
(5) Within 10 days of a student’s enrollment in a public charter  school, the public charter school
shall provide written notice of the  student’s enrollment to the school district in which the public
charter school is located if the student does not reside in the school district where the public
charter school is located.
(6) Within 10  days of receiving the notice described in subsection (5) of this section, the school
district in which the public charter school is located shall  provide to the student’s parent, legal
guardian or person in parental relationship written information about:
[5]
SB 601
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The school district’s responsibility to identify, locate and  evaluate students enrolled in the
public charter school to determine which students  may be in need of special education and related
services as provided by ORS 338.165; and
(b) The methods by which the school district may be contacted to  answer questions or provide
information related to special education and related services.
(7) When a student described in subsection (5) of this section withdraws from  a public charter
school for a reason other than graduation from  high school, the school district in which the public
charter school is located shall:
(a) Provide to the school district in which the student resides written notice that the student
has withdrawn.
(b) Provide to the student’s parent,  legal guardian or person in parental relationship written
information about:
(A) The responsibility of the school district in which the student  resides to identify, locate and
evaluate students  who reside in the school district to determine which students may be in need of
special education and related services as provided by ORS 338.165; and
(B) The methods by  which the school district in which the student resides may be contacted to
answer questions or provide information related to special education and related services.
(8)(a) If a student described in subsection (5)  of this section enrolls in a public charter school
and has  an individualized education program, the school district in which the public charter school
is located must implement  the individualized education program and follow the terms of the indi-
vidualized education program until a new individualized education program is developed.
(b) If a student described  in subsection (5) of this section withdraws from a public charter school
and has an individualized education program, the school district in which the  student resides must
implement the individualized education program and follow the terms  of the individualized education
program until a new individualized education program is developed.
(9) When a virtual public charter school enrolls a student or a student no  longer is enrolled in
a virtual public charter school, the virtual public charter school shall provide  the written notices
described in ORS 338.120 (1)(m) and (n) to the school district where the student is a resident.
(10) A public charter school may conduct fund-raising activities but may not require a  student
to participate in fund-raising activities as a condition of admission to the public charter school.
SECTION 6.  ORS 338.025 is amended to read:
338.025. (1) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for  the implementation
of this chapter. The rules shall follow the intent of this chapter.
(2) Upon application by a public charter school, the State  Board of Education may grant a
waiver of any provision of this chapter if the waiver promotes the  development of programs by
providers, enhances the equitable access by underserved families to the public education of  their
choice, extends the equitable access to  public support by all students or permits high quality pro-
grams of unusual cost.  The State Board of Education may not waive any appeal provision in this
chapter or any provision under ORS  338.115 (1)(a) to (aa), 338.120, [ 338.125 (4),] 338.135 (2)(b) or
339.122.
DEVELOPMENT OF PLAN TO OPEN ENROLLMENT
FOR ALL PUBLIC SCHOOL STUDENTS
SECTION 7. (1) The Department of Education shall develop a plan to allow students to
[6]
SB 601
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
attend any public school in this state regardless of the school district in  which the student
resides.
(2) The department shall  report a summary of the plan in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may include recommendations for  legislation, to an interim committee of the
Legislative Assembly related to education no later than September 15, 2020.
SECTION 8. Section 7 of this 2019 Act is repealed on December 31, 2020.
DEVELOPMENT OF PLAN TO ALLOW HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS
TO ENROLL IN POST-SECONDARY INSTITUTIONS
OF EDUCATION AND PAY WITH
MONEYS FROM STATE SCHOOL FUND
SECTION 9. (1) The Department of Education shall develop a  plan to allow qualified high
school students to enroll in post-secondary institutions of education and to have any costs
incurred from the enrollment be paid from the State School Fund.
(2) The department shall report a summary of the plan in the manner  provided by ORS
192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to  an interim committee of the
Legislative Assembly related to education no later than September 15, 2020.
SECTION 10.
Section 9 of this 2019 Act is repealed on December 31, 2020.
STUDY RELATED TO COTEACHING TRAINING MODELS
SECTION 11. (1) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission shall conduct a study
to identify methods for:
(a) Implementing coteaching training models that  allow workforce experts to assist in
teaching without changing their employment status; and
(b) Encouraging workforce experts to participate in  models identified under paragraph
(a) of this subsection.
(2) The commission shall report the results of the study in the manner provided by  ORS
192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to  an interim committee of the
Legislative Assembly related to education no later than September 15, 2020.
SECTION 12. Section 11 of this 2019 Act is repealed on December 31, 2020.
ESTABLISHMENT OF MINIMUM NUMBER OF
SCHOOL DAYS
SECTION 13.  ORS 336.010 is amended to read:
336.010. (1) The common school month consists of 20 days[ .] and  the common school year
consists of at least 180 days. For purposes of calculating the number of days  in the common
school year, days in which students do  not receive any instruction may not be included in
the calculation.
(2) No pupil shall be required to attend school on any Saturday or on any legal school  holiday.
Except as otherwise specifically provided in this section, a  legal school holiday is any holiday
specified in ORS 187.010.
(3) Days on which an election is held throughout  the state shall be school holidays only for such
[7]
SB 601
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
schools in which the sole schoolroom is used for election purposes.
(4) The following days are not school holidays, but a portion of the days shall be  set apart and
observed in the public schools by appropriate activities:
(a) Lincoln’s Birthday on February 12.
(b) Admission of Oregon into the Union on February 14.
(c) Washington’s Birthday on February 22.
(d) Columbus Day on October 12.
(5) On January 15, Martin Luther  King, Jr.’s actual date of birth, a portion of the day shall be
set apart and observed in the public schools by appropriate activities.
(6) Martin Luther  King, Jr.’s Birthday, designated in ORS 187.010 as the third Monday in Jan-
uary, shall be a legal school holiday. However, notwithstanding subsection (8) of this section,
whether or not there shall be compensation of school  employees shall be at the discretion of the
school board or covered by a collective bargaining agreement.
(7) Presidents Day,  designated in ORS 187.010 as the third Monday in February, is not a legal
school  holiday.
(8) No teacher shall be required to teach on any Saturday, except  as provided in the terms of
the teacher’s employment, or on any legal school holiday. When a holiday  occurs on what would
otherwise be a school day, teachers shall be allowed full pay for the holiday.
(9) No subject required for graduation shall be taught on Saturday only.
SECTION 14.
(1) The amendments to ORS 336.010 by section 13 of this  2019 Act become
operative on July 1, 2020.
(2) The amendments to  ORS 336.010 by section 13 of this 2019 Act first apply to the
2020-2021 school year.
REDIRECTION OF EMPLOYEE CONTRIBUTIONS
FOR PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT SYSTEM
SECTION 15.  ORS 238A.330 is amended to read:
238A.330. (1) A member of the  individual account program must make employee contributions
to the individual account program of six percent of the member’s salary.
(2)(a) For a member who establishes membership in the Public Employees Retirement
System before August 29, 2003,  employee contributions made [ by a  member of the individual ac-
count program ] under this section shall be credited by the board  to the [ employee] contributions
account established for the member under ORS 238A.350 [ (2)] (3).
(b) For a member who establishes membership in the Public Employees  Retirement Sys-
tem on or after August 29, 2003, of the employee contributions made under this section:
(A) Three percent of the member’s salary shall be credited to the employee account es-
tablished for the member under ORS 238A.350 (2); and
(B) Three percent of the member’s salary shall be credited by the  board to the contri-
butions account established for the member under ORS 238A.350 (3).
(3) A new member of the individual  account program shall first make contributions under this
section for those wages that are attributable to  services performed by the employee during the first
full pay period  following the six-month probationary period required under ORS 238A.300, without
regard to when those wages are considered earned for other purposes under this chapter.
SECTION 16.  ORS 238A.350 is amended to read:
[8]
SB 601
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
238A.350. (1) Upon any contributions being made to the individual  account program by or on
behalf of a member of the program, the Public Employees  Retirement Board shall create the account
or accounts  described in this section. Each account shall be adjusted at least annually in accordance
with rules adopted by the board to reflect any net earnings or losses on those contributions and  to
pay the reasonable administrative costs of maintaining the program to the extent the  earnings on
the assets of the program are insufficient to pay those costs. The  adjustments described in this
subsection  shall  continue until the account is distributed to the member [ or], forfeited  or trans-
ferred to the School Districts Unfunded Liability Fund established  in section 24, chapter 105,
Oregon Laws 2018, as provided in subsection (3) of this section .
(2)(a) The board shall establish an employee account, which shall consist  of the employee con-
tributions made by or on behalf of the member  and credited to the employee account,  as adjusted
under subsection (1) of this section.
(b) The board shall create a separate employee account for a member who becomes an  active
member for the purpose of service in the Legislative Assembly under ORS 237.650, which shall
consist of the employee contributions made by or on behalf of the member that are attributable  to
the member’s legislative service, as adjusted under subsection (1) of this section.
(3)(a) The board shall  establish a contributions account, which shall consist of the em-
ployee contributions made by or on behalf of the  member under ORS 238A.330 and credited
to the contributions account, as adjusted under subsection (1) of this section.
(b) Unless the amounts in a contributions  account established under this subsection are
withdrawn under ORS 238A.375, upon the member’s retirement the amounts in the  account
shall be transferred to the School Districts Unfunded Liability Fund established in  section
24, chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2018.
[(3)] (4) If the public employer agrees to make employer contributions under ORS 238A.340,  the
board shall  establish an employer account, which shall consist of the employer contributions made
on behalf of the member as adjusted under subsection (1) of this section.
[(4)] (5) If the board accepts rollover contributions on behalf of the  member, the board shall
establish a rollover account, which shall consist of the rollover contributions made  by the member
as adjusted under subsection (1) of this section. Contributions and the earnings attributable  to the
contributions must be accounted for separately.
[(5)] (6) The board shall provide  an annual statement to each active and inactive member of the
program that reflects the amount credited to the  accounts established under this section. The
statement shall reflect whether the member is vested in the employer account  under the provisions
of ORS 238A.320.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 238A.320 is amended to read:
238A.320. (1)  A member of the individual account program becomes vested in the employee ac-
count established for the member under ORS 238A.350 (2) on the date the  employee account is es-
tablished.
(2) A member who makes rollover contributions becomes vested  in the rollover account estab-
lished for the member under ORS 238A.350 [ (4)] (5) on the date the rollover account is established.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section,  if an employer makes employer contri-
butions for a  member under ORS 238A.340 , the member becomes vested in the employer account
established under ORS 238A.350 [ (3)] (4) on the earliest of the following dates:
(a) The date on which the member completes at least 600  hours of service in each of five cal-
endar years. The five calendar years  need not be consecutive, but are subject to the provisions of
[9]
SB 601
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
subsection (5) of this section.
(b) The date on which an active member  reaches the normal retirement age for the member
under ORS 238A.160.
(c) If the individual account program is terminated, the date on which termination becomes  ef-
fective, but only to the extent the account is then funded.
(d) The date on which an active member becomes disabled, as described in ORS 238A.155 (5).
(e) The date on which an active member dies.
(4) If on the date that a person becomes an active  member the person has already reached the
normal retirement age for the person under ORS 238A.160, and the employer  makes employer con-
tributions for the member under ORS 238A.340, the person is vested in the employer account  es-
tablished under ORS 238A.350 [ (3)] (4) on that date.
(5) If a  member of the individual account program who is not vested in the employer account
performs fewer than 600 hours of service  in each of five consecutive calendar years, hours of service
performed before the first calendar year  of the period of five consecutive calendar years shall be
disregarded for purposes of determining whether the member  is vested under subsection (3)(a) of this
section.
(6) Solely for purposes of determining whether a member is vested  under subsection (3)(a) of this
section, hours of service include creditable service,  as defined in ORS 238.005, performed by the
person before the person became an eligible employee, as long as the  membership of the person
under ORS chapter 238 has not been terminated under the provisions of ORS 238.095 on the date
the person becomes an eligible employee.
(7) A member becomes vested in the contributions account established for the  member
under ORS 238A.350 (3) on the date the account is established.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 238A.375 is amended to read:
238A.375. (1)(a) An inactive member of the individual  account program may elect to receive a
distribution of the amounts  in the member’s employee account, rollover account and employer ac-
count to the extent the  member is vested in those accounts under ORS 238A.320 if the inactive
member has separated from all service with participating public employers and  with employers who
are treated as part of a participating public employer’s controlled  group under the federal laws and
rules governing the status of  the system and the fund as a qualified governmental retirement plan
and trust.
(b)(A) An inactive member of the individual account program may elect to receive a dis-
tribution of the amounts in the member’s contributions account established for  the member
under ORS 238A.350 (3) if:
(i) The inactive member has separated from all service with participating  public employ-
ers and  with employers who are treated as part of a participating public employer’s con-
trolled group under the federal laws and rules governing the status  of the system and the
fund as a qualified governmental retirement plan and trust; and
(ii) The member is eligible  to withdraw and withdraws from the pension program under
ORS 238A.120.
(B) The withdrawal of the member’s accounts under this  paragraph cancels all member-
ship rights in the Public Employees Retirement System.
(2) If an inactive member of the individual account program who  is not vested in the employer
account receives a distribution under subsection  (1) of this section, the employer account of the
member is permanently forfeited as of the date of the distribution.
[10]
SB 601
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) A member may not make an election under this section for less than all of the member’s in-
dividual accounts described in ORS 238A.350 in which the member is vested.
(4) A member who is vested in the pension program established under this chapter and who is
eligible to withdraw from the  pension program under ORS 238A.120 may make an election under this
section only if the member also withdraws from the pension program.
(5) A member who has a member account established under ORS chapter 238 may make an
election under this section only if the member also withdraws that member account in  the manner
provided by ORS 238.265. A member who  has an account established under ORS 238.440 may make
an election under this section only if the member  also withdraws the account established under ORS
238.440.
[(5)] (6) If an inactive member receives a distribution under subsection  (1) of this section and is
subsequently reemployed by a participating public employer, any  service performed before the date
the member became an inactive member may not be used  toward the period of service required for
vesting in the employer account under ORS 238A.320.
SECTION 19.  ORS 238A.410, as amended by section 9, chapter 101, Oregon Laws  2018, is
amended to read:
238A.410. (1) (a) If a member of the individual account program dies before retirement,  the
amounts in the member’s employee account, rollover account and employer account, to  the extent
the member is vested in those accounts under ORS 238A.320,  shall be paid in a lump sum to the
beneficiary or beneficiaries designated by the member for the purposes of this section.
(b) If a member of the individual  account program dies before retirement, the amounts
in the contributions account established for the member under ORS  238A.350 (3) shall be
transferred to the School Districts Unfunded Liability  Fund established in section 24, chapter
105, Oregon Laws 2018.
(2) If a  member of the individual account program is married at the time of death, or there exists
at the time of death any other person who is constitutionally  required to be treated in the same
manner as a spouse for the  purpose of retirement benefits, the spouse or other person shall be the
beneficiary for purposes of the death benefit payable under this section unless the spouse  or other
person consents to the designation of a different beneficiary or  beneficiaries before the designation
has been made and the consent has not been  revoked by the spouse or other person as of the time
of the member’s death. Consent and revocation of consent must be in writing, acknowledged by  a
notary public, and submitted to the  Public Employees Retirement Board in accordance with rules
adopted by the board. If the member’s  spouse is designated as the member’s beneficiary and the
marriage of the member and spouse is subsequently dissolved, the former  spouse shall be treated as
predeceasing the member for purposes of this section, unless the member  expressly designates the
former spouse as beneficiary after the  effective date of the dissolution or the former spouse is re-
quired to be designated as a beneficiary under the provisions of ORS 238.465.
(3) For purposes of this section and ORS  238A.400 (3), if a member fails to designate a benefi-
ciary, or if the person or persons designated do not survive the member, the death  benefit provided
for in this section shall be paid to the following  person or persons, in the following order of priority:
(a) The member’s surviving spouse or  other person who is constitutionally required to be treated
in the same manner as a spouse;
(b) The member’s surviving children, in equal shares; or
(c) The member’s estate.
(4) The entire amount  of a deceased member’s vested accounts must be distributed by December
[11]
SB 601
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
31 of the fifth calendar  year after the year in which the member died. Notwithstanding any other
provision of this chapter, distributions of death benefits under the individual account  program must
comply with the minimum distribution requirements of 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9) and  the regulations im-
plementing that section, as in  effect on December 31, 2017. The [ Public Employees Retirement ] board
shall adopt rules implementing those minimum distribution requirements.
SECTION 20.  ORS 243.800 is amended to read:
243.800. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of ORS chapter 238 or 238A or ORS 243.910  to
243.945, the governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002  shall establish and admin-
ister an Optional Retirement Plan for administrative and academic employees of the public univer-
sity. The Optional Retirement Plan must be a qualified  plan under the Internal Revenue Code,
capable of accepting funds transferred under subsection  (7) of this section without the transfer being
treated as a taxable  event under the Internal Revenue Code, and willing to accept those funds.
Retirement and death benefits shall be provided under the plan by the purchase of annuity contracts,
fixed or variable or a combination thereof, or by contracts for investments in mutual funds.
(2) An administrative or academic  employee who is eligible to remain or become a member of
the Public Employees Retirement  System may elect to participate in the Optional Retirement Plan
upon completion of:
(a) Six hundred hours of employment, or the equivalent as determined by the governing  board;
and
(b) Six months of employment that is not interrupted by more than  30 consecutive working days.
(3) An administrative or academic employee who is eligible to remain or  become a member of
the Public Employees Retirement System, including  an administrative or academic employee who
previously participated in the Optional Retirement Plan because of employment  in a position clas-
sified as  a post-doctoral scholar position under ORS 350.370, may make an irrevocable election to
participate in the Optional Retirement Plan  within six months after being employed. An election
under this subsection is effective on the first day of the month following the completion  of the re-
quirements of subsection (2) of this section.
(4) An administrative or academic employee who is eligible to remain or  become a member of
the Public Employees Retirement System and who does not  elect to participate in the Optional Re-
tirement Plan:
(a) Remains or becomes a member of the Public Employees Retirement System  in accordance
with ORS chapters 238 and 238A; or
(b) Continues to be assisted by the governing board under ORS 243.920  if the employee is being
so assisted.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (6)  of this section, employees who elect to participate in the
Optional Retirement  Plan are ineligible for active membership in the Public Employees Retirement
System or for any assistance by the governing board  under ORS 243.920 as long as those employees
are employed in the public university and the plan is in effect.
(6)(a) An  administrative or academic employee who elects to participate in the Optional Retire-
ment Plan, who has creditable service under ORS chapter 238 as defined by ORS  238.005 and who
is not vested shall be considered by the Public Employees Retirement Board  to be a terminated
member under the provisions of ORS 238.095 as of the effective date of the election,  and the
[amount] amounts  credited to the  member [ account] accounts of the member  established under
ORS 238.250 and 238.260 shall be  transferred directly to the Optional Retirement Plan by the Public
Employees Retirement Board in the manner provided by subsection (7) of this section.
[12]
SB 601
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) An administrative or academic employee who elects to participate in the Optional Retirement
Plan, who has creditable service under ORS chapter 238 as defined by ORS 238.005 and  who is
vested shall be considered to be an inactive member by the Public Employees Retirement Board and
shall retain all the rights, privileges  and options under ORS chapter 238 unless the employee makes
a written request  to the Public Employees Retirement Board for a transfer of the amounts credited
to the member  [ account] accounts  of the member established under ORS 238.250 and 238.260  to
the Optional Retirement Plan. A request for a transfer must  be made at the time the member elects
to participate in  the Optional Retirement Plan. Upon receiving the request, the Public Employees
Retirement Board shall transfer  all amounts credited to the member [ account] accounts of the
member established under ORS 238.250 and 238.260 directly to the Optional Retirement  Plan, and
shall terminate all rights, privileges and options  of the employee [ under ORS chapter 238 ] as pro-
vided in ORS 238.095.
(c) [ An administrative or academic employee who elects  to participate in the Optional Retirement
Plan, and who is not a vested member of the pension program of the Oregon Public  Service Retirement
Plan as described in ORS 238A.115 ] An administrative or academic  employee who elects to
participate in the  Optional Retirement Plan and who is a member of the pension program
of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan as described in ORS 238A.100  on the date that
the election becomes effective, but who has  not vested in the program under ORS 238A.115
on the date that the election becomes effective, shall  be considered to be a terminated member of
the pension program by the Public Employees Retirement Board as of the effective date  of the
election.  The Public Employees Retirement Board shall transfer the  amounts credited to the
member accounts of the member directly to the Optional  Retirement Plan in the manner
provided by subsection (7) of this section.
(d) An administrative or academic employee who elects to participate in the Optional Retirement
Plan, and who is a vested member of the pension program of the Oregon Public Service Retirement
Plan as described  in ORS 238A.115 on the date that the election becomes effective, shall be consid-
ered an inactive member of the pension program  by the Public Employees Retirement Board as of
the effective date of the election. An employee who is subject to the provisions of this  paragraph
retains all the rights, privileges and options  of an inactive member of the pension program. If the
actuarial  equivalent  of the employee’s benefit under the pension program at the time that the
election becomes effective is $5,000 or less, the employee may make a written request  to the Public
Employees Retirement Board for a transfer of the  employee’s interest under the pension program to
the Optional Retirement Plan. The request must be made  at the time the member elects to partic-
ipate in the Optional Retirement Plan. Upon receiving the  request, the Public Employees Retirement
Board shall transfer the amount determined to be the actuarial  equivalent of the employee’s benefit
under the pension program directly to the Optional Retirement Plan, and shall  terminate the mem-
bership of the employee in the pension program.
(e) An  administrative or academic employee who elects to participate in the Optional Retirement
Plan, and who is  a vested member of the individual account program of the Oregon Public Service
Retirement Plan as  described in ORS 238A.320 on the date that the election becomes effective, shall
be considered an inactive member of the individual account program  by the Public Employees Re-
tirement Board as of the effective date of the election. An employee who is  subject to the provisions
of this paragraph retains all the rights, privileges  and options of an inactive member of the indi-
vidual account program. An administrative or academic employee who elects to participate in  the
Optional Retirement Plan, and who is a member of the individual account program of the Oregon
[13]
SB 601
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Public Service Retirement Plan, may make a written  request to the Public Employees Retirement
Board that all amounts [ in the member’s employee account, rollover account and  employer account ]
credited to the member accounts of the member established under ORS 238A.350 , to the extent
the member  is vested in those accounts under ORS 238A.320, be transferred to the Optional Retire-
ment Plan. The request must be made at the  time the member elects to participate in the Optional
Retirement Plan. Upon receiving the request, the Public  Employees Retirement Board shall transfer
the amounts directly to the Optional  Retirement Plan, and shall terminate the membership of the
employee in the individual account program upon making the transfer.
(f) Notwithstanding paragraphs (b), (d) and  (e) of this subsection, the Public Employees Retire-
ment Board may not treat any employee as  an inactive member under the provisions of this sub-
section for the purpose of receiving any benefit under ORS chapter 238 or  238A that requires that
the employee be separated from all service with participating  public employers and with employers
who are treated  as part of a participating public employer’s controlled group under the federal laws
and rules  governing the status of the Public Employees Retirement System and the Public Employees
Retirement Fund as a qualified governmental retirement plan and trust.
(7) Any amounts transferred from the Public Employees Retirement Fund under subsection (6)
of this section shall be  transferred directly to the Optional Retirement Plan by the Public Employees
Retirement Board and may not be made available to the employee.
(8) An employee participating in the Optional Retirement  Plan who was hired before July 1,
2014, shall contribute monthly an amount equal to the percentage of the employee’s salary that the
employee would otherwise have contributed as  an employee contribution to the Public Employees
Retirement System if the employee had not elected to participate in the Optional Retirement Plan.
(9) For an employee participating in the Optional Retirement Plan who was hired before  July
1, 2014, the governing board shall  contribute monthly to the Optional Retirement Plan the percent-
age of salary of the employee equal to the percentage of salary that would otherwise  have been
contributed as an employer contribution on behalf  of the employee to the Public Employees Retire-
ment System, before  any offset under ORS 238.229 (2), if the employee had not elected to participate
in the Optional Retirement Plan.
(10) For an employee participating in the Optional Retirement Plan who was hired on  or after
July 1, 2014, the governing board shall contribute monthly to the Optional Retirement Plan:
(a) Eight percent of the employee’s salary; and
(b) A percentage of the employee’s salary equal to the percentage of salary  contributed by the
employee to the public  university’s Tax-Deferred Investment 403(b) Plan under ORS 243.820, up to
four percent of the employee’s salary in each pay period.
(11)(a) Unless otherwise prohibited by law, a person employed in a  position classified as a
post-doctoral scholar position under ORS 350.370 is an academic employee under subsection (1) of
this section and becomes a  participant in the Optional Retirement Plan when the person participates
in the public university’s Tax-Deferred Investment 403(b) Plan under ORS 243.820.
(b) Participation in the Optional Retirement Plan under this subsection becomes effective  on the
first day of the month following the later of:
(A) Enrollment in the public university’s Tax-Deferred  Investment 403(b) Plan under ORS
243.820; or
(B) Completion of:
(i) Six hundred hours of employment, or  the equivalent as determined by the governing board;
and
[14]
SB 601
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(ii) Six months of employment that is not interrupted  by more than 30 consecutive working days.
(c) For a post-doctoral scholar participating in the Optional  Retirement Plan, the governing
board shall contribute monthly to the Optional Retirement Plan a  percentage of the post-doctoral
scholar’s salary equal to the percentage of salary contributed by  the post-doctoral scholar to the
public university’s Tax-Deferred Investment 403(b) Plan under  ORS 243.820, up to four percent of the
post-doctoral scholar’s salary in each pay period.
(d) A  post-doctoral scholar is an academic employee who elects to participate in the Optional
Retirement Plan for purposes of subsection (6) of this section.
(e) Subsections (8) to (10) of this section  do not apply to a post-doctoral scholar participating in
the Optional Retirement Plan.
(12) Both employee and employer contributions to  an Optional Retirement Plan shall be remitted
directly to the companies that have issued annuity contracts to  the participating employees or di-
rectly to the mutual funds.
(13) Benefits under the Optional Retirement Plan are payable to employees who elect to  partic-
ipate in the  plan and their beneficiaries by the selected annuity provider or mutual fund in accord-
ance with the terms  of the annuity contracts or the terms of the contract with the mutual fund.
Employees electing to participate in the Optional Retirement Plan agree that  benefits payable under
the plan are not obligations of the State of Oregon or of the Public Employees Retirement System.
SECTION 21.  ORS 341.551 is amended to read:
341.551. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of ORS chapter 238  or 238A, the Office of Community
Colleges and Workforce Development may establish and administer an optional  retirement plan for
administrative employees of community college districts who are eligible for membership  in the
Public Employees Retirement System. Any community college district  may participate in the plan
by giving written notice to the office.
(2) An administrative employee may make an election to participate in the optional retirement
plan if the community college district that employs the employee is participating in  the plan. The
election must be made in the following manner:
(a) An administrative employee who is an active member  of the Public Employees Retirement
System may make an election to participate in the plan within 180 days after the  community college
district commences participation in the plan, effective on the first day of the month following  the
election.
(b) An administrative employee who is hired after  the community college district commences
participation in the  plan may make an election to participate in the plan within the first six months
of employment, effective on the first day of the month following six full months of employment.
(3) An administrative employee who does not elect to participate in the  optional retirement plan
remains or  becomes a member of the Public Employees Retirement System in accordance with ORS
chapters 238 and 238A.
(4) An administrative  employee may elect to participate in the optional retirement plan only if
at the time the election becomes effective the employee is not  concurrently employed in a position
with any participating public employer other than the community college district in  a position that
entitles the employee to membership  in the Public Employees Retirement System. Except as pro-
vided in subsection (9) of this section,  employees who elect to participate in the optional retirement
plan are ineligible for active membership in the Public Employees  Retirement System for as long as
those employees are employed by a community college district that participates  in the plan, whether
by reason of employment by the district or any other participating public employer.
[15]
SB 601
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5)(a) An administrative  employee who elects to participate in the optional retirement plan, who
has creditable service under ORS chapter 238 as defined by ORS 238.005  and who is not vested shall
be considered by the Public Employees Retirement Board to be a terminated  member under the
provisions of ORS 238.095 as of the effective date of the election, and the [ amount] amounts credited
to the member [ account] accounts of the member established under ORS 238.250 and 238.260 shall
be transferred directly to the optional retirement plan by the Public  Employees Retirement Board
in the manner provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(b) An  administrative employee who elects to participate in the optional retirement plan, who
has creditable service under ORS chapter  238 as defined by ORS 238.005 and who is vested shall
be considered to be an inactive  member by the Public Employees Retirement Board and shall retain
all the rights, privileges and options under ORS  chapter 238 unless the employee makes a written
request to the Public Employees Retirement  Board for a transfer of the amounts credited to the
member [ account] accounts of the member established under ORS 238.250 and 238.260 to the op-
tional retirement plan. A request for a transfer must be made  at the time the member elects to
participate in the optional retirement plan. Upon receiving the request, the Public  Employees Re-
tirement Board  shall transfer all amounts credited to the member [ account] accounts  of the member
established under ORS 238.250 and 238.260  directly to the optional retirement plan and shall ter-
minate all rights, privileges and options of the employee [ under ORS chapter 238 ] as provided in
ORS 238.095.
(c) [ An administrative employee who elects to participate in the optional  retirement plan and who
is not a vested member of  the pension program of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan as de-
scribed in ORS 238A.115 ] An administrative employee  who elects to participate in the optional
retirement plan and who is a member of the pension program of the Oregon Public Service
Retirement Plan as described in ORS 238A.100  on the date that the election becomes effec-
tive, but who has not vested in the program under ORS 238A.115  on the date that the election
becomes effective , shall be considered to be a terminated member of the  pension program by the
Public Employees Retirement Board as of the effective date of the  election.  The Public Employees
Retirement Board shall transfer the amounts credited to the member accounts of the mem-
ber directly to the optional retirement plan in the manner provided by subsection (6) of  this
section.
(d) An  administrative employee who elects to participate in the optional retirement plan and
who is a vested  member of the pension program of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan as
described in ORS 238A.115 on the date that the election becomes effective shall be considered  an
inactive member of the pension  program by the Public Employees Retirement Board as of the ef-
fective date of  the election. An employee who is subject to the provisions of this paragraph retains
all the rights, privileges and options of an inactive member of the pension  program. If the actuarial
equivalent of the employee’s benefit under the pension program at the time that the  election be-
comes effective is $5,000 or less, the employee  may make a written request to the Public Employees
Retirement Board for a transfer of the employee’s interest under the pension program to the optional
retirement plan. The request must be made at the time the member elects to  participate in the op-
tional retirement plan. Upon receiving the request, the Public Employees Retirement Board  shall
transfer the amount determined to be the actuarial equivalent  of the employee’s benefit under the
pension program directly to the optional retirement plan and shall  terminate the membership of the
employee in the pension program.
(e) An administrative employee who elects to participate in the optional retirement  plan and
[16]
SB 601
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
who is a vested member of  the individual account program of the Oregon Public Service Retirement
Plan as described in ORS 238A.320 on the date that the  election becomes effective shall be consid-
ered an inactive member of the individual  account program by the Public Employees Retirement
Board as of the effective date of the election.  An employee who is subject to the provisions of this
paragraph retains all  the rights, privileges and options of an inactive member of the individual ac-
count program. An administrative employee who  elects to participate in the optional retirement plan
and who is a member of the individual account program of the Oregon Public Service Retirement
Plan may make a written request to the Public Employees  Retirement Board that all amounts [ in the
member’s employee account, rollover account and employer account ] credited to the member ac-
counts of the member established under ORS 238A.350 , to the extent the member is vested  in
those accounts under  ORS 238A.320, be transferred to the optional retirement plan. The request
must be made at  the time the member elects to participate in the optional retirement plan. Upon
receiving the request, the Public Employees Retirement Board shall transfer  the amounts directly
to the optional retirement  plan and shall terminate the membership of the employee in the individual
account program.
(f) Notwithstanding paragraphs (b), (d) and  (e) of this subsection, the Public Employees Retire-
ment Board  shall not treat any employee as an inactive member under the provisions of this sub-
section for the purpose of receiving any benefit under ORS chapter 238 or  238A that requires that
the employee be separated from all service with participating  public employers and with employers
who are treated  as part of a participating public employer’s controlled group under the federal laws
and rules  governing the status of the Public Employees Retirement System and the Public Employees
Retirement Fund as a qualified governmental retirement plan and trust.
(6) Any amounts transferred from the Public Employees Retirement Fund under subsection (5)
of this section shall be transferred directly to  the optional retirement plan by the Public Employees
Retirement Board and shall not be made available to the employee.
(7) An employee participating in the optional retirement plan shall  contribute monthly an
amount equal to the percentage of the employee’s salary that the employee would otherwise  have
contributed as an employee contribution to the Public Employees  Retirement System if the employee
had not elected to participate in the optional retirement plan.
(8) A participating community  college district shall contribute monthly to the optional retire-
ment plan the percentage of  salary for each employee participating in the plan that is equal to the
percentage of salary that is required to be made as the employer contribution  under ORS 238A.220,
less any contributions made by reason of unfunded liabilities. The district  may make contributions
under this subsection only during periods of time in which the  employee would be eligible for
membership in the Public Employees Retirement System if the employee  had not elected to partic-
ipate in the optional retirement plan.
(9) An administrative employee who elects to participate in  the optional retirement plan may
make an election to withdraw  from the plan. An employee may make an election under this sub-
section only once. Upon withdrawing from the plan:
(a) All contributions made to the plan before the effective date of  the withdrawal remain cred-
ited to the employee;
(b) The employee becomes a member of  the Public Employees Retirement System under ORS
chapter 238A if the member meets all requirements for membership under ORS chapter 238A; and
(c) The employee is barred from ever again electing to participate in  the optional retirement
plan.
[17]
SB 601
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(10) For the purposes of this  section, “administrative employee” means a president, vice presi-
dent or dean, or  a person holding a position that is the equivalent of a president, vice president or
dean.
SECTION 22. (1) The amendments to ORS 238A.320, 238A.330, 238A.350, 238A.375, 238A.410,
243.800 and 341.551 by sections 15 to 21 of this  2019 Act become operative on January 1, 2020.
(2) The Public Employees Retirement Board may take any  action before the operative
date specified in subsection (1) of this section that  is necessary for the board to exercise, on
and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section, all of the duties,
functions and powers conferred on the board by the amendments to ORS 238A.320, 238A.330,
238A.350, 238A.375, 238A.410, 243.800 and 341.551 by sections 15 to 21 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 23.
(1) As soon as practicable after the effective date of  this 2019 Act, the
Public Employees Retirement Board shall:
(a) Determine the amount of savings in  employer contributions that are attributable to
the amendments  to ORS 238A.320, 238A.330, 238A.350, 238A.375, 238A.410, 243.800 and 341.551
by sections 15 to 21 of this 2019 Act; and
(b) Recalculate the contribution rates of all employers, pursuant to ORS 238.225, to re-
flect the amendments to ORS  238A.320, 238A.330, 238A.350, 238A.375, 238A.410, 243.800 and
341.551 by sections 15 to 21 of this 2019 Act; and
(2) The board shall issue corrected contribution rate orders to employers affected by
rates recalculated under this section as soon  as is practicable after the effective date of this
2019 Act. The corrected rates are effective July 1, 2019.
SECTION 24. (1) Jurisdiction is conferred upon the Supreme Court to determine in the
manner provided by this section whether the amendments to ORS  238A.320, 238A.330,
238A.350, 238A.375, 238A.410, 243.800  and 341.551 by sections 15 to 21 of this 2019 Act breach
any contract between members of the Public  Employees Retirement System and their em-
ployers or violate any provision of the Oregon Constitution or of the  United States Consti-
tution, including but not  limited to impairment of contract rights of members of the Public
Employees Retirement  System under Article I, section 21, of the Oregon Constitution, or
Article I, section 10, clause 1, of the United States Constitution.
(2) A person who  is adversely affected by the amendments to ORS 238A.320, 238A.330,
238A.350, 238A.375, 238A.410, 243.800 and 341.551 by sections 15 to 21 of this 2019 Act  or who
will be adversely affected  by the amendments to ORS 238A.320, 238A.330, 238A.350, 238A.375,
238A.410, 243.800 and 341.551 by sections  15 to 21 of this 2019 Act may institute a proceeding
for review by filing with the Supreme Court a petition that meets the following requirements:
(a) The petition must be filed within 60 days after the effective date of this 2019 Act.
(b) The petition must include the following:
(A) A statement of the basis of the challenge; and
(B) A statement and supporting affidavit showing  how the petitioner is adversely af-
fected.
(3) The petitioner shall serve  a copy of the petition by registered or certified mail upon
the Public Employees Retirement Board, the Attorney General and the Governor.
(4) Proceedings for review under this section shall be given  priority over all other mat-
ters before the Supreme Court.
(5) The Supreme Court shall allow public  employers participating in the Public Employees
Retirement System to intervene in any proceeding under this section.
[18]
SB 601
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6)(a) The Supreme  Court shall allow members of the Legislative Assembly to intervene
in any proceeding relating to the amendments to ORS 238A.320, 238A.330,  238A.350, 238A.375,
238A.410, 243.800 and 341.551 by sections 15 to 21 of this 2019 Act. After a member intervenes
in a proceeding relating to the amendments to ORS 238A.320, 238A.330, 238A.350, 238A.375,
238A.410, 243.800 and 341.551 by sections 15 to 21 of this 2019 Act, the member has standing
to participate in the proceeding even if the member ceases to be a member of  the Legislative
Assembly.
(b) A member of the Senate  or the House of Representatives who intervenes in a pro-
ceeding under this subsection may not use public funds to pay  legal expenses incurred in
intervening in or participating in the proceeding.
(7) In the event the Supreme Court determines that there are factual issues  in the peti-
tion, the Supreme Court may appoint a special master to hear evidence and  to prepare re-
commended findings of fact.
(8) The Supreme Court may not award  attorney fees to a petitioner in a proceeding under
this section.
PROHIBITION OF CERTAIN AGREEMENTS
SECTION 25.
 ORS 339.392 is amended to read:
339.392. (1)  An education provider may not enter into a collective bargaining agreement, an
employment contract, an agreement for resignation or termination, a  severance agreement or any
other contract or agreement that:
(a) Has the effect of suppressing information relating to an ongoing investigation related to  a
report of suspected abuse or sexual  conduct or relating to a substantiated report of abuse or sexual
conduct by a current or former employee;
(b) Affects the duties of the education provider  to report suspected abuse or sexual conduct or
to discipline a current or former employee for a substantiated report of abuse or sexual conduct;
(c) Impairs the  ability of the education provider to discipline an employee for a substantiated
report of abuse or sexual conduct; or
(d) Requires the education provider to expunge  from  documents maintained by the education
provider:
(A) Substantiated  information about abuse or sexual conduct [ from any documents maintained
by an education provider. ];
(B) Substantiated information  about behavior that did not constitute abuse or sexual
conduct but that may indicate a pattern of behavior for which an employee  may be disci-
plined; or
(C) Unsubstantiated information  that may indicate a pattern of behavior and to which
the current or former  employee was able to respond, including any response of the employee
to the information.
(2) Any provision of an employment contract  or agreement that is contrary to this section is
void and unenforceable.
(3) Nothing in this section prevents an education  provider from entering into a collective bar-
gaining agreement that includes:
(a) Standards for investigation of a report of abuse or sexual conduct; or
(b) An appeal process from the determination by  an education provider that a report of abuse
[19]
SB 601
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
or sexual conduct has been substantiated as provided in ORS 339.388 (5).
SECTION 26. The amendments to ORS 339.392 by section 25 of this 2019 Act apply to
agreements and contracts entered into on or after the effective date of this 2019 Act.
REPEAL OF STUDENT ASSESSMENT
BILL OF RIGHTS
SECTION 27. ORS 329.479 is repealed.
APPROPRIATION FOR HIGH SCHOOL GRADUATION AND
COLLEGE AND CAREER READINESS FUND
SECTION 28. There is appropriated  to the Department of Education, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2019, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $306,000,000 for deposit in the
High School Graduation and College and Career Readiness Fund established by ORS 327.856.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 29. The unit  captions used in this 2019 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2019 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 30. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
[20]