Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 332.
SECTION 2. (1) A district school board may  establish a policy to encourage students of
the school district to develop vocational skills by performing maintenance tasks at  a building
or on other property under the control of the school district.
(2) A policy established under subsection (1) of this section must:
(a) Allow students to  develop vocational skills as part of a work experience or career
exploration program or as part of a work-study program;
(b) Attempt to save money for the school district; and
(c) Encourage students to experience a wide range of work opportunities  and develop a
wide range of vocational skills.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2314