Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 475C.005  to
475C.525.
SECTION 2. (1) In order to ensure a robust  and comprehensive understanding of the
impact of medical cannabis products and to support research and related policy decisions, the
Oregon Health Authority and the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission shall  consolidate
data collection regarding the medical use of marijuana and the use of adult  use cannabis
items. The authority and the commission shall make  the data described in this section pub-
licly available on a website operated by or on behalf of the commission.
(2) The data must include, but are not limited to:
(a) Data regarding marijuana grow sites registered under ORS  475C.792 and designated
under ORS 475C.121 and premises for  which a marijuana production license is issued under
ORS 475C.065;
(b) Health outcomes related to the  medical use of marijuana and the use of adult use
cannabis items;
(c) Any data currently collected and maintained by the authority and the commission
regarding demographics of registry identification cardholders;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2031
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Data regarding the development and maintenance of marijuana plant profiles; and
(e) Other data the authority or the commission determine are important to achieve the
goals described in this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 475C.009 is amended to read:
475C.009. As used in ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525:
(1) “Adult use  cannabinoid” includes, but is not limited to, tetrahydrocannabinols,
tetrahydrocannabinolic acids that are artificially or naturally  derived, delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol,
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol, the optical isomers  of delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol or
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol and any  artificially derived cannabinoid that is reasonably determined
to have an intoxicating effect.
(2) “Adult use cannabis item” means:
(a) A marijuana item; or
(b) An industrial hemp commodity or product that exceeds:
(A) The concentration of adult use cannabinoids established by the Oregon  Liquor and Cannabis
Commission, in consultation with the Oregon Health Authority and the State Department  of Agri-
culture, by rule; or
(B) The greater of:
(i) A concentration of more than 0.3 percent total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol; or
(ii) The concentration of total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol allowed under federal law.
(3)(a) “Artificially derived cannabinoid” means a chemical substance that is created by  a chem-
ical reaction that changes the molecular structure of any chemical substance derived from the  plant
Cannabis family Cannabaceae.
(b) “Artificially derived cannabinoid” does not include:
(A) A naturally occurring chemical substance that is separated from  the plant Cannabis family
Cannabaceae by a chemical or mechanical extraction process;
(B) Cannabinoids that are produced by decarboxylation  from a naturally occurring cannabinoid
acid without the use of a chemical catalyst; or
(C) Any  other chemical substance identified by the commission, in consultation with the au-
thority and the department, by rule.
(4) “Cannabinoid” means  any of the chemical compounds that are the active constituents derived
from marijuana.
(5) “Cannabinoid concentrate” means a substance  obtained by separating cannabinoids from
marijuana by:
(a) A mechanical extraction process;
(b) A chemical  extraction process using a nonhydrocarbon-based solvent, such as water, vege-
table glycerin, vegetable oils, animal fats, isopropyl alcohol or ethanol;
(c) A chemical extraction process using carbon dioxide, provided  that the process does not in-
volve the use of high heat or pressure; or
(d) Any other process identified by the commission, in consultation with the authority, by rule.
(6) “Cannabinoid edible” means food or potable liquid into  which a cannabinoid concentrate,
cannabinoid extract or dried marijuana leaves or flowers have been incorporated.
(7) “Cannabinoid extract” means a substance obtained by  separating cannabinoids from
marijuana by:
(a) A chemical extraction process using a hydrocarbon-based solvent, such as butane, hexane
or propane;
[2]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) A  chemical extraction process using carbon dioxide, if the process uses high heat or pres-
sure; or
(c) Any other process identified by the commission, in consultation with the authority, by rule.
(8)(a) “Cannabinoid product” means a cannabinoid edible  and any other product intended for
human consumption  or use, including a product intended to be applied to the skin or hair, that
contains cannabinoids or dried marijuana leaves or flowers.
(b) “Cannabinoid product” does not include:
(A) Usable marijuana by itself;
(B) A cannabinoid concentrate by itself;
(C) A cannabinoid extract by itself; or
(D) Industrial hemp.
(9) “Consumer” means a person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds  or uses marijuana items
other than for the purpose of resale.
(10) “Deliver” means the actual, constructive or attempted transfer from one person  to another
of a marijuana item, whether or not there is an agency relationship.
(11) “Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol” or “delta-9-THC” means  (6aR,10aR)-6,6,9-
trimethyl-3-pentyl-6a,7,8,10a-tetrahydro-6H- benzo[c]chromen-1-ol.
(12) “Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinolic acid” or “delta-9-THCA”  means (6aR,10aR)-
1-hydroxy-6,6,9-trimethyl-3-pentyl-6a,7,8,10a- tetrahydro-6H-benzo[c]chromene-2-carboxylic acid.
(13) “Designated primary caregiver” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475C.777.
(14)(a) “Financial consideration”  means value that is given or received either directly or indi-
rectly through sales, barter, trade, fees, charges, dues, contributions or donations.
(b) “Financial consideration” does  not include marijuana, cannabinoid products or cannabinoid
concentrates that are delivered within the scope of and in compliance with ORS 475C.305.
(15) “Homegrown” means grown by a person 21 years of age or older for  noncommercial pur-
poses.
(16) “Household” means a housing unit and any place in or around a housing unit at  which the
occupants of the housing unit are producing, processing,  possessing or storing homegrown
marijuana, cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates or cannabinoid extracts.
(17) “Housing unit” means a house, an apartment or a mobile home, or  a group of rooms or a
single room that is occupied as separate living quarters, in which the  occupants live and eat sepa-
rately from  any other persons in the building and that has direct access from the outside of the
building or through a common hall.
(18) “Immature marijuana plant” means a marijuana plant that is not flowering.
(19) “Industrial hemp” has the meaning given that term in ORS 571.269.
(20) “Licensee” means a  person that holds a license issued under ORS 475C.065, 475C.085,
475C.093, 475C.097 or 475C.548 or a designation under ORS 475C.121 .
(21) “Licensee representative” means an owner, director, officer, manager,  employee, agent or
other representative of a licensee, to the extent that the person acts in a representative capacity.
(22)(a) “Manufacture” means producing, propagating, preparing, compounding,  converting or
processing a marijuana item, either  directly or indirectly, by extracting from substances of natural
origin.
(b) “Manufacture” includes any packaging or repackaging of a marijuana item or the  labeling
or relabeling of a container containing a marijuana item.
(23)(a) “Marijuana” means the plant Cannabis family  Cannabaceae, any part of the plant
[3]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Cannabis family Cannabaceae and marijuana seeds.
(b) “Marijuana” does not include:
(A) Industrial hemp; or
(B) Prescription drugs, as that term is defined in ORS 689.005, including those  containing one
or more  cannabinoids, that are approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and
dispensed by a pharmacy, as defined in ORS 689.005.
(24) “Marijuana flowers” means the flowers of the  plant genus Cannabis within the plant family
Cannabaceae.
(25)(a) “Marijuana grow  site” means a location at which marijuana is grown on behalf
of a registry identification cardholder.
(b) “Marijuana grow site” does not include a marijuana grow  site registered under ORS
475C.792.
[(25)] (26) “Marijuana  items” means marijuana, cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates
and cannabinoid extracts.
[(26)] (27) “Marijuana leaves” means the leaves  of the plant genus Cannabis within the plant
family Cannabaceae.
[(27)] (28) “Marijuana processor” means:
(a) A person that processes marijuana items in this state; or
(b) A person that holds a  license issued under ORS 475C.085 and processes industrial hemp
commodities or products pursuant to ORS 571.336.
[(28)] (29) “Marijuana producer” means a person that produces marijuana in this state.
[(29)] (30) “Marijuana retailer” means a  person that sells marijuana items to a consumer in this
state.
[(30)(a)] (31)(a) “Marijuana seeds” means the seeds of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae.
(b) “Marijuana seeds” does not include the seeds of industrial hemp.
[(31)] (32) “Marijuana wholesaler” means a person that purchases marijuana items in  this state
for resale to a person other than a consumer.
[(32)] (33) “Mature marijuana plant”  means a marijuana plant that is not an immature marijuana
plant.
[(33)] (34) “Medical grade cannabinoid product, cannabinoid concentrate or cannabinoid
extract” means a cannabinoid  product, cannabinoid concentrate or cannabinoid extract that has a
concentration of adult use cannabinoids that is permitted under ORS 475C.620 in a single serving
of the cannabinoid product, cannabinoid concentrate or cannabinoid extract for consumers  who hold
a valid registry identification card issued under ORS 475C.783.
[(34)] (35) “Medical purpose” means a purpose related to using usable  marijuana, cannabinoid
products, cannabinoid concentrates or cannabinoid extracts to mitigate  the symptoms or effects of
a debilitating medical condition, as defined in ORS 475C.777.
[(35)] (36) “Noncommercial” means not dependent or conditioned upon the provision or  receipt
of financial consideration.
[(36)(a)] (37)(a) “Premises” includes the following areas  of a location licensed or designated
under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.548:
(A) All public and private enclosed areas at the location that are  used in the business operated
at the location, including offices, kitchens, rest rooms and storerooms;
(B) All areas  outside a building that the commission has specifically licensed for the processing,
wholesale sale or retail sale of marijuana items; and
[4]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) For a  location that the commission has specifically licensed or designated  for the pro-
duction of marijuana outside a building, that portion of the location used to produce marijuana.
(b) “Premises” does not include a primary residence.
[(37)(a)] (38)(a) “Processes” means the processing, compounding or conversion of:
(A) Marijuana into cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates or cannabinoid extracts; or
(B) Pursuant to ORS 571.336, industrial  hemp or industrial hemp commodities or products into
industrial hemp commodities or  products that contain cannabinoids and are intended for human
consumption or use.
(b) “Processes” does not include packaging or labeling.
[(38)(a)] (39)(a) “Produces” means the manufacture, planting, cultivation, growing or harvesting
of marijuana.
(b) “Produces” does not include:
(A) The drying of marijuana by a  marijuana processor, if the marijuana processor is not other-
wise producing marijuana; or
(B) The cultivation and growing of an immature marijuana plant by a marijuana processor,
marijuana wholesaler or marijuana retailer if the marijuana processor, marijuana  wholesaler or
marijuana retailer purchased or otherwise received the plant from a licensed marijuana producer.
[(39)] (40) “Propagate” means to grow  immature marijuana plants or to breed or produce
marijuana seeds.
[(40)] (41) “Public place” means a place to which  the general public has access and includes,
but is not limited to, hallways, lobbies and other parts  of apartment houses and hotels not consti-
tuting rooms or  apartments designed for actual residence, and highways, streets, schools, places of
amusement, parks, playgrounds and areas used in connection with public passenger transportation.
[(41)] (42) “Registry identification cardholder” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475C.777.
[(42)] (43) “Total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol” or “total delta-9-THC” means the sum of the
concentration or mass of  delta-9-THCA multiplied by 0.877 plus the concentration or mass of
delta-9-THC.
[(43)(a)] (44)(a) “Usable marijuana” means the dried leaves and flowers of marijuana.
(b) “Usable marijuana” does not include:
(A) Marijuana seeds;
(B) The stalks and roots of marijuana; or
(C) Waste material that is a by-product of producing or processing marijuana.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 475C.013 is amended to read:
475C.013. ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 may not be construed:
(1) To amend or affect state or federal law pertaining to employment matters;
(2) To amend or affect state or federal law pertaining to landlord-tenant matters;
(3) To prohibit a recipient of a federal grant or an applicant for a federal  grant from prohibiting
the manufacture, delivery, possession or  use of marijuana to the extent necessary to satisfy federal
requirements for the grant;
(4) To prohibit a party  to a federal contract or a person applying to be a party to a federal
contract from prohibiting the manufacture, delivery, possession or use  of marijuana to the extent
necessary to comply with the terms and conditions of the contract or  to satisfy federal requirements
for the contract;
(5) To require a person to violate a federal law;
(6) To exempt a person from a federal law or obstruct the enforcement of a federal law; or
[5]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(7) To amend or affect the Oregon Medical [ Marijuana] Cannabis Act.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 475C.017 is amended to read:
475C.017. (1) The  Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission has the duties, functions and powers
specified in ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540 to 475C.586 and the powers necessary or proper
to enable the commission to carry out the commission’s duties, functions  and powers under ORS
475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540 to 475C.586. The jurisdiction,  supervision, duties, functions and
powers of the commission extend to any person that produces,  processes, transports, delivers, sells,
purchases or tests a marijuana item in this state. The commission may sue and be sued.
(2) The duties, functions and powers of the commission specified in ORS 475C.005 to  475C.525
and 475C.540 to 475C.586 include the following:
(a) To regulate the production, processing, transportation, delivery, sale, purchase and  testing
of marijuana items in accordance with the  provisions of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540 to
475C.586.
(b) To issue, renew, suspend, revoke or refuse to issue or renew licenses or designations for
the production, processing, sale or testing of marijuana items, or other licenses  related to the con-
sumption of marijuana items, and to permit, in the commission’s  discretion, the transfer of a license
between persons.
(c) To  adopt, amend or repeal rules as necessary to carry out the intent and provisions of ORS
475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540 to 475C.586, including rules  that the commission considers nec-
essary to protect the public health and safety.
(d) To exercise  all powers incidental, convenient or necessary to enable the commission to ad-
minister or  carry out the provisions of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540 to 475C.586 or any
other law of this state that charges the  commission with a duty, function or power related to
marijuana. Powers described in this paragraph include, but are not limited to:
(A) Issuing subpoenas;
(B) Compelling the attendance of witnesses;
(C) Administering oaths;
(D) Certifying official acts;
(E) Taking depositions as provided by law;
(F) Compelling the production of  books, payrolls, accounts, papers, records, documents and tes-
timony; and
(G) Establishing fees in addition to the application, licensing , designating and renewal fees de-
scribed in ORS 475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093, 475C.097 , 475C.121 and 475C.548, provided that  any fee
established by the commission is reasonably calculated not to exceed the cost of the activity  for
which the fee is charged.
(e) To adopt rules regulating and prohibiting advertising marijuana items in a manner:
(A) That is appealing to minors;
(B) That promotes excessive use;
(C) That promotes illegal activity; or
(D) That otherwise presents a significant risk to public health and safety.
(f) To regulate the use of marijuana items for other  purposes as deemed necessary or appropri-
ate by the commission.
(g) To establish pilot programs, of not more  than three years in duration, to expand access to
marijuana for medical use for registry  identification cardholders and designated primary caregivers,
as defined in ORS 475C.777.
[6]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(h) To regulate the processing, transportation,  delivery, sale, purchase and testing of artificially
derived cannabinoids in accordance with the provisions of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525  and 475C.540
to 475C.586.
(i) To regulate the testing and labeling of inhalant  delivery systems, as defined in ORS 431A.175,
that include  industrial hemp-derived vapor items, as defined in ORS 475C.540, that are sold in this
state by any person.
(3) Fees collected pursuant to subsection (2)(d)(G) of this section shall be deposited in the
Marijuana Control and Regulation Fund established under ORS 475C.297.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 475C.037 is amended to read:
475C.037. (1) The Oregon Liquor  and Cannabis Commission may not license or designate  an
applicant under the provisions of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or  475C.548 if the applicant is under 21
years of age.
(2) The commission may  refuse to issue a license  or designation  or may issue a restricted li-
cense to an applicant under the provisions of  ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.548 if the commis-
sion makes a finding that the applicant:
(a) Is in the habit  of using alcoholic beverages, habit-forming drugs, marijuana or controlled
substances to excess.
(b) Has made false statements to the commission.
(c) Is  incompetent or physically unable to carry on the management of the establishment pro-
posed to be licensed.
(d) Has been convicted of violating a federal law, state law or local ordinance if the  conviction
is substantially related to the fitness and ability of the applicant to lawfully  carry out activities
under the license.
(e) Is not of good repute and moral character.
(f) Does  not have a good record of compliance with ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.540 to
475C.586 or any rule adopted under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.540 to 475C.586.
(g) Is not the legitimate owner  of the premises proposed to be licensed  or designated , or has
not disclosed that other persons have ownership interests in the premises  proposed to be licensed
or designated.
(h) Has not demonstrated financial responsibility  sufficient to adequately meet the requirements
of the premises proposed to be licensed or designated.
(i) Is unable to understand the laws of this state relating to marijuana items or the rules adopted
under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540 to 475C.586.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2)(d) of this section,  in determining whether to issue a license
or a restricted license to an applicant, the commission may not consider  the prior conviction of the
applicant or any  owner, director, officer, manager, employee, agent or other representative of the
applicant for:
(a) The manufacture of marijuana, if:
(A) The date of the conviction is two or more years before the date of the application; and
(B) The person has not been convicted more  than once for the manufacture or delivery of
marijuana;
(b) The delivery of marijuana to a person 21 years of age or older, if:
(A) The date of the conviction is two or more years before the date of the application; and
(B) The person has not been convicted more than  once for the manufacture or delivery of
marijuana; or
[7]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) The possession of marijuana.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 475C.073 is amended to read:
475C.073. (1) A premises for which a  marijuana producer holds a production license issued under
ORS 475C.065 or a person responsible for a marijuana grow site designated under ORS
475C.121 and that is located in an area subject to the jurisdiction of a city or county that  has
adopted a prohibition under ORS 475C.950  on marijuana production, or has adopted or amended a
county or local ordinance that causes marijuana production to be a nonconforming land use, since
the date on which the production license was first issued may continue to be used  to produce
marijuana.
(2) A premises described in subsection (1) of this section is not  required to be continually owned
or operated by the marijuana producer that was first issued a  license under ORS 475C.065  or des-
ignation under ORS 475C.121.
(3) A land use compatibility statement, in addition to that  required for initial licensure, from the
city or county is not required for a premises described in subsection (1) of this section if:
(a) The marijuana producer or person responsible for a marijuana grow site  is applying for
[licensure] renewal  of a license or designation ; or
(b) A change in ownership of the premises occurs but does not alter the marijuana  plant grow
canopy size or whether the marijuana plant grow canopy is indoors or outdoors.
(4)(a) Alterations may be made to premises described in subsection (1) of this section if the  al-
terations:
(A) Are necessary in order for the premises to comply with  a lawful requirement for alteration
in production; or
(B) In the production or in the buildings,  structures or physical improvements associated with
the premises have no greater adverse impact to the surrounding area.
(b) The city  or county that has jurisdiction over the premises shall perform an evaluation of
proposed alterations and may deny only  alterations that do not meet the criteria set out in this
subsection.
(5) If a premises described in subsection (1) of this section is  not used for marijuana production
for a period of at least 12 calendar months, marijuana  production may not be resumed on the
premises unless the marijuana production  conforms to any zoning requirements or regulations ap-
plicable at the time of the proposed resumption.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 475C.121 is amended to read:
475C.121. (1) The Oregon Liquor and  Cannabis Commission shall designate any marijuana pro-
ducer that holds a license issued under  ORS 475C.065 and that is registered under ORS 475C.137
as an  exclusively medical licensee if the marijuana producer attests, in a form and manner pre-
scribed by the commission, to:
(a) Producing marijuana only for medical purposes; and
(b) Transferring usable  marijuana only to marijuana processors registered under ORS 475C.141,
marijuana wholesalers registered under ORS 475C.145,  marijuana retailers registered under ORS
475C.149, registry identification cardholders and designated primary caregivers.
(2)(a) The commission shall designate, in  the manner described for licenses in ORS
475C.049, a person responsible for a marijuana  grow site that produces marijuana for three
or more registry identification cardholders as an exclusively medical producer registrant  if
the person makes the attestations described in subsection  (1) of this section and applies to
the commission in the manner described in ORS 475C.033.
[8]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The  commission may require fingerprints of the applicant for the purpose of re-
questing a state or nationwide criminal records check under ORS 181A.195.
(c) A designation  issued under this section shall carry the same privileges and properties
as those described for licenses in ORS 475C.045.
(d) Prior to receiving a designation under this subsection, an applicant shall  request a
land use compatibility statement as described in ORS 475C.053.
(e) Except as otherwise provided by law,  a designation issued under this subsection is
subject to the provisions of ORS 475C.005  to 475C.525 as if the designation were a license is-
sued under ORS 475C.065.
(f) Notwithstanding ORS 475C.077,  a person designated under this subsection is subject
to the possession  limits described in ORS 475C.806 and 475C.809 and to the transfer limits
described in ORS 475C.800.
(g) The commission may not  require a person to whom a designation has been issued
under this subsection to use a security system or any  component of a security system, such
as video surveillance, an alarm system, sensors or physical barriers,  at the marijuana grow
site for which the person is responsible.
[(2)] (3) [ If the commission makes a designation under this section, ] The commission  shall keep a
record of the [ designation] of the designations made under this section .
(4) The commission may charge a fee for a designation  under this section not exceed $500
per year.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 475C.149 is amended to read:
475C.149. (1) To sell  marijuana items at retail for medical purposes, a marijuana retailer that
holds a license issued under ORS 475C.097 must  register with the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis
Commission under this section.
(2) The commission shall register a marijuana retailer for the purpose  of selling marijuana items
at retail for medical purposes if the marijuana retailer:
(a) Holds a license issued under ORS 475C.097;
(b) Meets any qualifications adopted by the commission by rule;
(c) Applies to the commission in a form and manner prescribed by the commission; and
(d) Pays any fee adopted by the commission by rule.
(3) A marijuana retailer registered under this section:
(a) May  sell medical grade cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates and cannabinoid
extracts to registry identification cardholders and designated primary caregivers;
(b) May not  sell medical grade cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates and cannabinoid
extracts to individuals other than  registry identification cardholders and designated primary
caregivers;
(c) May sell usable marijuana and medical grade cannabinoid products,  cannabinoid concen-
trates and cannabinoid extracts to registry identification  cardholders and designated primary
caregivers at a discounted price; [ and]
(d) May  provide, for no consideration, usable marijuana and medical grade cannabinoid products,
cannabinoid concentrates and  cannabinoid extracts to a registry identification cardholder and the
designated primary caregiver of the registry identification cardholder[ .]; and
(e) If the marijuana retailer sells cannabinoid  products, cannabinoid concentrates and
cannabinoid extracts, shall offer  a selection for sale to registry identification cardholders and
designated primary caregivers  of medical grade cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concen-
[9]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
trates and cannabinoid extracts that have a potency  of not more than 20 percent total
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol.
(4)(a) The commission shall adopt rules necessary to administer this section.
(b) The rules  must provide that any fee adopted by the commission under subsection (2)(d) of this
section be in an amount reasonably calculated to not exceed, together with other fees  collected
under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525, the cost of administering ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 475C.177 is amended to read:
475C.177. (1) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis  Commission shall develop and maintain a system
for tracking the transfer of marijuana items between premises for  which licenses or designations
have been issued under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.548.
(2) The purposes  of the system developed and maintained under this section include, but are not
limited to:
(a) Preventing the diversion  of marijuana items to criminal enterprises, gangs, cartels and other
states;
(b) Preventing persons from substituting or tampering with marijuana items;
(c) Ensuring an accurate accounting of the production, processing and sale of marijuana items;
(d) Ensuring that laboratory testing results are accurately reported; and
(e) Ensuring compliance with ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540 to 475C.586, rules adopted
under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540 to 475C.586 and any other law  of this state that
charges the commission with a duty, function or power related to marijuana.
(3) The system developed and maintained under this section must be capable  of tracking, at a
minimum:
(a) The propagation of immature marijuana plants and  the production of marijuana by a
marijuana producer or a person responsible for  a marijuana grow site designated under ORS
475C.121;
(b) The processing of marijuana by a marijuana processor;
(c) The receiving, storing and delivering of marijuana items by a marijuana wholesaler;
(d) The sale of marijuana items by a marijuana retailer to a consumer;
(e) The sale and purchase of marijuana items  between licensees, as permitted by ORS 475C.005
to 475C.525;
(f) The transfer of marijuana items between premises for which  licenses have been issued under
ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.548; and
(g) Any other information that the commission  determines is reasonably necessary to accomplish
the duties, functions and powers of the commission under ORS 475C.005 to  475C.525 and 475C.540
to 475C.586.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 475C.441 is amended to read:
475C.441. (1) As used in this section, “designated primary caregiver,” “immature  marijuana
plant,” “marijuana,” “medical cannabinoid product” and “registry identification cardholder”  have
the meanings given those terms in ORS 475C.777.
(2) A city or county may not adopt an ordinance, by referral or  otherwise, that prohibits or
otherwise limits:
(a) The privileges described in ORS 475C.305; or
(b) The right of a registry identification cardholder  and the designated primary caregiver of a
registry identification cardholder to:
(A) Possess the seeds of marijuana, immature  marijuana plants or medical cannabinoid products
[10]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
as described in ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919;
(B) Jointly possess up to six mature marijuana plants and up to 12 immature marijuana  plants
under ORS 475C.806 [ (1)]; or
(C) Jointly possess up to 24 ounces of usable marijuana under ORS 475C.809 (1).
SECTION 12.
ORS 475C.457 is added to and made a part of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525.
SECTION 13.  ORS 475C.457 is amended to read:
475C.457. (1) The  governing body of a city or county may repeal an ordinance that prohibits the
establishment of any one or more of the following in the area subject to the jurisdiction of  the city
or in the unincorporated area subject to the jurisdiction of the county:
(a) Marijuana processing sites registered under ORS 475C.815;
(b) Medical marijuana dispensaries registered under ORS 475C.833;
(c) Marijuana producers that hold a license issued under ORS 475C.065;
(d) Marijuana processors that hold a license issued under ORS 475C.085;
(e) Marijuana wholesalers that hold a license issued under ORS 475C.093;
(f) Marijuana retailers that hold a license issued under ORS 475C.097;
(g) Marijuana producers  that hold a license issued under ORS 475C.065 and that the Oregon
Liquor and Cannabis Commission has designated as  an exclusively medical licensee under ORS
475C.121 and  persons responsible for a marijuana grow site that the commission has desig-
nated under ORS 475C.121;
(h) Marijuana  processors that hold a license issued under ORS 475C.085 and that the commission
has designated as an exclusively medical licensee under ORS 475C.125;
(i) Marijuana wholesalers that hold a license issued under ORS 475C.093 and that the  commis-
sion has designated as an exclusively medical licensee under ORS 475C.129;
(j) Marijuana retailers that hold a license issued under ORS 475C.097 and  that the commission
has designated as an exclusively medical licensee under ORS 475C.133; or
(k) Any combination of the entities described in this subsection.
(2) If the governing body of a city or county repeals an ordinance under this  section, the gov-
erning body must provide the text of the ordinance:
(a) To the Oregon Health Authority, in a form and manner  prescribed by the authority, if the
ordinance  concerns  a medical marijuana dispensary registered under ORS 475C.833 or a marijuana
processing site registered under ORS 475C.815; or
(b)(A) To  the commission, in a form and manner prescribed by the commission, if the ordinance
concerns a premises for which a license has been issued under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525; and
(B) To the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  in a form and manner prescribed by
the department,  within 30 days of enactment of the repeal of the ordinance, if the ordinance con-
cerns a premises for which issuance of a license is required under ORS 475C.065,  475C.085, 475C.093
or 475C.097.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 475C.497 is amended to read:
475C.497. Except for ORS 475C.489 and 475C.493, ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525:
(1) Do not apply to the  extent a person acts within the scope of and in compliance with the
Oregon Medical [ Marijuana] Cannabis Act; and
(2) Do not amend or affect duties, functions and powers of the Oregon  Health Authority under
the Oregon Medical [ Marijuana] Cannabis Act.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 475C.773 is amended to read:
475C.773. ORS 475C.770  to 475C.919 shall be known as the Oregon Medical [ Marijuana]
[11]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Cannabis Act.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 475C.783 is amended to read:
475C.783. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish a program  for the issuance of registry
identification cards to applicants who meet the requirements of this section. The authority shall
issue an electronic registry identification card  that includes a quick response code and ena-
bles the registry identification cardholder to print the registry identification card.
(2) The authority shall issue a registry identification card to an  applicant who is 18 years of age
or older if the applicant pays a fee in an amount established by the authority by rule and  submits
to the authority an application containing the following information:
(a) Written documentation from the applicant’s attending provider stating that  the attending
provider has diagnosed the applicant as having a  debilitating medical condition and that the medical
use of marijuana may mitigate the symptoms or effects  of the applicant’s debilitating medical con-
dition;
(b) The name, address and date of birth of the applicant;
(c) The name, address and telephone number of the applicant’s attending provider;
(d) Proof of residency, submitted in a form required by the authority by rule;
(e) The name and address of the applicant’s designated primary caregiver, if the  applicant is
designating a primary caregiver under ORS 475C.789; and
(f) [ The information  described in ORS 475C.792 (2), ] If the applicant is applying to [ produce
marijuana or ] designate  another person [ under ORS 475C.792 ] to produce marijuana  on the
applicant’s behalf, the name and address of the designee .
[(3)(a)] (3) The authority shall issue a registry identification card  to an applicant who is under
18 years of age if:
[(A)] (a) The applicant  pays the fee and submits the application described in subsection (2) of
this section; and
[(B)] (b) The custodial parent or legal  guardian who is responsible for the health care decisions
of the applicant signs and submits to the authority a written statement that:
[(i)] (A) The applicant’s attending provider has explained to the applicant and to the custodial
parent or legal guardian the possible risks and benefits of the medical use of marijuana;
[(ii)] (B) The custodial parent or legal guardian consents to the medical use of marijuana by  the
applicant;
[(iii)] (C) The  custodial parent or legal guardian agrees to serve as the applicant’s designated
primary caregiver; and
[(iv)] (D) The custodial parent or legal guardian agrees to control  the acquisition, dosage and
frequency of the medical use of marijuana by the applicant.
[(b) An  applicant who is under 18 years of age may not apply to produce marijuana under sub-
section (2)(f) of this section. ]
(4) The authority shall:
(a) On the date on which the  authority receives an application described in subsection (2) of this
section, issue a receipt to  the applicant verifying that the authority received an application under
subsection (2) or (3) of this section; and
(b) Approve or deny an application received under subsection (2) or  (3) of this section within
30 days after receiving the application.
(5)(a) If the  authority approves an application, the authority shall issue a serially numbered
electronic registry identification card to the applicant within five days after approving the  appli-
[12]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cation. The registry identification card must include the following information:
(A) The registry identification cardholder’s name, address and date of birth;
(B) The issuance date and expiration date of the registry identification card;
(C) If the registry identification cardholder designated a primary caregiver under ORS 475C.789,
the name and address of the registry identification cardholder’s designated primary caregiver; and
(D) Any other information required by the authority by rule.
(b) If the registry identification cardholder  designated a primary caregiver under ORS 475C.789,
the authority shall issue an  electronic identification card to the designated primary  caregiver. The
identification card must contain the information required by paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(6) A registry identification cardholder shall:
(a) In a form and manner prescribed by  the authority, notify the authority of any change con-
cerning the registry identification cardholder’s:
(A) Name, address or attending provider;
(B) Designated primary caregiver, including the designation of a primary caregiver made at  a
time other than at the time of applying for or renewing a registry identification card; or
(C) Person responsible for a marijuana grow site, including  the designation of a person respon-
sible for a marijuana grow site made at a time other than at the time of applying for or renewing
a registry identification card.
(b) Subject to  subsection (13) of this section,  annually renew the registry identification card
by paying a fee in an amount established by the authority by rule and submitting to the authority
an application that contains the following information:
(A) Updated written documentation from the registry  identification cardholder’s attending pro-
vider stating that the registry identification cardholder still has a  debilitating medical condition and
that the medical use of marijuana may mitigate the  symptoms or effects of the registry identification
cardholder’s debilitating medical condition;
(B) The information described in subsection (2)(b) to (f) of this section; and
(C) If the registry identification cardholder is under 18 years of  age, a statement signed by the
custodial parent or legal guardian of the registry  identification cardholder that meets the require-
ments of subsection (3) of this section.
(7) The authority shall:
(a) On the date on which the  authority receives an application described in subsection (2) of this
section, issue a receipt to the applicant verifying that the authority  received an application under
subsection (6)(b) of this section; and
(b) Approve or deny an  application received under subsection (6)(b) of this section within 30
days after receiving the application.
(8)(a) If the registry identification cardholder’s attending provider  determines that the registry
identification cardholder no longer has a debilitating medical condition,  or determines that the
medical use of marijuana is contraindicated for  the registry identification cardholder’s debilitating
medical condition, the registry identification cardholder [ shall return the  registry identification card
to] notify the authority of the determination  within 30 calendar  days after receiving notice of the
determination[.] and the authority shall invalidate the electronic registry identification card.
(b) If, because  of circumstances beyond the control of the registry identification cardholder, a
registry identification cardholder is unable to obtain a second  medical opinion about the registry
identification cardholder’s continuing eligibility for the medical use of marijuana before having  to
[return the registry identification card to ] notify  the authority, the authority may grant the registry
[13]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
identification cardholder additional time to obtain a second medical opinion.
(9)(a) The authority may deny an application for a registry identification  card or an application
to renew a registry identification card, or may suspend or revoke a registry identification card, if:
(A) The applicant or registry identification cardholder  does not provide the information required
by this section;
(B) The authority determines that  the applicant or registry identification cardholder provided
false information; or
(C) The authority determines that the applicant or registry  identification cardholder violated a
provision of ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919 or a rule adopted under ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919.
(b) If the authority revokes  a registry identification card [ is revoked ], the authority shall also
revoke any  associated identification card issued under subsection (5)(b) of this section[ ,] or
marijuana grow site registration card issued under ORS 475C.792 [ (6), shall also be revoked ].
(c) A person whose application is denied, or whose registry identification card is revoked,  under
this subsection may not reapply for a registry identification card for six  months from the date of the
denial or revocation unless otherwise authorized by the authority.
(10)(a) The authority may deny a designation of a primary caregiver made under  ORS 475C.789,
or suspend or revoke an associated identification card  issued under subsection (5)(b) of this section,
if the authority determines that the designee or the registry identification cardholder  violated a
provision of ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919 or a rule adopted under ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919.
(b) A person whose designation has been  denied, or whose identification card has been revoked,
under this subsection may not  be designated as a primary caregiver under ORS 475C.789 for six
months from the date of the denial or revocation unless otherwise authorized by the authority.
(11)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) or (6)(b) of this  section, if an applicant for a registry
identification card, or a  registry identification cardholder applying for renewal of a registry iden-
tification card, submits to the authority proof of having served in the Armed Forces of the  United
States, the authority:
(A) May not impose a fee that is greater than $20  for the issuance or renewal of the registry
identification card; and
(B) Must waive the fee for the issuance or renewal of the registry identification card  if the ap-
plicant submits proof of having  a United States Department of Veterans Affairs total disability rat-
ing of at least 50 percent as  a result of an injury or illness that the veteran incurred, or that was
aggravated, during active military service and who received a discharge  or release under other than
dishonorable conditions.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection  (6)(b)(A) of this section, the requirement that a registry identifi-
cation cardholder include in the application to renew a registry identification card updated written
documentation  from  the cardholder’s attending provider regarding the cardholder’s continuing de-
bilitating medical condition does not apply to a service-disabled veteran who:
(A) Has been assigned a total and  permanent disability rating for compensation that rates the
veteran as unable to secure or follow a substantially gainful occupation as a result of service-
connected disabilities as described in 38 C.F.R. 4.16; or
(B) Has a United States Department of  Veterans Affairs total disability rating of 100 percent
as a result of an  injury or illness that the veteran incurred, or that was aggravated, during active
military service and who received a discharge or release under other than dishonorable conditions.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (2) or (6)(b) of this section, if an applicant  for a registry
identification card,  or registry identification cardholder applying for renewal of a registry
[14]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
identification card, submits to the authority proof of qualification  for federal Social Security
disability benefits, the commission may not impose  a fee that is greater than $20 for the is-
suance or renewal of the registry identification card.
(12) For any purpose described in ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919, including  exemption from criminal
liability under ORS 475C.883, a receipt issued by  the authority verifying that an application has
been submitted  to the authority under subsection (2), (3) or (6)(b) of this section has the same legal
effect as a registry  identification card for 30 days following the date on which the receipt was issued
to the applicant.
(13) The  authority may issue a permanent electronic registry identification card under
this section. A registry identification  cardholder who holds a permanent electronic registry
identification card is not required to apply for renewal of the card under this section.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 475C.786 is amended to read:
475C.786. A designated primary caregiver may assist the designating  registry identification
cardholder with any matter related to the medical use of marijuana, including[ :]
[(1) The production of marijuana at the address provided  by the registry identification cardholder
to the Oregon Health Authority pursuant to ORS 475C.783 (2)(f); and ]
[(2)] the processing of  marijuana into cannabinoid concentrates or medical cannabinoid products.
SECTION 18.  ORS 475C.792 is amended to read:
475C.792. (1)(a) The  Oregon Health Authority shall establish by rule a marijuana grow site
registration system to track and regulate  the production of marijuana by a [ registry identification
cardholder or a person designated by the registry identification cardholder to  produce marijuana for
the registry identification cardholder ] person designated to produce marijuana for not more  than
two registry identification cardholders .
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, a person may not produce  marijuana
unless the person is registered under this section.
(c) Paragraph (b) of this subsection does not apply to the production  of marijuana as provided
in ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or as otherwise provided for by the statutory laws of this state.
(2) Rules adopted under this section must require  an applicant for a registry identification
card[, or a registry  identification cardholder who produces marijuana or ] who designates another
person to produce marijuana[ ,] to submit an application to  the authority containing the following
information at the time of making an application under ORS 475C.783 (2), renewing a registry  iden-
tification card under ORS 475C.783 (6)(b),  or notifying the authority of a change under ORS 475C.783
(6)(a):
(a) The name of the person responsible for the marijuana grow site;
(b) Proof that the person is 21 years of age or older;
(c) If the [ registry identification cardholder or the ] person responsible for the marijuana grow site
is not the owner of the premises  of the marijuana grow site, signed informed consent from the owner
of the premises to register the premises as a marijuana grow site;
(d) The address of the marijuana grow site; and
(e) Any other information that the authority  considers necessary to track the production of
marijuana under ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919.
(3)(a) The  authority shall conduct a criminal records check under ORS 181A.195 of any person
whose name is submitted under this section as the person responsible for a marijuana grow site.
(b) A person  convicted of a Class A or Class B felony under ORS 475.752 to 475.920 for the
manufacture or delivery of  a controlled substance in Schedule I or Schedule II may not act as or
[15]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
be designated a  person responsible for a marijuana grow site for two years from the date of con-
viction.
(c) A person convicted more than once of a Class A  or Class B felony under ORS 475.752 to
475.920 for the manufacture or delivery of a  controlled substance in Schedule I or Schedule II may
not act as or be designated a person responsible for a marijuana grow site.
(4) Subject to subsection (11) of this section, the authority  shall issue [ a] an electronic
marijuana grow site registration card if the requirements of  subsections (2) and (3) of this section
are met. The electronic marijuana grow site registration card  must include a quick response
code and allow the holder to print the marijuana grow site registration card.
(5) A person who holds a marijuana grow site  registration card under this section [ must display
the card at the marijuana grow site at all times ] shall provide proof of the card  upon request of
the authority .
(6) Proof of  a marijuana grow site registration card [ must be obtained and  posted ] for each
registry  identification  cardholder for whom marijuana is being produced at a marijuana grow site
must be available upon request of the authority .
(7)(a) All seeds, immature marijuana plants, mature  marijuana plants and usable marijuana as-
sociated with the production of marijuana for  a registry identification cardholder by a person re-
sponsible for a marijuana grow site are the property of the registry identification cardholder.
(b) All  seeds, immature marijuana plants, mature marijuana plants and usable marijuana asso-
ciated with the production of marijuana for a registry identification  cardholder by a person re-
sponsible for a marijuana grow  site must be transferred to the registry identification cardholder
upon the request of the registry identification cardholder.
(c) All usable marijuana associated with  the production of marijuana for a registry identification
cardholder by a person responsible for  a marijuana grow site must be transferred to a marijuana
processing site upon the  request of the registry identification cardholder. For purposes of this par-
agraph, a request to transfer usable marijuana  constitutes an assignment of the right to possess the
usable marijuana.
(d) All seeds, immature marijuana plants and usable marijuana associated  with the production
of marijuana for a registry identification cardholder by a person responsible  for a marijuana grow
site must be transferred  to a medical marijuana dispensary upon request of the registry identifica-
tion cardholder. For purposes of this paragraph, a request to transfer seeds, immature marijuana
plants or usable marijuana constitutes an assignment of the right to possess  the seeds, immature
marijuana plants or usable marijuana.
[(e) Information related to transfers made under this subsection  must be submitted to the authority
in the manner required by ORS 475C.795. ]
(8) A registry identification  cardholder, or the designated  primary  caregiver of a registry
identification cardholder, may reimburse a person responsible for a marijuana grow site  for all costs
associated with the production of marijuana for the registry identification cardholder.
(9) The authority may inspect:
(a) The marijuana grow  site of a person designated to produce marijuana by a registry identifi-
cation cardholder to ensure compliance with this section [ and ORS 475C.795 and 475C.806 ] and any
rule adopted under this section [ and ORS 475C.795 and 475C.806 ]; and
(b) The records of the marijuana grow site of a person designated to produce marijuana  by a
registry identification cardholder to ensure compliance with this section [ and ORS  475C.795] and
any rule adopted under this section [ and ORS 475C.795 ].
[16]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(10) The authority may refuse to register [ a registry identification cardholder or a designee  under
this section ] or may suspend or revoke the registration of a person responsible for a marijuana grow
site if the authority  determines that [ the applicant or ] the person responsible for a marijuana grow
site violated a provision of ORS 475C.770  to 475C.919, a rule adopted under ORS 475C.770 to
475C.919 or an ordinance adopted pursuant to ORS 475C.827.
(11) The authority may require a person responsible for a marijuana  grow site, prior to issuing
a marijuana grow site registration card under subsection  (4) of this section, to pay a fee reasonably
calculated to pay costs incurred under this section and ORS [ 475C.795 and] 475C.856.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 475C.800 is amended to read:
475C.800. (1)  Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a marijuana grow site may transfer up to
[20] 45 pounds of usable marijuana per year to a person that holds a license issued under ORS
475C.085 or 475C.093, provided that:
(a) The transfer is tracked using the system developed and maintained under ORS 475C.177;
[(b) More than 12 mature marijuana plants are produced at the marijuana grow site; ]
[(c)] (b) The usable marijuana has been assigned to the person responsible for the marijuana
grow site pursuant to ORS 475C.798;
[(d)] (c) The usable marijuana has been tested in accordance with  the provisions of ORS
475C.540 to 475C.586; and
[(e)] (d) The marijuana grow site first registered with  the Oregon Health Authority under ORS
475C.792 on or before August 2, 2017.
(2) If the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission  determines that the supply of marijuana
items offered for sale by marijuana retailers that hold a license issued under ORS  475C.097 is ex-
ceeding  consumer  demand for the marijuana items, and if the commission determines that the market
for marijuana items in this state will not  self-correct for the excess, the commission may issue an
order that temporarily reduces the amount of usable  marijuana that may be transferred pursuant to
this section or that temporarily suspends the ability to  transfer usable marijuana pursuant to this
section.
SECTION 20.  ORS 475C.806 is amended to read:
475C.806. [(1)(a) A registry identification cardholder  and the designated primary caregiver of the
registry identification cardholder may jointly possess: ]
[(A) Six or fewer mature marijuana plants; and ]
[(B) Twelve or fewer immature marijuana plants. ]
[(b)(A) Unless an address is the marijuana grow site of  a person designated to produce marijuana
by a registry identification cardholder, the address where a registry  identification cardholder or the
primary caregiver of a registry identification cardholder produces marijuana may  be used to produce
not more than: ]
[(i) Six or fewer mature marijuana plants per registry identification cardholder,  up to 12 mature
marijuana plants; and ]
[(ii) Twelve or  fewer immature marijuana plants per registry identification cardholder, up to 24
immature marijuana plants.]
[(B) Except as provided in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph, an address  that is subject to this
paragraph may not be used to produce plants in the  genus Cannabis within the plant family
Cannabaceae pursuant to ORS 475C.305. ]
[(C) Subject to subparagraph (D) of this paragraph,  an address that is subject to this paragraph
may be used to produce plants in the genus  Cannabis within the plant family Cannabaceae pursuant
[17]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to ORS 475C.305 if a person other than a registry identification cardholder who is  using the address
to produce marijuana plants pursuant to ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919 resides at the address. ]
[(D) An address  that is subject to this paragraph may not be used to produce more than 12 total
mature marijuana plants. ]
[(2)(a)] (1) A person may be designated to  produce marijuana under ORS 475C.792 by no more
than [ eight] two registry identification cardholders.
[(b)](2)(a) Except as provided in  paragraph (b) of this subsection,  a person responsible for
a marijuana grow site may produce  for a registry identification cardholder who designates the per-
son to produce marijuana no more than:
(A) Six mature marijuana plants;
(B) 12 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height; and
(C) The [ amount] number, established by the Oregon Health Authority by rule, of immature
marijuana plants that are less than 24 inches in height.
[(3) If the address of a person responsible for a  marijuana grow site registered under ORS
475C.792 is located within city limits in an area zoned for residential use: ]
[(a) Except  as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, no more than the following amounts
of marijuana plants may be produced at the address: ]
[(A) 12 mature marijuana plants; ]
[(B) 24 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height; and ]
[(C) The amount, established by the authority by  rule, of immature marijuana plants that are less
than 24 inches in height; or ]
(b) Subject to subsection [ (5)] (4) of this section, if  each person responsible for a marijuana grow
site located at the  address first registered with the authority under ORS 475C.792 before January
1, 2015, no more than the following  [amounts] numbers of marijuana plants may be produced at the
address:
(A) The [ amount] number of mature marijuana plants located at that  address on December 31,
2014, in excess of 12 mature marijuana plants, not to exceed 24 mature marijuana plants;
(B) 48 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height; and
(C) The [ amount] number, established by the authority by rule, of immature marijuana  plants
that are less than 24 inches in height.
[(4)] (3) Subject to subsection (4) of this section,  if the address of a person responsible for a
marijuana grow site registered under ORS 475C.792 is [ located in an area  other than an area de-
scribed in subsection (3) of this section: ]
[(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, no more than the following  amounts
of marijuana plants may be produced at the address: ]
[(A) 48 mature marijuana plants; ]
[(B) 96 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height; and ]
[(C) The amount, established by the authority by rule,  of immature marijuana plants that are less
than 24 inches in height; or ]
[(b) Subject to subsections (5) and (6) of  this section, if ] not located in an area zoned for resi-
dential use and  each person responsible for a marijuana grow  site located at the address first
registered with the authority  under ORS 475C.792 before January 1, 2015, no more than the follow-
ing [ amounts] numbers of marijuana plants may be produced at the address:
[(A)] (a) The [ amount] number of mature marijuana plants located at that address on December
31, 2014, in excess of 48 mature marijuana plants, not to exceed 96 mature marijuana plants;
[18]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(B)] (b) 192 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height; and
[(C)] (c) The [ amount] number, established by the authority by rule, of  immature marijuana
plants that are less than 24 inches in height.
[(5)(a)] (4) If the authority suspends or revokes the registration of  a person responsible for a
marijuana grow site  that is located at an address described in subsection [ (3)(b)] (2)(b) of this sec-
tion, no more than the [ following amounts ] numbers  of marijuana plants described in subsection
(2)(a) of this section  may subsequently be produced at any address described in subsection (2)(b)
or (3) of this section at  which the person responsible for the marijuana grow site produces
marijuana.[:]
[(A) 12 mature marijuana plants; ]
[(B) 24 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height; and ]
[(C) The amount, established by the authority by  rule, of immature marijuana plants that are less
than 24 inches in height. ]
[(b) If the authority suspends or revokes the registration of a person responsible  for a marijuana
grow site that is located at an address described in  subsection (4)(b) of this section, no more than the
following amounts of marijuana plants may subsequently be  produced at any address described in
subsection (4) of this section at which the person responsible  for the marijuana grow site produces
marijuana:]
[(A) 48 mature marijuana plants; ]
[(B) 96 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height; and ]
[(C) The amount, established by the authority by rule,  of immature marijuana plants that are less
than 24 inches in height. ]
[(6)] (5) If a registry identification cardholder who designated a person to  produce marijuana for
the registry identification cardholder pursuant to ORS  475C.792 terminates the designation, the
person responsible for the  marijuana grow site whose designation has been terminated [ may not be
designated to produce marijuana by another registry identification cardholder, except that  the person ]
may be designated to produce marijuana by  another registry identification cardholder [ if no more
than 48 mature marijuana plants  and no more than 96 immature marijuana plants that are 24 or more
inches in height are  produced at the address for the marijuana grow site at which the person produces
marijuana].
[(7)] (6) Subject to the limits described in subsections (2) to [ (6)] (5) of this section, if multiple
persons responsible for a marijuana grow site under ORS 475C.792 are  located at the same address,
the persons designated to produce marijuana by registry identification cardholders who  are located
at that address may collectively  produce marijuana plants for any number of registry identification
cardholders who designate the persons to produce  marijuana , except that the total number of
registry identification cardholders for whom marijuana is produced at  the address may not
exceed more than two registry identification cardholders  for each person responsible for a
marijuana grow site located at the address .
[(8)] (7) If a law enforcement officer determines  that there is a number of marijuana plants at
an address in excess  of the quantities specified in this section, or that an address is being used to
produce a number of marijuana plants in excess  of the quantities specified in subsection [ (1)(b)] (2)
of this section, the law enforcement  officer may confiscate only the excess number of marijuana
plants.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 475C.809 is amended to read:
475C.809. (1) Except  as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a registry identification
[19]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cardholder and the designated primary caregiver of the registry identification cardholder may jointly
possess no more than 24 ounces of usable marijuana.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, a person designated  to produce marijuana by a
registry identification cardholder may possess the amount of  usable marijuana that the person har-
vests from the person’s mature marijuana plants[ , provided that the  person may not possess usable
marijuana in excess of the amount of usable marijuana in the person’s possession  as reported to the
Oregon Health Authority under ORS 475C.795 ].
(3) A person designated to produce marijuana by a  registry identification cardholder may not
possess usable marijuana in excess of:
(a) For a marijuana grow site located outdoors,  12 pounds of usable marijuana per mature
marijuana plant; or
(b) For a marijuana grow site located indoors, six pounds of usable  marijuana per mature
marijuana plant.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 475C.812 is amended to read:
475C.812. A person to whom a  registry identification card has been issued under ORS 475C.783
(5)(a), an identification card has been issued under ORS 475C.783 (5)(b),  or a marijuana grow site
registration card has been issued  under ORS 475C.792, may not possess marijuana, usable marijuana,
medical cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates or  cannabinoid extracts in a location other
than the address on file with the Oregon Health  Authority unless the person is [ carrying] able to
provide proof of issuance of  the card.
SECTION 23.  ORS 475C.815 is amended to read:
475C.815. (1)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish by rule a marijuana processing  site
registration system to track and regulate the processing of marijuana by a person responsible for
a marijuana processing site.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c)  of this subsection, a person may not process marijuana
unless the person is registered under this section.
(c) Paragraph (b) of this subsection does not apply  to the processing of marijuana as provided
in ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or as otherwise provided for by the statutory laws of this state.
(2) The registration system established under subsection (1) of this section must  require an ap-
plicant for a marijuana processing site to submit an application to the authority that includes:
(a) The name of the individual who owns the marijuana processing site or, if a business entity
owns the marijuana processing site, the name of each individual who has a financial  interest in the
marijuana processing site;
(b) The name of the individual or individuals  responsible for the marijuana processing site, if
different from the name of the individual who owns the marijuana processing site;
(c) The address of the marijuana processing site;
(d) Proof that  each individual responsible for the marijuana processing site is 21 years of age
or older;
(e) Documentation, as required by the authority by  rule, that demonstrates the marijuana pro-
cessing site meets the requirements of subsection (3) of this section; and
(f) Any other information that the authority considers necessary.
(3) To qualify for registration under this section, a marijuana processing site:
(a) May not be located  in an area that is zoned for residential use if the marijuana processing
site processes cannabinoid extracts;
(b) Must be registered as a business, or have  filed an application to register as a business, with
[20]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the office of the Secretary of State; and
(c) Must  meet the requirements of any rule adopted by the authority under subsection (10) of
this section.
(4)(a) The authority shall conduct a criminal records check under ORS 181A.195  for each indi-
vidual named in an application under subsection (2) of this section.
(b) An individual convicted for the manufacture  or delivery of a controlled substance in Sched-
ule I or Schedule  II may not own or be responsible for a marijuana processing site for two years
from the date the individual is convicted.
(c) An individual convicted more than once for the manufacture or  delivery of a controlled
substance in Schedule I or  Schedule II may not own or be responsible for a marijuana processing
site.
(5) If a person submits the application required under subsection (2) of  this section, if the
marijuana processing site identified in the  application meets the requirements of this section and
any rules adopted under this section and if each individual named in the application passes  the
criminal records check required under subsection (4)  of this section, the authority shall register the
marijuana processing site and issue electronic proof of registration. Proof of registration must be
[displayed on the premises of the marijuana  processing site at all times ] provided by the holder at
any time upon request of the authority .
(6) A marijuana processing site that  is registered under this section is not required to register
with the State Board of Pharmacy under ORS 475.125.
(7) The  individual or individuals responsible for a marijuana processing site shall maintain doc-
umentation of each transfer of usable  marijuana, medical cannabinoid products, cannabinoid con-
centrates and cannabinoid extracts.
(8) The authority may inspect:
(a) The premises of  a proposed marijuana processing site or a registered marijuana processing
site to ensure compliance with this section and ORS 475C.821 and 475C.824 and any rules  adopted
under this section and ORS 475C.821 and 475C.824; and
(b) The records of a registered marijuana processing  site to ensure compliance with subsection
(7) of this section.
(9) Subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 183, the authority may  refuse to register an appli-
cant under this section or  may suspend or revoke the registration of a marijuana processing site if
the authority determines that the applicant, the owner of the marijuana  processing site, a person
responsible for the marijuana processing site,  or an employee of the marijuana processing site, vio-
lated a provision of ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919, a rule adopted  under ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919 or
an ordinance adopted pursuant to ORS 475C.897.
(10) The authority shall adopt rules to implement this section, including rules that:
(a) Require a  registered marijuana processing site to annually renew the registration for that
site;
(b) Establish fees for registering, and renewing the registration of, a marijuana processing site;
(c) Require that medical cannabinoid products, cannabinoid  concentrates and cannabinoid ex-
tracts transferred by a marijuana processing  site be tested to ensure the public health and safety;
and
(d) Impose any other standard on the operation of a marijuana processing site to  ensure the
public health and safety.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 475C.827 is amended to read:
[21]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
475C.827. (1)(a) Except as provided in  paragraph (b) of this subsection, a marijuana processing
site may not transfer medical cannabinoid products, cannabinoid  concentrates or cannabinoid ex-
tracts to a person other than another marijuana processing site or a medical marijuana  dispensary.
(b) A marijuana processing site may transfer a medical cannabinoid product,  cannabinoid con-
centrate or cannabinoid extract to a  registry identification cardholder, or the designated primary
caregiver of a registry identification cardholder, [ provided that the  registry identification cardholder
or designated primary caregiver provides  the marijuana processing site with ] if  the marijuana to be
processed into the medical cannabinoid  product, cannabinoid concentrate or cannabinoid extract
was provided  to the marijuana processing site on behalf of the registry identification
cardholder and the marijuana processing site receives no compensation for the transfer.
(c) A registry identification cardholder, or the designated primary caregiver of a  registry iden-
tification cardholder, may reimburse a marijuana processing  site for all costs associated with the
processing of marijuana for the registry identification cardholder.
(2) A person other than a marijuana processing site may  not transfer medical cannabinoid pro-
ducts, cannabinoid concentrates or cannabinoid extracts to a medical marijuana dispensary.
(3)(a) A marijuana processing site may receive from a person responsible  for a marijuana
grow site  marijuana produced on behalf of a registry identification cardholder. The marijuana
processing site may transfer the marijuana, and a medical cannabinoid product,  cannabinoid
concentrate or cannabinoid extract to the registry identification cardholder, or the desig-
nated primary caregiver of the registry  identification cardholder, on whose behalf the
marijuana was transferred to the marijuana processor.
(b) A person responsible  for a marijuana grow site may transfer to a marijuana processor
marijuana produced at the grow site for a registry identification cardholder at the request
of the registry identification cardholder or the designated primary caregiver of the registry
identification cardholder.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 475C.833 is amended to read:
475C.833. (1)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish by rule  a medical marijuana
dispensary registration system for the purpose of tracking and regulating the transfer of:
(A) Usable marijuana, immature marijuana plants and seeds from registry identification
cardholders, designated primary caregivers and persons responsible  for marijuana grow sites to
medical marijuana dispensaries;
(B) Medical cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates and cannabinoid  extracts from
persons responsible for marijuana processing sites to medical marijuana dispensaries; and
(C) Usable marijuana, immature marijuana plants, seeds, medical cannabinoid  products,
cannabinoid concentrates and cannabinoid extracts from medical marijuana dispensaries to  registry
identification cardholders and designated primary caregivers.
(b) A person may not operate an  establishment for the purpose of providing the services de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection unless the person is registered under this section.
(2) The registration system  established under subsection (1) of this section must require an ap-
plicant for a medical marijuana dispensary to submit an application to the authority that includes:
(a) The name of the individual who owns the medical  marijuana dispensary or, if a business
entity owns the medical marijuana dispensary, the name of each individual who has a financial in-
terest in the medical marijuana dispensary;
(b) The name of the individual or individuals responsible  for the medical marijuana dispensary,
if different from the name of the individual who owns the medical marijuana dispensary;
[22]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) The address of the medical marijuana dispensary;
(d) Proof that each individual responsible for the medical marijuana dispensary is  21 years of
age or older;
(e) Documentation, as required by  the authority by rule, that demonstrates the medical
marijuana dispensary meets the requirements of subsection (3) of this section; and
(f) Any other information that the authority considers necessary.
(3) To qualify for registration under this section, a medical marijuana dispensary:
(a) May not be located in an area that is zoned for residential use;
(b) May not be located at the same address as a marijuana grow site;
(c) Must be registered as a business, or have filed  an application to register as a business, with
the office of the Secretary of State;
(d) Except as provided under ORS 475C.840, may not be located within 1,000 feet of:
(A) A building where a public prekindergarten or kindergarten program  is provided by a school
district or an education service district;
(B) A public elementary or secondary school  for which attendance is compulsory under ORS
339.020; or
(C) A  private or parochial elementary or secondary school, teaching children as described in
ORS 339.030 (1)(a);
(e) Must not be located within 1,000 feet of another medical marijuana dispensary; and
(f) Must meet  the requirements of any rule adopted by the authority under subsection (10) of this
section.
(4)(a) The authority shall  conduct a criminal records check under ORS 181A.195 for each indi-
vidual named in an application submitted under subsection (2) of this section.
(b) An individual convicted for the manufacture or delivery  of a controlled substance in Sched-
ule I or Schedule II may not own or be  responsible for a medical marijuana dispensary for two years
from the date the individual is convicted.
(c) An individual convicted more than once for the manufacture or  delivery of a controlled
substance in Schedule I or Schedule II may not own or  be responsible for a medical marijuana
dispensary.
(5) If a person submits the application required  under subsection (2) of this section, if the med-
ical marijuana dispensary identified in the application meets  the requirements of this section and
any rules adopted under this section and if each individual named in the application passes  the
criminal records check required under subsection (4)  of this section, the authority shall register the
medical marijuana dispensary and issue  electronic proof of registration. Proof of registration must
be [ displayed on the premises of the medical marijuana dispensary  at all times ] provided by the
holder at any time upon request of the authority .
(6) A medical marijuana dispensary that is registered  under this section is not required to reg-
ister with the State Board of Pharmacy under ORS 475.125.
(7) The individual or individuals responsible for a medical marijuana dispensary shall maintain
documentation of each transfer of usable marijuana, medical cannabinoid products,  cannabinoid
concentrates, cannabinoid extracts, immature marijuana plants and seeds.
(8) The authority may inspect:
(a) The premises of a proposed medical marijuana dispensary or a registered  medical marijuana
dispensary to ensure compliance with this section and ORS  475C.843 and any rules adopted under
this section or ORS 475C.843; and
[23]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The records of a registered medical marijuana dispensary to ensure  compliance with sub-
section (7) of this section.
(9) Subject to the provisions of  ORS chapter 183, the authority may refuse to register an appli-
cant under this section or may suspend or  revoke the registration of a medical marijuana dispensary
if the authority determines that the applicant, the owner  of the medical marijuana dispensary, a
person responsible for the  medical marijuana dispensary, or an employee of the medical marijuana
dispensary, violated a provision of ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919, a rule adopted under ORS 475C.770
to 475C.919 or an ordinance adopted pursuant to ORS 475C.897.
(10) The authority shall adopt rules to implement this section, including rules that:
(a) Require a registered medical  marijuana dispensary to annually renew the registration for
that dispensary;
(b) Establish  fees for registering, and renewing the registration of, a medical marijuana
dispensary;
(c) Require that each medical marijuana dispensary install  and maintain a minimum security
system that includes video surveillance, an alarm system and a safe;
(d) Require that usable  marijuana, medical cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates,
cannabinoid extracts and immature marijuana plants transferred by a  medical marijuana dispensary
be tested to ensure the public health and safety; and
(e) Impose any other  standard on the operation of a medical marijuana dispensary to ensure the
public health and safety.
SECTION 26.
 ORS 475C.856 is amended to read:
475C.856. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall develop and maintain  a database of information
related to [ the production of  marijuana by persons designated to produce marijuana by a registry
identification cardholder, ] the processing of marijuana by a marijuana processing site under ORS
475C.815 and the transfer of usable marijuana, medical cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concen-
trates and cannabinoid extracts by medical  marijuana dispensaries under ORS 475C.833. At a mini-
mum, the database must include the information submitted to the  authority under ORS [ 475C.795,]
475C.821 and 475C.843.
(2)(a) Subject to paragraph (c) of this subsection, the authority  may provide information that is
stored in the database developed and maintained under this section to a law enforcement agency.
(b) Subject to paragraph (c) of this subsection, the authority may provide information that  is
stored in the database developed and maintained under this section to the  regulatory agencies of a
city or county.
(c) The authority may not disclose:
(A) Any personally identifiable information related to a registry identification  cardholder or a
designated primary caregiver that is stored in the database developed and maintained under  this
section.
(B) Any information related to the amount and type of usable marijuana, medical  cannabinoid
products, cannabinoid concentrates and cannabinoid extracts transferred to or by [ persons desig-
nated to produce marijuana by a  registry identification cardholder, ] marijuana processing sites or
medical marijuana dispensaries.
(3) Nothing in this section prevents a law enforcement  agency from lawfully obtaining informa-
tion that is stored in the database developed and maintained under this section by subpoena.
SECTION 27.
 ORS 475C.862 is amended to read:
475C.862. (1) Any personally identifiable information, as defined in ORS  432.005, other than a
[24]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
name of an individual or  an address submitted with an application under ORS 475C.815 or 475C.833,
that the Oregon Health Authority collects and maintains for purposes of registering a  marijuana
grow  site  under ORS 475C.792, a marijuana processing site under ORS 475C.815, or a medical
marijuana dispensary under ORS 475C.833, is confidential and not subject to public disclosure under
ORS 192.311 to 192.478, except  that the authority may provide personally identifiable information to
a person registered under ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919 if the registrant requests the information and
the information is related to a designation made under ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919.
(2) Any personally identifiable  information, as defined in ORS 432.005, submitted to the authority
under ORS [ 475C.795,] 475C.821 or 475C.843 or pursuant to ORS 475C.856 is confidential and not
subject to public disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(3) Any record that the authority keeps or maintains for purposes related to the  installation or
maintenance of a security system by a medical marijuana  dispensary pursuant to rules adopted un-
der ORS 475C.833 (10) is  confidential and not subject to public disclosure under ORS 192.311 to
192.478.
SECTION 28.
 ORS 475C.889 is amended to read:
475C.889. (1) Except as provided in  ORS 475C.886, a person has an affirmative defense to a
criminal charge of possession, delivery or manufacture of marijuana, or any  other criminal offense
in which possession, delivery or  manufacture of marijuana is an element, if the person charged with
the offense:
(a) Was diagnosed with a debilitating medical condition  within 12 months of the date on which
the person was arrested and was advised by the person’s attending provider that the  medical use
of marijuana may mitigate the symptoms or effects of that debilitating medical condition;
(b) Is engaged in the medical use of marijuana; and
(c) Possesses, delivers or manufactures marijuana only in quantities permitted under ORS
475C.806.
(2) A person does not need to lawfully possess  a registry identification card to assert the affir-
mative defense established in this section.
(3) A  person engaged in the medical use of marijuana who claims that marijuana provides med-
ically necessary benefits and who is charged with a crime pertaining to the use  of marijuana is not
precluded from presenting a defense of choice of evils, as set forth in ORS 161.200,  or from pre-
senting evidence supporting the necessity of marijuana for  treatment of a specific disease or medical
condition, provided that:
(a) The person possesses, delivers or manufactures marijuana  only as permitted under ORS
475C.806 [(1)]; and
(b) The person has taken a substantial step toward complying with  the provisions of ORS
475C.770 to 475C.919.
(4) A defendant proposing to use the affirmative defense established in this section in a  criminal
action shall, not  less than five days before the trial of the cause, file and serve upon the district
attorney a written notice of the intention to assert  the affirmative defense. The notice must specif-
ically state the reasons why the defendant is entitled  to assert the affirmative defense and the fac-
tual basis for the affirmative defense. If the defendant fails to file and serve the notice, the defendant
is not permitted to assert the affirmative defense at the trial of the cause unless the court orders,
for good cause, otherwise.
SECTION 29.
 ORS 475C.945 is amended to read:
475C.945. If a city or county enacts  or has enacted an ordinance prohibiting or allowing
[25]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
marijuana processing sites  registered under ORS 475C.815 or medical marijuana dispensaries regis-
tered under ORS 475C.833, the governing body  of the city or the county may amend the ordinance,
without referring the amendment to the electors of  the city or county under ORS 475C.950, to pro-
hibit or allow the premises of a licensee,  as those terms are defined in ORS 475C.009, that has been
designated an exclusively medical  licensee under ORS 475C.121, 475C.125, 475C.129 or 475C.133  or
the premises of a person that has been designated as an  exclusively medical producer regis-
trant under ORS 475C.121 .
SECTION 30.
 ORS 475C.950 is amended to read:
475C.950. (1) The governing body of a city or county may adopt ordinances to be referred to the
electors of the city or county as described in subsection (2) of this section  that prohibit or allow the
establishment of any one or more of the following in the area subject to the jurisdiction of  the city
or in the unincorporated area subject to the jurisdiction of the county:
(a) Marijuana processing sites registered under ORS 475C.815;
(b) Medical marijuana dispensaries registered under ORS 475C.833;
(c) Marijuana producers that hold a license issued under ORS 475C.065;
(d) Marijuana processors that hold a license issued under ORS 475C.085;
(e) Marijuana wholesalers that hold a license issued under ORS 475C.093;
(f) Marijuana retailers that hold a license issued under ORS 475C.097;
(g) Marijuana producers  that hold a license issued under ORS 475C.065 and that the Oregon
Liquor and Cannabis Commission has designated as  an exclusively medical licensee under ORS
475C.121 and  persons responsible for a marijuana grow site that the commission has desig-
nated under ORS 475C.121;
(h) Marijuana  processors that hold a license issued under ORS 475C.085 and that the commission
has designated as an exclusively medical licensee under ORS 475C.125;
(i) Marijuana wholesalers that hold a license issued under ORS 475C.093 and that the  commis-
sion has designated as an exclusively medical licensee under ORS 475C.129;
(j) Marijuana retailers that hold a license issued under ORS 475C.097 and  that the commission
has designated as an exclusively medical licensee under ORS 475C.133; or
(k) Any combination of the entities described in this subsection.
(2) If the governing body  of a city or county adopts an ordinance under this section, the gov-
erning body shall submit the measure of the ordinance  to the electors of the city or county for ap-
proval at the next statewide general election.
(3) If the governing body  of a city or county adopts an ordinance under this section, the gov-
erning body must provide the text of the ordinance:
(a) To the Oregon Health Authority, in a form and manner  prescribed by the authority, if the
ordinance  concerns  a medical marijuana dispensary registered under ORS 475C.833 or a marijuana
processing site registered under ORS 475C.815; or
(b) To the commission,  if the ordinance concerns a premises for which a license has been issued
under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525.
(4)(a) Upon receiving notice  of a prohibition under subsection (3) of this section, the authority
shall discontinue registering those  entities to which the prohibition applies until the date of the next
statewide general election.
(b) Upon receiving notice of a prohibition  under subsection (3) of this section, the commission
shall discontinue licensing those premises to which the prohibition applies until the date of the  next
statewide general election.
[26]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5)(a) If an allowance is approved at the next statewide  general election under subsection (2)
of this section, and the allowance concerns an entity described in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of  this
section, the authority shall begin registering the entity to which  the allowance applies on the first
business day of the January immediately following the date of the statewide general election.
(b) If an allowance is approved at the next statewide general election under  subsection (2) of
this section, and the allowance concerns an entity  described in subsection (1)(c) to (j) of this section,
the commission shall begin licensing the premises to which the allowance  applies on the first busi-
ness day of the January immediately following the date of the next statewide general election.
(6) If the electors of a city or county approve an  ordinance prohibiting or allowing an entity
described in subsection  (1)(a), (b) or (g) to (j) of this section, the governing body of the city or county
may amend  the ordinance, without referring the amendment to the electors of the city or county,
to prohibit or allow any other entity described in subsection (1)(a), (b) or (g) to (j) of this section.
(7) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a city or county that adopts an ordinance under
this section that prohibits the establishment of an entity described in subsection  (1) of this section
may not impose a tax or fee on the production, processing or sale of  marijuana or any product into
which marijuana has been incorporated.
(8) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this  section, a medical marijuana dispensary is not subject
to an ordinance adopted under this section if the medical marijuana dispensary:
(a) Is registered under ORS 475C.833 on or before the  date on which the governing body adopts
the ordinance; and
(b) Has successfully completed a city or county land use application process.
(9) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of  this section, a marijuana processing site is not subject to
an ordinance adopted under this section if the marijuana processing site:
(a) Is registered under ORS 475C.815 on or before the  date on which the governing body adopts
the ordinance; and
(b) Has successfully completed a city or county land use application process.
SECTION 31.
If the grow  site of a person responsible for a marijuana grow site registered
under ORS 475C.792 that is designated under ORS 475C.121 by the Oregon Liquor  and
Cannabis Commission as an exclusively medical producer registrant is located within the
boundaries of a city  or county that prohibits the establishment of marijuana producers that
hold a license issued  under ORS 475C.065 and that the commission has designated as an ex-
clusively medical licensee  under ORS 475C.121, the person may continue to produce
marijuana at the grow site unless the Oregon Health  Authority revokes the person’s regis-
tration under ORS 475C.792 or the commission revokes the person’s designation under ORS
475C.121.
SECTION 32.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Health care facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 442.015.
(b) “Health professional regulatory board” has  the meaning given that term in ORS
676.160.
(c) “Medical resources” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Medical devices or equipment.
(B) Prescription drugs.
(C) Laboratory testing.
(d) “Provider” means:
(A) An individual licensed or certified by a health professional regulatory board.
[27]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) A health care facility.
(e) “Registry identification cardholder”  has the meaning given that term in ORS 475C.777.
(2) It is unlawful for a provider or any person acting on behalf of a provider to discrimi-
nate against a patient by doing any  of the following based on the fact that a patient is a
registry identification cardholder who uses medical marijuana  to mitigate the symptoms or
effects of the patient’s debilitating medical condition:
(a) Deny medical treatment to the patient that is likely to  benefit the patient based on
an individualized assessment of the patient using objective medical evidence; or
(b) Limit or restrict in any manner the allocation of medical resources to the patient.
SECTION 33.
Sections 34 and 35 of this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 659A.
SECTION 34. (1) As used in this section and section 35 of this 2025 Act:
(a) “Cannabinoid” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475C.009.
(b) “Employment decision” means any decision relating to the hiring, promoting,  termi-
nating or disciplining of an employee or prospective employee.
(c) “Marijuana” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475C.777.
(d) “Registry identification  cardholder” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475C.777.
(2) It is  an unlawful practice for an employer or prospective employer to make an em-
ployment decision solely on the basis that the employee or prospective employee:
(a) Is  a registry identification cardholder who uses medical marijuana to mitigate the
symptoms or effects of a debilitating medical condition.
(b) Has tested positive for cannabinoid  metabolites following any employment-related
drug test required by the employer if the positive test result is  in connection with the
employee’s or prospective employee’s use of marijuana as  a registry identification
cardholder.
(3) Nothing in this section:
(a) Prevents an employer from:
(A) Making an employment decision  based upon the employer’s reasonable suspicion that
an employee is impaired at work due to recent marijuana use. An  employer may not rely
solely on a positive test result that confirms the  presence of cannabinoid metabolites to es-
tablish the employer’s reasonable suspicion of workplace impairment.
(B) Prohibiting employees from using marijuana on workplace premises during or after
working hours.
(b) Applies to  an employer that is a federal contractor or that receives federal grants
that are subject to the federal Drug-Free Workplace Act of 1988 (41 U.S.C. 8101 et seq.).
SECTION 35.
It is an unlawful practice for any employer to require, as  a condition of
employment, that any employee or  prospective employee who is a registry identification
cardholder to refrain from using marijuana during nonworking hours to mitigate the symp-
toms or effects of a debilitating medical condition except when the restriction relates  to the
performance of work while impaired.
SECTION 36. ORS 475C.795, 475C.797, 475C.803  and 475C.871 and section 8, chapter 103,
Oregon Laws 2018, are repealed.
SECTION 37. (1) Sections  2, 31, 32, 34 and 35 of this 2025 Act, the amendments to ORS
475C.009, 475C.013, 475C.017, 475C.037, 475C.073, 475C.121, 475C.149, 475C.177, 475C.441, 475C.457,
475C.497, 475C.773, 475C.783, 475C.786, 475C.792, 475C.800, 475C.806, 475C.809, 475C.812, 475C.815,
[28]
SB 176
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
475C.827, 475C.833, 475C.856, 475C.862, 475C.889, 475C.945 and 475C.950 by sections  3 to 11 and
13 to 30 of this 2025 Act and the repeal of  ORS 475C.795, 475C.797, 475C.803 and 475C.871 and
section 8, chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2018, by section 36 of this 2025  Act become operative on
January 1, 2026.
(2) The  Oregon Health Authority and the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission may
take any action before the operative date specified in subsection  (1) of this section that is
necessary to enable the authority and the commission to exercise, on  and after the operative
date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers con-
ferred on the authority and the commission by sections 2, 31, 32,  34 and 35 of this 2025 Act,
the amendments to  ORS 475C.009, 475C.013, 475C.017, 475C.037, 475C.073, 475C.121, 475C.149,
475C.177, 475C.441, 475C.457, 475C.497, 475C.773, 475C.783, 475C.786, 475C.792, 475C.800, 475C.806,
475C.809, 475C.812, 475C.815, 475C.827, 475C.833, 475C.856, 475C.862,  475C.889, 475C.945 and
475C.950 by sections  3 to 11 and 13 to 30 of this 2025 Act and the repeal of ORS 475C.795,
475C.797, 475C.803 and 475C.871 and section 8, chapter 103, Oregon Laws 2018, by section 36
of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 38.
(1) On and after the effective date of this 2025 Act, the Oregon Health Au-
thority may not issue or renew a registration for a marijuana grow site at  which marijuana
is produced for more than two registry identification cardholders. A  person responsible for
a marijuana grow site at which marijuana is produced  for three or more registry identifica-
tion cardholders that is first registered under ORS 475C.792 prior to  the effective date of this
2025 Act and that holds a registration that must be renewed after the effective  date of this
2025 Act and on or  before the operative date specified in section 37 of this 2025 Act may
continue to produce marijuana at the marijuana grow site until  the operative date specified
in section 37 of this 2025 Act.
(2) On and after the operative date specified in section  37 of this 2025 Act, a marijuana
grow site that produces marijuana for three or more  registry identification cardholders may
produce marijuana only if the person responsible for the marijuana grow site  is designated
under ORS 475C.121.
SECTION 39. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[29]