Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Affordable  rental rate” means a rental rate for privately owned multifamily rental
housing units that does not exceed 30 percent of the median family income for a family of
four residing within the county in which the housing units are located.
(b) “Housing authority” means a housing authority created under ORS 456.075. “Housing
authority” includes a person exercising delegated powers and duties under ORS 456.135,  a
local government electing under ORS 456.095 to  have the powers of a housing authority and
a body to which powers and authority are transferred under ORS 456.233.
(2) The Housing and Community Services Department shall develop  and implement the
Retaining Affordable Rental Housing Program for the purpose of providing financial assist-
ance to owners of multifamily rental housing to rehabilitate and maintain the housing at an
affordable rental rate.  The department shall enter into agreements with housing authorities
to administer and monitor the program in the counties  in which a particular housing au-
thority has been created or, if there is no such housing  authority, the department shall ad-
minister the program in the county for which no housing authority exists.
(3) The department shall  make grants to landowners of eligible multifamily rental hous-
ing, not to exceed $10,000,  which may be used by the landowner to make capital improve-
ments, habitability improvements or environmental and energy  efficiency improvements, as
defined by rules adopted by the department. The rules adopted by the  department must
provide that the improvements for which the grant funds will be used  must have a useful life
of at least 10 years.
(4) To be eligible for a grant under this section, a landowner must demonstrate  that the
landowner’s multifamily rental housing:
(a) Contains 10 or more units;
(b) Has been available for  rental for a minimum of 10 consecutive years prior to the date
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2002
HB 2210
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of the application for financial assistance; and
(c) Was rented at an affordable rental rate for at least five of the  10 prior consecutive
years.
(5) The department shall, in  collaboration with housing authorities, develop a process for
landowners to submit applications to the  housing authority operating in the area where the
multifamily rental housing is  located or, if no such housing authority exists, to the depart-
ment. For applications made within an area of operation of  a housing authority, the housing
authority shall review the applications and make recommendations to the  department to
approve or deny the application.  For applications made to the department, the department
shall review the application and approve or deny the application.
(6)(a) Upon approval of an  application for grant funds that was made to a housing au-
thority, the department shall distribute funds from the Retaining Affordable Rental  Housing
Program Fund established under section 2 of this 2017 Act  to the housing authority for dis-
tribution to the landowner. If  the application for grant funds was made directly to and ap-
proved by the department, the department shall distribute funds to the landowner.
(b) Prior to distribution of funds, the housing authority or the department shall enter
into a contract with the landowner that sets forth, at a minimum:
(A) The purposes for which the grant funds may be used;
(B) That the landowner will execute written instruments to be recorded  in the records
of the county where the multifamily rental housing is located that contain  terms, including
but not limited  to restrictive covenants, providing that the multifamily rental housing shall
be rented at an affordable  rental rate for a minimum of 10 years after receipt of the grant
funds; and
(C) That the landowner must pay to  the department or housing authority, as appropriate,
the amount of any grant funds received  under this section that are used in violation of any
of the terms of the contract.
(7) The department may not award grants under this  section that exceed the amount of
funds available in the Retaining Affordable Rental  Housing Program Fund established under
section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(8) In administering the program under this section, housing authorities shall monitor
compliance with grant and contract requirements and report to the department  at such time
intervals as the department establishes by rule. Notwithstanding the report required by  this
subsection, a housing authority must report to the department regarding any noncompliance
with grant or contract requirements engaged in by a landlord immediately upon discovery
of the noncompliance.
(9) The department, in consultation with housing  authorities, shall adopt rules to carry
out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Retaining Affordable Rental  Housing Program Fund is created within
the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the
Retaining Affordable Rental Housing Program Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Retaining Affordable Rental Housing Program Fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts appropriated  or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative As-
sembly;
(b) Amounts received from state, federal and private sources;
(c) Amounts donated to the fund; and
[2]
HB 2210
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
(d) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the Housing and Community
Services Department for the  purposes of providing grants for multifamily rental housing
assistance under section 1 of this 2017 Act.
(4) The department may use moneys in the fund to pay  the administrative costs, associ-
ated with the fund  and with carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2017 Act, incurred
by the department and housing authorities.
[3]