Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 656.526 is amended to read:
656.526. (1) Periodically, the  State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation shall determine the
total liability existing against the Industrial Accident Fund.
(2) If, after the determination required by subsection (1) of this section, the  State Accident In-
surance Fund Corporation finds the Industrial Accident Fund, aside from the  reserves deemed
actuarially necessary according to recognized insurance principles, contains a  surplus, the State
Accident Insurance Fund Corporation in its discretion may,  after providing for any payments to the
state, taxes , payments under  subsection (3) of this section  or other dispositions of surplus pro-
vided by law, declare a dividend to be paid to,  or credited to the accounts of, employers who were
insured by the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation during all  or part of the period for which
the dividend is declared. Any dividend so declared shall give  due consideration to the solvency of
the Industrial Accident Fund, not be unfairly discriminatory and not be promised  in advance of such
declaration.
(3) When the State Accident  Insurance Fund Corporation determines that a dividend will
be distributed under subsection (2) of this section, the  State Accident Insurance Fund Cor-
poration shall pay 10 percent of the total amount  available to be paid as dividends to the
State Treasurer for deposit in  the Oregon Catastrophic Responders Fund established under
section 2 of this 2025 Act.
[(3)] (4)  An  employer in default when the dividend is declared shall not be eligible to receive
payment or the credit provided by subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Catastrophic Responders Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct  from the General Fund. The Oregon Catastrophic Responders
Fund consists of moneys deposited in the fund under  ORS 656.526 and moneys appropriated,
allocated, deposited or transferred  to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise.
Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Department  of Emergency
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3840
HB 3331
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
Management for the purposes specified in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) In consultation with the advisory board established under section 3 of this  2025 Act,
the department shall expend moneys in the fund  to increase the state’s readiness to manage
a declaration of catastrophic disaster under Article X-A of the Oregon Constitution.
(3) The department may adopt rules necessary for the administration of this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Catastrophic Disaster Advisory Board is created. The board shall:
(a) Advise the  Oregon Department of Emergency Management on expenditures from the
Oregon Catastrophic Responders Fund established under section 2 of this 2025 Act; and
(b) Study  and make recommendations to the Legislative Assembly regarding
sustainability and emergency management policy improvements.
(2) The board consists of up to 15 members appointed by the Governor, subject  to con-
firmation by the Senate pursuant to Article III, section 4, of the Oregon Constitution.
(3) A majority of the members of the  board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business.
(4) Official action by the board requires the approval of a majority of the members of  the
board.
(5) The board shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(6) The board shall meet at times and places  specified by the call of the chairperson or
of a majority of the members of the board.
(7) The board may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the board.
(8) The office of the Governor shall provide staff support to the board.
(9) Members of the board are not  entitled to compensation or reimbursement for ex-
penses and serve as volunteers on the board.
(10) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the board in the performance  of the duties of the board and, to the extent permitted by laws
relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of  the board con-
sider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 4.
The Catastrophic Disaster Advisory Board shall make  its first recommen-
dations to the Legislative Assembly under section 3 (1)(b) of this 2025  Act on or before Feb-
ruary 1, 2027.
[2]