Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon  Military Families Education and Workforce Preparedness
Scholarship Advisory Committee is established in the Oregon Military Department  to review
and approve applications for scholarships awarded under section 2 of this 2018  Act. The
committee consists of at least seven members appointed by the Governor as follows:
(a) At least three members appointed in consultation with the Oregon Military Depart-
ment.
(b) At least two  members appointed in consultation with the Department of Veterans’
Affairs.
(c) At least one representative  of an organization providing support services to
servicemembers and families of servicemembers in this state.
(d) At least one public member who is not an employee  of a public body, as defined in
ORS 174.109.
(2) Members of the committee shall be appointed to serve for terms of  four years, but a
member serves at the pleasure of the Governor. The Governor  shall appoint a person to fill
any vacancy on the committee for the expired term.
(3) The members of the  committee shall appoint a chairperson from among the members
of the committee.
(4) A majority of the members of the committee constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(5) The committee  shall meet at the call of the chairperson or upon the request of a
majority of the members of the committee. The committee  may meet by phone or video
conference with at least 24 hours’ public notice.
(6) The Oregon Military Department  shall provide administrative support to the com-
mittee.
(7) Members of the committee  are not entitled to compensation or reimbursement for
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 117
HB 4040
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
expenses and serve as volunteers on the committee.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Armed Forces of the United States” means:
(A) The Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps and Coast Guard of the United States;
(B) The reserves of  the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps and Coast Guard of the
United States; and
(C) The Oregon National Guard and a National Guard of any other state or territory.
(b) “Post-secondary institution of education” means:
(A) A community college operated under ORS chapter 341;
(B) A public university listed in ORS 352.002 or the Oregon Health and Science University;
or
(C) A generally accredited, private institution of higher education located in Oregon.
(c)(A) “Veteran” means a person who:
(i) Served on active duty with the Armed Forces of the United States:
(I) For a period of more than 90 consecutive days beginning on or before January 31, 1955,
and was discharged or released under honorable conditions;
(II) For a period of  more than 178 consecutive days beginning after January 31, 1955, and
was discharged or released from active duty under honorable conditions;
(III) For 178 days or less and was discharged or released from  active duty under honor-
able conditions because of a service-connected disability;
(IV) For 178 days or less and was discharged or released from active duty under  honor-
able conditions and has a disability rating from the United States  Department of Veterans
Affairs; or
(V) For at least one day in a combat zone  and was discharged or released from active
duty under honorable conditions;
(ii) Received a combat  or campaign ribbon or an expeditionary medal for service in the
Armed Forces of the United States and was discharged or released from  active duty under
honorable conditions;
(iii) Is receiving a nonservice-connected pension from the United  States Department of
Veterans Affairs; or
(iv) Is a member of the Oregon National Guard, available for deployment and  in good
standing, as determined by the Oregon Military Department by rule.
(B) As used in this paragraph, “active duty” does not include attendance at a school un-
der military orders, except  schooling incident to an active enlistment or a regular tour of
duty, or normal military training  as a reserve officer or member of an organized reserve or
a National Guard unit.
(2) The department shall establish a program to award scholarships to veterans who  are
residents of this state and who are pursuing and enrolled in an approved course  of study,
approved professional training,  approved workforce development program or approved ap-
prenticeship in, or in connection with, a post-secondary institution of education.
(3) The department  shall establish a process allowing veterans to apply for scholarships
from the program.
(4) The department may award scholarships from the program to applicants  approved by
the Oregon Military Families Education  and Workforce Preparedness Scholarship Advisory
Committee established in section 1 of this 2018 Act to the extent  of the funds available in the
[2]
HB 4040
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
Oregon Military Education and Workforce Preparedness Scholarship  Program Fund estab-
lished in section 3 of this 2018 Act.
(5) A scholarship awarded to a veteran under  this section may not exceed $2,500 per ac-
ademic year.
(6) The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the
General Fund,  the Oregon Military Education and Workforce Preparedness Scholarship Pro-
gram Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon Military Education  and Workforce Preparedness
Scholarship Program Fund shall be credited to the fund. The fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts transferred to the fund under section 4 of this 2018 Act.
(b) Gifts, grants and donations, in money or otherwise, for use as  described in subsection
(2) of this section.
(2)(a) Moneys in the fund are continuously  appropriated to the Oregon Military Depart-
ment for the purposes of implementing the provisions of section 2 of this 2018 Act.
(b) The department  may use up to five percent of the moneys in the fund to pay the ad-
ministrative expenses of implementing the provisions of section 2 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 4.
There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, from the
Veterans’ Services Fund established  in ORS 406.140, to the Oregon Military Department, for
deposit in the Oregon Military Education and Workforce  Preparedness Scholarship Program
Fund established in section 3 of this 2018 Act, the lesser of:
(1) $250,000; or
(2) The moneys in the Veterans’ Services Fund that have not been allocated for  other
specific purposes.
SECTION 5.
Notwithstanding the term of  office specified by section 1 of this 2018 Act,
of the members first appointed to  the Oregon Military Families Education and Workforce
Preparedness Scholarship Advisory Committee:
(1) At least two members shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2021.
(2) At least two members shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2022.
(3) At least three members shall serve for a term ending January 1, 2023.
[3]