Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Health Authority shall study  potential changes to the prioritized
list of health services compiled by the Health Evidence Review  Commission under ORS
414.690. The authority shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may
include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the  Legislative As-
sembly related to health no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 423