Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Occupational Safety and Health Division of the Department  of Con-
sumer and Business Services shall study the potential safety benefits of screening replace-
ment workers during a strike, lockout or other  labor dispute with an employer that employs
more than 100 employees in an industry involving hazardous materials.
(2) For the purpose of subsection (1) of this section, “hazardous materials” means:
(a) Hazardous waste as defined in ORS 466.005;
(b) Hazardous substances as defined in ORS 453.005;
(c) Radioactive waste as defined in ORS 469.300;
(d) Uranium mine overburden or uranium mill tailings, mill wastes  or mill by-product
materials;
(e) Radioactive substances as defined in ORS 453.005;
(f) Any substance  designated by the United States Department of Transportation as
hazardous pursuant to  the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, 49 U.S.C. 5101 et seq.,
P.L. 93-633, as amended; and
(g) Any  substance that the United States Environmental Protection Agency designates
as hazardous pursuant to:
(A) The federal Toxic Substances Control Act, 15 U.S.C.  2601 to 2692, P.L. 94-469, as
amended; or
(B) The federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, 42 U.S.C. 6901 to  6992, P.L.
94-580, as amended.
(3) The division shall submit  a report regarding its findings under subsection (1) of this
section in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2026.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1770