Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 315.616, as amended by section  47a, chapter 73, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
315.616. [ A resident or nonresident individual who is certified as eligible  under ORS 442.561,
442.562, 442.563 or 442.564, and is licensed as a physician under ORS chapter 677, licensed as a  phy-
sician associate under  ORS 677.505 to 677.525, licensed as a nurse practitioner under ORS 678.375 to
678.390, licensed as a certified registered nurse anesthetist as defined in ORS 678.010, licensed  as a
dentist under ORS chapter 679 or licensed as an optometrist under ORS 683.010 to 683.340 is entitled
to the tax credit described in ORS 315.613  even if not a member of the hospital medical staff if the
Office of Rural Health certifies that the individual: ]
[(1) Is engaged for at least 20 hours per week, averaged over the  month, during the tax year in a
rural practice; and ]
[(2)(a) If a physician or a physician associate, can cause a patient to be admitted to the hospital; ]
[(b) If a certified registered nurse anesthetist, is employed  by or has a contractual relationship with
one of the hospitals described in ORS 315.613 (1); or ]
[(c) If an optometrist, has consulting privileges with a  hospital listed in ORS 315.613 (1). This
paragraph does not apply to an optometrist who qualifies as a “frontier rural  practitioner,” as defined
by the Office of Rural Health. ]
A resident or nonresident individual who is certified as eligible  under ORS 442.561,
442.562, 442.563 or 442.564 is entitled to the tax credit described in ORS 315.613,  regardless
of whether the individual is a member of the hospital medical staff, if:
(1) The individual is:
(a) A physician licensed under ORS chapter 677;
(b) A physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1106
HB 2204
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
(c) A nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390;
(d) A certified registered nurse anesthetist licensed under ORS 678.279;
(e) A dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679;
(f) An optometrist licensed under ORS 683.010 to 683.340; or
(g) A podiatric physician and surgeon licensed under ORS 677.805 to 677.840; and
(2) The Office of Rural Health  certifies that the individual is engaged for at least 20 hours
per week, averaged over the month, during the tax year in a rural practice and:
(a) If a physician or physician associate, can cause a patient to be admitted to the  hos-
pital; or
(b) If a certified registered  nurse anesthetist, is employed by or has a contractual re-
lationship with one of the hospitals described in ORS 315.613 (3).
SECTION 2.
 ORS 315.619 is amended to read:
315.619. A member of the medical staff of a  type C hospital who meets the requirements of ORS
315.616 [(1) and] (2)(a) is entitled to the tax credit described in ORS 315.613 if:
(1) The hospital  is isolated due to geographic conditions, complies with rules relating to emer-
gency response and  is subject to such other special factors as the Office of Rural Health may pre-
scribe;  and
(2) The hospital is designated by the Office of  Rural Health as being subject to particular
problems in recruiting and retaining medical staff and is located in  an area that is medically
underserved.
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 315.616 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply  to tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]