Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Board of Parole and  Post-Prison Supervision shall study issues
related to conducting hearings during which the board is to  consider setting or resetting a
release date for a  person. The board shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may  include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3084