Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Higher Education Coordinating  Commission shall conduct a study to
determine how to best decrease the levels of student debt held by students  who attend public
post-secondary institutions of  education. The commission shall submit a report in the man-
ner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related  to higher education no later than September
15, 2024.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2006