Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Higher Education Coordinating  Commission shall conduct a study to
determine how best to fund public pre-kindergarten  through post-secondary education in this
state. The commission shall submit  a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim  committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to education no later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1998