Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on the Recruitment and Retention of Case Managers  and
Adult Protective Services Workers is established.
(2) The task force consists of nine members appointed by the Governor as follows:
(a) Two members representing area agencies, as defined in ORS 410.040;
(b) One member representing the Department of Human Services;
(c) One member representing the Oregon Health Authority;
(d) One member representing a labor organization that represents case  managers and
adult protective services workers;
(e) One member who is employed as a  case manager or adult protective services worker;
(f) One member who supervises case managers or adult protective services workers;
(g) One member who is a provider of Medicaid-funded long term care services; and
(h) One member who is a consumer of Medicaid-funded long term care services.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Identify barriers to the recruitment and retention  of case managers and adult pro-
tective services workers who serve consumers of Medicaid-funded long term care services;
(b) Identify recruitment and retention best practices from other states; and
(c) Provide solutions to improve current recruitment and retention rates.
(4) In carrying out the duties under subsection (3)  of this section, the task force shall
examine the following:
(a) Applicable state and federal laws, rules and regulations;
(b) Potential pathways to enter the profession;
(c) Potential retention programs;
(d) Strategies for reducing unnecessary administrative burdens;
(e) Reimbursement rates and wages;
(f) Strategies for improving supervision and training;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 786
HB 2061
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
(g) Caseload guidelines and ratios based on national and local staffing studies;
(h) The impact of the Oregon Eligibility (ONE) system on recruitment and retention;
(i) Strategies for increasing the diversity of the workforce and the impact of having a
diverse workforce on recruitment and retention;
(j) Burnout rates;
(k) The numbers and types of workers needed to meet the demand for services  and
comply with state and federal law; and
(L) Alternative options for providing services.
(5) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(6) Official action  by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the members
of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make  an appointment to be-
come immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) No later than December 15, 2026, the task force  shall submit a report in the manner
provided in ORS 192.245 to the interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to
health and shall make recommendations about:
(a) Consumer access to care;
(b) Consumer safety;
(c) Federal regulatory requirements;
(d) Administrative burdens on staff, managers, supervisors and agencies; and
(e) Needed resources.
(12) The Department of Human Services shall provide  staff support to the task force. The
department may contract  with a third party to provide staff support services under this
subsection.
(13) Members of the task  force are not entitled to compensation or reimbursement for
expenses and serve as volunteers on the task force.
(14) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Human Services, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, out of
the General Fund, the  amount of $_______, which may be expended for the purposes of sec-
tion 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]