Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 4 of this 2025  Act are added to and made a part of ORS 243.860
to 243.886.
SECTION 2. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a substitute
teacher employed by a common school district, union high  school district or education ser-
vice district is eligible to enroll in a health benefit plan offered  by the Oregon Educators
Benefit Board if the substitute teacher worked at  least half-time at either a single common
school district, union high school district or  education service district, or in aggregate at
multiple common school districts, union high school districts and education service  districts
during the previous school year.
(b) The total cost of providing any health benefit plan offered by  a district to a substitute
teacher under this  section may not increase annually by more than the annual increase in
premium amounts  paid for contracted health benefit plans that is permitted under ORS
243.866 (9)(b).
(2)(a) In order to enroll  in a health benefit plan under this section, a substitute teacher
must select a home district for the  duration of the benefit year under a process established
by each district. A home district selected under this subsection:
(A) Must be one at which the substitute teacher worked as a substitute teacher at:
(i) The time of the application; or
(ii) Any time during the  previous benefit year, if the substitute teacher is not currently
working at a district but otherwise is eligible under this section; and
(B) Is responsible for:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2283
SB 318
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) Determining whether the substitute teacher is eligible to enroll  in a health benefit
plan under this section;
(ii) Determining, on an annual basis, whether a substitute teacher who was found to  be
eligible to enroll in a health benefit plan under sub-subparagraph  (i) of this subparagraph
continues to be eligible to enroll in a health benefit plan under this section;
(iii) Collecting the premiums for health benefit plans that  must be paid by the substitute
teacher under subsection (3) of this section;
(iv) Paying the full cost of the insurance  premiums for providing health benefit plans to
the substitute teacher, subject to reimbursement  as described in subsection (4) of this sec-
tion; and
(v) Administering and providing health benefit plans to  the substitute teacher in the
manner described in this section.
(b) In order to enroll in a  health benefit plan under this section, a substitute teacher
must provide the home district with all information necessary for the district to  determine
the eligibility of the substitute teacher to enroll in the health  benefit plan under this section.
(c) No later than 30  days before the deadline to submit an application to enroll in a health
benefit plan under this section, each district must notify all substitute teachers  who have
worked for the district during the  current academic year and the previous academic year of:
(A) The eligibility requirements to enroll in a health benefit plan under this section;
(B) The health care benefits and associated costs available  to eligible substitute teachers;
and
(C) Instructions on how substitute teachers may apply to enroll in  a health benefit plan
under this section.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a substitute teacher shall
pay 10 percent of all insurance premiums for health benefit plans.
(b) A district may provide by collective bargaining to pay for some  or all of the insurance
premiums that must otherwise be paid by a substitute teacher under paragraph (a) of this
subsection. The district may not be reimbursed under  subsection (4) of this section for the
costs the district incurs to provide health benefit plans under this paragraph.
(4)(a) Every three months a  district may request reimbursement from the board for the
cost of paying insurance premiums for providing health benefit plans to each substitute
teacher who has selected the district as the substitute teacher’s home district  under sub-
section (2) of this section.
(b) The board shall use moneys from the Substitute Teacher Insurance Fund established
under section 4 of this 2025 Act to  fully reimburse each district for all documented costs
requested by the  district under this subsection, except for any costs described in subsection
(3) of this section.
(5) Unless otherwise provided for by  collective bargaining, a substitute teacher who is
eligible to enroll in a health benefit plan under subsection  (1) of this section may receive
health care benefits only in the manner provided by this section.
(6) The  board may adopt rules necessary to implement this section, including but not
limited to rules for:
(a) Determining a substitute teacher’s eligibility to enroll in a health  benefit plan under
this section;
(b) The aggregation of hours worked at multiple districts; and
[2]
SB 318
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
(c) The payment of premiums when a substitute teacher works at multiple districts.
SECTION 3.
A common school district, union high school district or education  service
district that, on the effective date of this  2025 Act, provided health care benefits to substi-
tute teachers who are not eligible for health care benefits under section 2 of this 2025 Act:
(1) May not increase the  eligibility requirements that must be met by a substitute
teacher who is not eligible for health care benefits  under section 2 of this 2025 Act in order
for the substitute teacher to qualify for health care benefits from the district; and
(2) Must continue to provide comparable health care benefits to substitute teachers  who
are not eligible for health care benefits under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. The Substitute Teacher Insurance Fund  is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General  Fund. Interest earned by the Substitute Teacher In-
surance Fund must be credited to the fund.  The fund consists of moneys appropriated, allo-
cated, deposited or  transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise and
interest earned on moneys  in the fund. The moneys in the fund are continuously appropri-
ated to the Oregon Educators Benefit Board for the purpose of  reimbursing districts for the
cost of paying premiums for health benefit  plans for substitute teachers under section 2 of
this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to  the Oregon Educators Benefit Board, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of
the General Fund, the amount  of $_______, for deposit in the Substitute Teacher Insurance
Fund established under section 4  of this 2025 Act, for the purposes specified in section 4 of
this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6. (1) Except as provided  in subsection (2) of this section, section 2 of this 2025
Act applies to health benefit plans offered  to substitute teachers on or after October 1, 2025.
(2) To the extent that a  conflict exists, the terms of collective bargaining agreements and
other contracts entered into before the effective date of this 2025 Act shall  prevail over
section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]