Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 295
HB 4155
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 1.
Legislative intent.  It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly to establish:
(1) The Oregon Cybersecurity  Center of Excellence, and to establish the Oregon
Cybersecurity Center of Excellence Operating Fund for the purpose  of funding the center’s
cybersecurity programs,  services and activities and ongoing operations through the appro-
priation of moneys to the operating fund each biennium  for distribution to the center and
to the following entities:
(a) The National Center of Academic Excellence in Cyber Research at  the Mark O.
Hatfield Center for Cybersecurity of Portland State University.
(b) The Oregon Research and Teaching Security Operations Center  at the School of
Electrical Engineering and Computer Science of Oregon State University.
(c) The School of Law and the Charles H. Lundquist College of Business  of the University
of Oregon.
(d) Other public universities,  community colleges and public bodies in Oregon that sup-
port or participate in the center’s programs, services and activities.
(2) The Oregon Cybersecurity Workforce Development Fund, and to  appropriate moneys
to the fund each biennium for  distribution to the Oregon Cybersecurity Center of Excellence
for the purpose of targeted investments in workforce development programs designed to  ac-
celerate the growth, qualifications and availability of Oregon’s cybersecurity workforce.
(3) The Oregon Cybersecurity Grant  Program Fund, and to appropriate moneys to the
fund each biennium for distribution to the Oregon Cybersecurity Center of Excellence for the
purposes of cybersecurity assessment, monitoring,  incident response and technical assist-
ance and other cybersecurity-related goods and services to Oregon public  bodies on a com-
petitive basis with specific emphasis on serving the unmet needs  of local governments,
regional governments, special districts, education service districts, school districts and li-
braries.
(4) The Oregon Cybersecurity Public Awareness Fund, and to  appropriate moneys to the
fund each biennium for distribution to the Oregon Cybersecurity Center of Excellence for the
purposes of raising awareness  about the importance of cybersecurity across Oregon and en-
suring that Oregonians better understand existing threats and have the information  and re-
sources to be safer and more secure online.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 276A.326 is amended to read:
276A.326. (1) The Oregon Cybersecurity Advisory Council  is established within the [ office of
Enterprise Information Services ] Oregon Cybersecurity Center of Excellence and shall be the
governing body of the center . The council consists of [ nine] 15 voting members appointed by the
[State Chief Information  Officer ] Governor  in consultation with the [ Governor ] State Chief Infor-
mation Officer . A majority of the  council’s voting members must be [ representatives of cyber-related
industries in Oregon. The voting members of the council must include at least one  representative of
post-secondary institutions of education and one representative of public law enforcement  agencies in
Oregon] geographically diverse representatives of public universities listed in  ORS 352.002,
local governments, regional governments,  special districts, education service districts, school
districts and libraries.
[(2) The State Chief Information Officer may appoint nonvoting members to the council from: ]
[(a) The Department of Justice; ]
[(b) The office of the Secretary of State; ]
[(c) The Oregon Department of Emergency Management; ]
[2]
HB 4155
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(d) The Department of Consumer and Business Services; ]
[(e) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission; ]
[(f) The State Workforce and Talent Development Board; ]
[(g) The Employment Department; ]
[(h) The Oregon Business Development Department; or ]
[(i) Any local, county, state, regional, tribal or federal government partner. ]
[(3) The State Chief Information Officer shall provide administrative and staff support and facili-
ties as necessary for the council to carry out the purposes set forth in this section. ]
[(4) The purposes of the council are to: ]
[(a) Serve as the statewide advisory body to the State Chief Information Officer on cybersecurity. ]
[(b) Provide a statewide forum for discussing and resolving cybersecurity issues. ]
[(c) Provide  information and recommend best practices concerning cybersecurity and resilience
measures to public and private entities. ]
[(d) Coordinate cybersecurity information sharing and  promote shared and real-time situational
awareness between the public and private sectors in this state. ]
[(e) Encourage the development of the  cybersecurity workforce through measures including, but not
limited to, competitions aimed at building workforce skills, disseminating best  practices, facilitating
cybersecurity research and encouraging  industry investment and partnership with post-secondary in-
stitutions of education and other career readiness programs. ]
[(5) The council may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the council. ]
(2) The membership of the council consists of:
(a) One member who represents Indian tribes, as defined in ORS 97.740;
(b) One member who represents the Association of Oregon Counties;
(c) One member who represents the League of Oregon Cities;
(d) One member who represents the Special Districts Association of Oregon;
(e) One member who represents regional governments;
(f) One member who represents the Oregon Association of Education Service Districts;
(g) One member who represents the Oregon School Boards Association;
(h) One member who represents the Coalition of Oregon School Administrators;
(i) One member who represents public universities listed in ORS 352.002;
(j) One member who represents community colleges;
(k) One member who represents the office of Enterprise Information  Services of the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services;
(L) One member who represents a  critical infrastructure sector in Oregon as defined by
the Cybersecurity and  Infrastructure Security Agency of the United States Department of
Homeland Security;
(m) One member who represents cyber-related industries in Oregon;
(n) One member who represents a public sector information technology association  in
Oregon; and
(o) One member who represents a private sector information technology  or telecommu-
nications association in Oregon.
(3) The council shall:
(a) Adopt a charter, drafted in consultation  with representatives from Portland State
University, Oregon State University and the University of Oregon, as  the governing docu-
ment for the Oregon Cybersecurity Center of Excellence and for  the center’s operations and
[3]
HB 4155
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
budget and the funds administered by the center, and shall review the charter annually.
(b) Develop and update every four years a strategic plan for the center.
(c) Develop and submit a report on the center’s strategic goals  and objectives, operations
and funding requests for continued operations and funds administered by the center,  to the
Governor and to the appropriate committees of the Legislative Assembly, in the  manner re-
quired by ORS 192.245, by February 1 of  each odd-numbered year. The report must identify
any grants, donations, gifts or other forms of conveyances of land, money, real or personal
property or other valuable thing made to the state or the center for  carrying out the pur-
poses of the center.
(d) Establish, in consultation with the State  Chief Information Officer, a statewide
cybersecurity planning committee that meets the purpose, composition and cybersecurity
expertise requirements described in the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act (P.L.
117-58).
(e) Provide a statewide forum for discussing and resolving cybersecurity issues.
(4) The council may:
(a) Adopt rules, policies and procedures necessary for  the operation of the council and
the center’s operations and budget and the funds administered by the center.
(b) Establish subcommittees, advisory committees or other work groups necessary  to
assist the council in performing its duties.
(c) Appoint nonvoting members to the council.
[(6)(a)] (5)(a) A majority of the voting members of the council constitutes a  quorum for the
transaction of business.
(b) Official action  by the council requires the approval of a majority of the voting members of
the council.
[(7)] (6) The  [ State Chief Information Officer ] council shall [ appoint] elect one member of the
council to serve as chairperson and one member of the council to serve as vice chairperson. The
process for electing the chairperson and vice chairperson shall be specified in the  charter
adopted by the council pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.
[(8)(a)] (7)(a) The term of office of each voting member of the council is four years, but a mem-
ber serves at the pleasure of the [ State Chief Information Officer ] Governor.
(b) Before the expiration of the term of a voting member, the [ State Chief  Information Officer ]
Governor, in consultation  with the [ Governor ] State Chief Information Officer , shall appoint a
successor whose term begins on July  1 following the appointment. A voting member is eligible for
reappointment.
[(c) A nonvoting member’s term of  office is two years. A nonvoting member is eligible for reap-
pointment.]
[(d)] (c) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the [ State Chief Information Officer ] Governor, in
consultation with the [ Governor ] State Chief Information Officer , shall make an appointment to
become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
[(9)] (8) The council shall meet at  times and places specified by the call of the chairperson or
a majority of the voting members of the council.
[(10)] (9) Members of the council [ who are  not members of the Legislative Assembly ] are not en-
titled to compensation, but the  [ State Chief Information Officer ] center may reimburse a member of
the council for actual  and necessary travel and other expenses incurred in performing the member’s
official duties, in the manner and amounts provided  for in ORS 292.495, from funds appropriated to
[4]
HB 4155
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the [ State Chief Information Officer ] Oregon Cybersecurity Center of Excellence Operating Fund
for purposes of the council.
[(11)] (10) All agencies of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, are  directed to assist the
council in the performance  of the council’s duties and, to the extent permitted by laws relating to
confidentiality, shall furnish information and advice the council  considers necessary to perform the
council’s  duties.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 276A.329 is amended to read:
276A.329. [ The State Chief Information Officer shall develop a plan for the establishment of an
Oregon Cybersecurity  Center of Excellence. The State Chief Information Officer shall submit the plan
to an appropriate committee or  interim committee of the Legislative Assembly no later than January
1, 2019. The plan must identify any grants, donations, gifts  or other form of conveyance of land, money,
real or personal property or other valuable thing made to the state  from any source that is expected to
support the establishment and continued operation of the center. The  plan must also include a de-
scription of the actions, timelines, budget  and positions or contractor resources required for the center
to:]
[(1) Coordinate information sharing related to cybersecurity risks, warnings and incidents. ]
[(2) Provide support regarding cybersecurity incident response and cybercrime investigations. ]
[(3) Serve as an Information Sharing and Analysis Organization pursuant to 6 U.S.C.  133 et seq.,
and as a liaison with the National Cybersecurity and Communications Integration Center within  the
United States Department of Homeland Security, other federal agencies and other public and  private
sector entities on issues relating to cybersecurity. ]
[(4) Identify and participate in appropriate federal, multistate or private sector  programs and ef-
forts that support or complement the center’s cybersecurity mission. ]
[(5) Receive and appropriately  disseminate relevant cybersecurity threat information from appro-
priate sources, including the federal government, law enforcement agencies, public utilities and  private
industry.]
[(6) Draft and biennially  update an Oregon Cybersecurity Strategy and a Cyber Disruption Re-
sponse Plan to be submitted to the Governor and an  appropriate committee or interim committee of the
Legislative Assembly. The plan must: ]
[(a) Detail the steps that the state should take to increase the resiliency of its  operations in prepa-
ration for, and during the response to, a cyber disruption event; ]
[(b) Address high-risk cybersecurity for the state’s critical infrastructure, including a review of in-
formation security technologies currently in place to determine if current policies are  sufficient to pre-
vent the compromise or unauthorized disclosure of critical or sensitive  government information inside
and outside the firewall of state agencies,  and develop plans to better identify, protect from, detect, re-
spond to and recover from significant cyber threats; ]
[(c) Establish a process to regularly conduct risk-based assessments of  the cybersecurity risk pro-
file, including infrastructure and activities within this state; ]
[(d) Provide  recommendations related to securing networks, systems and data, including interoper-
ability, standardized plans and procedures, evolving threats and best practices  to prevent the unau-
thorized access, theft, alteration or destruction of data held by the state; ]
[(e) Include  the recommended content and timelines for conducting cybersecurity awareness training
for state agencies and the dissemination of educational materials to the  public and private sectors in
this state through the center; ]
[(f) Identify opportunities to educate the public on  ways to prevent cybersecurity attacks and protect
[5]
HB 4155
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the public’s personal information; ]
[(g) Include strategies for collaboration with the private sector  and educational institutions through
the center and other venues to identify and implement cybersecurity best practices; and ]
[(h) Establish data breach reporting and notification requirements in coordination with the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services. ]
(1) The Oregon Cybersecurity Center of  Excellence is established as an independent,
nonprofit public corporation. The center shall exercise and carry out all  powers, rights and
privileges that are expressly conferred up the center, are implied by  law or are incident to
such powers.
(2) The mission and purpose of the center is to oversee, coordinate, fund and provide:
(a) Cyber education, awareness and training for public, private and nonprofit sectors;
(b) Cybersecurity workforce development programs in coordination with:
(A) Public universities listed in ORS 352.002;
(B) Community colleges operated under ORS chapter 341; and
(C) Science, technology, engineering and mathematics  and career and technical education
programs; and
(c) Cybersecurity-related goods and services to Oregon  public bodies, with priority given
to local governments,  regional governments, special districts, education service districts,
school districts and libraries.
(3) In carrying out its mission and purpose, the center shall:
(a) Serve as the statewide advisory body to the Legislative  Assembly, Governor and State
Chief Information Officer on  cybersecurity for local governments, regional governments,
special districts, education service districts, school districts and libraries.
(b) Provide information and  recommend best practices concerning cybersecurity,
resilience and recovery measures, including legal, insurance  and other topics, to public, pri-
vate and nonprofit sectors in Oregon.
(c) Coordinate the sharing of information related to  cybersecurity risks, warnings and
incidents, and promote public awareness and  shared, real-time situational awareness among
public, private and nonprofit sector entities.
(d) Identify and participate in  appropriate federal, multistate, regional, state, local or
private sector programs and  efforts that support or complement the center’s cybersecurity
mission.
(e) Pursue and leverage federal sources of cybersecurity and cyber resilience funding to
achieve state goals related to cybersecurity and cyber resilience.
(f) Manage and award funds distributed to the center for cybersecurity initiatives.
(g) Encourage the development of Oregon’s cybersecurity workforce through  measures
including, but not limited to:
(A) Identifying gaps and needs in workforce programs.
(B) Fostering the growth and development of cybersecurity workforce  development pro-
grams and career and technical education in school districts, community colleges and  public
universities listed in ORS 352.002.
(C) Assisting in curriculum review  and standardization and providing recommendations
to improve programs.
(D) Fostering industry  involvement in internships, mentorship and apprenticeship pro-
grams and experiential learning programs.
[6]
HB 4155
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(E) Building awareness of  industry and career opportunities to recruit students into
cyber-related educational tracks.
(h) Provide cybersecurity assessment, monitoring and incident response services  to pub-
lic bodies, with priority  given to public bodies with the most need for services including local
governments, regional governments,  special districts, education service districts, school dis-
tricts and libraries.
(i) Collaborate with public bodies to coordinate cybersecurity efforts with ongoing infor-
mation technology modernization projects.
(j) Develop, update and submit  biennially the Oregon Cybersecurity Modernization Plan
described in subsection (5) of this section to the Governor and the appropriate committees
of the Legislative Assembly.
(4)(a) Portland State University, Oregon  State University and the University of Oregon
shall jointly operate the center by agreement, using moneys  from the Oregon Cybersecurity
Center of Excellence  Operating Fund established under section 7 of this 2022 Act, and shall
provide administrative and staff support and facilities as necessary for the center to carry
out the purposes set forth  in this section. The universities may operate the center as a vir-
tual center, in whole or in part.
(b) A public university or community college in Oregon not listed in paragraph (a) of this
subsection may join  the agreement to operate the center and provide administrative and
staff support and facilities.
(5) The Oregon Cybersecurity Modernization Plan developed and  updated under this sec-
tion must, at a minimum:
(a) Identify cybersecurity risks in critical infrastructure, local  governments, school dis-
tricts and public sector entities;
(b) Establish risk-based assessment procedures;
(c) Survey  and identify technology and process gaps and provide recommendations to
address the gaps;
(d) Survey educational, training, public awareness and workforce development programs
and provide recommendations to improve the programs; and
(e) Provide financial estimates and impacts associated with the cost of implementing or
not implementing recommendations, including pilot programs  and statewide implementation.
SECTION 4.
As used in sections 4 to 10 of this 2022 Act:
(1) “Education service district”  means a district created under ORS 334.010 that provides
regional educational services to component school districts.
(2) “Library” means a public agency that provides to  all residents of a local government
unit free and equal access  to library and information services that are suitable for persons
of all ages.
(3) “Local government” means a city or county.
(4) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
(5) “Regional government” means a metropolitan service  district formed under ORS
chapter 268.
(6) “School district” has the meaning given that term in ORS 330.003.
(7) “Special district” means a district as defined in ORS 198.010.
SECTION 5.
Authority to enter into  agreements. Notwithstanding any other provision
of law, the Oregon Cybersecurity Center of Excellence may:
[7]
HB 4155
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(1) Enter into any agreement, or any configuration of agreements, relating to the estab-
lishment and ongoing operations and purpose of the center with any private entity  or unit
of government, or with any configuration  of private entities and units of government. The
subject of agreements entered into under this section  may include, but need not be limited
to, cybersecurity workforce development,  training and awareness, information technology
security assessments and vulnerability testing, cyber disruption and incident  response, risk-
based remediation measures, application lifecycle maintenance management (ALM) and the
funding and provision of cybersecurity-related goods or services.
(2) Include in any agreement entered into  under this section any financing mechanisms,
including but  not limited to the imposition and collection of franchise fees or user fees and
the development or use of other revenue sources.
SECTION 6.
Authority to  accept moneys. (1) The Oregon Cybersecurity Center of Excel-
lence may accept from the  United States Government or any of its agencies any funds that
are made  available to the State of Oregon for carrying out the purposes of the center, re-
gardless of whether the funds are made available by grant,  loan or other financing arrange-
ment. The center may enter into agreements and  other arrangements with the United States
Government or  any of its agencies as may be necessary, proper and convenient for carrying
out the purposes of the center.
(2) The center may accept from any source any grant, donation, gift or other form of
conveyance of land, money, real or personal property or other valuable thing made  to the
State of Oregon or the center for carrying out the purposes of the center.
(3) Any  cybersecurity initiative, consistent with the purpose of the center, may be fi-
nanced in whole or in part by  contributions of any funds or property made by any private
entity or unit of government that is a  party to any agreement entered into under the au-
thority of the center.
(4) The center shall deposit, as appropriate,  all moneys received under this section into
one of the following funds:
(a) The Oregon Cybersecurity Center of Excellence Operating Fund  established under
section 7 of this 2022 Act.
(b) The  Oregon Cybersecurity Workforce Development Fund established under section 8
of this 2022 Act.
(c) The Oregon Cybersecurity Grant Program Fund established under section 9 of  this
2022 Act.
(d) The Oregon Cybersecurity Public Awareness Fund established under  section 10 of this
2022 Act.
SECTION 7. Center operating fund. (1) The Oregon  Cybersecurity Center of Excellence
Operating Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the  General
Fund. Interest  earned by the Oregon Cybersecurity Center of Excellence Operating Fund
must be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts appropriated  or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative As-
sembly; and
(c) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated  to the Higher Education Coordi-
[8]
HB 4155
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
nating Commission for distribution to the Oregon Cybersecurity Center of Excellence for the
purposes of carrying out the functions and operations of the center.
(4) The center shall submit to the Governor and to the appropriate committees of  the
Legislative Assembly, in the manner provided under ORS  192.245, a biennial report that
summarizes the balance of the fund,  lists the deposits into and expenditures from the fund
and provides such other details as necessary regarding the operation of the fund.
SECTION 8.
Cybersecurity workforce development fund.  (1) The Oregon Cybersecurity
Workforce Development Fund is established in the State  Treasury, separate and distinct
from the General  Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon Cybersecurity Workforce Develop-
ment Fund must be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the  Legislative As-
sembly; and
(c) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission for distribution to the Oregon Cybersecurity Center of Excellence for the
purposes of  making targeted investments in workforce development programs designed to
accelerate the growth, qualifications and availability of Oregon’s cybersecurity workforce.
(4) The center shall submit to the Governor and to the appropriate committees of  the
Legislative Assembly, in the manner provided under ORS  192.245, a biennial report that
summarizes the balance of the fund,  lists the deposits into and expenditures from the fund
and provides such other details as necessary regarding the operation of the fund.
SECTION 9.
Cybersecurity grant program fund.  (1) The Oregon Cybersecurity Grant
Program Fund is established in  the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General
Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon Cybersecurity Grant Program Fund  must be credited
to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts appropriated  or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative As-
sembly; and
(c) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated  to the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission for distribution to the Oregon Cybersecurity Center of Excellence for the
purposes of providing:
(a) Cybersecurity assessment, monitoring, incident response  and technical assistance and
other cybersecurity-related goods and  services to Oregon public bodies on a competitive basis
with specific  emphasis on serving the unmet needs of local governments, regional govern-
ments, special districts, education service districts, school districts and libraries.
(b) Matching funds for federal moneys related  to cybersecurity received by public bodies.
(4) The center shall adopt standards, objectives, criteria and eligibility requirements  for
the use of moneys distributed from the Oregon Cybersecurity Grant Program Fund. In  de-
veloping criteria and eligibility standards, the center  shall take into consideration any re-
quirements of federal programs awarding moneys related to cybersecurity.
(5) The center shall submit to the Governor and to the appropriate committees of  the
[9]
HB 4155
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Legislative Assembly, in the manner provided under ORS  192.245, a biennial report that
summarizes the balance of the fund,  lists the deposits into and expenditures from the fund
and provides such other details as necessary regarding the operation of the fund.
SECTION 10.
Cybersecurity public awareness fund. (1) The Oregon Cybersecurity Public
Awareness Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from  the General
Fund. Interest earned by the  Oregon Cybersecurity Public Awareness Fund must be credited
to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the  Legislative As-
sembly; and
(c) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission for distribution to the Oregon Cybersecurity Center of Excellence for the
purposes of raising awareness about the importance of cybersecurity across  Oregon and en-
suring that Oregonians  better understand existing threats and have the information and re-
sources to be safer and more secure online.
(4) The  center shall submit to the Governor and to the appropriate committees of the
Legislative Assembly in the  manner provided under ORS 192.245, a biennial report that
summarizes the balance of the fund, lists the deposits into  and expenditures from the fund
and provides such other details as necessary regarding the operation of the fund.
SECTION 11.
Section 1 of this  2022 Act and ORS 276A.326 and 276A.329 are added to and
made a part of sections 4 to 10 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 12.  ORS 276A.332 is amended to read:
276A.332. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State Chief Information Officer may:
(1) Enter into any  agreement, or any configuration of agreements, relating to state cybersecurity
or to support the operations of  the Oregon Cybersecurity Center of Excellence established
by ORS 276A.329,  with any private entity or unit of government, or  with any configuration of pri-
vate entities and units of government. The subject of agreements entered into under this  section
may include, but need not be limited  to, cybersecurity workforce development,  training and
awareness, information technology  security assessments and vulnerability testing, cyber disruption
and incident response, risk-based remediation measures and  application [ life cycle maintenance ]
lifecycle management (ALM) .
(2) Include in any agreement entered into  under this section any financing mechanisms, includ-
ing but not limited  to the imposition and collection of franchise fees or user fees and the develop-
ment or use of other revenue sources.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 276A.335 is amended to read:
276A.335. (1) The State Chief Information Officer may accept from the United States Government
or any of its agencies any funds that are made available to the state  for carrying out the purposes
of ORS  276A.323 , [ to] 276A.326, 276A.329, 276A.332 and  276A.335, regardless of whether the funds
are made available by grant, loan or other financing arrangement. Under the authority granted by
ORS chapter 190, the State Chief Information  Officer may enter into agreements and other ar-
rangements with the United States Government or any of its  agencies as may be necessary, proper
and convenient for carrying  out the purposes of ORS 276A.323 , [ to] 276A.326, 276A.329, 276A.332
and 276A.335.
[10]
HB 4155
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The office of Enterprise Information  Services may accept from any source any grant, do-
nation, gift or other form of conveyance of  land, money, real or personal property or other valuable
thing made to the  state or the office of Enterprise Information Services for carrying out the pur-
poses of ORS 276A.323 , [ to] 276A.326, 276A.329, 276A.332 and 276A.335.
(3) Any cybersecurity initiative, consistent  with the purposes of ORS 276A.323 , [ to] 276A.326,
276A.329, 276A.332 and 276A.335, may be financed in whole or in part  by contributions of any funds
or property made by any private  entity or unit of government that is a party to any agreement en-
tered into under the authority of the office of Enterprise Information Services.
(4) The State Chief  Information Officer shall deposit into the State Information Technology Op-
erating Fund established under ORS 276A.209 all moneys received under this section.
SECTION 14.
(1) In addition to and not in  lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending June
30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $_______, to be deposited into the Oregon
Cybersecurity Center of Excellence Operating Fund established under  section 7 of this 2022
Act.
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, to be  deposited into the Oregon Cybersecurity
Workforce Development Fund established under section 8 of this 2022 Act.
(3) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, to be  deposited into the Oregon Cybersecurity Grant
Program Fund established under section 9 of this 2022 Act.
(4) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, to be deposited into the  Oregon Cybersecurity Public
Awareness Fund established under section 10 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 15. The section captions  used in this 2022 Act are provided only for the con-
venience of the reader and do not become  part of the statutory law of this state or express
any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 16. (1) Sections 1, 4 to 10 and  14 of this 2022 Act and the amendments to ORS
276A.326, 276A.329, 276A.332 and 276A.335 by sections 2,  3, 12 and 13 of this 2022 Act become
operative on July 1, 2022.
(2) The Governor,  State Chief Information Officer, Oregon Cybersecurity Advisory
Council and Portland State University, Oregon State University and University  of Oregon
may take any action before the operative date specified in subsection (1)  of this section that
is necessary to enable the Governor, State Chief Information Officer,  Oregon Cybersecurity
Advisory Council and Portland State University, Oregon State University and University of
Oregon to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section,
all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the  Governor, State Chief Information
Officer, Oregon Cybersecurity Advisory Council and Portland  State University, Oregon State
University and University of Oregon by the amendments  to ORS 276A.326, 276A.329, 276A.332
and 276A.335 by sections 2, 3, 12 and 13 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 17. This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2022 Act takes effect
[11]
HB 4155
1
2
on its passage.
[12]