Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State  Department of Agriculture shall study food and beverage pro-
duction in Oregon. The  department shall submit a report on the study in the manner pro-
vided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to  the committees
or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to natural resources no later than
September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3379