Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $8,316,044,524 for the State School Fund.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the amount of
$370,466,870 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum  limit for
payment of expenses from lottery  moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Department of Education for the State School Fund.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the amount of
$36,599,736 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Education from  fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts,  but excluding lottery funds, federal funds and funds de-
scribed in section 4 of this 2021 Act, collected or received by the department for the State
School Fund.
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$676,888,870 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum  limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Education from  fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or
received by the department for the  State School Fund from the Fund for Student Success
established under ORS 327.001.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$200,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum  limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Education from lottery  moneys transferred from
the Education Stability Fund to the State School Fund.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding ORS 327.008 and 327.013, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, the Department of Education:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3816
HB 3405
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
(1) May spend up to $968,000 from the  State School Fund for the contract described in
ORS 329.488.
(2) May spend up to  $1,600,000 from the State School Fund for purposes related to the
Oregon Virtual School District.
(3) May spend up to $2,850,375 from the State School Fund to provide  lunches, at no
charge to the student, to  students who are eligible for reduced price lunches under the
United States Department of Agriculture’s current Income Eligibility Guidelines.
SECTION 7.
The amount of $4,000,000 is transferred  from the State School Fund to the
Local Option Equalization Grants Account created in ORS 327.339.
SECTION 8. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
[2]