Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 247.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Electronic signature” means an electronic form of  a handwritten signature that can
be verified, in the manner described in ORS 254.470 (11), for the purpose of tallying ballots.
(b) “Registration information” means:
(A) An individual’s legal name, age, residence and citizenship information; and
(B) The individual’s electronic signature.
(2)(a) The Secretary of State shall by rule establish a schedule by which  each public in-
stitution of higher education, as that term is defined in  ORS 350.260, shall provide to the
secretary electronic records, derived from some or all of a person’s information provided  by
the person to the  public institution of higher education upon the person’s application for
admission to the public institution of higher education, of each  person who is eligible to be
a qualified elector under Article II, section 2, of the Oregon Constitution.
(b) The  secretary may establish by rule what electronic records establish, for purposes
of this subsection, whether a person may be eligible to be a qualified elector.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection, a public institution of higher edu-
cation may  not provide to the secretary any electronic records demonstrating that a person
is not a citizen of the United States.
(3) When establishing a schedule under subsection (2) of  this section, the secretary may
adopt rules governing the format and frequency of data transfer.
(4)(a) The secretary:
(A) Shall by rule develop a  process to obtain any missing registration information from
the Department of Transportation for each person described in  subsection (2) of this section
for whom the public institution of higher education does not  provide all registration infor-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 233
SB 1577
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mation; and
(B) May use any registration information that is obtained under subparagraph (A) of  this
paragraph, or that is otherwise in the secretary’s possession, for  the purpose of registering
a person to vote under this section.
(b) The Department of Transportation may not provide to the secretary registration in-
formation of a person under this subsection if the department’s records demonstrate  that
the person is not a citizen of the United States.
(5) Upon receiving the electronic record  for a person described in subsection (2) of this
section, and any missing registration information for the person  under subsection (4) of this
section, the secretary shall provide the person’s registration information to the county clerk
of the county in which the person  may be registered as an elector. The secretary or county
clerk shall notify each person of the process to:
(a) Decline being registered as an elector.
(b) Adopt a political party affiliation.
(6) If a person  notified under subsection (5) of this section does not decline to be regis-
tered as an  elector within 21 calendar days after the secretary or county clerk issues the
notification, the person’s registration information submitted to the  county clerk under sub-
section (5) of this section will constitute a completed  registration card for the person for
purposes of this chapter. The person shall be registered to vote if  the county clerk deter-
mines that the person is qualified to vote under Article II, section 2, of the Oregon Consti-
tution, and the person is not already registered to vote.
(7) A county  clerk may not send a ballot to, or add to an elector registration list, a per-
son unless:
(a) The person is already registered to vote; or
(b)(A) The person is determined under subsection (6)  of this section to be qualified to
vote; and
(B) At least 21 calendar days  have passed after the secretary or county clerk provided
the notification described in subsection (5) of this section to the person.
(8) The transfer  of personal information and data by a public institution of higher edu-
cation or the Department of Transportation to the secretary under this section  is limited to
the information and data that is necessary to register  people as electors. Information and
data transferred to the secretary under this  section may be used only for the purpose of
registering people as electors.
(9) The secretary  shall adopt rules required to implement this section. Any rules adopted
under this section:
(a) Are subject to input and public comment; and
(b) May come into effect only after the secretary  and each public institution of higher
education test and verify the data transfer processes.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 247.017 is amended to read:
247.017. (1) The Secretary  of State shall by rule establish a schedule by which the Department
of Transportation and the Department of Revenue  shall provide to the  secretary electronic re-
cords containing the legal name, age, residence and citizenship  information for, and the electronic
signature of, each person who meets qualifications identified by the secretary by rule.
(2) Upon receiving the electronic record for, and electronic signature of, a  person described in
subsection (1) of this section, the Secretary of  State shall provide the information to the county
[2]
SB 1577
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
clerk of the county in which the person may  be registered as an elector. The secretary or county
clerk shall notify each person of the process to:
(a) Decline being registered as an elector.
(b) Adopt a political party affiliation.
(3) If a person notified under subsection (2)  of this section does not decline to be registered as
an elector within 21 calendar days after the Secretary of State or county  clerk issues the notifica-
tion, the person’s electronic record and electronic signature submitted under  subsection (1) of this
section will constitute a completed registration card for the person for  purposes of this chapter. The
person shall be registered to  vote if the county clerk determines that the person is qualified to vote
under Article II, section 2, of the Oregon Constitution, and the person is not  already registered to
vote.
(4) A county clerk may not send a ballot  to, or add to an elector registration list, a person who
meets eligibility requirements until at least 21 calendar days after the Secretary of State or  county
clerk provided notification to the person as described in subsection (2) of this section.
(5) The Department of Revenue shall provide electronic records to the Secretary of State
under subsection (1) of this section.
[(5)] (6) In addition to providing electronic records to the  Secretary of State under subsection
(1) of  this section, the Department of Transportation may by rule develop, and require the avail-
ability or use of, any form or  application the department determines is necessary to ensure compli-
ance with  the voter registration provisions of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (P.L.
103-31).
[(6)] (7) The Secretary of  State shall adopt rules required to implement subsections (1) to (4) of
this section.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 247.002 is amended to read:
247.002. As used in this chapter:
(1) “County clerk” means the county clerk or the county official in charge of elections.
(2) “Elector”  means an individual qualified to vote under Article II, section 2, Oregon Consti-
tution.
(3) “Registration card” means [ a]:
(a) A  state voter registration card approved by the Secretary of State under ORS 247.171[ , a];
(b) A  federal voter registration application form prescribed by the Federal Election Commission
pursuant to the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (P.L. 103-31) [ or an ];
(c) An  electronic record containing an  individual’s legal name, age, residence and citizenship
information and electronic signature  submitted to the Department of Transportation in the manner
described in ORS 247.017 ; or
(d) An electronic record created from some or all of an individual’s registration infor-
mation submitted by the individual to a public institution of higher education in  the manner
described in section 2 of this 2024 Act.
(4) As used in this  section, “public institution of higher education” and “registration in-
formation” have the meanings given those terms in section 2 of this 2024 Act .
SECTION 5.
 ORS 247.002, as amended by section 3, chapter 492, Oregon Laws 2023,  is amended
to read:
247.002. As used in this chapter:
(1) “County clerk” means the county clerk or the county official in charge of elections.
(2) “Elector” means an individual qualified to vote under Article II, section 2, Oregon  Consti-
[3]
SB 1577
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tution.
(3) “Registration card” means:
(a) A state voter registration card approved by the Secretary of State under ORS 247.171;
(b) A federal voter registration application form prescribed  by the Federal Election Commission
pursuant to the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (P.L. 103-31);
(c) An electronic record containing an individual’s legal name, age, residence and  citizenship
information and electronic signature submitted to the Department of Transportation  in the manner
described in ORS 247.017; [ or]
(d) An electronic record containing an individual’s legal name, age, residence and citizenship
information submitted to the Oregon Health Authority in the manner described in ORS 247.018 ; or
(e) An  electronic record created from some or all of an individual’s registration infor-
mation submitted by the individual to a public institution of higher education in  the manner
described in section 2 of this 2024 Act.
(4) As used in this section, “public institution of higher  education” and “registration in-
formation” have the meanings given those terms in section 2 of this 2024 Act .
SECTION 6.
 ORS 247.012 is amended to read:
247.012. (1) A qualified person may register to vote or update a registration to vote by:
(a) Delivering by mail, having a person deliver or otherwise delivering  a completed registration
card to any county clerk, the Secretary of State, any office of the Department of Transportation or
any designated voter registration agency as described in ORS 247.208;
(b) Personally delivering, or having a person  deliver, the card to an official designated by a
county clerk under subsection (7) of this section;
(c) Submitting the person’s legal name, age, residence and citizenship information  and electronic
signature to the Department of Transportation; [ or]
(d) Submitting some or all of the person’s registration information to a public institution
of higher education in a manner that allows the  county clerk to register the person to vote
or update the person’s voter registration through the process described in section  2 of this
2024 Act; or
[(d)] (e) Completing a registration card using the electronic voter registration system  described
in ORS 247.019.
(2) If a registration card is mailed or delivered to:
(a) Any person other than a county clerk or the Secretary of State, the  person shall forward the
card to a county clerk or the Secretary of State not later  than the fifth day after receiving the card;
or
(b) The Secretary of State or a county clerk for a county other  than the county in which the
person applying for registration  resides, the Secretary of State or county clerk shall forward the
card to the county clerk for the county in which the person  resides not later than the fifth day after
receiving the card.
(3) Registration of a qualified person occurs:
(a) When a legible, accurate and  complete registration card is received in the office of any
county clerk, the Office of the Secretary of  State, an office of the Department of Transportation, a
designated voter registration agency under ORS 247.208  or at a location designated by a county
clerk under subsection (7) of this section;
(b) On the date a registration  card is postmarked if the card is received after the 21st day im-
mediately preceding an election but is  postmarked not later than the 21st day immediately preceding
[4]
SB 1577
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the election and is addressed to an office of any county  clerk, the Office of the Secretary of State,
an office of the Department  of Transportation or any designated voter registration agency as de-
scribed in ORS 247.208; or
(c) In  the case of a registration card missing a date of birth, containing an incomplete date of
birth or containing an unintentional scrivener’s error that is supplied or corrected as described  in
subsection (4) or (6) of this section, on the date that registration would  have occurred if the regis-
tration card had not been missing the date of birth, contained  an incomplete date of birth or con-
tained the scrivener’s error.
(4)(a) Except as provided in ORS 247.125, if a registration card is legible, accurate and  contains,
at a minimum, the registrant’s name, residence  address, date of birth and signature, the county clerk
shall register the person.
(b) If the information required under paragraph  (a) of this subsection is missing from the regis-
tration card or the date of birth is incomplete, the county clerk shall attempt to  obtain the missing
or incomplete information from all sources available to the county clerk, including but  not limited
to current and previous addresses and  phone numbers of the registrant. The county clerk may also
supply the registrant’s date of birth from any previous  registration of the registrant. If the missing
or incomplete information cannot be obtained from sources available to the  county clerk, the county
clerk shall use reasonable efforts to contact the registrant by phone,  mail and electronic mail to
obtain the missing or incomplete information.
(5) If a registration card meets the requirements of subsection (4) of  this section but is missing
an indication of political party affiliation, the registrant  shall be considered not affiliated with any
political party. This subsection does not apply if an elector is updating a registration.
(6) If a registration card contains  an unintentional scrivener’s error, the county clerk may at-
tempt to contact the person to correct the error.
(7) A county clerk may appoint officials to accept registration of persons at designated locations.
The appointments and locations shall be in writing and filed in the office of the county clerk. The
county clerk shall be responsible for the performance of duties by those appointed.
(8) A registration card received and accepted  under this section shall be considered an active
registration.
(9) A registration may be updated at any time.
(10) As used in this section, “public institution of higher education” and “registration
information” have the meanings given those terms in section 2 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 247.012, as amended by section 4, chapter 492, Oregon Laws 2023,  is amended
to read:
247.012. (1) A qualified person may register to vote or update a registration to vote by:
(a) Delivering by mail, having a person deliver or otherwise delivering  a completed registration
card to any county clerk, the Secretary of State, any office of the Department of Transportation or
any designated voter registration agency as described in ORS 247.208;
(b) Personally delivering, or having a person  deliver, the card to an official designated by a
county clerk under subsection (7) of this section;
(c) Submitting the person’s legal name, age, residence and citizenship information  and electronic
signature to the Department of Transportation;
(d) Submitting  the person’s legal name, age, residence and citizenship information to the Oregon
Health Authority for use in the Oregon Health Plan; [ or]
(e) Submitting some  or all of the person’s registration information to a public institution
[5]
SB 1577
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of higher education in a manner that allows the  county clerk to register the person to vote
or update the person’s voter registration through the process described in section  2 of this
2024 Act; or
[(e)] (f) Completing a registration card using the electronic  voter registration system described
in ORS 247.019.
(2) If a registration card is mailed or delivered to:
(a) Any person other than a county clerk or the Secretary of State, the  person shall forward the
card to a county clerk or the Secretary of State not later  than the fifth day after receiving the card;
or
(b) The Secretary of State or a county clerk for a county other  than the county in which the
person applying for registration  resides, the Secretary of State or county clerk shall forward the
card to the county clerk for the county in which the person  resides not later than the fifth day after
receiving the card.
(3) Registration of a qualified person occurs:
(a) When a legible, accurate and  complete registration card is received in the office of any
county clerk, the Office of the Secretary of  State, an office of the Department of Transportation, a
designated voter registration agency under ORS 247.208  or at a location designated by a county
clerk under subsection (7) of this section;
(b) On the date a registration  card is postmarked if the card is received after the 21st day im-
mediately preceding an election but is  postmarked not later than the 21st day immediately preceding
the election and is addressed to an office of any county  clerk, the Office of the Secretary of State,
an office of the Department  of Transportation or any designated voter registration agency as de-
scribed in ORS 247.208; or
(c) In  the case of a registration card missing a date of birth, containing an incomplete date of
birth or containing an unintentional scrivener’s error that is supplied or corrected as described  in
subsection (4) or (6) of this section, on the date that registration would  have occurred if the regis-
tration card had not been missing the date of birth, contained  an incomplete date of birth or con-
tained the scrivener’s error.
(4)(a)(A) Except as provided in ORS 247.125, if a registration card is  legible, accurate and con-
tains, at  a minimum, the registrant’s name, residence address, date of birth and signature, the county
clerk shall register the person.
(B) The county clerk  shall register a person pursuant to ORS 247.018, regardless of whether the
person’s registration card contains a signature, if the person’s registration card is  legible, accurate
and contains, at a minimum, the registrant’s name, residence address and date of birth.
(b) If the information required under paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection is missing  from the
registration card or the date of birth is incomplete,  or if the signature of a person described in
paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection has not been submitted, the county  clerk shall attempt to obtain
the missing or incomplete information from all sources available to  the county clerk, including but
not limited to current and previous  addresses and phone numbers of the registrant. The county clerk
may also  supply the registrant’s date of birth from any previous registration of the registrant. If the
missing or incomplete information cannot be obtained from sources  available to the county clerk,
the county clerk  shall use reasonable efforts to contact the registrant by phone, mail and electronic
mail to obtain the missing or incomplete information.
(5) If a registration card meets  the requirements of subsection (4) of this section but is missing
an indication of political party affiliation, the registrant  shall be considered not affiliated with any
[6]
SB 1577
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
political party. This subsection does not apply if an elector is updating a registration.
(6) If a registration card contains an unintentional scrivener’s error,  the county clerk may at-
tempt to contact the person to correct the error.
(7) A county clerk may appoint officials to accept registration of persons at designated locations.
The appointments and locations shall be in writing and filed in the office of the county clerk. The
county clerk shall be responsible for the performance of duties by those appointed.
(8) A registration card received and accepted under this  section shall be considered an active
registration.
(9) A registration may be updated at any time.
(10) As used in this section, “public institution of higher education” and “registration
information” have the meanings given those terms in section 2 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 247.292 is amended to read:
247.292. (1) A county clerk shall update the registration of an  elector in the county upon re-
ceiving evidence from:
(a) The elector indicating a residence or mailing address that is different from the residence or
mailing address for the elector as contained in the records of the county clerk;
(b) The United States Postal Service indicating  a residence address that is different from the
residence address for the elector as contained in the records of the county clerk; or
(c) The Secretary of State  as provided in ORS 247.017 or 247.295  or  section  2 of this 2024
Act.
(2) When a county clerk updates the registration of  an elector under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion, the clerk shall send a new voter notification card by  nonforwardable mail to the elector as
provided in ORS 247.181. The clerk shall include a notice stating that if the residence address or
mailing address is not correct, the elector must notify the clerk.
(3) An elector is not  disqualified from voting due to any error relating to an update of regis-
tration made under this section.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 247.292, as amended by section 5, chapter 492, Oregon Laws 2023,  is amended
to read:
247.292. (1) A county clerk shall update  the registration of an elector in the county upon re-
ceiving evidence from:
(a) The elector indicating a residence or mailing address that is different from the residence or
mailing address for the elector as contained in the records of the county clerk;
(b) The United States Postal Service indicating a residence  address that is different from the
residence address for the elector as contained in the records of the county clerk; or
(c) The Secretary  of State as provided in ORS 247.017, 247.018 or 247.295  or section 2 of this
2024 Act .
(2) When a county clerk updates the registration of  an elector under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion, the clerk shall send a new  voter notification card by nonforwardable mail to the elector as
provided in ORS 247.181. The clerk shall include a notice stating that if the residence address or
mailing address is not correct, the elector must notify the clerk.
(3) An elector is not disqualified from voting due to any error relating to  an update of regis-
tration made under this section.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 247.014 is amended to read:
247.014. (1) In implementing ORS 247.012, 247.017 and 247.171  and section 2  of this 2024 Act ,
the Department of Transportation  and each public institution of higher education shall take steps
[7]
SB 1577
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
reasonably necessary to allow transfer  of voter registration information by electronic or magnetic
medium.
(2) As used in this section,  “public institution of higher education” has the meaning given
that term in ORS 350.260.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 247.014, as amended by section 6,  chapter 492, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
247.014. (1) In  implementing ORS 247.012, 247.017, 247.018 and 247.171 and section 2 of this
2024 Act , the Department of Transportation [ and], the Oregon Health Authority and each public
institution of higher education  shall take steps  reasonably necessary to allow transfer of voter
registration information by electronic or magnetic medium.
(2) As used in this section,  “public institution of higher education” has the meaning given
that term in ORS 350.260.
SECTION 12.  ORS 247.171 is amended to read:
247.171. (1) Except as provided in this subsection, the Secretary of  State shall design, prepare
and distribute  state voter registration cards. The Secretary of State shall also distribute federal
registration  cards.  Any person may apply in writing to the Secretary of State for permission to print,
copy or otherwise prepare and distribute the  registration cards designed by the Secretary of State.
The secretary may revoke any  permission granted under this subsection at any time. All registration
cards shall be distributed to the public without charge.
(2) The Secretary  of State shall approve any voter registration application form developed for
use by any agency designated as a voter registration agency under ORS 247.208.
(3) Each voter registration card designed  or approved by the Secretary of State shall describe
the penalties for knowingly supplying false information on the registration card and shall  contain
space for a person to provide the following information:
(a) Full name;
(b) Residence address,  mailing address or any other information necessary to locate the resi-
dence of the person offering to register to vote;
(c) The name of the political party with which the person is affiliated, if any;
(d) Date of birth;
(e) An indication that the person is a citizen of the United States; and
(f) [ A] Except for an electronic signature obtained as provided under  section 2 of this 2024
Act, a  signature attesting to the fact that the person is qualified to be an elector.
(4) Any  form containing a voter registration card may also include space for a person to provide:
(a) A telephone number where the person may be contacted; and
(b) If previously registered to  vote in this state, the name then supplied by the person and the
county and, if known, the address of previous registration.
(5) A person shall not supply any information under subsection (3) or (4) of this section  knowing
it to be false.
(6) A county clerk or other person  accepting registration cards shall not request any informa-
tion unless it is authorized by state or federal law.
(7) [ A] Except as provided in section 2 of this 2024 Act, a  person shall attest to the infor-
mation supplied on the voter registration card by signing the completed registration card.
(8) [ Any ] Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, any  completed  and signed
registration card described in subsection (3) of this section shall be the official  registration card of
the elector.
[8]
SB 1577
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 13.
 ORS 247.171, as amended by section 7,  chapter 492, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
247.171. (1) Except as provided  in this subsection, the Secretary of State shall design, prepare
and distribute state voter registration cards. The Secretary of State shall also distribute  federal
registration  cards.  Any person may apply in writing to the Secretary of State for permission to print,
copy or otherwise prepare and distribute the registration cards  designed by the Secretary of State.
The secretary may revoke any  permission granted under this subsection at any time. All registration
cards shall be distributed to the public without charge.
(2) The Secretary of State shall approve any voter registration application form  developed for
use by any agency designated as a voter registration agency under ORS 247.208.
(3) Each voter registration card designed or approved by the  Secretary of State shall describe
the penalties  for knowingly supplying false information on the registration card and shall contain
space for a person to provide the following information:
(a) Full name;
(b) Residence address, mailing address or any other information necessary to locate  the resi-
dence of the person offering to register to vote;
(c) The name of the political party with which the person is affiliated, if any;
(d) Date of birth;
(e) An indication that the person is a citizen of the United States; and
(f) Except as provided in ORS  247.018 and section 2 of this 2024 Act , a signature attesting to
the fact that the person is qualified to be an elector.
(4) Any  form containing a voter registration card may also include space for a person to provide:
(a) A telephone number where the person may be contacted; and
(b) If previously registered to  vote in this state, the name then supplied by the person and the
county and, if known, the address of previous registration.
(5) A person shall not supply any information under subsection (3) or (4) of this section  knowing
it to be false.
(6) A county clerk or other person  accepting registration cards shall not request any informa-
tion unless it is authorized by state or federal law.
(7) Except as provided in ORS 247.018  and section 2 of this 2024 Act , a person shall  attest to
the information supplied on the voter registration card by signing the completed registration card.
(8) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, any completed  and signed registration
card described in subsection (3) of this section shall be the official registration card of the elector.
SECTION 14.
 Section 9, chapter 492, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  (1)(a) The amendments to ORS 247.019 by section 8, chapter 492, Oregon Laws 2023,
become operative on the effective date of this 2024 Act.
(b) Section 2 , chapter 492, Oregon Laws  2023, [ of this 2023 Act ] and the amendments to ORS
247.002, 247.012, 247.014, [ 247.019,] 247.171 and 247.292 by sections 3 to 7, chapter 492, Oregon
Laws 2023, [ 8 of this 2023 Act ] become operative on June 1, 2026.
(2) The Secretary of State, the Oregon Health Authority, the  Department of Transportation and
the county clerks may take any action before the operative date specified in subsection  (1) of this
section that is  necessary for the Secretary of State, the Oregon Health Authority, the Department
of Transportation and the county clerks to exercise, on and after the operative date specified  in
subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the  Secretary of
State, the Oregon Health Authority,  the Department of Transportation and the county clerks by
[9]
SB 1577
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
section 2 , chapter 492, Oregon  Laws 2023,  [ of this 2023 Act ] and the amendments to ORS 247.002,
247.012, 247.014, 247.019, 247.171 and 247.292 by sections 3 to 8 , chapter 492, Oregon Laws 2023
[of this 2023 Act ].
SECTION 15.
The Secretary  of State, the Department of Revenue, each public institution
of higher education as defined in section 2 of this 2024 Act and the county clerks may take
any action before the effective date of this 2024 Act that is necessary for the Secretary of
State, the Department of  Revenue, each public institution of higher education and the county
clerks to exercise, on and after the effective date of this 2024 Act, all  of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the Secretary of State, the Department of Revenue, each  public
institution of higher education and the county clerks by section 2 of this 2024 Act and the
amendments to ORS 247.002, 247.012, 247.014, 247.017, 247.171 and 247.292  by sections 3, 4, 5,
6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12 and 13 of this 2024 Act.
[10]