Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Revenue Officer shall study the corporate excise and income
tax system. The Legislative Revenue  Officer shall submit a report in the manner provided
by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to revenue no later than December 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3629