Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife and Department of Environ-
mental Quality shall jointly study the impacts of wildfire on  the water quality of streams and
tributaries, in consultation with any other relevant state agencies.
(2) At minimum, the study must assess  how the first rains after a wildfire affect the
water quality, and whether  levels of turbidity and sediment change after a wildfire, paying
particular attention to the potential infilling  of colder, deeper salmonid habitat pools and to
any subsequent effects on spawning gravel and beds from changes  in fine sediment deposits
and coverage.
(3) The departments shall jointly submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245,
and may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legisla-
tive Assembly related to water no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4036