Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Revenue Officer shall conduct a study of how best to fund
the assessment and taxation functions of the property tax system in Oregon. Not later  than
December 1, 2025, the officer shall submit a report of the findings of the study, in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, to the  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to
revenue, and shall include recommendations for legislation in the report.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2223