Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Transportation shall  distribute moneys to the Port
of Hood River for the Hood River-White Salmon Interstate Bridge replacement project  in
accordance with the following schedule:
(a) In the biennium beginning July 1, 2023: $30,000,000.
(b) In the biennium beginning July 1, 2025: $95,000,000.
(2) The Legislative Assembly intends  to support the Hood River-White Salmon Interstate
Bridge replacement project through a total investment of $125,000,000.
SECTION 2.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any authorization to issue  general obli-
gation bonds under ORS 286A.035, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, at the request of
the Department of Transportation, the State Treasurer may issue general obligation bonds
under ORS 367.555 to 367.600 in an amount  that produces $30,000,000 of net proceeds for the
purpose specified in subsection (2)  of this section, plus an amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of bonds issued under this section  must be transferred to the depart-
ment for the purposes of section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3.
The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall issue a grant to
the Port of Cascade Locks in the amount of $6,000,000, which must be used  for the Bridge
of the Gods seismic strengthening project.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $6,000,000 to carry out the provisions of
section 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5. (1) On or before December 31, 2023, the Oregon Department of Administra-
tive Services shall distribute the  amount of $20,000,000 to Multnomah County for the Earth-
quake Ready Burnside Bridge project.
(2) The Legislative Assembly intends to support  the Earthquake Ready Burnside Bridge
project through a total investment of $250,000,000 by the year 2030.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4560
HB 3622
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
SECTION 6.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any authorization to issue  general obli-
gation bonds under ORS 286A.035, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, at the request of
the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services, the State Treasurer may issue general
obligation bonds under ORS 367.555 to 367.600 in an amount that produces $20,000,000 of net
proceeds for the purpose specified in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an amount estimated
by the State Treasurer to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of bonds issued under  this section must be transferred to the depart-
ment for the purposes of section 5 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 7. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[2]