Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon State  Police shall study the impact that the number of Oregon
State Police troopers has on public safety and report to an appropriate committee  or interim
committee of the Legislative Assembly no later than September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3030