Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 254.470 is amended to read:
254.470. (1) The Secretary of State by rule shall establish requirements  and criteria for the
designation of places of deposit for the ballots cast in an election. The rules shall also specify the
dates and times the places of deposit must be open  and the security requirements for the places of
deposit. At a minimum, the places designated under this section shall be  open on the date of the
election for a period of eight or more hours,  but must be open until at least 8 p.m. At each place
of deposit  designated under this section, the county clerk shall prominently display a sign stating
that the location is an official ballot drop site.
(2)(a) Except  as provided in paragraphs (b) to (e) of this subsection, the county clerk shall mail
by nonforwardable mail an official ballot with a return identification envelope and a  secrecy envel-
ope not sooner than the 20th day before the date of an  election and not later than the 14th day
before the date of the election, to  each active elector of the electoral district as of the 21st day
before the date of the election.
(b) If the county clerk determines that an active elector of the electoral district  as of the 21st
day before the date of the election does not receive daily mail service from the United  States Postal
Service, the county clerk shall mail by  nonforwardable mail an official ballot with a return iden-
tification envelope and a secrecy envelope to the elector not sooner than the 20th  day before the
date of an election and not later than the 18th day before the date of the election.
(c) In the case of ballots to be mailed to addresses outside this state to electors who are not
military or overseas electors, the county clerk may mail the ballots not sooner than  the 29th day
before the date of the election.
(d) If an active elector of  the electoral district requests an absentee ballot because the elector
will be absent from the electoral district during the period of time described in paragraph (a)  of this
subsection, the county clerk may, if the elector’s ballot is available:
(A) Allow the elector to receive the elector’s ballot in person at the office of  the county clerk
not sooner than the 43rd day before the date of the election; or
(B) Mail  by nonforwardable mail an official ballot with a return identification envelope and a
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4581
SB 964
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
secrecy envelope to the elector not sooner than the 43rd day before the date of the election.
(e) The county clerk is not required to mail a  secrecy envelope under this subsection if the
Secretary of State has approved a different procedure under ORS 254.458 that  provides substantially
the same degree of secrecy.
(3) For an election held on the date of a primary election:
(a) The county clerk shall mail the official ballot of a major political party  to each elector who
is registered as being affiliated with the major  political party as of the 21st day before the date of
the election.
(b) The county clerk shall mail the  official ballot of a major political party to an elector not
affiliated with  any political party if the elector has applied for the ballot as provided in this sub-
section and that party has provided under ORS 254.365 for a primary election that  admits electors
not affiliated with any political party.
(c) An elector not affiliated with any political party who wishes to vote  in the primary election
of a major political party shall apply to the county clerk in writing. The application must be com-
pleted, signed and submitted by the elector electronically, in  person or by mail, in a manner deter-
mined by  the secretary by rule and must indicate which major political party ballot the elector
wishes to  receive. Except for electors described in subsection (4) of this section, and subject to ORS
247.203, the application must be received by the county clerk not later than 5 p.m.  of the 21st day
before the date of the election.
(d) If the  primary election ballot includes city, county or nonpartisan offices or measures, the
county clerk shall mail to each elector who is not  eligible to vote for party candidates a ballot
limited to those offices and measures for which the elector is eligible to vote.
(4)(a) For each  elector who updates a voter registration after the deadline in ORS 247.025, the
county clerk shall make the official ballot, the return identification  envelope and the secrecy en-
velope available either by mail or at the county clerk’s  office or at another place designated by the
county clerk. An elector to  whom this subsection applies must request a ballot from the county
clerk.
(b) The county clerk is not  required to make available a secrecy envelope under this subsection
if the Secretary of State has approved a  different procedure under ORS 254.458 that provides sub-
stantially the same degree of secrecy.
(5) The ballot shall contain the following warning:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Any person who, by use of force or other means, unduly influences an elector  to vote in any
particular manner or to refrain from voting is subject to a fine.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(6)(a) Upon receipt of any ballot described in this section, the elector shall mark the ballot,  sign
the return identification envelope supplied with  the ballot and comply with the instructions provided
with the ballot.
(b) The elector may return the marked ballot  to the county clerk by United States mail or by
depositing the ballot at the office of the county clerk, at any place of deposit  designated by the
county clerk or at any location described in ORS 254.472 or 254.474.
(c) The ballot must be returned in the return identification envelope.
(d) Subject to paragraph (e) of this subsection, if a person returns a ballot for  an elector, the
[2]
SB 964
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
person shall deposit the ballot in a manner described in  paragraph (b) of this subsection not later
than two days after receiving the ballot.
(e) If the elector deposits the  ballot at the office of the county clerk, at any place of deposit
designated by the county clerk or at any location described in ORS 254.472 or 254.474, the ballot
must be  received at the office of the county clerk, at the designated place of deposit or at any lo-
cation described in ORS 254.472  or 254.474 not later than the end of the period determined under
subsection (1) of this section on the date of the election. If the elector returns the ballot by mail:
(A) The ballot must be received at the office of the county clerk not later than the end  of the
period determined under subsection (1) of this section on the date of the election; or
(B) The ballot must:
(i) Have a postal indicator showing that the ballot was mailed  not later than the date of the
election; and
(ii) Be received at the office of the county clerk not later than seven calendar days after  the
date of the election.
(f) If a county  clerk receives a marked ballot for an elector who does not reside in the clerk’s
county, the ballot shall be forwarded to the county clerk of the county in  which the elector resides
not later than the eighth day after the election.
(7) The following shall appear on the return identification envelope:
(a) Space for the elector to sign the envelope.
(b) A notice designed by  rule by the Secretary of State, in consultation with the county clerks,
explaining that by  signing the ballot the elector is attesting under penalty of perjury that the ballot
was mailed no later than the date of the election.
(c) A summary of the applicable penalties  for knowingly making a false statement, oath or affi-
davit under the election laws.
(8) If the elector returns the ballot by mail, and a postal indicator is not  present or legible, the
ballot shall be considered to be mailed on the date of the election and may be counted if  the ballot
is received no later than seven calendar days after the election.
(9) An elector may  obtain a replacement ballot if the ballot is destroyed, spoiled, lost or not
received by the elector. Replacement ballots shall be issued and processed as described  in this
section and ORS 254.480. The county clerk shall keep a record of each replacement ballot  provided
under this subsection. Notwithstanding  any deadline for mailing ballots in subsection (2) of this
section, a replacement ballot may be mailed, made available in the office of the county clerk or made
available at one central location in the electoral  district in which the election is conducted. The
county clerk shall designate the central location. A  replacement ballot need not be mailed after the
fifth day before the date of the election.
(10) A ballot shall be counted only if:
(a) It is returned in the return identification envelope;
(b) The envelope is signed by the elector to whom the ballot is issued,  unless a certified state-
ment is submitted under ORS 254.431; and
(c) The signature is verified as provided in subsection (11) of this section.
(11) The county clerk shall verify the signature  of each elector on the return identification en-
velope with the signature on the elector’s registration record,  according to the procedure provided
by rules adopted by the Secretary of State.  Rules adopted by the secretary under this subsection
must limit personnel authorized to verify  signatures to the personnel authorized to count ballots
under ORS 254.476. If the county clerk determines that an elector to whom a  replacement ballot has
[3]
SB 964
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
been issued has voted more  than once, the county clerk shall count only one ballot cast by that
elector.
(12) At 8 p.m. on election day, electors who are at the county clerk’s office, a  place of deposit
designated under subsection (1) of this section or  any location described in ORS 254.472 or 254.474
and who are in line waiting to vote or deposit a voted ballot shall be  considered to have begun the
act of voting.
(13)(a)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the  name of the Secretary
of State may not appear in the secretary’s official capacity on the return identification envelope  or
on any instructions or materials included with the ballot if the  secretary is a candidate in the
election for which the ballot is printed.
(B) This paragraph does not prohibit the name of the Secretary of State from  appearing in the
secretary’s official capacity in the voters’ pamphlet.
(b) The name of the county clerk or  other filing officer may not appear in the official capacity
of the county clerk or filing officer on the return identification envelope or on  any instructions or
materials included with the ballot if the county clerk or filing officer is a candidate in  the election
for which the ballot is printed.
(c) As used in this subsection, “filing officer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 254.165.
(14) As used in this section, “postal indicator” means [ a postmark or other indicator on a mailed
ballot, identified by the Secretary of State by rule, ] an official mark stamped on an envelope over
the postage stamp by the  United States Postal Service  that demonstrates the date or time at
which a ballot was mailed.
[4]