Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Transportation shall study issues related to highways.
The department shall submit a report in the manner provided by  ORS 192.245, and may in-
clude recommendations for legislation, to the Joint Committee on Transportation  no later
than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3537