Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 735.530 is amended to read:
735.530. As used in ORS 735.530 to 735.552:
(1) “Claim” means a  request from a pharmacy or pharmacist to be reimbursed for the cost of
filling or refilling a prescription for a drug or for providing a medical supply or service.
(2) “Enrollee” means an individual who has enrolled for coverage in a health benefit plan for
which a pharmacy benefit manager has contracted with  the insurer to reimburse claims submitted
by pharmacies or pharmacists for the costs of drugs prescribed for the individual.
(3) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(4) “Insurer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 731.106.
(5) “Long term care  pharmacy” means a pharmacy for which the primary business is to serve
a:
(a) Licensed long term care facility, as defined in ORS 442.015;
(b) Licensed residential facility, as defined in ORS 443.400; or
(c) Licensed adult foster home, as defined in ORS 443.705.
(6) “Mail order  pharmacy” means a pharmacy for which the primary business is to receive pre-
scriptions by mail, telephone or electronic transmission  and dispense drugs to patients through the
use of the United States Postal Service, a package delivery service or home delivery.
(7) “Network pharmacy” means a pharmacy that contracts with a pharmacy benefit manager.
(8) “Oregon Average Actual  Acquisition Cost” means the rate established by the Oregon
Health Authority, in accordance with 42 C.F.R.  447.518, that represents the average invoice
amounts for individual drug  products based on surveys conducted by or on behalf of the au-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1264
HB 3013
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
thority of pharmacies that participate in the state medical assistance program.
[(8)] (9) “Pharmacist” has the meaning given that term in ORS 689.005.
[(9)] (10) “Pharmacy” includes:
(a) A pharmacy as defined in ORS 689.005;
(b) A pharmacist as defined in ORS 689.005;
[(b)] (c) A long term care pharmacy; and
[(c)] (d) An entity that provides or oversees administrative services for two or  more pharmacies.
[(10)] (11) “Pharmacy benefit”  means the payment for or reimbursement of an enrollee’s cost for
prescription  drugs.
[(11)(a)] (12)(a) “Pharmacy benefit manager” means a person that contracts  with pharmacies on
behalf of an insurer offering a health  benefit plan, a third party administrator or the Oregon Pre-
scription Drug Program established in ORS 414.312 to:
(A) Process claims for prescription drugs or  medical supplies or provide retail network man-
agement for pharmacies or pharmacists;
(B) Pay pharmacies or pharmacists for prescription drugs or medical supplies; or
(C) Negotiate rebates with manufacturers for drugs paid for or procured as described in this
paragraph.
(b) “Pharmacy benefit manager” does not include a health care service  contractor as defined in
ORS 750.005.
[(12)] (13) “Specialty drug” means a drug that:
(a) Is subject to restricted distribution by the United States Food and Drug Administration; or
(b) Requires special handling, provider coordination or  patient education that cannot be pro-
vided by a retail pharmacy.
[(13)] (14) “Specialty pharmacy” means  a pharmacy capable of meeting the requirements appli-
cable to specialty drugs.
[(14)] (15) “Third party administrator” means a person licensed under ORS 744.702.
[(15)] (16) “340B pharmacy” means a pharmacy that is authorized  to purchase drugs at a dis-
count under 42 U.S.C. 256b.
(17) “Wholesale acquisition cost” has the meaning given that term in 42  U.S.C.
1395w-3a(c)(6)(B).
SECTION 2.
 ORS 735.532 is amended to read:
735.532. [(1) To conduct business in this state, a pharmacy benefit manager must register with  the
Department of Consumer and Business Services and annually renew the registration. ]
[(2) To register under this section, a pharmacy benefit manager must: ]
(1) A  person may not transact business or purport to transact business in this state as
a pharmacy benefit  manager unless the person has a license to transact business as a
pharmacy benefit manager issued by the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(2) To obtain a license under this section, a person must:
(a) Submit an application to the department on a form prescribed by the department by rule.
(b) Pay a [ registration] fee in an amount adopted by the department by rule.
(3) A license to  transact business as a pharmacy benefit manager must be renewed every
12 months.  To renew a [ registration] license  under  this [ section] subsection , a pharmacy benefit
manager must pay a renewal fee in an amount adopted by the department by rule.
(4) The department shall deposit all moneys collected under this section into the  Consumer and
Business Services Fund created in ORS 705.145.
[2]
HB 3013
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) Any fee adopted by the department under this  section must be [ based on ] sufficient to pay
the department’s reasonable costs in administering ORS 735.530 to 735.552.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 735.533 is amended to read:
735.533. (1) In accordance with ORS chapter 183, the Department of  Consumer and Business
Services may deny an application for [ registration] a license to transact business  as a pharmacy
benefit manager or  deny an application for renewal of a [ registration] license to transact business
as a pharmacy benefit manager, and  may suspend or revoke a [ registration] a license to transact
business as a pharmacy benefit manager, if the department finds that an applicant or  [ registrant]
licensee:
(a) Falsified an application for [ registration] a license  or for the  renewal of a [ registration] li-
cense or engaged in any dishonest act in relation to the application;
(b) Engaged in  dishonesty, fraud or gross negligence in the conduct of business as a pharmacy
benefit manager;
(c) Engaged in conduct that resulted  in a conviction of a felony under the laws of any state or
of the United States, to the extent that such conduct may be considered under ORS 670.280;
(d) Was convicted under the laws of any state or of the United  States of any crime of which an
essential element is dishonesty or fraud;
(e) Had a certificate of authority or authority to conduct business as a pharmacy benefit  man-
ager denied, revoked or suspended in another state;
(f) Failed to pay a civil penalty imposed by final order of the department or to  comply with the
terms of suspension set by the department;
(g) Failed to meet the terms of a consent  decree approved by a court of competent jurisdiction
in this state, or a consent order made between the department and the pharmacy benefit manager;
(h) Refused to be examined or to produce accounts, records  or files for examination, including
the refusal by any officer of the applicant or [ registrant] licensee to give information with respect
to the affairs of the pharmacy benefit  manager, or refused to perform any other legal obligation with
respect to an examination by the department; or
(i) Violated  any [ rule or order of the department or any ] provision of the Insurance Code , any
rule adopted by the department pursuant  to the Insurance Code or any order of the depart-
ment.
(2) The department may prescribe by rule a  procedure by which a pharmacy or an entity acting
on behalf of a pharmacy may file a complaint with the department  alleging that a pharmacy benefit
manager has engaged in conduct [ described in this section ] in violation of ORS 735.530 to 735.552 .
The department may restrict the right of a pharmacy or entity to file a complaint only to  the extent
necessary to prevent abuse of the complaint process.
SECTION 4.  ORS 735.534 is amended to read:
735.534. (1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Generally  available for purchase” means a drug is available for purchase in this state
by a pharmacy from a national  or regional wholesaler at the time a claim for reimbursement is
submitted by a network pharmacy.
(B) A drug is not “generally available for purchase” if the drug:
(i) May be dispensed only in a hospital or inpatient care facility;
(ii) Is unavailable due to a shortage of the product or an ingredient;
(iii) Is available to a  pharmacy at a price that is at or below the maximum allowable cost only
if purchased in substantial quantities that are inconsistent with the business needs of a pharmacy;
[3]
HB 3013
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(iv) Is sold at a discount due to a short expiration date on the drug; or
(v) Is the subject of an active or pending recall.
(b) “List” means the list of drugs for which maximum allowable costs have been established.
(c) “Maximum allowable cost” means the maximum amount that a pharmacy benefit  manager
will reimburse a pharmacy for the cost of a drug.
(d) “Multiple source drug” means a therapeutically  equivalent drug that is available from at
least two manufacturers.
(e) “Therapeutically equivalent” has the meaning given that term in ORS 689.515.
(2) A pharmacy benefit manager [ registered ] licensed under ORS 735.532:
(a) May  not place a drug on a list unless there are at least two multiple source drugs, or at least
one generic drug generally available for purchase.
(b) Shall ensure that all drugs on a list are generally available for purchase.
(c) Shall ensure that no drug on a list is obsolete.
(d) Shall make available to each network pharmacy  at the beginning of the term of a contract,
and upon renewal of a contract, the specific authoritative industry sources, other  than proprietary
sources, the pharmacy benefit manager uses to determine the  maximum allowable cost set by the
pharmacy benefit manager.
(e) Shall make a list available to a network pharmacy upon request in a format that:
(A) Is electronic;
(B) Is computer accessible and searchable;
(C) Identifies all drugs for which maximum allowable costs have been established; and
(D) For each drug specifies:
(i) The national drug code; and
(ii) The maximum allowable cost.
(f) Shall update  each list maintained by the pharmacy benefit manager every seven business days
and make the updated lists, including all changes in the price of drugs, available to  network phar-
macies in the format described in paragraph (e) of this subsection.
(g) Shall  ensure that dispensing fees are not included in the calculation of maximum allowable
cost.
(h) May not reimburse a 340B pharmacy differently than any other network  pharmacy based on
its status as a 340B pharmacy.
(i) Shall pay a solo network pharmacy or a network pharmacy chain  with fewer than 100
locations, a professional dispensing fee in  an amount no less than the dispensing fee estab-
lished by the Oregon Health Authority, in accordance with 42 C.F.R. 447.518, and reimburse
the cost of the ingredients of the  drug in an amount that is the lesser of, but in no event less
than the fee-for-service rate paid by the authority in the medical assistance program:
(A) The pharmacy’s usual charge to the public for the drug; and
(B)(i) The Oregon Average Actual Acquisition Cost;
(ii) If the drug is not listed  on the Oregon Average Actual Acquisition Cost, the National
Average Drug Acquisition Cost published by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services;
or
(iii) If the drug is not listed  on the Oregon Average Actual Acquisition Cost or the Na-
tional Average Drug Acquisition Cost, the wholesale acquisition cost.
[(i)] (j)  May not retroactively deny or reduce a claim for  reimbursement of the cost of services
after the claim has been adjudicated by the pharmacy benefit manager unless the:
[4]
HB 3013
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Adjudicated claim was submitted fraudulently;
(B) Pharmacy  benefit manager’s payment on the adjudicated claim was incorrect because the
pharmacy [ or pharmacist ] had already been paid for the services;  or
(C) Services were [ improperly] rendered by the pharmacy [ or pharmacist ] in violation  of state
or federal law[; or ]
[(D) Pharmacy or pharmacist agrees to the denial  or reduction prior to the pharmacy benefit
manager notifying the pharmacy or pharmacist that the claim has been denied or reduced ].
(3) Subsection [ (2)(i)] (2)(j) of this section may not be construed  to limit pharmacy claim audits
under ORS 735.540 to 735.552.
[(4) A pharmacy benefit manager must  establish a process by which a network pharmacy may ap-
peal its reimbursement for a drug subject to maximum allowable cost pricing. A network pharmacy
may appeal a maximum allowable  cost if the reimbursement for the drug is less than the net amount
that the network pharmacy paid to the supplier of the drug. The process must allow a  network phar-
macy a period of no less than 60 days after a claim is reimbursed in which to file the appeal. An appeal
requested under this section must be completed within 30 calendar days  of the pharmacy making the
claim for which appeal has been requested. ]
[(5) A pharmacy benefit manager shall allow  a network pharmacy to submit the documentation in
support of its appeal on paper or electronically and may not: ]
[(a) Refuse to accept an appeal submitted by a person authorized to act on  behalf of the network
pharmacy;]
[(b) Refuse to adjudicate an  appeal for the reason that the appeal is submitted along with other
claims that are denied; or ]
[(c) Impose requirements or establish procedures that have the effect  of unduly obstructing or de-
laying an appeal. ]
[(6) A pharmacy benefit manager must provide as part of the  appeals process established under
subsection (4) of this section: ]
[(a) A telephone number at which a network pharmacy may contact the pharmacy  benefit manager
and speak with an individual who is responsible for processing appeals; ]
[(b) A final response to an appeal of a maximum allowable cost within seven business days; and ]
[(c) If the appeal is denied, the reason for the denial and the national drug code of a drug that
may be  purchased by similarly situated pharmacies at a price that is equal to or less than the maximum
allowable cost.]
(4) A pharmacy may  appeal to the Department of Consumer and Business Services, in the
manner prescribed  by the department, a pharmacy benefit manager’s payment of a claim
that fails to meet the requirements of  this section and may not be required to first appeal
the payment through the pharmacy benefit manager.
[(7)(a)] (5)(a)  If [ an appeal is upheld  under this section ] the department issues an order in
favor of the pharmacy under subsection (4) of this section , the pharmacy benefit manager shall:
(A) Make an adjustment for the pharmacy that requested the  appeal from the date of initial
adjudication forward; and
(B) Allow the pharmacy to reverse the claim  and resubmit an adjusted claim without any addi-
tional charges.
(b) If  the request for an adjustment has come from a critical access pharmacy, as defined by the
Oregon Health Authority by rule for purposes related to  the Oregon Prescription Drug Program, the
adjustment approved under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall  apply only to critical access
[5]
HB 3013
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
pharmacies.
[(8) This section does not apply to the state medical assistance program. ]
[(9)] (6)  The Department of Consumer and Business  Services may adopt rules to carry out the
provisions of this section.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 735.536 is amended to read:
735.536. (1) As used in this section, “out-of-pocket cost” means the amount paid by an  enrollee
under the enrollee’s coverage,  including deductibles, copayments, coinsurance or other expenses as
prescribed by the Department of Consumer and Business Services by rule.
(2) A pharmacy benefit manager [ registered ] licensed under ORS 735.532:
(a) May not require a prescription to  be filled or refilled by a mail order pharmacy as a condi-
tion for reimbursing the cost of the drug.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, may  require a prescription for a
specialty drug to be filled or refilled at  a specialty pharmacy as a condition for the reimbursement
of the cost of a drug.
(c) Shall reimburse the cost of a specialty drug that is filled  or refilled at a network pharmacy
that is a long term care pharmacy.
(d)(A) Shall allow a network pharmacy to  mail, ship or deliver prescription drugs to its patients
as an ancillary service.
(B) Is not required to reimburse a delivery  fee charged by a pharmacy for a delivery described
in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph  unless the fee is specified in the contract between the phar-
macy benefit manager and the pharmacy.
(e) May  not require a patient signature as proof of delivery of a mailed or shipped prescription
drug if the network pharmacy:
(A)(i) Maintains a mailing or shipping log signed by a representative of the pharmacy; or
(ii) Maintains each notification of delivery  provided by the United States Postal Service or a
package delivery service; and
(B) Is responsible for  the cost of mailing, shipping or delivering a replacement for a drug that
was mailed or shipped but not received by the enrollee.
(f) May not penalize a network pharmacy  by  imposing charges or fees, requiring contract
amendments, canceling or terminating contracts or demanding recoupment or otherwise re-
taliate against a network pharmacy  for [ or otherwise directly or indirectly  prevent a network
pharmacy from]:
(A) Informing an enrollee of the difference between  the out-of-pocket cost to the enrollee to
purchase a prescription drug using the  enrollee’s pharmacy benefit and the pharmacy’s usual and
customary charge for the prescription drug[ .];
(B) Filing an appeal;
(C) Filing a complaint against the pharmacy benefit manager with  the Department of
Consumer and Business Services;
(D) Engaging in the legislative process; or
(E) Challenging the pharmacy benefit manager’s practices or agreements.
(g) Charge a fee to a pharmacy for submitting claims or for the adjudication of claims.
(3) The Department of Consumer and Business Services may adopt rules to  carry out the pro-
visions of this section.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 735.540 is amended to read:
735.540. As used in ORS 735.540 to 735.552:
[6]
HB 3013
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(1) “Audit” means an on-site or remote review  of the records of a pharmacy , or a request for
records from a pharmacy for the purpose of an audit,  by or on behalf of an entity.
(2) “Clerical error” means a minor error:
(a) In the keeping, recording or transcribing of records or  documents or in the handling of
electronic or hard copies of correspondence;
(b) That does not result in financial harm to an entity; and
(c) That does not involve dispensing an incorrect dose, amount or type  of medication or dis-
pensing a prescription drug to the wrong person.
(3) “Entity” includes:
(a) A pharmacy benefit manager;
(b) An insurer;
(c) A third party administrator;
(d) A state agency; or
(e) A person that represents or is employed by one of the entities described in this subsection.
(4) “Fraud” means knowingly and willfully executing or attempting to execute  a scheme, in
connection with the  delivery of or payment for health care benefits, items or services, that uses false
or misleading pretenses, representations or promises to  obtain any money or property owned by or
under the custody or control of any person.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 735.542 is amended to read:
735.542. An entity that audits claims or an independent third  party that contracts with an entity
to audit claims:
(1) Must establish, in writing, a procedure for a  pharmacy to appeal the entity’s findings with
respect to a  claim and must provide a pharmacy with a notice regarding the procedure, in writing
or electronically, prior to conducting an audit of the pharmacy’s claims;
(2) Must submit a request to a pharmacy for a record for the purpose of an audit by:
(a) Electronic mail; and
(b) Facsimile or certified mail;
[(2)] (3) May  not conduct an audit of a claim more than [ 24] six months after the date the claim
was adjudicated by the entity;
[(3)] (4) Must give at least 15 days’ advance  written notice of an [ on-site] audit to the pharmacy
or corporate headquarters of the pharmacy  by electronic mail ;
[(4)] (5)  May not conduct an on-site audit during the first five days of  any month without the
pharmacy’s consent;
[(5)] (6)  Must conduct the audit in consultation  with a pharmacist who is licensed by this or
another state if the audit involves clinical or professional judgment;
[(6)] (7)  May not conduct an [ on-site] audit of more than [ 250] 100  unique prescriptions  of a
pharmacy in any [ 12-month period except in cases of alleged  fraud ] six-month period except as
prescribed by the Department of Consumer and Business Services by rule ;
[(7)] (8)  May not  conduct more than one [ on-site] audit of a pharmacy in any [ 12-month] six-
month period;
(9) Must give a pharmacy at least 30 days to respond to an audit;
[(8)] (10) Must audit  each pharmacy under the same standards and parameters that the entity
uses to audit other similarly situated pharmacies;
[(9)] (11) Must pay any outstanding claims of a pharmacy no more than 45 days after the  earlier
of the date all appeals are concluded or the date a final report is issued under ORS 735.550 (3);
[7]
HB 3013
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(10)] (12)  May not include dispensing fees or interest in the amount of any overpayment as-
sessed on a claim unless the overpaid claim was for a prescription that was not filled correctly;
[(11)] (13) May not recoup costs associated with:
(a) Clerical errors; or
(b) Other errors that do not result in financial harm to the entity or a consumer; and
[(12)] (14)  May not charge a pharmacy for a denied or disputed claim until the audit  and the
appeals procedure established under subsection (1) of this section are final.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 743A.062 is amended to read:
743A.062. (1) As used in this section[ ,]:
(a) “Medical assistance program” means the state  program that provides medical assistance as
defined in ORS 414.025.
(b) “340B drug” means a covered drug dispensed by a covered entity, as those  terms are
defined in 42 U.S.C. 256b, that is  subject to the cap on amounts required to be paid in 42
U.S.C. 256b(a)(1).
(2) [ An insurance policy  or ] A policy or certificate of health insurance or other  contract
providing  [ coverage  for ] for the reimbursement of the cost of  a prescription drug to a resident
of this state [ may not]:
(a) May not  exclude coverage of the drug  for a particular indication solely on the grounds that
the indication has not been approved by the United  States Food and Drug Administration if the
Health Evidence Review  Commission established under ORS 414.688 or the Pharmacy and
Therapeutics Committee established under ORS 414.353 determines that  the drug is recognized as
effective for the treatment of that indication:
(A) In publications that the commission or the committee determines to be equivalent to:
(i) The American Hospital Formulary Service drug information;
(ii) “Drug Facts and Comparisons” (Lippincott-Raven Publishers);
(iii) The United States Pharmacopoeia drug information; or
(iv) Other publications that  have been identified by the United States Secretary of Health and
Human Services as authoritative;
(B) In the majority of relevant peer-reviewed medical literature; or
(C) By the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services; [ or]
(b) For an insured who is enrolled in the medical assistance program , may not :
(A) Except as provided in subsection (3) of  this section, require a prescription for the drug to
be filled or refilled at a mail order pharmacy; or
(B) Require a prescription for the drug to be filled or refilled at a pharmacy that is not a local
pharmacy enrolled in the medical assistance program[ .];
(c) Must permit the policyholder, certificate holder or beneficiary, at the time of  issu-
ance, amendment or  renewal, to select a licensed pharmacy or licensed pharmacist for the
dispensing of prescription drugs reimbursed by the policy, certificate or contract;
(d) May not deny a  pharmacy or pharmacist licensed in this state the opportunity to
participate as  a preferred provider or a contracting provider, under the same terms and
conditions applicable to all other preferred or contracting providers if the  pharmacy or
pharmacist agrees to the terms and conditions; or
(e) May not require a claim for reimbursement of a prescription drug to include  a modi-
fier or other indicator that the drug is a 340B drug unless:
(A) The claim is for a direct payment from the medical assistance program; or
[8]
HB 3013
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) It is required by law to prevent a duplicate discount or rebate.
(3) Subsection (2)(b)(A) of this section does not prohibit an insurer from requiring a medical as-
sistance recipient to fill or refill a prescription for a specialty drug at  a mail order pharmacy that
is a specialty pharmacy.
(4) Required coverage of a prescription drug under this  section shall include coverage for med-
ically necessary services associated with the administration of that drug.
(5) Nothing in this section requires coverage for any prescription drug  if the United States Food
and Drug Administration has determined use of the drug to be contraindicated.
(6) Nothing in this section requires coverage for  experimental drugs not approved for any indi-
cation by the United States Food and Drug Administration.
(7) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 646A.694 is amended to read:
646A.694. (1) The Department of Consumer and Business Services  shall provide to the Pre-
scription Drug Affordability Board each calendar quarter a list of  prescription drugs included in
reports submitted to the department under ORS 646A.689 (2) and (6),  a list of drugs included in re-
ports submitted to  the department under ORS 743.025 and a list of insulin drugs marketed in this
state during the previous calendar year. Each calendar year, the board shall identify nine  drugs and
at least one insulin product from the lists provided under this subsection  that the board determines
may create  affordability challenges for health care systems or high out-of-pocket costs for patients
in this state based on criteria adopted by the board by rule, including but not limited to:
(a) Whether the prescription drug has led to health inequities in communities of color;
(b) The number of residents in this state prescribed the prescription drug;
(c) The price for the prescription drug sold in this state;
(d) The estimated average monetary price concession, discount or  rebate the manufacturer pro-
vides to health insurance plans in this state or is expected to  provide to health insurance plans in
this state, expressed as a percentage of the price for the prescription drug under review;
(e) The estimated  total amount of the price concession, discount or rebate the manufacturer
provides to each pharmacy benefit  manager [ registered ] licensed in this state for the prescription
drug under review, expressed as a percentage of the prices;
(f) The estimated price for therapeutic alternatives to the drug that are sold in this state;
(g) The estimated average price concession, discount or  rebate the manufacturer provides or is
expected to provide to  health insurance plans and pharmacy benefit managers in this state for
therapeutic alternatives;
(h) The estimated costs to health insurance plans based on patient use of the drug  consistent
with the  labeling approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and recognized
standard medical practice;
(i) The impact on  patient access to the drug considering standard prescription drug benefit de-
signs in health insurance plans offered in this state;
(j) The relative  financial impacts to health, medical or social services costs as can be quantified
and compared to the costs of existing therapeutic alternatives;
(k) The estimated average patient copayment or other cost-sharing for  the prescription drug in
this state;
(L) Any information a manufacturer chooses to provide; and
(m) Any other factors as determined by the board in rules adopted by the board.
(2) A  drug that is designated by the Secretary of the United States Food and Drug Adminis-
[9]
HB 3013
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tration, under 21 U.S.C. 360bb, as  a drug for a rare disease or condition is not subject to review
under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The board shall accept testimony from patients and caregivers affected by  a condition or
disease that is treated by a prescription drug  under review by the board and from individuals with
scientific or medical training with respect to the disease or condition.
(4)(a) If the  board considers the cost-effectiveness of a prescription drug in criteria adopted by
the board under subsection (1) of this section, the board may not  use quality-adjusted life-years, or
similar formulas  that take into account a patient’s age or severity of illness or disability, to identify
subpopulations for which a prescription drug would be less  cost-effective. For any prescription drug
that extends life, the board’s analysis of cost-effectiveness must weigh the  value of the quality of life
equally for all patients, regardless of the patients’ age or severity of illness or disability.
(b) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Health utility” means a measure of the degree to which having a particular form  of disease
or disability or having particular functional  limitations negatively impacts the quality of life as
compared to a state of perfect health, expressed as a number between zero and one.
(B) “Quality-adjusted life-year” is the product of a health utility multiplied by the extra  months
or years of life that a patient might gain as a result of a treatment.
(5) To  the extent practicable, the board shall access pricing information for prescription drugs
by:
(a) Accessing pricing information collected by the department under ORS 646A.689 and  743.025;
(b) Accessing data reported to the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 442.373;
(c) Entering into a memorandum of  understanding with another state to which manufacturers
already report pricing information; and
(d) Accessing other publicly available pricing information.
(6) The information  used to conduct an affordability review may include any document and re-
search related to the introductory price or price increase of a prescription drug, including life cycle
management, net average price in this state, market competition and context, projected revenue  and
the estimated value or cost-effectiveness of the prescription drug.
(7) The department and the board shall keep  strictly confidential any information collected, used
or relied upon for the review conducted under this section if the information is:
(a) Information submitted to the department by a manufacturer under ORS 646A.689; and
(b) Confidential, proprietary or a trade secret as defined in ORS 192.345.
SECTION 10.
No later than January 1, 2024, the Department of Consumer  and Business
Services shall hire at least one additional full-time employee to assist in the  regulation of
pharmacy benefit managers under ORS 735.530 to 735.552.
SECTION 11. The amendments to ORS 735.534, 735.536, 735.540 and  735.542 by sections 4
to 7 of  this 2023 Act apply to contracts between pharmacies or pharmacists and pharmacy
benefit managers that are entered into, renewed, extended or automatically renewed on  or
after January 1, 2024.
SECTION 12. (1) The amendments to ORS 646A.694, 735.530, 735.532, 735.533, 735.534,
735.536, 735.540, 735.542 and 743A.062 by sections 1 to  9 of this 2023 Act become operative on
January 1, 2024.
(2) The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall  take all steps necessary
before January 1, 2024, to carry out the amendments to  ORS 735.532 and 735.533 by sections
2 and 3 of this 2023 Act on and after January 1, 2024.
[10]
HB 3013
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
SECTION 13.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $_______, which may be expended for
carrying out section 10 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 14. Section 10 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 15. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[11]