Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 5 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Company” means any sole proprietorship, organization, firm, association,  corpo-
ration, utility, partnership, venture,  public franchise, franchisor, franchisee or its wholly
owned subsidiary that exists  for profit-making purposes or otherwise to secure economic
advantage.
(2) “Fund of funds”  means investment funds that function by secondary investment in a
portfolio of other investments, including investment funds.
(3) “Index funds” means pooled investments that are passively managed with  an intent
to match or track the performance of a market index.
(4) “Invest” means to commit funds or other assets to a company. “Invest”  includes
making a loan or other extension  of credit to a company, or owning or controlling a share
or interest in a company or a bond or other debt instrument issued by a company.
(5) “Investment” means the commitment of funds or other assets to a company for  an
interest in the company. “Investment” includes the ownership or control  of a share or in-
terest in a company or of a bond or other debt instrument issued by a company.
(6) “Private prison” means prison facilities  operated by a private company whose services
are contracted for by a public body as defined in ORS  174.109, by a governmental unit of any
other state or by the federal government.
(7) “Scrutinized company” means a company that operates a private prison  or a company
that owns more than one million shares in a company that operates a private prison.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Investment Council and the State Treasurer, in the State
Treasurer’s role as investment officer for the council, shall act  reasonably and in a manner
consistent with fiduciary standards,  including the provisions of ORS 293.721 and 293.726, to
try to ensure that managers who are engaged by the council or  the State Treasurer for the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1816
SB 1005
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
active management of investment funds consisting of the  Public Employees Retirement Fund
referred to  in ORS 238.660, through the purchase and sale of publicly traded equities, are not
investing in publicly traded equities of any scrutinized company.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to investments indirectly made through
index funds, fund of funds or privately placed investments.
SECTION 3. (1) Consistent with fiduciary standards, including the provisions of ORS
293.721 and 293.726, the State Treasurer shall adopt a statement of policy that describes a
process of engagement with managers who:
(a) Are engaged by the Oregon Investment Council or the State Treasurer  for the active
management of  investment funds consisting of the Public Employees Retirement Fund re-
ferred to in ORS 238.660 through the purchase and sale of publicly traded equities; and
(b) Have invested such funds in scrutinized companies.
(2) The policy  required under subsection (1) of this section must require the State
Treasurer, to the extent practicable, to identify  and send a written notice to the managers
described in subsection (1) of this section. The  notice shall encourage the managers, con-
sistent with fiduciary standards, including the provisions of ORS 293.721 and 293.726, to:
(a) Notify scrutinized companies with which  the managers have made investments of the
State Treasurer’s policy adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) Not later than 90  days after giving the notice, end investments in the scrutinized
companies and avoid future investments in the scrutinized companies, as long as the man-
agers may do so  without monetary loss through reasonable, prudent and productive invest-
ments in companies generating returns that  are comparable to the returns generated by the
scrutinized companies.
(3) A notice provided by a  manager to a scrutinized company under subsection (2) of this
section shall advise the scrutinized company  that the company may comment in writing to
the State Treasurer to dispute the identification of the company as a scrutinized company.
(4) If the State Treasurer determines under subsection (3) of this section  that a company
is not a scrutinized company, the State Treasurer shall  notify the relevant manager of the
State Treasurer’s determination.
(5) The  State Treasurer shall advise the Oregon Investment Council of a notice the State
Treasurer provides under subsection (2) of this section if the manager to whom the notice
was given has not informed the State Treasurer within 180 days after the date the notice
was given that the manager has ended the manager’s investment in  scrutinized companies
or plans to divest from investment in scrutinized companies.
SECTION 4.
On or before  March 15 of each year, the State Treasurer shall make avail-
able on the State Treasurer’s website  a summary of actions taken during the previous year
in accordance with sections 1 to 5 of this 2017 Act. The summary shall  include a list of
identified scrutinized companies.
SECTION 5. Sections 3 (2) to (5) and 4 of this 2017 Act apply only  if the Legislative As-
sembly appropriates sufficient moneys to the State Treasurer,  other than moneys described
by ORS 293.718 or moneys in the Public Employees Retirement Fund,  to administer sections
3 (2) to (5) and 4 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 6. The State Treasurer shall first  make available on the State Treasurer’s
website the information required under section 4 of this 2017 Act not  later than September
1, 2018.
[2]
SB 1005
1
2
3
4
5
SECTION 7. Sections 1 to 5 of this 2017 Act become operative January 1, 2018.
SECTION 8. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]