Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 153.111 is amended to read:
153.111. (1) Upon entry of a conviction for a traffic offense, the court shall forward to the  De-
partment of Transportation an abstract of conviction in the manner required  by ORS 810.375, and
a copy of the judgment, if required, under the provisions of ORS 810.375.
(2) Upon entry of a conviction for violation of any provision of the wildlife  laws or commercial
fishing laws, or any rule promulgated pursuant  to those laws, the court that enters the judgment
of conviction shall forward to the Department of State Police an abstract of conviction.
(3) Upon entry of  a conviction for violation of compulsory school attendance require-
ments under ORS 339.095,  the court shall forward to the Department of Education an ab-
stract of conviction.
[(3)] (4) Upon entry of a conviction for violation of a weights and measures law subject  to pen-
alty under ORS 618.991, the court shall forward to the  State Department of Agriculture an abstract
of conviction.
[(4)] (5) Upon entry of a conviction of a boating offense, as defined in ORS  830.005, the court
shall forward to the State Marine Board an abstract of conviction.
[(5)] (6) A court may destroy any abstract not required to be  forwarded to an agency under the
provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.  ORS 153.657 is amended to read:
153.657. (1) If a court enters a  judgment of conviction for violation of ORS 339.020 or  the re-
quirements of ORS 339.035, amounts collected under the judgment are payable as follows:
(a) One-half of the amount is payable to the school district or the education service  district that
employs the person who issued the citation under ORS 339.095; and
(b) One-half of the amount is payable as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) If a judgment of conviction that is subject to subsection (1)  of this section is entered in
circuit court, the amount specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be paid to the state.
(b) If a judgment of conviction that is subject to subsection (1) of this section is entered in  jus-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2527
HB 2052
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tice court, the amount specified in subsection (1)(b) of this  section shall be paid to the county that
established the court.
(c) If a judgment of conviction that is subject to subsection (1) of this section is entered in  mu-
nicipal court, the amount specified in subsection (1)(b) of  this section shall be paid to the city that
established the court.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 339.065 is amended to read:
339.065. (1)  In estimating regular attendance for purposes of the compulsory attendance pro-
visions of ORS 339.005 to 339.030, 339.040 to 339.125, 339.137 , [ and] 339.420 and 339.990, the princi-
pal or teacher shall consider all unexcused absences. Eight unexcused one-half day absences  in any
four-week period during which the school is in session shall be considered irregular attendance.
(2)(a) An absence may be excused by a principal or teacher if the absence is caused by:
(A) The pupil’s sickness, including the mental or behavioral health of the pupil;
(B) The sickness of some member of the pupil’s family; or
(C) An emergency.
(b) In addition to the reasons identified in paragraph (a) of this subsection, a  principal or
teacher:
(A) Shall excuse not more than seven  days of absences during the school year if the pupil is a
dependent of a member of the Armed Forces of the United States who is on active duty or who is
called into active duty. For the purpose of this subparagraph, “Armed Forces of the United  States”
includes:
(i) The Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps and Coast Guard of the United States;
(ii) Reserve components of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps and Coast Guard of the
United States; and
(iii) The National Guard of the United States and the Oregon National Guard.
(B) May excuse absences for other reasons  when satisfactory arrangements are made in advance
of the absence.
(3)(a) Any pupil may be excused from attendance by the district  school board for a period not
to exceed five days in a term of three months or not to exceed 10 days  in any term of at least six
months. Any such excuse shall be in writing directed  to the principal of the school that the pupil
attends.
(b) When calculating the number  of excused absences under this subsection, any absences ex-
cused under subsection (2)(b)(A) of this section shall not be counted.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 339.095 is amended to read:
339.095. (1) In addition to any other persons permitted  to enforce violations, the school district
superintendent or education service district superintendent, or  any employee specifically designated
by either superintendent,  may issue citations for violations established under ORS 339.990 in the
manner provided by ORS chapter 153.
(2) Prior to issuing the  citation described in subsection (3) of this section to the parent or
guardian of a student not regularly attending full-time school, a  school district superintendent or
education service district superintendent shall:
(a) Provide a parent or guardian of the student and the student with written notification that:
(A) States that the student is required to attend regularly a full-time school;
(B) Explains that the failure  to send the student and maintain the student in regular
attendance is a Class C violation;
[(B)] (C) States that the superintendent may issue a citation;
[2]
HB 2052
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
[(C)] (D) Requires the parent or guardian of the student and the  student to attend a conference
with a designated official;
(E) Requires the parent or guardian of the student and the  student to attend a meeting
with representatives of the school and the community to assist the student with attendance
issues;
[(D)] (F) States that the parent or guardian has the right to request:
(i) For a student who  does not have an individualized education program, an evaluation to de-
termine if the student should have an individualized education program; or
(ii) For a student who has an individualized  education program, a review of the individualized
education program; and
[(E)] (G) Is written in the native language of the parent or guardian of the student.
(b) Schedule the conference and meeting described in paragraph [ (a)(C)] (a)(D) and (E) of this
subsection. A conference  and meeting  may not be scheduled until after any  evaluations or reviews
described in paragraph [ (a)(D)] (a)(F) of this subsection have been completed.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 1.525 or any  provision of ORS chapter 153, the State Board of Educa-
tion by rule shall establish the citation form to be used by superintendents  in citing violations es-
tablished under ORS 339.990. Notwithstanding ORS 153.045, each of the  parts of the citation shall
contain the information required by the state board.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 339.990 is amended to read:
339.990. Violation of ORS 339.020 or the requirements of ORS 339.035 is a Class C violation.
SECTION 6. The amendments to ORS 153.111, 153.657, 339.065, 339.095 and  339.990 by
sections 1 to 5 of this 2025 Act apply to school absences occurring on or after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 7. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[3]