Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 419B.343 is amended to read:
419B.343. (1)  To ensure effective planning for wards, the Department of Human Services shall
take into consideration recommendations and information provided by  the committing court before
placement in any facility. The department shall ensure that the case planning in any case:
(a) For the reunification of the  family bears a rational relationship to the jurisdictional findings
that brought the ward within the court’s jurisdiction under ORS 419B.100;
(b) Incorporates the perspective of the ward and the family and, whenever possible, allows the
family to assist in designing its own service  programs, based on an assessment of the family’s needs
and the family’s solutions and resources for change; and
(c) Is integrated with other agencies in cooperation with the caseworkers.
(2) Except in cases when the  plan is something other than to reunify the family, the department
shall include in the case plan:
(a) Appropriate services to allow  the parent the opportunity to adjust the parent’s circum-
stances, conduct or conditions to  make it possible for the ward to safely return home within a rea-
sonable time; and
(b) A concurrent  permanent plan to be implemented if the parent is unable or unwilling to adjust
the parent’s circumstances, conduct or conditions  in such a way as to make it possible for the ward
to safely return home within a reasonable time.
(3) For [ a] every ward 14 years of age or older, the department shall ensure that:
(a) Case planning for the ward addresses the ward’s needs and goals for a transition  to suc-
cessful adulthood, including needs and goals related to housing, physical  and mental health, educa-
tion, employment, community connections and supportive relationships; [ and]
(b) Case planning for the ward includes annual  in-person meetings with the ward during
which the department informs the ward that the ward  is eligible for transition services and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3099
SB 745
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
provides the ward with assistance in applying for transition services, if applicable; and
[(b)] (c)  The ward’s case plan includes a document that describes the rights of the ward  as
specified in ORS 418.201 and a signed acknowledgment by the ward  that the ward has been provided
with a  copy of the document and that rights contained in the document have been explained to the
ward in an age-appropriate manner.
(4) The case plan for a ward in substitute care must include the  health and education records
of the ward, including the most recent information available regarding:
(a) The names and addresses of the ward’s health and education providers;
(b) The grade level of the ward’s academic performance;
(c) The ward’s school record;
(d) Whether the ward’s placement takes into  account proximity to the school in which the ward
is enrolled at the time of placement;
(e) The ward’s immunizations;
(f) Any known medical problems of the ward;
(g) The ward’s medications; and
(h) Any other relevant health and education information concerning  the ward that the depart-
ment determines is appropriate to include in the records.
SECTION 2.
No later than  September 15 of each year, the Department of Human Services
shall submit  a report to the appropriate committee or interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly with the prior fiscal year’s data regarding the following:
(1) The number of wards who were eligible for transition services under ORS 419B.343;
(2) The number of wards who applied for transition services;
(3) The number of wards who were eligible for transition services but did not apply; and
(4) The department’s efforts to conduct  outreach to wards to inform them of the avail-
ability and purpose of transition services.
SECTION 3.
There is appropriated  to the Department of Human Services, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $8,500,000 for the
purpose of providing transition services to wards, as defined in ORS 419A.004.
SECTION 4. The initial report described in section  2 of this 2019 Act is due no later than
September 15, 2020.
[2]