Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Water Resources Department shall study water  management in the
Harney Basin. The department shall submit a report on  the study in the manner provided
by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation,  to the committees or in-
terim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to natural resources  no later than
September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3551