Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 308.205 is amended to read:
308.205. (1) Real market value  of all property, real and personal, means the amount in cash that
could reasonably be expected to be paid by an  informed buyer to an informed seller, each acting
without compulsion in an arm’s-length transaction occurring as  of the assessment date for the tax
year.
(2) Real market value in all cases shall be determined by methods and procedures  in accordance
with rules adopted by the Department of Revenue and in accordance with the following:
(a) The amount a typical seller  would accept or the amount a typical buyer would offer that
could reasonably be expected by a seller of property.
(b) An amount in cash shall be considered the equivalent of a financing method that  is typical
for a property.
(c) If the property has no immediate market value, its real market value is the amount  of money
that would justly compensate the owner for loss of the property.
(d) If the property is subject to governmental restriction as to use on the assessment date  under
applicable law or regulation, real market value shall not be based  upon sales that reflect for the
property a value  that the property would have if the use of the property were not subject to the
restriction unless adjustments in value are made reflecting the effect of the restrictions.
(3) For purposes of  ad valorem property taxation, for any property tax year the real
market value of property classified as commercial or industrial under rules  adopted by the
Department of Revenue pursuant to ORS 308.215 shall be the average of the  real market
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1418
HB 2167
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
value, as defined in this section, of the  property for the current assessment year and the two
immediately preceding assessment years.
SECTION 2. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law,  the rate of ad valorem
property taxes imposed by any  taxing district on property that is classified as commercial
or industrial under rules adopted by the Department  of Revenue pursuant to ORS 308.215
shall be $  per thousand dollars of real market value.  The limits on the collection of
property taxes under Article XI, section 11b, of the Oregon Constitution, do not apply to
taxes assessed in accordance with this subsection.
(2)(a) Of the taxes imposed and collected  at the rate set under subsection (1) of this
section for property described in subsection (1) of this section, the amount collected  on the
first $5:
(A) Shall be distributed to school districts, education service districts and  community
college districts within which the property is located; and
(B) May not  be reduced by any exemption that is not in effect on or before June 30, 2021.
(b) Any exemption that takes effect on or after July 1, 2021, may be granted with respect
to property described in subsection (1) of this section on the  rate of tax that is greater than
the $5 dedicated to school districts, education  service districts or community college dis-
tricts, which shall receive the same distributions as provided in paragraph (a)(A) of  this
subsection without reduction for the exemption.
(3) This section does not affect any laws relating to local  option taxes as applied to
property described in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) Taxes imposed on property described in  subsection (1) of this section may not receive
the discount for payment of taxes granted under ORS 311.505.
SECTION 3.
(1) This section applies to property described in section 2 (1) of this 2019 Act
if, for the assessment year beginning on January  1, 2021, the ratio of the maximum assessed
value of the property over  the real market value of the property is less than or equal to 90
percent.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law:
(a) For the property tax year beginning on July 1, 2021, the real market value of  the
property shall be the maximum assessed value of  the property plus 20 percent of the differ-
ence between the maximum assessed value and the real market value of the property.
(b) For the property tax year beginning on July 1, 2022, the real market value of  the
property shall be the maximum assessed value of  the property plus 40 percent of the differ-
ence between the maximum assessed value and the real market value of the property.
(c) For the property tax year beginning on July 1, 2023, the real market value of the
property shall be the maximum assessed value of  the property plus 60 percent of the differ-
ence between the maximum assessed value and the real market value of the property.
(d) For the property tax year beginning on July 1, 2024, the real market value of  the
property shall be the maximum assessed value of  the property plus 80 percent of the differ-
ence between the maximum assessed value and the real market value of the property.
(e) For property tax years beginning on or after July  1, 2025, the real market value of the
property shall be determined under ORS 308.205.
SECTION 4.
Section 3 of this 2019 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
SECTION 5.  ORS 311.505 is amended to read:
311.505. (1) Except as provided in subsection (6) of  this section, the first one-third of all taxes
[2]
HB 2167
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
and other charges due from the taxpayer or property, levied or imposed and charged on the latest
tax roll, shall be paid on or before November 15, the second one-third on or before February  15, and
the remaining one-third on or before May 15 next following.
(2) Interest shall be charged and collected on any taxes on property, other charges,  and on any
additional taxes or penalty imposed for disqualification of property for  special assessment or ex-
emption, or installment thereof not  paid when due, at the rate of one and one-third percent per
month, or fraction of a month until paid.
(3) Except as provided in section 2 of this 2019 Act,  discounts shall be allowed on  partial or
full payments of such taxes, made on or before November 15 as follows:
(a) Two percent on two-thirds of such taxes so paid.
(b) Three percent where all of such taxes are so paid.
(4) For purposes of this section, “taxes” includes all  taxes on property as defined in ORS 310.140
and certified to the assessor under ORS 310.060 except taxes assessed on any other property which
have by any means become a lien against the property for which the payment was made.
(5) All interest collected and all discounts  allowed shall be prorated to the several municipal
corporations, taxing districts and governmental agencies sharing in the taxes or assessments.
(6) If the total property tax is less than $40, no installment payment of taxes shall be allowed.
SECTION 6.
The Department of Revenue shall provide  each county with a software pro-
gram, or technical assistance, to help  the county assessors and tax collectors with the extra
complexity of assessing and collecting  ad valorem property taxes due to the provisions of
sections 2 and 3 of this 2019 Act and the amendments  to ORS 308.205 and 311.505 by sections
1 and 5 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 7.  Section 6 of this 2019 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
SECTION 8. There is appropriated to the Department of Revenue,  for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2019, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $ , to be deposited in the
County Assessment  Function Funding Assistance Account created under ORS 294.184, for the
purpose of helping county assessors and tax  collectors with the extra complexity of assessing
and collecting ad valorem property taxes due to  the provisions of sections 2 and 3 of this 2019
Act and the amendments to ORS 308.205 and 311.505 by sections  1 and 5 of this 2019 Act. This
appropriation is available continuously until expended for the purpose specified in this sec-
tion.
SECTION 9.
 This 2019 Act does not  become operative unless the amendment to the
Oregon Constitution proposed by House Joint Resolution 4 (2019) is approved by the  people
at the regular general election held in November 2020. This 2019 Act becomes operative on
the effective date of that amendment.
SECTION 10.
This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]