Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 8.760 is amended to read:
8.760. The county court or board  of county commissioners may empower the district attorney
to appoint one or more deputy district attorneys [ whose compensation shall be  fixed by the county
court or board of county commissioners and paid ] who shall be paid monthly  salaries as adopted
in the salary plan provided for in  ORS 240.240 (2)  out of the county funds in the same manner
as county officers are paid. The state shall reimburse  a county for the salary of one deputy
district attorney and half of the salary of the other deputy district  attorneys appointed by
the district attorney of the county.
SECTION 2. (1) The amendments to  ORS 8.760 by section 1 of this 2025 Act become op-
erative on January 1, 2026.
(2) A county and the state may take any  action before the operative date specified in
subsection (1) of this section to  enable the county or the state to exercise, on and after the
effective date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and  pow-
ers conferred on the state  and the county by the amendments to ORS 8.760 by section 1 of
this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1950