Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 471.473 is amended to read:
471.473. (1) A person appointed to operate a  store established by the Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission  under ORS 471.750 qualifies for the payment of business loss compensation
under this section if:
(a) The system for  selling containers of distilled liquor at retail in this state changes after the
person assumes operation of the store; and
(b) The system change results from a law that :
(A) Prohibits the commission from purchasing or selling distilled liquor ; or
(B) Otherwise changes the system in a manner that causes a reduction in sales of  dis-
tilled liquor by a person described in this subsection .
(2)(a) The purpose of business loss compensation is to offset the actual  or presumed sales re-
duction and actual or perceived devaluation of a  liquor store business following a system change
described in subsection (1) of this section. Except as provided in paragraph (b) of  this sub-
section, the commission shall pay a person qualifying under this section business loss compensation
[equal to four percent of the average annual gross distilled liquor sales made by the store during  the
five years that preceded  the system change, whether or not the person was the store operator during
the entire five-year period ] according to the formula determined by the commission by rule .
(b) If the store has operated  less than five years prior to the system change, the commission
shall pay compensation equal to [ four] 10 percent  of the average annual gross distilled liquor sales
made by the store prior to the system change.
(3)(a) The commission shall pay any business loss compensation due under  this section from the
suspense account described in ORS 471.805. Except as  otherwise required by federal or state law
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1081
HB 2123
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
or by contract, the commission shall give the payment of  business loss compensation priority over
the payment of other debts from the suspense account.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 279A.250 to 279A.290 or the revolving fund balance  limit established
in ORS 471.805[ ,]:
(A) If a change in the system for selling containers of  distilled liquor at retail in this state re-
sults in business loss compensation being payable under this  section, and the commission declares
within five years  after the system change that a warehouse established by the commission under
ORS 471.750 or the  inventory of the commission is surplus property, the net proceeds from sale of
the warehouse or inventory remaining after deduction of sales  costs shall be deposited to the sus-
pense account described in ORS 471.805.
(B) If a change in the  system for selling containers of distilled liquor at retail in this
state results in business loss  compensation being payable under this section but does not
result in the commission making the declaration  described in this subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph, an  amount of moneys equivalent to 10 percent of the average annual gross dis-
tilled liquor sales during the five years that preceded  the system change in this state shall
be deposited to the suspense account described in ORS 471.805.
(c) All moneys deposited under [ this] paragraph (b) of this subsection  shall be kept in a sub-
account within the suspense account that indicates the source  of the moneys. Notwithstanding ORS
471.805, moneys deposited to the suspense account under [ this] paragraph (b) of this subsection
may not be transferred to the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission  Account if any business loss
compensation is owed and remains unpaid. [ This] Paragraph (b) of this subsection  does not restrict
the source for paying business loss compensation from the suspense  account or alter the priority
of business loss compensation payment established in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(4) If a person that receives business loss compensation under this section brings  any action
against the commission for  damages resulting from a change in the system for selling containers of
distilled liquor at retail in this state, the business loss compensation received by  the person as a
result of that system change  shall be an offset against any damages awarded the person in the
action. This subsection does not create any new cause of action.
(5) Business loss compensation received by a person  under this section does not affect the
claiming of any  tax deduction by the person for depreciation of equipment, fixtures or other property
improvements, but is ordinary business income of the person, taxable as provided by law.
SECTION 2.
The amendments  to ORS 471.473 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to
changes in the system  for selling containers of distilled liquor at retail in this state that
occur on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]