Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Licensee” means an  individual who holds an authorization from a professional li-
censing board to provide an occupational or professional service.
(b) “Occupational or professional service” has the meaning given that term  in ORS
670.400.
(c) “Professional licensing board” has the meaning given that term in ORS 670.400.
(2) An individual who is not lawfully present  in the United States is eligible for an au-
thorization to provide an occupational or professional service.  A professional licensing board
may not deny issuance of  an authorization issued by the professional licensing board to an
individual solely on the basis of the individual’s immigration or citizenship status.
(3) A professional licensing board may  not disclose the Social Security number, federal
individual taxpayer identification number or other federally issued identification number  of
an applicant for  an authorization issued by the professional licensing board or a licensee of
professional licensing board to a person other  than an employee of the professional licensing
board for any purpose except:
(a) Tax purposes;
(b) Authorization purposes; or
(c) Enforcement of an order for payment of child support.
(4) A Social Security number, federal individual taxpayer identification number or other
federally issued identification number provided to a professional licensing board by an appli-
cant for an authorization issued by the professional licensing board or a licensee of the pro-
fessional licensing board is confidential and exempt from public disclosure under ORS 192.311
to 192.478.
SECTION 2.
An individual who is not lawfully present in the United States is  eligible for
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2977
HB 3830
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
a state or local  public benefit, as defined in 8 U.S.C. 1621(c), and may not be denied a state
or local public benefit based solely on the individual’s immigration or citizenship status.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 25.785 is amended to read:
25.785. (1) Subject to ORS 670.406 and section 1 of this 2025 Act,  any state agency, board or
commission that is authorized to issue an occupational,  professional, recreational or driver license,
certificate, permit or registration subject to suspension under ORS 25.750 to 25.783 shall require that
an individual’s Social Security number be recorded on  an application for, or form for renewal of, a
license, certificate, permit or registration and to the maximum extent  feasible shall include the So-
cial Security number in automated databases containing information about the individual.
(2) A state agency, board or commission described in subsection (1) of this section may  accept
a written statement from an individual  who has not been issued a Social Security number by the
United States Social Security Administration to fulfill the requirement in subsection  (1) of this sec-
tion.
(3) An  individual may not submit to a state agency, board or commission a written statement
described in subsection (2) of this section knowing the statement to be false.
[2]