Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 803.370 is amended to read:
803.370. This section establishes requirements  for an application for vehicle registration in this
state. If an applicant fails to comply with requirements  under this section, the Department of
Transportation may refuse to register or reregister a vehicle until the applicant complies with the
requirements. An application shall contain all of the following:
(1) The true name and, except as provided for corrections officers in ORS 802.253,  eligible em-
ployees in ORS 802.250 or Address Confidentiality Program  participants in ORS 192.846, the actual
residence or business address of the  owner. The department may provide by rule for acceptance of
something other than an actual residence or business  address if the department determines that the
applicant does not have an actual address.
(2) A description of the vehicle, including  the name of the make and the vehicle identification
number.
(3) An odometer disclosure in a form determined  by the department by rule pursuant to ORS
803.120, if a disclosure is otherwise required.
(4) Any other information required by the department.
(5) If the application is for registration or  reregistration of a vehicle that is subject to the fed-
eral heavy vehicle  use tax, proof that the federal use tax has been paid. The department shall adopt
rules to determine proof that will be acceptable for purposes of this subsection.
(6) A statement:
(a) That the applicant is domiciled in  this state as described in ORS 803.355 if the applicant is
required by ORS  803.360 to be domiciled in this state in order to register a vehicle in the state; and
(b) That so long as the vehicle remains registered  to the applicant in this state, the applicant
will remain domiciled in this state if required to do so in order to register the vehicle.
(7) A statement:
(a) That the vehicle qualifies under ORS 803.360 (2) for registration in  this state, if the owner
is not domiciled in this state and is  not required by ORS 803.200, or any other provision of law, to
register the vehicle in this state; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3751
HB 2739
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
(b) That so long as the vehicle remains registered to the applicant under the  provisions of ORS
803.360 (2), the owner and the vehicle will meet the qualifications of this subsection.
(8) A  statement upon initial registration that the applicant is in compliance with financial re-
sponsibility requirements for the vehicle  and will remain in compliance until the vehicle is trans-
ferred. Exemptions from this subsection are established in ORS 806.020.
(9) If the application  is for registration or renewal of registration of a motor vehicle by a motor
carrier, the information on drug and alcohol testing programs required by ORS 825.410.
(10) An option to include information on the registration card that the  registered owner, or a
person who may operate the vehicle, is deaf or hard of hearing.
(11) An option to include information on the registration  card that the registered owner,
or a person who may operate the vehicle, has limited English language proficiency.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 803.500 is amended to read:
803.500. The Department of Transportation shall furnish for each  vehicle and camper registered
by the department, a registration card that shows all of the following information:
(1) The name of the registered owner.
(2) The make.
(3) The year model.
(4) The vehicle identification number as denoted by the title issued for the vehicle or camper.
(5) The mileage of the vehicle as reported to the department  at the time the most recent title
transfer was reported to the department, or the mileage reported to the department at the  time the
vehicle was initially titled in Oregon, whichever occurred last.
(6) The  word “totaled” if the vehicle has been reported to the department as a totaled vehicle
under the provisions of  ORS 819.012 or 819.014, unless the reason for the report was theft and the
vehicle has been recovered.
(7) Upon request of the registered owner, the fact  that the registered owner, or a person who
may operate the vehicle, is deaf or hard of hearing.
(8) Upon request of the  registered owner, the fact that the registered owner, or a person
who may operate the vehicle, has limited English language proficiency.
[(8)] (9) Any other information required by the department.
[(9)] (10) Notwithstanding subsection [ (8)] (9) of this section, after receiving the registration card
from the department,  the registered owner may black out or otherwise obscure the residence ad-
dress, business address, mailing address or vehicle address shown on the registration card.  No other
information on the registration card may be blacked out or otherwise obscured.
[2]