Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Forestry Department shall:
(1) Establish the Western Oregon Regional Carbon Sink as a geographical area;
(2) In addition to replanting required  by State Board of Forestry standards adopted pur-
suant to ORS 527.745, require  planting of one billion shrubs or trees within the Western
Oregon Regional Carbon Sink identified pursuant to subsection (1) of this section;
(3) Authorize public-private  partnerships to advise the department on locations for
planting, harvest sustainability and other aspects of preparing for longer harvest cycles;
(4) Designate at least 25 percent of tree plantings required under subsection (2) of this
section for harvest at approximately 80 years of growth; and
(5) Designate at least 25 percent of tree plantings required under subsection (2) of this
section for strengthening forest resilience and meeting salmon habitat goals.
SECTION 2.
The State Forestry Department shall take the actions required under section
1 (2) of this 2025 Act on or before January 1, 2035.
SECTION 3. (1) The Task Force on the Western  Oregon Regional Carbon Sink is estab-
lished.
(2) The task force consists of 11 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint:
(A) One member from among members of the Senate.
(B) Two members who are forestry professionals.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint:
(A) One member from among members of the House of Representatives.
(B) Two members who are environmental advocates.
(c) The Governor shall appoint five persons who are knowledgeable about Oregon  forests.
(3) The task force shall prepare a report on the  establishment of a Western Oregon Re-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3370
HB 3263
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
gional Carbon Sink.
(4) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for  the
transaction of business.
(5) Official action by  the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to an interim committee  of the Legislative
Assembly related to natural resources no later than September 15, 2026.
(11) The State Forestry Department shall provide staff support to the task force.
(12) Members of  the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(13) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(14) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 4.
Section 3 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 5. (1) The Western Oregon Regional Carbon Sink Advisory Board is established.
(2) The State Forestry Department shall  appoint members of the board. Members of the
board shall consist of forestry professionals, environmental advocates and other  persons
knowledgeable about Oregon forests.
(3) The board shall advise the department on management of the Western Oregon  Re-
gional Carbon Sink.
SECTION 6. Section 5 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
SECTION 7. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]