Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the  Water Resources Department, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $44,000,000 for the purpose of issuing grants to the City of Newport
for land acquisition, design services,  construction or other capital costs relating to the con-
struction of a dam to supersede the dams commonly known as Big Creek  Dam Number 1 and
Big Creek Dam Number 2. This appropriation is available continuously until  expended for the
purpose specified in this section.
SECTION 2.
Not later than the 60th day after completion of the project described in
section 1 of this  2019 Act, after consultation with the governing body for the City of Newport,
the Water Resources Director shall certify  the completion of the project and the amount of
the unobligated balance of the appropriation made by  section 1 of this 2019 Act. Upon certi-
fication, the unobligated balance reverts to the General Fund.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3275