Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of  this 2026 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
475C.600 to 475C.648.
SECTION 2. (1) In addition to the rules adopted under ORS  475C.604, the Oregon Liquor
and Cannabis Commission shall adopt rules to require that  marijuana items and inhalant
delivery systems that contain industrial  hemp-derived vapor items bear a label with the in-
formation described in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The label required under subsection  (1) of this section must include the following in-
formation printed in at least a 12-point font size:
(a) A recommendation that new consumers begin with lower doses of cannabinoids;
(b) That care should be taken for the delayed  onset of cannabinoid edibles, including a
warning that it can take up to four hours to  feel the full effects from consuming cannabinoid
edibles and that consuming more within the four hours may  result in more adverse effects
that may require medical attention;
(c) The dangers of purchasing illegal  marijuana items or inhalant delivery systems that
contain industrial hemp-derived vapor items, including the increased risk that such products
are untested  and may contain unsafe additives or harmful contaminants such as mold or
pesticides;
(d) Warnings against  consuming or inhaling cannabinoids while pregnant or breastfeeding
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 289
SB 1548
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and that exposure to  cannabis may harm the health of the fetus, including by causing low
birth weight;
(e) The potential for cannabis use to contribute to mental  health problems, including
psychotic disorders such  as schizophrenia, and increased suicide attempts and thoughts of
suicide, and that these risks are greatest for frequent users  and when using marijuana items
or inhalant delivery  systems containing industrial hemp-derived vapor items with higher
levels of tetrahydrocannabinol;
(f) The link between higher tetrahydrocannabinol  content and the likelihood of experi-
encing adverse effects and  impairment, including severe anxiety and the disruption of mem-
ory and concentration;
(g) Cautions that driving while under the influence of cannabinoids is unlawful and that
the use of cannabinoids when driving increases the risk of motor vehicle crashes;
(h) Evidence that starting cannabis use at a young age, or using  cannabis frequently,
may lead to problem use and may harm the developing brain; and
(i) That inhaling cannabis may make breathing problems worse  and that prolonged use
of cannabis inhalants may cause recurrent and severe nausea and vomiting.
(3) If the package of a marijuana item or inhalant delivery  system that contains an in-
dustrial hemp-derived vapor item is too small to bear a label described in subsection (2) of
this section, the marijuana item or inhalant delivery system that contains an industrial
hemp-derived vapor item must include a pamphlet or insert that bears the information de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section. A marijuana retailer  licensed under ORS 475C.097
shall ensure that each consumer who purchases a  marijuana item or inhalant delivery sys-
tem that contains industrial  hemp-derived cannabinoids described in this subsection receives
the pamphlet or insert described in this subsection.
(4) Once every five years, the commission shall, in consultation with the  Oregon Health
Authority, evaluate the  requirements adopted by the commission by rule under this section
and may as necessary revise the requirements to ensure the requirements reflect the  cur-
rent state of the evolving science on the health effects of cannabis and on effective commu-
nication of health warnings.
(5) The commission may adopt rules as necessary to carry out this section.
SECTION 3.
Usable marijuana, including usable marijuana that is prerolled, may not in-
clude by infusion or other method cannabinoids in addition to  those cannabinoids naturally
occurring in the usable marijuana.
SECTION 4.  ORS 475C.017 is amended to read:
475C.017. (1) The  Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission has the duties, functions and powers
specified in ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540 to 475C.586 and the powers necessary or proper
to enable the commission to carry out the commission’s duties, functions  and powers under ORS
475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540 to 475C.586. The jurisdiction,  supervision, duties, functions and
powers of the commission extend to any person that produces,  processes, transports, delivers, sells,
purchases or tests a marijuana item in this state. The commission may sue and be sued.
(2) The duties, functions and powers of the commission specified in ORS 475C.005 to  475C.525
and 475C.540 to 475C.586 include the following:
(a) To regulate the production, processing, transportation, delivery, sale, purchase and  testing
of marijuana items in accordance with the  provisions of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540 to
475C.586.
[2]
SB 1548
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) To issue, renew, suspend, revoke or refuse to issue or  renew licenses for the production,
processing, sale or testing of marijuana items, or other licenses related to the consumption of
marijuana items, and to permit, in the commission’s discretion, the transfer  of a license between
persons.
(c) To  adopt, amend or repeal rules as necessary to carry out the intent and provisions of ORS
475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540 to 475C.586, including rules  that the commission considers nec-
essary to protect the public health and safety.
(d) To exercise  all powers incidental, convenient or necessary to enable the commission to ad-
minister or  carry out the provisions of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540 to 475C.586 or any
other law of this state that charges the  commission with a duty, function or power related to
marijuana. Powers described in this paragraph include, but are not limited to:
(A) Issuing subpoenas;
(B) Compelling the attendance of witnesses;
(C) Administering oaths;
(D) Certifying official acts;
(E) Taking depositions as provided by law;
(F) Compelling the production of  books, payrolls, accounts, papers, records, documents and tes-
timony; and
(G) Establishing fees  in addition to the application, licensing and renewal fees described in ORS
475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093, 475C.097 and 475C.548, provided that any fee established by the  com-
mission is reasonably calculated not to exceed the cost of the activity for which  the fee is charged.
(e) To adopt rules regulating and prohibiting advertising marijuana items in a manner that:
(A) Is likely to cause minors to unlawfully possess or consume marijuana or marijuana  items,
in order  to prevent the unlawful possession or consumption of marijuana or marijuana items by mi-
nors and to protect minors from the negative health  effects of unlawfully consuming
marijuana or marijuana items ;
(B) Promotes excessive use;
(C) Promotes illegal activity; or
(D) Otherwise presents a significant risk to public health and safety.
(f) To regulate the use of marijuana  items for other purposes as deemed necessary or appropri-
ate by the commission.
(g) To establish pilot programs, of not more than three  years in duration, to expand access to
marijuana for medical use for registry  identification cardholders and designated primary caregivers,
as defined in ORS 475C.777.
(h) To regulate the processing, transportation,  delivery, sale, purchase and testing of artificially
derived cannabinoids in  accordance with the provisions of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 and 475C.540
to 475C.586.
(i) To regulate the testing and labeling of inhalant  delivery systems, as defined in ORS 431A.175,
that include industrial hemp-derived vapor items, as defined in ORS 475C.540, that are sold in  this
state by any person.
(3) The rules adopted under  subsection (2)(e)(A) of this section must require that adver-
tising of  marijuana items be tailored judiciously to the purposes described in subsection
(2)(e)(A) of this section.
[(3)] (4) Fees collected pursuant to subsection (2)(d)(G) of this section shall  be deposited in the
Marijuana Control and Regulation Fund established under ORS 475C.297.
[3]
SB 1548
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 5.
 ORS 475C.449 is amended to read:
475C.449. (1) For purposes of this section, “reasonable regulations” includes:
(a) Reasonable  conditions on the manner in which a marijuana producer that holds a license
issued under ORS 475C.065 may produce marijuana or in which a researcher of  cannabis that holds
a certificate issued under ORS 475C.289 may  produce marijuana or propagate immature marijuana
plants;
(b) Reasonable conditions on the manner in which a marijuana processor that  holds a license
issued under ORS 475C.085 may  process marijuana or in which a researcher of cannabis that holds
a certificate issued under ORS 475C.289 may process marijuana;
(c) Reasonable conditions on the manner in which a marijuana wholesaler that holds a  license
issued under ORS 475C.093 may sell marijuana at wholesale;
(d) Reasonable  conditions on the manner in which a marijuana retailer that holds a license is-
sued under ORS 475C.097 may sell marijuana items;
(e) Reasonable limitations on the hours  during which a premises for which a license has been
issued under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 may operate;
(f) Reasonable requirements related to the public’s access to a premises for which a license  or
certificate has been issued under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525; and
(g) Reasonable limitations on where a premises for which a license or certificate may  be issued
under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 may be located.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 30.935, 215.253  (1) or 633.738, the governing body of a city or county
may adopt ordinances that impose reasonable regulations  on the operation of businesses located at
premises for which a license or certificate has  been issued under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 if the
premises are located in the area subject to the jurisdiction of the city or county, except that  the
governing body of a city or county may not:
(a) Adopt an ordinance that prohibits a premises for which a license has been issued under  ORS
475C.097 from being located within a distance that is greater than 1,000 feet of another  premises for
which a license has been issued under ORS 475C.097.
(b) Adopt  an ordinance that imposes a setback requirement for an agricultural building used to
produce marijuana located on a premises for which a license has been  issued under ORS 475C.065
if the agricultural building:
(A) Was constructed on or before July 1,  2015, in compliance with all applicable land use and
building code requirements at the time of construction;
(B) Is located at  an address where a marijuana grow site first registered with the Oregon Health
Authority under ORS 475C.792 on or before January 1, 2015;
(C) Was used to produce marijuana pursuant  to the provisions of ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919 on
or before January 1, 2015; and
(D) Has four opaque walls and a roof.
(3) The limitations imposed by the governing body of a  city or county under subsection
(1)(g) of this section may, subject to subsection  (2)(a) of this section, create a buffer zone
of more than 1,000 feet around  a premises for which a license or certificate has been issued
under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 in the compelling interest of the public health and safety of
the area subject to the jurisdiction of the city or county.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 475C.604 is amended to read:
475C.604. (1) As is necessary to protect the public health  and safety, and in consultation with
the Oregon Health Authority and the State Department of  Agriculture, the Oregon Liquor and
[4]
SB 1548
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Cannabis Commission shall adopt rules establishing standards for the labeling  of marijuana items
and inhalant delivery systems that contain industrial  hemp-derived vapor items, including but not
limited to:
(a) Ensuring that usable marijuana, cannabinoid  concentrates and extracts, cannabinoid edibles,
other cannabinoid  products and inhalant delivery systems that contain industrial hemp-derived vapor
items have labeling that communicates:
(A) Health and safety warnings;
(B) If applicable, activation time;
(C) Potency;
(D) For cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts,  serving size and the
number of servings included in a cannabinoid product or cannabinoid concentrate or extract  pack-
age; and
(E) Content of the marijuana item or inhalant delivery system that contains an  industrial
hemp-derived vapor item; and
(b) Labeling that is in accordance with applicable  state food labeling requirements for the same
type of food product or  potable liquid when the food product or potable liquid does not contain
marijuana or cannabinoids.
(2) In adopting rules under ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919, the authority shall require all  usable
marijuana, cannabinoid  products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts transferred by a med-
ical marijuana dispensary registered under ORS 475C.833 to be labeled  in accordance with sub-
section (1) of this section and rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) In adopting rules under  ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525, the commission shall require all usable
marijuana, cannabinoid products and cannabinoid  concentrates and extracts sold or transferred by
a marijuana retailer that  holds a license issued under ORS 475C.097 to be labeled in accordance
with subsection  (1) of this section and section 2 of this 2026 Act  and rules adopted under sub-
section (1) of this section and section 2 of this 2026 Act .
(4) In adopting rules under subsection (1) of this section, the commission:
(a) May establish different labeling standards for different  varieties of usable marijuana, for
different types of  cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts and for inhalant
delivery systems that contain industrial hemp-derived vapor items;
(b) May establish different minimum  labeling standards for persons registered under ORS
475C.770 to 475C.919 and persons licensed under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525;
(c) Shall consider the cost of a potential requirement and how that cost will affect the cost  to
the ultimate consumer of the  marijuana item or inhalant delivery system that contains an industrial
hemp-derived vapor item; and
(d) May  not adopt rules that are more restrictive than is reasonably necessary to protect the
public health and safety.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 475C.612 is amended to read:
475C.612. (1) As is necessary to protect the public health  and safety, and in consultation with
the Oregon Health Authority and the State Department of  Agriculture, the Oregon Liquor and
Cannabis Commission shall adopt rules establishing  standards for the packaging of marijuana items,
including but not limited to:
(a) Ensuring that cannabinoid concentrates and extracts, cannabinoid edibles and other
cannabinoid products are:
(A) Packaged in child-resistant safety packaging; and
[5]
SB 1548
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Not marketed in a manner that:
(i) Is untruthful or misleading;
(ii) Is likely to cause minors to unlawfully possess or consume  cannabinoid concentrates,
cannabinoid extracts, cannabinoid edibles or other  cannabinoid products, in order to prevent the
unlawful possession or consumption of cannabinoid products by minors; or
(iii) Otherwise creates a significant risk of harm to public health and safety;
(b) Ensuring that usable marijuana, including usable marijuana that is pre-rolled, is  not mar-
keted in a manner that:
(A) Is untruthful and misleading;
(B) Is likely to cause minors to unlawfully possess or consume usable marijuana, in order to
prevent the unlawful possession or consumption of usable marijuana by minors; or
(C) Otherwise creates a significant risk of harm to public health and safety; and
(c) In order to  prevent the unlawful possession or consumption of cannabinoid edibles and other
cannabinoid products by minors  and to protect minors from the negative  health effects of the
consumption of cannabinoid edibles and other cannabinoid products, ensuring that cannabinoid
edibles and other cannabinoid products are [ not packaged in a manner that is  likely to cause minors
to unlawfully possess or consume cannabinoid edibles and other cannabinoid products ] packaged in
a manner that is tailored judiciously to the specific purposes described in this paragraph .
(2) In  adopting rules under ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919, the authority shall require all usable
marijuana, cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts transferred by a  med-
ical marijuana dispensary registered under ORS 475C.833 to be packaged in  accordance with sub-
section (1) of this section and rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) In adopting rules under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525, the commission  shall require all usable
marijuana, cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts  sold or transferred by
a marijuana retailer that holds a  license under ORS 475C.097 to be packaged in accordance with
subsection (1) of this section and rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) In adopting rules under subsection (1) of this section, the commission:
(a) May establish different packaging standards for  different varieties of usable marijuana and
for different types of cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts.
(b) May establish different minimum packaging standards for persons  registered under ORS
475C.770 to 475C.919 and persons licensed under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525.
(c) May consider the effect on the environment of requiring certain packaging.
(d) Shall consider  the cost of a potential requirement and how that cost will affect the cost to
the ultimate consumer of the marijuana item.
(e) Shall, in order to prevent the unlawful possession or consumption of marijuana items  [ by
minors, shall ] and to protect minors from the negative health effects of unlawfully consuming
marijuana items,  describe, using objective criteria, packaging that is [ likely to cause minors to  un-
lawfully possess or  consume marijuana items ] tailored judiciously to prevent minors from un-
lawfully possessing or consuming marijuana items and to protect minors  from the negative
health effects of unlawfully  consuming marijuana items . The objective criteria must include, but
is not limited to, prohibiting packaging that uses imagery or characters primarily associated with
minors when such associations are likely to result in minors unlawfully possessing  or consuming
marijuana items.
(f) Must require that each  cannabinoid edible contained in a package of cannabinoid
edibles be individually wrapped. The rules adopted under this paragraph  do not apply to a
[6]
SB 1548
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cannabinoid edible that is a potable liquid.
[(f)] (g) May not adopt rules  that are more restrictive than is reasonably necessary to protect
the public health and safety.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 475C.620 is amended to read:
475C.620. (1) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission, in consultation with the Oregon
Health Authority and the State Department of Agriculture, shall adopt rules establishing:
(a) The maximum concentration of  total delta-9-THC that is permitted in a single serving of a
cannabinoid product or cannabinoid concentrate or extract;
(b) The maximum  concentration of adult use cannabinoid, any other cannabinoid or artificially
derived cannabinoid that is permitted in a single  serving of a cannabinoid product or a cannabinoid
concentrate or extract; and
(c) The number of servings that are permitted in a package of cannabinoid product or
cannabinoid concentrate or extract.
(2)(a) In adopting rules under subsection (1)(a)  or (b) of this section, the commission shall pre-
scribe the different levels of concentration of  total delta-9-THC, artificially derived cannabinoids,
adult use cannabinoids  or any other cannabinoid that is permitted in a single serving of a
cannabinoid product or cannabinoid concentrate or extract for:
(A) Consumers who hold a valid registry identification card issued under ORS 475C.783; and
(B) Consumers who do not hold a valid registry identification card issued under ORS 475C.783.
(b) In prescribing the levels of concentration of total delta-9-THC, artificially  derived
cannabinoids, adult use cannabinoids or any other cannabinoid that is permitted in  a single serving
of a cannabinoid product or cannabinoid concentrate or extract for consumers who  hold a valid
registry identification card issued under ORS 475C.783, the commission shall  consider the appropri-
ate level of concentration necessary to  mitigate the symptoms or effects of a debilitating medical
condition, as defined in ORS 475C.777.
(3) In adopting rules under ORS 475C.770 to 475C.919, the  authority shall adopt by rule re-
quirements established by the commission  by rule to require all usable marijuana, cannabinoid pro-
ducts and cannabinoid  concentrates and extracts transferred by a medical marijuana dispensary
registered  under  ORS 475C.833 to meet the concentration standards and servings per package stan-
dards adopted by rule pursuant to this section.
(4)(a) In adopting rules under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525, the commission shall require all usable
marijuana, cannabinoid products and cannabinoid concentrates and extracts  sold or transferred by
a marijuana retailer  that holds a license under ORS 475C.097 to meet the concentration standards
and servings per package standards adopted by rule pursuant to this section.
(b) The rules adopted by the commission under this subsection must :
(A) Allow for a concentration  of up to 100 milligrams of adult use cannabinoid per package of
cannabinoid  edibles.
(B) Allow up to 10 milligrams of adult use cannabinoid per individual cannabinoid edible.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 475C.897 is amended to read:
475C.897. (1) For purposes of this section, “reasonable regulations” includes:
(a) Reasonable  limitations on the hours during which the marijuana grow site of a person des-
ignated to produce marijuana by a registry identification cardholder, a marijuana processing  site
or a medical marijuana dispensary may operate;
(b) Reasonable conditions on the  manner in which the marijuana grow site of a person desig-
nated to produce marijuana by a registry  identification cardholder, a marijuana processing site or
[7]
SB 1548
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
a medical marijuana dispensary  may transfer usable marijuana, medical cannabinoid products,
cannabinoid concentrates, cannabinoid extracts, immature marijuana plants and seeds;
(c) Reasonable requirements related to the public’s access to the marijuana grow site of a person
designated to produce  marijuana by a registry identification cardholder, a marijuana processing site
or a medical marijuana dispensary; and
(d) Reasonable limitations on where the marijuana grow site of  a person designated to produce
marijuana by a registry identification cardholder, a marijuana processing site  or a medical
marijuana dispensary may be located.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 30.935, 215.253 (1) or 633.738, the governing body of  a city or county
may adopt ordinances that impose reasonable regulations on the  operation of marijuana grow sites
of persons designated to produce marijuana by registry identification cardholders,  marijuana pro-
cessing sites and medical marijuana dispensaries that are located in the area subject  to the juris-
diction of the city or county.
(3) The limitations imposed by the governing body of a  city or county under subsection
(1)(d) of this section may create a buffer zone of more than 1,000 feet around  a marijuana
grow site of a  person designated to produce marijuana by a registry identification cardholder,
a marijuana processing site or a medical marijuana dispensary  in the compelling interest of
the public health and safety of the area subject to the jurisdiction of the city or county.
SECTION 10.
(1) The amendments to ORS 475C.449 and  475C.897 by sections 5 and 9 of
this 2026 Act apply to new licenses,  certificates or registrations issued on or after January
1, 2027.
(2) The amendments to ORS 475C.017, 475C.612 and 475C.620 by sections  4, 7 and 8 of this
2026 Act  apply to marijuana items and inhalant delivery systems that contain industrial
hemp-derived cannabinoids sold or transferred  to the final consumer on and after January
1, 2027.
SECTION 11. (1) Section 3 of this 2026 Act and the  amendments to ORS 475C.017,
475C.449, 475C.612, 475C.620 and 475C.897 by sections 4, 5 and 7 to 9 of this 2026 Act become
operative on January 1, 2027.
(2) Section 2 of this 2026 Act and  the amendments to ORS 475C.604 by section 6 of this
2026 Act become operative on July 1, 2027.
(3) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission may take any action  before the opera-
tive date specified in subsection (1) of this  section that is necessary to enable the commis-
sion, on and after  the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, to exercise
the duties, functions and powers conferred on the commission by section 3 of this  2026 Act
and the amendments  to ORS 475C.017, 475C.449, 475C.612, 475C.620 and 475C.897 by sections
4, 5 and 7 to 9 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 12. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[8]