Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2022 Act is added to and made a part of ORS  181A.010 to
181A.350.
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of State Police shall establish and maintain a unit within
the department to assist county sheriffs’ offices  with law enforcement needs to address un-
lawful marijuana cultivation and distribution operations  and general local law enforcement
needs.
(2) The department shall ensure that each county sheriff’s office receives at least
$500,000 annually in resources for the purpose described in this section, and shall develop a
formula to prioritize  the allocation of additional resources to county sheriffs’ offices in
counties with the greatest demonstrable  need for assistance in addressing unlawful
marijuana cultivation or distribution operations.
(3) The department may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 181A.020 is amended to read:
181A.020. (1) There is established in the General Fund of the State Treasury an account  to be
known as the State Police Account. All moneys received by the Department of State Police shall
be paid to the credit of the State  Police Account, and such moneys are continuously appropriated
to the department for :
(a) The payment of expenses of the department ; and
(b) The purposes described in section 2 of this 2022 Act .
(2) There is  established a subaccount in the State Police Account consisting of all moneys, re-
venue and income described in ORS 463.220.  All moneys in the subaccount are continuously appro-
priated to the Department of State Police to carry out the provisions of ORS chapter 463.
(3) The Department of State Police may accept and distribute gifts, grants, donations and funds
from any source, including services and property, to carry out the duties of the department.
SECTION 4.  ORS 475C.726 is amended to read:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 233
SB 1541
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
475C.726. (1) There is established the Oregon Marijuana Account, separate  and distinct from the
General Fund.
(2) The account consists of moneys transferred to the account under ORS 475C.734.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly the amount of moneys available  in the
Oregon Marijuana Account.
(b) Before making other transfers of moneys required by this  section, the department shall
transfer quarterly to the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund all moneys in  the Oregon
Marijuana Account in excess of [ $11,250,000] $26,250,000.
(c) After making the transfer  of moneys required by paragraph (b) of this subsection, and
in addition to the transfer described in paragraph  (e)(C) of this subsection, the department
shall transfer  quarterly $15,000,000 to the State Police Account established under ORS
181A.020 for the purposes described in section 2 of this 2022 Act.
[(c)] (d) Subject to subsection (4) of this section,  and after making the [ transfer] transfers of
moneys required by [ paragraph (b) ] paragraphs (b) and (c)  of  this subsection, the department shall
transfer quarterly 20 percent of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account as follows:
(A) Ten percent of the moneys  in the account must be transferred to the cities of this state in
the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10 percent  must be transferred in shares that reflect the popu-
lation of each city of this state that is  not exempt from this paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)
of this section compared to the population of all cities of this  state that are not exempt from this
paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section, as determined by  Portland State University
under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately preceding the date of the transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the  number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093 and 475C.097 on the last business  day
of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located in each city compared
to the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093  and 475C.097 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the  following
shares:
(i) Fifty  percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the total commer-
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant
to ORS 475C.065 on the last business day of  the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer
for all premises located in each county compared to the total commercially  available area of all
grow canopies associated with marijuana producer licenses held pursuant to  ORS 475C.065 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the  number of li-
censes held pursuant to ORS 475C.085, 475C.093 and 475C.097 on the last business  day of the cal-
endar quarter preceding the date of  the transfer for premises located in each county compared to
the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475C.085, 475C.093 and 475C.097 on the last business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
[(d)] (e) After making the  [transfer] transfers of moneys required by [ paragraph (b)] paragraphs
(b) and (c) of this subsection, 80  percent of the remaining moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account
must be used as follows:
(A) Forty percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for  which
moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used;
[2]
SB 1541
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Twenty percent of the moneys in the account must  be used solely for mental health treat-
ment or for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment;
(C) Fifteen percent of the moneys in the  account must be used solely for purposes described
under ORS 181A.020 (1)(a)  for which moneys in the State Police  Account established under ORS
181A.020 may be used; and
(D) Five percent of the  moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes related to al-
cohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
(4)(a) A city that has an ordinance  prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS  475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097 is required is not eligible to
receive transfers of moneys under subsection [ (3)(c)(A)] (3)(d)(A) of this section.
(b) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which  issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475C.065  is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
subsection [ (3)(c)(B)(i)] (3)(d)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475C.085, 475C.093 or  475C.097 is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection [ (3)(c)(B)(ii)] (3)(d)(B)(ii) of this section.
(d)(A) Paragraphs (b)  and (c) of this subsection do not apply to a county ordinance adopted on
or after January 1, 2018, that prohibits the establishment of a premises for  which a license under
ORS 475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097 is required but allows in the unincorporated area of
the county the continued  operation of an existing premises for which a license under ORS 475C.065,
475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097 is required.
(B) A county that adopts an ordinance described in subparagraph (A) of  this paragraph shall
certify the adoption of the ordinance under subsection (6) of this section.
(5)(a) A city or county that is ineligible under subsection (4) of this section to  receive a transfer
of moneys  from the Oregon Marijuana Account during a given quarter but has received a transfer
of moneys for that quarter shall return the amount transferred to the Department of Revenue,  with
interest as described  under paragraph (f) of this subsection. An ineligible city or county may vol-
untarily transfer the moneys to the Department of Revenue immediately upon receipt of the ineligi-
ble transfer.
(b) If the Director of the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services determines that a city
or county received a transfer of moneys under subsection [ (3)(c)] (3)(d) of this section but was inel-
igible to receive that transfer under subsection  (4) of this section, the director shall provide notice
to the ineligible city or county and order the city or county to return the  amount received to the
Department of Revenue, with interest as described under paragraph (f) of this subsection. A city or
county may appeal the order within 30 days of the date of the order under  the procedures for a
contested case under ORS chapter 183.
(c) As soon as the order under paragraph  (b) of this subsection becomes final, the director shall
notify the Department of Revenue and the ineligible city or county. Upon  notification, the Depart-
ment of Revenue immediately shall proceed to collect the amount stated in the notice.
(d) The Department of Revenue shall have the  benefit of all laws of the state pertaining to the
collection of income and  excise taxes and may proceed to collect the amounts described in the no-
tice under paragraph (c) of this subsection. An assessment of tax is not necessary and  the collection
described in this subsection is not precluded by any statute of limitations.
(e) If a city or county is subject to  an order to return moneys from an ineligible transfer, the
city or county shall  be denied any further relief in connection with the ineligible transfer on or after
[3]
SB 1541
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
the date that the order becomes final.
(f) Interest under this section shall accrue at  the rate established in ORS 305.220 beginning on
the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(g) Both the moneys and  the interest collected from or returned by an ineligible city or county
shall be redistributed to the cities or counties that were eligible to  receive a transfer under sub-
section [ (3)(c)] (3)(d) of this section on the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(6)(a) Not later than July 1 of each year, each city  and county in this state shall certify with
the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services whether the city or county has an ordinance
prohibiting the establishment of a premises for  which issuance of a license under ORS 475C.065,
475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097 is required and whether the county has an ordinance described  in
subsection (4)(d) of this section. The certification shall be made  concurrently with the certifications
under ORS 221.770, in  a form and manner prescribed by the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services.
(b) If a city fails to comply with this subsection, the city is not eligible to receive transfers  of
moneys under subsection [ (3)(c)(A)] (3)(d)(A) of this section.  If a county fails to comply with this
subsection, the county is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection  [ (3)(c)(B)]
(3)(d)(B) of this section.
(c) A city or county that repeals an ordinance as provided  in ORS 475C.457 shall file an updated
certification with the Oregon Department of Administrative Services in a  form and manner pre-
scribed by the department, noting the effective date of  the change. A city or county that repeals an
ordinance as provided in ORS 475C.457 is eligible to  receive quarterly transfers of moneys under
this section for quarters where  the repeal is effective for the entire quarter and the updated certi-
fication was filed at least 30 days before the date of transfer.
SECTION 5.
There is appropriated to the Department of State Police, for the  biennium
ending June 30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $2,000,000, for the purpose of
carrying out section 2 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 6. (1) Section 2 of this 2022 Act and the  amendments to ORS 181A.020 and
475C.726 by sections 3 and 4 of this 2022 Act become operative on January 1, 2023.
(2) The Department of Revenue and the Department of State Police  may take any action
before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable
the departments to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this
section, all of the duties, functions  and powers conferred on the departments by section 2
of this 2022 Act and the amendments to  ORS 181A.020 and 475C.726 by sections 3 and 4 of this
2022 Act.
SECTION 7.
This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]