Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
CHILD SAFETY TRAINING
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “child” and “child-caring agency” have the
meanings given those terms in ORS 418.205.
(2) The Department of Human Services, in  consultation with the Oregon Youth Authority
and the Oregon Health Authority, shall establish a  child-caring agency grant and training
program.
(3) The purpose of  the grant and training program is to improve the safety and treatment
outcomes of children receiving services from child-caring agencies, to increase  regulatory
compliance by service providers and to improve the recruitment and retention of well-trained
and qualified service providers.
(4) The department may contract with a nonprofit organization to administer  the pro-
gram.
(5)(a) The administrator of the program may award grants in an amount  not to exceed
$30,000 per grant recipient to child-caring agencies for the purpose  of developing training
programs to ensure compliance with the federal Family First  Prevention Services Act and
other quality improvement initiatives.
(b) In addition to awarding the grants described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the
administrator of the program shall  develop a statewide child-caring agency training program
to support the implementation of the federal Family First Prevention Services Act.
(6) The administrator of the grant and training program shall  submit biannual reports
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1620
HB 2424
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to the department describing the following:
(a) The number of grants awarded in the preceding six-month period;
(b) The aggregate amount of grant moneys awarded;
(c) The number of statewide trainings held by the administrator of the program; and
(d) The demonstrated outcomes of the grant and training program.
(7) The department may adopt any rules necessary to carry out the  provisions of this
section.
SUBSTANDARD CARE
SECTION 2.
 ORS  418.259, as amended by section 9, chapter 19, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special
session), is amended to read:
418.259. (1) The investigation conducted by  the Department of Human Services under ORS
418.258 must result in one of the following findings:
(a) That  the report is substantiated. A report is substantiated when , except as provided in
paragraph (b) of this subsection,  there is reasonable cause to believe  that the abuse of a child in
care  occurred.
(b) That the  report is unsubstantiated. A report is unsubstantiated when there is no evidence
that the abuse of a child in care occurred  or when there is evidence that the  abuse of a child
in care occurred but that the abuse was the result of substandard care .
(c) That the report  is inconclusive. A report is inconclusive when there is some indication that
the abuse occurred but  there is insufficient evidence to conclude that there is reasonable cause to
believe that the abuse occurred.
(2) When a report is received under ORS 418.258 alleging that a child in  care may have been
subjected  to  abuse, the department shall notify the case managers for the child, the attorney for the
child, the child’s court appointed special advocate, the parents or guardians of the child, any  attor-
ney representing a parent or guardian of the child  and any governmental agency that has a contract
with the child-caring agency or developmental disabilities residential facility to provide care  or
services to the child that a report has been received.
(3) The department may interview the child in care who is the subject  of suspected abuse and
witnesses without the presence of employees of the child-caring agency, proctor  foster home or de-
velopmental disabilities residential facility, the provider of  services at a certified foster home or
department personnel. The department shall  inform the child in care that the child may have the
child’s parent or guardian, if the child has not been committed to the custody of the department  or
the Oregon Youth Authority, or attorney present when participating  in an interview conducted in
the course of an abuse investigation.
(4)(a) For the purposes of this section, abuse is the result of substandard care  if the de-
partment determines that:
(A) There is reasonable cause to believe that the abuse of a child in care occurred;
(B) The abuse resulted in no harm or minimal harm to the child in care; and
(C) There is reasonable cause to believe that the actions of the employee,  person or en-
tity that is the subject of the investigation were:
(i) Inadvertent; or
(ii) A behavioral choice with no intent to harm, but which resulted in  minimal harm or
the risk of harm to the child in care.
[2]
HB 2424
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Abuse is not the result of substandard care  if the department determines that there
is reasonable cause to believe that  the employee, person or entity that is the subject of the
investigation:
(A) Consciously disregarded policies and practices; or
(B) Intended to harm the child in care.
[(4)] (5) The department shall notify the following when a report of abuse is substantiated:
(a) The Director of Human Services.
(b) Personnel in the department responsible for the licensing, certificate or  authorization of
child-caring agencies.
(c) The department’s lead personnel in that part of the  department that is responsible for child
welfare  generally.
(d) With respect to the child in care who  is the subject of the abuse report and investigation,
the case managers for the child, the attorney  for the child, the child’s court appointed special ad-
vocate, the parents or guardians of the  child, any attorney representing a parent or guardian of the
child and any governmental agency that has a contract with the child-caring agency to  provide care
or services to the child.
(e) The  parents or guardians of the child in care who is the subject of the abuse report and in-
vestigation if the child in care has not been committed to  the custody of the department or the
youth authority. Notification under this paragraph  may not include any details or information other
than that a report of abuse has been substantiated.
(f) Any governmental agency that has a contract with  the child-caring agency to provide care
or services to a child in care.
(g) The local citizen review board established by the Judicial Department under ORS 419A.090.
[(5)] (6) The department shall report on a quarterly basis to the interim legislative committees
on child welfare for the purposes of public review and oversight of the quality and safety  of child-
caring agencies, certified foster homes and  developmental disabilities residential facilities that are
licensed, certified or authorized by the department in this state and of proctor  foster homes that are
certified by the child-caring agencies. Information provided in reports under this subsection may
not contain the name or any identifying information of a child in care but  must contain all of the
following:
(a) The name of any child-caring agency, including an  out-of-state child-caring agency, proctor
foster home or developmental  disabilities residential facility, or, provided there are five or more
certified foster homes in the  county, the name of the county where a certified foster home is located,
where the department conducted an investigation pursuant to ORS 418.258 that resulted in  a finding
that the report of abuse was substantiated during that quarter;
(b) The approximate date that the abuse occurred;
(c) The nature of the abuse and a brief narrative description of the abuse that occurred;
(d) Whether physical injury, sexual abuse or death resulted from the abuse;
(e) Corrective actions taken or ordered by the department and  the outcome of the corrective
actions; and
(f) Information the department received in  that quarter regarding any substantiated allegations
of child abuse made by any other state involving a congregate care  residential setting, as defined
in ORS 419B.354, in which the department has placed Oregon children.
[(6)] (7) In compiling records, reports and other information during  an investigation under ORS
418.258 (1) and in issuing findings, letters of concern or reprimands, the Director of Human Services
[3]
HB 2424
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or the director’s designee and the department may  not refer to the employee, person or entity that
is the subject of the  investigation as an “alleged perpetrator” but must refer to the employee, person
or entity as the “respondent.”
WORKFORCE DIVERSITY
SECTION 3.
(1) The Child Welfare Cultural Equity Program is established within the
Department of Human Services.  The purpose of the program is to ensure access to a diverse
set of child welfare service providers  consistent with the cultural diversity needs of the
population being served.
(2) Under the program, the department may develop, or contract with nonprofit  organ-
izations to assist in developing:
(a) Methods  for determining the cultural needs of the children receiving child welfare
services from the department;
(b) Methods for incentivizing the recruitment and retention of a  diverse set of child
welfare service providers; and
(c) Best  practices for connecting a child served by the department with service providers
who meet the child’s cultural diversity needs.
(3) The department may adopt rules to implement and  carry out the provisions of this
section.
STUDENT LOAN FORGIVENESS
SECTION 4. (1) There is created in the Oregon Health Authority a qualified mental health
associate incentive program for the purpose of providing loan repayment subsidies to quali-
fied mental health associates  who commit to serving children in child-caring agencies in this
state. The authority shall prescribe by rule:
(a) Participant eligibility criteria,  including the types of qualified mental health associ-
ates who may participate in the program;
(b) The terms and conditions of participation in the program, including the duration of
the term of any service agreement, which must be at least 24 months;
(c) If the funds  allocated to the program from the Health Care Provider Incentive Fund
established under ORS 676.450 are insufficient to provide assistance to all  of the applicants
who are eligible to participate in the program, the priority for the distribution of funds; and
(d) The financial penalties imposed on an  individual who fails to comply with the terms
and conditions of participation.
(2) Eligibility requirements adopted for the program:
(a) Must allow qualified mental health associates to qualify for  an incentive for multiyear
periods.
(b) Must give preference to applicants:
(A) Who are willing to commit to completing trainings offered under section 1 of this 2021
Act;
(B) Who have been recruited through the  Child Welfare Cultural Equity Program estab-
lished under section 3 of this 2021 Act;
(C) Who commit to serving with a child-caring agency that provides care  to children re-
[4]
HB 2424
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ceiving child welfare services from the Department of Human Services  or children who have
been referred by state or local agencies or coordinated care organizations; or
(D) Who meet specific needs identified by the child-caring agency.
(3) The authority may enter into contracts  with one or more public or private entities
to administer the qualified  mental health associate incentive program or parts of the pro-
gram.
(4) The  authority may receive gifts, grants or contributions from any source, whether
public or private, to carry out the provisions of this section. Moneys received  under this
subsection shall be deposited in the Health  Care Provider Incentive Fund established under
ORS 676.450.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 418.205, as amended by sections 15a and  15b, chapter 19, Oregon Laws 2020
(first special session), is amended to read:
418.205. As used in  ORS 418.205 to 418.327, 418.470, 418.475, 418.950 to 418.970 and 418.992 to
418.998 and section 4 of this 2021 Act , unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Child” means an unmarried person under 21 years of age  who resides in or receives care
or services from a child-caring agency.
(2)(a) “Child-caring agency”:
(A) Means any private  school, private agency, private organization or county program providing:
(i) Day treatment for children with emotional disturbances;
(ii) Adoption placement services;
(iii) Residential care, including but not limited  to foster care or residential treatment for chil-
dren;
(iv) Residential care  in combination with academic education and therapeutic care, including but
not limited to treatment for emotional, behavioral or mental health disturbances;
(v) Outdoor youth programs; or
(vi) Other similar care or services for children.
(B) Includes the following:
(i) A shelter-care home that is not a foster home subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645;
(ii) An independent residence facility as described in ORS 418.475;
(iii) A private residential boarding school; and
(iv) A child-caring facility as defined in ORS 418.950.
(b) “Child-caring agency” does not include:
(A) Residential facilities or foster  care homes certified or licensed by the Department of Human
Services  under  ORS 443.400 to 443.455, 443.830 and 443.835 for children receiving developmental
disability services;
(B) Any private agency or organization facilitating the provision of respite  services for parents
pursuant to a properly executed power of attorney under ORS 109.056. For purposes of this subpar-
agraph, “respite services” means the voluntary assumption of short-term  care and control of a minor
child without  compensation or reimbursement of expenses for the purpose of providing a parent in
crisis with relief from the demands of ongoing care of the parent’s child;
(C) A youth job development organization as defined in ORS 344.415;
(D) A shelter-care home that is a foster home subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645;
(E) A foster home subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645;
(F) A facility that exclusively serves individuals 18 years of age and older; or
(G) A facility that primarily serves both adults and children but requires that any child  must
[5]
HB 2424
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
be accompanied at all times by at least one custodial parent or guardian.
(3) “Child-caring facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.950.
(4)(a) “County program” means any county operated program that provides care or services to
children in the custody of the Department of Human Services or the Oregon Youth Authority.
(b) “County program” does not include any local juvenile detention  facility that receives state
services provided and coordinated by the Department of Corrections under ORS 169.070.
(5) “Governmental agency” means an executive, legislative or  judicial agency, department,
board, commission, authority, institution or instrumentality of this state or of a county,  municipality
or other political subdivision of this state.
(6) “Independent residence facility” means a facility established or certified under ORS  418.475.
(7)(a) “Outdoor youth program” means a program that provides, in  an outdoor living setting,
services to children  who have behavioral problems, mental health problems or problems with abuse
of alcohol or drugs.
(b) “Outdoor youth program” does not include any program, facility or activity:
(A) Operated by a governmental entity;
(B) Operated or affiliated with the Oregon Youth Corps;
(C) Licensed by the Department of Human Services under other  authority of the department; or
(D) Operated by a youth job development organization as defined in ORS 344.415.
(8) “Private” means not owned, operated or administered by any governmental agency or unit.
(9) “Private residential boarding school” means either of the following as the context requires:
(a) A child-caring agency that is a private  school that provides residential care in combination
with academic education and therapeutic care, including  but not limited to treatment for emotional,
behavioral or mental health disturbances; or
(b) A private  school providing residential care that is primarily engaged in educational work
under ORS 418.327.
(10) “Proctor foster home” means a foster home certified by a child-caring agency under ORS
418.248 that is not subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645.
(11) “Provider of care or services for  children” means a person, entity or organization that
provides care or services to children, regardless of whether the child is in  the custody of the De-
partment of Human Services, and  that does not otherwise meet the definition of, or requirements for,
a child-caring agency. “Provider of care or services for children” includes a proctor foster  home
certified by a child-caring agency under ORS 418.248.
(12) “Qualified residential  treatment program” means a program described in section 12b, chap-
ter 19, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special session).
(13) “Shelter-care home” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.470.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 676.450 is amended to read:
676.450. The  Health Care Provider Incentive Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund.  Interest earned by the Health Care Provider Incentive Fund
shall be credited to the fund. The fund consists of moneys  appropriated to the fund by the Legisla-
tive Assembly and gifts, grants or other moneys contributed to  the fund by any source, whether
public or private. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated  to the Oregon Health Authority
to carry out ORS 676.454 and 676.467  and section 4 of this 2021 Act .
QUALIFIED MENTAL HEALTH ASSOCIATES
[6]
HB 2424
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
SECTION 7.
A child-caring agency, as defined in ORS 418.205, may allow a person to serve
as a qualified mental  health associate designated to assist the child-caring agency if the
person:
(1) Provides the child-caring agency  with documentation showing that the person has
completed an educational program for qualified mental health associates accredited by a na-
tional accreditation organization approved by the  Oregon Health Authority or the Depart-
ment of Human Services by rule;
(2) Is actively enrolled in,  or has completed, a registered apprenticeship program identi-
fied by the authority by rule;
(3) Provides the child-caring agency with documentation showing  that the person has
completed a training program identified by the authority by rule; and
(4) Every two years completes 16 hours of continuing education approved by  the author-
ity.
APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 8.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Human Services, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $1,250,000 for the purpose of  carrying out the provisions
of section 1 of this 2021 Act.
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to the
Department of Human Services, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  out of the General
Fund, the amount of  $2,500,000 for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 3
of this 2021 Act.
(3) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to the
Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out  of the General Fund,
the amount of $250,000, for deposit in the Health Care Provider Incentive Fund  established
in ORS 676.450, and which may  be expended for the purpose of providing loan repayment
subsidies to qualified mental health  associates participating in the qualified mental health
associate incentive program under section 4 of this 2021 Act.
(4) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to the
Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out  of the General Fund,
the amount of $250,000 for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of  section 7 of this 2021
Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 9. The unit captions used in this 2021 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express  any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
[7]