Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Revenue Officer shall conduct a study  of the adequacy of the
required 70 percent-30 percent division between the permissible uses of new and increased
local transient lodging tax revenues. The officer shall submit a report of findings to the in-
terim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to revenue in  the manner provided
under ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1861