Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 498.062 is amended to read:
498.062. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Beaver” means a member of the species Castor canadensis.
(b) “Forest practices” has the meaning given that term in ORS 527.620.
(c) “Forestland” has the meaning given that term in ORS 527.620.
(d) “Small forestland” means forestland whose owner owns or holds common ownership  interest
in less than 5,000 acres of forestland in this state.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 498.012 (1), an owner of forestland, other than small forestland,  or a
designee of the owner, may take a beaver on the owner’s forestland only if:
(a) The beaver apparently poses a threat to infrastructure.
(b) The owner or a designee of  the owner first requests that the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife address the threat to infrastructure apparently posed by the beaver.
(c) The owner  or a designee of the owner waits 30 days after making the request described in
paragraph (b) of this subsection before taking the beaver.
(3) If the department receives a request under subsection (2)(b) of this  section, the department
shall make  a reasonable attempt to nonlethally relocate the beaver, as department resources allow,
or otherwise address the threat  to infrastructure apparently posed by the beaver, in consultation
with the owner or a designee of the owner.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section and ORS 498.012 (1), if a beaver  on privately
owned forestland damages  or imminently threatens infrastructure, an owner of forestland, other than
small forestland, or a designee of the owner, may take the beaver without submitting  a request to
the department under subsection (2) of this section.
(5) An owner, or a designee of an owner, that takes a beaver under subsection (2) or (4)  of this
section must report the taking as described in ORS 498.061.
(6) In consultation with persons engaged in forest  practices and other interested stakeholders,
the department shall:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1423
SB 354
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
(a) Make reasonable attempts to nonlethally relocate beavers, as department resources allow.
(b) Develop a program for voluntarily  relocating beavers that includes the voluntary relo-
cation of beavers, on advice from the department, from areas of western  Oregon to areas
of central and eastern Oregon in which beavers are native, in order  to provide watershed
enhancements.
(7) Notwithstanding ORS 496.162 (3), the State Fish and  Wildlife Commission shall adopt rules
to implement this section.
[2]