Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Office of  Emergency Management shall study and make recommen-
dations regarding possible improvements to the operations of the office.
(2) The office shall submit a report on its findings to  an appropriate committee of the
Legislative Assembly no later than January 1, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2651