Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 407.315 is amended to read:
407.315. (1) When a veteran assumes a previous loan under ORS 407.305, the interest  rate to be
paid by the veteran  from the date of assumption shall be the rate per annum , not to exceed the
prime rate plus one percent,  prescribed periodically  by the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, tak-
ing into consideration the solvency of  the loan program and the interest rates currently prevailing
in this state for loans secured by owner-occupied residential property.
(2) The department shall make a cash flow projection to  determine if assumptions at the interest
rate established under subsection (1) of this  section are among the causes of a negative cash flow
projection for the loan program. The cash flow  projection required by this section shall be an esti-
mate of  the revenue received from the repayment of loans, interest earnings, administrative expenses
of the loan program, payment of interest and principal on outstanding debt and  other relevant fac-
tors during the period in which current outstanding bonds are required to be retired.
(3) If the  cash flow projection required under subsection (2) of this section indicates that as-
sumptions of  loans at the interest rate established under subsection (1) of this section are a cause
of a negative cash flow projection for the loan program, the department, by rule and notwithstanding
ORS 407.325 (3), shall increase the interest rate to be paid for loans assumed under ORS 407.305  to
the lowest rate per annum  that assures a positive cash flow projection, but not exceeding the rate
then prescribed under ORS 407.325.
SECTION 2.  ORS 407.325 is amended to read:
407.325. (1) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall periodically prescribe the interest rate ,
not to exceed the prime rate  plus one percent,  to be paid by an applicant for a home or farm
acquisition loan with a fixed interest rate, taking into consideration the current value of  the money,
the solvency of the loan program and the effect of the rate on veteran applicants.
(2) The department shall periodically, during the term of  a home or farm loan with a variable
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3604
SB 676
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
interest rate, prescribe the interest rate , not to exceed the prime rate plus one percent,  to be
paid by an applicant, taking into  consideration the current value of the money, the solvency of the
loan program and the effect of the rate on veteran applicants.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section:
(a) The rate of interest on a loan  granted on or after May 27, 1971, and originally set at five
and nine-tenths percent per annum may not  be increased to more than seven and nine-tenths percent
per annum.
(b) The rate of  interest on a loan granted on or after January 1, 1981, and originally set at seven
and two-tenths percent per annum may not be increased to more than nine and  two-tenths percent
per annum.
(4) The department may prescribe the interest rate to be paid by an applicant at  a rate greater
than the rates described in subsection (3) of  this section, but only if the department determines, at
the sole  discretion of the department, that such action is necessary to avoid invoking the provisions
of Article XI-A, section 4, of the Oregon Constitution.
(5) When, during  two consecutive fiscal years, the cash flow projection and the review of the
projection performed under ORS 407.185  indicate that the Oregon War Veterans’ Bond Sinking Ac-
count will maintain a balance throughout the term of the projections that  exceeds the succeeding
years’ debt service and operating expenses for the loan program, the department shall  prepare a
program for reducing the interest rates charged under  this section in such a manner as to ensure
the future solvency and self-supporting nature of the loan program. However, no reduction in inter-
est rates shall occur if the variable rate debt, if converted to a fixed rate, requires  retention of the
amounts in order to meet projections.
(6) Notwithstanding the rate prescribed for acquisition of a home as provided in subsections  (1)
to (5) of this section, the department may periodically establish separate  and distinct interest rates
for home improvement loans granted before January 1, 2020.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2025, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $40,000,000, to be deposited into the Oregon  War Veterans’
Fund created by ORS 407.495, and to be used by the department to advance loans to  any
person qualified for loans under the provisions  of Article XI-A, section 3, Oregon Constitu-
tion, for the acquisition of farms and homes, as provided in ORS chapter 407.
[2]