Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall study how different sources  of
moneys are used to pay  for veterans’ services in this state. The department shall submit a
report on the findings in the manner provided by ORS  192.245, and may include recommen-
dations for legislation, to the interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to
veterans no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4228