Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 343.407 to
343.413.
SECTION 2. (1) At the time  and in the manner prescribed by the Department of Educa-
tion, each school district shall submit to the department information to enable  the depart-
ment to issue the annual report cards described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(2) For each school district, the department shall  issue an annual report card that de-
scribes for the school district:
(a) The total number of  talented and gifted children and the percentage of talented and
gifted children, as compared to the total population.
(b) The total number of talented and gifted children and the  percentage of talented and
gifted children, as compared to the total population and  to other talented and gifted children,
in each of the following areas:
(A) General intellectual ability;
(B) Unusual academic ability in mathematics or language arts;
(C) Creative ability in using  original or nontraditional methods in thinking and producing;
(D) Leadership ability  in motivating the performance of others either in educational or
noneducational settings; and
(E) Ability in visual or performing arts.
(c) The total number of talented and gifted children and  the percentage of talented and
gifted children, as compared to the total population and  to other talented and gifted children,
in each of the following student groups:
(A) Ethnicity;
(B) Eligibility for English language learner programs;
(C) Whether the student has an individualized education  program or a plan developed in
accordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4177
SB 933
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(D) Whether the student is economically disadvantaged.
(d) The total number of talented and gifted children and the  percentage of talented and
gifted children, as compared to the total population and  to other talented and gifted children,
in each of the following grade groupings:
(A) Kindergarten through grade 2;
(B) Grades 3 through 5;
(C) Grades 6 through 8; and
(D) Grades 9 through 12.
(e) The total number of talented  and gifted children and the percentage of talented and
gifted children, as compared to the total population and  to other talented and gifted children,
who have regular attendance rates, as defined in  ORS 327.190, in each of the following stu-
dent groups:
(A) Ethnicity;
(B) Eligibility for English language learner programs;
(C) Whether the student has an individualized education  program or a plan developed in
accordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794; and
(D) Whether the student is economically disadvantaged.
(f) The total number of talented and gifted children and the  percentage of talented and
gifted children, as compared to the total population and  to other talented and gifted children,
in kindergarten through grade eight who:
(A) Are enrolled in advanced classes; or
(B) Participate in programs during the school day that provide accelerated curriculum
and instruction.
(g) The total number of  talented and gifted children and the percentage of talented and
gifted children, as compared to the total population and  to other talented and gifted children,
in grades 9 through 12 who are enrolled in:
(A) Career and technical education courses;
(B) Accelerated college credit programs, as defined in ORS 340.300; and
(C) Alternative education programs, as defined in ORS 336.615.
(h) The number and difficulty  level of high school mathematics and science courses taken
by talented and gifted children, reported  based on identification as talented and gifted chil-
dren in each of the following areas:
(A) General intellectual ability;
(B) Unusual academic ability in mathematics; and
(C) Unusual academic ability in language arts.
(i) The number  and percentage of full-time equivalent positions that are allocated to the
instruction of talented and gifted children.
(j) The training and credentials of staff who have responsibilities related to:
(A) The administration of the instruction of talented and gifted education;
(B) The identification of talented and gifted children; and
(C) The instruction of talented and gifted children.
(k) The amount and percentage of total moneys  received under Title I of the federal El-
ementary and Secondary  Education Act of 1965 that are used for services for talented and
gifted children.
(L) The amount  and percentage of total moneys expended on instruction for talented and
[2]
SB 933
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
gifted children.
(m) The average amount of moneys expended for each talented and gifted child.
(n) The results of  a parent survey on the adequacy of instruction provided to talented
and gifted children.
(o) The annual achievement test score gains in mathematics and in language arts for  all
enrolled students who took the statewide summative assessments in both the previous school
year and the current school year, disaggregated in the following order:
(A) By subject matter and grade;
(B) By proficiency level; and
(C) By demographic information identified by the State Board of  Education, which must
include, at a minimum, gender identity, racial or ethnic identity, whether the student is
economically disadvantaged and whether the  student is eligible for special education and re-
lated services.
(3) For the state, the department shall issue a report card that describes for the state:
(a) Each of the components described in subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) The percentage of students identified as talented and  gifted children for school dis-
tricts, based on whether the  school district is small, medium or large, as defined by the State
Board of Education by rule.
(4) The State  Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the administration
of this section, including limitations on the disclosure of information  to ensure that per-
sonally identifiable information about an individual student is not disclosed.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 329.105 is amended to read:
329.105. (1) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall collect  data and produce annual
school district and school performance reports  to provide information to parents and to improve
schools.
(2) The superintendent shall include in the school district  and school performance reports data
for the following  areas, for each school or district, that are available to the Department of Educa-
tion from the most recent school year:
(a) Data required by the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95, 129 Stat. 1802);
(b) Information about how to access  the website that is maintained by the State Department of
Geology and Mineral Industries as provided by ORS 516.030 (6)(b);
(c) Information related to the number of children served in  the district and the number of chil-
dren who are susceptible to restrictable disease, as reported under ORS 433.269 (2)(a); [ and]
(d) The information identified in section 2 of this 2025 Act; and
[(d)] (e) Any other data identified by the Department of Education as required by  federal law
to be in the reports.
(3) In addition to the data required by subsection (2) of this section, the superintendent  may
include other data on the school district and school performance reports.
(4) The department shall work with stakeholders to:
(a) Design and implement  an accountability system of progressive interventions for schools and
school districts that do not demonstrate improvement; and
(b) Provide technical  assistance to schools and school districts that do not demonstrate im-
provement.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 329.115 is amended to read:
329.115. (1)  Prior to December 1 of each year, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall is-
[3]
SB 933
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
sue an Oregon Report Card on the state of the public schools of this state.
(2) The Oregon Report Card shall include information on the following:
(a) Data required by the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95, 129 Stat. 1802); [ and]
(b) The information identified in section 2 of this 2025 Act; and
[(b)] (c) Any other data identified by the Department of Education as required by federal law.
(3) In addition to the information required under subsection (2)  of this section, the superinten-
dent may include other information in the Oregon Report Card.
[4]