Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 171.745 is amended to read:
171.745. (1) A lobbyist registered with the Oregon Government Ethics Commission  or required
to register with the commission shall, according to the schedule described in ORS  171.752, file with
the commission a statement showing for the applicable reporting period:
(a) The total amount of all moneys expended for food,  refreshments and entertainment by the
lobbyist for the purpose of lobbying.
(b) The name of any legislative official or executive official to whom or for whose benefit,  on
any one  occasion, an expenditure is made for the purposes of lobbying, and the date, name of payee,
purpose and amount of that expenditure. This paragraph applies if the  total amount expended on the
occasion by one or more persons exceeds $50.
(c)(A) Each bill or measure that is  introduced before the Legislative Assembly on which
the lobbyist has engaged in lobbying activities.
(B) For each bill or measure reported under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph:
(i) A statement as to whether the lobbyist  engaged in lobbying activities in support of the
bill or measure, in opposition to the bill or measure  or whether the lobbyist was neutral on
the bill or measure, but sought amendments to the bill or measure; and
(ii) The name of each person or  entity that hired the lobbyist for the purpose of lobbying
on the bill or measure.
(d)(A) A listing of each legislative topic on which the lobbyist has engaged  in lobbying
activities that is not part of a  bill or measure that is introduced before the Legislative As-
sembly reported under paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(B) For each topic reported under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the name of  each
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1885
HB 2577
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
person or entity that hired the lobbyist for the purpose of lobbying.
(e) The total amount of  moneys paid to the lobbyist for the purpose of lobbying by each
person or entity identified in paragraph (c)(B)(ii) or (d)(B) of this subsection.
(2) Statements required by this section need not include:
(a) Amounts expended  by the lobbyist for personal living and travel expenses and office over-
head, including salaries and wages paid for staff and  secretarial assistance, and maintenance ex-
penses; or
(b) Amounts expended by the lobbyist on lobbying another  lobbyist who is registered with the
commission or required to register with the  commission, or on lobbying any person on whose behalf
a lobbyist is registered or required to register. This paragraph does not apply if the  person lobbied
is a legislative official, an executive official or a member of a state board or commission.
(3) If the  amount of any expenditure required to be included in a statement is not accurately
known at the time the statement is required to be filed, an estimate  of the expenditure shall be
submitted in the statement and designated as an estimate.  The exact amount expended for which a
previous estimate was made shall be submitted in a subsequent report when the information  is
available.
(4) A statement required by this section shall include a copy of any notice provided to a  public
official or candidate under ORS 244.100.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 171.745, as amended by section 2, chapter 701, Oregon Laws 2013,  is amended
to read:
171.745. (1) A lobbyist registered with the Oregon Government Ethics Commission  or required
to register with the commission shall, according to the schedule described in ORS  171.752, file with
the commission a statement showing for the applicable reporting period:
(a) The total amount of all moneys expended for food,  refreshments and entertainment by the
lobbyist for the purpose of lobbying.
(b) The name of any legislative official or executive official to whom or for whose benefit,  on
any one  occasion, an expenditure is made for the purposes of lobbying, and the date, name of payee,
purpose and amount of that expenditure. This paragraph applies if the  total amount expended on the
occasion by one or more persons exceeds $50.
(c)(A) Each bill or measure that is  introduced before the Legislative Assembly on which
the lobbyist has engaged in lobbying activities.
(B) For each bill or measure reported under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph:
(i) A statement as to whether the lobbyist  engaged in lobbying activities in support of the
bill or measure, in opposition to the bill or measure  or whether the lobbyist was neutral on
the bill or measure, but sought amendments to the bill or measure; and
(ii) The name of each person or  entity that hired the lobbyist for the purpose of lobbying
on the bill or measure.
(d)(A) A listing of each legislative topic on which the lobbyist has engaged  in lobbying
activities that is not part of a  bill or measure that is introduced before the Legislative As-
sembly reported under paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(B) For each topic reported under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the name of  each
person or entity that hired the lobbyist for the purpose of lobbying.
(e) The total amount of  moneys paid to the lobbyist for the purpose of lobbying by each
person or entity identified in paragraph (c)(B)(ii) or (d)(B) of this subsection.
(2) Statements required by this section need  not include amounts expended by the lobbyist for
[2]
HB 2577
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
personal living and travel expenses and office overhead, including salaries  and wages paid for staff
and secretarial assistance, and maintenance expenses.
(3) If the  amount of any expenditure required to be included in a statement is not accurately
known at the time the statement is required to be filed, an estimate  of the expenditure shall be
submitted in the statement and designated as an estimate.  The exact amount expended for which a
previous estimate was made shall be submitted in a subsequent report when the information  is
available.
(4) A statement required by this section shall include a copy of any notice provided to a  public
official or candidate under ORS 244.100.
SECTION 3.  ORS 171.772 is amended to read:
171.772. In carrying out  the provisions of ORS 171.725 to 171.785, the Oregon Government Ethics
Commission shall:
(1) Prescribe by rule forms  for registrations, statements and reports required to be filed by ORS
171.725 to  171.785 and provide the forms to persons required to register and to file the statements
and reports.
(2) Accept and file any information voluntarily supplied  that exceeds the requirements of ORS
171.725 to 171.785.
(3) Make registrations, statements and reports filed available  for public inspection and copying
during regular office  hours, and make copying facilities available at a charge not to exceed actual
cost.
(4) Adopt by  rule an electronic filing system under which statements required to be filed under
ORS 171.745 and 171.750  must be filed with the commission in an electronic format. The commission
may not charge a fee for filing a statement under this subsection.
(5) Provide training on procedures for filing statements under subsection (4) of this section.
(6) Make statements and information contained within the statements  filed under ORS
171.745 and 171.750 available in a searchable format for review by the public using the  Internet.
The searchable format must permit the public to view:
(a) For each bill or measure that is introduced before the Legislative Assembly:
(A) The name of  each lobbyist that has engaged in lobbying activities in support of the
bill or measure, and the name of the person  or entity that hired each lobbyist identified in
this subparagraph;
(B) The  name of each lobbyist that has engaged in lobbying activities in opposition to the
bill or measure, and the name of the person  or entity that hired each lobbyist identified in
this subparagraph; and
(C) The name of each  lobbyist that has engaged in lobbying activities that were neutral
to the bill or measure, but which involved seeking an amendment or amendments to  the bill
or measure, and the name  of the person or entity that hired each lobbyist identified in this
subparagraph.
(b) For each person or entity that hired a lobbyist:
(A) The name of each lobbyist hired by the person or entity;
(B) Each bill or measure that is introduced before the Legislative  Assembly on which
each lobbyist identified in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph engaged in lobbying activities;
(C) Each legislative topic other than a bill or  measure before the Legislative Assembly
on which each lobbyist identified in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph engaged in  lobbying
activities; and
[3]
HB 2577
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(D) The total amount of moneys  the person or entity paid to each lobbyist identified in
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph for the purpose of lobbying.
(c) For each lobbyist:
(A) Each bill or measure  that is introduced before the Legislative Assembly for which the
lobbyist engaged in lobbying activities in support  of the bill or measure, and the name of the
person or entity that hired the lobbyist for each bill or measure identified  in this subpara-
graph;
(B) Each bill or measure that  is introduced before the Legislative Assembly for which the
lobbyist engaged in lobbying activities in opposition to the bill or measure, and the name of
the person  or entity that hired the lobbyist for each bill or measure identified in this sub-
paragraph;
(C) Each bill or measure that is introduced  before the Legislative Assembly for which the
lobbyist engaged in lobbying activities that  were neutral to the bill or measure, but which
involved seeking an amendment or amendments to the bill or measure, and the name of the
person or entity that hired the lobbyist for each bill or measure identified  in this subpara-
graph;
(D) Each legislative topic on which the lobbyist has engaged in  lobbying activities that is
not included in subparagraphs (A) to (C) of this paragraph, and the name of the person or
entity that hired the lobbyist for each topic identified in this subparagraph; and
(E) The total amount of moneys paid  to the lobbyist by each person or entity that hired
the lobbyist for the purpose of lobbying.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 171.735 is amended to read:
171.735. ORS 171.740 and 171.745 do not apply to the following persons:
(1) News media, or their employees or agents,  that in the ordinary course of business directly
or indirectly urge legislative  action but that engage in no other activities in connection with the
legislative action.
(2) Any legislative official acting in an official capacity.
(3) Any  individual who does not receive compensation or reimbursement of expenses for lobby-
ing, who limits lobbying  activities solely to formal appearances to give testimony before public ses-
sions of committees of the Legislative Assembly,  or public hearings of state agencies, and who, when
testifying, registers an appearance in the records of the committees or agencies.
[(4) A person who does not: ]
[(a) Agree  to provide personal services for money or any other consideration for the purpose of
lobbying; ]
[(b) Spend more  than an  aggregate amount of  24 hours during any calendar quarter lobbying;
and]
[(c) Spend an aggregate amount in excess of $100 lobbying during any calendar quarter. ]
[(5)] (4)  The Governor, chief of staff for the Governor, deputy chief of staff  for the Governor,
legal counsel to the Governor, deputy legal counsel  to the Governor, Secretary of State, Deputy
Secretary of State appointed pursuant to ORS 177.040, State Treasurer, Deputy  State Treasurer ap-
pointed pursuant to ORS 178.060, chief of staff for the office  of the State Treasurer, Attorney Gen-
eral, Deputy Attorney General appointed pursuant to  ORS 180.130, Deputy Superintendent of Public
Instruction appointed pursuant to ORS  326.300, Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries,
deputy commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries appointed  pursuant to ORS 651.060,
members and staff of the Oregon  Law Commission who conduct the law revision program of the
[4]
HB 2577
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
commission or any judge.
(5) Any person not otherwise exempt from ORS 171.740 and 171.745 under  subsections (1)
to (4) of this section, unless the person:
(a) Resides, is based, is employed or operates as a contractor in this state and:
(A) Agrees to provide personal services for money or any other consideration for  the
purpose of lobbying; or
(B) Holds a position with a public body as  defined in ORS 174.109, or with a private entity,
with work responsibilities that include lobbying;
(b) Spends more than an aggregate amount of 24 hours  lobbying during any calendar
quarter; or
(c) Spends an aggregate amount in excess of $100 lobbying during any calendar quarter.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 171.740, as amended by section 2, chapter 101, Oregon Laws 2016,  is amended
to read:
171.740. (1) Within three business days [ after exceeding the limit of time or  expenditure specified
in ORS 171.735 (4), or within three business days after agreeing  to provide personal services for money
or any  other consideration for the purpose of lobbying, ] of meeting the requirements for any sit-
uation described in ORS 171.735 (5),  a lobbyist shall register with the Oregon  Government Ethics
Commission by filing with the commission a statement containing the following information:
(a) The name, address, electronic mail address and telephone number of the lobbyist.
(b) The name, address,  electronic mail address and telephone number of each person that em-
ploys the lobbyist or in whose interest the lobbyist appears or works.
(c) A general description of the trade, business, profession or area of  endeavor of any person
designated under  paragraph (b) of this subsection, and a statement by the person that the lobbyist
is officially authorized to lobby for the person.
(d) The name of any member of the  Legislative Assembly employed, retained or otherwise com-
pensated by:
(A) The lobbyist designated under paragraph (a) of this subsection; or
(B) A person designated under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(e) The general subject or subjects of the legislative action of interest to the person for  whom
the lobbyist is registered.
(2)(a) Not later than 10 calendar days after a lobbyist files a registration statement under this
section, the designation of official authorization to lobby shall be signed by an official of each person
that employs the lobbyist or in whose interest the lobbyist appears or works.
(b) A lobbyist may unilaterally withdraw a  registration statement filed under this section not
more than one time per calendar year for each person  designated under subsection (1)(b) of this
section if the withdrawal is made:
(A) Before the designation  of official authorization to lobby has been signed in the manner re-
quired under paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
(B) No more than 10 calendar days after the lobbyist filed the registration statement.
(3) A lobbyist  must file a separate registration statement under subsection (1) of this section for
each person that employs the  lobbyist or in whose interest the lobbyist appears or works. If a
lobbyist appears or works for a person for whom the lobbyist  has not registered, the lobbyist shall
register with the commission not  later than three business days after the day the lobbyist first ap-
pears or works for the person.
(4)(a) Except as provided  in paragraph (b) of this subsection, if any of the information submitted
[5]
HB 2577
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
by a lobbyist in the statement required under subsection (1) of this section changes,  the lobbyist
shall revise the statement within 30 days of the change.
(b) A  lobbyist shall notify the commission within three business days if the lobbyist ceases to
represent a person for whom the lobbyist is registered. Notification must be made by updating the
registration statement required under subsection (1) of this section.
(5) A lobbyist registration expires December 31  of each odd-numbered year. If a lobbyist renews
the registration before January 31 of the  following even-numbered year, the commission shall con-
sider the registration to have been  effective as of December 31 of the odd-numbered year on which
the registration expired.
(6) For the statement required by subsection (1) of this section,  an entity composed of more than
one lobbyist  may file one statement for the lobbyists who compose the entity. The statement the
entity files must include the names of the individuals authorized to lobby on behalf of the client
listed in the statement.
SECTION 6.
(1) The amendments to  ORS 171.745 and 171.772 by sections 1 to 3 of this 2017
Act become operative on January 1, 2019.
(2) The  amendments to ORS 171.735 and 171.740 by sections 4 and 5 of this 2017 Act first
apply to lobbying, the registration of  lobbyists and the filing of lobbyist registration state-
ments and updates or revisions to lobbyist  registration statements that occur on or after the
effective date of this 2017 Act.
[6]