Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding any other law, if a public body receives moneys  that
derive from the levy of a fine or civil penalty authorized under state law, the public  body
shall promptly transfer the entirety of such moneys to the  State Treasurer for deposit in the
General Fund for general governmental purposes.
(2) As used  in this section, “public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1532