Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any provision of ORS 459A.860  to 459A.975, the Department
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 48
HB 4013
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
of Environmental Quality may not take enforcement  action against any person, including but
not limited to producers of wine packaging as determined under ORS 459A.866, if  the
enforcement action arises out  of the person’s failure to satisfy an obligation under ORS
459A.860 to 459A.975 related to wine packaging.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]