Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Department of  Administrative Services and the Attorney Gen-
eral shall study issues related to public procurement and present the results of the study in
a report  to an appropriate committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly in
the manner provided under ORS 192.245 on or before September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2460