Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 517.705 is amended to read:
517.705. (1) A person may not  engage in onshore exploration that disturbs more than one surface
acre or involves drilling to greater than 50 feet except  in compliance with a permit issued by the
State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries under this section.
(2) An application for an onshore exploration permit must include:
(a) The name and address of the surface owner and mineral owner.
(b) The names and addresses of the persons conducting the exploration.
(c) The name and address of any designated agent.
(d) A brief description of the exploration activities, including:
(A) The amount of road to be constructed;
(B) The number, depth and location of proposed drill holes;
(C) The number, depth and location of proposed monitoring wells; and
(D) The number, length, width and depth of exploration trenches.
(e) Provisions for the reclamation of surface disturbance caused by exploration activities.
(f) Exploration drill hole or monitoring well abandonment procedures, including:
(A) The capping of all holes;
(B) The plugging of any hole producing surface flow; and
(C) Appropriate sealing for any holes which have encountered aquifers.
(g) An exploration boundary map with the location  of the proposed exploration and delineation
of exploration boundaries.
(h) Such other information as the department by rule may require to assess the impacts  of the
proposed exploration.
(i) A nonrefundable fee of $2,000 per application.
(3) Each permit application may include a  single contiguous exploration boundary that is no
more than 640 acres.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1738
HB 2777
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) Any production records,  mineral assessments or trade secrets submitted as part of the ap-
plication under subsection (2) of this section are confidential.
(5) This section does not apply to a well from which sample materials are acquired, if  the
well was constructed by a water well constructor who is licensed under ORS 537.747.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 517.833 is amended to read:
517.833. (1) A person who by sale, assignment, lease or  other means has succeeded in interest
to an uncompleted surface mining operation may request that the State Department  of Geology and
Mineral Industries release the existing operator from any reclamation obligations  and transfer the
operating permit to the successor. The department [ shall] may  not deny a request  to  transfer
[the] an operating permit, unless  one more of the following conditions occurs :
(a) The successor  does not agree to full assumption of the reclamation requirements in the op-
erating permit and reclamation plan;
(b) The successor fails to provide a bond or security as required by ORS 517.810;
(c) More than one person has a claim to the property or operating permit and there is a dispute
between the claimants that presents a justiciable controversy; or
(d) The successor, as the operator  of another permitted site in this state, has failed to substan-
tially comply with the conditions of an operating permit or reclamation plan,  the provisions of ORS
517.702 to 517.989 or the rules adopted by the department to carry  out the purposes of ORS 517.702
to 517.989.
(2) The governing board of the State Department of  Geology and Mineral Industries may adopt
rules relating to the responsibilities and duties of a person requesting a transfer  of an operating
permit under this section.  Rules adopted under this subsection  may not impose conditions on
the transfer of an operating permit in addition  to those described in subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) A person requesting a transfer of a permit shall pay to the  department a fee not to
exceed $250.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 517.830 is amended to read:
517.830. (1) Upon receipt of an application for an operating permit, the State  Department of
Geology and Mineral Industries shall:
(a) Inspect the operating site described in the application;
(b) Provide notice to the local jurisdiction and an opportunity for  the local jurisdiction to,
within 30 days after the date of the notice, request that  the department delay a decision on an op-
erating permit and reclamation plan as provided in subsection (4) of this section; and
(c) If the application is not  subject to the consolidated application process under ORS 517.952
to 517.989, provide notice to each federal and state permitting agency, as defined in ORS  517.952,
and each cooperating agency and provide an  opportunity for the agencies to, within 30 days after
the date of the notice, respond in writing to the department identifying reasonably expected  adverse
effects of the proposed mining operation on land, air, water or wildlife resources.
(2) Within 90 days after the  date that the application and the required permit fee are received,
the department shall issue the operating permit applied for or,  if it considers the application in-
complete, return the application to the applicant for  correction of the deficiencies indicated by the
department. An  operating permit that is not subject to ORS 517.952 to 517.989 shall contain rea-
sonable conditions designed to  avoid or minimize an adverse effect identified by an agency pursuant
to subsection (1)(c) of this section, provided:
(a) A permit  issued by a federal, state or local permitting agency approving the mining operation
[2]
HB 2777
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
does not include provisions to mitigate the adverse effect; and
(b) The land use decision issued  by the local government approving the mining operation does
not include provisions to mitigate the adverse effect.
(3) Failure by the department to act upon the reclamation plan submitted with an application
for an operating permit within the 90-day period referred to in subsection (2) of this  section is not
a denial by the department of the operating permit applied for. The department, pending final  ap-
proval  of  a reclamation plan, may issue a provisional permit subject to reasonable limitations that
may be prescribed by the department and  conditioned upon the applicant’s compliance with the bond
and security requirements established by ORS 517.810.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, if an application involves  an ag-
gregate site that requires a permit issued pursuant to ORS 215.427 or  227.178, and if the local ju-
risdiction requests that the  application not be decided until the local jurisdiction has taken final
action, the department shall make a final decision on the operating permit and reclamation  plan no
later than 165 days after the date a complete land use application is submitted to the local juris-
diction, unless the applicant agrees to allow additional time under  ORS 215.427, 215.429, 227.178 or
227.179. If a plan amendment is required as part of issuance of a permit, the  provisions of paragraph
(b) of this subsection apply. The department may not approve an operating  permit and reclamation
plan if the land use application is denied.
(b) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3)  of this section, if an application involves an aggre-
gate site that requires  amendment to a comprehensive plan, as defined in ORS 197.015, and if the
local jurisdiction requests that the application not  be decided until the local jurisdiction has taken
final action on the plan amendment, the department  may not make a final decision on the operating
permit and reclamation plan until  the local jurisdiction has taken final action on the plan amend-
ment. The department shall make its final decision  within 45 days of the date that the local juris-
diction has taken  final action on the plan amendment. The department may not approve an operating
permit and reclamation plan if the plan amendment is denied.
(5)(a) Conditions and requirements imposed on an operating permit and reclamation plan,  and
modifications thereto, issued subsequent  to issuance of a local jurisdiction permit shall be compat-
ible with the requirements  and conditions of the local government permit, unless more stringent
requirements are necessary to comply with the provisions of ORS 517.750 to 517.901.
(b) The department, or any  other permitting agency pursuant to the consolidated appli-
cation process under ORS 517.952 to 517.989, may not require a  land use compatibility state-
ment for a proposed activity if the proposed activity has been  authorized in a local
jurisdiction permit or other special land use authorization.
(6)(a) If a local jurisdiction does not request that the  department delay a decision on an oper-
ating permit and reclamation plan as provided in subsections (1)(b) and (4) of  this section, the de-
partment shall, prior to issuing the operating permit, give the local jurisdiction notice and an
opportunity to provide comments and the following information about the proposed operating permit
and reclamation plan:
(A) Information about any applicable local land use regulations;
(B) Whether the site described in the proposed operating permit and reclamation plan is in-
cluded on a local government inventory required by any open spaces, scenic and historic areas  and
natural resources land use planning goal;
(C) A statement that an application has or has not been filed for local approval; and
(D) Any other information that the local jurisdiction considers pertinent in  its review of the
[3]
HB 2777
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
application.
(b) A local jurisdiction shall respond to a notice provided under paragraph (a) of this subsection
within 35 days after the date of the notice.
(7) If the department refuses to approve a submitted reclamation plan, it  shall notify the appli-
cant, in writing, of its reasons for the refusal to approve the reclamation  plan, including additional
requirements as may be prescribed  by the department for inclusion in the reclamation plan. Within
60 days after the receipt of the notice, the applicant  shall comply with the additional requirements
prescribed by the department for the reclamation plan or file with  the department a notice of appeal
from the decision of the department with respect to the reclamation plan. If a notice of appeal  is
filed with the department by the applicant, the  department may issue a provisional permit to the
applicant.
(8) If an  application is submitted as part of the consolidated application process under ORS
517.952 to 517.989, review of the application and approval or denial of the application  shall be in
accordance  with  ORS 517.952 to 517.989. However, the review and approval or denial shall take into
consideration all policy considerations for issuing a permit under ORS 517.702 to 517.989.
[4]