Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, for the purposes of:
(1) Developing academic content standards for Oregon Studies in the manner described
in ORS 329.492; and
(2) Supporting teacher training and classroom instruction in Oregon Studies  in the
manner described in ORS 329.492.
SECTION 2. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2610