Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Each public university listed in ORS 352.002 and community college op-
erated under ORS chapter 341 shall pay part-time faculty at  the same rate, on a per-hour
basis, that the public university or  community college pays equally experienced full-time
faculty who teach comparable courses.
(2) In determining the number of hours worked by part-time faculty and full-time faculty
under this section, each public university and community  college must include all hours
spent working in the normal course of teaching a course,  including but not limited to time
spent:
(a) In class;
(b) Preparing to teach each class;
(c) Conducting office hours for enrolled students; and
(d) Grading.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2023, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $ , which shall be allocated to the
Community College Support Fund established in ORS 341.620 and the Public University  Fund
established in ORS 352.450 for the purpose of paying for  the cost to implement section 1 of
this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1874