Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
TESTING OF WELLS THAT SUPPLY
GROUND WATER FOR DOMESTIC PURPOSES
SECTION 1. As used in ORS 448.268 and 448.271 and sections 3 and 4 of this 2019 Act:
(1) “Area of ground water concern” has the meaning given that term in ORS 468B.150.
(2) “Contaminant” has the meaning given that term in ORS 468B.150.
(3) “Local public health authority” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431.003.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 448.271 is amended to read:
448.271. (1) In any transaction for the sale or  exchange of real estate that includes a well that
supplies ground water for  domestic purposes, the seller of the real estate shall, upon accepting an
offer to purchase [ that] the  real estate, have the well tested for arsenic, nitrates and total  coliform
bacteria.  The  Oregon Health Authority [ also may,] by rule[ ,] may require additional tests for specific
contaminants in specific areas of  public health concern. Tests required under this subsection
must be conducted by  an environmental laboratory that is accredited under the environ-
mental laboratory  accreditation program established under ORS 438.615. The seller shall sub-
mit the results  of the tests required under this [ section] subsection  to the authority and to the
[buyer] purchaser within 90 days of receiving the results of the tests.
[(2)] The failure of a seller to comply with [ the provisions of this section ] this subsection  does
not invalidate an instrument of conveyance executed in the transaction.
(2) The authority shall:
(a) For purposes related to education, analyze the results of tests  received by the au-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 843
HB 2860
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
thority under subsection (1) of this section;
(b) Identify areas with likely ground water contaminant problems; and
(c) Provide ground  water contaminant education in areas identified as having ground
water contaminant problems.
(3) The  authority shall provide the results of tests received by the authority under sub-
section (1) of this section and any information derived from  the authority’s activities under
subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section to the Department of  Environmental Quality. The
department may use that information in the administration of ORS  468B.150 to 468B.190.
Upon request, the department shall assist the authority in fulfilling the authority’s  duties
under subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section.
(4) To fulfill its duties under subsection (2)(c) of this section, the authority may:
(a) Collaborate with the department or any  other state agency to provide ground water
contaminant education; or
(b) Notify a local public health authority that ground water  contaminant education is
needed in an area subject to the jurisdiction of the local public health authority.
(5) The authority may adopt rules to implement this section.
GRANTS AND LOANS
SECTION 3.
(1) The  Oregon Health Authority may make grants and loans from the Safe
Well Water  Fund established under section 5 of this 2019 Act for the purpose of assisting
low-income and rental property owners with installation of treatment systems  for ground
water that has contaminant problems or with  repair or replacement of wells because of
ground water that has contaminant problems.
(2) The authority shall identify appropriate property owners for receipt  of a grant or loan
under this section. At a minimum, a property owner that receives a grant or loan under this
section must:
(a) Be a low-income property owner, as determined by the  authority, or a rental property
owner;
(b) Have had the ground water supply of  the property tested by an environmental labo-
ratory that is accredited under  the environmental laboratory accreditation program estab-
lished under ORS 438.615; and
(c) Have received test results indicating  that the ground water supply of the property
poses a health risk.
(3) The authority shall provide property owners  that receive a grant or loan under this
section with information necessary  to install a treatment system or to repair or replace a
well, including information on the efficacy of  different treatment systems or well designs and
information on businesses that sell treatment systems or that repair or replace wells. The
authority may provide information as  required by this section by posting information on a
website maintained by the authority  and providing notice of the website to property owners
that receive a grant or loan under this section.
(4) The authority shall require a property owner that receives a loan under this  section
to repay the loan within five years after receiving the loan.
(5) The authority may pay the expenses incurred by  the authority in administering this
section out of  moneys that are available for the purpose of making grants or loans under this
[2]
HB 2860
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section.
(6) The authority may adopt rules necessary to administer this section.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority  may make grants from the Safe Well Wa-
ter Fund established under section  5 of this 2019 Act for the purpose of assisting local public
health authorities, nonprofit organizations, soil and water conservation districts and the
Oregon State University Extension Service with:
(a) Providing ground water contaminant education in an area that has  been identified by
the authority as having a ground water contaminant problem; and
(b) Providing for the free or low-cost testing of wells.
(2) For purposes of  making grants under this section, the authority shall identify appro-
priate recipients of grant moneys. In identifying appropriate recipients of grant  moneys, the
authority shall consider  whether the recipient is qualified and capable of providing ground
water contaminant education as described in subsection (1)(a) of this  section or providing for
the free or low-cost testing of wells as described in subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(3) The authority shall  provide recipients of grant moneys under this section with the
technical support necessary to provide ground water contaminant education as described in
subsection (1)(a) of this section or to provide  for the free or low-cost testing of wells as de-
scribed in subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(4) The authority may pay the expenses incurred by  the authority in administering this
section out of moneys that are available for  the purpose of making grants under this section.
(5) The authority may adopt rules necessary to administer this section.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Safe Well Water Fund  is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The Safe Well Water Fund shall consist of  all moneys placed in the fund as provided
by law.
(3) Moneys  in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority for
purposes described in sections 3 and 4 of this 2019 Act.
(4) The authority may accept from any source any grant, donation or  gift of moneys for
deposit in the fund.
LANDLORD TESTING OF DRINKING WATER
SECTION 6. Section 7 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 90.100 to 90.465.
SECTION 7. (1) For each dwelling unit rented by a landlord for which a source of drinking
water is a well, the landlord shall collect samples of drinking water  in accordance with this
section, for the purpose of having those samples tested in  accordance with rules adopted by
the Oregon Health Authority.
(2)(a) A landlord subject  to this section must ensure that each well for which drinking
water is collected under this section is tested as follows:
(A) The drinking water must be tested for arsenic at least once during the life of  the
well, no later than 30 days after installing the well.
(B) Except as provided  in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, the drinking water
must be tested for total coliform bacteria and nitrates at least once each year. If the results
of a test conducted under  this subparagraph confirm that drinking water collected under this
section contains:
[3]
HB 2860
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) Any amount of total coliform  bacteria, the landlord must, as soon as practicable, treat
the drinking water or repair or replace the well and retest the drinking water to confirm
that all coliform bacteria has been removed; or
(ii) An amount of nitrates that exceeds the amount  of nitrates that drinking water may
safely contain  as established by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the
landlord must, as soon  as practicable, treat the drinking water or repair or replace the well
and retest the drinking water to confirm that nitrates are at an acceptable level.
(b) If the results  of tests conducted under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection for three
consecutive years confirm that drinking water collected under  this section does not contain
any total  coliform bacteria or nitrates, the landlord is not required to collect and test
drinking water from that well for total coliform bacteria and nitrates for  the next five years.
(c) If the results of the first test conducted under paragraph (a)(B)  of this subsection
following a five-year period of a landlord not being required to conduct  a test to confirm that
drinking water  collected under this section does not contain any total coliform bacteria or
nitrates, the landlord is not required to collect and  test drinking water from that well for
total coliform bacteria and nitrates for the next five years.
(3)(a) In accordance with rules adopted by the Oregon Health Authority:
(A) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a  landlord subject to this
section shall collect samples of drinking water from a dwelling unit’s  primary dispenser of
drinking water.
(B) A landlord subject to this section may collect supplementary samples of  drinking
water from a dwelling unit’s other dispensers of  drinking water or from a dwelling unit’s
well head.
(C) A landlord subject to this section must request a laboratory conducting a  test pur-
suant to this section to electronically report the results of the test to the Department  of
Environmental Quality.
(b) A landlord subject to this section may delegate the landlord’s duty  to collect samples
of drinking water to a tenant  if the landlord and the tenant agree to the delegation in writing
and the agreement is made in good faith and for adequate consideration.
(c) When submitting samples of drinking water collected under this section to  a labora-
tory for testing, a landlord shall inform the laboratory that the testing is required pursuant
to this section.
(4) A laboratory conducting a test pursuant to this section must:
(a) Be accredited under the environmental laboratory accreditation program established
under ORS 438.615; and
(b) At the request of the landlord:
(A) Electronically report the results of  the test to the department in a form and manner
prescribed by the department, which may  include reporting of the results through electronic
mail using a spreadsheet; and
(B) Send the full laboratory report to  the landlord in a form showing the absence or
presence of  total coliform bacteria, the concentration of nitrates in milligrams per liter or
parts per million and, if applicable, the concentration of arsenic in milligrams per liter  or
parts per million in the drinking water.
(5) If a tenant is occupying the dwelling unit for  which a test was conducted pursuant
to this section, the landlord  must provide the results of the test to the tenant in one of the
[4]
HB 2860
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
following formats:
(a) A format showing the absence or presence  of total coliform bacteria, the concen-
tration of nitrates in milligrams per  liter or parts per million and, if applicable, the concen-
tration of arsenic in milligrams per liter or parts per million in the drinking water; or
(b) A format showing only whether the dwelling unit passed or failed  the test described
in subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(6) In order to provide the results of a test  to a tenant under subsection (5) of this sec-
tion, a landlord shall either:
(a) Direct the laboratory that conducted the test to send the  full laboratory report to the
tenant directly; or
(b) Provide the results to the tenant  using the form adopted by the Oregon Health Au-
thority under subsection (9)(a) of this section.
(7) At the beginning of  a tenancy for a dwelling unit for which a landlord must collect
and test drinking water under this section, the landlord must provide to the tenant:
(a) Notice that the dwelling unit has a well as a source of drinking water;
(b) Notice that the dwelling unit’s drinking  water has been tested for arsenic, total
coliform bacteria and nitrates;
(c) The results of the most recent test for arsenic, in a  format described in subsection
(5) of this section;
(d) The results of the most recent test for total coliform bacteria  and nitrates, in a for-
mat described in subsection (5) of this section;
(e) The date on  which the most recent test for total coliform bacteria and nitrates was
conducted; and
(f) The date on which the next test for total coliform  bacteria and nitrates will be con-
ducted.
(8) Each time a landlord has a sample tested under subsection (2)(a)(B),  (b) or (c) of this
section, no later than 30 days  after receiving the results of the test from the laboratory, the
landlord must provide the tenant of the dwelling  unit for which the landlord conducted the
test with the following information:
(a) If the results of  the test confirm that the drinking water does not contain any total
coliform bacteria or nitrates, with:
(A) Notice of having conducted the test;
(B) The results of the test, in a format described in subsection (5) of this section;
(C) A statement that the tenant may request a copy of the full laboratory reports; and
(D) The date on which the landlord will next test the drinking water.
(b) If the results of the test confirm that the drinking water contains  total coliform
bacteria or nitrates, with:
(A) Notice of having conducted the test;
(B) The results of the test, in a format described in subsection (5) of this section;
(C) A statement that the tenant may request a copy of the full laboratory reports;
(D) The date on which the landlord treated  or will treat the drinking water or on which
the landlord repaired or replaced or will repair or replace the well;
(E) The date on which the landlord will next test the drinking water; and
(F) The handout adopted by the Oregon Health Authority  under subsection (9)(b) of this
section.
[5]
HB 2860
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(9) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt by rule:
(a) A form that a  landlord subject to this section must use to provide information de-
scribed in subsection (8)(a) and (b)(A) to (E) of this section. The form must include a section
that may be filled out by the landlord to indicate whether the  dwelling unit passed or failed
the test, in accordance with the requirements of subsection (2)(a) of this section, and a sec-
tion that may be  filled out by the landlord to indicate the absence or presence of total
coliform bacteria, the concentration of nitrates in milligrams per liter or parts per million
and, if applicable, the concentration of arsenic in milligrams per liter or parts per  million in
the drinking water.
(b) A handout providing information on testing drinking water for contaminants and the
impact that drinking water that contains contaminants can have on a person’s health.
(10) This section does not apply to a dwelling unit that is:
(a) Subject to ORS 90.505 to 90.850; or
(b) Part  of a premises subject to regulation under ORS 448.119 to 448.285, 454.235 and
454.255, as described in ORS 448.119.
(11) If a landlord fails to conduct a test or disclose test results as required  by this sec-
tion, the tenant renting the dwelling  unit from the landlord may recover the actual damages
of the tenant or $300, whichever is greater.
SECTION 8.
Notwithstanding section 7 (2) of this 2019 Act, if  the results of the first test
of drinking water for total  coliform bacteria and nitrates following the operative date speci-
fied in section 13 of this 2019 Act confirm that drinking water collected under section 7  of
this 2019 Act does not  contain any total coliform bacteria or nitrates, the landlord of the
dwelling unit for which the test is conducted is not required to collect and test the drinking
water for that dwelling unit for the next five years.
SECTION 9.
Notwithstanding section 7 (2)(a)(A) of this 2019 Act, for each dwelling unit
rented by a landlord before the operative date specified in section 13 of this  2019 Act for
which a source of drinking water is a well, the landlord shall:
(1) Collect and test samples  of drinking water in accordance with section 7 of this 2019
Act no later than 60 days after the operative date specified in section 13  of this 2019 Act; and
(2) Provide the tenant of the dwelling unit for which the landlord conducted  the test with
the information  described in section 7 (6) of this 2019 Act no later than 90 days after the
operative date specified in section 13 of this 2019 Act.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 10.  ORS 468B.150 is amended to read:
468B.150. As used in ORS [ 448.268, 448.271 and] 468B.150 to 468B.190:
(1) “Area of ground water concern” means an area of  the state subject to a declaration by the
Department of  Environmental Quality under ORS 468B.175 or the Oregon Health Authority under
ORS 448.268.
(2) “Contaminant” means any chemical, ion, radionuclide, synthetic organic compound,
microorganism, waste or other  substance that does not occur naturally in ground water or that oc-
curs naturally but at a lower concentration.
(3) “Ground water management area” means an area  in which contaminants in the ground water
have exceeded the levels established under ORS 468B.165, and the  affected area is subject to a
[6]
HB 2860
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
declaration under ORS 468B.180.
(4) “Fertilizer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 633.311.
(5) “Pesticide” has the meaning given that term in ORS 634.006.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 90.320 is amended to read:
90.320. (1) A landlord shall at all times during  the tenancy maintain the dwelling unit in a
habitable condition. For purposes of this section, a  dwelling unit shall be considered unhabitable if
it substantially lacks:
(a) Effective waterproofing and weather protection of roof  and exterior walls, including windows
and doors;
(b) Plumbing facilities that conform to applicable law in effect at the time  of installation, and
maintained in good working order;
(c) A water supply approved under applicable law that is:
(A) Under the control  of the tenant or landlord and is capable of producing hot and cold running
water;
(B) Furnished to appropriate fixtures;
(C) Connected to a sewage disposal system approved under applicable law; and
(D) Maintained so as to provide safe drinking water , including as demonstrated by  a test or
a treatment  as required by section 7 of this 2019 Act for a dwelling unit with a well as a
source of drinking water,  and to be in good working order to the extent that the  system can be
controlled by the landlord;
(d) Adequate heating facilities that  conform to applicable law at the time of installation and
maintained in good working order;
(e) Electrical lighting  with wiring and electrical equipment that conform to applicable law at the
time of installation and maintained in good working order;
(f) Buildings, grounds and appurtenances at the  time of the commencement of the rental agree-
ment in every part safe for normal and reasonably foreseeable uses, clean, sanitary  and free from
all accumulations of debris, filth, rubbish, garbage, rodents and vermin, and all areas under  control
of the  landlord kept in every part safe for normal and reasonably foreseeable uses, clean, sanitary
and free from all accumulations of debris, filth, rubbish, garbage, rodents and vermin;
(g) Except as otherwise provided by local ordinance or by written agreement between the land-
lord and the tenant, an adequate  number of appropriate receptacles for garbage and rubbish in clean
condition and good repair at the  time of the commencement of the rental agreement, and the land-
lord shall provide and maintain appropriate serviceable  receptacles thereafter and arrange for their
removal;
(h) Floors, walls, ceilings, stairways and railings maintained in good repair;
(i) Ventilating, air  conditioning and other facilities and appliances, including elevators, main-
tained in good repair if supplied or required to be supplied by the landlord;
(j) Safety from fire hazards,  including a working smoke alarm or smoke detector, with working
batteries  if  solely battery-operated, provided only at the beginning of any new tenancy when the
tenant first takes possession of the premises, as provided in ORS 479.270, but not to  include the
tenant’s testing of the smoke alarm or smoke detector as provided in ORS 90.325 (1);
(k) A carbon monoxide alarm, and the dwelling unit:
(A) Contains a carbon monoxide source; or
(B) Is located  within a structure that contains a carbon monoxide source and the dwelling unit
is connected to the room in which the carbon monoxide source is located by a door, ductwork or a
[7]
HB 2860
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
ventilation shaft; or
(L) Working locks for all  dwelling entrance doors, and, unless contrary to applicable law,
latches for all windows, by  which access may be had to that portion of the premises that the tenant
is entitled under the rental agreement  to occupy to the exclusion of others and keys for those locks
that require keys.
(2) The landlord and tenant may agree in writing that the tenant is to perform specified repairs,
maintenance tasks and minor remodeling only if:
(a) The agreement of the parties is entered into in good faith and not for the  purpose of evading
the obligations of the landlord;
(b) The agreement does not  diminish the obligations of the landlord to other tenants in the
premises; and
(c) The terms and conditions of  the agreement are clearly and fairly disclosed and adequate
consideration for the agreement is specifically stated.
(3) Any provisions of this section that  reasonably apply only to a structure that is used as a
home, residence or sleeping place shall not apply to a  manufactured dwelling, recreational vehicle
or floating home where the tenant owns the manufactured dwelling, recreational  vehicle or floating
home, rents the  space and, in the case of a dwelling or home, the space is not in a facility. Manu-
factured dwelling or floating home tenancies in which the tenant owns  the dwelling or home and
rents space in a facility shall be governed by ORS 90.730, not by this section.
APPROPRIATION
SECTION 12. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $ , for deposit in  the Safe Well Water Fund estab-
lished in section 5 of this 2019 Act.
OPERATIVE DATE
SECTION 13. (1) Sections 6 to 9 of this 2019  Act and the amendments to ORS 90.320 by
section 11 of this 2019 Act become operative on March 1, 2020.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take any  action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the authority to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the authority by  sections 6 to 9 of this 2019 Act and the amend-
ments to ORS 90.320 by section 11 of this 2019 Act.
UNIT CAPTIONS
SECTION 14. The unit captions used in this 2019 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2019 Act.
[8]