Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 247.
SECTION 2. (1) A person who is registering to vote in accordance with  ORS 247.012 (1)
for the first time must provide evidence of the person’s United States citizenship  with the
registration.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1) of this  section, evidence of United States citizenship
may include the original or a legible photocopy of the person’s:
(a) Birth certificate, including any legal documentation proving that the person’s  legal
name has changed since birth.
(b) United States passport.
(c) United States naturalization documents.
(d) United States Bureau of Indian Affairs  card number, tribal treaty card number or
tribal enrollment number.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 247.171 is amended to read:
247.171. (1) Except as provided  in this subsection, the Secretary of State shall design, prepare
and distribute state voter registration cards. The Secretary of State shall also distribute  federal
registration  cards.  Any person may apply in writing to the Secretary of State for permission to print,
copy or otherwise prepare and distribute the registration cards  designed by the Secretary of State.
The secretary may revoke any  permission granted under this subsection at any time. All registration
cards shall be distributed to the public without charge.
(2) The Secretary of State shall approve any voter registration application form  developed for
use by any agency designated as a voter registration agency under ORS 247.208.
(3) Each voter registration card designed or approved by the  Secretary of State shall describe
the penalties  for knowingly supplying false information on the registration card and shall contain
space for a person to provide the following information:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 624
HB 2442
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Full name;
(b) Residence address, mailing address or any other information necessary to locate  the resi-
dence of the person offering to register to vote;
(c) The name of the political party with which the person is affiliated, if any;
(d) Date of birth;
(e) An indication that the person is a citizen of the United States; and
(f) A signature attesting to the fact that the person is qualified to be an elector.
(4) Each voter registration card designed by the Secretary of State must  state that evi-
dence of United States citizenship is required for persons who are  registering to vote in this
state for the first time and must list examples of documents that  are accepted as evidence
of citizenship.
[(4)] (5) Any form containing a voter registration card may  also include space for a person to
provide:
(a) A telephone number where the person may be contacted; and
(b) If previously registered to  vote in this state, the name then supplied by the person and the
county and, if known, the address of previous registration.
[(5)] (6) A person shall not supply  any information under subsection (3) or [ (4)] (5) of this section
knowing it to be false.
[(6)] (7) A county clerk or other person accepting registration cards shall not request any in-
formation unless it is authorized by state or federal law.
[(7)] (8) A person shall attest to  the information supplied on the voter registration card by
signing the completed registration card.
[(8)] (9) Any completed and signed registration card  described in subsection (3) of this section
shall be the official registration card of the elector.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 247.171, as amended by section 7, chapter 492, Oregon Laws 2023,  is amended
to read:
247.171. (1) Except as provided  in this subsection, the Secretary of State shall design, prepare
and distribute state voter registration cards. The Secretary of State shall also distribute  federal
registration  cards.  Any person may apply in writing to the Secretary of State for permission to print,
copy or otherwise prepare and distribute the registration cards  designed by the Secretary of State.
The secretary may revoke any  permission granted under this subsection at any time. All registration
cards shall be distributed to the public without charge.
(2) The Secretary of State shall approve any voter registration application form  developed for
use by any agency designated as a voter registration agency under ORS 247.208.
(3) Each voter registration card designed or approved by the  Secretary of State shall describe
the penalties  for knowingly supplying false information on the registration card and shall contain
space for a person to provide the following information:
(a) Full name;
(b) Residence address, mailing address or any other information necessary to locate  the resi-
dence of the person offering to register to vote;
(c) The name of the political party with which the person is affiliated, if any;
(d) Date of birth;
(e) An indication that the person is a citizen of the United States; and
(f) Except as provided  in ORS 247.018, a signature attesting to the fact that the person is qual-
ified to be an elector.
[2]
HB 2442
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) Each voter registration  card designed by the Secretary of State must state that evi-
dence of United States citizenship is required for persons who are  registering to vote in this
state for the first time  and must list examples of documents that are accepted as evidence
of citizenship.
[(4)] (5) Any form containing a voter registration  card may also include space for a person to
provide:
(a) A telephone number where the person may be contacted; and
(b) If previously registered to vote in this state, the name then supplied by  the person and the
county and, if known, the address of previous registration.
[(5)] (6) A person shall not supply  any information under subsection (3) or [ (4)] (5) of this section
knowing it to be false.
[(6)] (7) A county clerk or other person accepting registration cards shall not request any in-
formation unless it is authorized by state or federal law.
[(7)] (8) Except as provided in ORS 247.018, a person shall  attest to the information supplied on
the voter registration card by signing the completed registration card.
[(8)] (9) Except as  provided in subsection [ (7)] (8) of this section, any completed and signed
registration card described in subsection (3) of this section shall be the official  registration card of
the elector.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 247.012 is amended to read:
247.012. (1) A qualified person may register to vote or update a registration to vote by:
(a) Delivering by mail, having a person deliver or otherwise delivering  a completed registration
card to any county clerk, the Secretary of State, any office of the Department of Transportation or
any designated voter registration agency as described in ORS 247.208;
(b) Personally delivering, or having a person deliver, the card  to an official designated by a
county clerk under subsection (7) of this section;  or
(c) Submitting the person’s legal name, age, residence and citizenship information  and electronic
signature to the Department of Transportation[ ; or ].
[(d) Completing a registration card  using the electronic voter registration system described in ORS
247.019.]
(2) If a registration card is mailed or delivered to:
(a) Any person other than a county clerk or the Secretary of State, the  person shall forward the
card to a county clerk or the Secretary of State not later  than the fifth day after receiving the card;
or
(b) The Secretary of State or a  county clerk for a county other than the county in which the
person applying for registration resides, the Secretary of State or county clerk  shall forward the
card to the county clerk for the county in which the person  resides not later than the fifth day after
receiving the card.
[(3) Registration of a qualified person occurs: ]
[(a) When a legible, accurate and complete registration card is received in the office of any  county
clerk, the Office of the Secretary of  State, an office of the Department of Transportation, a designated
voter registration agency under  ORS 247.208 or at a location designated by a county clerk under sub-
section (7) of this section; ]
[(b) On the date a registration card is postmarked if the card  is received after the 21st day imme-
diately preceding an election but is postmarked not later than the 21st day immediately preceding  the
election and is addressed to an office of any  county clerk, the Office of the Secretary of State, an office
[3]
HB 2442
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of the Department of Transportation or any designated voter  registration agency as described in ORS
247.208; or ]
[(c) In the case  of a registration card missing a date of birth, containing an incomplete date of birth
or containing an unintentional scrivener’s error that is supplied or corrected as  described in subsection
(4) or (6) of this section, on the date that registration would  have occurred if the registration card had
not been missing the date of birth, contained  an incomplete date of birth or contained the scrivener’s
error.]
[(4)(a)] (3) The county clerk for the county in which the  person resides shall register the
person:
(a) Except as provided in ORS 247.125, if [ a] the person’s  registration card is legible, accurate
and contains, at a minimum, the [ registrant’s] person’s name, residence  address, date of birth and
signature[, the county clerk shall register the person. ]; and
(b) For a person registering to vote in this  state for the first time, if the person’s reg-
istration card is accompanied by evidence of United States citizenship.
[(b)] (4) If the information or evidence of United States citizenship  required under  [paragraph
(a) of this ] subsection (3) of this section  is missing [ from the registration card ] or  the date of birth
is incomplete,  the county clerk shall attempt to obtain the missing or incomplete information from
all sources available to the  county clerk, including but not limited to current and previous addresses
and phone numbers of the registrant. The county clerk may also  supply the registrant’s date of birth
from any previous registration of the registrant. If the missing or incomplete information  cannot be
obtained from sources available to the county clerk, the county clerk shall use reasonable  efforts
to contact the  registrant by phone, mail and electronic mail to obtain the missing or incomplete
information.
(5) If a registration card meets the requirements of subsection [ (4)] (3) of this section but is
missing an indication of political party affiliation, the  registrant [ shall be ] is considered not affil-
iated with any political party. This subsection  does not apply if an elector is updating a registration.
(6) If a registration card contains  an unintentional scrivener’s error, the county clerk may at-
tempt to contact the person to correct the error.
(7) A county clerk may appoint officials to accept registration of persons at designated locations.
The appointments and locations shall be in writing and filed in the office of the county clerk. The
county clerk [ shall be ] is responsible for the performance of duties by those appointed.
(8) A registration [ card received  and accepted ] that occurs  under this section [ shall be ] is con-
sidered an active registration.
(9) A registration may be updated at any time.
(10) The county clerk  shall mail a written notice to each person who has attempted to
register to vote for the  first time in this state under this section. The notice must indicate
whether the person is registered  and must be mailed not later than seven business days after
the county clerk receives registration materials under subsection (1) or (2) of this section.
The registration of a qualified person occurs  on the date the county clerk mails the notice
confirming the registration of the person.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 247.012, as amended by section 4, chapter 492, Oregon Laws 2023,  is amended
to read:
247.012. (1) A qualified person may register to vote or update a registration to vote by:
(a) Delivering by mail, having a person deliver or otherwise delivering  a completed registration
card to any county clerk, the Secretary of State, any office of the Department of Transportation or
[4]
HB 2442
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
any designated voter registration agency as described in ORS 247.208;
(b) Personally delivering, or having a person deliver, the card  to an official designated by a
county clerk under subsection (7) of this section;
(c) Submitting the person’s legal name, age, residence and citizenship information  and electronic
signature to the Department of Transportation;  or
(d) Submitting  the person’s legal name, age, residence and citizenship information to the Oregon
Health Authority for use in the Oregon Health Plan[ ; or ].
[(e) Completing a registration card using the electronic voter  registration system described in ORS
247.019.]
(2) If a registration card is mailed or delivered to:
(a) Any person other than a county clerk or the Secretary of State, the  person shall forward the
card to a county clerk or the Secretary of State not later  than the fifth day after receiving the card;
or
(b) The Secretary of State or a county clerk for a county other  than the county in which the
person applying for registration  resides, the Secretary of State or county clerk shall forward the
card to the county clerk for the county in which the person  resides not later than the fifth day after
receiving the card.
[(3) Registration of a qualified person occurs: ]
[(a) When a legible, accurate and complete registration card is received in the office of any  county
clerk, the Office of the Secretary of State, an office of  the Department of Transportation, a designated
voter registration agency under ORS 247.208 or at a location designated by a county  clerk under sub-
section (7) of this section; ]
[(b) On the date a registration card is  postmarked if the card is received after the 21st day imme-
diately preceding  an election but is postmarked not later than the 21st day immediately preceding the
election and is addressed to an office of any  county clerk, the Office of the Secretary of State, an office
of the Department of Transportation or any  designated voter registration agency as described in ORS
247.208; or]
[(c) In the case  of a registration card missing a date of birth, containing an incomplete date of birth
or containing an unintentional scrivener’s error that is supplied or corrected as  described in subsection
(4) or (6) of this section, on the date that registration would  have occurred if the registration card had
not been missing the date of birth, contained an incomplete  date of birth or contained the scrivener’s
error.]
[(4)(a)(A)] (3) The county clerk for the county in which the  person resides shall register
the person:
(a)(A) Except as provided in ORS 247.125, if [ a] the person’s  registration card is legible,  ac-
curate and contains, at a minimum, the [ registrant’s] person’s name, residence  address, date of birth
and signature[ , the county clerk shall register the person. ]; or
(B) [ The county clerk shall register a person ] Pursuant to ORS 247.018, regardless of whether the
person’s registration card  contains a signature, if the person’s registration card is legible, accurate
and contains, at a minimum, the registrant’s name, residence address and date of birth[ .]; and
(b) For a person registering to vote in this state  for the first time, if the person’s reg-
istration card is accompanied by evidence of United States citizenship.
[(b)] (4) If the information or evidence of United States citizenship  required under  [paragraph
(a)(A) of this ] subsection  (3) of this section  is missing  [ from the registration card ] or the date of
birth is incomplete, or if the signature of a person described in  [paragraph (a)(B) of this ] subsection
[5]
HB 2442
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) of this section  has not been submitted, the county clerk shall attempt to obtain the  missing or
incomplete information from all sources  available to the county clerk, including but not limited to
current and previous addresses and phone numbers of the registrant.  The county clerk may also
supply the registrant’s date of birth from any  previous registration of the registrant. If the missing
or incomplete information cannot be obtained from sources available to the  county clerk, the county
clerk shall use reasonable efforts to  contact the registrant by phone, mail and electronic mail to
obtain the missing or incomplete information.
(5) If a registration card meets  the requirements of subsection [ (4)] (3) of this section but is
missing an indication of political party affiliation, the  registrant [ shall be ] is considered not affil-
iated with any political party. This subsection  does not apply if an elector is updating a registration.
(6) If a registration card contains an unintentional scrivener’s error,  the county clerk may at-
tempt to contact the person to correct the error.
(7) A county clerk may appoint officials to accept registration of persons at designated locations.
The appointments and locations shall be in writing and filed in the office of the county clerk. The
county clerk [ shall be ] is responsible for the performance of duties by those appointed.
(8) A registration [ card received and accepted ] that occurs  under this section  [ shall be ] is con-
sidered an active registration.
(9) A registration may be updated at any time.
(10) The county clerk shall mail a written notice to each person who  has attempted to
register to vote for the first time in this state under this section.  The notice must indicate
whether the person is registered  and must be mailed not later than seven business days after
the county clerk receives registration materials under subsection (1) or (2) of this section.
The registration of a qualified person occurs on the date  the county clerk mails the notice
confirming the registration of the person.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 260.993 is amended to read:
260.993. (1) The penalty for violation of ORS 260.532 is limited to  that provided in ORS 260.532
(6) and (8).
(2) Violation of ORS 247.125 (1), 247.171 [ (5)] (6) , 247.420 (2),  253.710, 260.402, 260.555, 260.558,
260.575, 260.645 or 260.665 (2) or (3) involving any action described in ORS 260.665 (2)(d) to (f) or
260.715 is a Class C felony.
(3) Violation of ORS 260.695 (5) is a Class A misdemeanor.
(4) Violation of ORS 247.171 [ (6)] (7) is a Class C misdemeanor.
SECTION 8.
ORS 247.019 is repealed.
SECTION 9.  ORS 247.025 is amended to read:
247.025. To vote in an election:
(1) Except as provided in ORS  247.012 (10),  a person’s registration card must be received at
an office or location  described in ORS 247.012 not later than the time the office or location closes
for business  on the 21st day immediately preceding the election, but in no case later than midnight
of the 21st day immediately preceding the election;  or
(2) Except as provided in ORS 247.012 (10),  a person’s registration card  must be postmarked
not later than the 21st day immediately preceding the election and be addressed to an  office of any
county clerk, the Office  of the Secretary of State, an office of the Department of Transportation or
any designated voter registration agency as described in ORS 247.208[ ; or ].
[(3) A person’s registration card must be delivered electronically as described in  ORS 247.019 not
later than 11:59 p.m. of the 21st day immediately preceding the election. ]
[6]
HB 2442
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
SECTION 10.
(1) Section 2  of this 2025 Act applies to persons who register to vote in this
state for the first time on or after the operative date of section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 247.171 by sections 3 and 4 of this 2025 Act apply to voter
registration cards designed, prepared or distributed on or  after the operative date of the
amendments to ORS 247.171 by sections 3 and 4 of this 2025  Act and to persons who register
to vote for the first time in this state on or after the operative date of the  amendments to
ORS 247.171 by sections 3 and 4 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The amendments to ORS 247.012 by sections 5 and 6 of this 2025 Act apply to voter
registration cards received, delivered or completed on  or after the operative date of the
amendments to ORS 247.012 by sections 5 and 6 of this 2025 Act.
[7]