Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall establish a program to
provide legal services that assist adults in custody who are serving sentences at  the Coffee
Creek Correctional Facility to reenter and reintegrate into local communities,  to reduce
vulnerability to domestic violence, to obtain  employment, housing services and other benefits
and to help with any other legal issue facing an adult in custody.
(2) The commission shall carry out  the purposes of subsection (1) of this section by
granting to the Oregon Justice Resource Center an amount sufficient  for the center to em-
ploy attorneys, as needed, and to provide necessary support for the attorneys’ work.
(3) The commission  and the Oregon Justice Resource Center shall evaluate the oper-
ations and success of the program and report the  results of the evaluation to an interim
committee of the Legislative Assembly related to corrections  no later than September 15,
2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2027.
SECTION 3. There is  appropriated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,200,000 for  the
purpose of making a grant to the Oregon Justice Resource Center to fund the legal  services
program described in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3520