Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $3,000,000, to be distributed by grant to the
Salvage Chief (LSM380) Foundation, an Oregon public  benefit corporation, for the purpose
of repairing, upgrading and returning to operation the vessel known as the  Salvage Chief,
as follows:
(1) $1,894,737 for hull repairs;
(2) $631,579 for engine and fire pump upgrades; and
(3) $473,684 for emergency  communications upgrades, United States Coast Guard in-
spection and contingency.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4684