Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department of Energy shall  evaluate sites with the potential
to serve as geographically dispersed fuel storage locations and prioritize  those sites based
on factors that would make the sites attractive  for storing emergency fuel reserves. Poten-
tial sites must include but need not be limited to sites that:
(a) Are  situated in locations that will support population islands formed as a result of
road or bridge damage due to a seismic event;
(b) Are owned or operated by, or otherwise under the control of, the State of Oregon;
(c) Have been previously identified by a state agency with expertise related to energy, fire
or emergency management as proximate to areas with the highest risks  and highest needs
in the event of a wildfire, tsunami or Cascadia Subduction Zone earthquake;
(d) Are accessible by and in proximity to priority transportation routes or, in eastern  or
coastal Oregon, accessible by and in proximity  to ancillary transportation routes that are
essential to communities; and
(e) Are consistent with other  criteria for fuel storage sites described in the 2024 Oregon
Energy Security Plan.
(2) No later than June 15, 2027,  the department shall submit the department’s prelimi-
nary findings under subsection (1) of  this section to the committees of the Legislative As-
sembly related to energy and emergency management in the manner  provided by ORS
192.245.
(3) The department  shall finalize the department’s findings under subsection (1) of this
section and include the findings in the report required under ORS 469.064 (4) due no later
than September 15, 2028. In addition to the interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly
related to energy, the  department shall provide the report and findings to the interim com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related to emergency management.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 126
HB 4032
1
[2]