Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Public Utility Commission shall conduct a study of laws related to
telecommunications.
(2) The commission shall provide the results of the study in a report to the appropriate
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 no
later than September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 841