Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $15,000,000 for
the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2.
The Oregon Business Development Department shall distribute the moneys
appropriated under section 1 of this 2025 Act to the YMCA of Douglas County, which, as
fiscal agent  for the project, shall use the moneys to seed the capital campaign and expand
fundraising efforts for a multiuse recreational facility  to serve the greater Roseburg and
Douglas County communities.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4061