Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $500,000 for distribution to the Tucker Maxon
School in Portland, to be used for the following purposes:
(1) $250,000 to provide financial aid to students with hearing loss who cannot afford tui-
tion at the school.
(2) $250,000 for capital improvements.
SECTION 2.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2063