Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 164.055 is amended to read:
164.055. (1) A  person commits the crime of theft in the first degree if, by means other than
extortion, the person commits theft as defined in ORS 164.015 and:
(a) The total value of the property in a single or aggregate transaction is $1,000 or more;
(b) The theft is committed during a  riot, fire, explosion, catastrophe or other emergency in an
area affected by the riot, fire, explosion, catastrophe or other emergency;
(c) The theft is theft by receiving committed by buying, selling, borrowing or  lending on the
security of the property;
(d) The subject of the theft is a firearm or explosive;
(e) The subject of the theft is a livestock  animal, a companion animal or a wild animal removed
from habitat or born of a wild animal removed from habitat, pursuant to ORS 497.308 (2)(c);
(f) The subject of the theft is a precursor substance; or
(g) During  the commission of the theft, the person recklessly engages in conduct that creates a
substantial risk of serious physical injury to another person.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “Companion animal” means a dog or cat possessed by a person, business or other  entity for
purposes of companionship, security,  hunting, herding or providing assistance in relation to a phys-
ical disability.
(b) “Explosive” means a chemical compound, mixture or device that is  commonly used or in-
tended for the purpose of producing  a chemical reaction resulting in a substantially instantaneous
release of gas and  heat, including but not limited to dynamite, blasting powder, nitroglycerin,
blasting caps and nitrojelly, but excluding fireworks as  defined in ORS 480.111, black powder,
smokeless powder, small arms ammunition and small arms ammunition primers.
(c) “Firearm” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.210.
(d) “Livestock animal” means a ratite, psittacine, horse, gelding, mare, filly,  stallion, colt, mule,
ass, jenny, bull, steer, cow, calf, goat, sheep, lamb, llama, pig or hog.
(e) “Precursor substance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475.940.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 211
HB 2294
1
2
3
4
5
(3) Theft in the first degree is a Class C felony.
(4) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall  classify theft in the first degree as
described in subsection (1)(d) of this section, when the subject  of the theft is a firearm, as
a crime category 8 of the sentencing guidelines grid of the commission.
[2]