Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall study whether legislative changes are
needed concerning fitness to proceed and community restoration.
(2) The authority shall provide the results of the study,  including any recommended leg-
islative changes, in a report to the appropriate interim  committees of the Legislative As-
sembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than May 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 420