Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated  to the Department of Education, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2019, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $306,000,000 for deposit in the
High School Graduation and College and Career Readiness Fund established by ORS 327.856.
SECTION 2. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2055