Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 279C.810 is amended to read:
279C.810. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Funds of a public agency” does not include:
(A) Funds provided in  the form of a government grant to a nonprofit organization, unless the
government grant is issued for  the purpose of construction, reconstruction, major renovation or
painting;
(B) Building and development permit fees paid or waived by the public agency;
(C) Tax credits or tax abatements;
(D) Land that a public agency sells to a private entity at fair market value;
(E) The difference between:
(i) The  value of land that a public agency sells to a private entity as determined at the time of
the sale after taking into account any plan, requirement, covenant, condition, restriction or  other
limitation, exclusive of zoning or land use regulations, that the public  agency imposes on the de-
velopment or use of the land; and
(ii) The fair market value of the land if  the land is not subject to the limitations described in
sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph;
(F) Staff resources of  the public agency used to manage a project or to provide a principal
source of supervision, coordination or oversight of a project;
(G) Staff resources of  the public agency used to design or inspect one or more components of
a project;
(H) Moneys derived from the sale of bonds that are loaned by a state  agency to a private entity,
unless the moneys will be used for a public improvement;
(I) Value added  to land as a consequence of a public agency’s site preparation, demolition of real
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 919
SB 460
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
property or remediation or removal of environmental contamination, except  for value added in ex-
cess of the expenses the public agency incurred  in the site preparation, demolition or remediation
or removal when the land is sold for  use in a project otherwise subject to ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870;
or
(J) Bonds,  or loans from the proceeds of bonds, issued in accordance with ORS chapter 289 or
ORS 441.525 to 441.595, unless the bonds or loans will be used for a public improvement.
(b) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization or group of organizations described in  sec-
tion 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that is exempt from income tax  under section 501(a) of
the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870 do not apply to:
(a) Projects for which the contract price does not exceed $50,000. In determining the price of  a
project, a public agency:
(A) May not include the value of  donated materials or work performed on the project by indi-
viduals volunteering to the public agency without pay; and
(B) Shall include the value of work performed by  every person paid by a contractor or subcon-
tractor in any manner for the person’s work on the project.
(b) Projects for which  no funds of a public agency are directly or indirectly used. In accordance
with ORS chapter 183, the Commissioner of the Bureau  of Labor and Industries shall adopt rules to
carry out the provisions of this paragraph.
(c) Projects:
(A) That are privately owned;
(B) That use funds of a private entity;
(C) In which less than 25 percent of the square footage of a completed project will be occupied
or used by a public agency; and
(D) For which less than $750,000 of funds of a public agency are used.
(d) Projects for residential construction that are privately owned and that predominantly provide
affordable housing. As used in this paragraph:
(A) “Affordable housing”  means housing that serves occupants whose incomes are no greater
than 60 percent of the area median income or, if the occupants are owners, whose incomes are  no
greater than 80 percent of the area median income.
(B) “Predominantly” means 60 percent or more.
(C) “Privately owned” includes:
(i) Affordable housing provided on  real property owned by a public agency if the real property
and related structures are leased to a private entity for 50 or more years; and
(ii) Affordable housing owned by a partnership,  nonprofit corporation or limited liability com-
pany in which a housing authority, as defined in ORS 456.005, is a general partner,  director or
managing member and the housing authority is  not a majority owner in the partnership, nonprofit
corporation or limited liability company.
(D) “Residential construction” includes the construction, reconstruction, major  renovation or
painting of single-family  houses or apartment buildings not more than four stories in height and all
incidental items, such as site work, parking areas,  utilities, streets and sidewalks, pursuant to the
United States Department  of Labor’s “All Agency Memorandum No. 130: Application of the Standard
of Comparison “Projects of a Character Similar” Under Davis-Bacon  and Related Acts,” dated
March 17, 1978. However, the commissioner may consider different definitions  of residential con-
struction  in  determining whether a project is a residential construction project for purposes of this
[2]
SB 460
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
paragraph, including definitions that:
(i) Exist in local ordinances or codes; or
(ii) Differ, in the prevailing practice of a particular trade  or occupation, from the United States
Department of Labor’s description of residential construction.
(e) A determination or payment of the applicable  rate of wage for a worker on public
works who is a  participant in a pre-apprenticeship program, including a program authorized
or implemented under Title I,  Subtitle C, of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportu-
nity Act (P.L. 113-128) and regulations under 20 C.F.R. part 686, both as in effect  on the ef-
fective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 279C.810 by section 1 of this  2025 Act apply to
procurements for public works that a contracting agency  advertises or otherwise solicits or,
if the contracting agency  does not advertise or solicit the procurement for public works, to
a contract for public works that the contracting agency enters into on  or after the effective
date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]