Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Transportation shall enter into  a grant agreement
with the Lane Transit District. The grant agreement must:
(a) Provide that the department will grant $30 million to the district; and
(b) Provide that the district will use  grant moneys for expansion of its bus rapid transit
and high-capacity transit systems.
(2) The grant  agreement may contain reporting or accounting requirements or any other
terms and conditions that the department determines are necessary or advisable.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Transportation, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $30,000,000,  which may be expended for the purpose of carrying
out section 1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3.  This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2017.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4259