Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall establish  a pilot
project by which employees of the Department of State Police are paid on a biweekly basis.
The Oregon Department of  Administrative Services shall terminate the pilot project on June
30, 2027.
(2) The  Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall report on the pilot project
to an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related to general  government no later
than September 15, 2027. The report must include  a description of the successes and chal-
lenges of implementing biweekly pay and recommendations to be considered statewide.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2432