Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A person commits the crime of unlawful creation, possession, distribution
or purchase of an explicit digital forgery in the first degree if:
(a) With the intent to harass,  humiliate or injure another person, the person creates,
possesses, distributes or purchases a sexually  explicit digitally forged image that appears to
depict the other person; and
(b) The other person is a minor at the time of the creation, possession,  distribution or
purchase.
(2) Unlawful creation, possession, distribution or purchase  of an explicit digital forgery
in the first degree is a Class C felony.
(3) As used in this section and section 2 of this 2025 Act:
(a) “Digitally forged image” means an image  that has been created, manipulated or al-
tered using a computer  software program, artificial intelligence, editing application or simi-
lar means so that the image purports to be a photograph, film, videotape,  recording, digital
picture or other realistic visual depiction of an individual.
(b) “Distribute” means to transfer, publish or exhibit.
(c) “Sexually explicit” means,  with respect to an image, that the image depicts or appears
to depict an individual’s sex organs or the individual engaging in sexual  intercourse or oral
or anal sexual intercourse, as those terms are defined in ORS 163.305, or masturbation.
SECTION 2.
(1) A person commits the crime of unlawful creation, possession, distribution
or purchase of an explicit digital forgery in the  second degree if the person, with the intent
to harass, humiliate or injure another person and without the consent of  the other person,
creates, possesses, distributes or purchases  a sexually explicit digitally forged image that
appears to depict the other person.
(2) Unlawful creation, possession, distribution or purchase  of an explicit digital forgery
in the second degree is a Class A misdemeanor.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 112
HB 2230
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
SECTION 3.
 ORS 161.005 is amended to read:
161.005. ORS 161.005 to 161.055,  161.065, 161.085 to 161.125, 161.150 to 161.175, 161.190 to
161.275, 161.290 to 161.373, 161.405 to 161.485, 161.505 to 161.585, 161.605, 161.615 to 161.685, 161.705
to 161.737, 162.005, 162.015 to 162.035,  162.055 to 162.115, 162.135 to 162.205, 162.225 to 162.375,
162.405 to 162.425, 162.465,  163.005, 163.095, 163.107, 163.115, 163.125 to 163.145, 163.149, 163.160 to
163.208, 163.191, 163.196, 163.215 to  163.257, 163.261, 163.263, 163.264, 163.266, 163.275, 163.285,
163.305 to 163.467, 163.429,  163.432, 163.433, 163.472, 163.505 to 163.575, 163.665 to 163.693, 163.700,
163.701, 163.715, 164.005, 164.015 to 164.135, 164.138, 164.140, 164.205 to 164.270,  164.305 to 164.377,
164.395 to 164.415,  164.805, 164.857, 164.886, 165.002 to 165.102, 165.109, 165.118, 165.805, 165.815,
166.005 to 166.095, 166.119, 166.125, 166.128, 166.350, 166.382, 166.384, 166.660, 167.002  to 167.027,
167.057, 167.060 to 167.100, 167.117, 167.122 to 167.162, 167.203 to 167.252,  167.310 to 167.340, 167.350,
167.810 and 167.820  and sections 1 and 2 of this 2025  Act  shall be known and may be cited as
Oregon Criminal Code of 1971.
[2]