Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Pursuant to  Article IX, section 14 (6)(a), of the Oregon Constitution, the
Legislative Assembly increases the amount of the estimate of revenues that will be  received
from General Fund revenue sources other than corporate income and  excise taxes for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, to $24 billion.
SECTION 2. (1) Except as provided  in subsection (2) of this section, any positive differ-
ence between the actual amount of revenues collected from General Fund revenue sources
other than corporate income and excise taxes for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, and
the estimate made for that biennium pursuant to  Article IX, section 14 (1), of the Oregon
Constitution, shall be transferred to the Oregon Wildfire Mitigation  and Adaptation Fund
established under section 3 of this 2025 Act.
(2) If the actual amount of revenues collected from General Fund revenue sources  other
than corporate income and excise taxes for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  exceeds the
amount of the estimate made in section 1 of this 2025 Act by two percent or more:
(a) The difference between the actual amount of revenues and  the amount of the esti-
mate made in section 1 of this 2025 Act shall be returned to personal  income taxpayers in
the manner provided in ORS 291.349; and
(b) The  difference between the estimate of revenues made in section 1 of this 2025 Act
and the estimate made for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, pursuant to Article IX, sec-
tion 14 (1), of the Oregon Constitution,  shall be transferred to the Oregon Wildfire Mitigation
and Adaptation Fund established under section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon Wildfire Mitigation and  Adaptation Fund is established in the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3980
SB 1177
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
State Treasury, separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon
Wildfire Mitigation and Adaptation Fund shall be credited to the  fund, and shall be used
solely for the purposes of wildfire mitigation and community adaptation  to wildfire risk. The
principal of the fund shall be retained in the fund.
(2) The Legislative Assembly may not appropriate moneys other  than interest earned by
the fund from the fund.
(3)(a) After the appropriation required by paragraph (b) of  this subsection, any remaining
interest earned by the fund for the biennium  may be expended for programs for wildfire re-
sponse and suppression, including forest resiliency or risk reduction  programs operating
outside of the  wildland urban interface, as that term is defined in rule by the State Board
of Forestry.
(b) For each biennium, the Legislative Assembly shall appropriate  at least $50 million,
or the interest earned by the fund if the interest is not  equal to at least $50 million for the
biennium, from  the fund, to be used by community risk reduction programs operating within
or adjacent to the wildland urban interface, as that term is defined in rule by the State Board
of Forestry.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]