Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 455.500 is amended to read:
455.500. (1) The Director of the Department of Consumer and  Business Services, in consultation
with the appropriate advisory boards, shall adopt, amend and  administer a code separate from the
state building code, to be known as the Reach Code. The director shall design the code to increase
energy efficiency in buildings that are newly constructed, reconstructed, altered or repaired.
(2) The Reach Code shall be a set  of statewide optional construction standards and methods that
are economically and technically feasible, including any published generally accepted codes  and
standards newly developed for construction  or for the installation of products, equipment and de-
vices. When adopting or amending the code, the director, in consultation  with the appropriate ad-
visory boards, shall:
(a) Review  generally accepted codes and standards that achieve greater energy efficiency than
the energy efficiency required by the state building code; and
(b) Review technical components of  generally accepted construction documents as the director
considers necessary to  address federal, state and local financial incentives and advances in con-
struction methods, standards and technologies.
(3) When amending the state building  code under ORS 455.030, the director shall consider
whether any of the standards and methods contained in the Reach Code should be  removed from the
Reach Code and adopted in the state building code.
(4) The inclusion of a standard or method for construction or for the installation of  products,
equipment or devices in the Reach Code:
(a) Does not alter  any licensing or certification requirements under ORS 446.003 to 446.200,
446.225 to 446.285, 447.010 to 447.156, 460.005 to 460.175, 479.510 to 479.945 or 480.510 to 480.670  or
this chapter or ORS chapter 693 or Department of Consumer and Business Services rules;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2661
SB 497
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
(b) Exempts products, equipment and devices from product  certification requirements under ORS
447.010 to 447.156 and 479.510 to 479.945 and the state building code; and
(c) Requires that a municipality administering and enforcing a building inspection program un-
der ORS 455.148 or  455.150 must recognize and accept the standard, method, installation, product,
equipment or device if a person applies to construct,  reconstruct, alter or repair a building in con-
formance with the Reach Code.
(5) A municipality that administers and  enforces a building inspection program under
ORS 455.148 or 455.150 may not adopt construction standards or  methods from the Reach
Code, or a similar or related code of standards and methods, that exceed  or are more strin-
gent than the standards and methods the director adopts and  administers under this section.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]