Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 803.400 is amended to read:
803.400. [This section establishes and distinguishes registration periods. Each registration  period
determines the period of validity for vehicle  registration. ] Vehicle registration under the following
registration periods is valid during the described registration period:
[(1)(a) Annual registration is valid for a one-year period. Except as provided in this subsection,
the period starts on the first day  of a calendar month and runs through the last day of the same cal-
endar month one  year later. Once a vehicle is registered under annual registration, the registration
period of the vehicle  begins and ends with that same calendar month each time the vehicle is reregis-
tered or registration for the vehicle is renewed. ]
[(b) Annual registration  issued under ORS 803.415 (11) starts on the day a vehicle is registered
and runs  through the same day one year later. Once a vehicle is registered annually under ORS
803.415 (11), the registration period of the vehicle begins and ends  with that same day each time the
vehicle is  reregistered or registration for the vehicle is renewed. Vehicles initially registered on Feb-
ruary 29 will expire on the last day of February at the end of the registration period. ]
[(2) Biennial  registration is valid for a two-year period. The period starts on the day a vehicle is
registered and runs through the same day two years later. Once a vehicle is registered  under biennial
registration, the registration period of the vehicle begins and ends with that same day each time the
vehicle is  reregistered or registration for the vehicle is renewed. Vehicles initially registered on Feb-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1509
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ruary 29 will expire on the last day of February two years later. ]
[(3) Calendar-year registration starts  on January 1 of a year and runs through December 31 of the
same year. ]
[(4)] (1) Ownership registration starts on the day the vehicle is registered  and is valid until the
ownership of the vehicle changes.
[(5)] (2)  Permanent registration starts on  the day the vehicle is registered and is valid for the
life of the vehicle.
[(6) Quarterly registration starts on the first day of any  calendar quarter and runs through the last
day of the last calendar quarter in  the registration period. The number of calendar quarters in a
quarterly registration is elected by the vehicle owner at  the time of registration. A person may not es-
tablish quarterly registration periods for more than four quarters. If a vehicle  is registered for a
quarterly registration  period of less than four calendar quarters, the Department of Transportation
shall collect, when issuing or renewing registration of the vehicle, the additional fee  for quarterly reg-
istration established under ORS 803.420. ]
[(7) Four-year registration starts on the day  a vehicle is registered and runs through the same day
four years later. ]
SECTION 2.
 ORS 803.410 is amended to read:
803.410. (1) The Department of Transportation is  empowered to administer ORS 803.400 [ and
803.405], relating to the registration periods of vehicles and to  adopt and enforce rules, including
rules for the adjustment  or proration of fees and registration periods, necessary to accomplish the
enforcement of those sections. [ The authority granted the department under this section is subject to
the following: ]
[(1) The department may initially register a vehicle  that is subject to biennial registration for less
than a  24-month period or for more than a 24-month period, not exceeding a maximum of a 30-month
period, and  prorate the fee on a monthly basis, when in its opinion such fractional registration tends
to fulfill the purpose of the biennial registration system. ]
[(2) The department may initially adjust the registration  periods of trailers for hire registered as
part of a fleet. ]
[(3) The authority granted under this section includes authority to  adjust the initial registration
period of travel trailers and special use trailers that are required to be registered after  being removed
from assessment under the ad valorem tax laws by ORS 820.520. ]
[(4)] (2)  The department, by rule, may adjust  registration fees or registration periods for a ve-
hicle, as is administratively convenient for the department, if:
(a) The vehicle is changed from one type of registration to another type; or
(b) Any other change relating to the registration of the vehicle is made where it would be  ad-
ministratively convenient for the department to make such adjustments.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 803.415 is amended to read:
803.415. [This section establishes registration periods for vehicles. The registration periods are pe-
riods described under ORS 803.400. Except  as provided in the following, the registration period for any
vehicle registered in this state by the Department of Transportation is a biennial registration period: ]
[(1) The following vehicles have permanent registration: ]
[(a) Antique vehicles registered under ORS 805.010. ]
[(b) Vehicles of special interest registered under ORS 805.020. ]
[(c) Trailers that will be operated on the highways at  a loaded weight of more than 8,000 pounds
and are not travel trailers, fixed load vehicles or special use trailers. ]
[2]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(2) Government-owned vehicles registered under ORS 805.040 have ownership registration. ]
[(3) The following vehicles may  be registered under annual or quarterly registration unless the
vehicles are registered under  proportional registration under ORS 826.009 or proportional fleet regis-
tration under ORS 826.011: ]
[(a) Vehicles required to establish a registration weight under ORS 803.430. ]
[(b) Commercial buses. ]
[(c) Vehicles registered as farm vehicles under ORS 805.300. ]
[(4) Snowmobiles are registered as provided in ORS 821.080. ]
[(5) Vehicles operated by dealers who hold certificates under ORS 822.020 are as provided  under
ORS 822.040.]
[(6) Trailers for hire that will be operated at a loaded weight of 8,000 pounds or less  may be reg-
istered as follows: ]
[(a) Annual registration; or ]
[(b) If registered under an agreement pursuant to  ORS 802.500, for a period of time determined
as specified in the agreement or as determined by the department. ]
[(7) Except as  otherwise provided in subsection (10) of this section, the registration period for
electric vehicles and hybrid vehicles that use electricity and another source of motive power is  a
biennial registration period except that the registration period  for the following electric or hybrid ve-
hicles is an annual registration period: ]
[(a) Commercial buses. ]
[(b) Electric or hybrid vehicles registered as farm vehicles under ORS 805.300. ]
[(c) Vehicles required to establish registration weight under ORS 803.430. ]
[(8) Vehicles registered under ORS 805.100 have an ownership registration period. ]
[(9) School vehicles registered under  ORS 805.050 have ownership registration except that the
registration shall continue to be valid if ownership of the vehicle is transferred to a  person who con-
tinues to use the vehicle for purposes authorized by ORS 805.050. ]
[(10) The following vehicles have a four-year registration period: ]
[(a) New vehicles registered under ORS 803.420 (6)(a) for which new registration plates will  be
issued; and]
[(b) New trailers  registered under ORS 803.420 (6)(b), for which new registration plates will be
issued.]
[(11) A rental or leasing company,  as defined in ORS 221.275, may elect an annual, a biennial or
a four-year registration period for the initial registration of a new vehicle registered  under ORS
803.420 (6)(a) for which new registration plates will be issued  if the company owns the vehicle that is
being registered. The subsequent renewal or reregistration periods for the vehicle are biennial. ]
[(12) Vehicles registered under ORS 805.110 have ownership registration except  that the registra-
tion shall continue to be valid if ownership of the vehicle is transferred to a spouse who  is authorized
to retain the former prisoner of war registration plates under ORS 805.110. ]
(1) Except as provided in this section,  the registration period for any vehicle registered
in this state by the Department of Transportation is an  ownership registration period as
described under ORS 803.400.
(2) This section does not apply to:
(a) Vehicles  registered under proportional registration under ORS 826.009 or proportional
fleet registration under ORS 826.011; or
(b) The following vehicles that have permanent registration:
[3]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Antique vehicles registered under ORS 805.010.
(B) Vehicles of special interest registered under ORS 805.020.
(C) Trailers that will be operated  on the highways at a loaded weight of more than 8,000
pounds and are not travel trailers, fixed load vehicles or special use trailers.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 803.420 is amended to read:
803.420. (1) The vehicle registration fees imposed under  this section shall be based on the clas-
sifications determined by the Department of Transportation by rule. The department  may classify a
vehicle to ensure that  registration fees for the vehicle are the same as for other vehicles the de-
partment determines to be comparable.
[(2) Except  as otherwise provided in this section, or unless the vehicle is registered quarterly, the
fees described in  this section are for an entire registration period for the vehicle as described under
ORS 803.415. For a vehicle registered for a quarterly registration period under ORS 803.415,  the de-
partment shall apportion any fee under this section to reflect the number of quarters registered. ]
(2) The registration fees in this section are one-time fees.
(3) Vehicle registration fees are due when a vehicle is registered [ and when the registered  owner
renews the registration ].
(4) In addition to the registration fees listed in this section, a county or a district  may impose
an additional registration fee as provided under ORS 801.041 and 801.042.
[(5) A rental or leasing  company, as defined in ORS 221.275, that elects to initially register a ve-
hicle for an annual  or biennial registration period shall pay a fee of $2 in addition to the vehicle reg-
istration fee provided under this section. ]
[(6)] (5)  The registration fees for [ each year of the registration period for  vehicles subject to
biennial registration ] each of the following vehicles  are as follows:
(a) Passenger vehicles not otherwise provided for in this section or ORS 821.320, $43.
(b) Utility trailers or light trailers, as those terms are defined by rule by the department, $63.
(c) Mopeds and motorcycles, $44.
(d) Low-speed vehicles, $63.
(e) Medium-speed electric vehicles, $63.
[(7) The registration fees for vehicles that are subject to biennial registration and that are  listed
in this subsection are as follows: ]
[(a)] (f)  State-owned vehicles registered under  ORS 805.045 and undercover vehicles registered
under ORS 805.060, $10 upon registration [ or renewal ].
[(b)] (g)  Fixed load vehicles:
(A) If a declaration of weight described under ORS 803.435 is submitted establishing  the weight
of the vehicle at 3,000 pounds or less, $61.
(B) If no declaration of weight is submitted or if the weight of  the vehicles is in excess of 3,000
pounds, $82.
[(c)] (h)  Travel trailers, special use trailers,  campers and motor homes, based on length as de-
termined under ORS 803.425:
(A) Trailers or campers that are 6 to 10 feet in length, $81.
(B) Trailers or campers over 10 feet in length,  $81 plus $7 a foot for each foot of length over
the first 10 feet.
(C) Motor homes that are 6 to 14 feet in length, $86.
(D) Motor homes over 14 feet in length, $126 plus $8 a foot for each foot of length over the  first
10 feet.
[4]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) Government-owned vehicles registered under ORS 805.040, $5.
(j) Vehicles registered with special registration for  disabled veterans under ORS 805.100
or for former prisoners of war under ORS 805.110, $15.
(k) School vehicles registered under ORS 805.050, $5.
[(8)] (6)  The registration fee  for trailers for hire that are equipped with pneumatic tires made
of an elastic material and that are not travel trailers or  trailers registered under permanent regis-
tration is $30.
[(9) The registration fees for vehicles subject to ownership registration are as follows: ]
[(a) Government-owned vehicles registered under ORS 805.040, $5. ]
[(b) Vehicles  registered with special registration for disabled veterans under ORS 805.100 or for
former prisoners of war under ORS 805.110, $15. ]
[(c) School vehicles registered under ORS 805.050, $5. ]
[(10)] (7) The registration fees for vehicles subject to permanent registration are as follows:
(a) Antique vehicles registered under ORS 805.010, $100.
(b) Vehicles of special interest registered under ORS 805.020, $100.
(c) Racing activity vehicles registered under ORS 805.035, $100.
(d) Trailers, $10.
(e) State-owned vehicles  registered under ORS 805.045 and undercover vehicles registered under
ORS 805.060, $10.
[(11)] (8)  The registration fee for trailers registered as  part of a fleet under an agreement
reached pursuant to ORS 802.500 is the same fee as the fee  for vehicles of the same type registered
under other provisions of the Oregon Vehicle Code.
[(12)] (9) The registration fee for  vehicles with proportional registration under ORS 826.009, or
proportional fleet registration under ORS 826.011, is the same fee as the fee for  vehicles of the same
type under this section except that the fees shall be fixed on  an apportioned basis as provided under
the agreement established under ORS 826.007.
[(13)] (10) In addition to any other registration fees charged for registration of vehicles in fleets
under ORS 805.120, the department may charge [ the following fees: ]
[(a)] a service charge for each vehicle entered into a fleet, $3.
[(b) Service charge for each vehicle in the fleet at the time of renewal, $2. ]
[(14)(a)] (11)(a)  The registration fee for motor vehicles  required to establish a registration
weight under ORS 803.430 or 826.013, tow vehicles used to transport property for hire other than
as described in ORS 822.210  and commercial buses is as provided in the following chart, based upon
the weight submitted in the declaration of weight prepared under ORS 803.435 or 826.015:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Weight in Pounds Fee
8,000 or less $ 74
8,001 to 10,000 464
10,001 to 12,000 528
12,001 to 14,000 591
14,001 to 16,000 655
16,001 to 18,000 718
18,001 to 20,000 801
20,001 to 22,000 864
[5]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
22,001 to 24,000 949
24,001 to 26,000 1,031
26,001 to 28,000 375
28,001 to 30,000 391
30,001 to 32,000 422
32,001 to 34,000 438
34,001 to 36,000 468
36,001 to 38,000 485
38,001 to 40,000 515
40,001 to 42,000 532
42,001 to 44,000 562
44,001 to 46,000 578
46,001 to 48,000 593
48,001 to 50,000 625
50,001 to 52,000 656
52,001 to 54,000 672
54,001 to 56,000 686
56,001 to 58,000 717
58,001 to 60,000 750
60,001 to 62,000 780
62,001 to 64,000 811
64,001 to 66,000 827
66,001 to 68,000 857
68,001 to 70,000 874
70,001 to 72,000 904
72,001 to 74,000 921
74,001 to 76,000 951
76,001 to 78,000 967
78,001 to 80,000 998
80,001 to 82,000 1,014
82,001 to 84,000 1,045
84,001 to 86,000 1,061
86,001 to 88,000 1,092
88,001 to 90,000 1,108
90,001 to 92,000 1,139
92,001 to 94,000 1,155
94,001 to 96,000 1,185
96,001 to 98,000 1,202
98,001 to 100,000 1,218
100,001 to 102,000 1,249
102,001 to 104,000 1,265
104,001 to 105,500 1,295
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(b)(A) The registration fee for motor  vehicles with a registration weight of more than 8,000
[6]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
pounds that are described in ORS 825.015,  that are operated by a charitable organization as defined
in ORS 825.017 (13), is as provided in the following chart:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Weight in Pounds Fee
8,001 to 10,000 $ 71
10,001 to 12,000 85
12,001 to 14,000 92
14,001 to 16,000 107
16,001 to 18,000 114
18,001 to 20,000 128
20,001 to 22,000 135
22,001 to 24,000 149
24,001 to 26,000 156
26,001 to 28,000 170
28,001 to 30,000 178
30,001 to 32,000 192
32,001 to 34,000 199
34,001 to 36,000 213
36,001 to 38,000 220
38,001 to 40,000 234
40,001 to 42,000 241
42,001 to 44,000 256
44,001 to 46,000 263
46,001 to 48,000 270
48,001 to 50,000 284
50,001 to 52,000 298
52,001 to 54,000 305
54,001 to 56,000 312
56,001 to 58,000 327
58,001 to 60,000 341
60,001 to 62,000 355
62,001 to 64,000 369
64,001 to 66,000 376
66,001 to 68,000 391
68,001 to 70,000 398
70,001 to 72,000 412
72,001 to 74,000 419
74,001 to 76,000 433
76,001 to 78,000 440
78,001 to 80,000 454
80,001 to 82,000 462
82,001 to 84,000 476
84,001 to 86,000 483
86,001 to 88,000 497
[7]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
88,001 to 90,000 504
90,001 to 92,000 518
92,001 to 94,000 525
94,001 to 96,000 540
96,001 to 98,000 547
98,001 to 100,000 554
100,001 to 102,000 568
102,001 to 104,000 575
104,001 to 105,500 589
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(B) The registration fee for motor vehicles that are certified under ORS 822.205, unless the mo-
tor vehicles  are registered under paragraph (a) of this subsection, or that are used exclusively to
transport manufactured structures, is as provided in the following chart:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Weight in Pounds Fee
8,000 or less $ 63
8,001 to 10,000 145
10,001 to 12,000 173
12,001 to 14,000 187
14,001 to 16,000 217
16,001 to 18,000 231
18,001 to 20,000 260
20,001 to 22,000 274
22,001 to 24,000 304
24,001 to 26,000 318
26,001 to 28,000 346
28,001 to 30,000 362
30,001 to 32,000 391
32,001 to 34,000 405
34,001 to 36,000 435
36,001 to 38,000 449
38,001 to 40,000 477
40,001 to 42,000 491
42,001 to 44,000 521
44,001 to 46,000 535
46,001 to 48,000 550
48,001 to 50,000 578
50,001 to 52,000 608
52,001 to 54,000 622
54,001 to 56,000 636
56,001 to 58,000 665
58,001 to 60,000 694
60,001 to 62,000 723
[8]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
62,001 to 64,000 753
64,001 to 66,000 767
66,001 to 68,000 795
68,001 to 70,000 809
70,001 to 72,000 839
72,001 to 74,000 853
74,001 to 76,000 882
76,001 to 78,000 896
78,001 to 80,000 926
80,001 to 82,000 940
82,001 to 84,000 968
84,001 to 86,000 983
86,001 to 88,000 1,012
88,001 to 90,000 1,027
90,001 to 92,000 1,055
92,001 to 94,000 1,071
94,001 to 96,000 1,099
96,001 to 98,000 1,113
98,001 to 100,000 1,127
100,001 to 102,000 1,157
102,001 to 104,000 1,172
104,001 to 105,500 1,200
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(C) The owner of a vehicle described in  subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph must certify
at the time of [ initial] registration, in a manner determined by the department by rule, that the
motor vehicle will be used exclusively to transport manufactured structures or  exclusively as de-
scribed in ORS 822.210, unless  the motor vehicle is registered under paragraph (a) of this subsection,
or as described in ORS 825.015 or 825.017 (13).  Registration of a vehicle described in subparagraph
(A) or (B) of this paragraph is invalid if the vehicle is operated in any manner  other than that de-
scribed in the certification under this subparagraph.
(c) [ Subject to paragraph (d) of this subsection, ] The registration fee for motor vehicles registered
as farm vehicles under ORS 805.300 is as provided in the following chart, based upon the registra-
tion weight given in the declaration of weight submitted under ORS 803.435:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Weight in Pounds Fee
8,000 or less $ 50
8,001 to 10,000 65
10,001 to 12,000 75
12,001 to 14,000 97
14,001 to 16,000 108
16,001 to 18,000 129
18,001 to 20,000 141
20,001 to 22,000 162
[9]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
22,001 to 24,000 172
24,001 to 26,000 195
26,001 to 28,000 204
28,001 to 30,000 226
30,001 to 32,000 237
32,001 to 34,000 258
34,001 to 36,000 270
36,001 to 38,000 291
38,001 to 40,000 302
40,001 to 42,000 324
42,001 to 44,000 334
44,001 to 46,000 356
46,001 to 48,000 366
48,001 to 50,000 388
50,001 to 52,000 399
52,001 to 54,000 409
54,001 to 56,000 432
56,001 to 58,000 453
58,001 to 60,000 463
60,001 to 62,000 474
62,001 to 64,000 496
64,001 to 66,000 517
66,001 to 68,000 528
68,001 to 70,000 540
70,001 to 72,000 561
72,001 to 74,000 571
74,001 to 76,000 594
76,001 to 78,000 604
78,001 to 80,000 625
80,001 to 82,000 636
82,001 to 84,000 657
84,001 to 86,000 669
86,001 to 88,000 690
88,001 to 90,000 700
90,001 to 92,000 723
92,001 to 94,000 733
94,001 to 96,000 754
96,001 to 98,000 765
98,001 to 100,000 787
100,001 to 102,000 798
102,001 to 104,000 819
104,001 to 105,500 831
_______________________________________________________________________________________
[(d) For any  vehicle that is registered under a quarterly registration period, the registration fee is
[10]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a minimum of $15 for each quarter registered plus an additional fee of $2. ]
[(15)] (12) The registration [ and renewal ] fees for vehicles  specified in this subsection that are
required to establish a registration weight under ORS 803.430 or 826.013 are as follows:
(a) State-owned vehicles registered under ORS 805.045, $10.
(b) Undercover vehicles registered under ORS 805.060, $10.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 803.422 is amended to read:
803.422. (1) As used in this section, “miles per gallon” or “MPG”  means the distance traveled
in a vehicle powered by one gallon of fuel.
(2) The Department of Transportation shall determine  the combined MPG ratings for each motor
vehicle pursuant to a method determined by the department.
(3) Except as provided in  ORS 319.890 (3), in addition to the registration fees prescribed under
ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a)] (5)(a) , there shall  be paid [ for each year of the registration period, ] an additional
amount as follows:
(a) For vehicles that have a rating of 0-19 MPG, $20.
(b) For vehicles that have a rating of 20-39 MPG, $25.
(c) For vehicles that have a rating of 40 MPG or greater, $35.
(d) For electric vehicles, $115.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 6.
 ORS 801.041 is amended to read:
801.041. The following  apply to the authority granted to counties by ORS 801.040 to establish
registration fees for vehicles:
(1) An ordinance establishing registration fees under this section must be enacted by the  county
imposing the  registration fee and filed with the Department of Transportation. Notwithstanding
ORS 203.055 or any provision of a county charter, the governing body of a county with a population
of 350,000 or more may enact an ordinance establishing registration fees. The governing body of a
county with a population of less than 350,000 may enact an ordinance establishing registration fees
after submitting the ordinance to the electors of the county for their approval. The governing  body
of the county  imposing the registration fee shall enter into an intergovernmental agreement under
ORS 190.010 with the department by which the department shall collect the registration fees, pay
them over to the county and,  if necessary, allow the credit or credits described in ORS 803.445 (5).
The intergovernmental agreement must state the date  on which the department shall begin collect-
ing registration fees for the county.
(2) The  authority granted by this section allows the establishment of registration fees in addition
to those described in ORS 803.420 and 803.422. There  is no authority under this section to affect
registration periods, qualifications,  cards, plates, requirements or any other provision relating to
vehicle registration under the vehicle code.
(3) Except  as otherwise provided for in this subsection, when registration fees are imposed under
this section, they must be imposed on all vehicle classes. Registration fees as  provided under this
section may not be imposed on the following:
(a) Snowmobiles and Class I all-terrain vehicles.
(b) Fixed load vehicles.
(c) Vehicles registered under ORS 805.100 to disabled veterans.
(d) Vehicles registered as antique vehicles under ORS 805.010.
[11]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) Vehicles registered as vehicles of special interest under ORS 805.020.
(f) Government-owned or operated vehicles registered under ORS 805.040 or 805.045.
(g) School buses or school activity vehicles registered under ORS 805.050.
(h) Law enforcement undercover vehicles registered under ORS 805.060.
(i) Vehicles registered on a proportional basis for interstate operation.
(j) Vehicles  with a registration weight of 26,001 pounds or more described in ORS 803.420 [ (14)(a)
or (b) ] (11)(a) or (b) .
(k) Vehicles registered as farm vehicles under the provisions of ORS 805.300.
(L) Travel trailers, campers and motor homes.
(m) Vehicles registered to an employment address as provided in ORS 802.250  when the eligible
public employee  or household member’s residence address is not within the county of the employ-
ment address. The department may adopt rules it considers necessary for the administration of  this
paragraph.
(n) Vehicles registered under ORS 805.110 to former prisoners of war.
(4) Any registration fee imposed by a county must be a fixed amount not  to exceed, with respect
to any vehicle class, the sum of the registration fee established under ORS 803.420  [(6)(a)] (5)(a) and
the fee applicable to  the registered vehicle under ORS 803.422. For vehicles on which a flat fee is
imposed under ORS 803.420, the fee must be a whole dollar amount.
(5) Moneys from registration fees established under  this section must be paid to the county es-
tablishing the registration fees as provided in ORS 802.110.
(6) Except as provided in ORS 801.044, or unless a different distribution is agreed upon by  the
county and the cities within the jurisdiction of  the county, the county ordinance shall provide for
payment of at least 40 percent of the moneys  from registration fees established under this section
to cities within the county.
(7) The  moneys for the cities and the county shall be used for any purpose for which moneys
from registration fees may be used, including the payment of debt service and costs  related to bonds
or other obligations issued for such purposes.
(8) Two or more counties may act jointly to impose a registration fee under this section.  The
ordinance of each county acting jointly with  another under this subsection must provide for the
distribution of moneys collected through a joint registration fee.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 802.210 is amended to read:
802.210. [The Department of Transportation is not required  to maintain records on any of the fol-
lowing:]
[(1) The  preparation and notification required on approaching expiration of registration under ORS
803.450.]
[(2) The preparation and notification required on approaching expiration  of driver license or driver
permit under ORS 807.140. ]
The Department of Transportation is not required to maintain records on the preparation
and notification required on approaching expiration of a driver license or driver permit under
ORS 807.140.
SECTION 8.  ORS 803.090 is amended to read:
803.090. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the fee  to issue a certificate of
title under ORS 803.045 or 803.140,  to transfer title under ORS 803.092, to issue a duplicate or re-
placement certificate of title under ORS 803.065  or to issue a new title due to name or address
change under ORS 803.220 is as follows:
[12]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) For a salvage title, $27.
(b) For a vehicle title for trailers eligible for permanent  registration under ORS 803.415 [ (1)] and
motor vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating over 26,000 pounds, excluding motor homes, $90.
(c) For a vehicle title  for vehicles other than those vehicles described in paragraph (b) of this
subsection,  $77.
(2) If an application for  a duplicate or replacement certificate of title is filed at the same time
as an application for  a transfer of title for the same vehicle, the applicant is required to pay only
the transfer of title fee.
(3) The  fee for late presentation of certificate of title under ORS 803.105 is $25 from the 31st
day after the transfer through the 60th day after the transfer and $50 thereafter.
(4) The fees for title transactions involving a form of title other than  a certificate shall be the
amounts established by the Department of Transportation by rule under ORS 803.012.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 803.350 is amended to read:
803.350. This section establishes the  requirements for qualification for registration. The De-
partment of Transportation may not issue registration to a vehicle if the  requirements under this
section are not met. The  department, in the absence of just cause for refusing to register a vehicle
upon application, shall assign a distinctive number or other distinctive means of identification  and
shall issue registration for a vehicle if all of the following requirements are met:
(1) The applicant applies for and is  granted title in the applicant’s name at the same time the
person makes application for registration, or  presents satisfactory evidence that title covering the
vehicle has been previously issued to the applicant.
(2) The applicant completes an application described under ORS 803.370. If the vehicle is a re-
constructed or assembled vehicle or a replica, the person must indicate that fact  in the application
or be subject to ORS 803.225.
(3) The applicant  pays the department the registration fee established under ORS 803.420 and
803.422 and any applicable fees for issuance of registration plates.
(4) For motor vehicles, proof of  compliance with pollution control equipment requirements is
provided to the department. Proof  required to comply with this subsection is described under ORS
815.310. This  subsection does not apply if the vehicle is exempt from the requirements for proof of
compliance under ORS 815.300.
(5) The applicant is domiciled  in this state, as described in ORS 803.355, if required by ORS
803.360 to be domiciled  in the state in order to register a vehicle. If the department has reason to
believe that the applicant is not  domiciled in this state and is required to be in order to register a
vehicle,  the  department may require the person to submit proof of domicile. The department shall
determine by rule what constitutes proof of domicile.
(6) The applicant owns a vehicle that qualifies under ORS 803.360 (2) for registration in this
state, if the owner is not domiciled in this state and is not required by ORS 803.200,  or any other
provision of law, to register the vehicle in this state.
(7) The applicant surrenders all evidence of any former registration  or title as required by ORS
803.380.
(8)(a) Beginning with 2009 model  year new motor vehicles, the applicant provides proof of com-
pliance with low emission motor vehicle standards adopted pursuant to ORS 468A.360. The  depart-
ment shall  determine by rule what constitutes proof of compliance with low emission motor vehicle
standards.
(b) The department shall determine by rule which new motor vehicles are exempt  from the re-
[13]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
quirements of this subsection. Any rules adopted pursuant to this  paragraph shall be consistent with
the Environmental Quality Commission standards adopted pursuant to ORS 468A.360.
(c) For  purposes of this subsection, “new motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle with 7,500 miles
or less on the odometer when the vehicle is [ initially] registered  under ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a)] (5)(a) ,
805.100, 805.110 or 805.120.
(9) If required to do so  by the department, the applicant provides the department with satisfac-
tory proof that the vehicle was designed to be  operated on highways and meets equipment require-
ments imposed by statute or rule  for the lawful operation of a vehicle on highways. The department
may adopt rules specifying the kinds of vehicles  that are subject to this subsection and what con-
stitutes satisfactory proof under this subsection.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 803.445 is amended to read:
803.445. (1) The governing body of a county  may impose registration fees for vehicles as pro-
vided in ORS 801.041.
(2) The  governing body of a district may impose registration fees for vehicles as provided in ORS
801.042.
(3) The  Department of Transportation shall provide by rule for the administration of laws au-
thorizing county and district registration fees and for the collection of those fees.
(4) Any registration fee imposed under this section shall be  imposed in a manner consistent with
ORS 803.420.
(5) A county  or district may not impose a vehicle registration fee that would by itself, or in
combination with any other vehicle registration fee  imposed under this section, exceed the sum of
the fee  imposed under ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a)] (5)(a)  and the fee applicable to the registered vehicle
under ORS 803.422. The owner of any vehicle subject  to multiple fees under this section shall be
allowed a credit or credits with respect to one or more of such fees so that the total  of such fees
does not exceed the  sum of the fee imposed under ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a)] (5)(a)  and the fee applicable
to the registered vehicle under ORS 803.422.
SECTION 11.  ORS 803.473 is amended to read:
803.473. On and after  September 29, 1991, the Department of Transportation [ shall] may  not
refuse to [ renew registration, ] transfer the  certificate of title or issue a duplicate or replacement
certificate of title for a camper or travel trailer solely on the grounds that prior to  September 29,
1991, the owner of the camper or travel trailer owed unpaid registration fees to the department.
SECTION 12.  ORS 803.525 is amended to read:
803.525. The Department of Transportation shall issue  two registration plates for every vehicle
that is  registered by the department except as otherwise provided in this section or ORS 803.530.
[Upon renewal or  when otherwise provided under ORS 803.555, the department may issue stickers in
lieu of or in addition to registration plates. ] The following shall be issued plates as described:
(1) Only one registration plate  shall be issued for a moped, motorcycle, trailer, antique vehicle
or vehicle of special interest registered by the department.
(2) Only one plate shall  be issued for a camper that is registered. Stickers may be issued in lieu
of a plate.
SECTION 13.  ORS 803.530 is amended to read:
803.530. (1)  Registration plates assigned to a vehicle by the Department of Transportation shall
remain with the vehicle to which the plates are assigned and are valid only during the  registration
period for which the plates are issued except as provided in this section.
(2) The department may allow registration plates to be transferred to another vehicle if:
[14]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The department receives an application;
(b) The applicant pays the plate transfer fee under ORS 803.575; and
(c) The applicant complies with the registration qualifications described in ORS 803.350.
(3) The department shall transfer registration plates under this section if  the applicant and the
vehicle qualify for the plates and the plates are:
(a) Legible and capable of being used for identification purposes; and
(b) Any of the following:
(A) From a current issue of registration plates;
(B) Customized registration plates described under ORS 805.240;
(C) Oregon Trail commemorative registration plates issued under section 113, chapter  741,
Oregon Laws 1993;
(D) Special registration plates issued  under ORS 805.255, 805.260, 805.263, 805.266, 805.278 or
805.283;
(E) Group registration plates issued under ORS 805.205;
(F) Veterans’ recognition registration plates issued under ORS 805.105;
(G) Pacific Wonderland registration plates issued under ORS 805.287;
(H) Registration plates issued through the special registration program under ORS 805.222; or
(I) Registration plates  that are no longer currently issued that the department determines may
still be transferred.
[(4) Notwithstanding ORS 803.400, when registration plates are transferred from one  vehicle to
another vehicle owned by the same person, the registration period  represented by the plates also
transfers with the plates. When registration plates are transferred from one vehicle to another  vehicle
not owned by the same person, the remaining registration period  represented by the transferred plates
ceases for both the vehicle receiving the transferred plates  and the vehicle from which the plates were
removed.]
[(5)] (4) The owner of a registered  vehicle to which a plate is assigned may replace a registra-
tion plate. The following apply to this subsection:
(a) To replace a plate under this subsection, the owner must apply to the  department for re-
placement of the plate in a form prescribed by the department and pay the replacement  plate fee
established under ORS 803.575.
(b) The department, in lieu of replacement, may issue duplicate plates  for the same fee as
charged for replacements.
(c) The plates issued under this subsection are valid only for the period of the plates replaced.
(d) The replaced plates may not be considered customized plates when they are replaced, if:
(A) The original plates were from plates currently issued;
(B) The original plates were not customized plates; and
(C) The replacement plates are a duplicate of the original plates.
(e) When a vehicle is assigned  a pair of plates and the owner wishes to replace a single plate,
the department may replace a single plate rather than replace both plates.
[(6)] (5) A county may replace a registration plate that  is from a specially designed government
series with a registration plate that is from  a regular series. The following apply to this subsection:
(a) To replace a plate  under this subsection, the county must apply to the department for re-
placement of the plate in a form prescribed by the department and pay the replacement  plate fee
established under ORS 803.575.
(b) The plates issued under this subsection are valid only for the period of the plates replaced.
[15]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(7)] (6)  If the  department retired the vehicle’s registration under ORS 819.030 because the ve-
hicle is totaled or substantially altered, a person may apply under subsection (2) of this section to
transfer the registration plates to another vehicle.
[(8)] (7)  Subject to [ subsections (2) and (4) ] subsection (2)  of this section,  after the department
authorizes the use of special interest plates under ORS 805.210, a person may  apply to transfer the
plates to either:
(a) A vehicle that was previously  determined by the department to qualify as a vehicle of special
interest; or
(b) A vehicle approved by the department as a  vehicle of special interest at the time of appli-
cation.
[(9)] (8) If a person  described in subsection [ (8)] (7) of this section provides the department with
only one special interest registration plate for transfer  and the department’s vehicle records show
the special interest registration plate  belongs to a vehicle record with no owner matching an ap-
plicant, the applicant shall provide proof, as  determined by the department by rule, that the plate
is no longer used on the vehicle  it is currently showing being registered to in the department’s ve-
hicle records.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 803.535 is amended to read:
803.535. [Subject to ORS 805.105 and  805.205 and the following, the Department of Transportation
shall select registration plates it issues: ]
[(1) Registration plates shall be in the size, form and arrangement and made  of materials deter-
mined by the department subject to the following: ]
Subject to  ORS 805.105 and 805.205 and the following, the Department of Transportation
shall select registration plates it issues. Registration plates shall be in the  size, form and
arrangement and made of materials determined by the department subject to the following:
[(a)] (1)  Except as otherwise provided in [ paragraph (f) of this ] subsection  (6) of this section ,
the design of the registration plates shall  be that chosen by the commission from entries in the
contest held pursuant to chapter 572, Oregon Laws 1987.
[(b)] (2) If registration plates are issued, means  shall be provided for identifying the vehicle from
the front and rear by means of characters or numerals.
[(c)] (3) All plates shall be made with a reflective material, so as to be a fully reflectorized safety
plate. The reflectorized material  shall be of such a nature as to provide effective dependable
brightness in the promotion of traffic safety during the service period of the plate issued.
[(d)] (4) Except as otherwise authorized under ORS 805.200, all  plates shall contain the distinc-
tive number or characters assigned to the vehicle and the word “Oregon.”
[(e)] (5) When a pair of  registration plates is issued, each plate shall bear the same identification
as the other plate of the pair.
[(f)] (6)  The department may choose plates for vehicles  that are not required to display plates
from the series produced as provided in chapter 572, Oregon  Laws 1987. Nothing in this
[paragraph] subsection  prohibits the  department from issuing plates from the series produced as
provided in chapter 572, Oregon Laws 1987, for  vehicles that are not required to display such plates.
[(2) The department may  provide for designation of the registration period for which the registra-
tion is issued on the plate by means of stickers described under ORS 803.555 or any other method  the
department determines appropriate. ]
[(3) The department may provide plates that may  be used on a vehicle for successive registration
periods when validated by one or more stickers described under ORS 803.555. ]
[16]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 15.
 ORS 803.550 is amended to read:
803.550. (1) A person commits the offense of illegal  alteration or illegal display of a registration
plate if the person knowingly does any of the following:
(a) Illegally alters a registration plate in a manner described in subsection (2) of this section.
(b) Causes a registration plate to be illegally displayed as described in subsection  (3) of this
section.
(c) Operates any vehicle that is displaying a  registration plate that is illegally altered in a
manner described in subsection (2) of this section or  that is illegally displayed as described in sub-
section (3) of this section.
(d) Owns and causes or permits a vehicle to display a registration plate  that is illegally altered
in a manner described in subsection (2) of  this section or that is illegally displayed as described in
subsection (3) of this section.
(2) A registration plate is illegally  altered for purposes of this section if the plate has been al-
tered, modified, covered or obscured in any manner including, but not limited to, the following:
(a) Any change of the color, configuration, numbers, letters or material of the plate.
(b) Any material or covering,  other than a frame or plate holder, placed on, over or in front of
the plate that alters the appearance of the plate.
(c) Any frame or plate holder that obscures the numbers[ ,] or letters [ or registration stickers, ]
so as to render them unreadable.
(3) A registration plate is illegally displayed for purposes of this section if the plate[ :]
[(a)] is displayed on a vehicle other than the vehicle for which the plate was issued .[; or ]
[(b) Displays registration stickers that contain an expiration date that is different from the  expira-
tion date shown upon the vehicle registration records of the Department of Transportation. ]
(4) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to the following:
(a) Any placement of [ registration stickers ] a sticker  described under ORS 803.555.
(b) Any public official who displays or performs  any alteration of a registration plate in the
course of official duties.
(c) Any special interest registration plate approved under ORS 805.210.
(5) Subsection [ (3)(a)] (3) of this section does not apply to a vehicle dealer authorized  to use and
operate vehicles displaying the dealer’s plates under ORS 822.040.
[(6) A person does not commit  the offense of illegal alteration or illegal display of a registration
plate if, at the time the conduct described in subsection (3)(b) of this section occurs, the person has proof
of registration of the vehicle but has not yet received new  registration stickers from the department.
The proof of vehicle registration is valid 30 days from the date  of issuance. The department shall adopt
rules regarding what constitutes proof of vehicle registration under this subsection. ]
[(7)] (6) The court shall dismiss any charge under this section if, prior  to the court appearance
date listed on the citation, the person charged delivers  to the clerk of the court named on the ci-
tation proof of registration of the  vehicle at the time of the violation.  The department shall adopt
rules regarding what constitutes proof of registration under this subsection.
[(8)] (7) The  offense described in this section, illegal alteration or illegal display of a registration
plate, is a Class B traffic violation.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 803.360 is amended to read:
803.360. (1) A person may not register [ or renew the registration of ] a vehicle in this state unless
the person is domiciled in this state, as described in ORS 803.355. This section  does not apply to
persons required by ORS 803.200 or any other provision of law, to register vehicles in this state.
[17]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of  this section, a person who is not domiciled in this state
may register [ or renew the registration of ] a vehicle that:
(a) Is usually left within the state when the registered owner is absent from the state;
(b) Is used primarily for personal transportation within the state;
(c) Is a private passenger vehicle or a  vehicle with a loaded weight of no more than 10,000
pounds; and
(d) Is not a motor home or a camper.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 803.591 is amended to read:
803.591. (1) As used in this section and ORS 803.593:
(a) “Diesel engine” has the meaning given that term in ORS 468A.795.
(b) “Heavy-duty truck” has the meaning given that term in ORS 468A.795.
(c) “Medium-duty truck” has the meaning given that term in ORS 468A.795.
(d) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
(2) On and after January 1, 2025,  the Department of Transportation may not issue a certificate
of title for the following motor vehicles if the  address of the owner of the motor vehicle is located
within Multnomah, Clackamas or Washington County:
(a) A medium-duty truck powered by a model year 2009 or older diesel engine.
(b) A heavy-duty truck powered by a model year 2006 or older diesel engine.
(3) The department may not issue registration [ or renewal  of registration ] on and after the fol-
lowing dates for the following motor vehicles if the  address of the owner of the motor vehicle is
located within Multnomah, Clackamas or Washington County:
(a) January 1,  2023, for a medium-duty truck or a heavy-duty truck if the motor vehicle is pow-
ered by a model year 1996 or older diesel engine.
(b) January 1, 2029, for:
(A) A medium-duty truck powered by a model year 2009 or older diesel engine.
(B) A heavy-duty truck powered by a model year 2009 or older diesel engine owned by a  public
body.
(C) A heavy-duty truck powered by a model year  2006 or older diesel engine owned by a person
other than a public body.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the department may issue a certificate
of title, issue  registration [ or issue renewal of registration ] for a motor vehicle described in sub-
section (2) or (3) of this section after a date described in subsection (2) or (3) of this section if:
(a) The diesel engine that powers the  motor vehicle has been retrofitted with approved retrofit
technology pursuant to rules adopted by  the Environmental Quality Commission under ORS
468A.810; and
(b) Proof of certification of the retrofit has been issued under ORS 468A.810.
(5) The following motor vehicles are exempt from the requirements of this section:
(a) Motor vehicles registered as farm vehicles under the provisions of ORS 805.300.
(b) Farm tractors.
(c) Implements of husbandry.
(d) Motor vehicles used exclusively as training vehicles.
(e) Publicly and privately owned emergency vehicles.
(f) Ambulances.
(g) Campers.
(h) Motor homes.
[18]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) Recreational vehicles.
(j) Heavy-duty trucks  operated for 5,000 miles or fewer on highways of this state during one
calendar year.
(k) Carriers with a fleet size of five or fewer heavy-duty trucks.
(L) Antique vehicles.
(m) Motor trucks, as defined in ORS 801.355, used primarily to transport logs.
(6)(a) In order  for registration to continue to be valid for a motor vehicle that is owned by a
public body and subject to subsection (3) of  this section, the public body shall, in a manner deter-
mined by the department  by rule, submit proof to the department that the motor vehicle complies
with subsection (3) of this section. Proof of compliance must be on  a form supplied by the depart-
ment and must include such information as the department may require. Proof of compliance for  a
motor vehicle owned by a public body is valid until the ownership of the vehicle changes.
(b) The department shall provide notice to a public body of the requirement under  this sub-
section to submit proof of compliance with subsection (3) of this section. The notice shall be  issued
to the public body no later than one year prior to the date that the proof of compliance must be
submitted to the department.
(7) The department may adopt rules as necessary to administer this section.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 805.045 is amended to read:
805.045. (1)  If approval is granted under ORS 283.390, the Department of Transportation may
issue:
(a) Registration plates  or other evidence of registration from any regular series rather than from
any specially designed government series for  a vehicle owned or operated by any state department
or institution; or
(b) Wine country registration plates for a vehicle operated by a member  of the Oregon Wine
Board in discharging the board’s duties if requested to do so by the board.
(2) The registration period for a vehicle described under  this section shall be the same as the
regular registration period for the type of vehicle registered.
(3)(a) The fee for registration [ or renewal ] of a regular series registration plate for a  vehicle
under subsection (1)(a) of this section is the fee established under ORS 803.420 for  registration [ or
renewal] of a state-owned vehicle registered under this section.
(b) The fee for registration [ or renewal ] of a wine country  registration plate for a vehicle under
subsection (1)(b) of this section is the fee established under ORS 803.420 for that  type of vehicle[ ,
and not for renewal of a state-owned vehicle registered  under this section ]. Additionally, the applicant
shall pay the surcharge described under ORS 805.266.
(4) Any vehicle registered under this section and not exempted under ORS 815.300  must meet
the requirements for certification of compliance with pollution control under ORS 815.310.
SECTION 19.  ORS 805.047 is amended to read:
805.047. (1) Upon request of any county,  the Department of Transportation may issue registra-
tion plates or other evidence of registration from any regular series rather than from any  specially
designed government series for a vehicle owned  or operated by the county. The registration period
for a vehicle described under  this section shall be the same as the regular registration period for
the type of vehicle registered. The fee  for registration [ or renewal of registration ] of a vehicle under
this section shall be the fee established under ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a)] (5)(a).
(2) Any vehicle  registered under this section and not exempted under ORS 815.300 must meet
the requirements for certification of compliance with pollution control under ORS 815.310.
[19]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 20.
 ORS 805.050 is amended to read:
805.050. (1) The Department of Transportation shall provide  for registration of vehicles that
qualify under this section in a manner that is consistent with this section. A vehicle qualifies  for
registration under this section if the vehicle meets the following qualifications and  is not a vehicle
that is described under subsection (2) of this section:
(a) The vehicle must be a motor vehicle.
(b) Except  as provided under ORS 803.600, the vehicle must be used exclusively in transporting
students to or from any school or authorized school  activity or function, including extracurricular
activities, and to or from points designated by a school.
(c) The vehicle must meet the requirements for  school buses under ORS 820.100 to 820.120, or
activity vehicles under ORS 820.110 and 820.120.
(d) The vehicle may be  owned, operated or leased by the state, a city or county or any other
political subdivision or otherwise provided to such government body for purposes described in this
subsection or may be privately or otherwise owned and leased by or provided  to a school for pur-
poses described in this subsection.
(2) The following vehicles may not be registered under this section:
(a) A vehicle subject to regulation under ORS chapter 825.
(b) A vehicle regulated by a city under ORS 221.420.
(3) Except as otherwise provided  by this section, vehicles registered under this section are
subject to the same requirements and provisions  for registration as are other vehicles. The following
requirements and provisions are different from those otherwise provided for registration:
(a) The registration period for vehicles subject to this section  shall be an ownership registration
period as  described under ORS 803.400[ , except that the registration continues valid if the ownership
of the  vehicle is transferred to another who continues to use the vehicle for purposes allowed under the
registration].
(b) The fee for registration of the  vehicles shall be the fee for registration of school vehicles
established under ORS 803.420, and no other registration fee shall be required.
(c) Any vehicle registered under this section and not exempted under ORS 815.300  shall meet
the requirements for certification of compliance with pollution control under ORS 815.310.
(4) The department shall suspend  or revoke registration under this section if the department
determines that:
(a) A vehicle registered under this section is being used for purposes other than those  required
for qualification for registration under this section, and a trip  permit as provided under ORS 803.600
has not been obtained.
(b) The vehicle does not comply with requirements under ORS 820.100 to 820.120.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 805.060 is amended to read:
805.060. (1)  The Department of Transportation may issue registration plates or other evidence
of registration from any regular series rather than from any specially designed government  series
for a vehicle operated by a federal, state, county,  city or Indian tribal law enforcement, parole or
probation  agency  in discharging its undercover criminal investigation duties if requested to do so
by the agency. The registration period for a vehicle  described under this section shall be the same
as the regular registration period for the type of vehicle registered. The fee  for registration [ or
renewal of registration ] of a vehicle under  this section shall be the fee established for registration
[or renewal ] of police undercover vehicles under ORS 803.420.
(2) Any vehicle registered under this  section and not exempt from the requirements to comply
[20]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
with certificates of compliance for pollution control equipment by ORS  815.300, must be certified as
complying with the requirements for pollution control equipment under ORS 815.310.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 805.100 is amended to read:
805.100. (1) In the absence of just cause for refusal, the Department  of Transportation shall
provide for registration of any vehicle required to be registered by this state in  a manner consistent
with this section for persons who qualify as disabled veterans under this section. The special regis-
tration provisions under this section are subject to all of the following:
(a) The fee is the  one-time registration fee established by ORS 803.420 for vehicles registered
under this section.
(b) The department may issue registrations for vehicles in a household  under this section in a
number equal  to the number of persons in the household who qualify as disabled veterans under
subsection (2) of this section.
(c) The department shall not register any commercial vehicle under this section.
(2) A person is a disabled veteran who qualifies for  registration of a vehicle under this section
if the person:
(a) Is a disabled veteran whose  disability results from causes connected with service in the
Armed Forces of the United States; and
(b) Has been a member of and discharged or released under  honorable conditions from the
Armed Forces of the United States, and whose service was for not  less than 90 consecutive days or
who was discharged or released on account of a service-connected injury or illness  prior to the
completion of the minimum period of service.
(3) A person qualifies as a disabled veteran under subsection  (2) of this section if the person
presents a letter from the United States Department  of Veterans Affairs or any branch of the Armed
Forces of the United States certifying that the person is a disabled veteran.
(4) Registration issued under  this section is valid as provided in ORS 803.415. [ The registration
period for vehicles registered under  this section exempts the registration from any requirement to be
renewed or to make payment of renewal fees. However,] If any  owner would be required to comply
with ORS 815.310 upon issuance [ or renewal ] of regular  registration for the vehicle, the owner must
comply with ORS 815.310 in  the same manner as for other vehicles or the department may suspend
the registration of the vehicle until the owner submits proof of compliance.
(5) The department may suspend or revoke  any registration issued under this section if the de-
partment determines that the vehicle  is owned by a person not qualified for registration under this
section or the vehicle is a kind not qualified for registration under this section.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 805.103 is amended to read:
805.103. (1) The Department of  Transportation shall provide for issuance of registration plates
for a motor vehicle registered under ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a)] (5)(a) , in a  manner consistent with this
section, to motor vehicle  owners who qualify for the plates as Congressional Medal of Honor re-
cipients under subsection (2) this section.
(2) A person who is a Congressional Medal  of Honor recipient qualifies for registration plates
under this section if the person provides the department  with a certificate from the United States
Department of Veterans  Affairs attesting to the person’s status as a Congressional Medal of Honor
recipient.
(3) Registration plates issued under this section  shall be considered customized registration
plates for purposes of the fee  required in ORS 805.250. The department may waive the fee required
in ORS 805.250.
[21]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) The  department may not issue registration plates for a motor vehicle under this section if
another motor vehicle owned by the applicant has been issued registration  plates under this section.
(5) The registration plates issued under this section shall:
(a) Be issued with a unique background design determined by the department;
(b) Be issued with a specific configuration as determined by the department;
(c) Contain the words “Medal of Honor”;
(d) Contain the image of the Congressional Medal of Honor; and
(e) Meet the requirements for registration plates under ORS 803.535.
(6) If there is a  transfer of interest in the motor vehicle to which the registration plate under
this section is assigned, or if the motor  vehicle is totaled and not reconstructed, the motor vehicle
owner shall remove the registration plate. The Congressional Medal of  Honor recipient may retain
the registration plate, but the registration  plate may not be placed on any other motor vehicle un-
less the registration plate is transferred as set forth in subsection (7) of this section.
(7) If the motor vehicle owner qualifies for the registration plates under  subsection (2) of this
section, the department may transfer registration plates issued under this  section to another motor
vehicle registered under ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a)] (5)(a) , as set forth in ORS 803.530.
(8) The department  shall cancel any registration plates issued under this section if the depart-
ment determines that the motor vehicle is owned by a person who does  not qualify for the regis-
tration plates under subsection (2) of this section  or that the motor vehicle is not registered under
ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a)] (5)(a).
(9) The department may adopt rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 805.105 is amended to read:
805.105. (1) The Department of Transportation shall establish a  veterans’ recognition registra-
tion plate program  to issue registration plates called “veterans’ recognition registration plates”
upon request to an owner of any motor vehicle registered under ORS  803.420 [ (6)(a)] (5)(a)  if the
owner of the  motor vehicle qualifies for the plates. Rules adopted under this section shall include,
but need not be limited to, rules that:
(a) Describe general qualifications  to be met by any veterans’ group in order to be eligible for
a veterans’ recognition registration plate issued under this section.
(b) Specify circumstances  under which the department may cease to issue veterans’ recognition
registration plates.
(c) Specify what constitutes proof of  veteran status for issuance of a veterans’ recognition reg-
istration plate, if such proof is required by a veterans’  group or by the Director of Veterans’ Affairs.
(d) Specify  what constitutes proof that a person is a surviving family member of a person who
was killed in action during an armed conflict while serving in the  Armed Forces of the United
States. The department may only issue a veterans’  recognition registration plate displaying a gold
star decal  and the words “Gold Star Family” to a person who is a parent, sibling, spouse or de-
pendent of a person who was killed in action during an armed  conflict while serving in the Armed
Forces of the United States.
(2)(a) In addition to any other fee  authorized by law, upon issuance of a veterans’ recognition
registration plate under this section  [ and upon renewal of registration ] for a vehicle that has plates
issued under this section, the department shall collect a surcharge of  $2.50 per plate [ for each year
of the registration period ] for the vehicle [ as described under ORS 803.415 ].
(b) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c) of  this subsection, net proceeds of the sur-
charge collected by the department for the veterans’ recognition registration plate shall be deposited
[22]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in the trust fund established under ORS 406.050  for paying the expenses of operating the Oregon
Veterans’ Homes identified in ORS 408.362.
(c) If the department issues a  veterans’ recognition registration plate that names, describes or
represents a veterans’ group,  that veterans’ group may designate an account into which the net
proceeds of the surcharge collected  by the department under this section are to be deposited. The
department shall keep accurate records of  the number of plates issued under this paragraph for each
veterans’ group and, after payment of administrative expenses  of the department, shall deposit
moneys collected under this subsection into the specified account.
(d) The department shall  waive the surcharge required under paragraph (a) of this subsection
and transfer the amount otherwise  paid by the person to the trust fund established under ORS
406.050 if:
(A) A request to waive the surcharge is submitted by a Gold Star Family member; and
(B) Funds are appropriated by the Legislative  Assembly or otherwise made available to the de-
partment for the purpose of paying the surcharge.
(e) Deposits under this subsection shall be made quarterly.
(3)(a) In consultation with the Department of Transportation, the Director of  Veterans’ Affairs
shall design the veterans’ recognition registration plate.
(b) If the department issues a veterans’ recognition registration plate to  recognize a veterans’
group, the department shall, in consultation with the requesting veterans’ group, add words or  a
military-related decal to the veterans’ recognition registration plate that names, describes or re-
presents the veterans’ group.
(c) The department shall add a gold star decal  and the words “Gold Star Family” to a veterans’
recognition registration plate background to recognize surviving family members of  persons killed
in action during an armed conflict while serving in the Armed Forces of the United States.
(d) Except as otherwise required by the  design, veterans’ recognition registration plates must
comply with the requirements of ORS 803.535.
(4) The  department shall determine how many sets of veterans’ recognition registration plates
will be  manufactured. If the department does not sell [ or issue renewal for ] 500 sets of veterans’ re-
cognition registration plates in any one year, the department shall  cease production of veterans’
recognition  registration  plates. For the purposes of this section, veterans’ recognition registration
plates that name, describe or represent a veterans’ group are included in the total number of
veterans’ recognition registration plates issued.
(5) For the purposes of this section, “sibling” includes siblings of the whole or  half blood and
siblings by adoption, marriage or domestic partnership.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 805.115 is amended to read:
805.115. (1) In the absence of just cause for refusal, the Department  of Transportation shall
provide for registration in a manner consistent with this section for persons who qualify  under this
section as active  members of the Oregon National Guard. The special registration provisions under
this section are subject to the following:
(a) The  fee to register [ or renew registration ] under this section shall be the regular registration
fee for the vehicle.
(b) Any motor  vehicle registered under ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a) or (7)(c)(C) or (D) ] (5)(a) or (h)(C)
or (D)  may be registered under this section.
(2) A  person is eligible for registration under this section if the person is issued a certificate
by the Oregon  Military Department certifying that the person is an active member of the Oregon
[23]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
National Guard.
(3) The department may suspend[ ,] or revoke [ or refuse to renew ] any  registration issued under
this section if the department determines  that the vehicle is owned by a person not qualified for
registration under this section or that the vehicle is not eligible for registration under  this section.
(4) The  Oregon Military Department shall notify the Department of Transportation within 30
days if a person issued a certificate described in subsection (2) of this section ceases  to be an active
member of the Oregon National Guard.
SECTION 26.
 ORS 805.120 is amended to read:
805.120. (1) The owner of a fleet of vehicles may register the vehicles under this section  as a
fleet in lieu of registering the vehicles individually.
(2) Except as otherwise provided under this section, vehicles  registered in a fleet under this
section are subject to the same taxes, fees, qualifications, provisions,  conditions, prohibitions and
penalties applicable to similar vehicles otherwise registered under the vehicle code.
(3) The following apply to fleets registered under this section:
(a) The registered  owner of the fleet must maintain the number of vehicles registered in the fleet
that the  Department of Transportation determines by rule to be required for participation in the
fleet registration program.
[(b) Fleet registration or renewal of fleet registration under this  section may be annual or biennial
registration as determined by the department by rule. ]
[(c)] (b)  The registration of individual vehicles in a fleet  registered under this section does not
expire as long as the fleet registration is valid.
[(d)] (c)  The department shall assign identification to the fleet and,  upon payment of appropriate
fees, shall issue to the registered owner of the fleet permanent fleet tags, stickers,  plates or other
identification the department determines appropriate for the  vehicles that the owner and the de-
partment have agreed to place in the fleet. The department may  establish the use of any appropriate
form of identification under this paragraph  as the department determines convenient for its own
operation.
[(e)] (d)  The tags, stickers, plates or other appropriate identification issued under this section
shall be displayed on any vehicle to which it has been assigned by the department.
[(f)] (e)  Registration cards issued by the department for vehicles registered under this section
are only required to  individually describe the vehicles in the fleet to the extent the department de-
termines necessary and to identify the fleet in which the vehicles are registered.
[(g)] (f)  Application  for registration under this section shall be in the manner determined by the
department by rule.
[(h)] (g)  The fleet owner shall maintain records and provide information to the department as
required by the department by rule and shall  allow the department to audit the records of the owner
and conduct inspections  at any reasonable time to determine compliance with requirements for fleet
registration.
[(i)] (h)  Vehicles shall be  added to the fleet and transferred from the fleet according to proce-
dures established by the department by rule.
[(j)] (i) The vehicles in the fleet shall be marked in compliance with any requirement for  vehicle
markings the department determines necessary for identification of fleet vehicles.
[(k)] (j) The department may adjust fee payments [ and registration periods ] for individual vehicles
added to a fleet registered under this section as the department determines  necessary for adminis-
tration of the fleet registration.
[24]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(L)] (k)  The fees for a  fleet registered under this section are the same as the fees required if
the vehicles in the fleet are individually registered under the vehicle code.
[(m)] (L)  The  department may charge a service charge for each vehicle entered into a fleet [ and
a fleet vehicle renewal charge for each vehicle  in the fleet at the time of renewal ]. Fees described in
this paragraph are established under ORS 803.420.
[(n)] (m)  The department may schedule the time for payment of  fleet registration fees in any
manner convenient to the department or the fleet owner.
[(o)] (n)  The fleet owner shall comply  with any rules the department establishes for the regis-
tration of vehicles in fleets under this section.
[(p)] (o)  The department shall cancel any registration under this section  if the department de-
termines that the owner of the vehicles registered is not complying with any requirements for  fleet
registration established under this section or by the department.
[(q)] (p)  A fleet owner may certify compliance with pollution control requirements under  ORS
815.310 in the manner provided under ORS 815.310 for vehicles registered under this section.
[(r)] (q) The department shall establish procedures for the reporting  of odometer disclosures for
the vehicles in the fleet on a regular basis and for vehicles that are  withdrawn from the fleet, if
odometer disclosures are otherwise required. The reports shall provide any  information the depart-
ment determines by rule to be necessary.  The department may establish any reporting time the de-
partment considers convenient[ , but shall  attempt to establish periods with a frequency roughly
equivalent to those for renewal  of vehicle registration ]. The department shall retain the odometer in-
formation submitted under this section but need not print  it on certificates of title or registration
cards.
[(4) A fleet owner may request that  the registration of all vehicles in the fleet expire in the same
month. Notwithstanding ORS 803.405 or any other provision of this section, if such  a request is made
the department shall: ]
[(a) Adjust the registration expiration date of all vehicles in the fleet. ]
[(b) When a vehicle that is already registered in this state  is added to the fleet, adjust the regis-
tration expiration date of the vehicle to correspond to that of other vehicles in the fleet. ]
[(c) When a vehicle that has never before been registered in this state is added  to the fleet, assign
a registration expiration date to the vehicle that corresponds to that of other vehicles in the fleet. ]
[(5) When the department adjusts or assigns registration expiration  dates in accordance with sub-
section (4) of this section, the department shall prorate all registration fees to reflect  the adjustment or
assignment.]
[(6)] (4)  The department shall adopt rules necessary for the administration of this section.  The
rules may include any rules that increase the convenience of administration or the convenience of
the registration process under this section.
SECTION 27.
 ORS 805.205 is amended to read:
805.205. (1) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, the Department of Transporta-
tion shall provide for issuance of registration plates described in  this section for nonprofit groups
meeting the qualifications  for tax exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code
and for institutions of  higher education. Plates issued under this section may be issued to owners
of motor vehicles registered under the provisions of  ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a)] (5)(a) . Plates issued under
this section  may not contain expressions of political opinion or religious belief. Rules adopted under
this section shall include, but need not be limited to, rules that:
(a) Specify circumstances under which the department may cease to issue plates for any partic-
[25]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ular group.
(b) Require each group for which plates are issued to file  an annual statement on a form de-
signed by the department showing that the group is a nonprofit group or is an institution of  higher
education and that the group or institution otherwise meets the qualifications imposed for  eligibility
for plates issued under this section.  The statement shall include names and addresses of current
directors or officers of the group or institution or  of other persons authorized to speak for the group
or institution on matters affecting plates issued under this section.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs  (b) and (c) of this subsection, in addition to
any other fee authorized by law, upon issuance  of a plate under this section [ and upon renewal of
registration] for a vehicle that  has plates issued under this section, the department shall collect a
surcharge [ for each year of the registration period ]. The surcharge shall be determined by the de-
partment by rule and may not be less than $2.50 per plate or more than $16 per plate. In  setting the
amount of the surcharge, the department shall consult with the nonprofit group for which the  plates
are issued.
(b) In addition  to any other fee authorized by law, upon issuance of a plate under this section
that recognizes an institution of higher education in this  state[ , and upon renewal of registration for
a vehicle that has such plates, ] the department shall collect a surcharge of  $8 per plate [ for each year
of the registration period ].
(c) In addition to any other fee authorized by law,  upon issuance of a Share the Road registra-
tion plate the department shall collect a surcharge of $5 [ per year of registration ].
(3) Plates issued under this section shall be from the current regular issue of plates except that:
(a) If the group requesting the plates is an institution of higher education, the plates  shall, upon
request, contain words that indicate the plates are issued to recognize  the institution or shall con-
tain the institution’s logo or an image of the institution’s mascot; or
(b) If the group requesting the  plates is a group that recognizes fallen public safety officers, the
plates shall, upon request, contain a decal that indicates the plates are issued to recognize  fallen
public safety officers.
(4) Except as otherwise required by  the design chosen, the plates shall comply with the re-
quirements of ORS 803.535. The department shall determine how many sets of plates shall be man-
ufactured for each group approved under this section. If the department does not sell  [ or issue
renewal for ] 500 sets of plates for a particular group in any one year, the department shall cease
production of those plates.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6) of  this section, each group that is found by
the department to be eligible for plates issued under this section may  designate an account into
which the net proceeds of the surcharge collected  by the department under subsection (2) of this
section are to be deposited. The department shall keep accurate records of the number of plates  is-
sued for each group that qualifies. After payment  of administrative expenses of the department,
moneys collected under  this section for each group shall be deposited by the department into an
account specified by that group. If any group  does not specify an account for the moneys collected
from the sale of plates issued under this section, the  department shall deposit moneys collected for
those plates  into the Passenger Rail Transportation Account established under ORS 802.100 to be
used as other moneys in the account are used. Deposits under this subsection shall be made at least
quarterly.
(6)(a) Each institution of higher education that requests a  plate under this section shall desig-
nate an account in the general fund of the institution, and the proceeds in  the account shall be used
[26]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
for the purpose of academic enrichment at the institution.
(b) Net proceeds  of the surcharge collected by the department for Share the Road registration
plates shall be deposited into two  accounts designated by The Street Trust Community Fund and
Cycle Oregon. The department shall evenly distribute the  net proceeds to each account. Deposits
under this paragraph shall be made at least quarterly. At any time  that the department determines
that the accounts designated by The Street Trust Community Fund and Cycle  Oregon cease to exist,
the department may deposit the proceeds into the Passenger Rail Transportation Account estab-
lished under ORS 802.100.
(c) Net proceeds of the  surcharge collected by the department for Keep Kids Safe registration
plates shall be deposited into an account designated  by the Children’s Trust Fund of Oregon Foun-
dation to fund strategies and approaches shown to prevent or reduce child abuse.  Deposits made
under this paragraph shall be made at least quarterly. At any time  that the department determines
that the account designated by the Children’s  Trust Fund of Oregon Foundation ceases to exist, the
department shall deposit the proceeds into the Keep Kids Safe Registration Plate Account estab-
lished in ORS 805.207. At the beginning of each biennium, the Department of Early  Learning and
Care shall evenly distribute the moneys  in the Keep Kids Safe Registration Plate Account to the
counties in this state, until each county receives $1,000. After each county has received $1,000,  the
Department of Early Learning and Care  shall distribute any remaining moneys to each county in
an amount equal to the percentage of Keep  Kids Safe registration plates sold in that county. Each
county shall use the moneys received under this paragraph solely for the purpose of funding  strat-
egies and approaches shown to prevent or reduce child abuse.
(7) The Department of Transportation may not accept applications to create  new group regis-
tration plates on or after August 12, 2015.
SECTION 28.
 ORS 805.222 is amended to read:
805.222. (1) The Department of Transportation shall establish a special registration program  and
provide for issuance of special registration plates for nonprofit groups meeting the qualifications for
tax exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue  Code, for institutions of higher
education and for public bodies, as defined in ORS 174.109.
(2) Plates issued under this section may be issued to owners of motor vehicles registered under
the provisions of  ORS 803.420 [(6)(a)] (5)(a). In addition, the department may adopt rules for issuance
of special  registration plates issued pursuant to this section for vehicles not registered under ORS
803.420 [(6)(a)] (5)(a).
(3) Plates issued under this section may not  contain expressions of political opinion or religious
belief.
(4) Rules adopted under this section shall include, but need not be limited to, rules that:
(a) Describe  general qualifications to be met by any nonprofit group, institution of higher edu-
cation or public body in order to be eligible for plates issued under this section.
(b) Specify circumstances  under which the department may cease to issue plates under this
section.
(c) Require each nonprofit group, institution of higher education or public body for which plates
are issued to file an annual statement on a form designed by the department showing  that the group
is a nonprofit group, institution of higher education or public body  and that the nonprofit group,
institution of higher education or public body otherwise meets  the qualifications imposed for eligi-
bility for plates issued under this section. The statement shall include  names and addresses of cur-
rent directors or officers of the nonprofit group, institution of higher education or public body or
[27]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of other persons authorized to speak for the nonprofit group, institution  of higher education or
public body on matters affecting plates issued under this section.
(d) Specify the manner in which a  nonprofit group, institution of higher education or public body
may apply for a special registration plate.
(5) In addition to any other fee authorized by law, for each set of special  registration plates is-
sued pursuant to this section, the department shall collect  a surcharge of $40 payable when the
plates are issued [ and upon each  subsequent renewal of registration of a vehicle bearing the plates ].
The department shall distribute the moneys from the surcharge as provided  in subsection (8) of this
section.
(6) The department, in consultation  with the nonprofit group, institution of higher education or
public body requesting the special registration plate, shall develop a unique design for each plate
issued under this section. Any design must comply with requirements described under ORS 803.535.
(7) The department  shall determine how many sets of plates shall be manufactured for each plate
approved under this  section. If the department does not issue 2,000 sets of plates for a particular
nonprofit group, institution of higher education or public body in any  one year, the department shall
cease production of those plates.
(8) Each nonprofit group, institution of higher education or public body  that is found by the
department to be eligible for plates issued under this section  may designate an account into which
the net proceeds of the surcharge collected by the department under  subsection (5) of this section
are to be deposited. The department shall  keep accurate records of the number of plates issued for
each nonprofit group, institution of higher  education or public body that qualifies. After payment
of administrative expenses of the department, moneys collected under  this section for a nonprofit
group, institution of higher education or public body shall be  deposited by the department into an
account specified by that nonprofit  group, institution of higher education or public body. If any
nonprofit group, institution of higher education or public body does not specify an account for the
moneys collected from the sale  of plates issued under this section, the department shall deposit
moneys collected for those plates  into the Passenger Rail Transportation Account established under
ORS 802.100 to be used as other moneys  in the account are used. Deposits under this subsection
shall be made at least quarterly.
SECTION 29.
 ORS 805.255 is amended to read:
805.255. (1) The Department of Transportation shall establish  a salmon registration plate pro-
gram to issue special registration plates called “salmon registration  plates” upon request to owners
of motor vehicles registered under the provisions of ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a)] (5)(a)  to observe the im-
portance of salmonid to Oregon. In addition,  the department may adopt rules for issuance of salmon
registration plates for vehicles not registered under the provisions of ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a)] (5)(a).
(2) In addition to any other fee authorized by law,  for each salmon registration plate issued
under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall collect a surcharge of $7.50 [ for each  year
of the registration period ], payable when the plate is issued [ and upon each subsequent renewal of
registration of a vehicle bearing the plate ]. The department shall distribute the surcharge as provided
in ORS 805.256.
SECTION 30.  ORS 805.260 is amended to read:
805.260. (1) The Department of Transportation  shall establish a cultural registration plate pro-
gram to issue special registration plates called “cultural  registration plates” upon request to owners
of motor vehicles registered under the provisions of ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a)] (5)(a)  to observe the im-
portance  of  culture to Oregon. In addition, the department may adopt rules for issuance of cultural
[28]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
registration plates for vehicles not registered under the provisions of ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a)] (5)(a).
(2) In addition to any other  fee authorized by law, for each cultural registration plate issued
under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall  collect a surcharge of $25 payable when
the plate is issued [ and upon each subsequent renewal of registration of a vehicle bearing the  plate ].
The department shall distribute the surcharge as provided in ORS 805.261.
(3) The department, in consultation with the Trust for Cultural Development Board, shall  design
the cultural registration plates. The plates  shall meet the requirements for registration plates de-
scribed in ORS 803.535.
SECTION 31.
 ORS 805.263 is amended to read:
805.263. (1)  The Department of Transportation shall establish a Crater Lake National Park reg-
istration plate program to issue special registration plates called “Crater  Lake National Park reg-
istration plates” upon request to owners of  motor vehicles registered under the provisions of ORS
803.420 [(6)(a)] (5)(a)  to commemorate the 100th anniversary of Crater Lake National Park. The
department may adopt rules  for issuance of Crater Lake National Park registration plates for vehi-
cles that are not registered under the provisions of ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a)] (5)(a).
(2) In addition to any other fee authorized by law, for each Crater Lake National Park  regis-
tration plate issued under subsection (1) of this section, the  department shall collect a surcharge
of $15 payable when the plate  is issued. The department shall distribute the surcharge as provided
in ORS 805.264.
SECTION 32.  ORS 805.266 is amended to read:
805.266. (1) The Department of Transportation shall establish a  wine country registration plate
program to issue special registration plates called “wine country registration plates” upon  request
to owners of motor vehicles registered under the provisions of ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a)] (5)(a).
(2) In addition to any other fee  authorized by law, for each set of wine country registration
plates issued under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall  collect a surcharge of $30
payable when the plates are issued [ and upon each subsequent renewal of  registration of a vehicle
bearing the plates ]. The department shall transfer  the moneys from the surcharge as provided in ORS
805.272.
SECTION 33.  ORS 805.278 is amended to read:
805.278. (1) The Department of Transportation shall establish  a Portland Trail Blazers registra-
tion plate program to issue special registration plates to support charitable initiatives through  the
Trail Blazers Foundation established by the Portland Trail Blazers.  The special registration plates
shall be issued upon request to owners of motor vehicles  registered under ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a)]
(5)(a). In addition, the department may adopt rules for issuance of Portland Trail Blazers registra-
tion plates for vehicles not registered under ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a)] (5)(a).
(2) In addition to any other fee authorized by law,  for each set of Portland Trail Blazers regis-
tration plates issued under subsection (1)  of this section, the department shall collect a surcharge
of $40  payable when the plates are issued [ and upon each subsequent renewal of registration of a
vehicle bearing the plates ]. The department shall distribute the moneys from the surcharge as  pro-
vided in ORS 805.279.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 803.530, Portland Trail Blazers registration plates may  be transferred
from vehicle to vehicle  if the department stops issuing the plates, as long as the plates are legible
and capable of being used for identification purposes.
(4) The  Portland Trail Blazers registration plate must include the name or logo of the Portland
Trail Blazers basketball team. The department shall design the plate in consultation with the
[29]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Portland Trail Blazers. The final design of the plate is subject to approval  by the Portland Trail
Blazers. The department may enter into agreements necessary for the use of the  logo, name, marks
or slogans associated with the Portland Trail Blazers or the National Basketball Association.
(5) Except as otherwise  required by the design approved by the department, Portland Trail
Blazers registration plates must comply with the requirements of ORS 803.535.
SECTION 34.
 ORS 805.283 is amended to read:
805.283. (1) The Department of Transportation shall establish a breast  cancer awareness regis-
tration plate program to issue special registration plates called “breast cancer awareness registra-
tion plates” upon request to owners of motor  vehicles registered under ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a)] (5)(a) .
In addition, the department may adopt rules for issuance of  breast cancer awareness registration
plates for vehicles not registered under ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a)] (5)(a).
(2) In addition to any other fee authorized by law, for each set of breast cancer awareness reg-
istration plates issued under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall collect a  surcharge
of $40 payable when the plates are issued [ and upon each subsequent renewal of registration of  a
vehicle bearing the plates ]. The department shall distribute the surcharge as provided in ORS 805.285.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 803.530, breast cancer awareness registration plates may be trans-
ferred from vehicle to vehicle if the department stops issuing the plates,  as long as the plates are
legible and capable of being used for identification purposes.
SECTION 35.
 ORS 805.287 is amended to read:
805.287. (1) The Department of Transportation shall establish a Pacific Wonderland registration
plate program to issue special registration  plates called “Pacific Wonderland registration plates”
upon request to owners of motor vehicles registered  under the provisions of ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a)]
(5)(a). In addition, the department may adopt rules for issuance  of Pacific Wonderland registration
plates for vehicles not registered under the provisions of ORS 803.420 [ (6)(a)] (5)(a).
(2) In addition to any other fee  authorized by law, for each set of Pacific Wonderland registra-
tion plates issued under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall  collect a surcharge of
$100 payable when the plates are issued. The department shall  transfer the moneys from the sur-
charge as provided in ORS 805.289.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 803.530,  Pacific Wonderland registration plates may be transferred
from vehicle to vehicle  if the department stops issuing the plates, as long as the plates are legible
and capable of being used for identification purposes.
SECTION 36.  ORS 806.020 is amended to read:
806.020. This section provides exemptions from  the necessity for compliance with or proof of
compliance  with  financial responsibility requirements in accident reports under ORS 811.725, when
applying for vehicle registration under ORS 803.370 [ or 803.460] and for operating a vehicle under
ORS 806.010. The owner or operator of a vehicle is exempt, as provided by this section, from finan-
cial responsibility requirements if the vehicle involved in the accident, sought to be registered  or
operated is any of the following:
(1) An antique vehicle issued permanent registration under ORS 805.010.
(2) A farm trailer.
(3) A farm tractor.
(4) An implement of husbandry.
(5) A vehicle of special interest that is maintained as a collector’s item and  used for exhibitions,
parades, club activities and similar uses, but not  used primarily for the transportation of persons
or property.
[30]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) A snowmobile  or a Class I, Class III or Class IV all-terrain vehicle, unless the vehicle is
operating on an all-terrain vehicle highway access route  that is designated by the Oregon Trans-
portation Commission as open to all-terrain vehicles.
(7) Any motor vehicle  not operated on any highway or premises open to the public in this state.
(8) A motor assisted scooter.
(9) An electric personal assistive mobility device.
SECTION 37.
 ORS 806.180 is amended to read:
806.180. A person who is required under ORS [ 803.460 or] 811.725 to provide  proof of compliance
with financial responsibility requirements shall  certify proof of compliance in a manner prescribed
by the Department of Transportation by rule  and shall provide any information that the department
requires.
SECTION 38.  ORS 815.295 is amended to read:
815.295. (1) A person commits the offense of failure to be  equipped with required pollution con-
trol equipment if the person operates a motor vehicle upon a highway or leaves a  motor vehicle
standing upon a highway and the vehicle is not  equipped with a motor vehicle pollution control
system, as defined under ORS 468A.350, that is  in compliance with motor vehicle pollutant, noise
control and emission standards adopted by  the Environmental Quality Commission under ORS
468A.360.
(2) A person shall not be found in violation  of this section if proof of compliance has been issued
for the vehicle in  compliance with ORS 815.310. Whenever proof of compliance is revoked, suspended
or restricted because  a certified system, as defined in ORS 468A.350, or factory-installed system, as
defined in ORS 468A.350, has been found to be unsafe in actual  use or is otherwise mechanically
defective, the defect  must be corrected or the system must be brought into compliance with the rules
of the commission within 30 days after such finding.
(3) Exemptions to this section are established under ORS 815.300. In addition to such  ex-
emptions, the following exemptions to this section are established:
(a) If the Environmental Quality Commission adopts  a rule under ORS 468A.360 requiring cer-
tified or factory-installed systems on motor vehicles  registered in designated counties, such vehicles
are not required to be  in compliance with such rules until after the date of registration[ , reregis-
tration or renewal ] of the vehicle immediately subsequent to the effective date of the rule.
(b) Implements of husbandry, road machinery, road rollers and farm  tractors are exempt from
this section.
(c) Antique vehicles maintained as collectors’  items and used for exhibitions, parades, club ac-
tivities and similar uses, but  not used primarily for the transportation of persons or property, are
exempt from this section.
(4) The offense described in this section, failure to be equipped with required  pollution control
equipment, is a Class C traffic violation.
SECTION 39.  ORS 815.300 is amended to read:
815.300. This section establishes exemptions from the requirements under ORS  815.295 to be
equipped with a certified pollution control system. Exemptions established  by this section are in
addition to any exemptions established by ORS 801.026. The exemptions established  in this section
are also  applicable to requirements for certification of pollution control equipment before registra-
tion under ORS 803.350  [and 803.465]. All of the following vehicles are exempt from the requirements
under ORS 815.295:
(1) Any vehicle that is not a motor vehicle.
[31]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Any vehicle unless the vehicle is registered within:
(a) The boundaries of the metropolitan service district formed under ORS chapter  268 for the
metropolitan area, as defined in ORS 268.020, which includes the City of Portland, Oregon.
(b) Boundaries designated by the Environmental Quality Commission under ORS 468A.390.
(3) Any new motor vehicle or new motor vehicle engine  when the registration results from the
initial retail sale thereof.
(4) Any motor vehicle:
(a) Not registered in areas designated under subsection (2)(a) of this section, including any ex-
pansion of such boundary under  subsection (2)(b) of this section, with a model year that predates
by more than 20 years the year in which registration [ or renewal of registration ] is required; or
(b) Registered in areas designated under subsection (2)(a) of  this section, including any expan-
sion of such boundary under subsection (2)(b) of this section, with a model year of 1974 or earlier.
(5) Motor vehicles that are registered  as farm vehicles under ORS 805.300 or apportioned farm
vehicles under ORS 805.300.
(6) Special interest vehicles that are maintained as  collectors’ items and used for exhibitions,
parades, club activities and similar uses but not used primarily for the transportation of persons  or
property.
(7) Fixed load vehicles.
(8) Vehicles that  are proportionally registered under ORS 826.009 and 826.011 in accordance
with agreements established under ORS 826.007.
(9) Electric motor vehicles. This subsection does  not exempt hybrid motor vehicles that use
electricity and another source of motive power.
(10) First  response rescue units operated by political subdivisions of this state that are not used
to transport persons who are ill or injured or who have disabilities.
(11) A vehicle that is currently registered in Oregon at  the time application for new registration
is received by the Department of Transportation if the new registration is  a result of a change in
the registration or plate type [ and the application is received at least four months prior to the expi-
ration of the existing registration ].
(12) Golf carts.
(13) Any Class I, Class II, Class III or Class IV all-terrain vehicle.
(14) An original equipment manufacturer vehicle that is engineered, designed,  produced and
warranted to use natural gas as its only fuel source.
(15) Racing activity vehicles.
SECTION 40.
 ORS 815.310 is amended to read:
815.310. When proof of compliance  with pollution control equipment requirements is required
under ORS 803.350[ , 803.465] and 815.295 the following apply:
(1) The proof may be provided by any means that the Department of Transportation  and the
Environmental Quality Commission determine by joint rulemaking or by  interagency agreement to
be satisfactory.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, when a certificate of compliance  is used as
proof, the certificate must comply with all the following:
(a) It must be signed by a person licensed and qualified under ORS 468A.380.
(b) It must be  dated not more than 180 days prior to the motor vehicle registration [ or renewal
of registration ].
(c) It must be  on a form supplied by the Department of Environmental Quality and must include
[32]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
such information as the department may require.
(3) In order for registration to continue to be valid for a motor vehicle that is registered  as a
government-owned vehicle under ORS 805.040, a police undercover vehicle under ORS 805.060  or a
state-owned vehicle with regular registration plates  under ORS 805.045, the vehicle must be certified
as frequently as a privately owned vehicle of the same registration type  is required to be certified.
For purposes of this subsection, the registration type of a privately owned vehicle is determined  by
the registration period for the  vehicle under ORS 803.415. For local government vehicles, the proof
of certification may be provided through self-testing facilities provided  by local governmental agen-
cies. Local governmental agencies providing self-testing facilities may not be charged a fee in  con-
nection with provision of the required proof. However, a  reasonable fee covering department
expenses in administering such self-testing programs may be charged.
SECTION 41.
 ORS 822.213 is amended to read:
822.213. (1) In addition to  the privileges described under ORS 822.210, the holder of a current,
valid towing business certificate issued under ORS 822.205 may use  a tow vehicle to transport
property for hire other than as described in ORS 822.210 if:
(a) The tow vehicle is used primarily for the purposes  described in ORS 822.210 in a manner
specified by the department by rule;
(b) The tow vehicle has a combined weight of 26,001 pounds or more;
(c) The holder of the towing business  certificate has submitted a declaration of weight under
ORS 803.435 and has registered the tow vehicle under ORS 803.420 [ (14)(a)] (11)(a); and
(d) The holder of the towing business certificate operates in accordance with the provisions  of
ORS chapter 825.
(2) A tow vehicle that is  used to transport property for hire other than as described in ORS
822.210 is subject to the weight-mile tax imposed under ORS 825.474.
SECTION 42.
 ORS 826.031 is amended to read:
826.031. (1) The owner of a vehicle that is subject to the tax imposed under ORS 825.474 and
that is not registered  under the proportional registration provisions of this chapter and is not reg-
istered in any other jurisdiction shall register the vehicle with the Department of Transportation  if
the vehicle is to be operated in this state. Registration under this section is in  lieu of registration
under ORS chapter 803.
(2) The department shall determine the form of application for  registration [ and renewal of reg-
istration] and may  require any information that it determines necessary to facilitate the registration
process.
(3) A vehicle registered under this section is subject to  the insurance requirements of ORS
825.160 and not to the financial responsibility requirements of ORS chapter  806. [Proof of compliance
with financial responsibility requirements as  specified in ORS 803.460 is not required for renewal of
registration of a vehicle under this section. ]
(4) A vehicle registered under this section shall be deemed to be fully  registered in this state
for any type of movement or operation, except  that in those instances in which a grant of authority
is required for intrastate movement or operation, no such vehicle shall be operated  in intrastate
commerce in this state unless  the owner thereof has been granted intrastate authority or right by
the department and  unless the vehicle is being operated in conformity with such authority and
rights.
(5) A vehicle may be registered under this section prior to a certificate of  title being issued for
the vehicle but nothing in this section affects any requirement that a certificate of title be issued.
[33]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 43.
 ORS 381.312 is amended to read:
381.312. (1) The Port of  Hood River, or any private entity or unit of government that the port
designates to operate a bridge in an agreement the port enters into under ORS 381.205 to 381.314,
may establish, collect or alter a reasonable toll, administrative fee or  civil penalty in connection
with the bridge.
(2) The port or the private entity or unit of government  that the port designates shall deposit
any proceeds from a toll, administrative fee or civil penalty into an account established under  an
agreement described in ORS 381.310. The port or  unit of government shall deposit the share of
proceeds that the port or unit of government receives  with a depository that meets the requirements
set forth in ORS chapter 295. A private entity shall deposit the share of proceeds that the private
entity receives with an insured institution, as defined in ORS 706.008.
(3)(a) The Department of Transportation, on behalf of the port, shall[ :]
[(A)] assess and collect the amount of a toll that a person fails to pay,  plus a civil penalty and
administrative fee[ ; and ]
[(B) Refuse to renew the motor vehicle registration of the motor vehicle of a person that failed to
pay a toll, a civil penalty or an administrative fee assessed under this subsection ].
(b) For the purpose of conducting  the activities described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the
department shall:
(A) Treat a toll  established in connection with the bridge as a toll that was established under
ORS 383.004;
(B) Apply the exemptions set forth in ORS 383.035 [ (5)] (4); and
(C) Adopt rules to establish a process by means of which the port, a private entity or a unit  of
government may request action from the department under this subsection.
SECTION 44.
 ORS 381.725 is amended to read:
381.725. (1) A board shall have the  exclusive power to impose, fix and periodically adjust the
rate of tolls or other charges for use of a bridge owned or operated  by the commission without ap-
proval, authorization  or concurrence by a state legislature, state toll authority, local government,
state agency,  state official or other entity. The board may establish and implement rules for speci-
fying the rate of tolls and other charges, including but  not limited to discounts, exemptions and
distinct rates for certain classes of vehicle and user. Nothing in ORS 383.001 to 383.245 prohibits  a
commission from establishing or setting a toll or other charge for use of a  bridge owned or operated
by the commission.
(2) In  setting and periodically adjusting toll rates or other charges, a board shall ensure that
toll rates and other charges  annually yield revenue sufficient to meet the costs, expenses and obli-
gations of the commission,  including the satisfaction of the financial and other covenants made by
the commission with regard to bonds or other debt instruments.
(3) To  enforce the payment of tolls and other charges for use of a bridge, the commission may
enter into agreements with the Department of Transportation and an agency of the State  of
Washington. An agreement may provide that[ :]
[(a)] the department or agency shall provide information to the commission or the  commission’s
designee to identify registered owners of vehicles who fail to pay a toll or  other charge established
by the commission under this section.
[(b) If a commission,  or a commission’s designee, gives notice to the department or agency that a
person has not  paid a toll or other charge established under this section, the department or agency
shall refuse to renew the motor vehicle registration of the motor vehicle  operated by the person at the
[34]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
time of the violation. ]
[(c) The department or agency may renew a motor vehicle registration of a person  described in
paragraph (b)  of this subsection upon receipt of a notice from a commission, or a commission’s
designee, indicating that all tolls and other charges established under this section and owed by the
person have been paid. ]
(4) A transponder record or recorded image of a vehicle  and the registration plate of the vehicle
produced by a photo enforcement system at the time a driver of a vehicle did not  pay a toll is prima
facie evidence that the registered owner of the vehicle is the driver  of the vehicle, provided that,
if the registered owner of a vehicle is a  person in the vehicle rental or leasing business, the regis-
tered owner may identify the person who was operating the vehicle  at the time the toll was not paid
or pay the toll and other  charges. A registered owner of a vehicle who pays a toll or other charge
imposed while another person was operating the vehicle of the  registered owner is entitled to full
reimbursement from the  operator. The rights granted to the commission to enforce the payment of
tolls and other charges of the commission under ORS 381.702 to 381.755 are supplemental, and the
commission may employ  all other remedies available to the commission under the laws of the State
of Oregon and the State of Washington.
(5) The proceeds from toll rates and other charges of the commission may only be  used to pay
the necessary and incidental costs and expenses incurred by the commission  in connection with
owning, constructing, operating, maintaining,  renewing and governing a bridge, including but not
limited to costs incurred for:
(a) The design, development, construction, equipping,  installation, financing or refinancing of the
bridge, demolition and removal of the existing bridge and mitigation of associated impacts;
(b) The  operation, repair, maintenance, resurfacing, preservation, equipping, improvement, re-
construction, renewal and replacement of the bridge;
(c) The tolling  of the bridge, the collection, administration and enforcement of tolls and the ac-
quisition, leasing, maintenance and replacement of tolling equipment and software;
(d) The financing or refinancing of any bonds or other debt instruments of the commission;
(e) A reasonable return on investment  for the private financing of the costs, expenses or obli-
gations of the commission;
(f) The establishment and maintenance of reserves or sinking funds approved by the board; and
(g) Any other obligations or  expenses incurred by the commission in carrying out the
commission’s purposes under ORS 381.702 to 381.755.
(6) The commission  may grant to a public or private entity by franchise, lease or in another
manner the use or control  of all or part of a bridge, property or facility owned or under the control
of the commission, and may fix the terms, conditions,  rents and other payments for the use or con-
trol.
(7) For the purpose of funding a bridge under ORS  381.702 to 381.755, the approaches, connect-
ing roads, related facilities and  appurtenances on both sides of the Columbia River are designated
as part of the highway system of Oregon. All revenues, receipts, grants, bond proceeds  and other
funds of the commission may be commingled  and spent to carry out the purposes of the commission,
unless and to the extent otherwise restricted  by the terms of a grant agreement or debt instrument.
SECTION 45.
 ORS 383.035 is amended to read:
383.035. (1) A person shall pay a toll established under ORS 383.004.
(2) A person who fails to pay a toll established under ORS 383.004 shall pay to the  Department
of Transportation the amount of the toll, a civil penalty and  an administrative fee established by the
[35]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tollway operator not to exceed the actual cost of collecting the unpaid toll. The  department shall
adopt by rule the amount of civil penalty that may be imposed for each violation of  subsection (1)
of this section.
(3) A civil penalty imposed under this section may be remitted or reduced upon such  terms and
conditions as the department considers proper and consistent.
[(4) In addition to any other penalty, the department shall refuse to renew the motor vehicle regis-
tration of a motor vehicle when the registered owner of the motor vehicle has not paid the toll,  the civil
penalty and any administrative fee charged under this section. ]
[(5)] (4) This section does not apply to:
(a) A person who is a member of a category of persons  exempted by the Oregon Transportation
Commission from paying a toll; or
(b) A person who  is a member of a category of persons made eligible by the commission for
paying a reduced toll, to the extent of the reduction.
[(6)] (5)  Civil penalties imposed under this section shall be imposed in the manner provided by
ORS 183.745.
[(7)] (6)  The department may enter into an agreement  with a commission or a commission’s
designee under ORS 381.725 (3) to enforce the payment of tolls and  other charges for use of an
interstate toll bridge.
SECTION 46.
 ORS 406.083 is amended to read:
406.083. (1) The Oregon Department of Veterans’ Affairs Veterans Suicide Prevention and Out-
reach Program Fund is established in the State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General
Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon Department of Veterans’ Affairs  Veterans Suicide Prevention
and Outreach Program Fund shall be credited to the fund. The fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Amounts credited to the fund under ORS 305.690 to 305.753.
[(c) Amounts credited to the fund under ORS 803.478. ]
[(d)] (c)  Gifts, grants  and donations, in money or otherwise, for use as described in subsection
(2) of this section.
[(e)] (d) Interest earned by the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of Veterans’  Affairs for
the purposes of implementing the provisions of ORS 406.081 and 406.082.
SECTION 47.
 ORS 468A.365 is amended to read:
468A.365. The Environmental Quality Commission shall:
(1) Determine  and adopt by rule criteria for certification of motor vehicle pollution control
systems. In determining the criteria the commission shall consider the following:
(a) The experience of any other state or the federal government;
(b) The cost of the system and of its installation;
(c) The durability of the system;
(d) The  ease of determining whether the system, when installed on a motor vehicle, is function-
ing properly; and
(e) Any other factors  which, in the opinion of the commission, render such a system suitable for
the control of motor vehicle  air pollution or for the protection of the health, safety and welfare of
the public.
(2) Prescribe by rule the manner in which a motor  vehicle pollution control system shall be
tested for certification. The rules may  prescribe a more rigorous inspection procedure in the areas
[36]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
designated under ORS 815.300  (2)(a), including any expansion of such boundary under ORS 815.300
(2)(b), in  order to reduce air pollution emissions in those areas of the state. No such rule shall re-
quire testing for certification more often than once during the period  for which registration [ or re-
newal of registration ] for a motor vehicle is issued. No rule shall require testing  for certification of
a motor vehicle that is exempted from the requirement for certification under ORS 815.300.
(3) Issue certificates of  approval for classes of motor vehicle pollution control systems which,
after being tested by the commission or by a method acceptable to the  commission, the commission
finds meet the criteria adopted under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) Designate by rule classifications of motor vehicles for which certified systems are  available.
(5) Revoke,  suspend or restrict a certificate of approval previously issued upon a determination
that the system no longer meets the criteria adopted under  subsection (1) of this section pursuant
to procedures for a contested case under ORS chapter 183.
(6) Designate suitable methods and standards  for testing systems and inspecting motor vehicles
to determine and insure compliance with the standards and criteria established by the commission.
(7) Except as provided in ORS  468A.370, contract for the use of or the performance of tests or
other services within or without the state.
SECTION 48.
 ORS 468A.387 is amended to read:
468A.387. (1)  The Department of Environmental Quality shall establish flexible weekday operat-
ing schedules for testing stations  that conduct motor vehicle pollution control system inspections
described under ORS 468A.365 that extend the hours of  operation beyond 5 p.m. for some testing
stations for some days of the week.
(2) After  determining the hours of operation for testing stations under subsection (1) of this
section, the department shall advertise the hours of operation in as  many ways as practicable, in-
cluding but not limited to:
(a) Enclosing information about the hours of operation in all mailings  and notices related to
motor vehicle emission testing [ and motor vehicle registration renewal notices ];
(b) Posting the hours of operation at Department of Transportation field offices;
(c) Broadcasting public service announcements; and
(d) Using appropriate Internet and other electronic media services that may be available.
SECTION 49.
 ORS 468A.390 is amended to read:
468A.390. (1) If the need for  a motor vehicle pollution control system inspection program is
identified for an area in the State of Oregon Clean Air Act Implementation Plan, then the Envi-
ronmental Quality Commission, by rule, shall  designate boundaries, in addition to the areas specified
in ORS 815.300 (2)(a) and (b), within which motor vehicles are  subject to the requirement under ORS
815.300 to have a certificate of compliance issued and under ORS 468A.380 to be registered [ or have
the registration of the vehicle renewed ].
(2) Whenever the Environmental Quality Commission designates boundaries under this section
within which vehicles are subject to the requirements of  ORS 815.300, the commission shall notify
the Department of Transportation and shall provide  the Department of Transportation with infor-
mation necessary to perform the Department of Transportation’s duties under ORS 815.300.
SECTION 50.
 ORS 801.042 is amended to read:
801.042. The following apply to the authority granted to a district by ORS 801.040 to  establish
registration fees for vehicles:
(1) Before the governing body of a district can  impose a registration fee under this section, it
must submit the proposal to  the electors of the district for their approval and, if the proposal is
[37]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
approved, enter into  an intergovernmental agreement under ORS 190.010 with the governing bodies
of all  counties, other districts and cities with populations of over 300,000 that overlap the district.
The intergovernmental  agreement must state the registration fees and, if necessary, how the revenue
from the fees shall be apportioned among counties and  the districts. Before the governing body of
a county can enter into such an intergovernmental agreement, the county shall consult  with the
cities in its jurisdiction.
(2) If a district raises revenues from  a registration fee for purposes related to highways, roads,
streets and roadside rest areas, the governing body of that district  shall establish a Regional Ar-
terial Fund and shall deposit in the Regional Arterial Fund all such registration fees.
(3) Interest received on moneys credited to the Regional Arterial Fund shall accrue to  and be-
come a part of the Regional Arterial Fund.
(4) The Regional Arterial Fund must be  administered by the governing body of the district re-
ferred to in subsection (2) of this section and such governing body by ordinance may  disburse mon-
eys in the Regional Arterial Fund. Moneys within the Regional Arterial Fund  may be disbursed only
for a program of projects recommended by  a joint policy advisory committee on transportation
consisting of local officials and  state agency representatives designated by the district referred to
in subsection (2) of this section. The projects for which the joint policy  advisory committee on
transportation can recommend funding must concern arterials, collectors or other  improvements
designated by the joint policy advisory committee on transportation.
(5) Ordinances establishing  registration fees under this section must be filed with the Depart-
ment of Transportation. The governing body of the district imposing the registration  fee shall enter
into an intergovernmental agreement under  ORS 190.010 with the department by which the depart-
ment shall collect  the registration fees, pay them over to the district and, if necessary, allow the
credit or credits described in ORS 803.445 (5). The intergovernmental agreement must state the  date
on which the department shall begin collecting registration fees for the district.
(6) The  authority granted by this section allows the establishment of registration fees in addition
to those described in ORS 803.420 and 803.422. There  is no authority under this section to affect
registration periods, qualifications, cards, plates, requirements or any other provision  relating to
vehicle registration under the vehicle code.
(7) Except  as otherwise provided for in this subsection, when registration fees are imposed under
this section, the fees must be imposed on  all vehicle classes. Registration fees as provided under this
section may not be imposed on the following:
(a) Snowmobiles and Class I all-terrain vehicles.
(b) Fixed load vehicles.
(c) Vehicles registered under ORS 805.100 to disabled veterans.
(d) Vehicles registered as antique vehicles under ORS 805.010.
(e) Vehicles registered as vehicles of special interest under ORS 805.020.
(f) Government-owned or operated vehicles registered under ORS 805.040 or 805.045.
(g) School buses or school activity vehicles registered under ORS 805.050.
(h) Law enforcement undercover vehicles registered under ORS 805.060.
(i) Vehicles registered on a proportional basis for interstate operation.
(j) Vehicles  with a registration weight of 26,001 pounds or more described in ORS 803.420 [ (14)(a)
or (b) ] (11)(a) or (b) .
(k) Vehicles registered as farm vehicles under the provisions of ORS 805.300.
(L) Travel trailers, campers and motor homes.
[38]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(m) Vehicles registered to an employment address as provided in ORS 802.250  when the eligible
public employee or household member’s residence address is not within the county of the  employ-
ment address.  The department may adopt rules it considers necessary for the administration of this
paragraph.
(n) Vehicles registered under ORS 805.110 to former prisoners of war.
(8) Any registration fee imposed by the governing body  of a district must be a fixed amount not
to exceed, with respect to any vehicle class, the registration fee  established under ORS 803.420
[(6)(a)] (5)(a)  and the fee applicable to the  registered vehicle under ORS 803.422. For vehicles on
which a flat fee is imposed under ORS 803.420, the fee must be a whole dollar amount.
SECTION 51.
 ORS 802.170 is amended to read:
802.170. If any person pays the Department of Transportation any fee or tax with  a bank check
and the check is returned to the  department as uncollectible, or if a person pays the department
with a credit or debit  card and for any reason the department does not get payment from the issuer
of the card, the department may charge the person the fee for dishonored checks  or other orders for
the payment of money under ORS  30.701 (5). If the person does not pay the fee charged under this
section, the department may do all of the following:
(1) Suspend or cancel, or refuse to issue [ or renew ], any [ vehicle registration, ] vehicle  title or
vehicle permit in payment of which the check  or other order for the payment of money was pre-
sented.
(2) Suspend or cancel, or refuse to  issue, any vehicle registration in payment of which
the check or other order for the payment of money was presented.
[(2)] (3) Cancel, or refuse to issue or renew, any driver license or driver permit in  payment of
which the check or other order for the payment of money was presented.
[(3)] (4) Authorize any department employee or police officer to seize and recover any evidence
of the registration, title, license or permit suspended or canceled.
[(4)] (5) If evidence of the suspended or canceled registration, title,  license or permit is not re-
covered,  refuse  to conduct any further transactions with the person until the fee charged under this
section is paid.
SECTION 52.  ORS 805.261 is amended to read:
805.261. (1) After deduction of the cost of administration of the cultural registration  plate pro-
gram, moneys from the surcharge  imposed by ORS 805.260 shall be transferred to the Trust for
Cultural Development Account established under ORS 359.405.
(2) As used in this section, “the cost  of administration of the cultural registration  plate
program” is the sum of all Department of Transportation expenses for the issuance or transfer of
cultural registration plates under ORS 805.260 that are above the normal costs of issuing[ ,
renewing] and transferring registration plates in the normal course of the  business of the depart-
ment. These expenses include, but are not limited to, the costs of collecting  the cultural registration
plate surcharge and transferring cultural registration plates.
SECTION 53.
 ORS 805.264 is amended to read:
805.264. (1) After deduction of the cost of administration of the Crater Lake National Park reg-
istration plate program,  the Department of Transportation shall transfer moneys from the surcharge
imposed by ORS  805.263 to the Oregon Community Foundation for use on Crater Lake National Park
projects.
(2) As used in this section, “the cost of administration  of the Crater Lake National Park regis-
tration plate program” is the sum of all Department of Transportation expenses for the issuance or
[39]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
transfer of Crater Lake National Park registration plates under  ORS 805.263 that are above the
normal costs of issuing[ , renewing ] and transferring  registration plates in the normal course of
business in the department. These expenses include, but are not limited to,  the costs of collecting
the Crater Lake  National Park registration plate surcharge and transferring Crater Lake National
Park registration plates.
SECTION 54.
 ORS 805.272 is amended to read:
805.272. (1) After the deduction of  the cost of administration of the wine country registration
plate program, the Department of Transportation shall deposit the net proceeds of the  surcharge
collected by the department under ORS 805.266 into the account of the Oregon Tourism Commission
established under ORS 284.131. The department shall make deposits under this  subsection at least
quarterly.
(2) Moneys deposited under subsection (1) of  this section are continuously appropriated to the
Oregon Tourism Commission for the purposes set forth in ORS 284.131.
(3) As used in this section, “the cost of  administration of the wine country registration plate
program” means the sum of all department expenses for the  issuance or transfer of wine country
registration  plates  under ORS 805.266 that are above the normal costs of issuing[ , renewing ] and
transferring registration plates in the normal course of the business of  the department. These ex-
penses include, but are not limited to, the costs of collecting the wine  country registration plate
surcharge and transferring wine country registration plates.
SECTION 55.
 ORS 805.279 is amended to read:
805.279. (1) Moneys from the surcharge imposed by ORS 805.278 must  be transferred to the Trail
Blazers Foundation established by the Portland Trail Blazers after deduction of  the cost of admin-
istration of the Portland Trail Blazers registration plate program,  including but not limited to the
costs of collecting the Portland Trail Blazers  registration plate surcharge and transferring Portland
Trail Blazers registration plates that are above the normal costs of  issuing[ , renewing ] and trans-
ferring registration  plates in the normal course of business of the Department of Transportation.
Any royalties due to the National Basketball Association  are the responsibility of the Portland Trail
Blazers.
(2) The Trail Blazers Foundation shall  use the surcharge proceeds received under this section
to issue grants for youth-related programs and initiatives.
(3) Each  year, the Trail Blazers Foundation shall report to a committee or interim committee
of the Legislative  Assembly related to transportation. The report must provide information about the
grants awarded with the funds from the surcharge.
SECTION 56.  ORS 805.285 is amended to read:
805.285. (1) Moneys from the surcharge  imposed by ORS 805.283 must be transferred to the
Oregon Health Authority Fund established by ORS 413.101 after deduction of the cost of adminis-
tration of  the breast cancer awareness registration plate program, including but not limited to the
costs of collecting the breast cancer awareness registration plate  surcharge and transferring breast
cancer awareness registration plates that are above the normal  costs of issuing[ , renewing ] and
transferring registration plates in the  normal course of business of the Department of Transporta-
tion.
(2) Moneys deposited under subsection (1) of this  section are continuously appropriated to the
Oregon Health Authority for activities under ORS 414.534 related to early  detection of breast and
cervical cancers as part of the Oregon Breast and Cervical Cancer Program.
SECTION 57.
 ORS 805.289 is amended to read:
[40]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
805.289. (1) After deduction of the cost of administration of the Pacific Wonderland  registration
plate program, the Department of  Transportation shall transfer 50 percent of the moneys from the
surcharge imposed by ORS  805.287 to the Oregon State Capitol Foundation for the general purposes
of the foundation under ORS 173.500 and 50 percent to the Oregon Historical Society.
(2) As used in this section, the cost of administration of  the Pacific Wonderland registration
plate program is the sum of all department  expenses for the issuance or transfer of Pacific
Wonderland registration plates under ORS  805.287 that are above the normal costs of issuing[ , re-
newing] and transferring registration plates in the normal course of  the business of the department.
These expenses include, but are  not limited to, the costs of collecting the Pacific Wonderland reg-
istration plate surcharge and transferring Pacific Wonderland registration plates.
SECTION 58.
 ORS 803.370 is amended to read:
803.370. This section establishes requirements  for an application for vehicle registration in this
state. If an applicant fails to comply with requirements  under this section, the Department of
Transportation may refuse to register or reregister a vehicle until the applicant complies with the
requirements. An application shall contain all of the following:
(1) The true name and, except as provided for corrections officers in ORS 802.253,  eligible em-
ployees in ORS 802.250 or Address Confidentiality Program  participants in ORS 192.846, the actual
residence or business address of the  owner. The department may provide by rule for acceptance of
something other than an actual residence or business  address if the department determines that the
applicant does not have an actual address.
(2) A description of the vehicle, including  the name of the make and the vehicle identification
number.
(3) An odometer disclosure in a form determined  by the department by rule pursuant to ORS
803.120, if a disclosure is otherwise required.
(4) Any other information required by the department.
(5) If the application is for registration or  reregistration of a vehicle that is subject to the fed-
eral heavy vehicle  use tax, proof that the federal use tax has been paid. The department shall adopt
rules to determine proof that will be acceptable for purposes of this subsection.
(6) A statement:
(a) That the applicant is domiciled in  this state as described in ORS 803.355 if the applicant is
required by ORS  803.360 to be domiciled in this state in order to register a vehicle in the state; and
(b) That so long as the vehicle remains registered  to the applicant in this state, the applicant
will remain domiciled in this state if required to do so in order to register the vehicle.
(7) A statement:
(a) That the vehicle qualifies under ORS 803.360 (2) for registration in  this state, if the owner
is not domiciled in this state and is  not required by ORS 803.200, or any other provision of law, to
register the vehicle in this state; and
(b) That so long as the vehicle remains registered to the applicant under the  provisions of ORS
803.360 (2), the owner and the vehicle will meet the qualifications of this subsection.
(8) A  statement upon initial registration that the applicant is in compliance with financial re-
sponsibility requirements for the vehicle  and will remain in compliance until the vehicle is trans-
ferred. Exemptions from this subsection are established in ORS 806.020.
(9) If the  application is for registration [ or renewal of registration ] of a motor vehicle by a motor
carrier, the information on drug and alcohol testing programs required by ORS 825.410.
(10) An option to include  information on the registration card that the registered owner, or a
[41]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
person who may operate the vehicle, is deaf or hard of hearing.
SECTION 59.
 ORS 819.030 is amended to read:
819.030. The Department of Transportation shall comply with the following procedures upon re-
ceiving a certificate of  title or other notice in accordance with the provisions of ORS 819.010,
819.012 or 819.014:
(1) If the department is satisfied  that the vehicle is wrecked, dismantled or disassembled, the
department shall cancel and retire the registration  and title of the vehicle. Except for issuance of
a salvage title, the department may not register or title the vehicle again unless:
(a) The department is satisfied that the original title  certificate, if any, was surrendered in error
or that notice was submitted in error and the record canceled in error; or
(b) The vehicle is registered or titled as an assembled vehicle, a reconstructed vehicle or  a
replica.
(2) If the department is satisfied that the vehicle is  wrecked, dismantled or disassembled, the
department may issue a proof of compliance form if no salvage title is issued for the vehicle.
(3) If the department is satisfied that the vehicle is  totaled or substantially altered, the depart-
ment may:
(a) Issue a salvage title, retire the vehicle’s registration and cancel the title; or
(b) Issue a branded title.
(4) If  a vehicle is recovered after a theft and the theft is the reason that the vehicle was con-
sidered a totaled vehicle or the department issues a branded title for a totaled or substantially al-
tered vehicle, a  person may apply with the department to keep the same registration plates [ and the
remaining registration period represented by the plates with that vehicle ]. The department  may allow
the owner to keep the registration plates  if the plates are legible and capable of being used for
identification purposes.
(5) A person may apply with the department to transfer plates from a vehicle for which  the de-
partment previously received a  totaled or substantially altered notification. A plate transfer request
must be in accordance with the provisions of ORS 803.530.
(6) The owner of a vehicle  whose title and registration have been canceled and retired due to
the department being notified it is totaled, wrecked, dismantled, disassembled  or substantially al-
tered is entitled to an administrative review to determine whether the notification was correct.
SECTION 60.
 ORS 805.250 is amended to read:
805.250. This section establishes fees for issuance of registration plates authorized under ORS
805.200. If a fee for plates authorized in ORS 805.200 is not established in this section, the fee is the
same fee as established under ORS 803.570. Where a fee is established under this  section, the fee
is in addition to the fee established under ORS 803.570 unless otherwise provided in the following:
(1) Amateur radio operator registration plates issued under ORS 805.230, $5.
(2) Customized registration plates issued under ORS 805.240:
(a) For original issuance [ or renewal ], $50 annual fee.
(b) For issuance of a duplicate or replacement plate, $12.
(3) Special interest registration plates approved under ORS 805.210 are approved without  cost
except as provided in this subsection, including without payment of the fee established  under ORS
803.570. If identifying stickers are required, $1 per sticker or pair of stickers.
(4) Dealer plates issued under ORS 822.040 are as follows:
(a) For the original dealer plate, no fee except the fee established under ORS 803.570.
(b) For replacement dealer plates,  $10 for each plate except that persons dealing exclusively in
[42]
SB 627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
motorcycles, mopeds, snowmobiles or any combination of those vehicles shall pay only  $3 for each
replacement plate.
(c) For additional plates, [ or for renewal of registration, ] $42, except that persons dealing exclu-
sively in motorcycles, mopeds or snowmobiles or  any combination of those vehicles shall pay only
$9 for each additional plate[ , or for renewal of registration ].
(5) Special vehicle transporter  plates or devices issued under ORS 822.310, $5 for each plate or
device.
SECTION 61.
ORS 803.405, 803.417, 803.450, 803.455, 803.460, 803.465, 803.478 and 803.533 are
repealed.
APPLICATION
SECTION 62. (1) The amendments to statutes by sections 1 to 60 of this 2025 Act and the
repeal of ORS 803.405, 803.417,  803.450, 803.455, 803.460, 803.465, 803.478 and 803.533 by section
61 of this 2025 Act apply to fees imposed on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(2) A vehicle registered under the vehicle code  as of the day immediately preceding the
effective date of this 2025  Act, that is subject to the registration requirements of the vehicle
code on and after the effective date  of this 2025 Act is considered to have ownership regis-
tration, unless the vehicle qualifies for permanent registration or proportional registration.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 63. The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
[43]