Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 187.010 is amended to read:
187.010. (1) The following days are legal holidays in this state:
(a) Each Sunday.
(b) New Year’s Day on January 1.
(c) Martin Luther King, Jr.’s Birthday on the third Monday in January.
(d) Presidents Day, for  the purpose of commemorating Presidents Washington and Lincoln, on
the third Monday in February.
(e) The day of  the Lunar New Year on the date corresponding with the second new moon
following the winter solstice, or the third new moon following  the winter solstice when an
intercalary month intervenes.
[(e)] (f)  Memorial Day on the last Monday in May.
[(f)] (g)  Juneteenth on June 19.
[(g)] (h)  Independence Day on July 4.
[(h)] (i) Labor Day on the first Monday in September.
[(i)] (j)  Veterans Day on November 11.
[(j)] (k)  Thanksgiving Day on the fourth Thursday in November.
[(k)] (L)  Christmas Day on December 25.
(2) Each time a holiday,  other than Sunday, listed in subsection (1) of this section falls on Sun-
day, the succeeding Monday shall be a legal holiday. Each time a holiday  listed in subsection (1)
of this section falls on Saturday, the preceding Friday shall be a legal holiday.
(3) Any act  authorized, required or permitted to be performed on a holiday as designated in this
section may be performed on the next succeeding business day; and no  liability or loss of rights of
any kind shall result from such delay.
(4) In enumerating legal holidays in subsection (1) of this section, the Legislative Assembly does
not intend to limit or otherwise affect public or private  collective bargaining or collective bargain-
ing agreements.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3743