Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Corrections shall study issues related to  post-custodial
workforce development in this state. The  department shall submit a report in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and  may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary no later  than September 15,
2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2853