Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 90.755 is amended to read:
90.755. [(1) No ] Notwithstanding any  provision in any bylaw, rental agreement, regulation or
rule, within a facility a landlord:
(1) May not infringe upon  the right of a [ person who rents a space for a manufactured dwelling
or floating home ] tenant to invite public officers, candidates for public office or officers or repre-
sentatives of a tenant organization to appear and speak upon matters of public interest in the com-
mon areas or recreational areas of the  facility at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner in
an open public meeting.
(2) [ The landlord of a facility, however, ] May enforce reasonable rules  and regulations relating
to the time, place and  scheduling of the speakers that will protect the interests of the majority of
the homeowners.
[(2)] (3) [ The landlord shall allow the tenant to place ] May not prohibit a tenant  from placing
political signs on or in a manufactured dwelling or floating home owned by the  tenant or the space
rented by the tenant.
(4) May reasonably regulate  the size of the signs and the length  of time for which the signs
may be displayed [ are subject to the reasonable rules of the landlord ].
(5) May not close the park to canvassing  or solicitation by public officials, candidates for
public office or their proxies.
(6) Shall allow tenants to prohibit solicitation or to post “no soliciting”  signs for their
dwelling unit.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2422