Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section, “state court technology services” means  Oregon
Judicial Case Information Network subscriptions, electronic court filing services  and related
support services.
(2) The cost of providing state court technology services to state  agencies shall be as-
sessed against all state agencies.
(3) The Oregon Department of Administrative  Services shall apportion the state court
technology services assessment among  the state agencies on the basis of the number of
full-time equivalent positions budgeted by the agency.
(4) The department shall determine, and may at any time redetermine, which state funds
or appropriations are subject to the state court technology services assessment. In  deter-
mining or redetermining the funds subject to the assessment:
(a) A fund consisting of moneys the  use of which is restricted by the Oregon Constitution
may be assessed only those  state court technology services expenses ascertained as being
necessarily incurred in connection with the purposes set forth in the Oregon Constitution.
(b) Trust funds may be assessed only those state court technology  services expenses as-
certained as being necessarily incurred in connection with the purpose for which the  trust
fund was established.
(c) State agencies may  be assessed only those state court technology services expenses
that support state agencies.
(5) The department shall cause the amounts assessed under this section to  be deposited
into the State Court Technology Fund established in ORS 1.012.
(6) The Judicial Department shall provide data to  the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services identifying the state court technology services used  by state agencies and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 240
SB 1545
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
the cost of providing the services.
SECTION 2.  ORS 1.012 is amended to read:
1.012. (1) The State Court Technology Fund is  established in the State Treasury, separate and
distinct from  the General Fund. Interest earned by the State Court Technology Fund shall be
credited to the fund.
(2) All fees received on and after July 1, 2013, for the use of the Oregon Judicial Case  Infor-
mation Network under ORS 1.002 (6) and for the use of other state court  electronic applications and
systems shall be deposited into the fund.
(3) The fund consists of the moneys deposited into the fund under subsection (2) of  this section,
the moneys deposited into the fund under ORS 21.006 and section 1 of this 2018 Act  and the
moneys allocated to the fund under ORS 137.300.
(4) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Judicial Department  for the pur-
poses of:
(a) Developing, maintaining and supporting state court electronic applications, services and
systems and for providing access to and use of those applications, services and systems; and
(b) Providing electronic service and filing services.
SECTION 3.
The Oregon Department of  Administrative Services shall first impose the
state court technology services  assessment as provided in section 1 of this 2018 Act for the
biennium beginning on July 1, 2019.
SECTION 4. This 2018 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2018
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]