Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Forestry  Department shall study the economic effects on
counties, cities and small districts  in forest trust land counties that will likely occur as a
result of the February 2024 draft final Western  Oregon State Forests Habitat Conservation
Plan.
(2) The department shall submit a report on the study in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the  committees or interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to natural resources no later than September
15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2486