Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall study  options for
agencies with remote work agreements to consolidate office space with other agencies  and
sell or  lease unoccupied office space in state buildings. The department shall submit a report
in the manner  provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation,
to the  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to public administration no
later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4317