Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of  this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 674.
SECTION 2. (1) The Appraiser Certification and Licensure Board shall establish a  pro-
gram to provide grants of not more than $2,000 each to state certified appraisers  and state
licensed appraisers to whom the board issues a certificate or license on or after January  1,
2026.
(2) The board may issue a grant  under subsection (1) of this section only if sufficient
moneys are available in the account created by the board under ORS 182.470.
(3) The board shall adopt rules to carry out this section. The rules shall include, but are
not limited to:
(a) An application process for the grant; and
(b) Any restrictions on the use of the grant by the recipient.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Appraiser Certification and  Licensure Board shall issue a temporary
certificate to engage in real estate appraisal activity to an individual who has completed:
(a) The education required by the board to become a state certified appraiser; and
(b) The experience required under subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(2) The board shall issue a temporary  license to engage in real estate appraisal activity
to an individual who has completed:
(a) The education required by the board to become a state licensed appraiser; and
(b) The experience required under subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(3) The board shall adopt rules to carry out this section. The rules shall include, but are
not limited to:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1987
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) An application process for a temporary certificate or license;
(b) The number of hours of experience that an individual must complete to be eligible to
apply for a temporary certificate or license;
(c) Fees for temporary certificates and licenses;
(d) The length of time for which a temporary certificate or license is valid; and
(e) Any restrictions on activity in which the holder of  a temporary certificate or license
may engage.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 182.425 is amended to read:
182.425. (1) Every state agency that provides housing for its officers  or employees shall collect
a rental for such housing  based on the fair rental value as determined by an appraiser registered
under ORS 308.010 or licensed or certified under ORS  674.310 or section 3 of this 2025 Act , subject
to any reductions  therefrom authorized under ORS 182.435. Rentals collected under this section shall
be credited to the agency’s account.
(2) No state agency shall provide furnishings as part of any housing provided by the agency.
(3) Determinations  of fair rental value shall be reexamined periodically but not less frequently
than once every five years and  the rental shall be adjusted annually by the change in real estate
values, for the affected community as determined by the state agency.
(4) Determination of the net rental  of any employee-occupied state-owned housing unit under
subsections (1), (2) and (3) of this section shall be considered a personnel  action for purposes of ORS
240.086.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 182.425, as amended by section 4 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
182.425. (1) Every state agency  that provides housing for its officers or employees shall collect
a rental for such housing based on the fair rental value as determined  by an appraiser registered
under ORS 308.010 or licensed or certified under ORS 674.310 [ or section 3 of this 2025 Act ], subject
to any reductions  therefrom authorized under ORS 182.435. Rentals collected under this section shall
be credited to the agency’s account.
(2) No state agency shall provide furnishings as part of any housing provided by the agency.
(3) Determinations of fair rental value shall be reexamined periodically but not less  frequently
than once every five years and the rental shall be adjusted annually by  the change in real estate
values, for the affected community as determined by the state agency.
(4) Determination of the net rental of any  employee-occupied state-owned housing unit under
subsections (1), (2) and (3) of this section shall be considered a personnel  action for purposes of ORS
240.086.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 195.326 is amended to read:
195.326. An appraiser certified under ORS 674.310 or section 3 of this 2025 Act  or  registered
under ORS 308.010 may carry out the appraisals required by ORS 195.305 to 195.336 and  sections 5
to 11, chapter 424, Oregon Laws 2007, sections 2 to 9 and 17, chapter 855, Oregon  Laws 2009, and
sections 2 to 7, chapter 8, Oregon Laws 2010. The Department of Land Conservation and  Develop-
ment is authorized to retain persons to review the appraisals.
SECTION 7.  ORS 195.326, as amended by section 6 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
195.326. An appraiser certified  under ORS 674.310 [ or section 3 of this 2025 Act ] or registered
under ORS 308.010 may carry out the appraisals required by ORS 195.305 to 195.336 and  sections 5
to 11, chapter 424, Oregon Laws 2007, sections 2 to 9 and 17, chapter 855, Oregon  Laws 2009, and
sections 2 to 7, chapter 8, Oregon Laws 2010. The Department of Land Conservation and  Develop-
ment is authorized to retain persons to review the appraisals.
[2]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 8.
 ORS 305.239, as amended by section 14, chapter 75, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
305.239. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 9.320:
(a) Any person who is  qualified to practice law or public accountancy in this state, any person
who has  been granted active enrollment to practice before the Internal Revenue Service and who
is qualified to prepare tax returns in this state or any person who is  the authorized employee of a
taxpayer and is  regularly employed by the taxpayer in tax matters may represent the taxpayer be-
fore a  tax court magistrate or the Department of Revenue in any conference or proceeding with
respect to the administration of any tax.
(b) Any person who is licensed by the  State Board of Tax Practitioners or who is exempt from
such licensing requirement as provided for and limited by  ORS 673.610 may represent a taxpayer
before a tax court magistrate or the department in any  conference or proceeding with respect to the
administration of any tax on or measured by net income.
(c) Any  shareholder of an S corporation, as defined in section 1361 of the Internal Revenue
Code, as amended and in effect  on December 31, 2023, may represent the corporation in any pro-
ceeding  before  a tax court magistrate or the department in the same manner as if the shareholder
were a partner and the S corporation were  a partnership. The S corporation must designate in
writing a tax matters shareholder authorized to represent the S corporation.
(d) An individual  who is licensed as a real estate broker or principal real estate broker under
ORS 696.022 or is a state certified appraiser or state licensed appraiser under ORS 674.310  or sec-
tion 3 of this 2025 Act  or is a registered  appraiser under ORS 308.010 may represent a taxpayer
before a tax court magistrate or the department in any  conference or proceeding with respect to the
administration of any ad valorem property tax.
(e) A general partner who has been designated by members of  a partnership as their tax matters
partner under ORS 305.242 may represent those partners in any conference or proceeding  with re-
spect to the administration of any tax on or measured by net income.
(f) Any person authorized under rules adopted by  the department may represent a taxpayer be-
fore the department in  any conference or proceeding with respect to any tax. Rules adopted under
this paragraph, to the extent feasible, shall be  consistent with federal law that governs represen-
tation before the Internal Revenue Service, as federal law is amended and in effect on December 31,
2023.
(g) Any person authorized under rules  adopted by the tax court may represent a taxpayer in a
proceeding before a tax court magistrate.
(2) A person may not be recognized as representing a taxpayer pursuant to this section  unless
there is first filed with the magistrate or  department a written authorization, or unless it appears
to the satisfaction of the  magistrate or department that the representative does in fact have au-
thority to represent the taxpayer. A person recognized  as an authorized representative under rules
or procedures adopted by the  tax court shall be considered an authorized representative by the de-
partment.
(3) A taxpayer represented by someone other than  an attorney is bound by all things done by
the authorized representative, and may not thereafter claim any proceeding was legally  defective
because the taxpayer was not represented by an attorney.
(4) Prior to the holding  of a conference or proceeding before the tax court magistrate or de-
partment, written notice shall be given by the  magistrate or department to the taxpayer of the
provisions of subsection (3) of this section.
[3]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 9.
 ORS 305.239, as amended by section 14,  chapter 75, Oregon Laws 2024, and section
8 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
305.239. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 9.320:
(a) Any person who is qualified to practice law or public accountancy in  this state, any person
who has been granted active enrollment to practice before the Internal Revenue Service and  who
is qualified to prepare tax returns  in this state or any person who is the authorized employee of a
taxpayer and is regularly employed by the taxpayer in tax matters may represent the  taxpayer be-
fore a tax court magistrate or the Department of Revenue in any conference or proceeding  with
respect to the administration of any tax.
(b) Any person who is licensed by the State Board of  Tax Practitioners or who is exempt from
such licensing requirement as provided for and  limited by ORS 673.610 may represent a taxpayer
before a tax court magistrate or the department in any  conference or proceeding with respect to the
administration of any tax on or measured by net income.
(c) Any shareholder of an S corporation, as defined in section 1361 of the Internal  Revenue
Code, as amended and in effect on December 31, 2023, may represent  the corporation in any pro-
ceeding before a tax court magistrate or the department in the same manner as if the  shareholder
were a partner and the S corporation were a  partnership. The S corporation must designate in
writing a tax matters shareholder authorized to represent the S corporation.
(d) An individual  who is licensed as a real estate broker or principal real estate broker under
ORS 696.022 or is a state certified appraiser or  state licensed appraiser under ORS 674.310 [ or sec-
tion 3 of this 2025 Act ] or is a registered  appraiser under ORS 308.010 may represent a taxpayer
before a tax court magistrate or the department in any  conference or proceeding with respect to the
administration of any ad valorem property tax.
(e) A general partner who has been designated by members of  a partnership as their tax matters
partner under ORS 305.242 may represent those partners in any conference or proceeding  with re-
spect to the administration of any tax on or measured by net income.
(f) Any person authorized under rules adopted by  the department may represent a taxpayer be-
fore the department in  any conference or proceeding with respect to any tax. Rules adopted under
this paragraph, to the extent feasible, shall be  consistent with federal law that governs represen-
tation before the Internal Revenue Service, as federal law is amended and in effect on December 31,
2023.
(g) Any person authorized under rules  adopted by the tax court may represent a taxpayer in a
proceeding before a tax court magistrate.
(2) A person may not be recognized as representing a taxpayer pursuant to this section  unless
there is first filed with the magistrate or  department a written authorization, or unless it appears
to the satisfaction of the  magistrate or department that the representative does in fact have au-
thority to represent the taxpayer. A person recognized  as an authorized representative under rules
or procedures adopted by the  tax court shall be considered an authorized representative by the de-
partment.
(3) A taxpayer represented by someone other than  an attorney is bound by all things done by
the authorized representative, and may not thereafter claim any proceeding was legally  defective
because the taxpayer was not represented by an attorney.
(4) Prior to the holding  of a conference or proceeding before the tax court magistrate or de-
partment, written notice shall be given by the  magistrate or department to the taxpayer of the
provisions of subsection (3) of this section.
[4]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 10.
 ORS 309.024 is amended to read:
309.024. (1) The property value appeals board shall keep a written or audio record of  all pro-
ceedings. Notwithstanding ORS 192.650, no written minutes need be made.
(2) The county clerk, as described in ORS 306.005, shall serve as clerk of  the board. The clerk
or deputy clerk shall attend sessions of the board at the discretion of  the board as approved by the
clerk.
(3) The district attorney or the  county counsel, at the discretion of the county clerk, shall be
the legal advisor of the board unless there is a potential conflict of interest  in the district attorney
or county counsel serving as the legal advisor. If there  is a potential conflict of interest, the county
clerk may appoint independent counsel to serve as the legal advisor  of the board. The legal advisor
of the board, or the legal advisor’s deputy, may attend all sessions of the board.
(4) At the  discretion of the county clerk, the board may hire one or more appraisers registered
under ORS 308.010, or licensed or certified under ORS 674.310  or section 3 of this 2025 Act , and
not otherwise employed by  the county, and other necessary personnel for the purpose of aiding the
board in carrying out its functions  and duties under ORS 309.026. The boards of the various counties
may make such reciprocal arrangements for the exchange of  appraisers with other counties as will
most effectively carry out the functions and duties of the boards.
SECTION 11.  ORS 309.024, as amended by section 10 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
309.024. (1) The  property value appeals board shall keep a written or audio record of all pro-
ceedings. Notwithstanding ORS 192.650, no written minutes need be made.
(2) The county clerk, as  described in ORS 306.005, shall serve as clerk of the board. The clerk
or deputy clerk shall attend sessions of the board at the discretion of  the board as approved by the
clerk.
(3) The district attorney or the county counsel, at the discretion of  the county clerk, shall be
the legal advisor of the board unless there is a potential conflict of interest  in the district attorney
or county counsel serving as the legal advisor. If there  is a potential conflict of interest, the county
clerk may appoint independent counsel to serve as the legal advisor  of the board. The legal advisor
of the board, or the legal advisor’s deputy, may attend all sessions of the board.
(4) At the discretion of the county clerk, the board may hire one or more  appraisers registered
under ORS 308.010,  or licensed or certified under ORS 674.310 [ or section 3 of this 2025 Act ], and
not otherwise employed by the county, and other necessary personnel for the purpose  of aiding the
board in carrying out its functions  and duties under ORS 309.026. The boards of the various counties
may make such reciprocal arrangements for the  exchange of appraisers with other counties as will
most effectively carry out the functions and duties of the boards.
SECTION 12.  ORS 309.100 is amended to read:
309.100. (1) Except as provided in ORS 305.403, the owner or an  owner of any taxable property
or any person who holds an interest in the property that obligates the person to  pay taxes imposed
on the property, may petition the property value appeals board for relief as authorized under ORS
309.026. As used in  this subsection, an interest that obligates the person to pay taxes includes a
contract, lease or other intervening instrumentality.
(2) Petitions filed under this section shall be filed with the clerk of the  board during the period
following the date the tax statements are mailed or otherwise delivered for  the current tax year and
ending December 31.
(3) Each petition shall:
(a) Be made in writing.
[5]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) State the facts and the grounds upon which the petition is made.
(c) Be signed and verified by the  oath of a person described in subsection (1) or (4) of this sec-
tion.
(d) State the address to which notice of the action of the board  shall be sent. The notice may
be sent to a person described in subsection (1) or (4) of this section.
(e) State if the petitioner or a representative desires to appear at a hearing before the board.
(4)(a) The following persons may sign a petition and appear before the  board on behalf of a
person described in subsection (1) of this section:
(A) A relative, as defined  by rule adopted by the Department of Revenue, of an owner of the
property.
(B) A person duly qualified to practice law or public accountancy in this state.
(C) A legal guardian or conservator who is acting on behalf of an owner of the property.
(D) A real estate broker or principal real estate broker licensed under ORS 696.022.
(E) A state certified appraiser or a state licensed appraiser under ORS 674.310 or section 3 of
this 2025 Act  or a registered appraiser under ORS 308.010.
(F) The lessee of the property.
(G) An attorney-in-fact under a general power of attorney executed by a principal who is an
owner of the property.
(b) A petition signed by a person described in this subsection, other than a legal guardian  or
conservator of a property  owner, an attorney-in-fact described in paragraph (a)(G) of this subsection
or a person duly qualified to  practice law in this state, shall include written authorization for the
person to act on behalf of  the owner or other person described in subsection (1) of this section. The
authorization shall be signed by the owner or other person  described in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion.
(c) In the case of a  petition signed by a legal guardian or conservator, the board may request
the guardian or conservator to authenticate the guardianship or conservatorship.
(d) In the case of a petition signed by an attorney-in-fact  described in paragraph (a)(G) of this
subsection, the petition shall be accompanied by a copy of the general power of attorney.
(5) If the petitioner has requested a hearing before the  board, the board shall give such
petitioner at least five days’ written notice of the time and place  to appear. If the board denies any
petition upon the grounds that it does not  meet the requirements of subsection (3) of this section,
it shall issue a written order rejecting the petition and set forth in  the order the reasons the board
considered the petition to be defective.
(6) Notwithstanding ORS 9.160 or 9.320, the owner or  other person described in subsection (1)
of this section may appear and represent himself or herself at the hearing before  the board, or may
be represented at the hearing by any authorized person described in subsection (4) of this section.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 309.100, as amended by section 12 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
309.100. (1) Except as provided in ORS 305.403, the owner or an  owner of any taxable property
or any person who holds an interest in the property that obligates the person to  pay taxes imposed
on the property, may petition the property value appeals board for relief as authorized under ORS
309.026. As used in  this subsection, an interest that obligates the person to pay taxes includes a
contract, lease or other intervening instrumentality.
(2) Petitions filed under this section shall be filed with the clerk of the  board during the period
following the date the tax statements are mailed or otherwise delivered for  the current tax year and
ending December 31.
[6]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) Each petition shall:
(a) Be made in writing.
(b) State the facts and the grounds upon which the petition is made.
(c) Be signed and verified by the  oath of a person described in subsection (1) or (4) of this sec-
tion.
(d) State the address to which notice of the action of the board  shall be sent. The notice may
be sent to a person described in subsection (1) or (4) of this section.
(e) State if the petitioner or a representative desires to appear at a hearing before the board.
(4)(a) The following persons may sign a petition and appear before the  board on behalf of a
person described in subsection (1) of this section:
(A) A relative, as defined by rule adopted by the Department of Revenue, of  an owner of the
property.
(B) A person duly qualified to practice law or public accountancy in this state.
(C) A legal guardian or conservator who is acting on behalf of an owner of the property.
(D) A real estate broker or principal real estate broker licensed under ORS 696.022.
(E) A  state certified appraiser or a state licensed appraiser under ORS 674.310 [ or section 3 of
this 2025 Act ] or a registered appraiser under ORS 308.010.
(F) The lessee of the property.
(G) An attorney-in-fact under a general power of attorney executed by a principal who is an
owner of the property.
(b) A  petition signed by a person described in this subsection, other than a legal guardian or
conservator of a property  owner, an attorney-in-fact described in paragraph (a)(G) of this subsection
or a person duly qualified to practice law in this state, shall  include written authorization for the
person to act on behalf of  the owner or other person described in subsection (1) of this section. The
authorization shall be signed by the owner or  other person described in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion.
(c) In the case of a petition signed by a legal guardian or  conservator, the board may request
the guardian or conservator to authenticate the guardianship or conservatorship.
(d) In the case of a petition  signed by an attorney-in-fact described in paragraph (a)(G) of this
subsection, the petition shall be accompanied by a copy of the general power of attorney.
(5) If the petitioner has requested a  hearing before the board, the board shall give such
petitioner at least five days’ written notice of the time and place  to appear. If the board denies any
petition upon the grounds that it does not meet the  requirements of subsection (3) of this section,
it shall issue a written order rejecting the petition and set forth in  the order the reasons the board
considered the petition to be defective.
(6) Notwithstanding ORS 9.160 or 9.320, the  owner or other person described in subsection (1)
of this section may appear and represent himself or herself at the hearing before  the board, or may
be represented at the hearing by any authorized person described in subsection (4) of this section.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 477.089 is amended to read:
477.089. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Economic and property damage” means the sum of:
(A) The lesser of the difference in the fair  market value of property immediately before and
immediately after a wildfire or the cost of restoring property to the condition the property  was in
immediately before a wildfire; and
(B) Any other objectively verifiable monetary losses.
[7]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) “Fair market value” means the amount, as determined by  a state certified appraiser, that a
willing buyer would pay to a willing seller  for property in an arm’s-length transaction if both parties
were fully informed about all advantages and disadvantages of the  property and neither party is
acting under a compulsion to buy or sell.
(c) “Forest  tree species” means a tree species that is capable of producing logs, fiber or other
wood materials that are suitable for the production of lumber, sheeting, pulp, firewood  or other
commercial forest products.
(d) “State certified appraiser” means  an individual who has been certified as a state certified
appraiser under ORS 674.310 or section 3 of this 2025 Act  and is  qualified to appraise the property
that is the subject of a fair market value determination.
(e) “Wildfire” means a fire that:
(A) Results from a violation of this chapter or of  rules adopted under ORS 526.016 or 526.041;
or
(B) Originated on land used  or capable of being used for growing forest tree species regardless
of the existing use of the land.
(2) Except as provided in ORS 477.092  and 477.095, in a civil action for property damage caused
by a wildfire, the recoverable damages are:
(a) The amount of economic and property damages, if the wildfire did not occur as  the result
of recklessness, gross negligence, willfulness or malice; or
(b) Twice the amount of economic and property damages, if the wildfire occurred as  the result
of recklessness, gross negligence, willfulness or malice.
(3) Except as provided in ORS 477.095  and subject to any other provision of this chapter limiting
the recovery of fire fighting costs, a person  who causes a wildfire is liable to any person or entity
for the full amount of all expenses incurred by the person or entity in fighting the wildfire.
(4) The remedies provided under this section are  in addition to any available criminal or civil
penalties that may be assessed for the violation of a statute or rule but, subject to Article I, section
10, of the Oregon Constitution, are  the exclusive remedies for damages or injury to property caused
by a wildfire. This subsection does not:
(a) Prohibit the bringing of any cross claim, counterclaim or joinder of parties;
(b) Prohibit the institution of a suit under ORS 496.705 for the recovery of damages  for the un-
lawful taking of wildlife; or
(c) Affect the applicability of ORS 31.600 to an action.
(5) This section does not create a new cause of action or alter any existing cause of action.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 477.089, as amended by section 14 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
477.089. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Economic and property damage” means the sum of:
(A) The lesser of the difference in the fair  market value of property immediately before and
immediately after a wildfire or the cost of restoring property to the condition the property  was in
immediately before a wildfire; and
(B) Any other objectively verifiable monetary losses.
(b) “Fair market value” means the amount, as determined by  a state certified appraiser, that a
willing buyer would pay to a willing seller  for property in an arm’s-length transaction if both parties
were fully informed about all advantages and disadvantages of the  property and neither party is
acting under a compulsion to buy or sell.
(c) “Forest  tree species” means a tree species that is capable of producing logs, fiber or other
[8]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
wood materials that are suitable for the production of lumber, sheeting, pulp, firewood  or other
commercial forest products.
(d) “State certified appraiser” means  an individual who has been certified as a state certified
appraiser under ORS 674.310 [ or section 3 of this 2025 Act ] and is qualified to  appraise the property
that is the subject of a fair market value determination.
(e) “Wildfire” means a fire that:
(A) Results from a violation of this chapter  or of rules adopted under ORS 526.016 or 526.041;
or
(B) Originated on land used or capable of being used for growing  forest tree species regardless
of the existing use of the land.
(2) Except as provided in ORS 477.092  and 477.095, in a civil action for property damage caused
by a wildfire, the recoverable damages are:
(a) The amount  of economic and property damages, if the wildfire did not occur as the result
of recklessness, gross negligence, willfulness or malice; or
(b) Twice the  amount of economic and property damages, if the wildfire occurred as the result
of recklessness, gross negligence, willfulness or malice.
(3) Except as provided in ORS 477.095  and subject to any other provision of this chapter limiting
the recovery of fire fighting costs, a person who causes a wildfire  is liable to any person or entity
for the full amount of all expenses incurred by the person or entity in fighting the wildfire.
(4) The remedies provided under this section are in  addition to any available criminal or civil
penalties that may be assessed for the violation of a statute or rule but, subject to Article I, section
10, of the Oregon Constitution, are  the exclusive remedies for damages or injury to property caused
by a wildfire. This subsection does not:
(a) Prohibit the bringing of any cross claim, counterclaim or joinder of parties;
(b) Prohibit the institution  of a suit under ORS 496.705 for the recovery of damages for the un-
lawful taking of wildlife; or
(c) Affect the applicability of ORS 31.600 to an action.
(5) This section does not create a new cause of action or alter any existing cause of action.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 674.010 is amended to read:
674.010. For purposes of this chapter:
(1) “Appraisal  Foundation” means the Appraisal Foundation established on November 30, 1987,
as a not-for-profit corporation under the laws of Illinois.
(2) “Appraisal Subcommittee” means the Appraisal Subcommittee of the Federal Financial  In-
stitutions Examination Council established pursuant to the federal Act.
(3) “Board” means the Appraiser Certification and Licensure Board  established under ORS
674.305.
(4) “Federal Act” means Title  XI of the Federal Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery and
Enforcement Act of 1989 (12 U.S.C. 3310 et seq.).
(5) “Federal financial institution regulatory agency” means:
(a) The Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System;
(b) The Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;
(c) The Office of the Comptroller of the Currency;
(d) The Office of Thrift Supervision; or
(e) The National Credit Union Administration.
(6) “Federally related transaction” means any real estate-related financial transaction that:
[9]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) A federal  financial institution regulatory agency or the Resolution Trust Corporation en-
gages in, contracts for or regulates; and
(b) Requires the services of an appraiser.
(7) “Financial institution” means an insured depository institution as  defined in section 3 of the
Federal Deposit Insurance Act or an  insured credit union as defined in section 101 of the Federal
Credit Union Act.
(8) “Mortgage banker” has the meaning given that term in ORS 86A.100.
(9) “Professional real estate activity” has the meaning given that term in ORS 696.010.
(10) “Real estate appraisal activity” means the activity described in ORS 674.100.
(11) “Real estate-related financial transaction” means any transaction involving:
(a) The sale, lease, purchase, investment in or exchange  of real property, including interests in
real property, or the financing thereof;
(b) The refinancing of real property or interests in real property; and
(c) The use of real  property or interests in real property as security for a loan or investment,
including mortgage-backed securities.
(12) “State certified appraiser” means an individual who has been certified as  a state certified
appraiser under ORS 674.310  or section 3 of this 2025 Act .
(13) “State  licensed appraiser” means an individual who has been licensed as a state licensed
appraiser under ORS 674.310  or section 3 of this 2025 Act .
(14) “State registered appraiser assistant” means an individual who  has been registered as a
state registered appraiser assistant under ORS 674.310.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 674.010, as amended by section 16 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
674.010. For purposes of this chapter:
(1) “Appraisal Foundation” means the Appraisal Foundation established on November 30,  1987,
as a not-for-profit corporation under the laws of Illinois.
(2) “Appraisal  Subcommittee” means the Appraisal Subcommittee of the Federal Financial In-
stitutions Examination Council established pursuant to the federal Act.
(3) “Board” means the  Appraiser Certification and Licensure Board established under ORS
674.305.
(4) “Federal Act” means Title XI of the Federal Financial  Institutions Reform, Recovery and
Enforcement Act of 1989 (12 U.S.C. 3310 et seq.).
(5) “Federal financial institution regulatory agency” means:
(a) The Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System;
(b) The Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;
(c) The Office of the Comptroller of the Currency;
(d) The Office of Thrift Supervision; or
(e) The National Credit Union Administration.
(6) “Federally related transaction” means any real estate-related financial transaction that:
(a) A federal financial institution regulatory agency or the Resolution Trust  Corporation en-
gages in, contracts for or regulates; and
(b) Requires the services of an appraiser.
(7) “Financial institution” means an insured depository institution as  defined in section 3 of the
Federal Deposit Insurance Act or an insured credit union as defined in  section 101 of the Federal
Credit Union Act.
(8) “Mortgage banker” has the meaning given that term in ORS 86A.100.
[10]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(9) “Professional real estate activity” has the meaning given that term in ORS 696.010.
(10) “Real estate appraisal activity” means the activity described in ORS 674.100.
(11) “Real estate-related financial transaction” means any transaction involving:
(a) The sale, lease, purchase, investment in  or exchange of real property, including interests in
real property, or the financing thereof;
(b) The refinancing of real property or interests in real property; and
(c) The use of real property or interests in real property as security for  a loan or investment,
including mortgage-backed securities.
(12) “State certified appraiser”  means an individual who has been certified as a state certified
appraiser under ORS 674.310 [ or section 3 of this 2025 Act ].
(13) “State  licensed appraiser” means an individual who has been licensed as a state licensed
appraiser under ORS 674.310 [ or section 3 of this 2025 Act ].
(14) “State registered appraiser assistant” means an individual who  has been registered as a
state registered appraiser assistant under ORS 674.310.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 674.100 is amended to read:
674.100. (1)(a) A person may not engage in,  carry on, advertise or purport to engage in or carry
on real estate  appraisal activity within this state without first obtaining certification, licensure or
registration as provided for in ORS 674.310.
(b) Real estate appraisal  activity is the preparation, completion and issuance of an opinion as
to the value on a given date or at a given time of real property  or an interest in real property,
whether the activity is performed in connection with a  federally related transaction or is not per-
formed in  connection with a federally related transaction. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law, a state certified appraiser or a state licensed appraiser:
(A) Is not required to  be licensed under ORS 696.022 to perform real estate appraisal activity
or any other activity that constitutes the giving of an opinion as to  the value of real property or
an interest in real property; and
(B) Is not subject to regulation under ORS 696.010  to 696.495 and 696.600 to 696.995 in con-
nection with the performance of  real estate appraisal activity or the performance of any other ac-
tivity that constitutes the giving  of an opinion as to the value of real estate or an interest in real
estate.
(2) Real estate appraisal activity excludes activity that is not performed in connection with a
federally related transaction and that:
(a) Is performed by a nonlicensed regular full-time employee of a  single owner of real estate, if
the activity involves the real estate of the employer and  is incidental to the employee’s normal,
nonreal estate activities;
(b) Is performed by a nonlicensed regular full-time employee whose activity involves the  real
estate of the  employer, when the activity is the employee’s principal activity, but the employer’s
principal activity or business is not the appraisal of real estate;
(c) Is performed by an attorney at law  rendering services in the performance of duties as an
attorney at law;
(d) Is performed by a registered geologist, registered professional engineer or  architect render-
ing services as a registered geologist, registered professional engineer or architect;
(e) Is performed  by a certified public accountant rendering services as a certified public ac-
countant;
(f) Is performed by a mortgage banker rendering services as a mortgage banker;
[11]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(g) Constitutes  a letter opinion or a competitive market analysis as those terms are defined in
ORS 696.010 that, by administrative or judicial order or subpoena, is compelled  from an individual
licensed to engage in professional real estate activity under ORS 696.022;
(h) Is  performed by a salaried employee of the federal government, the State of Oregon or a
political subdivision of the federal government or the State of  Oregon while engaged in the per-
formance of the duties of the employee;
(i) Is limited to analyzing or advising of permissible land  use alternatives, environmental impact,
building and use permit  procedures or demographic market studies, if the performance of the activ-
ities does not involve the rendering of an opinion as to the value of the real estate in question;
(j) Is performed by  a professional forester appraising or valuing timber, timberland or both as
part of services performed as a  private consultant in forest management, but only if, in the case of
timberland, the appraisal or valuation is limited to the use of the land as forestland;
(k) Is limited to giving an opinion in an administrative or judicial  proceeding regarding the
value of real estate for taxation;
(L) Is limited to giving an opinion  regarding the value of real estate by a person who is not li-
censed under ORS  chapter 696, if the person’s business is not the appraisal, selling or listing of real
estate and the activity  is performed without compensation. This paragraph does not apply to a
person conducting transactional negotiations on behalf of another person for transfer of  an interest
in real property;
(m) Is limited  to transferring or acquiring an interest in real estate by a person who is not li-
censed under ORS chapter 696; or
(n) Is performed by a home inspector acting within the scope of a  certificate or license issued
under ORS chapter 701.
(3)(a) Real estate appraisal activity does not  include an analysis, evaluation, opinion, conclusion,
notation or compilation of data prepared by or for a financial  institution or affiliate, a consumer
finance company licensed under ORS chapter 725 or an insurance company or affiliate, made  for
internal use only by the financial  institution or affiliate, consumer finance company or the insurance
company or affiliate, concerning an interest in real  estate for ownership or collateral purposes by
the financial institution or affiliate, the consumer finance company licensed under ORS chapter  725
or the insurance company or affiliate. Nothing in this subsection shall  be construed to excuse a
financial institution or affiliate from complying with the provisions of Title XI of the federal Finan-
cial Institutions Reform, Recovery and Enforcement Act of 1989 (12 U.S.C. 3310 et seq.).
(b) As used in this subsection, “evaluation” means  a study of the nature, quality or utility of a
parcel of real estate or interests in, or aspects of, real property in which a value estimate is  not
necessarily required.
(4)(a) A state licensed appraiser or state certified appraiser engaged to perform  an evaluation
is not engaged in real estate appraisal activity if the evaluation includes a disclaimer that:
(A) Is located immediately above the appraiser’s signature; and
(B) Includes the following language in at least 10-point boldfaced type:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
I am a state licensed appraiser or a state certified appraiser. This evaluation was not  prepared
in my capacity as a real estate appraiser and might not comply  with the uniform standards of pro-
fessional appraisal practice.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
[12]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) As used in this subsection, “evaluation” means an opinion of the market  value of real prop-
erty or real estate provided to a financial institution in  conformance with the Interagency Appraisal
and Evaluation Guidelines adopted jointly by the federal financial institutions  regulatory agencies
for use in real estate-related financial transactions that do not require an appraisal.
(5) As used in this section, “purport to engage in or carry on real estate appraisal  activity”
means the display of a card, sign, advertisement or other printed, engraved or written  instrument
bearing the person’s name in conjunction with  the term “appraiser,” “licensed appraiser,” “certified
appraiser,”  “appraiser  assistant,” “registered appraiser assistant” or “appraisal” or an oral state-
ment or representation of certification, licensure  or registration by the Appraiser Certification and
Licensure Board made by a person.
(6) Each display or statement  described in subsection (5) of this section by a person not licensed,
certified or registered by the board is a separate violation under ORS 674.850 or 674.990.
(7) In a proceeding under ORS 674.850 or 674.990, a display or  statement described in subsection
(5) of this section  shall be considered prima facie evidence that the person named in the display or
making the statement purports to engage in or carry on real estate appraisal activity.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 674.100, as amended by section 18 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
674.100. (1)(a) A person may not engage in,  carry on, advertise or purport to engage in or carry
on real estate appraisal activity within this state without first obtaining certification,  licensure or
registration as provided for in ORS 674.310 [ or section 3 of this 2025 Act ].
(b) Real estate appraisal activity is the preparation, completion and issuance of  an opinion as
to the value on a given date  or at a given time of real property or an interest in real property,
whether the activity is performed in connection with  a federally related transaction or is not per-
formed in connection with a federally related transaction. Notwithstanding any other provision  of
law, a state certified appraiser or a state licensed appraiser:
(A) Is not required to be licensed under ORS 696.022 to perform  real estate appraisal activity
or any other activity that constitutes the  giving of an opinion as to the value of real property or
an interest in real property; and
(B) Is not subject to regulation under ORS 696.010  to 696.495 and 696.600 to 696.995 in con-
nection with the performance of real estate appraisal activity or the performance  of any other ac-
tivity that constitutes the giving of an opinion as to the value of real estate or  an interest in real
estate.
(2) Real estate appraisal activity excludes activity that is not performed in connection with a
federally related transaction and that:
(a) Is performed by a nonlicensed regular  full-time employee of a single owner of real estate, if
the activity involves the real estate of  the employer and is incidental to the employee’s normal,
nonreal estate activities;
(b) Is  performed by a nonlicensed regular full-time employee whose activity involves the real
estate of the employer, when the activity is the employee’s principal activity, but  the employer’s
principal activity or business is not the appraisal of real estate;
(c) Is performed by an attorney at law rendering services  in the performance of duties as an
attorney at law;
(d) Is performed  by a registered geologist, registered professional engineer or architect render-
ing services as a registered geologist, registered professional engineer or architect;
(e) Is performed by a certified public accountant rendering services as a certified  public ac-
[13]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
countant;
(f) Is performed by a mortgage banker rendering services as a mortgage banker;
(g) Constitutes a letter opinion or a competitive market analysis as those terms are defined  in
ORS 696.010 that, by  administrative or judicial order or subpoena, is compelled from an individual
licensed to engage in professional real estate activity under ORS 696.022;
(h) Is  performed by a salaried employee of the federal government, the State of Oregon or a
political subdivision of the federal government or the State of  Oregon while engaged in the per-
formance of the duties of the employee;
(i) Is limited to analyzing or advising of permissible land  use alternatives, environmental impact,
building and use permit  procedures or demographic market studies, if the performance of the activ-
ities does not involve the rendering of an opinion as to the value of the real estate in question;
(j) Is performed by  a professional forester appraising or valuing timber, timberland or both as
part of services performed as a  private consultant in forest management, but only if, in the case of
timberland, the appraisal or valuation is limited to the use of the land as forestland;
(k) Is limited to giving an opinion in an administrative or judicial  proceeding regarding the
value of real estate for taxation;
(L) Is limited to giving an opinion  regarding the value of real estate by a person who is not li-
censed under ORS  chapter 696, if the person’s business is not the appraisal, selling or listing of real
estate and the activity  is performed without compensation. This paragraph does not apply to a
person conducting transactional negotiations on behalf of another person for transfer of  an interest
in real property;
(m) Is limited  to transferring or acquiring an interest in real estate by a person who is not li-
censed under ORS chapter 696; or
(n) Is performed by a home inspector acting within the scope of a  certificate or license issued
under ORS chapter 701.
(3)(a) Real estate appraisal activity does not  include an analysis, evaluation, opinion, conclusion,
notation or compilation of data prepared by or for a financial  institution or affiliate, a consumer
finance company licensed under ORS chapter 725 or an insurance company or affiliate, made  for
internal use only by the financial  institution or affiliate, consumer finance company or the insurance
company or affiliate, concerning an interest in real  estate for ownership or collateral purposes by
the financial institution or affiliate, the consumer finance company licensed under ORS chapter  725
or the insurance company or affiliate. Nothing in this subsection shall  be construed to excuse a
financial institution or affiliate from complying with the provisions of Title XI of the federal Finan-
cial Institutions Reform, Recovery and Enforcement Act of 1989 (12 U.S.C. 3310 et seq.).
(b) As used in this subsection, “evaluation” means  a study of the nature, quality or utility of a
parcel of real estate or interests in, or aspects of, real property in which a value estimate is  not
necessarily required.
(4)(a) A state licensed appraiser or state certified appraiser engaged to perform  an evaluation
is not engaged in real estate appraisal activity if the evaluation includes a disclaimer that:
(A) Is located immediately above the appraiser’s signature; and
(B) Includes the following language in at least 10-point boldfaced type:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
I am a state licensed appraiser or a state certified appraiser. This evaluation was not  prepared
in my capacity as a real estate appraiser and might not comply  with the uniform standards of pro-
[14]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
fessional appraisal practice.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(b) As used in this subsection, “evaluation” means an opinion of the market  value of real prop-
erty or real estate provided to a financial institution in  conformance with the Interagency Appraisal
and Evaluation Guidelines adopted jointly by the federal financial institutions  regulatory agencies
for use in real estate-related financial transactions that do not require an appraisal.
(5) As used in this section, “purport to engage in or carry on real estate appraisal  activity”
means the display of a card, sign, advertisement or other printed, engraved or written  instrument
bearing the person’s name in conjunction with  the term “appraiser,” “licensed appraiser,” “certified
appraiser,”  “appraiser  assistant,” “registered appraiser assistant” or “appraisal” or an oral state-
ment or representation of certification, licensure  or registration by the Appraiser Certification and
Licensure Board made by a person.
(6) Each display or statement  described in subsection (5) of this section by a person not licensed,
certified or registered by the board is a separate violation under ORS 674.850 or 674.990.
(7) In a proceeding under ORS 674.850 or 674.990, a display or  statement described in subsection
(5) of this section  shall be considered prima facie evidence that the person named in the display or
making the statement purports to engage in or carry on real estate appraisal activity.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 674.200 is amended to read:
674.200. As used in ORS 674.200 to 674.250:
(1) “Appraisal” means the process of developing an opinion of the value of real  property in
conformance with commonly accepted standards for appraisers.
(2)(a) “Appraisal management company” means an external third party that:
(A) Oversees an appraiser panel of more than 15 appraisers in Oregon or at  least 25 appraisers
in the United States; and
(B) Is authorized by a client to:
(i) Recruit, select and retain appraisers;
(ii) Contract with appraisers to perform appraisal assignments;
(iii) Manage the process of having an appraisal performed, including providing  administrative
duties such as receiving appraisal orders and appraisal reports, submitting completed  appraisal re-
ports to clients, collecting fees from clients  for services provided and reimbursing appraisers for
services performed; or
(iv) Review and verify the work of appraisers.
(b) “Appraisal management  company” does not include an entity that employs real estate ap-
praisers exclusively as employees for the performance of real estate appraisal activity.
(3) “Appraisal management services” means the process of receiving  a request for the perform-
ance of real estate appraisal activity from  a client and, for a fee paid by the client, entering into
an agreement with an independent contractor appraiser to perform the real estate appraisal  activity
contained in the request.
(4)(a) “Appraisal review” means the act or process  of developing and communicating an opinion
about the quality of the substantive aspects of  another appraiser’s work that was performed as part
of an appraisal assignment.
(b) An “appraisal review” is not a quality control examination.
(5) “Appraisal Subcommittee” has the meaning given that term in ORS 674.010.
(6) “Appraiser” means a state certified appraiser or  state licensed appraiser certified or licensed
[15]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under ORS 674.310  or section 3 of this 2025 Act .
(7) “Appraiser panel” means a group of appraisers who have been selected by an  appraisal
management company to perform real estate appraisal activity for clients.
(8) “Client” means a person that engages an  appraisal management company to perform ap-
praisal management services.
(9) “Controlling person” means:
(a) An owner, officer or director of an appraisal management company;
(b) An individual authorized by an appraisal  management company to enter into a contractual
relationship  with:
(A) A client for the performance of services requiring  registration as an appraisal management
company; and
(B) An appraiser for the performance of appraisals; or
(c) An individual  who possesses, directly or indirectly, the power to direct the management or
policies of an appraisal management company.
(10) “Independent contractor appraiser” means an appraiser who  receives a fee for performing
an appraisal, but who is not an employee of the person engaging the appraiser.
(11)(a) “Quality control examination” means an examination of an appraisal report for  compli-
ance and completeness in relation to client specifications,  including examination for grammatical
or typographical errors.
(b) A “quality control examination” is not an appraisal review.
(12) “Real estate appraisal activity” means the activity described in ORS 674.100.
(13) “Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice” means  the current standards of the
appraisal profession, developed for appraisers and  users of appraisal services by the Appraisal
Standards Board of the Appraisal Foundation.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 674.200, as amended by section 20 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
674.200. As used in ORS 674.200 to 674.250:
(1) “Appraisal” means the process of developing an opinion of the value of real  property in
conformance with commonly accepted standards for appraisers.
(2)(a) “Appraisal management company” means an external third party that:
(A) Oversees an appraiser panel of more than 15 appraisers in Oregon or at  least 25 appraisers
in the United States; and
(B) Is authorized by a client to:
(i) Recruit, select and retain appraisers;
(ii) Contract with appraisers to perform appraisal assignments;
(iii) Manage the process of having an appraisal performed, including providing  administrative
duties such as receiving appraisal orders and appraisal reports, submitting completed  appraisal re-
ports to clients, collecting fees from clients  for services provided and reimbursing appraisers for
services performed; or
(iv) Review and verify the work of appraisers.
(b) “Appraisal management  company” does not include an entity that employs real estate ap-
praisers exclusively as employees for the performance of real estate appraisal activity.
(3) “Appraisal management services” means the process of receiving  a request for the perform-
ance of real estate appraisal activity from  a client and, for a fee paid by the client, entering into
an agreement with an independent contractor appraiser to perform the real estate appraisal  activity
contained in the request.
[16]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4)(a) “Appraisal review” means the act or process  of developing and communicating an opinion
about the quality of the substantive aspects of  another appraiser’s work that was performed as part
of an appraisal assignment.
(b) An “appraisal review” is not a quality control examination.
(5) “Appraisal Subcommittee” has the meaning given that term in ORS 674.010.
(6) “Appraiser” means a state certified appraiser or  state licensed appraiser certified or licensed
under ORS 674.310 [ or section 3 of this 2025 Act ].
(7) “Appraiser panel” means a group of appraisers who have been selected by an  appraisal
management company to perform real estate appraisal activity for clients.
(8) “Client” means a person that engages an  appraisal management company to perform ap-
praisal management services.
(9) “Controlling person” means:
(a) An owner, officer or director of an appraisal management company;
(b) An individual authorized by an appraisal  management company to enter into a contractual
relationship  with:
(A) A client for the performance of services requiring  registration as an appraisal management
company; and
(B) An appraiser for the performance of appraisals; or
(c) An individual  who possesses, directly or indirectly, the power to direct the management or
policies of an appraisal management company.
(10) “Independent contractor appraiser” means an appraiser who  receives a fee for performing
an appraisal, but who is not an employee of the person engaging the appraiser.
(11)(a) “Quality control examination” means an examination of an appraisal report for  compli-
ance and completeness in relation to client specifications,  including examination for grammatical
or typographical errors.
(b) A “quality control examination” is not an appraisal review.
(12) “Real estate appraisal activity” means the activity described in ORS 674.100.
(13) “Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice” means  the current standards of the
appraisal profession, developed for appraisers and  users of appraisal services by the Appraisal
Standards Board of the Appraisal Foundation.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 674.205 is amended to read:
674.205. (1) A person may not directly or indirectly engage in or  attempt to engage in business
as an appraisal management company or advertise or  represent that the entity is an appraisal
management company unless the person is:
(a) Registered as an appraisal management company with the Appraiser  Certification and
Licensure Board; or
(b) An appraisal management company owned and controlled by an insured depository institu-
tion as defined in  12 U.S.C. 1813 that is regulated by the Comptroller of the Currency, the Board
of Governors of the Federal Reserve System or the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.
(2) A  business entity may apply for registration as an appraisal management company on forms
prescribed by rule  by the Appraiser Certification and Licensure Board. The application must in-
clude:
(a) The name, address and phone contact information of the entity;
(b) The name, address and phone contact information of a controlling person of the entity;
(c) If the entity is not domiciled in this state, the name and phone contact information for the
[17]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
entity’s agent for service of process in this state;
(d) The name, address and phone contact information of any person that owns 10  percent or
more of the entity;
(e) A certification that:
(A) Each owner, in whole  or in part, directly or indirectly, of the entity and the controlling
person identified in the application have not had an appraiser license or certificate  refused, denied,
canceled, surrendered in  lieu of revocation or revoked in any state, territory or possession of the
United States, for a substantive cause, as determined by the Appraiser  Certification and Licensure
Board;
(B) The entity has a system to verify that each appraiser  on the entity’s appraiser panel is li-
censed or certified under ORS 674.310  or section 3 of this 2025 Act ;
(C) The entity requires an appraiser completing an appraisal at the entity’s request  to confirm
that the appraiser is competent to perform the appraisal assignment before  accepting the assign-
ment;
(D) The entity requires appraisers completing appraisals at the entity’s  request to comply with
the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice;
(E) The entity  has a system in place to require that appraisals are conducted independently and
without inappropriate influence  or coercion as required by the appraisal independence standards
established under section 129E of the Truth in Lending Act; and
(F) The  entity maintains and retains for at least five years, or as required under ORS 674.150,
a detailed record of each appraisal management  services request the entity receives and the ap-
praiser who performs the real estate appraisal activity contained in the request;
(f) The surety bond, letter of credit or deposit required by ORS 674.210;
(g) Fees in  an amount prescribed by rule by the board, which must be sufficient to cover the
costs of administering ORS 674.200 to 674.250 and 674.995; and
(h) Any other information required by the board by rule.
(3) The board may not issue a  registration to a business entity as an appraisal management
company unless:
(a) Each individual  who owns 10 percent or more of the entity and the controlling person iden-
tified by the entity in the application have completed a criminal records check;
(b) The board finds that  no owner, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, of the entity or
the controlling person identified in the application has had  an appraiser license or certificate re-
fused, denied,  canceled, surrendered in lieu of revocation or revoked in any state or territory or
possession of the United  States, for a substantive cause, as determined by the Appraiser Certifica-
tion and Licensure Board; and
(c) The board determines that each individual who  owns more than 10 percent of the entity and
the controlling person identified by the entity in the application are of good moral character.
(4)(a) The board shall issue a unique registration number  to each appraisal management com-
pany registered under this section.
(b) The board shall maintain a published list of appraisal management companies registered un-
der this section.
(c) An appraisal management company registered  under this section shall disclose the company’s
registration number to each appraiser used by the company.
(5) An appraisal management  company registration expires two years after the date of the is-
suance of the  registration. The board shall adopt rules establishing the requirements for renewal
[18]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or reactivation of a registration. The rules  must require that an appraisal management company
provide all of the  information and certifications required for an initial application for registration
under subsection (2) of this section in the renewal application.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 674.205, as amended by section 22 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
674.205. (1) A person may not  directly or indirectly engage in or attempt to engage in business
as an appraisal management company or advertise or  represent that the entity is an appraisal
management company unless the person is:
(a) Registered as  an appraisal management company with the Appraiser Certification and
Licensure Board; or
(b) An appraisal management company owned and controlled by an insured depository institu-
tion as defined in 12 U.S.C. 1813 that is regulated by the Comptroller of the  Currency, the Board
of Governors of the Federal Reserve System or the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.
(2) A business entity may apply for registration as an appraisal management company on  forms
prescribed by rule by the Appraiser Certification and Licensure Board. The application  must in-
clude:
(a) The name, address and phone contact information of the entity;
(b) The name, address and phone contact information of a controlling person of the entity;
(c) If the entity is not domiciled in this state, the name and phone contact information for the
entity’s agent for service of process in this state;
(d) The name,  address and phone contact information of any person that owns 10 percent or
more of the entity;
(e) A certification that:
(A) Each owner, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, of the  entity and the controlling
person identified in the application have not had an appraiser license or certificate  refused, denied,
canceled, surrendered in lieu of revocation or revoked in any state, territory or possession  of the
United States, for a  substantive cause, as determined by the Appraiser Certification and Licensure
Board;
(B) The entity has a system to verify  that each appraiser on the entity’s appraiser panel is li-
censed or certified under ORS 674.310 [ or section 3 of this 2025 Act ];
(C) The entity  requires an appraiser completing an appraisal at the entity’s request to confirm
that the appraiser is  competent to perform the appraisal assignment before accepting the assign-
ment;
(D) The entity requires appraisers  completing appraisals at the entity’s request to comply with
the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice;
(E) The entity  has a system in place to require that appraisals are conducted independently and
without inappropriate influence or coercion as required by the appraisal  independence standards
established under section 129E of the Truth in Lending Act; and
(F) The entity maintains and retains for at least five years, or as required under ORS  674.150,
a detailed record of each appraisal management services request  the entity receives and the ap-
praiser who performs the real estate appraisal activity contained in the request;
(f) The surety bond, letter of credit or deposit required by ORS 674.210;
(g) Fees in an amount prescribed by rule by the board, which must be sufficient to  cover the
costs of administering ORS 674.200 to 674.250 and 674.995; and
(h) Any other information required by the board by rule.
(3) The board may not issue a registration to a  business entity as an appraisal management
[19]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
company unless:
(a) Each individual who owns 10 percent or more of the entity and the controlling  person iden-
tified by the entity in the application have completed a criminal records check;
(b) The board finds that no owner, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly,  of the entity or
the controlling person identified in the application  has had an appraiser license or certificate re-
fused, denied, canceled, surrendered in lieu of revocation or revoked in any state or territory  or
possession of the United States, for a substantive cause, as determined by  the Appraiser Certifica-
tion and Licensure Board; and
(c) The board determines that each individual who  owns more than 10 percent of the entity and
the controlling person identified by the entity in the application are of good moral character.
(4)(a) The board shall issue a  unique registration number to each appraisal management com-
pany registered under this section.
(b) The board shall maintain a published list of appraisal management companies registered un-
der this section.
(c) An appraisal management company registered  under this section shall disclose the company’s
registration number to each appraiser used by the company.
(5) An appraisal management company registration expires two years after the date  of the is-
suance of the registration. The board shall adopt rules establishing the requirements  for renewal
or reactivation of a registration. The rules must  require that an appraisal management company
provide all of the information and certifications required for an initial  application for registration
under subsection (2) of this section in the renewal application.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 674.310 is amended to read:
674.310. (1) The Appraiser Certification and Licensure Board shall:
(a) Have the power  to do all things necessary and convenient to carry into effect the provisions
of this chapter, ORS 674.200  to 674.250 and the federal Act and to regulate the activities of state
licensed appraisers, state certified appraisers, state  registered appraiser assistants and appraisal
management companies to ensure that  real estate appraisals conform to the law in effect on the date
of the real estate appraisal activity.
(b) Certify or license appraisers and register appraiser assistants as necessary to  carry out the
federal Act and the purposes set forth in ORS 674.020.
(c) Register appraisal management companies under ORS 674.200 to 674.250.
(d) Supervise the activities of state certified appraisers, state licensed appraisers,  state regis-
tered appraiser assistants and appraisal  management companies as provided in this chapter and ORS
674.200 to 674.250, to ensure that they perform real estate appraisal activity in strict  conformance
with the provisions of this chapter and of the federal Act, and that they otherwise comply  with the
provisions of this chapter and ORS 674.200 to  674.250 in the conduct of their professional activities.
(e) Establish, keep current and, no less than annually, transmit to the Appraisal  Subcommittee
a roster listing state certified appraisers and state licensed appraisers.
(f) Collect and remit fees as required under ORS  674.250, 674.330 and 674.340  and section 3 of
this 2025 Act .
(2) Rules adopted by the Appraiser Certification  and Licensure Board to govern real estate ap-
praiser certification and licensure shall conform with the requirements of the  federal Act. The
board shall adopt rules including but not limited to:
(a) Establishing programs for the certification, licensure or registration  of individuals who en-
gage in real estate appraisal activity.
[20]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Establishing educational requirements for  certification or licensure of appraisers and for the
registration of appraiser assistants that ensure protection of the public  interest and comply with the
requirements of the federal Act, including on state and federal fair housing  laws and topics of im-
plicit bias, including racial bias. Education requirements for state licensed appraisers and state
certified appraisers must meet the minimum criteria established by  the Appraiser Qualification
Board of the Appraisal Foundation.
(c) Establishing a professional code of responsibility for state certified  appraisers and state li-
censed appraisers that is in conformance with the federal Act.
(d) Providing for registration of out-of-state appraisers as provided for under ORS 674.120.
(3) An individual may not be a state licensed appraiser or a state certified appraiser  unless the
individual has achieved a passing grade on an examination approved by the  Appraisal Qualification
Board of the Appraisal Foundation for the credential being sought.
(4) The Appraiser Certification and Licensure Board, acting through the administrator,  may is-
sue subpoenas to compel  the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, records,
correspondence, agreements, memoranda and  other material or relevant documents in investigations
or proceedings pertaining to the powers and duties of the board.
(5) In the case of a person who refuses to respond to a subpoena issued by the  Appraiser Cer-
tification and Licensure Board, the judge of the circuit court, on the application of the board  ad-
ministrator, shall order compliance with the board subpoena in  the same manner as a proceeding for
contempt for failure to respond to a subpoena of the court.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 674.310, as amended by section 24 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
674.310. (1) The Appraiser Certification and Licensure Board shall:
(a) Have the power  to do all things necessary and convenient to carry into effect the provisions
of this chapter, ORS 674.200 to 674.250 and the federal Act and to regulate  the activities of state
licensed appraisers, state certified appraisers, state  registered appraiser assistants and appraisal
management companies to ensure that  real estate appraisals conform to the law in effect on the date
of the real estate appraisal activity.
(b) Certify or license  appraisers and register appraiser assistants as necessary to carry out the
federal Act and the purposes set forth in ORS 674.020.
(c) Register appraisal management companies under ORS 674.200 to 674.250.
(d) Supervise the  activities of state certified appraisers, state licensed appraisers, state regis-
tered appraiser assistants and appraisal  management companies as provided in this chapter and ORS
674.200 to  674.250, to ensure that they perform real estate appraisal activity in strict conformance
with the provisions of this chapter and of the federal Act, and that they otherwise comply  with the
provisions of this chapter and ORS 674.200 to  674.250 in the conduct of their professional activities.
(e) Establish,  keep current and, no less than annually, transmit to the Appraisal Subcommittee
a roster listing state certified appraisers and state licensed appraisers.
(f) Collect and remit fees as  required under ORS 674.250, 674.330 and 674.340 [ and section 3 of
this 2025 Act ].
(2) Rules adopted by the Appraiser Certification and Licensure  Board to govern real estate ap-
praiser certification and licensure shall  conform with the requirements of the federal Act. The
board shall adopt rules including but not limited to:
(a) Establishing programs for the  certification, licensure or registration of individuals who en-
gage in real estate appraisal activity.
(b) Establishing educational requirements for  certification or licensure of appraisers and for the
[21]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
registration of appraiser assistants that ensure protection of the public  interest and comply with the
requirements of the federal Act, including  on state and federal fair housing laws and topics of im-
plicit bias, including racial bias. Education requirements for state licensed appraisers and state
certified appraisers must meet  the minimum criteria established by the Appraiser Qualification
Board of the Appraisal Foundation.
(c) Establishing a professional code  of responsibility for state certified appraisers and state li-
censed appraisers that is in conformance with the federal Act.
(d) Providing for registration of out-of-state appraisers as provided for under ORS 674.120.
(3) An individual may not be a state licensed appraiser or a state certified appraiser  unless the
individual has achieved a passing grade on an examination approved by the  Appraisal Qualification
Board of the Appraisal Foundation for the credential being sought.
(4) The Appraiser Certification and Licensure Board, acting through the administrator,  may is-
sue subpoenas to compel  the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, records,
correspondence, agreements, memoranda and  other material or relevant documents in investigations
or proceedings pertaining to the powers and duties of the board.
(5) In the case of a person who refuses to respond to a subpoena issued by the  Appraiser Cer-
tification and Licensure Board, the judge of the circuit court, on the application of the board  ad-
ministrator, shall order compliance with the board subpoena in  the same manner as a proceeding for
contempt for failure to respond to a subpoena of the court.
SECTION 26.
 ORS 674.340 is amended to read:
674.340. (1) All moneys, fees and charges collected or  received by the Appraiser Certification
and Licensure Board pursuant to ORS 674.250 and 674.330 and section 3 of this 2025 Act  shall be
paid into the account created by the board under ORS 182.470.  All moneys in the account are ap-
propriated continuously to the board to carry out  the duties that the board is charged with admin-
istering.
(2) The Federal Registry Fund is established  in the account created by the board under ORS
182.470. Proceeds received under ORS 674.250  (1) and 674.330 (1) shall be deposited in the Federal
Registry  Fund for the sole purpose of remitting the funds to the Federal Financial Institutions Ex-
amination Council in accordance with the federal Act.
SECTION 27.  ORS 674.340, as amended by section 26 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
674.340. (1) All moneys, fees and charges collected or  received by the Appraiser Certification
and Licensure Board pursuant to ORS 674.250 and 674.330 [ and section 3 of this 2025 Act ] shall  be
paid into the account created by the board  under ORS 182.470. All moneys in the account are ap-
propriated continuously to the board to carry out the duties  that the board is charged with admin-
istering.
(2) The Federal Registry Fund is established in the account  created by the board under ORS
182.470. Proceeds received under ORS 674.250 (1) and 674.330 (1) shall  be deposited in the Federal
Registry Fund for the sole purpose of remitting the funds to the Federal Financial Institutions  Ex-
amination Council in accordance with the federal Act.
SECTION 28.  ORS 819.482 is amended to read:
819.482. (1) A person commits the  offense of acting as a vehicle appraiser without a certificate
if the person does not hold a  vehicle appraiser certificate issued under ORS 819.480 and the person,
for consideration, issues an opinion as to the value of a vehicle.
(2) This section does not apply to:
(a) A person  who holds a vehicle dealer certificate issued under ORS 822.020 and who appraises
[22]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vehicles in the operation of the vehicle dealer’s business;
(b) A person from another jurisdiction who  holds a vehicle appraiser certificate requiring qual-
ifications substantially similar to  qualifications required for the certification of a vehicle appraiser
in this state;
(c) An insurance adjuster authorized to do business under ORS 744.515 or 744.521; or
(d) A person licensed or certified to appraise real estate  under ORS 674.310 or section 3 of this
2025 Act and who appraises the value of manufactured structures.
(3) The offense  described in this section, acting as a vehicle appraiser without a certificate, is
a Class A violation.
SECTION 29.
 ORS 819.482, as amended by section 28 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
819.482. (1) A person commits the offense of acting as a  vehicle appraiser without a certificate
if the person does not hold a  vehicle appraiser certificate issued under ORS 819.480 and the person,
for consideration, issues an opinion as to the value of a vehicle.
(2) This section does not apply to:
(a) A person  who holds a vehicle dealer certificate issued under ORS 822.020 and who appraises
vehicles in the operation of the vehicle dealer’s business;
(b) A person from another jurisdiction who holds  a vehicle appraiser certificate requiring qual-
ifications substantially similar to qualifications required for the certification of  a vehicle appraiser
in this state;
(c) An insurance adjuster authorized to do business under ORS 744.515 or 744.521; or
(d) A person licensed or certified to appraise real estate under ORS 674.310 [ or section  3 of this
2025 Act ] and who appraises the value of manufactured structures.
(3) The offense described in this section, acting as a vehicle appraiser without a  certificate, is
a Class A violation.
SECTION 30.
 ORS 674.140 is amended to read:
674.140. The Appraiser Certification and Licensure Board may  suspend or revoke the certificate,
license or registration of a state certified appraiser, a state licensed appraiser or  a state registered
appraiser assistant, reprimand a state certified appraiser, a state licensed appraiser  or a state reg-
istered appraiser assistant, require additional education of a state certified appraiser, a state  li-
censed appraiser or a state registered  appraiser assistant or deny the issuance or renewal of a
certificate, license or registration to an  applicant if the state certified appraiser, state licensed ap-
praiser or state registered appraiser assistant or applicant has done any of the following:
(1) Knowingly or  negligently pursued a continued course of material misrepresentation in mat-
ters related to real estate  appraisal activity, whether or not damage or injury resulted, or knowingly
or negligently made a material misrepresentation or false material promise in a matter related  to
real estate appraisal activity, if the material misrepresentation or material false promise  created a
reasonable probability of damage or injury, whether or not damage or injury actually resulted.
(2) Disregarded or violated a provision of ORS 674.130 or 674.150  or the federal Act or a rule
adopted under ORS 674.310  or section 3 of this 2025 Act .
(3) Knowingly or negligently made, printed, distributed or in any manner published materially
misleading or untruthful advertising, descriptions or promises,  of such character as reasonably to
induce a person to act to the damage or injury of  the person, whether or not actual damage or in-
jury resulted.
(4) Guaranteed, authorized or permitted a person to guarantee future profits that  may result in
the resale of real property.
[23]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) Failed for any reason to pay to the board the annual registry fee provided for under ORS
674.330 (1) or the fees provided for under ORS 674.330 (2).
(6) Failed or refused upon demand  by the board to produce or to supply for inspection by the
board true copies of any  document, book or record in the individual’s possession or control or con-
cerning real estate appraisal activity transacted by the individual.
(7) Failed to maintain at all times any records that  the individual is required to maintain under
ORS 674.150.
(8) Accepted employment or compensation  for performing or agreeing to perform a real estate
appraisal activity contingent upon the reporting of a predetermined value or performed  real estate
appraisal activity on real estate in which the individual had an undisclosed interest.
(9) Entered a plea of nolo contendere or been found guilty of, or been convicted  of, a felony or
misdemeanor substantially  related to the individual’s trustworthiness or competence to engage in
real estate appraisal activity.
(10) Knowingly authorized, directed or  aided in the publication, advertisement, distribution or
circulation  of  a material false statement or material misrepresentation concerning the individual’s
business.
(11) Demonstrated negligence or incompetence in performing an act  for which the individual is
required to hold a certificate, license or registration.
(12) Knowingly permitted an individual  whose certificate, license or registration has been sus-
pended or revoked to engage in real estate appraisal activity with or on  behalf of a state certified
appraiser or state licensed appraiser.
(13) Committed an act or conduct, whether of the same or of a different character specified in
this section and whether or not in the course of real estate appraisal activity, that:
(a) Constitutes or demonstrates bad  faith, incompetency or untrustworthiness, or dishonest,
fraudulent or improper dealings; and
(b) Is substantially  related to the fitness of the applicant or holder of a certificate, license or
registration to conduct real estate appraisal activity.
SECTION 31.
 ORS 674.140, as amended by section 30 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
674.140. The Appraiser Certification and Licensure Board may  suspend or revoke the certificate,
license or registration of a state certified appraiser, a state licensed appraiser or  a state registered
appraiser assistant, reprimand a state certified appraiser, a state licensed appraiser  or a state reg-
istered appraiser assistant, require additional education of a state certified appraiser, a state  li-
censed appraiser or a state registered  appraiser assistant or deny the issuance or renewal of a
certificate, license or registration to an  applicant if the state certified appraiser, state licensed ap-
praiser or state registered appraiser assistant or applicant has done any of the following:
(1) Knowingly or  negligently pursued a continued course of material misrepresentation in mat-
ters related to real estate  appraisal activity, whether or not damage or injury resulted, or knowingly
or negligently made a material misrepresentation or false material promise in a matter related  to
real estate appraisal activity, if the material misrepresentation or material false promise  created a
reasonable probability of damage or injury, whether or not damage or injury actually resulted.
(2) Disregarded or violated a provision of ORS 674.130 or 674.150  or the federal Act or a rule
adopted under ORS 674.310 [ or section 3 of this 2025 Act ].
(3) Knowingly or negligently made, printed, distributed or in any manner published materially
misleading or untruthful advertising, descriptions or promises,  of such character as reasonably to
induce a person to act to the damage or injury of  the person, whether or not actual damage or in-
[24]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
jury resulted.
(4) Guaranteed, authorized or permitted a person to guarantee future profits that  may result in
the resale of real property.
(5) Failed for any reason to pay to the board the annual registry fee provided for under ORS
674.330 (1) or the fees provided for under ORS 674.330 (2).
(6) Failed or refused upon demand  by the board to produce or to supply for inspection by the
board true copies of any  document, book or record in the individual’s possession or control or con-
cerning real estate appraisal activity transacted by the individual.
(7) Failed to maintain at all times any records that  the individual is required to maintain under
ORS 674.150.
(8) Accepted employment or compensation  for performing or agreeing to perform a real estate
appraisal activity contingent upon the reporting of a predetermined value or performed  real estate
appraisal activity on real estate in which the individual had an undisclosed interest.
(9) Entered a plea of nolo contendere or been found guilty of, or been convicted  of, a felony or
misdemeanor substantially  related to the individual’s trustworthiness or competence to engage in
real estate appraisal activity.
(10) Knowingly authorized, directed or  aided in the publication, advertisement, distribution or
circulation  of  a material false statement or material misrepresentation concerning the individual’s
business.
(11) Demonstrated negligence or incompetence in performing an act  for which the individual is
required to hold a certificate, license or registration.
(12) Knowingly permitted an individual  whose certificate, license or registration has been sus-
pended or revoked to engage in real estate appraisal activity with or on  behalf of a state certified
appraiser or state licensed appraiser.
(13) Committed an act or conduct, whether of the same or of a different character specified in
this section and whether or not in the course of real estate appraisal activity, that:
(a) Constitutes or demonstrates bad  faith, incompetency or untrustworthiness, or dishonest,
fraudulent or improper dealings; and
(b) Is substantially  related to the fitness of the applicant or holder of a certificate, license or
registration to conduct real estate appraisal activity.
SECTION 32.
(1) Sections 2 and 3 of this  2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 182.425,
195.326, 305.239, 309.024, 309.100, 477.089, 674.010, 674.100,  674.140, 674.200, 674.205, 674.310,
674.340 and 819.482 by sections 4, 6, 8, 10, 12, 14,  16, 18, 20, 22, 24, 26, 28 and 30 of this 2025
Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The  amendments to ORS 182.425, 195.326, 305.239, 309.024, 309.100, 477.089, 674.010,
674.100, 674.140, 674.200, 674.205, 674.310, 674.340 and 819.482 by sections 5, 7, 9, 11, 13,  15, 17,
19, 21, 23, 25, 27, 29 and 31 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2028.
(3) The Appraiser Certification  and Licensure Board may take any action before the op-
erative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the board
to exercise, on or after the operative date specified in subsection  (1) of this section, all of
the duties, functions and powers conferred on the board by sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act
and the amendments to ORS 182.425, 195.326, 305.239, 309.024, 309.100, 477.089, 674.010, 674.100,
674.140, 674.200, 674.205, 674.310, 674.340 and 819.482 by sections 4, 6, 8, 10, 12, 14, 16, 18,  20,
22, 24, 26, 28 and 30 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 33.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 1, 2028.
[25]
HB 2882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
SECTION 34.
Notwithstanding section 33  of this 2025 Act, a temporary certificate or li-
cense issued under section 3 of this 2025 Act that is still in effect immediately before the date
of the repeal specified in section 33 of this 2025 Act shall:
(1) Remain in effect until the earlier of its original expiration  date or January 1, 2030;
and
(2) Continue to be governed by the laws applicable to the temporary certificate or license
as those laws were in effect immediately before the date of the repeal  specified in section 33
of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 35. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[26]