Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 459A.715 is amended to read:
459A.715. (1) A dealer may refuse to accept from any person, and  a distributor or importer may
refuse to accept from a dealer,  any empty beverage container that does not state thereon a refund
value as established by ORS 459A.705.
(2) A dealer may refuse to accept and to pay the refund value of:
(a) Empty beverage containers if the place of business  of the dealer and the kind of empty
beverage containers are included in an order of the Oregon Liquor and  Cannabis Commission ap-
proving a full-service redemption center under ORS 459A.735.
(b) Any beverage container visibly containing or contaminated by a substance other than water,
residue of the original contents or ordinary dust.
(c)(A) More than 144 individual beverage containers returned by  any one person during one day,
if the dealer occupies a space of 5,000 or more square feet in a single area.
(B) More  than 50 individual beverage containers returned by any one person during one day, if
the dealer occupies a space of less than 5,000 square feet in a single area.
(d) Any beverage container that is damaged to the extent that the brand appearing on  the con-
tainer cannot be identified.
(3) The commission shall develop and provide to dealers notices that describe the  reasons a
dealer may refuse to  accept and to pay the refund value for empty beverage containers under sub-
section  (2)  of this section. The notices may contain additional information as determined by the
commission.
(4) A dealer must post in each area where beverage containers are received a  notice provided
to the dealer under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) A dealer must accept the return of  beverage containers during the hours of 8 a.m.
to 8 p.m. while the dealer is otherwise open for business. A dealer may  refuse to accept the
return of beverage containers during all other hours.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 459A.700 is amended to read:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 543
SB 869
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
459A.700. As used in ORS  [ 459.992 (3) and (4) and ] 459A.700 to 459A.744, unless the context re-
quires otherwise:
(1) “Beverage” means a fluid described in ORS 459A.702.
(2) “Beverage container” means a container described in ORS 459A.702.
(3) “Commission” means the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
(4) “Consumer” means every person who purchases  a beverage in a beverage container for use
or consumption.
(5) “Dealer” means every person in this state who engages in  the sale of beverages in beverage
containers to a consumer, or means a full-service redemption center approved under ORS 459A.735.
(6) “Dealer redemption center”  means a location that meets the requirements of ORS 459A.741,
at which any person may return empty beverage containers and  receive payment of the refund value
of the beverage containers.
(7) “Distributor” means every person who engages in  the sale of beverages in beverage con-
tainers to a dealer in this state including any manufacturer who engages in such sales.
(8) “Full-service redemption center” means a location that meets  the requirements of ORS
459A.737, at  which any person may return empty beverage containers and receive payment of the
refund value of the beverage containers.
(9) “Hard seltzer” means any sugar-based alcoholic beverage that contains carbonated water  or
any malt-based alcoholic beverage that contains carbonated  water and is not a malt beverage, as
defined in ORS 471.001.
(10) “Importer” means any dealer or manufacturer who directly imports beverage containers into
this state.
(11) “In this state” means within  the exterior limits of the State of Oregon and includes all
territory within these limits owned by or ceded to the United States of America.
(12) “Kombucha” means a fermented beverage that is made from tea  and contains not more than
21 percent of alcohol by volume.
(13) “Manufacturer” means  every person bottling, canning or otherwise filling beverage con-
tainers for sale to distributors, importers or dealers.
(14) “Place of business of a dealer” means the location at  which a dealer sells or offers for sale
beverages in beverage containers to consumers.
(15) “Redemption center” means a full-service redemption center or a dealer  redemption center.
(16) “Use or consumption” includes the exercise of  any right or power over a beverage incident
to the ownership  thereof, other than the sale or the keeping or retention of a beverage for the
purposes of sale.
(17) “Water and flavored water” means any beverage identified through  the use of letters, words
or symbols on its product label as a type of water.
(18) “Wine” has the meaning given that  term in ORS 471.001, except that “wine” does not mean
hard seltzer or kombucha.
[2]