Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 291.204 is amended to read:
291.204. (1) The Oregon  Department of Administrative Services, by July 1 of each even-numbered
year, shall furnish every state agency with:
(a) Instructions for preparing for submission to the  Governor the information required by the
Governor in the preparation of the Governor’s budget; and
(b) Instructions for preparing the proposed maximum supervisory ratio report required by  ORS
291.227 (1).
(2) The Governor shall prescribe the instructions to be  used by the agencies in submitting their
agency request budgets as required by  ORS 291.208.  The instructions shall include direction to
agencies that requires agencies  to submit all policy option proposals to the legislative offi-
cials listed in ORS 291.208.
SECTION 2.  ORS 291.208 is amended to read:
291.208. (1) Each state agency shall file  with the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,
before September 1 in each even-numbered year in the manner required, an agency request budget
containing the information required. The department shall prepare  agency request budgets for all
agencies that fail to file budgets.
(2) Each state agency  shall file a copy of all policy option proposals submitted under
subsection (1) of this section with the President of the Senate, the Speaker of  the House of
Representatives and with the majority and minority leaders of the Senate and the House of
Representatives.
SECTION 3.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2728