Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 342.125 is amended to read:
342.125. (1) Teaching licenses shall be issued and renewed by the  Teacher Standards and Prac-
tices  Commission  by the authority of the State of Oregon, subject to ORS 342.120 to 342.430 and the
rules of the commission.
(2) Notwithstanding any requirements prescribed for  issuance of a license, a person whose ap-
plication for a license is pending may be employed in the public schools of this state  for 90 calendar
days after the date of submission of the application if:
(a) The person is not  ineligible for a license following background checks conducted by the
Teacher Standards and Practices Commission, including a criminal records check as provided in
ORS 181A.195 and a background check through  an interstate clearinghouse of revoked and sus-
pended licenses;
(b) The school district has completed the review of the employment  history of the person as
required by ORS 339.374;
(c) The  person had not been employed as provided by this subsection during the previous 12
months with a pending application for the same license; and
(d) The person and the school district have complied with any other  requirements established
by the commission by rule.
(3) Subject to ORS 342.130 and to subsection (4) of this  section, licenses shall be of the following
types:
(a) Preliminary teaching license.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2301
SB 321
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Professional teaching license.
(c) Distinguished teacher leader license.
(d) Preliminary personnel service license.
(e) Professional personnel service license.
(f) Preliminary administrative license.
(g) Professional administrative license.
(h) Reciprocal license.
(i) Legacy license.
(4)(a) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission may  establish other types of teaching
licenses as the commission considers necessary for operation  of the public schools of the state and
may prescribe the qualifications for the licenses. However,  no license established under the au-
thority of this subsection is required for a regular classroom teaching position in the  public schools.
(b) The commission shall by rule establish a  substitute teaching license and a restricted
substitute teaching license. The rules must provide:
(A) Eligibility criteria,  application procedures and other requirements for issuance of a
substitute teaching license or a restricted substitute teaching license.
(B) An expedited process for persons with a restricted substitute  teaching license to ob-
tain a substitute teaching license, based upon training, mentorship, classroom experience  or
other work experience.
(5) Notwithstanding ORS 342.127, any person who  has held a teaching license identified in sub-
section (3) of this section or established as provided by subsection  (4)(a) of this section may, within
three years  of retirement and without payment of any fees or any other additional requirements,
convert the teaching license into a substitute teaching license.
(6)(a) The Teacher  Standards and Practices Commission shall establish a public charter school
teacher  and  administrator registry. The commission shall require the applicant and the public
charter school to jointly submit an application requesting registration as a public charter school
teacher or administrator. The application shall include:
(A) A description of the specific teaching or administrator position the applicant will fill;
(B) A description of the background of the applicant  that is relevant to the teaching or admin-
istrator position, including any post-secondary education or other experience; and
(C) Documentation as  required by the commission for the purposes of conducting a criminal re-
cords check as provided in ORS 181A.195  and a background check through an interstate clearing-
house of revoked and suspended licenses.
(b) Subject to the  results of the criminal records check and background check and to informa-
tion received under ORS 342.143 (2), the commission shall approve the application for  registration.
The commission may deny a request for registration only on the basis of  the criminal records check,
the background check  through an interstate clearinghouse of revoked and suspended licenses or the
information received under ORS 342.143 (2). The registration is valid for a term established  by the
commission and, subject to information received under ORS 342.143 (2),  may be renewed upon joint
application from the teacher or administrator and the public charter school.
(c) A registration as a public charter school  teacher qualifies its holder to accept the teaching
position described in the application in the public  charter school that submitted the application with
the holder of the registration.
(d) A registration as a public charter school administrator qualifies its holder to accept the ad-
ministrator position described in the application in the public charter school that  submitted the
[2]
SB 321
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
application with the holder of the registration.
(7)(a) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission shall adopt an expedited process  for the
issuance of any license established pursuant to this section. The expedited process  adopted under
this subsection  may require the following:
(A) The showing of an urgent situation; and
(B) The joint request for the expedited process from the applicant for the license and:
(i) The school district superintendent or school district board;
(ii) The public charter school governing body; or
(iii) The education service district superintendent or board  of directors of the education service
district.
(b) Except as provided by paragraph (c) of this subsection, the commission shall  issue a license
as provided by this subsection within two working days after receiving a completed application.
(c) The commission  may limit the number of applications the commission will accept under this
subsection from a school district or an education service district to not more than  100 applications
in a period of two working days.
(d) For  purposes of this subsection, the commission may not distinguish between a school district
or an education service district involved in a labor dispute and  any other school district or educa-
tion service district.
SECTION 2.
The Teacher Standards  and Practices Commission, in consultation with the
Oregon Substitute Teachers Association, shall submit a report on the  implementation of the
amendments to ORS 342.125  by section 1 of this 2025 Act in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees  of the
Legislative Assembly related to education no later than December 15, 2025.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[3]