Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall study the impacts
of wildfire and smoke on:
(a) The recreation and fitness industries in Oregon, including the cost  of property in-
surance.
(b) The ability of Oregonians to engage in recreation and fitness activities in Oregon.
(2)(a) In conducting  the study, the department shall consult, as necessary, other state
agencies with relevant expertise.
(b) The Oregon  Business Development Department shall consult with the Department of
Consumer and Business Services in  studying the insurance-related subject matter described
in subsection (1)(a) of this section.
(c) The Oregon Business Development Department shall reimburse the Department of
Consumer and Business Services for the costs  incurred by the Department of Consumer and
Business Services in providing consultation services under this section.
(3) The Oregon Business  Development Department may submit a report on the study in
the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to
the committees or interim  committees of the Legislative Assembly related to wildfire no
later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon  Business Development Department, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $ , to carry out the provisions of  section
1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4404
HB 3866
1
2
July 1, 2025.
[2]