Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 350.355 is amended to read:
350.355. (1) Subject to ORS 352.237  and any group health and welfare insurance benefit plan
developed under ORS 352.237,  a part-time faculty member at a public institution of higher education
is eligible for the same health  care benefits as full-time faculty members if the part-time faculty
member is eligible for membership in the Public Employees Retirement System or another  plan au-
thorized under ORS chapter 238  or 238A by teaching either at a single public institution of higher
education or in aggregate at multiple public institutions of higher education during the prior year.
(2) A part-time faculty member at a  public institution of higher education shall pay [ all] 10
percent of the  insurance premiums for health  care benefits , with the remaining 90 percent of the
insurance premiums paid by the state out of  funds appropriated to the Oregon Educators
Benefit Board by the Legislative Assembly  [ unless otherwise provided for by the policy of  the in-
stitution or by collective bargaining at the institution ].
(3) The Oregon Educators Benefit Board may make rules to implement this section.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 350.355  by section 1 of this 2019 Act become oper-
ative and  first apply to health care benefits offered to part-time faculty members on Sep-
tember 1, 2020.
SECTION 3. The Oregon Educators  Benefit Board shall, before the operative date speci-
fied in section 2 of this 2019 Act, take  any actions necessary to implement the amendments
to ORS 350.355 by section 1  of this 2019 Act on the operative date specified in section 2 of this
2019 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 294