Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall annually assess the  ef-
fects of the provisions of ORS 498.850.
(2) The department shall report on the results of the  assessment conducted under sub-
section (1) of this section,  and may make recommendations for legislation, to the committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to natural resources in the manner provided in ORS
192.245 not later than February 1 of each year.
(3) The department shall post the report on a department website.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1814