Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 163.187 is amended to read:
163.187. (1) A person commits the crime of strangulation if the person  knowingly impedes the
normal breathing or circulation of the blood of another person by:
(a) Applying pressure on the throat, neck or chest of the other person; or
(b) Blocking the nose or mouth of the other person.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to legitimate medical or dental  procedures or
good faith practices of a religious belief.
(3) Strangulation is a Class A misdemeanor.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, strangulation is a Class [ C] B  felony if:
(a) The crime is committed in the  immediate presence of, or is witnessed by, the person’s or the
victim’s minor child or stepchild or a minor child residing within the household of the person or the
victim;
(b) The victim is under 10 years of age;
(c) The victim is a family or household member, as defined in ORS 135.230, of the person;
(d) During the commission of the crime, the person used, attempted to use or threatened to use
a dangerous or deadly weapon, as those terms are defined in ORS  161.015, unlawfully against an-
other;
(e) The  person has been previously convicted of violating this section or ORS 163.160, 163.165,
163.175, 163.185 or  163.190, or of committing an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction, and the
victim in the previous conviction is the same person who is the victim of the current crime;
(f) The person has at least three previous convictions for violating this section or ORS 163.160,
163.165, 163.175, 163.185 or 163.190 or for  committing an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction, in
any combination; or
(g) The person commits the strangulation knowing that the victim is pregnant.
(5) For purposes of subsection (4)(a) of this section, a strangulation is witnessed  if the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2473
HB 3585
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
strangulation is seen or directly perceived in any other manner by the child.
(6) The  Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall classify strangulation [ committed under the
circumstances] described in subsection [ (4)(c)] (4)  of this section as crime category [ 5] 8  of the sen-
tencing guidelines grid of the commission.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]