Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 247.
SECTION 2. (1) A  person who is registering to vote in accordance with ORS 247.012 (1)
must provide evidence of the person’s United States citizenship with the registration.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1) of this  section, evidence of United States citizenship
may include:
(a) Any form of identification  issued in accordance with the requirements of the federal
Real ID Act of 2005, 119 Stat. 231, that indicates the person is a United States citizen;
(b) A valid United States passport;
(c) A United States military identification card, together with  a United States military
record of service showing that the person’s place of birth was in the United States;
(d) A valid government-issued photo identification card  issued by a federal, state or tribal
government showing that the person’s place of birth was in the United States;
(e) A valid government-issued photo identification card issued  by a federal, state or tribal
government, other than an identification described in paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection,
if also presented together with one or more of the following:
(A) A certified birth certificate, including any legal  documentation proving that the
person’s legal name has changed since birth;
(B) An extract from a United States  hospital record of birth created at the time of the
applicant’s birth that indicates that the applicant’s place of birth was in the United States;
(C) A final adoption decree showing the person’s name and that the person was born in
the United States;
(D) A consular report of birth abroad for a citizen  of the United States or a certification
of the person’s report of birth of a United States citizen issued by  the United States Secre-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1207
HB 2444
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tary of State;
(E) A naturalization  certificate or certificate of citizenship issued by the Secretary of
Homeland Security or any other  document or method of proof of United States citizenship
issued by the federal  government under the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8
U.S.C. 1101 et seq.) (1952); or
(F) A United States  Bureau of Indian Affairs card number, tribal treaty card number or
tribal enrollment number.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 247.171 is amended to read:
247.171. (1) Except as provided in this subsection, the Secretary of  State shall design, prepare
and distribute  state voter registration cards. The Secretary of State shall also distribute federal
registration  cards.  Any person may apply in writing to the Secretary of State for permission to print,
copy or otherwise prepare and distribute the  registration cards designed by the Secretary of State.
The secretary may revoke any  permission granted under this subsection at any time. All registration
cards shall be distributed to the public without charge.
(2) The Secretary  of State shall approve any voter registration application form developed for
use by any agency designated as a voter registration agency under ORS 247.208.
(3) Each voter registration card designed  or approved by the Secretary of State shall describe
the penalties for knowingly supplying false information on the registration card and shall  contain
space for a person to provide the following information:
(a) Full name;
(b) Residence address,  mailing address or any other information necessary to locate the resi-
dence of the person offering to register to vote;
(c) The name of the political party with which the person is affiliated, if any;
(d) Date of birth;
(e) An indication that the person is a citizen of the United States; and
(f) A signature attesting to the fact that the person is qualified to be an elector.
(4) Each voter registration  card designed by the Secretary of State must state that evi-
dence of United States citizenship is required for persons who are  registering to vote in this
state and must list examples of documents that are accepted as evidence of citizenship.
[(4)] (5) Any form containing a voter registration card may  also include space for a person to
provide:
(a) A telephone number where the person may be contacted; and
(b) If previously registered to  vote in this state, the name then supplied by the person and the
county and, if known, the address of previous registration.
[(5)] (6) A person shall not supply  any information under subsection (3) or [ (4)] (5) of this section
knowing it to be false.
[(6)] (7) A county clerk or other person accepting registration cards shall not request any in-
formation unless it is authorized by state or federal law.
[(7)] (8) A person shall attest to  the information supplied on the voter registration card by
signing the completed registration card.
[(8)] (9) Any completed and signed registration card  described in subsection (3) of this section
shall be the official registration card of the elector.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 247.171, as amended by section 7, chapter 492, Oregon Laws 2023,  is amended
to read:
247.171. (1) Except as provided  in this subsection, the Secretary of State shall design, prepare
[2]
HB 2444
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and distribute state voter registration cards. The Secretary of State shall also distribute  federal
registration  cards.  Any person may apply in writing to the Secretary of State for permission to print,
copy or otherwise prepare and distribute the registration cards  designed by the Secretary of State.
The secretary may revoke any  permission granted under this subsection at any time. All registration
cards shall be distributed to the public without charge.
(2) The Secretary of State shall approve any voter registration application form  developed for
use by any agency designated as a voter registration agency under ORS 247.208.
(3) Each voter registration card designed or approved by the  Secretary of State shall describe
the penalties  for knowingly supplying false information on the registration card and shall contain
space for a person to provide the following information:
(a) Full name;
(b) Residence address, mailing address or any other information necessary to locate  the resi-
dence of the person offering to register to vote;
(c) The name of the political party with which the person is affiliated, if any;
(d) Date of birth;
(e) An indication that the person is a citizen of the United States; and
(f) Except as provided  in ORS 247.018, a signature attesting to the fact that the person is qual-
ified to be an elector.
(4) Each voter registration  card designed by the Secretary of State must state that evi-
dence of United States citizenship is required for persons who are  registering to vote in this
state and must list examples of documents that are accepted as evidence of citizenship.
[(4)] (5) Any form containing a voter registration card may  also include space for a person to
provide:
(a) A telephone number where the person may be contacted; and
(b) If previously registered to  vote in this state, the name then supplied by the person and the
county and, if known, the address of previous registration.
[(5)] (6) A person shall not supply  any information under subsection (3) or [ (4)] (5) of this section
knowing it to be false.
[(6)] (7) A county clerk or other person accepting registration cards shall not request any in-
formation unless it is authorized by state or federal law.
[(7)] (8) Except as provided in ORS 247.018, a person shall  attest to the information supplied on
the voter registration card by signing the completed registration card.
[(8)] (9) Except as provided in subsection [ (7)] (8) of this section, any  completed and signed
registration card described in  subsection (3) of this section shall be the official registration card of
the elector.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 247.012 is amended to read:
247.012. (1) A qualified person may register to vote or update a registration to vote by:
(a) Delivering by mail, having a person deliver or otherwise delivering  a completed registration
card to any county clerk, the Secretary of State, any office of the Department of Transportation or
any designated voter registration agency as described in ORS 247.208;
(b) Personally delivering, or having a person  deliver, the card to an official designated by a
county clerk under subsection (7) of this section;  or
(c) Submitting the person’s legal name, age, residence and citizenship information  and electronic
signature to the Department of Transportation[ ; or ].
[(d) Completing a registration card  using the electronic voter registration system described in ORS
[3]
HB 2444
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
247.019.]
(2) If a registration card is mailed or delivered to:
(a) Any person other than a county clerk or the Secretary of State, the  person shall forward the
card to a county clerk or the Secretary of State not later  than the fifth day after receiving the card;
or
(b) The Secretary of State or a county clerk for a county other  than the county in which the
person applying for registration  resides, the Secretary of State or county clerk shall forward the
card to the county clerk for the county in which the person  resides not later than the fifth day after
receiving the card.
[(3) Registration of a qualified person occurs: ]
[(a) When a legible, accurate and complete registration card is received in the office of any  county
clerk, the Office of the Secretary of State, an office of  the Department of Transportation, a designated
voter registration agency under ORS 247.208 or at a location designated by a county  clerk under sub-
section (7) of this section; ]
[(b) On the date a registration card is  postmarked if the card is received after the 21st day imme-
diately preceding  an election but is postmarked not later than the 21st day immediately preceding the
election and is addressed to an office of any  county clerk, the Office of the Secretary of State, an office
of the Department of Transportation or any  designated voter registration agency as described in ORS
247.208; or]
[(c) In the case  of a registration card missing a date of birth, containing an incomplete date of birth
or containing an unintentional scrivener’s error that is supplied or corrected as  described in subsection
(4) or (6) of this section, on the date that registration would  have occurred if the registration card had
not been missing the date of birth, contained an incomplete  date of birth or contained the scrivener’s
error.]
[(4)(a)] (3) The county clerk for  the county in which the person resides shall register the
person:
(a) Except as provided in ORS 247.125, if [ a] the person’s  registration card is legible, accurate
and contains, at a minimum, the  [ registrant’s] person’s name, residence address, date of birth and
signature[, the county clerk shall register the person. ]; and
(b) For a person registering to vote in this  state, if the person’s registration card is ac-
companied by evidence of United States citizenship.
[(b)] (4) If the information or evidence of United States citizenship  required under  [paragraph
(a) of this ] subsection (3) of this section  is missing [ from the registration card ] or  the date of birth
is incomplete,  the county clerk shall attempt to obtain the missing or incomplete information from
all sources available to the  county clerk, including but not limited to current and previous addresses
and phone numbers of the registrant. The county clerk may also  supply the registrant’s date of birth
from any previous registration of the registrant. If the missing or incomplete information  cannot be
obtained from sources available to the county clerk, the county clerk shall use reasonable  efforts
to contact the  registrant by phone, mail and electronic mail to obtain the missing or incomplete
information.
(5) If a registration card meets the requirements of subsection [ (4)] (3) of this section but is
missing an indication of political party affiliation, the  registrant [ shall be ] is considered not affil-
iated with any political party. This subsection  does not apply if an elector is updating a registration.
(6) If a registration card contains  an unintentional scrivener’s error, the county clerk may at-
tempt to contact the person to correct the error.
[4]
HB 2444
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(7) A county clerk may appoint officials to accept registration of persons at designated locations.
The appointments and locations shall be in writing and filed in the office of the county clerk. The
county clerk [ shall be ] is responsible for the performance of duties by those appointed.
(8) A registration [ card received  and accepted ] that occurs  under this section [ shall be ] is con-
sidered an active registration.
(9) A registration may be updated at any time.
(10) The county clerk  shall mail a written notice to each person who has attempted to
register to vote in this state under  this section. The notice must indicate whether the person
is registered and must be mailed not later than seven  business days after the county clerk
receives registration materials under subsection (1) or (2)  of this section. The registration
of a qualified person occurs on the date the county clerk mails the  notice confirming the
registration of the person.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 247.012, as amended by section 4, chapter 492, Oregon Laws 2023,  is amended
to read:
247.012. (1) A qualified person may register to vote or update a registration to vote by:
(a) Delivering by mail, having a person deliver or otherwise delivering  a completed registration
card to any county clerk, the Secretary of State, any office of the Department of Transportation or
any designated voter registration agency as described in ORS 247.208;
(b) Personally delivering, or having a person deliver, the card  to an official designated by a
county clerk under subsection (7) of this section;
(c) Submitting the person’s legal name, age, residence and citizenship information  and electronic
signature to the Department of Transportation;  or
(d) Submitting  the person’s legal name, age, residence and citizenship information to the Oregon
Health Authority for use in the Oregon Health Plan[ ; or ].
[(e) Completing a registration card using the electronic voter  registration system described in ORS
247.019.]
(2) If a registration card is mailed or delivered to:
(a) Any person other than a county clerk or the Secretary of State, the  person shall forward the
card to a county clerk or the Secretary of State not later  than the fifth day after receiving the card;
or
(b) The Secretary of State or a  county clerk for a county other than the county in which the
person applying for registration resides, the Secretary of State or county clerk  shall forward the
card to the county clerk for the county in which the person  resides not later than the fifth day after
receiving the card.
[(3) Registration of a qualified person occurs: ]
[(a) When a legible, accurate and complete registration card is received in the office of any  county
clerk, the Office of the Secretary of  State, an office of the Department of Transportation, a designated
voter registration agency under  ORS 247.208 or at a location designated by a county clerk under sub-
section (7) of this section; ]
[(b) On the date a registration card is postmarked if the card  is received after the 21st day imme-
diately preceding an election but is postmarked not later than the 21st day immediately preceding  the
election and is addressed to an office of any  county clerk, the Office of the Secretary of State, an office
of the Department of Transportation or any designated voter  registration agency as described in ORS
247.208; or ]
[(c) In the case  of a registration card missing a date of birth, containing an incomplete date of birth
[5]
HB 2444
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or containing an unintentional scrivener’s error that is supplied or corrected as  described in subsection
(4) or (6) of this section, on the date that registration would  have occurred if the registration card had
not been missing the date of birth, contained  an incomplete date of birth or contained the scrivener’s
error.]
[(4)(a)(A)] (3) The county clerk for the county in which the  person resides shall register
the person:
(a)(A) Except as provided in ORS 247.125, if [ a] the person’s  registration card is legible,  ac-
curate and contains, at a minimum, the [ registrant’s] person’s name, residence  address, date of birth
and signature[ , the county clerk shall register the person. ]; or
(B) [ The county clerk shall register a person ] Pursuant to ORS 247.018, regardless of whether the
person’s registration card  contains a signature, if the person’s registration card is legible, accurate
and contains, at a minimum, the registrant’s name, residence address and date of birth[ .]; and
(b) For a person registering to vote in this  state, if the person’s registration card is ac-
companied by evidence of United States citizenship.
[(b)] (4) If the information or evidence of United States citizenship  required under  [paragraph
(a)(A) of this ] subsection  (3) of this section  is missing  [ from the registration card ] or the date of
birth is incomplete, or if the signature of a person described in  [paragraph (a)(B) of this ] subsection
(3) of this section  has not been submitted, the county clerk shall attempt to obtain the  missing or
incomplete information from all sources  available to the county clerk, including but not limited to
current and previous addresses and phone numbers of the registrant.  The county clerk may also
supply the registrant’s date of birth from any  previous registration of the registrant. If the missing
or incomplete information cannot be obtained from sources available to the  county clerk, the county
clerk shall use reasonable efforts to  contact the registrant by phone, mail and electronic mail to
obtain the missing or incomplete information.
(5) If a registration card meets  the requirements of subsection [ (4)] (3) of this section but is
missing an indication of political party affiliation, the  registrant [ shall be ] is considered not affil-
iated with any political party. This subsection  does not apply if an elector is updating a registration.
(6) If a registration card contains an unintentional scrivener’s error,  the county clerk may at-
tempt to contact the person to correct the error.
(7) A county clerk may appoint officials to accept registration of persons at designated locations.
The appointments and locations shall be in writing and filed in the office of the county clerk. The
county clerk [ shall be ] is responsible for the performance of duties by those appointed.
(8) A registration [ card received and accepted ] that occurs  under this section  [ shall be ] is con-
sidered an active registration.
(9) A registration may be updated at any time.
(10) The county clerk shall mail a written notice to each person who  has attempted to
register to vote in this state under  this section. The notice must indicate whether the person
is registered and must be mailed not  later than seven business days after the county clerk
receives registration materials under subsection (1)  or (2) of this section. The registration
of a qualified person  occurs on the date the county clerk mails the notice confirming the
registration of the person.
SECTION 7.
ORS 247.019 is repealed.
SECTION 8.  ORS 247.025 is amended to read:
247.025. To vote in an election:
(1) Except as provided in ORS 247.012 (10),  a person’s registration  card must be received at
[6]
HB 2444
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
an office or location described in ORS 247.012 not later than the time the office  or location closes
for business on the 21st day immediately preceding the election, but in no case later than  midnight
of the 21st day immediately preceding the election;  or
(2) Except as provided  in ORS 247.012 (10),  a person’s registration card must be postmarked
not later than the 21st day immediately preceding the election and be addressed to an  office of any
county clerk, the Office of the Secretary of State, an office of the Department  of Transportation or
any designated voter registration agency as described in ORS 247.208[ ; or ].
[(3) A person’s registration  card must be delivered electronically as described in ORS 247.019 not
later than 11:59 p.m. of the 21st day immediately preceding the election. ]
SECTION 9.
 ORS 260.993 is amended to read:
260.993. (1) The penalty for violation  of ORS 260.532 is limited to that provided in ORS 260.532
(6) and (8).
(2) Violation of ORS 247.125  (1), 247.171 [ (5)] (6) , 247.420 (2), 253.710, 260.402, 260.555, 260.558,
260.575, 260.645 or 260.665 (2) or (3) involving any action described in ORS 260.665 (2)(d) to (f)  or
260.715 is a Class C felony.
(3) Violation of ORS 260.695 (5) is a Class A misdemeanor.
(4) Violation of ORS 247.171 [ (6)] (7) is a Class C misdemeanor.
SECTION 10.
(1) Section 2  of this 2025 Act applies to persons who register to vote in this
state on or after the operative date of section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 247.171 by sections 3 and 4 of this 2025 Act apply to voter
registration cards designed, prepared or distributed on  or after the operative date of the
amendments to ORS 247.171 by sections 3 and 4 of this 2025  Act and to persons who register
to vote in this state on or after the operative date of the amendments to  ORS 247.171 by
sections 3 and 4 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The amendments to ORS 247.012 by sections 5 and 6 of this 2025 Act apply to voter
registration cards received, delivered or completed on or  after the operative date of the
amendments to ORS 247.012 by sections 5 and 6 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 11. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[7]