Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 413.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “dental care organization” means a prepaid
managed care health services organization, as defined  in ORS 414.025, that provides dental
services.
(2) For dental services  provided to medical assistance recipients by dental care organ-
izations, the Oregon Health Authority  shall establish a per member per month rate that
ensures that the costs of the following services are reimbursed  at no less than 59.8 percent
of the  average rate paid by insurers nationwide as reported in a database maintained by an
independent nonprofit organization:
(a) Adult prophylactic services;
(b) Children’s prophylactic services;
(c) Composite restoration of two surfaces; and
(d) Upper and lower dentures.
(3) The authority shall annually review and revise, if necessary, the  reimbursement rates
established under this section.
(4) A coordinated care organization shall reimburse dental care organizations at the rates
established by the authority under this section.
(5) At least once every two  years, the authority shall report to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to health,  in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, about
the effectiveness of the reimbursement rates established under  this section in increasing
access to dental services for medical assistance recipients, as measured by utilization rates.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies to contracts between  a coordinated care
organization and the Oregon Health Authority entered  into, amended or renewed on or after
the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) Section 2 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2513
HB 2597
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take any  action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the authority to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the authority by section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]