Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Housing and Community Services Department shall study  affordable
housing for college students.  The department shall submit a report in the manner provided
by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to affordable housing no later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2756