Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. No later than September 15, 2019, the Department of Human Services  shall
report to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to human services any
changes to statutes governing the programs administered by the department that are  nec-
essary to implement  changes to the department’s budget, if any, that were made during the
2019 regular session of the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 2. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 361