Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 180.
SECTION 2. (1) The Attorney General,  by rule, shall adopt and periodically revise a list
of persons known or believed to be foreign adversaries to the United States.
(2) Upon inclusion on the list, a person is ineligible to receive property  or mineral rights
as described in section 4 of this 2025 Act or  to receive water rights as described in section
6 of this 2025 Act.
(3) In adopting the list  under this section, the Attorney General shall consider including
those persons that are:
(a) Listed as  foreign adversaries by the United States Secretary of Commerce under 15
C.F.R. 791.4;
(b) Subject to a prohibition on the trade of  defense articles or services with the United
States under 22 C.F.R. 126.1; or
(c) Included within the United  States Department of Treasury’s List of Specially Desig-
nated Nationals and Blocked Persons or any other list or identification  of sanctioned persons
or property maintained by the Office of Foreign Assets Control.
(4) A person added to the list:
(a) Is not entitled to notice.
(b) May file an appeal challenging the validity of the  person’s inclusion on the list at any
time, notwithstanding any limitations on review under ORS 183.400.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 93.
SECTION 4. A deed, sales agreement or any other instrument  is void if the instrument,
whether or not recorded, conveys any interest or rights in any real property to a person who,
on the date that the instrument is executed or recorded, is a listed foreign adversary as  de-
scribed in section 2 of this 2025 Act, if the instrument:
(1) Conveys land that, at  the time of conveyance, is zoned for exclusive farm use, forest
use or mixed farm and forest use; or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4496
SB 1023
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
(2) Involves the transfer of a mining claim, mineral rights or a water right.
SECTION 5.
Section 6 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 540.505 to
540.585.
SECTION 6. (1) The Water  Resources Department may not approve any application that
attempts to make a transfer or  change of a water right, including under ORS 540.010, 540.020,
540.023 or 540.030, such that  the water right would become held by or for the use of a person
who, on the  date that the application was executed or received by the department, is a listed
foreign adversary as described in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(2) A transfer or attempted transfer or change of a  water right under subsection (1) of
this section,  whether or not approved by the department, is void and may not be given any
effect by a district or any other person.
[2]