Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Business Development Department may make grants and
loans from the Community Leverage Fund established by section 2  of this 2017 Act to fund
proposals that address multiple outcomes in health,  early learning, workforce and economic
development and education. Grants and loans made  under this section shall be distributed in
substantially equal amounts among economic development regions described in ORS 284.752.
(2) Grants and loans described in subsection (1) of this section  may be made to counties,
cities, school  districts, post-secondary institutions or nongovernmental entities partnering
with a coordinated care organization, early learning hub, regional achievement collaborative,
workforce investment board or regional solutions advisory committee.
(3) To qualify for a grant  or loan under subsection (1) of this section, a proposal must
be submitted to the department in the manner and with a fee as may be prescribed by rule.
(4) All proposals for funding under subsection  (1) of this section must establish return
on investment criteria and performance measures as prescribed by the department by rule.
SECTION 2. (1) The Community Leverage  Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by  the Community Leverage
Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Community Leverage Fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts appropriated  or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative As-
sembly;
(c) Investment earnings received on moneys in the fund; and
(d) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Develop-
ment Department for the purposes of  making grants and loans under section 1 of this 2017
Act.
(4) The  department may establish accounts and subaccounts within the fund when the
department determines that accounts or subaccounts are necessary or desirable and may
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1629
HB 2534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
credit any interest or income derived from moneys in the fund to any account  or subaccount
in the fund.
(5) The department may use moneys in the fund to pay the administrative costs associ-
ated with the fund and with making  grants, loans and other distributions of moneys from the
fund.
SECTION 3. (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this 2017 Act become operative January 1, 2018.
(2) The Director of the Oregon  Business Development Department may take any action
before January 1, 2018, that is necessary to enable the director, on or after  January 1, 2018,
to exercise the functions, duties and powers conferred on  the director by sections 1 and 2
of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]