Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 291.201 to
291.222.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “zero-based budgeting” means budgeting that
begins with the assumption that initial funding amounts  for each component of a budget are
zero and that contains justification for each proposed expenditure.
(2) It is the policy of the state to use zero-based budgeting in  developing biennial budget
plans.
(3) Agency request budgets that are filed by or prepared for a state agency  under ORS
291.208 must contain the following information:
(a) A description of activities that the  agency performs and a justification for the exist-
ence of each activity by reference to statute or other legal authority;
(b) For each activity, a quantitative estimate of any adverse impacts that could  reason-
ably be expected if the activity were discontinued, together with a  full description of the
methods by which the adverse impact is estimated;
(c) For each activity, an itemized account of  expenditures that would be required to
maintain the activity at the minimum level of service required by the statutory or other legal
authority, together with a concise statement of  the quantity and quality of service required
at that minimum level;
(d) For each activity, an itemized account of expenditures required to maintain the  ac-
tivity at the current level of  service, together with a concise statement of the quantity and
quality of service being provided; and
(e) A ranking of all activities that shows the relative  contribution of each activity to the
overall goals and purposes of the agency at the current level of service.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025  Act applies to agency request budgets prepared for
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1479
SB 406
1
2
biennia beginning on or after July 1, 2027.
[2]