Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “small counties”  means counties having a popu-
lation of  less than 100,000, according to the latest federal decennial census or as determined
under ORS 190.520.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department may  make grants from the Oregon
Small County  Internet Access Fund to qualified small counties for the purpose of providing
assistance to small counties in obtaining affordable Internet access.
(3) The department shall adopt rules to establish eligibility standards for small counties
to qualify for grants and to define the type of assistance small counties may  obtain with
grants made under this section.
(4) The department shall collaborate with state agencies, local  governments, schools, in-
stitutions of higher education and other public and private entities and organizations, to
leverage Internet  access opportunities in small counties through the making of grants under
this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Small County Internet Access Fund is established within the
State Treasury, separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon
Small County Internet Access Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the  Legislative As-
sembly;
(c) Investment earnings received on moneys in the fund; and
(d) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Oregon Business Develop-
ment Department for the purpose of making grants under section 1 of this 2017 Act.
(4) The department may use moneys in the fund to pay the administrative costs associ-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 401
SB 625
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
ated with the fund and with making grants from the fund.
SECTION 3. The Oregon Business  Development Department shall submit a report by
September 15, 2018, to interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly with subject matter
jurisdiction over rural counties and economic development regarding the number  and type
of grants made to small counties under section 1 of this 2017 Act,  and the status,
affordability and availability of Internet access in small counties in this state.
[2]