Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 2 to 4 of this 2023 Act:
(1) “Female” means the sex  that typically has the capacity to bear young or produce
eggs.
(2) “Male” means the sex that typically has the capacity to produce  relatively small,
usually motile, gametes that fertilize the eggs of a female.
(3) “Medical health care professional” means the following individuals:
(a) A nurse licensed under ORS 678.010 to 678.410;
(b) A physician licensed under ORS chapter 677;
(c) A physician assistant licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525;
(d) A psychologist licensed under ORS 675.010 to 675.150;
(e) A pharmacist licensed under ORS chapter 689; or
(f) Other individual licensed to provide medical health care services.
(4) “Minor” means an individual who is under 18 years of age.
(5) “Sex” means the biological indication of male and female,  such as sex chromosomes,
naturally occurring sex hormones, gonads and nonambiguous internal and  external genitalia
[2]
HB 3137
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
present at birth, without  regard to an individual’s psychological, chosen or subjective expe-
rience.
(6)(a) “Sex alteration procedure”  means, when performed or used for the purpose of ap-
proximating the secondary sex characteristics of the opposite sex, a medical  or surgical
service, physician service, inpatient or outpatient hospital service  or prescription drug in-
tended to alter or remove physical or anatomical  characteristics or features that are typical
for the individual’s sex or to cosmetically create  physiological or anatomical characteristics
that resemble a sex different from the individual’s sex.
(b) “Sex alteration procedure” does not include:
(A) A service provided to an individual born  with a medically verifiable disorder of sex
development;
(B) A service provided to an individual diagnosed, through genetic  or biochemical testing,
with a disorder of sexual development resulting from  not having typical sex chromosome
structure, sex steroid hormone production or sex steroid hormone action; or
(C) The  treatment of an infection, injury, disease or disorder caused or exacerbated by
the performance of a sex alteration procedure.
SECTION 2.
(1) A medical health care professional may not, for  an individual who is a
minor:
(a) Perform a sex alteration procedure on the minor; or
(b) Refer the minor to another medical health care  professional for the purpose of ob-
taining a sex alteration procedure.
(2) A mental health professional may not  refer a minor to a medical health care profes-
sional for the purpose of obtaining a sex alteration procedure.
(3) An employee or contractor of a public or private school may not, for an  individual
who is a minor:
(a) Encourage or coerce the minor to withhold from the minor’s parent or legal  guardian
the fact that the minor’s self-perception is inconsistent with the minor’s sex; or
(b) Withhold from the minor’s  parent or legal guardian information related to the
minor’s self-perception being inconsistent with the minor’s sex.
SECTION 3.
(1) Public funds may not  be directly or indirectly used for or granted, paid
or distributed to an entity, organization or  individual that provides or performs a sex alter-
ation procedure to or for a minor.
(2) The health care services provided by or  in a health care facility owned or operated
by the state or a county or  local government, or by a physician or other individual employed
by the  state or a county or local government may not include sex alteration procedures
provided to minors.
(3) Any amount paid by an individual or an entity for  the provision of sex alteration
procedures for minors, or as premiums for a  policy for health insurance that includes cov-
erage for sex alteration procedures for minors is not tax deductible.
(4) Medical assistance may not include sex alteration procedures provided to minors.
(5) A policy for  health insurance may not provide payment or reimbursement for sex al-
teration procedures provided to minors.
SECTION 4.
The provision of a sex alteration procedure to a minor shall be considered
unprofessional conduct by a medical health care professional for which  the medical health
care professional may be subject to disciplinary action by the appropriate health professional
[3]
HB 3137
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
licensing board.
SECTION 5.
(1) A person may bring a  claim for a violation of section 2 or 3 of this 2023
Act and recover economic and noneconomic damages, injunctive relief or declaratory relief.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, an action under this  section
must be commenced not later than two years after the action accrues.
(b) An individual subjected as a minor to a violation of section 2 or 3  of this 2023 Act
may bring a  claim under this section at any time before the individual reaches 38 years of
age.
(3) The court shall award reasonable attorney fees to  a prevailing plaintiff in a civil
action under this section.
(4) The Attorney General may bring an action to  enforce compliance with section 2 or 3
of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]