Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall provide grants  from the Erin’s Law
Grant Fund established under section 2 of this 2023 Act to school districts to carry  out the
school district’s child sexual  abuse prevention instructional program under ORS 336.059. In
determining a grant amount to provide to a school district, the department shall consider:
(a) The number of schools and students in each school in a school district;
(b) Geographic location and travel distances;
(c) Barriers to a school district’s compliance with ORS 336.059; and
(d) A school district’s access to outside agency child abuse prevention educators.
(2) A school district shall use grant moneys received under this section to:
(a) Provide professional training for administrators, teachers and  other school personnel
regarding communicating child sexual abuse prevention  techniques to students, effects of
child sexual abuse on children, receiving child sexual abuse reports and disclosure and  man-
dated reporting;
(b) Create and implement program curriculum that is  developmentally appropriate, cul-
turally sensitive and evidence based;
(c) Partner with advocacy organizations that use  certified advocates, as defined in ORS
40.264, who have knowledge of and training in child sexual abuse prevention  to assist the
school district in implementing the school district’s program;
(d) Partner with outside agency child abuse prevention educators to provide program in-
struction; and
(e) Hire, train, retain and maintain other resources that support  the implementation of
the school district’s program, including advocates, therapists, school  nurses, mental health
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2657
SB 604
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
providers and school-based health centers.
(3) The department shall monitor the capacity and needs of and  provide technical as-
sistance to grantees.
(4) The department shall conduct a biennial evaluation of programs  that receive grants
under this section. The evaluation shall include measurement of outcomes that align with:
(a) Current research regarding child sexual abuse prevention;
(b) Compliance with ORS 336.059; and
(c) Subsequent child sexual abuse reporting outcomes.
(5) The department shall adopt rules necessary to carry out the provision of this section,
including requirements for grant eligibility under this section.
(6) On or before September 15 of each odd-numbered year,  the department shall submit
to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education a report on the
status and impact of grants made  to programs under this section. The report shall include
changes in the  capacity of school districts and the results of any biennial evaluations con-
ducted in accordance with subsection (4) of this section.
SECTION 2.
The Erin’s  Law Grant Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Erin’s Law Grant  Fund shall be
credited to the fund. All moneys in  the Erin’s Law Grant Fund are continuously appropriated
to the Department of Education for the purposes of awarding grants  pursuant to section 1
of this 2023 Act  and paying the costs and expenses of the department related to the admin-
istration and implementation of ORS 336.059 and section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3.  ORS 336.059 is amended to read:
336.059. (1) Each school district board shall adopt a child sexual abuse prevention  instructional
program for students in kindergarten through grade 12.
(2) School districts must include in the program:
(a) Developmentally appropriate, culturally sensitive and evidence-based instruction for each
grade level;
(b) A minimum of four instructional sessions per school  year, with each year’s instruction
building on the previous year’s instruction;
(c) Age-appropriate curriculum including  role-playing, discussion, activities and books to educate
students regarding child sexual abuse prevention;
(d) Instruction providing students with the knowledge and tools to communicate  incidents of
sexual abuse;
(e) Instruction regarding  “safe touch,” “unsafe touch,” “safe secrets,” “unsafe secrets,” and how
to escape and report a sexual abuse situation;
(f) Techniques to  recognize child sexual abuse, skills to reduce vulnerability and encouragement
to report child sexual abuse;
(g) An evaluation component with measurable outcomes;
(h) A professional training component for administrators, teachers and  other school personnel
regarding communicating child sexual abuse prevention  techniques to students, effects of child sex-
ual abuse on children, receiving child sexual  abuse reports and disclosures and mandated reporting;
and
(i) A parental involvement component to inform parents about  child sexual abuse topics, in-
cluding characteristics of offenders, “grooming”  behaviors and how to discuss child sexual abuse
prevention with children.
[2]
SB 604
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
(3) Program instruction may be  delivered by instructors including teachers, school counselors
and outside agency prevention educators, provided  the instructors have knowledge of and training
in child sexual abuse prevention.
(4) The Department of Education shall provide technical assistance to school districts  in
the development and implementation of the program required by this section.
SECTION 4.
The Department of Education shall create, fill and  utilize one full-time
equivalent position within the department to:
(1) Oversee and administer the provision of grants under section 1 of this 2023 Act.
(2) Ensure school districts comply with grant requirements for grants provided  under
section 1 of this 2023 Act.
(3) Work with school districts to ensure compliance with all requirements  under ORS
336.059.
(4) Create an oversight program to ensure school districts stay in  compliance with all
requirements under ORS 336.059 and section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund,  the amount of $20,000,000, for deposit in the Erin’s Law Grant Fund estab-
lished in section 2 of this 2023 Act, which may be expended for the purposes  of carrying out
ORS 336.059 and section 1 of this 2023 Act.
[3]