Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the Office of Community Colleges
and Workforce Development, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $  for the Oregon Youth Employment Program.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the Office of Community Colleges
and Workforce Development, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $  for local workforce investment boards for  youth work experi-
ence programs.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the Office of Community Colleges
and Workforce Development, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $  for the Oregon Youth  Conservation Corps for grants for the
Oregon Community Stewardship Corps and the Summer Conservation Corps.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, which  may be expended for Youth Development
Council programs that support youth employment.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount  of $_______, which may be expended for career and technical ed-
ucation programs that offer employment experiences for students.
SECTION 6. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2774
HB 2185
1
[2]