Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the owner-occupied  primary
residence of  an individual who is at least 65 years of age and has filed a valid claim under
subsection (4) of this section shall have a specially assessed value determined under  sub-
section (2) of this section.
(2)(a) The specially assessed value of a residence to which a valid claim relates shall equal
the real market value of the residence as shown on the tax statement delivered pursuant  to
ORS 311.250 for the property tax year immediately preceding the first  property tax year to
which a valid claim filed under subsection (4) of this section relates.
(b) For the first property tax year for which the residence is assessed under this  section,
the residence’s maximum specially assessed value shall equal the product of the specially
assessed value multiplied by  the ratio, not greater than 1.00, of the maximum assessed value
the residence would have had for the applicable property tax  year if it were not specially
assessed to the real market value of the residence for the applicable property tax year.
(c) For each year after the  first property tax year for which the residence is specially
assessed under this section and before disqualification from  the specially assessed value, the
residence’s maximum specially  assessed value shall equal the greater of 103 percent of the
residence’s assessed value from the prior property  tax year or 100 percent of the residence’s
maximum specially assessed value from the prior property tax year.
(3) The assessed value of the residence for  any property tax year during which the resi-
dence is granted a specially assessed value under this section shall be the least of:
(a) The residence’s maximum specially assessed value as determined under  subsection (2)
of this section;
(b) The residence’s real market value; or
(c) The residence’s specially assessed value  as determined under subsection (2) of this
section.
(4)(a) An individual’s claim for a specially  assessed value for a residence under this sec-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1504
SB 650
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tion must:
(A) Be in writing on a form supplied by the Department of Revenue;
(B) Describe the residence;
(C) Recite all facts establishing the eligibility of  the residence for, and of the individual
to claim, the specially assessed value; and
(D) Have attached:
(i) Any documentary proof required by the department; and
(ii) A written declaration by the individual that the statements contained in the  claim
are true.
(b) The claim must  be filed with the assessor of the county in which the residence is lo-
cated after January 1 and on or before April 15 immediately  preceding the property tax year
for which the specially assessed value is claimed.
(c) If the county  assessor determines that the residence is eligible for, and the individual
is eligible to claim, the specially assessed value, the county assessor shall determine the total
amount of taxes due on the individual’s residence in accordance with this section.
(5) Any individual aggrieved by the denial of  a claim for the specially assessed value un-
der this section may appeal to the Oregon Tax Court  in the manner provided by ORS 305.404
to 305.560.
(6) The specially assessed value under this section is  in addition to and not in lieu of any
other property tax limit, exemption or partial exemption, special assessment,  deferral or
credit.
(7)(a) If, as  of January 1 of the assessment year, any of the circumstances listed in par-
agraph (b) of this subsection have occurred since the immediately preceding January 1,  the
residence shall:
(A) Have,  for the immediately succeeding property tax year, a maximum assessed value
as determined under ORS 308.156 (5); and
(B) Be assessed and taxed as other property similarly situated is assessed and taxed.
(b) The circumstances referred to in paragraph (a) of this subsection are:
(A) The individual who claimed the specially assessed value on the residence dies or,  if
there was more  than one claimant, the survivor of the individual who originally claimed the
specially assessed value dies.
(B) The residence granted the specially assessed value is  sold, a contract to sell is en-
tered into or a person other than the individual who claimed the specially assessed value,
including a transferee, becomes the owner of the residence.
(C) The residence is no longer the  owner-occupied primary residence of any individual
who claimed the specially assessed value, except  in the case of an individual required to be
absent from the residence by reason of health.
(D) The residence granted the specially assessed value is a manufactured structure  or
floating home and has been moved out of the state.
(E) New property  or new improvements as defined in ORS 308.149 have been added to the
tax account of the residence that has been granted the specially assessed value.
(8) ORS 315.037 does not apply to this section.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act applies to property tax years beginning on or  after
July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
[2]
SB 650
1
2
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]