Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Public Defense Services Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  out
of the General Fund, the amount of $6,000,000, for distribution to counties  to reimburse dis-
trict attorneys for discovery costs in cases involving indigent defendants.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 970