Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Business Development Department may make grants to a
city with a population of 35,000 or less that:
(a) Has within its corporate boundaries a community college or a  public university listed
in ORS 352.002 with at least 3,000 full-time students;
(b) Has entered into a formal public-private public transit delivery agreement;
(c) Has potential for linkage for regional public transit opportunities;
(d) Has a strategic plan that includes public transit for health care  availability, housing-
to-work access, traffic congestion mitigation and regional economic development; or
(e) Needs both intracommunity and intercommunity public transit.
(2) Grants must be used for:
(a) An initial feasibility study on the  scale, scope, shape and size of a public transit sys-
tem;
(b) Establishment of a public-private partnership, including at least one community  col-
lege or public university and one city, for delivery of a public transit system; or
(c) Initial capitalization of a public transit system.
(3)(a) Any city described in subsection (1)  of this section may apply for a grant under this
section by submitting a completed application  and related information as required by the
Oregon Business Development Department by rule.
(b) An application must require the city to:
(A) Include a formal statement of intent to partner on a community-wide public transit
system;
(B) Identify a public agency that will manage the grant; and
(C) Include a good-faith statement of intent to develop  and maintain a community-wide
public transit  system, through partnerships, direct or contracted services or an intergov-
ernmental agreement entered into  under ORS chapter 190, based on a validated feasibility
study demonstrating long-term sustainability of a public transit system to be  operating not
later than 2030.
(c) The application shall be filed, reviewed and approved or rejected in  accordance with
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2151
HB 2541
1
2
3
4
5
rules adopted by the department.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $  for the
purpose of making grants under section 1 of this 2019 Act.
[2]