Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Court  Administrator shall report to an appropriate committee or
interim committee of  the Legislative Assembly on fees charged by state courts no later than
September 1, 2018.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3418