Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 458.690 is amended to read:
458.690. (1) A  fiduciary organization selected under ORS 458.695 may qualify as the recipient
of account  contributions that qualify the contributor for a tax credit under ORS 315.271 only if the
fiduciary organization matches amounts deposited by the account holder according to  a formula es-
tablished by the  fiduciary organization of not less than $1 nor more than $5 for each $1 deposited
by the account holder. The matching funds must be deposited into a designated  account that is
controlled by the fiduciary organization and is separate from the savings account of the account
holder.
(2) [ Account holders may not accrue  more than $6,000 of matching funds under subsection (1) of
this section from state-directed moneys in any 12-month period. A fiduciary organization may  designate
a lower amount as a limit on  annual matching funds. ] A fiduciary organization shall maintain on
deposit sufficient funds to cover the matching deposit agreements for  all individual development
accounts managed by the organization.
[(3) The Housing and Community Services Department  shall adopt rules to establish a maximum
total amount of state-directed moneys that may be deposited as matching funds into an  individual de-
velopment account.]
(3)(a) The maximum total amount of state-directed moneys that may be deposited  as
matching funds into an individual development account is $20,000, as adjusted  under para-
graph (b) of this subsection.
(b) To account for effects of inflation, the Housing and Community Services  Department
shall, by rule, annually adjust the  dollar amount specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection
based on  the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as
published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(4) The Housing and Community Services Department  shall provide information to the Depart-
ment of Revenue about all individual development  account contributors that are qualified for a tax
credit under ORS 315.271, if required by ORS 315.058.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3549
HB 2735
1
[2]