Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in  this section, “contractor” means a private entity that enters
into a multiyear contract with the Department of  Human Services to provide health or social
services to children, youth, adults or families in this state.
(2) A contract entered into between the department and a contractor must include an-
nual adjustments to the payments  under the contract that are no less than the percentage
increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All  Items),
as published by the Bureau of  Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor for
each prior year.
SECTION 2. Section 1  of this 2025 Act applies to contracts entered into or renewed on
or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2335