Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 327.006 to
327.133.
SECTION 2. (1) Each even-numbered year, the  Oregon Department of Administrative
Services shall prepare a tentative budget  for funding the State School Fund for the next
biennium.
(2)(a) For the purpose  of preparing the tentative budget, the department shall form a
committee. The committee must include:
(A) Three  representatives of state government, which must include one representative
from each of the following:
(i) The Department of Education;
(ii) The Legislative Fiscal Officer or a designee of the officer; and
(iii) The Legislative Revenue Officer or a designee of the officer;
(B) Four  representatives of statewide professional educator organizations, which must
include one representative from each of the following:
(i) School district administrators;
(ii) School district boards;
(iii) A licensed school employees labor union; and
(iv) A classified school employees labor union;
(C) Three representatives of educator professionals, which must include one designee  of
each of the following:
(i) School business officials;
(ii) School district human resources personnel; and
(iii) Education service districts; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 38
HB 4068
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(D) One Senator appointed by the  President of the Senate and one Representative ap-
pointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
(b) The Legislative Fiscal Officer  and the Legislative Revenue Officer, or their designees,
and the members of the committee who are members of the  Legislative Assembly shall serve
as nonvoting members on the committee formed under this subsection.
(3)(a) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall review  with the commit-
tee formed under subsection (2) of this section the components of the methodology that will
be used to prepare the tentative budget and the calculations for the tentative budget.
(b) The methodology  used for the tentative budget must calculate the current service
level based on consideration of the methodology identified by the committee.
(c) The tentative budget shall at a minimum include:
(A) Projected changes in the cost of personnel services, other services, supplies and
capital expenditures, based on:
(i) Anticipated expenses; and
(ii) Projections of roll-up costs  provided by school districts that represent at least two-
thirds of  the number of weighted students (ADMw) in the most recent State School Fund
calculations;
(B) Forecasted local revenues, as described in  ORS 327.011 and as calculated by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the Legislative  Fiscal Officer, the Legislative
Revenue Officer and the Department of Revenue; and
(C) Projected cost factors that may arise from new laws and administrative rules.
(4) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall consult with the  Legislative
Fiscal Officer and shall collaborate with the  committee formed under subsection (2) of this
section prior to finalizing the tentative budget required under this section.
(5) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall present the tentative  budget
prepared under this section to the Governor  and to the Legislative Assembly in conjunction
with the submittal of the agency request budget of the Department of Education.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 327.
SECTION 4. (1) Every school district shall provide a copy of the financial summary re-
quired under ORS 294.438 (1) and 294.441 to the Department of Education.
(2) A financial summary must be provided under subsection (1)  of this section by a date
specified by the State Board  of Education by rule. The rules must allow the Superintendent
of Public Instruction to specify an alternative date to provide the financial summary  if a
human-created disaster or a natural disaster affects the  ability of a school district to provide
the financial summary by the specified date.
(3) Any school district failing to provide a copy of a financial summary as required by this
section and by rule of the State Board of Education may  not receive any payments from the
State School Fund until the financial summary is provided.
(4) The department shall  review all financial summaries received under this section. If,
for a budget period, the unappropriated ending fund balance and reserves for the general
fund of a school district exceeds the beginning fund balance for the general  fund for the
school district by 10  percent or more, the department shall withhold the amount of the ex-
cess that exceeds the 10 percent from future payments to the school district from  the State
School Fund in a manner prescribed by the State Board of Education by rule.
(5) Based on financial summaries received under  this section, the department shall cal-
[2]
HB 4068
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
culate, for each category  identified in ORS 294.441 that is applicable to a school district, the
percentage of the total budget that is made of that category.
(6)(a) The department shall make accessible to the public the following:
(A) The financial summaries provided under this section; and
(B) The calculations made under subsection (5) of this section.
(b) The information made available to the public under this subsection must be  made
available:
(A) Through the Internet, a personal computer or other similar technology; and
(B) In a manner that allows  for comparisons between the financial summaries provided
by different school districts.
(7) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for  the administration
of this section.
[3]