Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The  Joint Legislative Audit Committee shall cause to be performed an
audit of  the Secretary of State Elections Division to assess the integrity of elections con-
ducted in Oregon.
(2) The audit shall be commenced no later than , 2025.
(3) The Legislative Fiscal Officer may hire individuals with appropriate  audit and
elections experience to assist the committee in the performance of the audit.
(4) Findings of the audit shall be presented to the committee no  later than
, 2026.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3957