Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2025,
out of the General Fund, the  amount of $12,000,000 for distribution to the Northwest Health
Foundation Fund II for the purpose of funding the Justice Reinvestment Equity Program
described in section 15, chapter 78, Oregon Laws 2022.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3503