Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “full-service redemption  center” has the meaning
given that term in ORS 459A.700.
(2) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission shall establish by  rule a grant program
to facilitate the establishment of a  full-service redemption center in each city in this state
with a population greater than 10,000. The commission shall award  grants in a manner that
the commission determines will best facilitate the establishment of new full-service redemp-
tion centers in cities with a population greater than 10,000. Rules adopted by the commission
must include provisions that:
(a) Describe the grant application process;
(b) Describe eligibility criteria and grant award amounts; and
(c) Establish procedures to ensure that grant awards are used in  accordance with pro-
gram requirements.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the General  Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, to award grants under section 1 of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1060