Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs  shall establish a program to provide
grants for funding for programs to  provide court and community care to children of veterans
and veteran families.
(2) The department may award a grant under the  program to a court and community
care program that:
(a) Is an established court and  community care program at the time of application for
the grant;
(b) Demonstrates  that the court and community care program has current or planned
future service availability specifically for children of veterans and veteran families;
(c) Agrees to use grant funds only to provide service  availability to children of veterans
and veteran families; and
(d) Agrees to gather and report to the department data on  the usage of the court and
community care program by veterans and the benefits of the program to veterans.
(3) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.
SECTION 2.
There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, from  the
Veterans’ Services Fund, to the Department of Veterans’  Affairs, the amount of $500,000 for
the purposes  of making grants and paying administrative costs under the program estab-
lished under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of $500,000
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Veterans’ Services Fund established under
ORS 406.140 to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, for the  purposes of making grants and
paying administrative costs under the program established under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1555
HB 2524
1
2
on its passage.
[2]