Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 517.800 is amended to read:
517.800. (1)(a)  Except for an application for a mining operation submitted under ORS 517.910 to
517.989, each applicant for an operating permit under ORS 517.702 to 517.989 shall pay  to the State
Department of Geology and Mineral Industries  a fee established by the State Geologist in an amount
not to exceed [ $2,000] $ .
(b) If an application for a  new permit or an amendment to an existing permit requires extraor-
dinary department resources because  of concerns about slope stability or proximity to waters of the
state or other environmentally sensitive areas, the applicant shall pay to the department an addi-
tional fee in an amount the State Geologist deems adequate  to cover the additional costs for staff
and other related expenses. The State Geologist shall consult with the  applicant when determining
the amount of the fee.
(2) A holder of an operating  permit that did not extract minerals during the preceding 12-month
period shall pay to  the department an annual renewal fee of $1,200. A holder of an operating permit
that extracted minerals during the preceding 12-month period shall pay to the department  an annual
renewal fee of [ $1,460] $
 and [ $0.0125] $  per ton of minerals extracted during the
preceding 12-month period.
(3) If a reclamation plan  is changed, the operator may be assessed for staff time and other re-
lated costs an amount not to exceed $2,000 in  addition to the annual renewal fee. This subsection
does not apply to a mining operation that is subject to the fee established by ORS 517.973 (2)(a).
(4) If an operator  requests that the department respond to requests for information required by
a local government in making a land use planning decision, the State  Geologist may require the
operator to pay the department a fee for staff time  and related costs. The department shall notify
the operator in advance of the estimated costs of providing the information,  and the assessment may
not exceed the estimate.
(5) The State Geologist may  require the operator of a site to pay to the department a special
inspection fee in an amount not to exceed $2,000 for an inspection conducted under the following
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1744
HB 2785
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
circumstances:
(a) Investigation  of surface mining operations conducted without the operating permit required
under ORS 517.790; or
(b) Investigation of surface mining operations conducted outside the area authorized  in an op-
erating permit.
(6) Upon request of an applicant or operator, the department  shall provide an itemized list and
documentation of expenses used to determine a fee under subsection (1)(b), (3) or  (4) of this section.
(7) Notwithstanding the per ton fee established  in subsection (2) of this section, the governing
board of the department may lower to zero  or raise the per ton fee up to [ $0.015] $
 to reflect
actual expenses of the department in administering ORS 517.702 to 517.951.
(8) All fees  collected by the department under this section shall be deposited in the Mined Land
Regulation and Reclamation Program Subaccount within the Geology and  Mineral Industries Ac-
count. The department shall prepare and submit to the  governing board of the department an annual
report on the financial status of the Mined Land Regulation and Reclamation Program Subaccount.
(9) The governing board of the department shall adopt rules establishing:
(a) Procedures for the administrative review of the determinations of fees under this section.
(b) The payment date for fees required under this section.
(c) Late fees of up to five percent of the unpaid amount of a fee  owed under this section if the
fee is more than 60 days past due.
SECTION 2.
No later than September 15 of each year, the State Department of  Geology
and Mineral Industries shall submit a report in the manner provided by  ORS 192.245 to the
interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to natural resources. The report
must include, but need not be limited to, the following information:
(1) The status of any pending applications for:
(a) New operating permits under ORS  517.790 or amendments to an existing operating
permit;
(b) Exploration permits under ORS 517.705; and
(c) The transfer of permits under 517.833.
(2) A summary of the revenue raised from fees charged to operators under ORS  517.710
and ORS 517.750 to 517.901.
(3) The average amount of time that elapses between:
(a) The time when a permit application is submitted and when the department determines
the application is complete; and
(b) The time  when the department determines an application is complete and when the
department issues a permit.
(4) The steps the department has taken to:
(a) Meet any performance benchmarks established  by the governing board of the de-
partment or the Legislative Assembly; and
(b) Process and issue permits as required by law.
(5) A review of  potential internal processes and procedures that the department may
adopt to  increase program efficiency and reduce delays in the processing and issuance of
permits under ORS 517.705 and ORS 517.750 to 517.901.
(6) Any results of a  performance audit of the mined land regulatory and reclamation
program conducted under ORS 297.070.
[2]