Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A small forestland owner that planted one or  more trees on or before the
effective date of this 2025 Act to comply with  reforestation requirements under ORS 527.610
to 527.770 may, notwithstanding any contrary provision of reforestation requirements  for the
forestland, harvest the trees.
(2) The reforestation requirements under ORS 527.610 to 527.770  apply to the forestland
after the trees have been harvested.
(3) The State Board of Forestry may adopt rules necessary to implement the provisions
of this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1598