Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall  be under the control of the Super-
intendent of Public Instruction.
(2) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall  be elected by the electors of this state
at the regular general election in the same manner as other state  officers are elected. The
term of office for the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall commence on the  first
Monday in January of the year succeeding the election. The Superintendent of  Public In-
struction shall hold office for the term of four years, and until  a successor is elected and
qualified.
(3) At any time when a vacancy may by  any cause occur in the office of Superintendent
of Public Instruction, the Governor shall appoint a suitable person  to be Superintendent of
Public Instruction. The person appointed shall hold  office until the next general election.
When a vacancy occurs in  the office of Superintendent of Public Instruction before the 61st
day before the first general election to be held  during that term of office, the remaining two
years of the term of office shall be filled by the electors at the first general election.
SECTION 2. (1) Section 1 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 4, 2027.
(2) The term of office prescribed by section 1 of this 2025 Act  applies to any Superinten-
dent of Public Instruction who takes office on or after January 4, 2027.
SECTION 3. ORS 326.300 is repealed and section 4 of this  2025 Act is enacted in lieu
thereof.
SECTION 4. (1) The Superintendent of Public Instruction may appoint deputy  super-
intendents of public instruction, for whose acts the superintendent shall be responsible.  A
deputy may perform any act or duty of the office of Superintendent of Public Instruction as
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3820
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
designated by the superintendent.
(2) Notice of the appointment of a  deputy and the duties designated for the deputy shall
be filed with the Secretary of State.
SECTION 5.
Section 4 of  this 2025 Act and the repeal of ORS 326.300 by section 3 of this
2025 Act become operative on January 4, 2027.
SECTION 6. (1) The Superintendent of Public  Instruction shall convene the Oregon Par-
ents Advisory Group. The purpose of the advisory group is  to advise the Superintendent of
Public Instruction on the operations of public elementary and secondary  schools in this
state.
(2) The advisory group convened under this  section shall include the following nine
members:
(a) A representative from the region including Douglas,  Jackson, Josephine and Klamath
Counties.
(b) A representative  from the region including Baker, Grant, Harney, Lake, Malheur,
Morrow, Umatilla, Union and Wallowa Counties.
(c) A representative from Multnomah County.
(d) A representative from Washington County.
(e) A representative from Clackamas County.
(f) A  representative from the region including Clatsop, Columbia, Coos, Curry, Lincoln
and Tillamook Counties.
(g) A representative from the region including Crook,  Deschutes, Jefferson and Wheeler
Counties.
(h) A representative from the region including Benton, Lane, Linn, Marion,  Polk and
Yamhill Counties.
(i) A  representative from the region including Gilliam, Hood River, Sherman and Wasco
Counties.
(3) The advisory group shall meet at least six times each year.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 171.130 is amended to read:
171.130. (1) At any time in advance of any regular or  special session of the Legislative Assembly
fixed by the Legislative Counsel Committee, or at any time in advance of a  special session as may
be fixed by joint rules  of both houses of the Legislative Assembly, the following may file a proposed
legislative measure with the Legislative Counsel:
(a) Members who will serve in the session and members-elect.
(b) Interim and statutory committees of the Legislative Assembly.
(2) On or before December 15 of an even-numbered year, or at any time in  advance of a special
session as may be  fixed by joint rules of both houses of the Legislative Assembly, the following may
file a proposed legislative measure with the Legislative Counsel:
(a) The Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, to implement the fiscal recommendations
of the Governor contained in the Governor’s budget.
(b) The person who will serve as Governor during the session.
(c) The Secretary of State, the State Treasurer, the Attorney General , [ and] the Commissioner
of the Bureau of Labor and Industries  and the Superintendent of Public Instruction .
(d) The Judicial Department.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, a statewide elected official who  initially as-
sumes office in January of  an odd-numbered year may submit proposed measures for introduction
[2]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
by members or committees of the Legislative Assembly until the  calendar day designated by rules
of either house of the  Legislative Assembly. The exemption granted by this subsection to a newly
elected Governor does not apply to state agencies in the executive branch.
(4) On or before December 15 of an even-numbered year, a state agency may file a  proposed
legislative measure with the Legislative Counsel through a member or committee of the Legislative
Assembly.
(5) The Legislative Counsel shall  order each measure filed pursuant to subsections (1) to (4) of
this section prepared for  printing and may order the measure printed. If the person filing a measure
specifically requests in writing that the measure  be made available for distribution, the Legislative
Counsel shall order the measure printed and shall make copies of the printed  measure available for
distribution before the beginning of the session to  members and members-elect and to others upon
request.
(6) Copies  of all measures filed and prepared for printing or printed pursuant to this section
shall be forwarded by the  Legislative Counsel to the chief clerk of the house designated by the
person filing the measure for introduction.
(7) The costs of carrying out this section shall be paid out of the money appropriated for  the
expenses of that session of the Legislative Assembly for which the measure is to be printed.
(8) The Legislative Counsel Committee may adopt rules or policies  to accomplish the purpose
of this section.
(9) This section does not affect any law or  any rule of the Legislative Assembly or either house
thereof relating to the introduction of legislative measures.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 171.133, as amended by section 82,  chapter 281, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
171.133. (1) A state agency shall not cause a bill or measure to be  introduced before the Legis-
lative Assembly if the bill or measure has not been approved by the Governor.
(2) As used in ORS 171.130 and this section,  “state agency” means every state agency whose
costs are paid wholly or in part from funds held in the State Treasury, except:
(a) The Legislative Assembly, the courts and their officers and committees; and
(b) The Secretary of State, the State Treasurer, the Attorney General , [ and] the  Commissioner
of the Bureau of Labor and Industries  and the Superintendent of Public Instruction .
SECTION 9.
 ORS 171.735 is amended to read:
171.735. ORS 171.740 and 171.745 do not apply to the following persons:
(1) News media, or their employees or agents, that  in the ordinary course of business directly
or indirectly urge legislative action but that engage in no other activities in  connection with the
legislative action.
(2) Any legislative official acting in an official capacity.
(3) Any individual who does not receive compensation or reimbursement of expenses for  lobby-
ing, who limits lobbying activities solely to formal appearances to give testimony  before public ses-
sions of committees of the Legislative Assembly,  or public hearings of state agencies, and who, when
testifying, registers an appearance in the records of the committees or agencies.
(4) A person who does not:
(a) Agree to provide personal services for money  or any other consideration for the purpose of
lobbying;
(b) Spend more than an aggregate amount of 24  hours during any calendar quarter lobbying; and
(c) Spend an aggregate amount in excess of $100 lobbying during any calendar quarter.
[3]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) The Governor, chief of staff for the  Governor, deputy chief of staff for the Governor, legal
counsel to the Governor, deputy legal counsel to  the Governor, Secretary of State, Deputy Secretary
of State appointed pursuant to ORS 177.040, State Treasurer, Deputy  State Treasurer appointed
pursuant to ORS  178.060, chief of staff for the office of the State Treasurer, Attorney General,
Deputy Attorney General appointed pursuant to ORS 180.130, [ Deputy Superintendent  of Public In-
struction appointed pursuant to ORS 326.300, ] Superintendent of Public Instruction,  deputy su-
perintendents of public instruction appointed  pursuant to section 4 of this 2025 Act,
Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries, deputy commissioner of the Bureau  of Labor
and Industries appointed pursuant to ORS 651.060, members and staff of the Oregon Law Commission
who conduct the law revision program of the commission or any judge.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 173.130 is amended to read:
173.130. (1) The Legislative Counsel shall prepare or assist in the  preparation of legislative
measures when requested to do so by a member or committee of the Legislative Assembly.
(2) Upon the written request  of a state agency, the Legislative Counsel may prepare or assist
in the preparation of legislative measures that have been approved for preparation in writing  by the
Governor or the  Governor’s designated representative. The Legislative Counsel may also prepare
or assist in the preparation of legislative measures that are requested in writing by the  Judicial
Department, the Governor, the Secretary of State, the State  Treasurer, the Attorney General , [ or]
the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and  Industries  or the Superintendent of Public In-
struction. In accordance with ORS 283.110, the Legislative Counsel may charge the agency or offi-
cer for the services performed.
(3) The Legislative Counsel shall  give such consideration to and service concerning any measure
or other legislative matter before the Legislative Assembly as is requested by the House of  Repre-
sentatives, the Senate or any committee of the Legislative Assembly that has  the measure or other
matter under consideration.
(4) The Legislative Counsel, pursuant to the policies  and directions of the Legislative Counsel
Committee and in conformity with any applicable rules of the House of Representatives or  Senate,
shall perform or cause to be performed research service requested  by any member or committee of
the Legislative Assembly in connection with the performance of legislative functions. Research  as-
signments made by joint or concurrent resolution of the Legislative  Assembly shall be given priority
over other research requests received by the Legislative Counsel. The research service to  be per-
formed includes the administrative services  incident to the accomplishment of the research requests
or assignments.
(5) The Legislative Counsel shall give an opinion in writing upon  any question of law in which
the Legislative Assembly or any member  or committee of the Legislative Assembly may have an
interest when the Legislative Assembly or  any member or committee of the Legislative Assembly
requests the opinion. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and ORS  173.135, the
Legislative Counsel shall not give opinions or provide other legal services to persons or  agencies
other than the Legislative Assembly and members and committees of the Legislative Assembly.
(6) The Legislative Counsel may enter into contracts to carry out the functions  of the Legisla-
tive Counsel.
SECTION 11.  ORS 176.350 is amended to read:
176.350. (1) The Racial Justice Council is created within the Office of the Governor.
(2) The membership of the council consists of the Governor, as chairperson, and no  more than
40 additional members appointed by and serving at the pleasure of  the Governor, subject to the
[4]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
following requirements:
(a) Each member must have a  demonstrated commitment to racial equity, social and economic
justice and diversity and inclusion;
(b) Each member must have connections to, or experience working with, historically underserved
communities, particularly tribal communities, immigrants, refugees  and communities of Black or
Indigenous people or other people of color;
(c) Each member must have personal  or professional experience and knowledge in public policy,
criminal justice reform, police accountability, economic opportunity, housing, homelessness,  health
equity, behavioral health, education or research; and
(d) Appointments to the council must be made to ensure representation  of the racial, gender and
geographical diversity of Oregon.
(3) The Governor  may assign one or more members to serve as a liaison between the council
and the advocacy commissions.
(4)(a) The Governor shall establish committees to address policies of interest to the council. A
committee may address multiple policy areas.
(b) The Governor shall appoint each council  member to at least one committee. The Governor
may appoint additional individuals who are not members of  the council to serve as voting or non-
voting members of a committee, provided that:
(A) Public officials who serve in  the legislative or judicial branch may serve only as nonvoting
members of a committee; and
(B) Members of the Legislative Assembly may serve on a committee only if the committee  in-
cludes an equal number of members from each chamber of the Legislative Assembly.
(c) Committees shall report to the council. The council shall approve or disapprove recommen-
dations of a committee.
(d) Appointments to each committee must be made to  ensure representation of the racial, gender
and geographical diversity of Oregon.
(5) The term of  a member of the council is two years. Members are eligible for reappointment.
If there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make an  appointment to become immediately
effective for the unexpired term.
(6) Members of the council are not entitled to  compensation under ORS 292.495. The chair, in
the chair’s discretion, may reimburse members of the council as provided in ORS 292.495 for  actual
and necessary travel or other expenses incurred in  the performance of their duties as members of
the council.
(7) Official action by the council requires modified consensus of the members of the council.
(8) The council shall meet at times and places specified by the call of the chairperson.
(9) All agencies of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111,  are directed to assist the
council in the performance of its duties and, to the extent permitted  by laws relating to
confidentiality, to furnish such information and advice as  the council considers necessary to perform
its duties.
(10) At least once per year, the  council shall report to the Legislative Assembly, the Secretary
of State, the Bureau of  Labor and Industries, the State Treasurer , [ and] the Attorney General  and
the Superintendent of  Public Instruction . The report must describe strategies designed to
institutionalize racial justice into the conduct of state business  and may include other matters per-
tinent to dismantling systemic and institutional racism.
(11) As used in this section:
[5]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) “Advocacy commission” means the  Commission on Asian and Pacific Islander Affairs, the
Commission on Black Affairs and the Commission on Hispanic Affairs.
(b) “Racial justice” means systematic fair treatment of people of all races that results  in equi-
table opportunities and outcomes for all people.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 240.205 is amended to read:
240.205. The unclassified service shall comprise:
(1) One executive officer and one secretary for each board or  commission, the members of which
are elected officers or are appointed by the Governor.
(2) The director of each department of state government, each full-time salaried head of a state
agency required by  law to be appointed by the Governor and each full-time salaried member of a
board or commission required by law to be appointed by the Governor.
(3) The administrator of each division within a department of  state government required by law
to be appointed by the director of the department with the approval of the Governor.
(4) Principal assistants and deputies and one private secretary  for each executive or adminis-
trative officer  specified in ORS 240.200 (1) and in subsections (1) to (3) of this section. “Deputy”
means the deputy  or deputies to an executive or administrative officer listed in subsections (1) to
(3) of  this section who is authorized to exercise that officer’s authority upon absence of the officer.
“Principal assistant” means  a manager of a major agency organizational component who reports
directly to an executive or  administrative officer listed in subsections (1) to (3) of this section or
deputy and who is designated as such by that executive or administrative officer with  the approval
of the Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(5) Employees in  the Governor’s office and the principal assistant and private secretary in the
Secretary of State’s division.
(6) The director, principals, instructors and teachers in the school operated under ORS 346.010.
(7) Apprentice trainees only during the prescribed length of their course of training.
(8) Licensed physicians  and dentists employed in their professional capacities and student
nurses, interns, and patient or adult in custody help in state institutions.
(9) Lawyers employed in their professional capacities.
(10) All members of the Oregon State Police appointed under ORS 181A.050.
[(11) The Deputy Superintendent of  Public Instruction appointed under ORS 326.300 and associate
superintendents in the Department of Education. ]
(11) Deputy superintendents of public instruction appointed under section 4  of this 2025
Act and assistant superintendents in the Department of Education.
(12) Temporary seasonal farm laborers  engaged in single phases of agricultural production or
harvesting.
(13) Any individual employed and paid from federal funds received under a federal program  in-
tended primarily to alleviate unemployment. However, persons employed  under this subsection shall
be treated as classified employees for purposes of ORS 243.650 to 243.809.
(14) Managers, department heads, directors, producers and announcers of the state radio  and
television network.
(15) Employees, including managers, of  the foreign trade offices of the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department located outside the country.
(16) Any other position designated by law as unclassified.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 244.042 is amended to read:
244.042. (1) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, a public  official may
[6]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
not solicit or receive, whether directly or indirectly, honoraria for the public official or  any member
of the household of the public official if the honoraria are solicited or received  in connection with
the official duties of the public official.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a candidate may not solicit or receive,
whether directly or indirectly, honoraria for  the candidate or any member of the household of the
candidate  if  the honoraria are solicited or received in connection with the official duties of the
public office for which the person is a candidate.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, this section does not prohibit:
(a) The solicitation or receipt of  an honorarium or a certificate, plaque, commemorative token
or other item with a value of $50 or less; or
(b) The solicitation or receipt of an honorarium for services performed in relation to the  private
profession, occupation, avocation or expertise of the public official or candidate.
(4)(a) The Governor, First Partner, Secretary  of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General ,
[and] Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries and Superintendent of Public In-
struction may not solicit or receive an honorarium, money or  any other consideration, as defined
in ORS 171.725, for any speaking engagement or presentation.
(b) This subsection does not prevent a public  official listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection
from receiving any food, beverage,  travel or lodging expenses otherwise authorized by this chapter
for a speaking engagement or presentation.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 244.050 is amended to read:
244.050. (1) On or  before April 15 of each year the following persons shall file with the Oregon
Government Ethics Commission a verified statement of economic interest as required  under this
chapter:
(a) The Governor, Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General, Commissioner  of the
Bureau of Labor and  Industries, Superintendent of Public Instruction,  district attorneys and
members of the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Any judicial officer, including justices of the peace and municipal judges,  except any pro tem
judicial officer who does not otherwise serve as a judicial officer.
(c) Any candidate for a public office designated in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(d) The Deputy Attorney General.
(e) The Deputy Secretary of State.
(f) The Legislative Administrator, the Legislative Counsel, the Legislative Fiscal Officer, the
Legislative Policy and Research Director, the  Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the House
of Representatives and the Legislative Equity Officer.
(g) The  president and vice presidents, or their administrative equivalents, in each public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002.
(h) The following state officers:
(A) Adjutant General.
(B) Director of Agriculture.
(C) Manager of State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(D) Water Resources Director.
(E) Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.
(F) Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(G) State Fish and Wildlife Director.
(H) State Forester.
[7]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(I) State Geologist.
(J) Director of Human Services.
(K) Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(L) Director of the Department of State Lands.
(M) State Librarian.
(N) Administrator of the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
(O) Superintendent of State Police.
(P) Director of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(Q) Director of Department of Revenue.
(R) Director of Transportation.
(S) Public Utility Commissioner.
(T) Director of Veterans’ Affairs.
(U) Executive director of Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(V) Director of the State Department of Energy.
(W) Director and each assistant director of the Oregon State Lottery.
(X) Director of the Department of Corrections.
(Y) Director of the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(Z) Executive director of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(AA) Director of the Oregon Business Development Department.
(BB) Director of the Oregon Department of Emergency Management.
(CC) Director of the Employment Department.
(DD) State Fire Marshal.
(EE) Chief of staff for the Governor.
(FF) Director of the Housing and Community Services Department.
(GG) State Court Administrator.
(HH) Director of the Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(II) Board chairperson of the Land Use Board of Appeals.
(JJ) State Marine Director.
(KK) Executive director of the Oregon Racing Commission.
(LL) State Parks and Recreation Director.
(MM) Executive director of the Oregon Public Defense Commission.
(NN) Chairperson of the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(OO) Director of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(PP) Executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(QQ) Executive director of the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board.
(RR) Director of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(SS) Director of the Oregon Health Authority.
[(TT) Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction. ]
(i) The First Partner, the legal counsel, the deputy  legal counsel and all policy advisors within
the Governor’s office.
(j) Every elected city or county official.
(k) Every member of a city or county planning, zoning or development commission.
(L) The chief executive officer of a city or county who performs  the duties of manager or prin-
cipal administrator of the city or county.
(m) Members of local government boundary commissions formed under ORS 199.410 to 199.519.
[8]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(n) Every member of a governing body of a metropolitan service  district and the auditor and
executive officer thereof.
(o) Each member of the board of directors of the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(p) The chief administrative officer and the financial  officer of each common and union high
school district, education service district and community college district.
(q) Every member of the following state boards, commissions and councils:
(A) Governing board of the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries.
(B) Oregon Business Development Commission.
(C) State Board of Education.
(D) Environmental Quality Commission.
(E) Fish and Wildlife Commission of the State of Oregon.
(F) State Board of Forestry.
(G) Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(H) Oregon Health Policy Board.
(I) Oregon Investment Council.
(J) Land Conservation and Development Commission.
(K) Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
(L) Oregon Short Term Fund Board.
(M) State Marine Board.
(N) Mass transit district boards.
(O) Energy Facility Siting Council.
(P) Board of Commissioners of the Port of Portland.
(Q) Employment Relations Board.
(R) Public Employees Retirement Board.
(S) Oregon Racing Commission.
(T) Oregon Transportation Commission.
(U) Water Resources Commission.
(V) Workers’ Compensation Board.
(W) Oregon Facilities Authority.
(X) Oregon State Lottery Commission.
(Y) Pacific Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council.
(Z) Columbia River Gorge Commission.
(AA) Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors.
(BB) Capitol Planning Commission.
(CC) Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(DD) Oregon Growth Board.
(EE) Early Learning Council.
(FF) The Oversight and Accountability Council.
(r) The following officers of the State Treasurer:
(A) Deputy State Treasurer.
(B) Chief of staff for the office of the State Treasurer.
(C) Director of the Investment Division.
(s) Every member of the board of commissioners of a port governed by ORS 777.005 to 777.725
or 777.915 to 777.953.
(t) Every member of the  board of directors of an authority created under ORS 441.525 to 441.595.
[9]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(u) Every member of a governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(v) Every member of the district school board of a common school district or union  high school
district.
(w) Every member of the board of directors of an authority  created under ORS 465.600 to
465.621.
(2) By April 15 next after the date an appointment takes effect, every appointed public official
on a board or commission  listed in subsection (1) of this section shall file with the Oregon Govern-
ment Ethics Commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS 244.060,  244.070
and 244.090.
(3) By  April 15 next after the filing deadline for the primary election, each candidate described
in subsection (1) of this section shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest  as
required under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(4) Not later than the 40th day before the date of the statewide general election,  each candidate
described in subsection (1) of this section who will appear on the statewide  general election ballot
and who was not required to file a statement  of economic interest under subsections (1) to (3) of this
section shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest as required under  ORS
244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(5) Subsections (1) to (3) of this section apply only to persons who  are incumbent, elected or
appointed public officials as of April 15 and to persons who are candidates on April 15.
(6) If a statement required to be filed under this section has not been received by  the commis-
sion within five days after the date the statement is  due, the commission shall notify the public of-
ficial or candidate and give the public official or candidate not less than 15 days to comply with  the
requirements of this section. If the public official or candidate fails to comply by the date set by  the
commission, the commission may impose a civil penalty as provided in ORS 244.350.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 249.002 is amended to read:
249.002. As used in this chapter:
(1) “Candidate” means an individual whose name is or is expected to  be printed on the official
ballot or a write-in candidate.
(2) “County clerk” means the county clerk or the county official in charge of elections.
(3) “Elector”  means an individual qualified to vote under Article II, section 2, Oregon Consti-
tution.
(4) “Judge” means judge of the Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, circuit court  or the Oregon
Tax Court.
(5) “Member” means an individual who is registered as being affiliated with the political party.
(6) “Minor political party” means a political party  that has qualified as a minor political party
under ORS 248.008.
(7) “Nonpartisan office” means the office of judge, Commissioner of the Bureau  of Labor and
Industries, Superintendent of Public Instruction,  any  elected office of a metropolitan service
district under ORS chapter 268, justice of the peace, county clerk,  county assessor, county surveyor,
county treasurer, county judge who exercises judicial functions,  sheriff, district attorney or any of-
fice designated nonpartisan by a home rule charter.
(8) “Prospective petition” means the information, except signatures and other identification  of
petition signers, required to be contained in a completed petition.
(9) “Public office” means any national, state, county, city or district office or position, except
a political party office, filled by the electors.
[10]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(10) “State office” means  Governor, Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General,
Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries, Superintendent of Public Instruction, judge,
state Senator, state Representative or district attorney.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 249.056 is amended to read:
249.056. (1) At the time of filing a declaration of candidacy  a candidate for the following offices
shall pay to the officer with whom the declaration is filed the following fee:
(a) United States Senator, $150.
(b) Governor, Secretary of State, State  Treasurer, Attorney General, Commissioner of the Bu-
reau of Labor and Industries,  Superintendent of Public Instruction,  Representative in  Congress,
judge of the Supreme Court, Court of Appeals or Oregon Tax Court, or executive officer or auditor
of a metropolitan service district, $100.
(c) County officer, district  attorney, county judge who exercises judicial functions or circuit
court judge, $50.
(d) State Senator or Representative or councilor of a metropolitan service district  under ORS
chapter 268, $25.
(2) No filing  fee shall be required of persons filing a declaration of candidacy for precinct com-
mitteeperson or justice of the peace.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 249.215 is amended to read:
249.215. (1) If a vacancy occurs in a state office before the 61st day  before the first general
election to be held during that term of office, the remaining two years of the  term of the state office
shall be filled by the electors at that general election.
(2) The remaining two years of  the term of the state office shall commence on the second
Monday in January following  the general election. Any appointment made to fill the vacancy shall
expire when a successor to the office is elected and qualified.
(3) Candidates for  the remaining two years of the term of the state office under this section shall
be nominated as provided in this chapter, with major political parties following the procedure  set
forth in ORS 249.200, except as follows:
(a) A minor political party, by party rule,  or an assembly of electors or individual electors, may
select a nominee; and
(b) The Secretary of State shall  accept certificates of nomination and notifications of nominees
filed with  the secretary pursuant to a schedule for filing set by the secretary, but in any case not
later than the 62nd day before the first general election.
(4) As used  in this section, “state office” means the office of Governor, Secretary of State, State
Treasurer, Attorney General , [ and] Commissioner of the  Bureau of Labor and Industries  and Su-
perintendent of Public Instruction .
SECTION 18. ORS 251.170, as amended by section 3,  chapter 55, Oregon Laws 2024, and section
1, chapter 56, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
251.170. (1) The translation of a state  voters’ pamphlet or county voters’ pamphlet required un-
der ORS 251.167 shall be made in the manner described in this section.
(2) For each state voters’ pamphlet and county voters’ pamphlet mailed to residents of a county,
the Secretary of State shall have the following  portions of the voters’ pamphlet professionally
translated into each language for which a translation is required under ORS 251.167:
(a) Any official statement or  communication made by the Secretary of State, county clerk, filing
office or other public  elections official, including any information described in ORS 251.026 or
251.315 (1)(a) to (d) and (g) and any other information regarding services offered by  elections offices,
[11]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
how to cast a ballot and key dates for the election;
(b) The ballot title for each measure;
(c) The explanatory statement for each measure;
(d) The financial estimate for each measure and  any statement prepared for a measure under
ORS 250.125;
(e) Any racial and ethnic impact statement prepared for a measure under ORS 137.685;
(f) Any statement submitted for a measure by a citizen panel under ORS 250.141; and
(g) Except  an argument for a measure prepared by the Legislative Assembly under ORS 251.245,
any other statement for a measure created by a public body as defined in ORS 174.109.
(3) In addition to the materials that the Secretary of State  is required to have professionally
translated under  subsection (2) of this section, the Secretary of State shall allow to be included in
the translated version of each state voters’ pamphlet that is made  available on the website of the
Secretary of State or of a county under ORS 251.167:
(a) Translations of a candidate statement submitted under ORS 251.065, provided that:
(A) The candidate is a candidate for federal or statewide office;
(B) The translation is filed by a candidate  or the agent of a candidate described in subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph;
(C) Neither the translation nor the candidate statement submitted under  ORS 251.065 is rejected
under ORS 251.055;
(D) The candidate statement meets the requirements of a candidate statement set  forth in this
chapter; and
(E) Any translation filed under this paragraph is in one of the 10 most commonly  spoken lan-
guages in this  state or of any county the office represents, other than English, as listed by the
Secretary of State under ORS 251.167.
(b) Translations of an argument in support of  or in opposition to a state measure filed under
ORS 251.255, provided that:
(A) The translation is filed by the person who filed the argument in support of or in  opposition
to a state measure under ORS 251.255;
(B) Neither the translation nor the argument in support of or in opposition to  a state measure
filed under ORS 251.255 is rejected under ORS 251.055;
(C) The statement in support of or in opposition to a state measure meets the  requirements of
a statement in support of or in opposition to a state measure set forth in this chapter; and
(D) Any translation filed under this paragraph is in one of the 10  most commonly spoken lan-
guages in this state or of any county in which the measure will be  voted on, other than English, as
listed by the Secretary of State under ORS 251.167.
(c) Translations of  any argument for a measure prepared by the Legislative Assembly under ORS
251.245 submitted by the Legislative Assembly, provided that any translation filed under this para-
graph is in one of the 10 most commonly spoken languages  in this state or of any county in which
the measure will be voted on,  other than English, as listed by the Secretary of State under ORS
251.167.
(4)(a) A  translation that is permitted or required under this section is not required to be iden-
tical in words to the original version but must be consistent with the meaning of the original  ver-
sion.
(b) A translation is not subject to any limitations on the number of words allowed set  forth in
this chapter.
[12]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) A county may at its own expense make or accept for publication on  the county’s website,
as part of a translated voters’ pamphlet required under ORS 251.167, any portion  of a state or
county voters’ pamphlet that is not described in this section.
(6) The Secretary of State:
(a) May adopt any rules necessary to implement this section; and
(b) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, is responsible for all costs  necessary to
comply with this section.
(7) As used in this section, “statewide office”  means Governor, Secretary of State, State Treas-
urer, Attorney General, Commissioner of  the Bureau of Labor and Industries, Superintendent of
Public Instruction,  or judge on  the Oregon Supreme Court, the Oregon Court of Appeals or the
Oregon Tax Court.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 254.005 is amended to read:
254.005. As used in this chapter:
(1) “Ballot”  means any material on which votes may be cast for candidates or measures. In the
case of a recall election, “ballot” includes material posted in  a voting compartment or delivered to
an elector by mail.
(2) “Chief elections officer” means the:
(a) Secretary of State, regarding a  candidate for a state office or an office to be voted on in the
state at large or in a congressional district, or a measure to be voted on in the state at large.
(b) County clerk, regarding a candidate for a county office, or a measure to be voted on  in a
county  only.
(c) City clerk, auditor or recorder, regarding a candidate for  a city office, or a measure to be
voted on in a city only.
(3) “County clerk” means the county clerk or the county official in charge of elections.
(4) “Elector” means an individual qualified to vote under section 2, Article II, Oregon  Consti-
tution.
(5) “Major political party” means a  political party that has qualified as a major political party
under ORS 248.006.
(6) “Measure” includes any of the following submitted to the people  for their approval or re-
jection at an election:
(a) A proposed law.
(b) An Act or part of an Act of the Legislative Assembly.
(c) A revision of or amendment to the Oregon Constitution.
(d) Local, special or municipal legislation.
(e) A proposition or question.
(7) “Minor political party” means a political party  that has qualified as a minor political party
under ORS 248.008.
(8) “Nonpartisan office” means the office of judge of the Supreme  Court, Court of Appeals, cir-
cuit court or the Oregon Tax Court, Commissioner of  the Bureau of Labor and Industries,  Super-
intendent of  Public Instruction,  any elected office of a metropolitan service district under ORS
chapter 268, justice of the peace, county clerk,  county assessor, county surveyor, county treasurer,
county judge who exercises  judicial functions, sheriff, district attorney or any office designated
nonpartisan by a home rule charter.
(9) “Prospective petition” means the information, except signatures and other identification  of
petition signers, required to be contained in a completed petition.
[13]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(10) “Regular district election” means the election held  each year for the purpose of electing
members of a district board as defined in ORS 255.005 (2).
(11) “Vote tally system” means one or  more pieces of equipment necessary to examine and tally
automatically the marked ballots.
(12) “Voting machine” means any device that will record every vote cast  on candidates and
measures and that will either internally or externally total all votes cast on that device.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 254.650 is amended to read:
254.650. (1) If the Secretary of State determines that a  vacancy exists in the nomination of a
candidate of a major political  party for state office, that the vacancy is due to the death of the
candidate and that the vacancy occurred after the 47th day before the date of the general  election:
(a) The election for that state office may not be held at the general election;
(b) The county clerks may not count ballots cast for  candidates for that state office at the
general election; and
(c) The Secretary of State shall order a special election as provided in ORS 254.655.
(2) The candidates listed on the ballot at the special election shall be:
(a) The candidates who were listed  on the general election ballot, other than the candidate
whose nomination became vacant; and
(b) The candidate selected to fill  the vacancy in the nomination as provided in ORS 249.190 or
249.205.
(3) As used in this section “state office” means the office  of Governor, Secretary of State, State
Treasurer, Attorney General, Superintendent of Public  Instruction,  state Senator or state Rep-
resentative.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 258.036 is amended to read:
258.036. (1) Not later than the 40th day after the election or  the seventh day after completion
of a recount of votes  cast in connection with the election, any person authorized to contest a result
of the election may file a petition of contest. The petition shall be filed with:
(a) The Circuit Court for Marion County if the petition involves a state  measure, a candidate
for election to the office of elector of President and Vice President of the United  States or a can-
didate for nomination  or election to the office of United States Senator, United States Represen-
tative in Congress, Governor,  Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General, Commissioner
of the Bureau  of Labor and Industries , Superintendent of Public Instruction or a position of judge
on the Oregon Supreme Court, the Oregon Court of Appeals or the Oregon Tax Court.
(b) The circuit court for the county where a  majority of the electors in the electoral district
reside if the petition involves a candidate  for nomination or election to the office of state Senator,
state Representative, circuit court judge or district attorney.
(c) The circuit court for the county in which the filing officer is located  if the petition involves
a candidate for nomination  or election to county, city or district office or a county, city or district
measure. If a district is located in more than one county, the petition  shall be filed with the circuit
court for the county in which the administrative office of the district is located.
(d) The circuit court  for the county in which the filing officer authorized to order the recall
election is located if the petition involves the recall of a public officer.
(2) The petition shall be verified in the manner required  for verification of complaints in civil
cases and shall specify:
(a) The cause of the contest; and
(b) The names of all contestees.
[14]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 22.
 ORS 258.055 is amended to read:
258.055. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, when a contestant files a peti-
tion of contest with the  circuit court described under ORS 258.036, the contestant shall, within three
business days of filing the petition, publish a notice stating that the petition  has been filed and
identifying the date of the deadline described in this subsection for filing a motion to intervene.  The
notice must be published at least  once in the next available issue of a newspaper of general circu-
lation published in the county where the proceeding is pending. Jurisdiction over the election
contest shall be complete within 10 days after the notice is published as provided in this subsection.
Any person interested may at any time before the expiration of the 10 days appear and contest  the
validity of the proceeding, or of any of the acts or things enumerated in the proceeding.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if the contest involves:
(a) A state measure.
(b) The election of a candidate to the office of elector of President and Vice President of the
United States.
(c) The nomination or election  of a candidate to the office of United States Senator, United
States Representative in Congress, Governor, Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney  General,
Commissioner of the Bureau  of Labor and Industries , Superintendent of Public Instruction  or a
position of judge on the Oregon Supreme Court, the Oregon Court of Appeals or  the Oregon Tax
Court.
(d) The recall of a person from the office of Governor, Secretary of State,  State Treasurer, At-
torney General, Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries , Superintendent of Public
Instruction or a position of judge on the Oregon Supreme Court, the Oregon Court of Appeals  or
the Oregon Tax Court.
(3) Not later than two business days after the contestant files a petition of  contest with the
circuit court, the contestant shall serve a copy of the petition by certified mail on  each contestee.
If the Secretary of State or county clerk is not  a contestee, not later than one business day after
the contestant files a petition of contest with the  circuit court, the contestant shall file a copy of
the petition with:
(a) The Secretary of State if the petition involves a candidate for state  office, the recall of a
person from state office or a state measure; or
(b) The county clerk if the petition involves  a candidate for county, city or district office, the
recall of a person from county, city or district office or a county, city  or district measure. As used
in this paragraph, “county clerk” includes the county clerk of the county in which  the administra-
tive office of a city or district is located regarding a measure, a  recall or a candidate for an office
to be voted on in a city or district located in more than one county.
(4) The circuit court shall fix a time for the hearing by the circuit court of the  contest pro-
ceeding, and not later than the fifth day before the hearing shall give written notice of  the hearing
to each party to the proceeding. In  fixing the time for the hearing, the court shall consider the dates
set in any notice published under subsection (1) of this section and the dates of  service on the
contestees. The contest  proceeding shall take precedence over all other business on the circuit court
docket.
(5) The circuit  court shall hear and determine the proceeding without a jury and shall issue
written findings of law and fact. The practice and procedure otherwise applicable to civil cases
shall govern the proceeding, except that the contestant has the burden  of proof by clear and con-
vincing  evidence.
[15]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 23.
 ORS 258.150 is amended to read:
258.150. (1) The Secretary of State shall be  responsible for ensuring that the procedures to be
used in conducting election recounts assure an accurate recount in the shortest time at the least
expense. Whenever demands are filed for a recount  of a vote for both a measure and a nomination
or office, or for more than one measure, nomination or office, the  Secretary of State may determine
the most appropriate procedure to be used in conducting the recounts simultaneously.
(2)(a) In all election recounts for the office of President and Vice  President of the United States,
United States Senate, United States House of Representatives,  Governor, Secretary of State, State
Treasurer, Attorney General, Commissioner of  the Bureau of Labor and Industries, Superintendent
of Public Instruction,  Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, Oregon Tax  Court, Circuit Court, Oregon
Senate, Oregon House of Representatives and  statewide measures, the Secretary of State shall en-
sure that county elections officials conduct the recount in a manner that  is consistent, transparent,
accurate and in accordance with all applicable laws.
(b) The county clerk in each county involved in a recount described in paragraph (a)  of this
subsection shall provide notice to the Secretary of State of the date, time and  location of the re-
count and information regarding all aspects of the recount process, including:
(A) The appointment of counting boards;
(B) The conditions for recount observers;
(C) The manner in which voter intent is determined; and
(D) The counting of ballots.
(c) The Secretary of State shall review  the notices and actual recount processes described in
paragraph (b) of this subsection to ensure consistency across counties  involved in the recount to the
degree reasonably practicable. The  Secretary of State shall be responsible for the certification of the
results of the election or  nomination as reported by the county clerks in the counties involved in
the recount.
(d) The Secretary of State may adopt rules necessary to implement this subsection.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 260.005 is amended to read:
260.005. As used in this chapter:
(1)(a) “Candidate” means:
(A) An individual whose name is printed on a ballot, for whom a declaration  of candidacy,
nominating petition or certificate of nomination to public office has been filed or whose  name is
expected to be or has been presented, with the individual’s consent, for nomination or  election to
public office;
(B) An individual who has solicited or received and accepted a contribution, made an  expendi-
ture, or given consent to an individual,  organization, political party or political committee to solicit
or receive and accept a contribution or  make an expenditure on the individual’s behalf to secure
nomination or election to any public office at any time, whether  or not the office for which the in-
dividual will seek nomination or election is  known when the solicitation is made, the contribution
is received and retained or the expenditure is made, and whether or not the name of the  individual
is printed on a ballot; or
(C) A public office holder against whom a recall petition has been completed and filed.
(b) For purposes of this section and ORS 260.035 to 260.156, “candidate” does not include a
candidate for the office of precinct committeeperson.
(2) “Committee director” means  any person who directly and substantially participates in
decision-making on behalf of a political committee concerning the solicitation or expenditure of
[16]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
funds and the support of or opposition to candidates or  measures. The officers of a political party
shall be considered the  directors of any political party committee of that party, unless otherwise
provided in the party’s bylaws.
(3) Except as provided in ORS 260.007, “contribute” or “contribution” includes:
(a) The payment, loan, gift, forgiving of indebtedness, or  furnishing without equivalent compen-
sation or consideration, of money, services other than personal services for which  no compensation
is asked or given, supplies, equipment or any other thing of value:
(A) For the purpose of influencing an election  for public office or an election on a measure, or
of reducing the debt of a candidate for nomination or election to  public office or the debt of a pol-
itical committee; or
(B) To or on behalf of a candidate, political committee or measure; and
(b) The excess value of a contribution made for compensation or  consideration of less than
equivalent value.
(4) “Controlled committee”  means a political committee that, in connection with the making of
contributions or expenditures:
(a) Is controlled directly or indirectly by a candidate or a controlled committee; or
(b) Acts jointly with a candidate or controlled committee.
(5) “Controlled directly or indirectly by a candidate” means:
(a) The candidate, the  candidate’s agent, a member of the candidate’s immediate family or any
other political committee that the  candidate controls has a significant influence on the actions or
decisions of the political committee; or
(b) The candidate’s principal  campaign committee and the political committee both have the
candidate or a member of the candidate’s immediate family as a treasurer or director.
(6) “County clerk” means the county clerk or the county official in charge of elections.
(7) “Elector” means an  individual qualified to vote under Article II, section 2, of the Oregon
Constitution.
(8) Except as provided in ORS 260.007, “expend”  or “expenditure” includes the payment or fur-
nishing of  money or anything of value or the incurring or repayment of indebtedness or obligation
by or on behalf of a candidate, political committee  or person in consideration for any services,
supplies, equipment or other thing of value performed or furnished for any reason, including  support
of or opposition to a candidate, political committee or measure, or for reducing  the debt of a can-
didate for nomination or election  to public office. “Expenditure” also includes contributions made
by a candidate or political committee to or on behalf of any other  candidate or political committee.
(9) “Filing officer” means:
(a) The Secretary of State:
(A) Regarding a candidate for public office;
(B) Regarding a statement required to be filed under ORS 260.118;
(C) Regarding any measure; or
(D) Regarding any political committee.
(b) In the case of an irrigation district formed under ORS chapter 545, “filing officer” means:
(A) The county clerk, regarding any candidate for office or any measure at an  irrigation district
formation election where the proposed district is situated wholly in one county;
(B) The county clerk of  the county in which the office of the secretary of the proposed irrigation
district will be located, regarding any candidate for office or any measure at an  irrigation district
formation election where the proposed district is situated in more than one county; or
[17]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) The secretary of  the irrigation district for any election other than an irrigation district
formation election.
(10) “Independent expenditure” means an expenditure by a person for a communication in  sup-
port of or in opposition  to a clearly identified candidate or measure that is not made with the co-
operation or with the prior consent of, or in consultation with, or at the request  or suggestion of,
a candidate or any agent or authorized committee of the candidate, or any political committee  or
agent of a political committee supporting or opposing a measure. For purposes of this subsection:
(a) “Agent” means any person who has:
(A) Actual oral or written authority, either express or implied, to make or to authorize  the
making of expenditures on behalf of a candidate or on behalf of a political  committee supporting or
opposing a measure; or
(B) Been placed in a position within  the campaign organization where it would reasonably ap-
pear that in the ordinary course of campaign-related  activities the person may authorize expen-
ditures.
(b)(A) “Clearly identified” means, with respect to candidates:
(i) The name of the candidate involved appears;
(ii) A photograph or drawing of the candidate appears; or
(iii) The identity of the candidate is apparent by unambiguous reference.
(B) “Clearly identified” means, with respect to measures:
(i) The ballot number of the measure appears;
(ii) A description of the measure’s subject or effect appears; or
(iii) The identity of the measure is apparent by unambiguous reference.
(c) “Communication in support of or in opposition to a clearly identified candidate or measure”
means:
(A)(i) The communication, when taken  as a whole and with limited reference to external events,
such as the  proximity to the election, could only be interpreted by a reasonable person as containing
advocacy for the  election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate for nomination or election to
public office, or the passage or defeat of a clearly identified measure; and
(ii) The electoral portion of the communication is unmistakable, unambiguous and suggestive  of
only one meaning; or
(B)(i) The communication involves aggregate expenditures of more than $250 by a person;
(ii) The communication refers to a clearly identified  candidate or measure that will appear on
the ballot or to a political party; and
(iii) The  communication is published and disseminated to the relevant electorate within 60 cal-
endar days before a primary election, 120 calendar days  before a general election or 90 calendar
days before an election other than a primary election or a general election.
(d) “Made with the cooperation or with the  prior consent of, or in consultation with, or at the
request or suggestion of, a candidate  or any agent or authorized committee of the candidate, or any
political committee or agent of a political committee supporting or opposing a measure”:
(A) Means any arrangement,  coordination or direction by the candidate or the candidate’s agent,
or by any political committee or  agent of a political committee supporting or opposing a measure,
prior to the publication, distribution, display  or broadcast of the communication. An expenditure
shall be presumed to be so made when it is:
(i) Based on information about the plans, projects or needs of  the candidate, or of the political
committee supporting or opposing a measure, and  provided to the expending person by the candidate
[18]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or by the  candidate’s agent, or by any political committee or agent of a political committee sup-
porting or opposing a measure, with a view toward having an expenditure made; or
(ii) Made by or through any person who is or has been authorized to raise or expend  funds, who
is or has been an officer of  a political committee authorized by the candidate or by a political
committee or agent of  a political committee supporting or opposing a measure, or who is or has been
receiving any form of compensation or reimbursement from  the candidate, the candidate’s principal
campaign committee or agent or from  any political committee or agent of a political committee
supporting or opposing a measure.
(B) Does not mean providing to the expending person  upon request a copy of this chapter or any
rules adopted by the Secretary of State relating to independent expenditures.
(11) “Initiative petition” means a petition to initiate a measure for  which a prospective petition
has been filed but that is not yet a measure.
(12) “Judge” means judge of  the Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, circuit court or the Oregon
Tax Court.
(13) “Mass mailing” means  more than 200 substantially similar pieces of mail, but does not in-
clude a form letter or  other mail that is sent in response to an unsolicited request, letter or other
inquiry.
(14) “Measure” includes any of the following submitted to the  people for their approval or re-
jection at an election:
(a) A proposed law.
(b) An Act or part of an Act of the Legislative Assembly.
(c) A revision of or amendment to the Oregon Constitution.
(d) Local, special or municipal legislation.
(e) A proposition or question.
(15) “Occupation” means:
(a) The nature of an individual’s principal business; and
(b) If  the individual is employed by another person, the business name and address, by city and
state, of the employer.
(16) “Person” means an individual, corporation, limited liability company, labor  organization,
association, firm, partnership, joint stock company, club, organization or  other combination of indi-
viduals having collective capacity.
(17) “Petition committee” means an initiative, referendum or  recall petition committee organized
under ORS 260.118.
(18) “Political committee” means a combination of two or more individuals, or a person  other
than an individual, that has:
(a) Received a contribution for the purpose  of supporting or opposing a candidate, measure or
political party; or
(b) Made an expenditure for the purpose of supporting or opposing  a candidate, measure or
political party. For purposes of this paragraph, an expenditure does not include:
(A) A contribution to a candidate or political committee that is required to report  the contri-
bution on a statement filed under ORS 260.057 or 260.076 or a certificate filed under  ORS 260.112;
or
(B) An independent expenditure for which a statement is required to be  filed by a person under
ORS 260.044.
(19) “Public office” means any  national, state, county, district, city office or position, except a
[19]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
political party office, that is filled by the electors.
(20) “Recall petition”  means a petition to recall a public officer for which a prospective petition
has been filed but that is not yet a measure.
(21) “Referendum petition” means a petition to refer  a measure for which a prospective petition
has been filed but that is not yet a measure.
(22) “Regular district election” means the regular district election described in ORS 255.335.
(23) “State office” means the office of Governor,  Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney
General, Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor  and Industries, Superintendent of Public Instruc-
tion, state Senator, state Representative, judge or district attorney.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 260.005, as amended by section 10, chapter 9, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
260.005. As used in this chapter:
(1)(a) “Candidate” means:
(A) An individual whose name is printed on a ballot, for whom a declaration  of candidacy,
nominating petition or certificate of nomination to public office has been filed or whose  name is
expected to be or has been presented, with the individual’s consent, for nomination or  election to
public office;
(B) An individual who has solicited or received and accepted a contribution, made an  expendi-
ture, or given consent to an individual,  organization, political party or political committee to solicit
or receive and accept a contribution or  make an expenditure on the individual’s behalf to secure
nomination or election to any public office at any time, whether  or not the office for which the in-
dividual will seek nomination or election is  known when the solicitation is made, the contribution
is received and retained or the expenditure is made, and whether or not the name of the  individual
is printed on a ballot; or
(C) A public office holder against whom a recall petition has been completed and filed.
(b) For purposes of this section and ORS 260.035 to 260.156, “candidate” does not include a
candidate for the office of precinct committeeperson.
(2) “Committee director” means  any person who directly and substantially participates in
decision-making on behalf of a political committee concerning the solicitation or expenditure of
funds and the support of or opposition to candidates or  measures. The officers of a political party
shall be considered the  directors of any political party committee of that party, unless otherwise
provided in the party’s bylaws.
(3) Except as provided in ORS 260.007, “contribute” or “contribution” includes:
(a) The payment, loan, gift, forgiving of indebtedness, or  furnishing without equivalent compen-
sation or consideration, of money, services other than personal services for which  no compensation
is asked or given, supplies, equipment or any other thing of value:
(A) For the purpose of influencing an election  for public office or an election on a measure, or
of reducing the debt of a candidate for nomination or election to  public office or the debt of a pol-
itical committee; or
(B) To or on behalf of a candidate, political committee or measure;
(b) The excess value of a contribution made for compensation or  consideration of less than
equivalent value; and
(c) An expenditure by a person for a communication in  support of or in opposition to a clearly
identified candidate or measure that is made with the cooperation or with the prior consent of, or
in consultation with, or at the request or  suggestion of, a candidate or any agent or authorized
[20]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
committee of the candidate, or any political committee or agent of a political committee supporting
or opposing a measure.
(4) “Controlled committee” means a political committee that, in connection with the  making of
contributions or expenditures:
(a) Is controlled directly or indirectly by a candidate or a controlled committee; or
(b) Acts jointly with a candidate or controlled committee.
(5) “Controlled directly or indirectly by a candidate” means:
(a) The candidate, the candidate’s agent, a member of the candidate’s immediate  family or any
other political committee that the candidate controls has a significant influence  on the actions or
decisions of the political committee; or
(b) The candidate’s principal campaign committee and the political committee  both have the
candidate or a member of the candidate’s immediate family as a treasurer or director.
(6) “County clerk” means the county clerk or the county official in charge of elections.
(7) “Elector” means an individual qualified to vote under Article II, section 2,  of the Oregon
Constitution.
(8) Except as provided in ORS 260.007, “expend”  or “expenditure” includes the payment or fur-
nishing of money or anything of value or the incurring or repayment of indebtedness or  obligation
by or on behalf of a candidate, political  committee or person in consideration for any services,
supplies, equipment or other thing of value performed or furnished for any reason, including  support
of or opposition to a candidate,  political committee or measure, or for reducing the debt of a can-
didate for nomination or election to public office. “Expenditure”  also includes contributions made
by a candidate or political committee to or on behalf of any other  candidate or political committee.
(9) “Filing officer” means:
(a) The Secretary of State:
(A) Regarding a candidate for public office;
(B) Regarding a statement required to be filed under ORS 260.118;
(C) Regarding any measure; or
(D) Regarding any political committee.
(b) In the case of an irrigation district formed under ORS chapter 545, “filing officer” means:
(A) The county clerk, regarding any candidate for office or any measure at an  irrigation district
formation election where the proposed district is situated wholly in one county;
(B) The county clerk of  the county in which the office of the secretary of the proposed irrigation
district will be  located, regarding any candidate for office or any measure at an irrigation district
formation election where the proposed district is situated in more than one county; or
(C) The secretary of the irrigation district for any election other than  an irrigation district
formation election.
(10) “Independent  expenditure” means an expenditure by a person for a communication in sup-
port of or in opposition to a clearly identified candidate or measure that is not  made with the co-
operation or with the  prior consent of, or in consultation with, or at the request or suggestion of,
a candidate  or any agent or authorized committee of the candidate, or any political committee or
agent of a political  committee supporting or opposing a measure. For purposes of this subsection and
subsection (3) of this section:
(a) “Agent” means any person who has:
(A) Actual  oral or written authority, either express or implied, to make or to authorize the
making of expenditures on behalf of a candidate or on behalf of a political  committee supporting or
[21]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
opposing a measure; or
(B) Been placed in a position within the campaign  organization where it would reasonably ap-
pear that in the ordinary course of  campaign-related activities the person may authorize expen-
ditures.
(b)(A) “Clearly identified” means, with respect to candidates:
(i) The name of the candidate involved appears;
(ii) A photograph or drawing of the candidate appears; or
(iii) The identity of the candidate is apparent by unambiguous reference.
(B) “Clearly identified” means, with respect to measures:
(i) The ballot number of the measure appears;
(ii) A description of the measure’s subject or effect appears; or
(iii) The identity of the measure is apparent by unambiguous reference.
(c) “Communication in support of or in opposition to a clearly identified candidate or measure”
means:
(A)(i) The communication, when taken  as a whole and with limited reference to external events,
such as the  proximity to the election, could only be interpreted by a reasonable person as containing
advocacy for the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate for nomination or  election to
public office, or the passage or defeat of a clearly identified measure; and
(ii) The  electoral portion of the communication is unmistakable, unambiguous and suggestive of
only one meaning; or
(B)(i) The communication involves aggregate expenditures of more than $250 by a person;
(ii) The communication refers to a clearly identified  candidate or measure that will appear on
the ballot or to a political party; and
(iii) The communication is published and disseminated to the relevant electorate within 60  cal-
endar days before a primary election, 120 calendar  days before a general election or 90 calendar
days before an election other than a primary election or a general election.
(d) “Made with the cooperation or with the prior consent of,  or in consultation with, or at the
request or suggestion of, a candidate  or any agent or authorized committee of the candidate, or any
political committee or agent of a political committee supporting or opposing a measure”:
(A) Means any arrangement,  coordination or direction by the candidate or the candidate’s agent,
or by any political committee or agent of a political committee  supporting or opposing a measure,
prior to the publication, distribution, display or broadcast  of the communication. An expenditure
shall be presumed to be so made when it is:
(i) Based on information about the plans,  projects or needs of the candidate, or of the political
committee supporting or opposing a measure, and  provided to the expending person by the candidate
or by the candidate’s agent, or by any political committee or agent of a political  committee sup-
porting or opposing a measure, with a view toward having an expenditure made; or
(ii) Made by or through any person who is or has been authorized to raise or expend  funds, who
is or has been an officer of a political committee authorized by  the candidate or by a political
committee or agent of  a political committee supporting or opposing a measure, or who is or has been
receiving any form of compensation or  reimbursement from the candidate, the candidate’s principal
campaign committee or agent or from any political committee or  agent of a political committee
supporting or opposing a measure.
(B) Does not mean providing to the expending person  upon request a copy of this chapter or any
rules adopted by the Secretary of State relating to independent expenditures.
[22]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(11) “Initiative petition” means a petition to initiate a measure for  which a prospective petition
has been filed but that is not yet a measure.
(12) “Judge” means judge of the Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, circuit  court or the Oregon
Tax Court.
(13) “Mass mailing” means more than 200 substantially similar pieces of mail, but  does not in-
clude a form letter or other mail that is sent in response to an unsolicited  request, letter or other
inquiry.
(14) “Measure” includes any of the following  submitted to the people for their approval or re-
jection at an election:
(a) A proposed law.
(b) An Act or part of an Act of the Legislative Assembly.
(c) A revision of or amendment to the Oregon Constitution.
(d) Local, special or municipal legislation.
(e) A proposition or question.
(15) “Occupation” means:
(a) The nature of an individual’s principal business; and
(b) If  the individual is employed by another person, the business name and address, by city and
state, of the employer.
(16) “Person” means an individual, corporation, limited liability company, labor  organization,
association, firm, partnership, joint stock company, club, organization or  other combination of indi-
viduals having collective capacity.
(17) “Petition committee” means an initiative, referendum or  recall petition committee organized
under ORS 260.118.
(18) “Political committee” means a combination of two or more individuals, or a person  other
than an individual, that has:
(a) Received a contribution for the purpose  of supporting or opposing a candidate, measure or
political party; or
(b) Made an expenditure for the purpose of supporting or opposing  a candidate, measure or
political party. For purposes of this paragraph, an expenditure does not include:
(A) A contribution to a candidate or political committee that is required to report  the contri-
bution on a statement filed under ORS 260.057 or 260.076 or a certificate filed under  ORS 260.112;
or
(B) An independent expenditure for which a statement is required to be  filed by a person under
ORS 260.044.
(19) “Public office” means any  national, state, county, district, city office or position, except a
political party office, that is filled by the electors.
(20) “Recall petition”  means a petition to recall a public officer for which a prospective petition
has been filed but that is not yet a measure.
(21) “Referendum petition” means a petition to refer  a measure for which a prospective petition
has been filed but that is not yet a measure.
(22) “Regular district election” means the regular district election described in ORS 255.335.
(23) “State office” means the office of Governor,  Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney
General, Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor  and Industries, Superintendent of Public Instruc-
tion, state Senator, state Representative, judge or district attorney.
SECTION 26.
 ORS 260.076 is amended to read:
[23]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
260.076. (1) A legislative official, statewide official or  candidate therefor, or the official’s or
candidate’s principal campaign committee, shall file statements showing  contributions received by
or on behalf of the official, candidate or committee during the period beginning January 1 and end-
ing upon adjournment of the regular session  of the Legislative Assembly, or during any special
session of the Legislative Assembly.
(2) The Governor, Governor-elect or  a candidate for Governor, or the principal campaign com-
mittee of the Governor, Governor-elect or candidate, shall file statements showing contributions  re-
ceived by or on behalf of the Governor, Governor-elect, candidate or committee during  the period
beginning January 1 and ending  30 business days following adjournment of the regular session of the
Legislative Assembly, or during any special session of the Legislative Assembly.
(3) A person or political committee affiliated with  a political party, caucus of either house of the
Legislative  Assembly,  legislative official, statewide official or the Governor, Governor-elect or can-
didate for Governor shall file statements showing contributions received by the  person or committee
on behalf of a legislative official, statewide official or candidate  therefor, during the period begin-
ning January 1 and ending upon adjournment of the regular session of the  Legislative Assembly, or
during any special session of the Legislative Assembly.
(4) A person or political committee affiliated with  a political party, caucus of either house of the
Legislative Assembly, legislative official, statewide official or the Governor, Governor-elect or  can-
didate for Governor shall file statements showing contributions received by the  person or committee
on behalf of the Governor, Governor-elect or candidate for Governor, during the period beginning
January 1 and  ending 30 business days following adjournment of the regular session of the Legisla-
tive Assembly, or during any special session of the Legislative Assembly.
(5) A statement described in subsections (1) to (4) of this section shall be filed with the Secretary
of State on a form prescribed by the secretary.  For contributions received during the period begin-
ning on January 1 and ending on the first day of the regular session, a statement shall be filed not
later than two business days after the first day of the regular session. For contributions received
on or after the first day of the regular session, a  statement shall be filed not later than two business
days after the date a contribution  is received. For contributions received during any special session
of the Legislative Assembly, a statement shall be filed not later than two business  days after the
date a contribution is received.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) “Legislative official” means any member or member-elect of the Legislative Assembly.
(b) “Statewide official” means the Secretary of State or Secretary of  State-elect, State Treasurer
or State  Treasurer-elect, Attorney General or Attorney General-elect , [and the] Commissioner of the
Bureau of Labor and Industries or [ the] Commissioner-elect of  the Bureau of Labor and Industries
and Superintendent of Public Instruction or Superintendent-elect of Public Instruction .
SECTION 27.
 ORS 292.010 is amended to read:
292.010. The salaries of the Governor, Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney  General,
Superintendent of Public Instruction,  judges of  the Supreme and circuit courts, district attorneys,
and all other state officers, and  all persons employed by the state whose salary or compensation is
payable by law out of the State Treasury, shall be paid monthly or on a biweekly basis.
SECTION 28.  ORS 292.311 is amended to read:
292.311. The incumbents of each of the following offices shall be paid an annual  salary on a
monthly basis, as follows:
(1) Governor, $98,600  for the year beginning January 1, 2014, and for each year thereafter. The
[24]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Governor shall also be paid $1,000 per month regularly  for expenses necessarily incurred but not
otherwise provided for.
(2) Secretary of State, $77,000 for the year beginning  January 1, 2014, and for each year there-
after. The Secretary of State shall  also be paid $250 per month regularly for expenses necessarily
incurred but not otherwise provided for.
(3) State Treasurer, $77,000 for the  year beginning January 1, 2014, and for each year thereafter.
The State  Treasurer shall also be paid $250 per month regularly for expenses necessarily incurred
but not otherwise provided for.
(4) Attorney General, $82,200 for the year beginning January 1, 2014, and for  each year there-
after. The Attorney General shall also be paid  $250 per month regularly for expenses necessarily
incurred but not otherwise provided for.
(5) Commissioner of the Bureau  of Labor and Industries, $77,000 for the year beginning January
1, 2014, and for each year thereafter. The commissioner shall  also be paid $250 per month regularly
for expenses necessarily incurred but not otherwise provided for.
(6) Superintendent of Public Instruction,  $77,000 for the year beginning January 1, 2027,
and for each year thereafter. The superintendent shall  also be paid $250 per month regularly
for expenses necessarily incurred but not otherwise provided for.
SECTION 29.
 ORS 292.316 is amended to read:
292.316. All fees and commissions of any kind, name or nature collected by the Governor,  Sec-
retary of State, State Treasurer , [ or] Attorney General or Superintendent of Public Instruction
for any service performed by the Governor, Secretary of  State, State Treasurer , [ or] Attorney Gen-
eral or Superintendent of Public Instruction  by virtue of office or collected by the Governor,
Secretary of State, State Treasurer , [ or] Attorney General or Superintendent of Public Instruc-
tion by virtue of office, shall be paid into the State Treasury on or  before the 10th day of the month
following the collection thereof, accompanied by a statement designating the fund or account  to
which the payment is to be credited. Each of such officers shall, in  the biennial report of the officer,
set forth a statement of all moneys so collected and paid over to the State Treasury.
SECTION 30.  ORS 292.430 is amended to read:
292.430. (1) In addition to the annual salaries established as provided in ORS 292.930, the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services may “pick-up,” assume and pay to the Public Employees Re-
tirement Fund any employee contributions, otherwise required by ORS 238.200, for the Governor,
Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General, Commissioner of the Bureau  of Labor and
Industries, Superintendent of Public Instruction  and members of the Legislative Assembly.
(2) The department may provide health, dental, life and long-term disability insurance without
cost to the officers referred to in subsection (1) of this section and to judges of the  Supreme Court,
Court of Appeals, Oregon Tax Court and circuit courts in  such amounts as are provided from time
to time to employees in the unclassified service of the state.
SECTION 31.
 ORS 292.930 is amended to read:
292.930. Each of the following elective officers shall  be paid an annual salary on a monthly basis
as determined by the Legislative Assembly each biennium:
(1) Governor.
(2) Secretary of State.
(3) State Treasurer.
(4) Attorney General.
(5) Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries.
[25]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) Superintendent of Public Instruction.
[(6)] (7) Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals.
[(7)] (8) Court of Appeals Judge.
[(8)] (9) Chief Justice of the Supreme Court.
[(9)] (10) Supreme Court Judge.
[(10)] (11) Circuit Court Judge.
[(11)] (12) Tax Court Judge.
SECTION 32.
 ORS 326.555 is amended to read:
326.555. There is established a State Council  for Educational Opportunity for Military Children,
as described in Article VIII of the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military
Children under ORS 326.552, consisting of the [ Deputy] Superintendent of Public Instruction, the
members of the State Board of Education, the  military family education liaison and the compact
commissioner. The Governor may appoint other individuals to  the state council and shall make a
good faith effort to ensure that other  individuals appointed are individuals who are described in
Article VIII of  the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military Children under ORS
326.552 and who are well informed on the principles of education of military children.
SECTION 33.
 ORS 327.506 is amended to read:
327.506. (1) The quality goals  for the state’s system of kindergarten through grade 12 public
education include those established under ORS 329.007, 329.015, 329.025, 329.045 and 329.065.
(2) Each biennium  the Quality Education Commission shall determine the amount of moneys
sufficient to ensure that the  state’s system of kindergarten through grade 12 public education meets
the quality goals.
(3) In determining the amount  of moneys sufficient to meet the quality goals, the commission
shall identify best practices that lead to high student performance and  the costs of implementing
those best practices in the state’s kindergarten through grade 12 public schools. Those  best prac-
tices shall be based on research, data, professional judgment and public values.
(4) Prior to August 1  of each even-numbered year, the commission shall issue a report to the
Governor , the Superintendent of Public Instruction  and the Legislative  Assembly that identifies:
(a) Current  practices in the state’s system of kindergarten through grade 12 public education,
the costs of continuing  those practices and the expected student performance under those practices;
and
(b) The best practices for meeting the quality goals, the costs  of implementing the best practices
and the expected student performance under the best practices.
(5) In addition, the commission shall provide in the report  issued under subsection (4) of this
section at least two alternatives for meeting the quality goals. The alternatives may use different
approaches for meeting the quality goals or use a phased implementation of  best practices for
meeting the quality goals.
SECTION 34.
 ORS 339.331 is amended to read:
339.331. (1) There is created the Center for School Safety within the University of  Oregon. The
mission of the center shall be to:
(a) Serve as the central point for data analysis;
(b) Conduct research;
(c) Disseminate information about successful school  safety programs, research results and new
programs; and
(d) Provide technical assistance for improving the safety of schools in collaboration  with the
[26]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Department of Education and others.
(2) To fulfill its mission, the Center for School Safety shall:
(a) Establish a clearinghouse for information and materials concerning school violence  pre-
vention and  intervention services. As used in this paragraph, “intervention services” means any
preventive, developmental, corrective or  supportive service or treatment provided to a student who
is at risk of school failure,  is at risk of participation in violent behavior or juvenile crime or has
been expelled from the school district. “Intervention services” may include, but is not limited to:
(A) Screening to identify students at risk for emotional disabilities or antisocial behavior;
(B) Direct instruction in academic, social, problem-solving and conflict resolution skills;
(C) Alternative education programs;
(D) Psychological services;
(E) Identification and assessment of abilities;
(F) Counseling services;
(G) Medical services;
(H) Day treatment;
(I) Family services; and
(J) Work and community service programs.
(b) Provide program development and implementation  expertise and technical support to schools,
law enforcement agencies and communities.  The expertise and support may include coordinating
training for administrators, teachers, students, parents and other community representatives.
(c) Analyze the data collected in compliance with section 5, chapter 618, Oregon Laws 2001.
(d) Research and evaluate school safety programs so schools and communities  are better able
to address their specific needs.
(e) Promote interagency efforts to address discipline  and safety issues within communities
throughout the state.
(f) Prepare and disseminate information regarding  the best practices in creating safe and effec-
tive schools.
(g) Advise the State Board of Education on rules and policies.
(h) Provide an annual report on the  status of school safety in Oregon by July 1 of each year to:
(A) The Governor;
(B) The Attorney General;
(C) The Superintendent of Public Instruction;
[(C)] (D) The State Board of Education; and
[(D)] (E) All relevant legislative committees.
(3) The University of Oregon Institute on Violence and Destructive  Behavior shall provide staff
support to the Center for School Safety board of directors and shall manage the center.
(4) The Center for School Safety board of directors may seek and accept public and private funds
for the center.
SECTION 35.
 Section 1, chapter 113, Oregon Laws 2018, as amended by  section 3, chapter 113,
Oregon Laws 2018, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Accelerated college credit program” has the meaning given that term in  [ section 6 of this
2018 Act ] ORS 350.420.
(b) “Credit toward general education” has the  meaning given that term in [ section 6 of this 2018
Act] ORS 350.420.
[27]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall prepare an annual report  on acceler-
ated college credit programs in the manner provided by this section.
(3) For the  purpose of the report required by this section, the commission shall collaborate with
public post-secondary institutions of education in this state to  determine the method for providing
a representative sampling of:
(a) Students from each institution who are:
(A) Graduates of a high school in this state;
(B) Enrolled in the first year at  a post-secondary institution of education for the first time, ex-
cept for any enrollment related to an accelerated college credit program; and
(C) Seeking a post-secondary certificate or degree.
(b) The number of credits from an accelerated college credit  program that a student attempted
to transfer to the post-secondary institution of education.
(4) The report required by this section must include the following information from  the repre-
sentative sampling based on the previous school year:
(a) The number and percentage of students who attempted to transfer a credit  from an acceler-
ated college credit program to a public post-secondary institution of education in this state.
(b) Of the students identified  under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the number and percentage
of students whose credits were accepted.
(c) Of the credits accepted, the number and percentage  that were accepted as credit toward
general education.
(d) Of the students identified  under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the number and percentage
of students whose credits were not accepted.
(e) Of the students identified under paragraph  (a) of this subsection, the high schools from which
the students graduated, if available.
(5) To the extent practicable, and in addition  to the information described in subsection (4) of
this section, the report must include,  from all students in this state described in subsection (3)(a)
of this section, the number of students  who attempted to transfer a credit from an accelerated col-
lege credit program to a public post-secondary institution of education in this state.
(6) To the extent  practicable, the information collected under subsections (4) and (5) of this
section must be disaggregated by:
(a) The student’s characteristics, including race, ethnicity and gender;
(b) The post-secondary institution of education that accepted or  did not accept a transfer of a
credit from an accelerated college credit program;
(c) The type of accelerated college credit program in which the student participated; and
(d) The class of the accelerated college credit program in which the student participated.
(7) No later than September 1  of each year, each public post-secondary institution of education
must provide to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission the information required under this
section.
(8) No later than December 1 of each year, the report required under this section must be:
(a) Submitted to  the Governor, the Superintendent of Public Instruction,  the Department of
Education, the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education, the  board of
education of each community college  district in this state and the governing board of each public
university listed in ORS 352.002; and
(b) Made available to each school district in this state.
(9) Nothing in this section is  intended to supersede the authority of a post-secondary institution
[28]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of education, or the faculty of an institution, to prescribe  an educational program or a course of
study as provided by ORS 341.290 (3) or 352.146.
SECTION 36.
 ORS 343.465 is amended to read:
343.465. (1) It is the policy of this state to respect the unique nature of each child, family  and
community with  particular attention to cultural and linguistic diversity, and to support a system of
services for preschool children with a disability and their families that:
(a) Recognizes the importance of the preschool child’s family, supports and  builds on each
family’s strengths and respects family decision-making and input regarding service options and pub-
lic policy.
(b) Identifies, evaluates and refers  services for preschool children with a disability at the earli-
est possible time.
(c) Uses specialized services and all other community services and programs for children,  in-
cluding community preschools, Head Start programs,  community health clinics, family support pro-
grams and other child-oriented agencies.
(d) Uses a variety of funding sources for preschool children with a disability and their  families,
including public and private funding, insurance and family resources.
(e) Assists families in utilizing necessary services in the most cost-effective and  efficient manner
possible by using a coordinated planning and implementation process.
(f) [ Insures] Ensures that all  children and their families, regardless of disability, risk factors
or cultural or linguistic differences, are able to utilize services for which they would otherwise be
qualified.
(g) Encourages services and supports for  preschool children with a disability and their families
in their home communities and in settings with children without a disability.
(h) Recognizes the importance of developing  and supporting well-trained and competent person-
nel to provide services to preschool children with a disability, and their families.
(i) Evaluates the system’s impact on the child and family, including  child progress, service
quality, family satisfaction, transition into public  schooling, longitudinal and cumulative reporting
over several biennia and interagency coordination at both the state and local level.
(j) Reports information described  in paragraph (i) of this subsection to the State Interagency
Coordinating Council, the Governor, the Superintendent of Public Instruction,  the Department
of Early Learning and Care, the State Board of Education,  the public universities listed in ORS
352.002 and the Legislative Assembly each biennium.
(2) In carrying out the  provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the Department of Education,
the Department of Early Learning and Care, the Department of Human  Services and the public
universities listed in ORS 352.002 shall coordinate the  provision of services to preschool children
with a disability with other services that are provided to children with a disability, or who are  at
risk of developing disabling conditions, and their families. All program planning, standards for ser-
vice, policies regarding services delivery and budget development for services for  preschool children
with a disability, children with a disability, and the families of  those children shall reflect the policy
outlined in subsection (1) of this section and elaborated through rules and agreements.
SECTION 37.
 ORS 343.499 is amended to read:
343.499. (1)(a) There is created the State Interagency Coordinating Council.
(b) The Governor shall appoint members of the council from a list of eligible  appointees from
this state that is provided by the council and agencies described  in subsection (2) of this section and
shall ensure that the membership of the council reasonably represents the racial, ethnic,  linguistic
[29]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and geographic population of this state.
(c) The Governor shall designate one member of the council  to serve as the chairperson, or if
the Governor chooses not to name a  chairperson, the council may elect one of its members to serve
as chairperson.
(d) Notwithstanding paragraph (c) of this subsection, any member  of the council who represents
the Department of Education may not serve as the chairperson of the council.
(2) The membership of the council shall be composed as follows:
(a) At least 20 percent of the council members shall be parents of children with a  disability who
are 12 years of age or younger at the time the council member is appointed. When appointing
council members under this paragraph, the Governor shall ensure that:
(A) At least 50 percent of the council members are parents of a child  with a disability who is
five years of age or younger at the time the council member is appointed;
(B) At least 20 percent of the council members:
(i) Are parents of a child with a disability who is three years  of age or younger at the time the
council member is appointed; and
(ii) Have knowledge of, or experience with, programs or services for infants  or toddlers with a
disability; and
(C) The council members represent the racial, ethnic and linguistic diversity of children  in this
state who are five years of age or younger.
(b) At least 20 percent of the council members shall be public or private providers of  early
intervention and early childhood special education services.
(c) At least  one council member shall be from a program responsible for preparing early inter-
vention and early childhood special education educators.
(d) At least one council member shall be from a Head Start program or from a  provider under
the Oregon Prenatal to Kindergarten Program.
(e) At least one council member shall be from a home-based child care program.
(f) At least one council member shall be from a center-based child care program.
(g) At least one council member shall be from the committee that serves as the state  advisory
council, as described in ORS 326.425 (3).
(h) At least  one council member shall be a member of the State Advisory Council for Special
Education created under ORS 343.287.
(i) At least one council member shall be from each state agency involved  in the provision of,
or payment  for, early intervention and early childhood special education services to infants and
toddlers with a disability and their families.
(j) At least one council member shall be from each state agency responsible  for providing pre-
school services to children with a disability.
(k) At least one council  member shall be from each state agency responsible for children’s
mental health.
(L) At least two council members shall be from the  Department of Human Services with exper-
tise in foster care or self-sufficiency programs.
(m) At  least one council member shall be from the Department of Early Learning and Care with
expertise in the Child Care and Development Fund.
(n) At least one  council member shall be a representative of the Department of Education with
expertise in the coordination of education of homeless children and youth.
(o) At least one council member shall  be from the Department of Consumer and Business Ser-
[30]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vices with expertise in state regulation of private health insurance.
(p) At least one council member shall be from the Oregon Health Authority with expertise in
Medicaid and the Children’s Health Insurance Program.
(q) At least one council member shall be a representative from a tribal  agency responsible for
supporting young children with developmental  delays and disabilities, from a tribal council or oth-
erwise representing one or more tribes.
(3) An individual appointed to represent a state agency under subsection (2) of this  section must
have sufficient authority to engage in making and implementing policy on behalf  of the agency. The
Governor may appoint a council member to represent more than one program  or specialty listed in
subsection (2) of this section.
(4) In addition to the council members appointed under subsection (2) of this section:
(a) The Governor may appoint any other council members not listed in subsection (2) of this
section.
(b) The President  of the Senate shall appoint one member from among members of the Senate
to serve as a nonvoting council member.
(c) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one  member from among members
of the House of Representatives to serve as a nonvoting council member.
(5) The State Interagency Coordinating Council shall:
(a) Advise the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the State  Board of Education, the Early
Learning System Director and the Early Learning Council on unmet needs in the early  childhood
special education and early intervention programs for children  with a disability, review and com-
ment publicly on any rules proposed  by the State Board of Education and the distribution of funds
for the programs and assist the state in developing and  reporting data on and evaluations of the
programs and services.
(b) Advise and  assist the represented public agencies regarding the services and programs they
provide to children with a disability and their families, including public  comments on any proposed
rules affecting the target population and the distribution of funds for such services,  and assist each
agency in developing services  that reflect the overall goals for the target population as adopted by
the council.
(c) Advise the Department of Education, the Department of Early Learning and Care and other
state agencies on the development and  implementation of the policies that constitute the statewide
system.
(d) Advise all  appropriate public agencies on achieving the full participation, coordination and
cooperation for implementation of a statewide system that includes but is not limited to:
(A) Seeking information from service providers, service coordinators, parents and  others about
any federal, state or local policies that impede timely service delivery; and
(B) Taking steps to ensure that any policy problems identified under subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph are resolved.
(e) Advise the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the Early Learning  System Director on
identifying the  sources of fiscal and other support for early intervention and early childhood special
education services, assigning financial responsibility to the appropriate agencies and ensuring that
the provisions of interagency agreements under ORS 343.511 are carried out.
(f) Review and comment on each agency’s services and policies regarding services for infants,
toddlers and preschool children with a disability, or infants, toddlers and preschool  children who
are at risk of developing disabling conditions, and their families to the maximum  extent possible to
[31]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ensure cost-effective and efficient use of resources.
(g) Advise the Department of Education  and the Department of Early Learning and Care on the
preparation of applications and amendments thereto.
(h) Advise  the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the Early Learning System Director
regarding transitions of children with a disability, including transitions to kindergarten.
(i) Prepare and submit an annual report to the Governor, the [ Deputy] Superintendent of  Public
Instruction, the Early Learning System Director, the Early Learning Council, the State  Board of
Education, the Legislative Assembly and the United  States Secretary of Education on the status of
early intervention and early childhood special education services provided within this state.
(6) The council may advise appropriate agencies about integration of services for preschool
children with a disability and at-risk preschool children.
(7) Terms of office for council members shall be three years, except that:
(a) The representative  from the State Advisory Council for Special Education shall serve a
one-year term; and
(b) The representatives from other state agencies  and the representatives from the Legislative
Assembly shall serve indefinite terms.
(8) Subject to  approval by the Governor, the council may use federal funds appropriated for this
purpose and available to the council to:
(a) Conduct hearings and forums;
(b) Reimburse nonagency  council members under ORS 292.495 for attending council meetings, for
performing council duties, and for necessary expenses, including child care for parent members;
(c) Pay  compensation to a council member if the member is not employed or if the member must
forfeit wages from other employment when performing official council business;
(d) Hire staff; and
(e) Obtain the services of such professional, technical  and clerical personnel as may be neces-
sary to carry out its functions.
(9) Except as provided in subsection (8) of  this section, council members shall serve without
compensation.
(10) The Department of Education shall  provide clerical and administrative support, including
staff, to the council to carry out the performance of the council’s function  as described in this sec-
tion.
(11) The council shall meet  at least quarterly. The meetings shall be announced publicly and,
to the extent appropriate, be open and accessible to the general public.
(12) No member of the council shall cast a vote on any matter  that would provide direct finan-
cial benefit to that member or otherwise give the appearance of a conflict of interest  under state
law.
SECTION 38.
 ORS 357.021 is amended to read:
357.021. (1) The State Library Board is established, consisting of nine voting members.
(2) The Governor, after consultation with  the Oregon Library Association, shall appoint seven
voting members as follows:
(a) Two members from two different state agencies;
(b) One member representing a public library in eastern Oregon;
(c) One member representing a public library in western Oregon;
(d) One public member from eastern Oregon;
(e) One public member from western Oregon; and
[32]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) One member  representing a community college library or a public university library in this
state.
(3) The [ Deputy] Superintendent of Public Instruction, or a designee of the [ deputy] superinten-
dent, shall be a voting member of the board.
(4) The  administrator of the Commission for the Blind, or a designee of the administrator, shall
be a voting member of the board.
(5) The State Librarian shall serve ex officio as a nonvoting member of the board.
(6) A board member described in subsection (2) of this section shall serve  a four-year term, but
a member described in subsection  (2) of this section serves at the pleasure of the Governor. Before
the expiration of the term of a member,  the Governor shall appoint a successor whose term begins
on July  1 next following. A member is eligible for reappointment. If there is a vacancy for any cause,
the Governor shall make an appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(7) A board member described in  subsection (2) of this section shall be eligible for reappointment
for only one additional term, but any person may  be reappointed to the board after an interval of
one year.
(8) The appointment of a board member  described in subsection (2) of this section is subject to
confirmation by the Senate in the manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
(9) A member of the State Library Board is entitled to  compensation and expenses as provided
in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 39.
 ORS 418.979 is amended to read:
418.979. (1) The purpose of the System of Care Advisory Council is to  improve the effectiveness
and efficacy of  state and local systems of care that provide services to youth by providing a cen-
tralized and impartial forum for statewide policy development and planning.
(2) The primary duty of the council is to develop and maintain a state system of care policy and
a comprehensive, long-range plan for a coordinated state system of care that encompasses public
health, health systems, child welfare, education, juvenile justice and services and  supports for men-
tal and behavioral health and people with intellectual or developmental disabilities. The plan  must
include, but need not be limited to, recommendations regarding:
(a) Capacity, utilization and types of state and local systems of care and services and supports;
(b) Implementation of in-home behavioral health services, crisis  and transition services,
therapeutic foster care, in-home family support services and  the integration of those services with
existing programs of residential  services for individuals with behavioral health needs and intellec-
tual developmental disabilities;
(c) Appropriate use of existing systems of care and services and supports;
(d) Whether additional services and supports are necessary to address gaps in coverage;
(e) Methods for assessing the effectiveness  of systems of care and services and supports in re-
ducing juvenile dependency or delinquency;
(f) Methods of reducing risk of future juvenile dependency or delinquency;
(g) The effective utilization of the local system of care governance structure;
(h) Guidelines for partner agency core values and guiding principles; and
(i) Guidelines that ensure cultural competence in the provision of services and supports by:
(A) Implementing uniform standards to allow local  system of care teams to describe the cul-
turally responsive services and supports available in a system of care.
(B) Providing youth and families with understandable and effective system of care services in a
manner compatible with their disabilities, cultural beliefs  and practices, literacy skills and language.
[33]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Developing  and implementing a process to review practices accepted by diverse communities.
(D) Identifying ways to continually improve culturally competent system of care services  and
implementing a statewide system of care that reflects culturally competent practices.
(3) Other duties of the council are to:
(a) Conduct  joint studies on any matter within the jurisdiction of the council by agreement with
the Oregon Youth Authority, the Department of Human Services, the Oregon Health  Authority, the
Department of Education, coordinated care organizations and any  other state agencies, boards or
commissions;
(b) Provide oversight of the implementation of the services described in subsection (2)(b)  of this
section by the Oregon Health Authority, the Oregon  Youth Authority and the Department of Human
Services and to provide periodic updates on the agencies’ implementation to the Legislative  Assem-
bly;
(c) Provide recommendations to the Director  of the Oregon Health Authority, the Director of
the Oregon Youth Authority, the [ Deputy] Superintendent  of Public Instruction and the Director of
Human Services as necessary for the agencies to maintain and strengthen the systems of care;
(d) Make  recommendations to the Director of the Oregon Health Authority, the Director of the
Oregon Youth Authority, the [ Deputy] Superintendent of Public Instruction and the Director  of Hu-
man Services to reduce barriers to implementation of systems of care;
(e) Continually monitor and update the Children’s System Data Dashboard described in ORS
418.981, with a specific focus on the number  of youth placed in hotels, out-of-state placements,
emergency department boarding, congregate care facilities, shelter care  or Oregon Youth Authority
custody;  and
(f) Award grants from funds appropriated by the Legislative Assembly to  the council or from
funds otherwise available from any other source, for the purpose of supporting local system of  care
governance  and  for carrying out the recommendations in the council’s plan developed under sub-
section (2) of this section.
(4)(a) On or before January 1 of  every fourth year, the council shall update its plan under sub-
section (2) of this section and submit the plan to an interim  committee of the Legislative Assembly
related to youth, and to the Governor.
(b) On or before September 15 of each year, the council shall  submit a report in the manner
provided in ORS 192.245 to an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related  to youth, and
to the Governor, describing how the council is meeting its  goals and any remaining barriers to ac-
cess to services and supports. The report may include  recommendations for legislation, including
recommendations for changes to the council structure, composition and operating processes.
(c) On or before December 31 of each odd-numbered  year, the council, the Department of Human
Services and the Oregon Health  Authority shall submit a joint report in the manner described in
ORS 192.245 to an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related  to youth, describing mon-
eys appropriated to or otherwise made available to the  department, the authority or the council in
the preceding biennium for the purpose of  providing, or providing access to, the services and sup-
ports described in subsection (2)(b) of this section. The report must include an accounting  of the
expenditures made by the department, the authority and the council  and of any moneys remaining
unspent at the close of the biennium.
(5) The council may:
(a) Apply for and receive gifts and grants from any public or private source.
(b) Submit proposals for legislative measures at the time and in the manner  prescribed in ORS
[34]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
171.130 and 171.133.
(c) Adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
(6) The council shall submit  an agency request budget at the time and in the manner prescribed
under ORS 291.208.
(7)(a) All agencies of state government are  directed to assist the council in the performance of
the duties of the council and,  to the extent permitted by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish
information and advice that the members of  the council consider necessary to perform the duties
of the council.
(b) At the council’s request, a participating state  agency shall provide the council with the
agency’s proposed budget form, prior to the agency’s submission  of the form to the Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services under  ORS 291.208, for the council’s review. The council may make
recommendations  to  the agency or, if appropriate, the department regarding the agency’s proposed
expenditures for services and supports necessary to implement the council’s  policy recommendations
under this section.
(8) The council  and participating state agencies shall, where applicable, enter into interagency
agreements to:
(a) Provide staff and resources to assist the council in carrying out the council’s duties;
(b) Share computer systems and technologies, to the extent allowed by law;
(c) Collect and analyze data related to the state system of care and the performance  of the
council’s duties; or
(d) Investigate the effectiveness of the council’s proposals and recommendations  under this sec-
tion.
(9) Moneys  that are appropriated to or otherwise made available to the council or the Oregon
Health Authority for the purpose of  supporting the duties of the council may not be expended except
as directed by the council.
SECTION 40.
 ORS 461.180 is amended to read:
461.180. (1) The Director of the Oregon State Lottery shall make  an ongoing study of the oper-
ation and the administration  of the lotteries which may be in operation in other states or countries,
of available literature  on the subject, of federal laws which may affect the operation of the Oregon
State Lottery and of the reaction of citizens of the state to existing or proposed  features in lottery
games, with a view toward recommending improvements that will  tend to serve the purposes of this
chapter. The director may make recommendations to the commission, Governor and Legislative
Assembly on any matters concerning the secure  and efficient operation and administration of the
state lottery and the convenience of the purchasers of tickets and shares.
(2) The director shall make and keep books and records which accurately  and fairly reflect each
day’s transactions, including but not limited to, the distribution of  tickets or shares to lottery game
retailers, receipt of  funds, prize claims, prize disbursements or prizes liable to be paid, expenses and
all other financial transactions  involving state lottery funds necessary so as to permit preparation
of financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting  principles and to maintain
daily accountability.
(3) The director shall make a monthly financial report to the commission, and  upon request
provide copies of such reports to the Governor, the Attorney General, the Secretary of State,  the
State Treasurer , the Superintendent of Public Instruction  and  the Legislative Assembly. Such
report shall include a  full and complete statement of state lottery revenues, prize disbursements,
expenses, net revenues and  all other financial transactions involving state lottery funds for the
[35]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
month.
(4) After the first six months of sales of tickets  or shares to the public, the director shall engage
an independent firm experienced in demographic analysis to conduct  a special study which shall
ascertain the demographic  characteristics of the players of each lottery game, including but not
limited to their income, age, sex, education and frequency  of participation. This report shall be
presented to the commission, the Governor, the Attorney General, the Secretary of State,  the State
Treasurer , the  Superintendent of Public Instruction  and the Legislative Assembly. Similar
studies shall be conducted after the first such  study from time to time as determined by the director.
(5) After the first full year of sales of tickets or shares to  the public, the director shall engage
an independent firm experienced in the  analysis of advertising, promotion, public relations, incen-
tives, public disclosures of odds and numbers of winners in lottery games and other aspects  of
communications to conduct a special study of the effectiveness of such communications  activities
by the state lottery and make recommendations to  the commission on the future conduct and future
rate of expenditure for such activities. This report  shall be presented to the commission, the Gov-
ernor, the Attorney General, the Secretary of  State, the State Treasurer , the Superintendent of
Public Instruction and the Legislative Assembly. Until the presentation  of such report and action
by the commission, the state lottery  shall expend as close to three and one-half percent as practical
of the projected sales of all tickets and shares  for advertising, promotion, public relations, incen-
tives, public disclosures of odds and numbers of winners in lottery games and other aspects  of
communications. Similar studies shall be  conducted from time to time after the first such study as
determined by the director.
(6) After the first nine months of sales of tickets or shares to the public, the commission  shall
engage an independent firm experienced in security  procedures, including but not limited to com-
puter security and systems  security, to conduct a comprehensive study and evaluation of all aspects
of security in the operation of the state lottery.  Such study shall include, but not be limited to,
personnel security, lottery game retailer security, lottery  contractor security, security of manufac-
turing operations of lottery contractors, security against  ticket counterfeiting and alteration and
other means of fraudulently winning, security  of drawings among entries or finalists, computer se-
curity, data communications security, database security, security in distribution, security  involving
validation and payment procedures, security involving unclaimed prizes,  security aspects applicable
to each particular lottery game,  security of drawings in lottery games where winners are determined
by drawings of numbers, the completeness of security against  locating winners in lottery games with
preprinted winners by persons  involved in their production, storage, distribution or sale and any
other aspects  of security applicable to any particular lottery game and to the state lottery and its
operations. The portion of the report containing the overall evaluation of the state lottery in  terms
of each aspect of security  shall be presented to the commission, the Governor, the Attorney General,
the Secretary of State, the State  Treasurer , the Superintendent of Public Instruction  and the
Legislative Assembly. Notwithstanding other  provisions of state law, the portion of the report con-
taining specific recommendations shall  be confidential and shall be presented only to the commis-
sion, the Governor and the director. Similar  studies of security shall be conducted biennially
thereafter.
(7) The director may delegate to any of the employees of the  Oregon State Lottery the exercise
or discharge in the director’s name of any power, duty or function of  whatever character, vested in
or imposed by law upon the director. The official act of any such person so acting in the director’s
name and by the authority of the director shall be considered to be an official act of the director.
[36]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 41.
 ORS 660.505 is amended to read:
660.505. (1) The members of the OregonServes Commission appointed under ORS 660.500  (2)(a)
must be residents of this state who have a proven commitment to community service and who  have
a demonstrated interest in fostering  and nurturing civic engagement as a strategy for strengthening
communities and promoting the ethic of service in all sectors of this state.
(2)(a) The Governor shall appoint as members of the commission:
(A) An individual with experience in educational, training and development  needs of youth,
particularly disadvantaged youth.
(B) An individual with experience  in promoting involvement of adults 55 years of age or older
in service and volunteerism.
(C) A representative of community-based agencies or organizations within this state.
(D) The [ Deputy] Superintendent of Public Instruction or designee.
(E) A representative of local governments in this state.
(F) A representative of local labor unions in this state.
(G) A representative of business.
(H) An individual between  16 and 25 years of age who is a participant in or supervisor of a
service program for school-age youth, or a campus-based or national service program.
(I) A representative of a national service program described in 42 U.S.C. 12572(a).
(J) A representative of the volunteer sector.
(b) An individual  member of the commission may represent more than one of the entities or or-
ganizations required to be represented under this subsection.
(3) In addition  to appointing members under subsection (2) of this section, the Governor may
appoint as members individuals from the following groups:
(a) Educators, including representatives of post-secondary  institutions of education and local
education agencies.
(b) Experts in the delivery of human, educational,  environmental or public safety services to
communities and individuals.
(c) Members or representatives of Native American tribes.
(d) At-risk or out-of-school youths.
(e) Entities  that receive assistance under the Domestic Volunteer Service Act of 1973 (42 U.S.C.
4950 et seq.).
(4) In making appointments of members described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,  the
Governor shall ensure that:
(a) No more than 50 percent of the appointed members are from the same political party; and
(b) No more than 25 percent of the appointed members are state employees.
(5) To the extent practicable, the Governor shall  ensure that the membership of the commission
is diverse with respect to race, ethnicity, age, gender and disability characteristics.
SECTION 42.
 Section 1, chapter 54, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) The America 250 Oregon Commission is established, consisting of 27 members ap-
pointed as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) The President  of the Senate shall appoint two nonvoting members from among members
of the Senate, one from the majority party and one from the minority party.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint two  nonvoting members from
among members of  the House of Representatives, one from the majority party and one from the mi-
nority party.
[37]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) The Governor shall appoint 13 voting members as follows:
(A) One member representing the Oregon Heritage Commission.
(B) One member representing the Oregon Arts Commission.
(C) One member representing the Trust for Cultural Development Board.
(D) One member representing the Commission on Black Affairs.
(E) One member representing the Commission on Asian and Pacific Islander Affairs.
(F) One member representing the Commission on Hispanic Affairs.
(G) One member representing the Commission for Women.
(H) Six members representing the public at large.
(d) The following 10 voting members shall serve ex officio:
(A) The Executive Director of the Oregon Historical  Society or the executive director’s
designee.
(B) The State Treasurer or the treasurer’s designee.
(C) The Secretary of State or the secretary’s designee.
(D) The [ Deputy] Superintendent of Public Instruction or the [ deputy] superintendent’s  designee.
(E) The State Parks and Recreation Director or the director’s designee.
(F) The Director of the Oregon Business Development Department or the director’s designee.
(G) The executive director of the Oregon Tourism Commission  or the executive director’s
designee.
(H) The Director of Veterans’ Affairs or the director’s designee.
(I) The Governor’s director of tribal affairs or the director’s designee.
(J) The  Executive Officer of the Commission on Indian Services or the executive officer’s
designee.
(e) The America 250 Oregon Commission may  by majority vote invite additional individuals to
serve as nonvoting honorary members of the commission.
(f) If there is a vacancy  for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appointment to
become immediately effective.
(3) The commission shall:
(a) Coordinate and provide guidance for Oregon’s official observance of the 250th anniversary
of the establishment of the United States, as marked by the Declaration of Independence in 1776.
(b) Consult with the nine federally  recognized Indian tribes in Oregon when planning and de-
veloping activities throughout the state in order to meaningfully include Oregon’s tribal history.
(c) Seek to ensure an official observance that is inclusive and shares the histories of  Oregon’s
diverse populations,  including the histories of the Native American peoples who have an ancestral
and tradition connection to this state.
(4) The commission may:
(a) Adopt rules necessary for the operation of the commission;
(b) Cooperate with national, regional, state,  local and Native American organizations, insti-
tutions, bodies and other public or private entities that are promoting the semiquincentennial;
(c) Plan, conduct and assist with semiquincentennial events;
(d) Plan, support and produce educational resources and programs related to the
semiquincentennial;
(e) Engage in and encourage fundraising  activities, including, but not limited to, the solicitation
of charitable gifts, grants or donations;
(f) Coordinate interagency participation in the observance;
[38]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(g) Create subcommittees of the commission comprising members of the commission, members
appointed from  the public at large and honorary members to further the goals of the commission;
and
(h) Engage in any other activity related  to the powers and duties conferred on the commission
under this section.
(5) The commission shall  meet at times and places specified by the call of the chairperson or
of a majority of the voting members of the commission.
(6) A majority of the voting members  of the commission constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(7) Official action by the commission requires the approval of a majority of the  voting members
of the commission.
(8) The Executive Director of the Oregon Historical Society or the executive director’s  designee
shall serve as chairperson.
(9) The Oregon Historical Society shall:
(a) Provide staff support to the commission.
(b) Direct and supervise the budgeting, recordkeeping, reporting and related administrative and
clerical functions of the commission.
(c) Print  and disseminate for the commission any required notices, rules or orders adopted by
the commission.
(d) Expend and allocate any appropriations authorized  by the Legislative Assembly to carry out
the purposes of this section.
(e) Collect all revenues other than those appropriated by the  Legislative Assembly and use them
for the purposes of this section.
(10) The Oregon Historical Society may employ personnel, contract for services  and receive,
expend and allocate the proceeds of gifts, grants and donations on behalf of the commission for the
purposes of this section.
(11) Voting members of the commission are entitled to compensation and expenses  as provided
in ORS 292.495.
(12) All agencies of state government, as defined in ORS  174.111, are directed to assist the
commission in the performance of the  duties of the commission and, to the extent permitted by laws
relating to confidentiality, to furnish  information and advice that the members of the commission
consider necessary to perform their duties.
(13) No later than September 15 of each year, the commission shall submit a  report in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to
historical commemorations. The report may include recommendations for legislation.
SECTION 43.
 Section 4, chapter 95, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 6,  chapter 95,
Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  (1) A youth advisory group is established for the purposes of this section.
(2)(a) The [ Deputy] Superintendent of Public Instruction,  in consultation with current members
of the youth  advisory group, shall select members of the youth advisory group as provided by this
subsection. The term of office of each member is one year.
(b) The majority of the members of the youth  advisory group must be youth between the ages
of 14  and 18 years of age during their term of service on the youth advisory group. The youth
members of the youth advisory group must include two youth  from each education service district
identified in ORS 334.013.
[39]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) When selecting the members of the youth advisory group, the  [ Deputy] Superintendent of
Public Instruction shall:
(A) Consult with the Youth Development Division, the Oregon Health Authority and the  Racial
Justice Council to select members  of the youth advisory group who are one or more of the following:
(i) Youth and staff representing tribal youth councils;
(ii) Youth and staff representing youth and student leadership organizations;
(iii) Youth and staff representing alternative education pathways;
(iv) Youth from immigrant and refugee communities;
(v) Individuals representing culturally and ethnically specific community-based organizations,
including organizations that assist immigrant and refugee communities;
(vi) Individuals who are  administrators, teachers and other school staff who support youth and
student leadership in public schools, including education service districts, school districts,  schools
and youth reengagement programs;
(vii) Youth who serve as advisors  to the State Board of Education or serve on Department of
Education work groups related to student success initiatives;
(viii) Youth who serve on the Youth Development  Council or who participate in Youth Devel-
opment Division programs;
(ix) Youth who serve on Oregon Health Authority work groups;
(x) Youth who serve on Racial Justice Council work groups; and
(xi) Additional members identified and recommended by the youth advisory group.
(B) Consult with the Youth Development  Division to select members of the youth advisory group
who are youth who have been reengaged  and to select program staff who support the statewide
youth reengagement  system developed and administered by the division under ORS 417.859 or who
otherwise provide education opportunities to youth or support the educational success of youth.
(d) In addition to the  members of the youth advisory group described in paragraphs (b) and (c)
of this subsection, the youth advisory  group may include any other members identified and recom-
mended by the youth advisory group and selected by the [ Deputy] Superintendent of  Public Instruc-
tion.
(e) The [ Deputy] Superintendent of Public Instruction may provide for alternate members for the
youth members of the youth advisory group described in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(f)(A) When making selections under this subsection, the [ Deputy] Superintendent  of Public In-
struction must ensure that:
(i) At least 70 percent of the members of the youth advisory  group have lived experiences with,
or a demonstrated understanding of, issues facing persons who are from racial or ethnic communities
that historically have been, or currently are, underrepresented or underserved;
(ii) At least 50 percent of  the youth members of the youth advisory group from each of the re-
gions identified in paragraph  (b) of this subsection have lived experiences with, or a demonstrated
understanding of, issues facing persons who are from racial or  ethnic communities that historically
have been, or currently are, underrepresented or underserved; and
(iii) The youth members of the youth advisory group must include youth who:
(I) Have lived experiences with, or  a demonstrated understanding of, issues facing persons who
identify as lesbian, gay,  bisexual, transgender, queer, two-spirit, intersex, asexual, nonbinary or an-
other minority gender identity or sexual orientation;
(II) Are English language learners;
(III) Are identified as being a child with a disability, as defined in ORS 343.035;
[40]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(IV) Are navigating poverty;
(V) Are a foster child or have a parent involved in the criminal justice system; or
(VI) Have  experienced disproportionate results in education due to historical practices, as
identified by the State Board of Education by rule.
(B) For the purpose of this paragraph, racial or ethnic communities  that historically have been,
or currently are, underrepresented or underserved include communities for which  a statewide edu-
cation plan has been developed and implemented.
(g) A member of the youth  advisory group may be selected for up to two terms. If there is a
vacancy for any cause,  the [ Deputy] Superintendent of Public Instruction, in consultation with other
members of the youth advisory group, shall make  a selection to become immediately effective for the
unexpired term.
(3) The Department of Education  shall ensure that each youth member of the youth advisory
group:
(a) Receives sufficient support to enable participation in youth advisory group meetings,  in-
cluding:
(A) Reimbursement  for actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred in the per-
formance of official duties in the manner and amounts provided in ORS 292.495; and
(B) Funding for any expenses  not otherwise reimbursed under subparagraph (A) of this para-
graph; and
(b) Has resources available to reimburse  any adult who provides transportation or other sup-
ports in helping the youth member to participate in the youth advisory group.
(4) The youth advisory group, with support from the Department of  Education, shall take into
consideration racial equity and justice and align with other statewide efforts for  racial equity and
justice when performing the following duties:
(a) Developing the youth advisory group’s goals, success criteria and progress  measures related
to youth and student leadership and engagement in the policymaking process  in this state. When
performing the duties described in this paragraph, the youth advisory group may modify the  youth
advisory group’s decision-making process, scope of  work, work plans and meeting structures, and the
roles and responsibilities of youth advisory group members.
(b) Examining current Department  of Education, Youth Development Division and Oregon
Health Authority initiatives and  practices related to youth and student leadership and engagement
in the policymaking process and making recommendations on  how to elevate and support youth and
student leadership and youth-led and student-led  accountability in the policymaking process at the
state and local level. When performing the duties described in this paragraph, the youth  advisory
group must give careful consideration to youth and student leadership and to engagement by youth
described in subsection (2)(f)(A)(ii)  and (iii) of this section. The youth advisory group may recom-
mend methods for evaluating current initiatives, practices and progress relating to youth and  stu-
dent leadership and engagement at the state level.
(c) Connecting with youth  and student leaders and exploring youth and student leadership net-
works, including  culturally and ethnically specific, community-based models and Youth Development
Division programs, to identify best practices in youth-led and student-led accountability in this state
and on a national level. Based on the performance of the duties described  in this paragraph, the
youth advisory group shall  make recommendations to the State Board of Education, the Youth De-
velopment Council, the Legislative Assembly and the Governor on  how to support youth and student
leadership networks on a  regional level for the purposes of connecting youths with youth organiza-
[41]
HB 3451
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
tions, connecting students with  student organizations, elevating youth and student leadership and
voice and supporting youth-led and student-led accountability, with special  consideration given to
youth described in subsection (2)(f)(A)(ii) and (iii) of this section.
(d) Helping the Department of  Education, the Youth Development Division and the Oregon
Health Authority with the surveys that are administered to youth and  students by assisting with
reviews of the findings  and making recommendations on the content and administration of the sur-
veys.
(e) Evaluating current processes in this  state to identify best practices for youth and students
reporting a bias incident as defined in ORS  147.380 or a hate or bias crime. Based on the perform-
ance of the  duty described in this paragraph, the youth advisory group shall make recommendations
for providing support to youth and students who have experienced bias incidents or  hate or bias
crimes.
(f) Reporting on the youth advisory  group’s work, progress and recommendations to the Legis-
lative Assembly and the Governor every two years and providing interim updates to youth and stu-
dent leadership networks and organizations, education service districts, school districts and local
entities that serve youth and students.
(5)(a) The youth advisory group shall meet at least six  times each year on the dates determined
by a majority of the members of the youth advisory group. The youth  advisory group shall also meet
at other times specified or requested by a majority of the members of the youth advisory group.
(b) The youth advisory group shall meet in  the place and manner determined by a majority of
the members of the youth advisory group. All or part of the members of  the youth advisory group
may attend the meetings electronically, unless otherwise provided by a majority  of the members of
the youth advisory group.
(6) The Department of Education shall:
(a) Provide staff support to the youth advisory group; and
(b) Support youth advisory group members in participating in the youth advisory group.
SECTION 44.
The amendments to ORS 171.130,  171.133, 171.735, 173.130, 176.350, 240.205,
244.042, 244.050, 249.002, 249.056, 249.215,  251.170, 254.005, 254.650, 258.036, 258.055, 258.150,
260.005, 260.076, 292.010, 292.311, 292.316, 292.430, 292.930,  326.555, 327.506, 339.331, 343.465,
343.499, 357.021, 418.979,  461.180 and 660.505 and section 1, chapter 113, Oregon Laws 2018,
section 1, chapter 54, Oregon Laws  2024, and section 4, chapter 95, Oregon Laws 2024, by
sections 7 to 43 of this 2025 Act apply only to the Superintendent of  Public Instruction who
takes office on or after January 4, 2027.
[42]