Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 279C.800 is amended to read:
279C.800. As used in ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870:
(1) “Fringe benefits” means:
(a) Contributions that a contractor or subcontractor  makes irrevocably to a trustee or to a third
person under a plan, fund or program; and
(b) Costs that a contractor or subcontractor may  reasonably be anticipated to incur in providing
the following items, except for items that federal, state or local law requires the contractor or sub-
contractor to provide:
(A) Benefits to workers pursuant  to an enforceable written commitment to the workers to carry
out a financially responsible plan or program for:
(i) Medical or hospital care;
(ii) Pensions on retirement or death; or
(iii) Compensation for injuries or illness that result from occupational activity;
(B) Insurance to provide the benefits described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;
(C) Unemployment benefits;
(D) Life insurance;
(E) Disability and sickness insurance or accident insurance;
(F) Vacation and holiday pay;
(G) Costs of apprenticeship or other similar programs; or
(H) Other bona fide fringe benefits.
(2) “Housing” has the meaning given that term in ORS 456.055.
(3) “Locality” means the following district in which the public works, or the major  portion of
the public works, is to be performed:
(a) District 1, composed of Clatsop, Columbia and Tillamook Counties;
(b) District 2, composed of Clackamas, Multnomah and Washington Counties;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2719
HB 2583
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) District 3, composed of Marion, Polk and Yamhill Counties;
(d) District 4, composed of Benton, Lincoln and Linn Counties;
(e) District 5, composed of Lane County;
(f) District 6, composed of Douglas County;
(g) District 7, composed of Coos and Curry Counties;
(h) District 8, composed of Jackson and Josephine Counties;
(i) District 9, composed of Hood River, Sherman and Wasco Counties;
(j) District 10, composed of Crook, Deschutes and Jefferson Counties;
(k) District 11, composed of Klamath and Lake Counties;
(L) District 12, composed of Gilliam, Grant, Morrow, Umatilla and Wheeler Counties;
(m) District 13, composed of Baker, Union and Wallowa Counties; and
(n) District 14, composed of Harney and Malheur Counties.
(4) “Prevailing rate of wage” means the rate of hourly wage, including all fringe benefits,  that
the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries determines is paid in the  locality to the
majority of workers employed on projects of a similar character in the same trade or occupation.
(5) “Public agency” means the State of  Oregon or a political subdivision of the State of Oregon,
or a county, city,  district, authority, public corporation or public entity organized and existing under
law or charter or an instrumentality of  the county, city, district, authority, public corporation or
public entity.
(6)(a) “Public works” includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Roads, highways, buildings, structures  and improvements of all types, the construction, re-
construction, major renovation or painting of which is carried on or contracted for by any  public
agency to serve the public interest;
(B) A project that uses $750,000  or more of funds of a public agency for constructing, recon-
structing, painting or performing a major renovation on a  road, highway, building, structure or im-
provement of any type;
(C) A project that uses funds of a private  entity for constructing a privately owned road, high-
way, building, structure  or improvement of any type in which a public agency will use or occupy
25 percent or more of the square footage of the completed project;
(D) Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS 279C.810 (2)(a), (b) and (c),  a device, structure or
mechanism, or a combination of devices, structures or mechanisms, that:
(i) Uses solar radiation as a source for generating heat, cooling or electrical energy; and
(ii) Is constructed or installed, with  or without using funds of a public agency, on land, premises,
structures or buildings that a public body, as defined in ORS 174.109, owns; [ or]
(E) Notwithstanding paragraph (b)(A) of this subsection and ORS 279C.810 (2)(b)  and (c), con-
struction, reconstruction, painting or major renovation of a road,  highway, building, structure or
improvement of any type  that occurs, with or without using funds of a public agency, on real prop-
erty that a public university listed in ORS 352.002 owns[ .]; or
(F) A project for constructing, reconstructing or performing a major renovation  on a
privately owned road, highway, building, structure or improvement of any type that:
(i) Is located in an enterprise zone, as defined in ORS 285C.050;
(ii) Consists of or is sited on real  property for which a qualified business firm, as defined
in ORS 285C.050, has received or will receive an exemption from ad valorem property taxation
under ORS 285C.170 or 285C.175 in connection with the project; and
(iii) Has a total project cost that the contracting agency that funds the project, or the
[2]
HB 2583
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
lead contracting agency if more than one contracting agency  participates in the project,
reasonably estimates will equal or exceed $5 million.
(b) “Public works” does not include:
(A) Reconstructing or renovating privately owned property that a public agency leases; or
(B) A private nonprofit entity’s renovation of publicly owned  real property that is more than 75
years old if:
(i) The real property is leased to the private nonprofit entity for more than 25 years;
(ii) Funds of a public agency used in the renovation do not  exceed 15 percent of the total cost
of the renovation; and
(iii) Contracts for the renovation were advertised or,  if not advertised, were entered into before
July 1, 2003, but the renovation has not been completed on or before July 13, 2007.
(7) “Sponsor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 285C.050.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 279C.810 is amended to read:
279C.810. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Funds of a public agency” does not include:
(A) Funds provided in  the form of a government grant to a nonprofit organization, unless the
government grant is issued for  the purpose of construction, reconstruction, major renovation or
painting;
(B) Building and  development permit fees [ paid or waived by the ] that a  public agency  pays or
waives;
(C) Tax  credits or tax abatements , except for exemptions from ad valorem property taxation
allowed under ORS 285C.170 or 285C.175;
(D) Land that a public agency sells to a private entity at fair market value;
(E) The difference between:
(i) The value of land that a public agency sells to a private entity as determined at the time  of
the sale  after taking into account any plan, requirement, covenant, condition, restriction or other
limitation, exclusive of zoning or land  use regulations, that the public agency imposes on the de-
velopment or use of the land; and
(ii) The fair market value of the land if the land  is not subject to the limitations described in
sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph;
(F) Staff resources [ of the ] a public agency [ used] uses to :
(i) Manage a  project or to provide a principal source of supervision, coordination or oversight
of a project;  or
[(G)] (ii) [ Staff resources of  the public agency used to ] Design or inspect one or more components
of a project;
[(H)] (G) Moneys derived from the sale of  bonds that [ are loaned by ] a state agency loans to a
private entity, unless the moneys will be used for a public improvement;
[(I)] (H) Value added to land as a consequence of a public  agency’s site preparation, demolition
of real property or remediation or removal of  environmental contamination, except for value added
in excess of the expenses the public agency incurred in the site preparation, demolition  or remedi-
ation or removal when the land  is sold for use in a project otherwise subject to ORS 279C.800 to
279C.870; or
[(J)] (I) Bonds, or loans from  the proceeds of bonds, issued in accordance with ORS chapter 289
or ORS 441.525 to 441.595, unless the bonds or loans will be used for a public improvement.
(b) “Nonprofit  organization” means an organization or group of organizations described in sec-
[3]
HB 2583
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tion 501(c)(3) of the Internal  Revenue Code that is exempt from income tax under section 501(a) of
the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870 do not apply to:
(a) [Projects ] A project  for which the contract price does not exceed  $50,000. In determining the
price of a project, a public agency:
(A) May not include the value of donated materials or work [ performed on the project by ] that
individuals [ volunteering] who volunteer to the public agency perform on the project  without pay;
and
(B) Shall include the value of work [ performed by every person paid by ] for which a contractor
or subcontractor pays a person  in any manner for the person’s work on the project.
(b) Projects for which [ no] funds of a public agency  are not directly or indirectly used. In ac-
cordance with ORS chapter 183, the  Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries shall adopt
rules to carry out the provisions of this paragraph.
(c) [ Projects ] A project :
(A) That [ are] is privately owned;
(B) That [ use] uses funds of a private entity;
(C) In which a public agency will occupy or use  less than 25 percent of  the square footage
of [ a] the completed project [ will be occupied or used by a public agency ]; and
(D) For which less than $750,000 of funds of a public agency are used.
(d) [ Projects ] A project  for residential construction that [ are] is privately owned and that pre-
dominantly [ provide] provides affordable housing. As used in this paragraph:
(A) “Affordable housing” means  housing that serves occupants whose incomes are [ no] not
greater than 60 percent of the  area median income or, if the occupants are owners, whose incomes
are [ no] not greater than 80 percent of the area median income.
(B) “Predominantly” means 60 percent or more.
(C) “Privately owned” [ includes] means :
(i) Affordable housing provided on  real property owned by a public agency if the real property
and related structures are leased to a private entity for 50 or more years; and
(ii) Affordable housing owned by a partnership,  nonprofit corporation or limited liability com-
pany in which a housing authority, as defined in ORS 456.005, is a general partner,  director or
managing member and the housing authority is  not a majority owner in the partnership, nonprofit
corporation or limited liability company.
(D) “Residential construction”  [ includes] means the construction, reconstruction, major reno-
vation or painting of  single-family houses or apartment buildings not more than four stories in
height and all incidental items, such as site work, parking areas, utilities, streets  and sidewalks,
pursuant to the United States Department of Labor’s “All Agency Memorandum No. 130: Applica-
tion of  the Standard of Comparison “Projects of a Character Similar” Under Davis-Bacon and Re-
lated Acts,”  dated March 17, 1978. However, the commissioner may consider different definitions of
residential construction in determining whether a project  is a residential construction project for
purposes of this paragraph, including definitions that:
(i) Exist in local ordinances or codes; or
(ii) Differ, in the prevailing practice of a particular trade  or occupation, from the United States
Department of Labor’s description of residential construction.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 279C.827 is amended to read:
279C.827. (1)(a) A public agency or a person that under ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870 must pay
[4]
HB 2583
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a prevailing rate of wage on public  works may not divide a public works project into more than
one contract for the purpose of avoiding compliance with ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870.
(b) [ When] If the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries  determines that a public
agency or a person that  under ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870 must pay a prevailing rate of wage
on public works  has divided a public works project into more than one contract for the purpose
of avoiding compliance with ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870, the commissioner shall issue an order [ com-
pelling] to compel compliance.
(c) In making determinations under this subsection, the commissioner shall consider:
(A) The physical separation of the project structures;
(B) The timing of the work on project phases or structures;
(C) The continuity of project  contractors and subcontractors working on project parts or phases;
(D) The  manner in which the public agency or person that under ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870
must pay a prevailing rate of wage on  public works  and the contractors administer and imple-
ment the project;
(E) Whether a single public works  project includes several types of improvements or structures;
and
(F) Whether the combined improvements or structures have an overall purpose or function.
(2) If a project is a public works  of the type described in ORS 279C.800 (6)(a)(B) or (C), the
commissioner , after applying the considerations set forth in subsection  (1)(c) of this section,
shall divide the project, if appropriate, [ after applying the considerations set forth in subsection  (1)(c)
of this section ] to separate the parts  of the project that [ include] use funds of a public agency or that
a public agency  will [ be occupied or used by  a public agency ] occupy or use  from the parts of the
project that do not [ include] use funds of  a public agency and that a public agency  will not [ be
occupied or used by a public agency ] occupy or use . If the commissioner divides the project, any part
of the project that does not [ include] use funds of a public agency and that a public agency  will
not [ be occupied or used by a  public agency ] occupy or use  is not subject to ORS 279C.800 to
279C.870.
(3) If a project includes parts that  [ are owned by ] a public agency owns and parts that [ are
owned by ] a private entity  owns, the commissioner , after applying the considerations set forth
in subsections (1)(c) and (2) of this section,  shall divide  the project, if appropriate, [ after applying
the considerations set forth in subsections (1)(c) and (2) of this section ] to separate the parts of  the
project that are public works  from the parts of the project that are not public works. If the com-
missioner divides the project, parts of the project that are not public works are not  subject to ORS
279C.800 to 279C.870.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 279C.845 is amended to read:
279C.845. (1) [ The] A contractor or the contractor’s surety and every  subcontractor or the
subcontractor’s surety shall  file certified statements [ with the public agency ] in writing, on a form
[prescribed by ] the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries[ , certifying: ] prescribes,
with one of the following, as appropriate:
(a) The public agency that awarded the  contract for public works to which the contractor
is a party. If the project is a public works  as defined in ORS 279C.800 (6)(a)(B) or (C), the
contractor shall submit the certified  statements to the public agency that provided public
funds for the project or that will use or occupy 25 percent or  more of the square footage of
the completed project. If more than one public agency provided public funds for the project
or will use or occupy 25 percent or more of the square footage of the  completed project, the
[5]
HB 2583
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
public agencies involved shall agree upon  which public agency will receive the certified
statements.
(b) The sponsor of the enterprise zone in which the public works project is located.  If
more than  one sponsor participated in designating the enterprise zone, the participating
sponsors shall agree upon which sponsor shall receive the certified statements.
(2) The certified statements must certify:
(a) The hourly rate of wage paid each  worker whom the contractor or the subcontractor has
employed upon the public works; and
(b) That no worker employed upon the public works has been paid less  than the prevailing rate
of wage or less than the minimum hourly rate of wage specified in the contract.
[(2)] (3) [The certified statement shall be verified by the oath of ] The contractor or the contractor’s
surety or the subcontractor or the subcontractor’s surety shall verify certified statements by
oath, attesting that the contractor or  subcontractor has read the certified [ statement]
statements , that the contractor or subcontractor knows the  contents of the certified [ statement]
statements  and that  to the contractor or subcontractor’s knowledge the certified [ statement is ]
statements are  true.
[(3)] (4) The certified statements shall set out accurately and completely the contractor’s or
subcontractor’s payroll records, including the name  and address of each worker, the worker’s cor-
rect classification, rate of pay, daily and weekly number of hours worked and the gross wages the
worker earned upon the public works during each week identified in the certified statement.
[(4)] (5) The contractor or subcontractor shall deliver  or mail [ each] the certified [ statement]
statements  required by subsection (1) of this section to the public  agency  or to the sponsor .
Certified statements for each week during which the contractor or subcontractor employs  a worker
upon the public works [ shall] must be submitted once a month, by the fifth business day of the fol-
lowing  month.  Information submitted on certified statements may be used only to ensure compliance
with the provisions of ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870.
[(5)] (6) Each contractor or subcontractor shall preserve the  certified statements for a period
of three years from the date of completion of the contract.
[(6)] (7) Certified statements [ received by ] that a public agency or a sponsor receives  are public
records subject to the provisions of ORS 192.410 to 192.505.
[(7)] (8) Notwithstanding ORS 279C.555 or 279C.570 (7),  if a contractor [ is required to ] must file
certified statements with a public agency  under  this section, the public agency shall retain 25
percent of any amount [ earned by ] the contractor earns on the public works  until the contractor
has filed  with the public agency certified statements as required by this section. The public agency
shall pay the contractor the  amount retained under this subsection within 14 days after the con-
tractor files the certified statements as required by this section, regardless of whether a subcon-
tractor has failed to file certified statements as required by  this section. [ The public agency is not
required to verify the truth of  the contents of certified statements filed by the contractor under this
section.]
[(8)] (9) Notwithstanding ORS 279C.555, the  contractor shall retain 25 percent of any amount
[earned by ] a first-tier subcontractor earns on a  public works until the subcontractor has filed with
the public agency certified statements as required by this section. The contractor shall verify that
the first-tier subcontractor  has filed the certified statements before the contractor may pay the
subcontractor [ any] an amount the contractor  retained under this subsection. The contractor shall
pay the first-tier subcontractor the amount the contractor  retained  under this subsection within
[6]
HB 2583
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
14 days after the subcontractor files the certified statements as  required by this section. [ Neither the
public agency nor the contractor  is required to verify the truth of the contents of certified statements
filed by a first-tier subcontractor under this section. ]
(10) This section does not require:
(a) A public agency or sponsor to verify the truth  of the contents of a contractor’s cer-
tified statements; or
(b) A public agency, a sponsor or a contractor to verify the truth of  the contents of a
subcontractor’s certified statements.
SECTION 5.
The amendments to ORS  279C.800, 279C.810, 279C.827 and 279C.845 by
sections 1 to 4 of this  2017 Act apply to contracts for public works that are first advertised
or otherwise solicited or, if the contract  for public works is not advertised or solicited, to a
contract for public  works that is first entered into on or after the operative date specified
in section 6 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 6. (1) The amendments to ORS 279C.800, 279C.810, 279C.827 and 279C.845 by
sections 1 to 4 of this 2017 Act become operative 91 days after the effective  date of this 2017
Act.
(2) A sponsor, as defined in ORS 285C.050, a public agency that  adopts rules under ORS
279A.065 or the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor  and Industries may take any action
before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable
the sponsor, the public agency or the  commissioner to exercise, on and after the operative
date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers con-
ferred on the sponsor, the  public agency or the commissioner by the amendments to ORS
279C.800, 279C.810, 279C.827 and 279C.845 by sections 1 to 4 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 7. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[7]