Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Human Services,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $3,000,000, which shall be expended for the purposes of im-
plementing section 2 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1)(a) The Department of Human Services  shall contract with a nonprofit
organization to implement and administer a program to  assist recipients who are eligible to
receive supplemental nutrition assistance provided by the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program under ORS 411.806 to 411.845 in purchasing locally grown fruits and  vegetables from
farmers’ markets, farm share sites and retail food outlets that participate in the program.
(b) The department shall contract with  a nonprofit organization that provides low-income
populations with greater access to fresh,  locally grown foods and that has established re-
lationships with farmers’ markets, farm share sites and retail food  outlets that participate
in the program.
(2) The department shall distribute to the nonprofit organization that has contracted
with the department under this section the funds appropriated under section  1 of this 2021
Act to:
(a) Carry out the implementation and administration of the program; and
(b) Match the amounts that a recipient spends on foods  that are eligible for supplemental
nutrition assistance.
(3)(a) The nonprofit organization  that has contracted with the department under this
section shall review the outcomes of the program,  including the program’s impact on the
purchase of locally grown fruits and vegetables by recipients of assistance under the Sup-
plemental Nutrition Assistance Program.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 869
HB 2292
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
(b) The  nonprofit organization shall prepare and submit to the department a report con-
taining the organization’s findings no  later than December 31, 2023. The department shall
make the report available to the public on the department’s website.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2024.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]