Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 448.405 to
448.465.
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of Environmental Quality, in consultation with public
and private stakeholders, shall develop a program  for examination and certification of oper-
ators of lagoon wastewater treatment systems under ORS 448.410. The examination must be
limited to topics relevant to the operation  of a lagoon wastewater treatment system. The
department may contract with a third party to develop the examination.
(2) A person who has one year of experience in the  performance of the duties of a sewage
treatment works operator, or that meets other  education and experience requirements es-
tablished by the department, shall be eligible for certification under ORS 448.410 as a lagoon
wastewater treatment system operator after receiving a passing score on  the examination
developed under this section.
(3) The department shall make a person’s  results on the examination, including questions
answered correctly and incorrectly, available to the person upon request.
(4) The department  shall regularly review the examination and examination results to
ensure that examination  topics remain current and relevant to the operation of a lagoon
wastewater treatment system. The department shall consult with  relevant stakeholders be-
fore updating examination questions.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4091