Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 317.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “De novo bank” means a depository institution, as defined in 12 U.S.C. 1813(c), that:
(A) Was first issued a charter  or certificate of authority to conduct banking business and
commenced business in  this state during the current tax year or in either of the two im-
mediately preceding tax years; and
(B) Is chartered in Oregon.
(b) “De novo bank” does not include a bank that is  formed by, merged with or converted
by a taxpayer that has filed a return under this chapter in any preceding tax year.
(2) A credit against taxes that are otherwise due  under this chapter is allowed to a tax-
payer that is a de novo bank.
(3) The credit allowed  under this section shall be computed by determining the amount
of tax that would otherwise be imposed on a de novo bank under this chapter, but  may not
exceed $1 million in each of three consecutive tax years, beginning with the tax year in which
the de novo bank commences business in this state.
(4) Prior to claiming the credit allowed under this section, a  taxpayer is required to
demonstrate having obtained, from the Director of the Department of Consumer  and Busi-
ness Services, a bank charter under ORS chapter 707  and a certificate of authority to con-
duct banking business in state.
(5) The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the tax  liability of the taxpayer
for the tax year.
(6) Any tax credit otherwise allowable under this section that is not  used by the taxpayer
in a particular tax year may be carried forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax  liability
for the next succeeding tax year. Any credit remaining unused in  the next succeeding tax
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4853
HB 3975
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
year may be carried forward and used in the second succeeding tax year, and likewise any
credit not used in that second succeeding  tax year may be carried forward and used in the
third succeeding tax year but may not be  carried forward for any other succeeding tax year.
(7) The Department of Consumer and Business  Services shall adopt rules for the pur-
poses of this  section, including policies and procedures for verifying taxpayer eligibility for
the credit allowed under this section.
(8) The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall provide  information to the
Department of Revenue about all taxpayers that are eligible  for a tax credit under this sec-
tion, if required by ORS 315.058.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 314.772 is amended to read:
314.772. (1) Except as provided in ORS 314.766 (5)(b), the tax credits allowed or allowable  to a
C corporation for purposes  of ORS chapter 317 or 318 shall not be allowed to an S corporation. The
business tax credits allowed or allowable for purposes of ORS chapter 316 shall be allowed  or are
allowable to the shareholders of the S corporation.
(2) In determining the tax imposed under ORS chapter 316, as provided under ORS 314.763, on
income of the  shareholder of an S corporation, there shall be taken into account the shareholder’s
pro rata share of  business tax credit (or item thereof) that would be allowed to the corporation (but
for subsection (1) of this section) or  recapture or recovery thereof. The credit (or item thereof), re-
capture or recovery shall be passed through to shareholders in pro rata shares as determined in the
manner prescribed under section 1377(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) The character of any item included in a shareholder’s pro rata  share under subsection (2)
of this section shall be determined as if such item were realized  directly from the source from which
realized by the corporation, or incurred in the same manner as incurred by the corporation.
(4) If the shareholder is a nonresident and there is a requirement applicable  for the business tax
credit that in the case of a nonresident the credit be allowed  in the proportion provided in ORS
316.117, then that provision shall apply to the nonresident shareholder.
(5) As used in this section, “business  tax credit” means the following credits: ORS 315.104
(forestation and reforestation), ORS 315.124 (small forest option), ORS 315.133 (agricultural overtime
pay), ORS 315.138 (fish screening, by-pass  devices, fishways), ORS 315.141 (biomass production for
biofuel), ORS  315.156 (crop gleaning), ORS 315.164 and 315.169 (agriculture workforce housing), ORS
315.176 (bovine manure), ORS 315.204 (dependent care assistance), ORS 315.208 (dependent care fa-
cilities), ORS 315.213 (contributions for child care), ORS  315.237 (employee and dependent scholar-
ships), ORS 315.271  (individual development accounts), ORS 315.283 (affordable housing sales), ORS
315.304 (pollution control facility),  ORS 315.326 (renewable energy development contributions), ORS
315.331 (energy conservation  projects), ORS 315.336 (transportation projects), ORS 315.341
(renewable energy resource equipment  manufacturing facilities), ORS 315.354 and 469B.151 (energy
conservation facilities), ORS  315.506 (tribal taxes on reservation enterprise zones and reservation
partnership zones), ORS 315.507 (electronic commerce), ORS 315.514 (film production development
contributions), ORS 315.518 (semiconductors),  ORS 315.523 (employee training programs), ORS
315.533 (low income community jobs initiative), ORS 315.593 (short  line railroads), ORS 315.640
(university venture development funds), ORS 315.643 (Opportunity Grant Fund contributions), ORS
315.675 (Trust for Cultural Development Account contributions), ORS 317.097 (loans for affordable
housing), ORS 317.124 (long term enterprise zone facilities), ORS 317.147  (loans for agriculture
workforce housing), ORS 317.152  (qualified research expenses) and ORS 317.154 (alternative qualified
research  expenses)  and section 9, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2013 (alternative fuel vehicle contribu-
[2]
HB 3975
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
tions), and section 2 of this 2025 Act (de novo banks) .
SECTION 4.
 ORS 318.031 is amended to read:
318.031. It being the intention of the Legislative Assembly that this chapter and ORS chapter
317 shall be administered as uniformly as possible (allowance being  made for the difference in im-
position of the taxes), ORS 305.140 and 305.150, ORS chapter 314 and  the following sections are in-
corporated  into  and made a part of this chapter: ORS 315.104, 315.124, 315.133, 315.141, 315.156,
315.176, 315.204, 315.208, 315.213, 315.283, 315.304, 315.326, 315.331, 315.336, 315.506, 315.507, 315.523,
315.533, 315.593 and 315.643 and section 2  of this 2025 Act (all only to the extent applicable to a
corporation) and ORS chapter 317.
SECTION 5. Except as provided in section 2 (6) of this 2025 Act,  section 2 of this 2025
Act applies to  banks that commence business in this state in tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]