Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,000,000, to be  distributed by grant to
Oasis of Praise International Ministries, a domestic  nonprofit corporation, for the purpose
of acquiring, rehabilitating and renovating real property to be used for the sole purpose of
providing nonreligious community resources and services.
(2) Before issuing the  grant under this section, the department shall enter into a grant
agreement with the recipient that prohibits the recipient from using the  real property, and
any proceeds from the disposition of the real property, for religious or sectarian purposes.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 652