Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Transportation shall  study issues related to roads. The
department shall  submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include
recommendations for legislation, to the interim Joint Committee on Transportation no later
than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3621