Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 634.
SECTION 2. (1) Oregon  State University, in cooperation with the State Department of
Agriculture, shall develop a statewide program of  Spanish language pesticide education for
pesticide consultants, operators, applicators, noncommercial applicators, private applicators
and trainees.
(2) Educational materials and instruction provided under  the program must be consistent
with the programs of instruction and courses of study established under ORS 634.306 (8).
(3) Instruction provided in Spanish must include, but need  not be limited to, training
regarding:
(a) Worker protection standards established by the federal Environmental Protection
Agency;
(b) Best practices to protect water quality; and
(c) Other practices for the safe handling of  pesticides to protect worker health and the
environment.
(4) Educational materials provided in Spanish must include, but need not be limited to:
(a) Training materials;
(b) Study guides; and
(c) Web-based content.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $744,124, for distribution to Oregon State Uni-
versity to carry out section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3679