Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) For  the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after  the department consults with the Department
of State Lands, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds  pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585  in an amount that produces $______ in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated  by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred  to the
Department of State Lands to acquire and restore the operation of the Willamette  Falls
navigation canal and locks, directly or by contract or agreement  with public or private en-
tities.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will create  jobs,
further economic development, finance public  education or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding that
restoration of the  Willamette Falls navigation canal and locks will enhance the economic
viability of  the region, increase opportunities for commercial transportation and offer op-
portunities for recreation and transportation.
SECTION 2.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2876