Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Department of Administrative  Services shall issue a grant to a
nonprofit organization to plan and develop a community center that provides increased  ac-
cess to cultural enrichment, fosters the development of arts and  community in a safe and
compassionate space, provides language development opportunities and increases  access to
resources that are vital to economic and social success to speakers of  Vietnamese. Grant
funds may be used for the attainment of  a project manager and the purchase, lease and
renovation of property to house the community center.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, which may be  expended for pur-
poses of providing a grant under section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4376