Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 326.695 is amended to read:
326.695. (1) As used in [ ORS 326.700 and 326.712 ] this section :
[(1)] (a) “Juvenile Detention Education  Program” means the provision of educational services
to:
[(a)] (A) Youths placed in  a youth care center, as defined in ORS 420.855, that is within a de-
tention facility, as defined in ORS 419A.004; and
[(b)] (B) Youths lodged overnight who receive educational services on consecutive days within
a detention facility, as defined in ORS 419A.004.
[(2)] (b) “Youth Corrections Education Program”  means the provision of educational services to
youths in youth correction facilities, as defined in ORS 420.005.
(2) The Department of Education shall administer the Youth Corrections Education
Program and the Juvenile Detention Education Program in a manner that provides  youths
in those programs with a quality education.
(3)(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction may contract with  an education service
district or a school district to provide teachers,  counselors or other personnel for the Youth
Corrections Education Program and the Juvenile Detention Education Program.
(b) When a contract is entered into  with an education service district, the Youth Cor-
rections Education Program and the Juvenile Detention Education Program are  not consid-
ered a component district of the education service district and the  youths enrolled in the
programs may  not be counted when determining the number of pupils in average daily
membership for purposes of ORS 334.175 (5).
(4) When determining the amount  to be paid under a contract entered into as provided
by subsection (3) of this section, the following shall be taken into consideration:
(a) The number of youths to be provided educational services;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4427
HB 3595
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The characteristics of  the facility where the educational services will be provided,
including the number of classrooms required to provide educational services;
(c) The diversity of the  population of youths to be provided educational services, includ-
ing the number  and percentage of youths who are from historically underserved populations;
(d) The number  and percentage of youths to be provided educational services who qualify
for special education and related services; and
(e) The level of transition supports provided to the youths.
(5) The Department of Education shall use moneys in the Juvenile Justice  Education
Fund established under section 3 of this 2023 Act for the purpose  of paying contracts entered
into under this section.
(6) The State Board of Education shall  adopt rules necessary for the administration of
this section, including  establishing a process by which an education service district or a
school district may appeal the amount received under a contract  entered into under this
section.
SECTION 2.
Sections 3 and 4 of this 2023 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
chapter 327.
SECTION 3. (1) The Juvenile Justice Education Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) Moneys in the  Juvenile Justice Education Fund are continuously appropriated to the
Department of Education  for distribution to the Youth Corrections Education Program and
the Juvenile Detention Education Program, as those  terms are defined in ORS 326.695, to
provide educational services to youths in those programs  under contracts entered into as
provided by ORS 326.695.
(3) The Juvenile Justice Education Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys allocated from the State  School Fund for students enrolled in the Youth
Corrections Education Program and the Juvenile Detention Education Program under ORS
327.026;
(b) Moneys made available for the Youth Corrections  Education Program and the Juve-
nile Detention Education Program from the Statewide Education Initiatives Account  under
ORS 327.254;
(c) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assem-
bly; and
(d) Other amounts deposited into the Juvenile Justice Education Fund from any source.
SECTION 4.
(1) No later than August 31 of each even-numbered year,  the Department
of Education shall prepare a target funding level for  the following biennium for the Youth
Corrections Education  Program and the Juvenile Detention Education Program, as those
terms are defined in ORS 326.695.
(2)(a) The target funding level shall be calculated by multiplying:
(A) The average per classroom funding level across all providers of educational services
under the Youth Corrections Education Program and the Juvenile Detention Education
Program; and
(B) The number of classrooms the Department of Education expects to be in operation
for the following biennium.
(b) For the purpose of determining the average per classroom funding level under para-
graph (a) of this subsection, the department shall  determine the average per classroom
[2]
HB 3595
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
funding level for the school year that ended June 30 before the target funding  level is pre-
pared and shall adjust that amount based  on the percentage by which the amount appropri-
ated to the State School Fund increased for the current  biennium as compared with the
amount appropriated for the biennium preceding the current biennium.
(3) The department shall estimate the expected  difference between the target funding
level calculated under subsection (2)  of this section and the amount anticipated to be allo-
cated for the Youth Corrections Education  Program and the Juvenile Detention Education
Program from the State School Fund under ORS 327.026. If, after all  other funding available
for the programs has been accounted for, the  department determines that the amount re-
quired for the target funding level has not been met, the department may transfer  from the
Statewide Education Initiatives Account to the  Juvenile Justice Education Fund any needed
amounts.
(4) If, at any time during the biennium, the  amount available in the Juvenile Justice
Education Fund and from other sources is not sufficient to pay for costs incurred  in relation
to the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program,
the department shall inform the Legislative Assembly or the Emergency Board of the lack
of funding and shall provide an accounting of the amount needed to pay those costs.
(5) The department shall submit  to the Legislative Assembly and the Office of the Gov-
ernor a report that explains the target funding level calculated under this section.  When
applicable, the report shall include any determinations by the  department that the amounts
available for the Youth Corrections Education Program and the  Juvenile Detention Educa-
tion Program will not be adequate to pay the costs of the programs.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 327.026 is amended to read:
327.026. [(1) In order to accomplish the purpose described in ORS 326.700, the  State Board of
Education shall adopt by rule definitions and procedures to be applied to the computation of the  State
School Fund allocations where necessary to make students enrolled  in the Youth Corrections Education
Program, as defined in ORS 326.695, and the Juvenile Detention Education Program,  as defined in
ORS 326.695, equivalent to students enrolled in common and union high school districts for purposes
of distribution of the fund. ]
(1) The State Board of Education shall adopt by rule definitions and  procedures to be
applied to the computation of State School Fund allocations for  students enrolled in the
Youth Corrections Education Program and the Juvenile Detention Education Program, as
those terms are defined in ORS 326.695. The  computations shall be equivalent to students
enrolled in common and union high school districts.
(2)(a) The Youth Corrections Education Program shall receive from the  State School Fund for
each school year  a special State School Fund grant, consisting of a general purpose grant that is
equal to the Youth Corrections Education Program extended  ADMw multiplied by Funding Per-
centage and further multiplied by Statewide  Target per ADMw Grant. For the purpose of the cal-
culation made under this paragraph:
(A) ADMw  equals ADM multiplied by 2.0 multiplied by the additional per student weight, as
calculated in ORS 327.013 (1)(c)(A)(i).
(B) Extended ADMw equals ADMw or ADMw of the prior year, whichever is greater.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the Youth  Corrections Education Program
may not receive moneys under this section from the State  School Fund for any youth in the program
who:
[3]
HB 3595
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Has received a high school diploma; or
(B) Is 21 years of age or older.
(3) The  Juvenile Detention Education Program shall receive from the State School Fund for each
school year a special State School Fund grant, consisting of a general purpose grant  that is equal
to the Juvenile Detention  Education Program extended ADMw multiplied by Funding Percentage
and further multiplied  by Statewide Target per ADMw Grant. For the purpose of the calculation
made under this subsection:
(a) ADMw equals ADM multiplied by 1.5.
(b) Extended ADMw equals ADMw or ADMw of the prior year, whichever is greater.
(4) Funds allocated to the Youth  Corrections Education Program and the Juvenile Detention
Education Program from the State School Fund shall [ remain with the Department of Education
and] be deposited in the Juvenile Justice Education Fund. The  amount of funds to be allo-
cated shall be  adjusted in the year following the distribution to reflect the actual ADMw of students
in the Youth Corrections Education Program and the Juvenile Detention Education Program in  the
same manner as for the school districts under ORS 327.101.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 327.254 is amended to read:
327.254. (1) The Department of Education shall use  moneys in the Statewide Education Initi-
atives Account to provide funding for statewide education initiatives, including:
(a) Funding the High School Graduation and College and Career Readiness Act at the levels
prescribed by ORS 327.856;
(b) Expanding school breakfast and lunch programs;
(c) Operating youth reengagement programs or providing youth reengagement services;
(d) Establishing and maintaining  the Statewide School Safety and Prevention System under ORS
339.341;
(e) Developing and providing statewide equity initiatives, including the Black  or African-
American education plan developed under ORS 329.841, the American Indian or Alaska Native  edu-
cation plan developed under  ORS 329.843, the Latino or Hispanic education plan developed under
ORS 329.845 or any similar education plan identified by the department;
(f) Providing summer learning programs at schools  that are considered high poverty under Title
I of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965;
(g) Funding early warning systems to assist students in  graduating from high school, as de-
scribed in ORS 327.367;
(h) Developing and implementing professional development programs and  training programs, in-
cluding programs that increase educator diversity and retain diverse educators;
(i) Planning for increased transparency and accountability in the public  education system of this
state;
(j) Providing additional funding to school districts participating  in the intensive program under
ORS 327.222;
(k) Providing technical assistance, including costs incurred for:
(A) The coaching program described in ORS 327.214; and
(B) The intensive program described in ORS 327.222, including costs for student success teams;
(L) Funding public charter schools, as described in ORS 327.362;
(m) Funding education service districts, as described in subsection (2) of this section; [ and]
(n) Funding the Youth Corrections Education Program and the Juvenile Detention Edu-
cation Program through the Juvenile  Justice Education Fund established under section 3 of
[4]
HB 3595
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
this 2023 Act, when necessary as provided by section 4 of this 2023 Act; and
[(n)] (o) Funding costs incurred by the department in implementing  this section and ORS 327.175
to 327.235 and 327.274.
(2)(a) The amount of a distribution to an  education service district under this section shall be
made as provided by paragraph  (b) of this subsection after calculating the following for each edu-
cation service district:
(A) One percent of the  total amount available for distribution to education service districts in
each biennium.
(B) The education service district’s ADMw ×  (the total amount available for distribution to
education service districts in each biennium ÷  the total ADMw of all education  service districts
that receive a distribution).
(b) The amount of the distribution to an education service district shall be the greater of  the
amounts calculated under paragraph (a) of this subsection, except that, for distributions  made as
provided by paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, the  total amount available for distribution to edu-
cation service districts shall be the amount remaining after any  distributions required under para-
graph (a)(A) of this subsection have been made.
(c) For purposes  of this subsection, ADMw equals the ADMw as calculated under ORS 327.013,
except that the additional amount allowed for students who are in  poverty families, as determined
under ORS 327.013 (1)(c)(A)(v)(I), shall be 0.5.
(d) An education service district  shall use moneys received under this section as provided by a
plan developed by the school districts located within the education  service district. A school district
that declines to participate in the development of the plan or that has withdrawn from an education
service district as provided by  ORS 334.015 is not entitled to any moneys distributed to the educa-
tion service district under this subsection.
(e) A plan developed under this subsection must:
(A) Align with and support school districts  in meeting the performance growth targets of the
school districts developing the plan;
(B) Include the provision of technical assistance to school districts in  developing, implementing
and reviewing a plan for receiving a grant from the Student Investment Account;
(C) Provide for  coordination with the department in administering and providing technical as-
sistance to school  districts, including coordinating any coaching programs established under ORS
327.214; and
(D) Be  adopted and amended as provided for local service plans under ORS 334.175 and approved
by the department.
(f) Each education service district must submit an annual report to the department that:
(A) Describes how the education service district spent moneys received under  this subsection;
and
(B) Includes an evaluation of the education service district’s compliance with the plan  from the
superintendent of each school district that participated in the development of the plan.
(3) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules necessary for the distribution of moneys  un-
der this section.
SECTION 7.
ORS 326.700 and 326.712 are repealed.
[5]