Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “specie” means:
(a) Coin having gold or silver content; and
(b) Refined gold or silver bullion that is:
(A) Coined, stamped or imprinted with its weight and purity; and
(B) Valued primarily based on its metal content and not its form.
(2) Specie is legal tender in this state.
(3) Except as expressly provided by law or contract,  a person may not compel another
person to tender or accept specie.
SECTION 2.
Moneys received from the purchase, sale or exchange of specie, as defined
in section 1 of this 2025 Act, are exempt from taxes imposed under ORS chapters 316,  317,
317A and 318.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4262