Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 284.751 is amended to read:
284.751. (1) For [ the] purposes of this section, “Oregon  Solutions Network” means the Oregon
Solutions Network established pursuant to Executive Order 11-12 dated December 16, 2011, including
but not limited to regional advisory committees and regional solutions centers within the network.
(2) The Oregon Business Development  Department shall facilitate regional collaboration among
the University of Oregon, Oregon State University and the Oregon Solutions Network in Lane,  Linn
and Benton Counties, for  the purpose of assisting technology-based[ ,] start-up businesses in this state
[whose primary purpose is  to commercialize ] that have as a purpose the commercialization of
university-based or university-assisted research and [ to increase ] increasing the number [ of], and
[ensure] ensuring the retention , of[ ,] such businesses in the region.
(3) The collaboration facilitated under subsection (2) of this section  shall include, but not be
limited to, the following:
(a) Providing financial assistance to programs, entities and providers of technical business  de-
velopment and creation assistance  and providing support to technology-based[ ,] start-up businesses
[whose primary purpose is to commercialize ] that have as a purpose  the commercialization of
university-based or university-assisted research.
(b) Identifying and recruiting entrepreneurial talent, qualified investors and other sources  of
capital.
(c) Acquiring, procuring, furnishing or improving facilities in or near  Lane, Linn or Benton
Counties, as identified by the University of Oregon, Oregon State University and  the Oregon Sol-
utions Network, for  the operation or support of businesses receiving assistance under this section,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2840
SB 418
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
signature research centers and other businesses, programs and  entities involved in the
commercialization of university-based or university-assisted research.
(d) Establishing, connecting or expanding support programs, directly  or indirectly, that provide
assistance to technology-based[ ,] start-up businesses [ whose primary purpose is to commercialize ] that
have as a purpose the commercialization of  university-based  or university-assisted research
within and outside the region.
(4) The department may enter into contracts and agreements  with the University of Oregon,
Oregon State University and the Oregon Solutions Network for the purpose of implementing  and
accomplishing the objectives set forth in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The department shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000 for
the purposes described in section 3 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) As used in this section and section 4 of this 2019 Act:
(a) “OSU Advantage” means the Oregon State University Advantage Accelerator.
(b) “RAIN Eugene” means the Regional Accelerator & Innovation Network.
(2)(a) The Oregon Business Development  Department shall distribute the moneys appro-
priated under section 2 of this 2019 Act pro rata to  OSU Advantage and RAIN Eugene, or
their successor organizations, by whatever name called, to  be used for the respective pur-
poses for which OSU Advantage and RAIN Eugene were organized.
(b) The department shall distribute the  respective shares of the moneys directly to OSU
Advantage and RAIN Eugene and not through any intermediary, including a  division within
the department.  No conditions other than those contained in this section may be imposed
on the distributions.
(3) Distributions may not be made under subsection (2) of this  section unless OSU Ad-
vantage and RAIN Eugene each match  the moneys distributable under this section with an
equal amount of funds from Oregon State University or the University of Oregon, respec-
tively, local governments, the private sector, public or private grants or any other source.
(4)(a) Start-up businesses assisted by OSU Advantage and RAIN  Eugene with moneys
distributed under this section must be traded  sector businesses or businesses that have the
potential to become traded sector businesses.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a nontraded sector business may
be admitted to  a class, or allowed to use space or services, provided by OSU Advantage or
RAIN Eugene, if necessary to  fill a class or a rentable space or to make provision of the
services economically feasible.
SECTION 4.
(1) On or before September 15, 2020,  OSU Advantage and RAIN Eugene, or
their successor organizations,  by whatever name called, shall each submit a report in the
manner provided in ORS  192.245 to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to economic development.
(2) In the reports required under this section, OSU Advantage and  RAIN Eugene shall
each briefly set forth:
(a) The number of traded sector  start-up businesses, nontraded sector start-up busi-
nesses and start-up businesses that have the potential  to become traded sector businesses,
separately stated, that OSU Advantage or RAIN Eugene has assisted;
(b) The nature of the assistance provided,  including but not limited to funding, classes
[2]
SB 418
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
or other forms of training, space and personal services;
(c) Business  funding raised and the number of jobs created by start-up businesses after
completion of training by OSU Advantage or RAIN Eugene;
(d) Industry  sectors represented by the start-up businesses assisted by OSU Advantage
or RAIN Eugene; and
(e) Any other metric OSU Advantage or RAIN  Eugene considers important to be included
in the report.
SECTION 5. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]