Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Advocacy Commissions  Office, the Commission on Hispanic Af-
fairs, the  Commission on Black Affairs, the Commission for Women and the Commission on
Asian and Pacific Islander Affairs shall each employ at least one paid intern.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Advocacy  Commissions Office, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended for the purpose  of
employing paid interns under section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3948