Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Southern Oregon  Early Learning Services, the Early Learning Hub for
Jackson and Josephine  Counties, shall administer a pilot program, the Southern Oregon
Early Childhood Support Network, to coordinate resources and supports offered to  low-
income pregnant individuals and families with children under five years of age by:
(a) Coordinated care organizations serving Jackson and Josephine Counties;
(b) The systems of care, as defined in ORS 418.976, for Jackson and Josephine Counties;
(c) Public health home visiting programs;
(d) The Child Care Resource Network  within the Southern Oregon Education Service
District;
(e) Child care centers;
(f) Preschools;
(g) The Family Connection;
(h) Local school districts;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1268
HB 2726
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
(i) Rogue Community College;
(j) Southern Oregon University;
(k) The Asante and Providence hospitals and health systems;
(L) Local federally qualified health centers;
(m) Southern Oregon Pediatrics;
(n) Local recovery centers and organizations;
(o) Community-based organizations;
(p) Jackson County Community Justice;
(q) Josephine County Community Justice;
(r) The Rogue Workforce Partnership;
(s) Connect Oregon; and
(t) Other community partners.
(2) Using moneys appropriated for the pilot program by  section 2 of this 2023 Act,
Southern Oregon Early Learning Services shall create the following two funds:
(a) The Early Childhood Support Fund, containing $10,000,000, which will  provide moneys
to community action agencies  in Jackson and Josephine Counties to provide financial support
to low-income pregnant individuals and families with children up to six years  of age for rent
and other  housing assistance, basic necessities such as food, clothing and diapers, educa-
tional opportunities for parents and other needs.
(b) The Child Care Workforce Fund, containing $15,000,000, from which Southern  Oregon
Early Learning Services will provide grants to providers of early learning services  to assist
with the development  and renovation of child care facilities and other capacity needs and to
pay living wage salaries and provide health care coverage to child care providers.
(3) No later than September 15, 2024, the Early  Learning Division of the Department of
Education shall submit a report to the interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly re-
lated to human services, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, on the outcomes from the
pilot program and recommendations for expanding the pilot program to  other areas of this
state.
SECTION 2.
There is appropriated to the Early  Learning Division of the Department of
Education, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the  General Fund, the amount of
$25,000,000 to be distributed to Southern Oregon Early Learning Services to carry out  the
pilot program described in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]