Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Animal  Welfare Trust is established, consisting of nine members
appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint one nonvoting member from  among mem-
bers of the Senate.
(b) The  Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one nonvoting member
from among members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint seven voting members as follows:
(A) One voting  member who represents veterinary medicine and has experience related
to animal health issues that affect a community as a whole.
(B) One voting member who represents animal rescue entities.
(C) One voting member who represents federally recognized Indian tribes.
(D) One voting member who represents  organizations that provide animal-related com-
munity outreach or support services.
(E) One voting member who represents animal shelters that impound  dogs as described
in ORS 609.090.
(F) Two at-large voting members who are residents of Oregon.
(2) Appointments to the  trust by the Governor are subject to confirmation by the Senate
in the manner provided in ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
(3) The term of office of each voting member appointed under subsection  (1)(c) of this
section is four years, but a member serves at the pleasure of the Governor.  Before the ex-
piration of the term of a member, the Governor shall appoint a successor whose term begins
on January 1 of the  following year. A voting member is eligible for reappointment. If there
is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall  make an appointment to become immediately
effective for the unexpired term.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3556
HB 3871
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) A majority of the voting members of the trust constitutes a quorum  for the trans-
action of business.
(5) The trust shall select one of its voting members to be the  executive director of the
trust, for such terms and with the  duties and powers that the trust determines are neces-
sary for the performance of the office.
(6) The trust shall meet at least twice each year at a place, day and hour determined by
the trust. The trust may also meet at other  times and places specified by the call of the
executive director or of a majority of the voting members of the trust.
(7) The trust may adopt any rules necessary to carry out the duties of the trust.
(8) Members of the trust who are not members of the Legislative Assembly are  not en-
titled to compensation, but may be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel and  other
expenses incurred by them in the performance of their official  duties in the manner and
amounts provided for in ORS 292.495.  Claims for expenses incurred in performing functions
of the trust shall be paid out of funds appropriated to the State Department of  Agriculture
for purposes of administering the trust.
(9) Members of  the Legislative Assembly appointed to the trust are nonvoting members
of the trust and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(10) The department shall provide a  facility and administrative support for the meetings
of the trust as requested. Other agencies shall provide support as requested  by the trust in
order to provide the trust with assistance related to animal welfare.
SECTION 2.
(1) The  Governor shall appoint the first voting members of the Animal
Welfare Trust on or before July 1, 2026.
(2) Notwithstanding the term of office specified in section 1 (3) of this 2025 Act,  of the
voting members first appointed to the Animal Welfare Trust:
(a) Two shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2029.
(b) Two shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2028.
(c) Two shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2027.
(d) One shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3.
The Animal Welfare Trust shall:
(1) Provide grants  to agencies, animal rescue entities, community service providers and
veterinary clinics that provide veterinary support services related to animals in low-income
households or underserved communities.
(2) Establish a process for awarding grants described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) To further the purpose described in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Pursue public and private grants.
(b) Raise funds from private sources.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Animal Welfare Fund  is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the Animal Welfare Fund shall be
credited to the fund. Moneys  in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Animal Wel-
fare Trust for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of sections 1, 3  and 5 of this 2025
Act.
(2) The trust may accept grants, donations, contributions or  gifts from any source for
deposit in the fund.
(3) The fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys accepted by the trust pursuant to subsection (2) of this section;
[2]
HB 3871
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
(b) Moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly;
(c) Interest earned on moneys in the fund; and
(d) Other moneys deposited in the fund from any source.
SECTION 5.
(1) Moneys deposited in the Animal Welfare Fund may be  used to reimburse:
(a) The State Treasurer for the costs of administering the fund as provided  in section 4
of this 2025 Act.
(b) The State Department of Agriculture for the costs of administering  the Animal Wel-
fare Trust as provided in section 1 (8) and (10) of this 2025 Act.
(c) Other  agencies for the costs of providing support to the trust as requested under
section 1 (10) of this 2025 Act.
(2) The total amount of costs paid under this section may not exceed five percent  of the
total amount of moneys deposited in the fund during the biennium.
SECTION 6. (1) The Animal Welfare Trust  shall submit a report, in the manner provided
by ORS 192.245, to committees or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to
animals by March 31 of each even-numbered year,  describing the progress of the trust in
carrying out its duties specified in section 3 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The report may include  relevant issues and trends of significance, including emerging
scientific research and public policy related to animal welfare.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding section 6 (1) of this 2025 Act, the Animal Welfare Trust
shall submit the first report described in section 6 of this 2025 Act by March 31, 2028.
[3]