Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Office of Emergency Management shall establish and administer an
Oregon outdoor recreation search and rescue card program. The primary purpose of the
program is to allow members of the public who engage in outdoor recreation in  Oregon to
voluntarily contribute to the Oregon Search and Rescue Fund established under section 2 of
this 2020 Act by purchasing an Oregon outdoor recreation search and rescue card.
(2)(a) The office  may coordinate with authorized sellers to make search and rescue cards
available for purchase, in person or online, where licenses, tags or permits  for engaging in
outdoor recreation are issued or sold.
(b) The office  may consult with the Office of Outdoor Recreation to carry out the pur-
poses of this subsection.
(3)(a) The office shall issue search and rescue cards, which may be annual or multiyear
search and rescue cards.
(b) A multiyear search and rescue card must expire no later than  five years after issu-
ance.
(c) The office, by rule, shall establish the procedure for renewal of  expired search and
rescue cards.
(d) The office shall issue individual search and rescue cards and may, at the  office’s dis-
cretion, issue family search and rescue cards.
(4)(a) The retail price of an annual search and rescue card may not exceed $10 for an
individual card or $25 for a family card.
(b) The retail price of a multiyear search and rescue card may  not exceed $50 for an in-
dividual card or $125 for a family card.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 170
HB 4111
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) The office, by rule, shall set the amount of authorized seller’s fees that may be re-
tained by authorized sellers for each sale of a  search and rescue card, not to exceed five
percent of the retail price of the search and rescue card.
(5) For each search and rescue card sold  by an authorized seller, the authorized seller
shall remit an  amount equal to the retail price of the card, less any authorized seller’s fee,
to the office. The office shall deposit the moneys in the Oregon  Search and Rescue Fund
established in section 2 of this 2020 Act.
(6) Purchase of a search and rescue card  under this section does not exempt a person
from liability for reimbursement under ORS 404.270.
(7) The office shall administer the search and rescue grant program described in section
3 (2) of this 2020 Act.
(8) As used in sections 1 to 3  of this 2020 Act, “authorized sellers” includes state agen-
cies, federal agencies or private retailers identified by the office.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Search and Rescue Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon  Search and
Rescue Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated
to the Office of Emergency Management.
(2)(a) The office may  solicit and accept gifts, grants or donations from public and private
sources for deposit in the fund.
(b) The office may accept gifts, grants or  donations under this subsection directly or
through an authorized seller of search and rescue cards under section 1 of this 2020 Act.
(c) If a person  makes a gift, grant or donation to the fund through an authorized seller,
the authorized seller shall remit  the entire amount of the gift, grant or donation to the office
and may not charge or retain any fee related to the gift, grant or donation.
(3) The fund consists of:
(a) Moneys deposited in the fund under section 1 of this 2020 Act; and
(b) Gifts, grants or donations received under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Moneys in the fund may only be used for one or more of the following purposes:
(a) To reimburse a county sheriff’s office for costs  incurred in the performance of the
sheriff’s responsibility for search and rescue activities under ORS 404.110, including costs,
if any, associated with volunteer search and rescue activities;
(b) To administer and support a search and rescue grant  program described in section 3
(2) of this 2020 Act; and
(c) To pay the administrative costs and expenses  of the office in carrying out the pro-
visions of ORS 404.100, 404.105 and 404.110 and sections 1 to 3 of this 2020 Act.
(5) The office shall  be paid from the fund for administrative costs under subsection (4)(c)
of this section once per quarter. The office shall repay  to the fund, prior to the next quar-
terly distribution, any moneys received for the payment of administrative costs  during a
prior quarter that were unexpended during the prior quarter. The office shall maintain  a
detailed accounting of the office’s administrative costs associated with the Oregon outdoor
recreation search and rescue card program.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Office of Emergency Management shall adopt rules to carry out the
provisions of sections 1 to  3 of this 2020 Act. Rules adopted by the office shall prescribe,
without limitation:
(a) Procedures for the  office to appoint authorized sellers to sell Oregon outdoor recre-
[2]
HB 4111
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ation search and rescue cards and for authorized sellers to collect the fees for the cards.
(b) Procedures for the printing and distribution of the search and  rescue cards to be of-
fered for sale to the public.
(c) The retail  price of a search and rescue card and the amount of the retail price that
may be retained by the authorized seller as the  authorized seller’s fee, subject to section 1
(4) of this 2020 Act.
(d) The method for authorized sellers to remit all moneys belonging  to the state accruing
from the sale of search and rescue cards.
(e) The method  for the office to accept and evaluate claims from a county sheriff’s office
for reimbursement for costs incurred in  the performance of the sheriff’s responsibility for
search and rescue activities under ORS 404.110, including costs, if  any, associated with vol-
unteer search and rescue activities.
(f) The method  for reimbursing a county sheriff’s office under sections 1 to 3 of this 2020
Act.
(2) The office shall establish and operate a search and rescue  grant program. The office
shall adopt rules necessary to administer the grant program that, without limitation:
(a) Include eligibility  criteria that limit grant applicants to county sheriffs’ offices, but
permit applications from county sheriffs’  offices to include requests submitted on behalf of
first responders;
(b) Prescribe a method for ensuring that grant funds are distributed equitably among
grant applicants, taking into consideration the applicant’s additional resources and  ge-
ographic location and the number of search and rescue activities in the applicant’s county;
(c) Limit use of grant funds to expenses  relating to equipment, training and educational
outreach;
(d) Direct that grant  funds must be spent no later than one year following distribution
of grant funds to the grant recipient; and
(e) Require grant recipients to submit a report to the office no later  than the earlier of
90 days following the date the recipient exhausts the grant funds or  15 months following the
date the grant funds are distributed to the recipient. The report must describe the equipment
purchased or maintained, the training provided  or the educational outreach implemented
with the grant funds.
(3) If two or  more agencies are required to initiate rulemaking to carry out the pro-
visions of sections 1 to 3 of this 2020 Act, the agencies  shall consult with one another to
coordinate the rules. The agencies may consolidate the rulemaking proceedings.
(4) On or before December 31 of each year, the Office  of Emergency Management shall
submit a report to  the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly relating to emergency
services that describes the administration and effectiveness of the Oregon outdoor  recre-
ation search and rescue card program established under sections 1 to 3 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 404.125 is amended to read:
404.125. (1) After a search and rescue, the sheriff of the county in which the search and  rescue
took place shall conduct a critique of the incident:
(a) If, in the opinion of the sheriff, the critique would be useful; [ or]
(b) Upon request from an individual directly involved in the incident ; or
(c) If necessary to receive reimbursement under section 2 of this 2020 Act .
(2) As part  of the critique, the sheriff shall examine the search and rescue report and may re-
[3]
HB 4111
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
ceive testimony and information from persons involved in the incident.
(3) When a critique of a search and rescue is conducted under  this section, the sheriff shall
prepare findings of fact  concerning the search and rescue, including the investigatory component,
and may prepare recommendations for the conduct of future incidents  or propose amendments to the
search and rescue plan under which the search and rescue was conducted.
(4) If amendments to the search and rescue plan are proposed and adopted,  the sheriff shall file
the amended search and rescue plan with the Office of Emergency Management.
(5) The office shall, in consultation with the  Oregon State Sheriffs’ Association, develop a
standardized critique  form to be used in the search and rescue critiques performed by a sheriff under
this section.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 404.130 is amended to read:
404.130. (1) An incident number shall be assigned to  each search and rescue reported under ORS
404.110.
(2) The incident number assigned shall be referenced for:
(a) The payment of workers’ compensation benefits for those persons participating in  search and
rescue activities; [ and]
(b) The dispatch and request for state, federal and cooperative assistance resources ; and
(c) A request for reimbursement under section 2 of this 2020 Act .
SECTION 6.
Sections 1 to 3 of this 2020 Act and  the amendments to ORS 404.125 and
404.130 by sections 4 and 5 of this 2020 Act become operative on January 1, 2021.
SECTION 7. The Office of Emergency Management may take any action before the  op-
erative date specified in section 6 of this 2020 Act that is necessary for  the office to exercise,
on and after  the operative date specified in section 6 of this 2020 Act, all of the duties,
functions and powers conferred on the office by sections 1 to  3 of this 2020 Act and the
amendments to ORS 404.125 and 404.130 by sections 4 and 5 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 8. This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]