Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 646.607 is amended to read:
646.607. A person engages in an unlawful  trade practice if in the course of the person’s business,
vocation or occupation the person:
(1) Employs any unconscionable tactic in connection with selling, renting or  disposing of real
estate, goods or services, or collecting or enforcing an obligation.
(2) Fails to deliver all or any portion of real estate, goods or services  as promised, and at a
customer’s request, fails to refund money that the customer gave to the person to purchase the
undelivered real estate, goods or services and that the person does not retain pursuant to  any right,
claim or defense the person may assert in good faith. This subsection does not create  a warranty
obligation and does not apply  to a dispute over the quality of real estate, goods or services delivered
to a customer.
(3) Violates ORS 401.965 (2).
(4) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.725 to 646A.750.
(5) Violates ORS 646A.530.
(6) Employs a collection practice that is unlawful under ORS 646.639.
(7) Is a beneficiary that violates ORS 86.726 (1)(a) or (2), 86.729 (4) or 86.732 (1) or (2).
(8) Violates ORS 646A.093  (2)(a) or does not comply with ORS 646A.093 (2)(b) .
(9) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.600 to 646A.628.
(10) Violates ORS 646A.808 (2).
(11) Violates ORS 336.184.
(12) Publishes on a website related to the person’s business, or in a consumer agreement  related
to a  consumer transaction, a statement or representation of fact in which the person asserts that
the person, in a particular manner or for particular purposes, will use, disclose,  collect, maintain,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3727
HB 3533
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
delete or dispose of information that the person requests, requires or  receives from a consumer and
the person uses, discloses, collects, maintains,  deletes or disposes of the information in a manner
that is materially inconsistent with the person’s statement or representation.
(13) Violates ORS 646A.813 (2).
(14) Violates ORS 137.930 (1).
SECTION 2.
 ORS 646A.093 is amended to read:
646A.093. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Advertise”  means to communicate about [ a consumer good ] consumer goods or services
by newspaper, radio, television, handbill, placard or other print, broadcast or  electronic medium
within this state for the purpose of [ selling] conducting a  sale of  the consumer [ good] goods or
consumer services.
(b) “Consumer” means a natural person who resides in this state.
[(b)] (c)  “Consumer goods” means goods that an individual uses  or buys for use primarily for
personal, family or household purposes.
(d) “Consumer services” means services that an individual uses or buys for  use primarily
for personal, family or household purposes.
(e)(A) “Fee” means  a surcharge, convenience fee, service fee, facility fee, handling fee
or other charge or amount, however  denominated, that is not part of the direct cost to the
seller of designing, manufacturing, crafting, assembling,  coordinating, transporting, storing,
distributing, marketing, advertising or retailing consumer goods or consumer services.
(B) “Fee” does not include:
(i) A tax or other amount that a governmental  body requires a seller to charge in a
transaction for consumer goods or  consumer services and remit to the governmental body;
or
(ii) A seller’s reasonable markup on the costs described in subparagraph (A)  of this par-
agraph.
(f) “Sale” means a  purchase, lease, rental or other transaction that, in return for com-
pensation, transfers ownership or the right to exclusive  use of consumer goods or consumer
services.
(2)(a) A person  that advertises consumer goods or consumer services for sale in this
state may not in the advertisement and during the course of any  sale that is conducted
electronically or  by telephone display or quote a price for the consumer goods or consumer
services that does not include or disclose every fee  that the consumer must pay to complete
the sale of the consumer goods or consumer services.
(b) A person that offers for  sale, [ sells] completes a sale of,  or advertises consumer goods that
the person will ship directly to a consumer in  this state shall clearly disclose during the [ sales]
transaction the charges, if  any, that the consumer must pay for handling and shipping the consumer
goods.
(3) A person that [ fails to disclose the  handling and shipping charges for consumer goods in a
transaction described in  subsection (2) of this section commits ] violates subsection (2)(a) of this
section or does not comply with subsection  (2)(b) of this section engages in  an unlawful  trade
practice under ORS 646.607 that is subject to enforcement under ORS 646.632.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 699.008 is amended to read:
699.008. (1) A hotelkeeper or innkeeper may not charge a facility fee  in addition to the price
of rental of a guest room in the  hotel or inn unless the hotelkeeper or innkeeper discloses the fa-
[2]
HB 3533
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
cility fee  as provided in ORS 646A.093  at the time that a guest reserves or  rents a guest room,
whichever is sooner.
(2) A travel arrangement company that facilitates the reservation or rental of a guest room  in
a hotel or inn shall disclose  as provided in ORS 646A.093  at the  time of reservation or rental,
whichever is sooner, any facility fee that the hotel or inn charges in addition to the price  of rental
of a guest room.
(3) This section does not prohibit the hotelkeeper or innkeeper from assessing any state  or local
transient lodging taxes.
SECTION 4.
The amendments to ORS  646.607, 646A.093 and 699.008 by sections 1 to 3 of
this 2025 Act apply to sales that occur on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[3]