Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the State Parks and Recreation Department, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $3,000,000 to be used
for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Art museum” means a facility that is designed to display works  of art to the public.
(b) “Capital improvements” includes construction of additions to  existing museum facili-
ties.
(c) “History” includes archaeology, architecture and civic development.
(d)(A) “History  museum” means a facility operated by a nonprofit organization that is
designed to preserve and present to the public information and displays relating  to the his-
tory of  the State of Oregon, the United States or the nine federally recognized Indian tribes
of this state.
(B) “History museum” does not include art museums.
(e) “Nonprofit  organization” means an organization described in section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code that is exempt from taxation  under section 501(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code.
(f) “Small history museum” means a history museum that reports, for the  five years
preceding the date on which an  application is submitted pursuant to this section, an average
of $300,000 per year or less in annual expenditures as reflected in reports the museum files
with the Internal Revenue Service.
(2) The State  Parks and Recreation Department shall develop and implement a program
under which the  department shall award grants, from moneys appropriated under section 1
of this 2023 Act, to history museums  for capital improvements and repairs to museum fa-
cilities.
(3)(a) The department shall prescribe  the form and manner in which a nonprofit organ-
ization that operates a history museum may apply for grants under this section.
(b) An application must include documentation:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1099
SB 76
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
(A) Establishing that the museum has been operating for at least 24 months immediately
preceding the date on which the application is submitted; and
(B) Describing how the museum preserves  and presents to the public information and
displays relating to the history of the State of Oregon, the United States or the nine federally
recognized Indian tribes of this state.
(4)(a) The department shall review all timely and complete applications and notify  each
applicant of the approval or rejection of the application.
(b) The rejection of an application may not be appealed but does not preclude the  appli-
cant from reapplying.
(5)(a) In awarding  grants, the department shall give priority to small history museums
seeking grants of $50,000 or less.
(b) The total amount of grant  moneys awarded with respect to an individual history
museum may not exceed $250,000.
(c) Upon approval of an application, the department shall  determine, based on the appli-
cation and consultation with the applicant, whether the  grant moneys shall be awarded as
reimbursement for, or in advance of, the expenditures for  which the application is approved.
Grants may not be awarded for projects that are completed at the time of application.
(6) Grant recipients shall provide the department with a detailed report  on how the grant
moneys are expended:
(a) If the moneys are expended within 90 days following receipt of the moneys,  upon
completion of the project; or
(b) If the moneys are not expended within 90 days  following receipt of the moneys, every
90 days from the receipt of the moneys  until the project is completed and upon completion
of the project.
(7)(a) The department shall adopt  rules to allow grant moneys to be awarded in blocks
as needed for efficient implementation of the program.
(b) The department may adopt any other rules it  considers necessary or convenient for
the administration of this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) Grants may not  be awarded under section 2 of this 2023 Act after June
30, 2025.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of  this section, after the date specified in subsection
(1) of this section:
(a) Grant moneys may be expended  in accordance with the terms on which they were
awarded under section 2 of this 2023 Act; and
(b) Reporting requirements imposed under section 2 of  this 2023 Act shall remain in force
until the reporting obligation is fulfilled.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]