Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Except as otherwise provided in this 2025 Act, ORS chapters 250, 251 and  254
apply to the special election held on the measure submitted under House Joint  Resolution
21 (2025).
SECTION 2. The measure referred to in section 1 of this 2025 Act shall be submitted to
the electors for their  approval or rejection at a special election held throughout this state
on November 4, 2025.
SECTION 3. Arguments relating to the measure referred to in section 1 of this  2025 Act
may be filed with the Secretary of State under ORS 251.245 and 251.255, except  that an ar-
gument shall be filed not later than  August 31, 2025. Notwithstanding ORS 192.311 to 192.478,
an argument filed under  this section is exempt from required disclosure in response to a
public records request until the fourth business day after the deadline for filing  the argu-
ment.
SECTION 4. (1) The Secretary of State shall cause to be  printed in the voters’ pamphlet
the number, ballot title and text of the measure referred to  in section 1 of this 2025 Act and
the financial estimate, explanatory statement and arguments relating to  the measure.
Notwithstanding ORS 251.026, the Secretary of State shall include in the voters’ pamphlet the
information or  statements described in ORS 251.026 that the secretary considers applicable
to the election on the measure referred to  in section 1 of this 2025 Act. Notwithstanding ORS
251.285, the measure referred to in section 1 of this 2025  Act shall be the only measure in-
cluded in the voters’ pamphlet prepared under this section.
(2) Not  later than the 10th day before the election, the Secretary of State shall cause the
voters’ pamphlet to be mailed to each post-office mailing address in Oregon and may  use any
additional means of distribution necessary to make the pamphlet available to electors.
(3) In preparing  the voters’ pamphlet under this section, the Secretary of State is not
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4382
HB 3686
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
required to comply with ORS 279B.055 or 279B.060.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Secretary of State shall prepare and deliver to each county clerk  by
the most expeditious means practicable  a certified statement of the measure referred to in
section 1 of this 2025 Act. The secretary shall include with the statement the  number, fi-
nancial estimate and full ballot title of the measure. The secretary shall keep a  copy of the
statement.
(2) The county clerks shall print on the ballot the number,  financial estimate and full
ballot title of the measure.  In lieu of printing the financial estimate and the summary por-
tion of the ballot title on the ballot, the county  clerks may include the complete text of the
ballot title, the financial estimate and any other information required by law.
SECTION 6. The Secretary of  State shall adopt rules governing the procedures for con-
ducting an election on the measure described in section  1 of this 2025 Act as may be neces-
sary to implement sections 1 to 6 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to  the Secretary of State, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $_______, for the payment of direct expenses of this state incurred in
submitting the measure referenced  in section 1 of this 2025 Act to the people at a special
election held throughout this state on November 4, 2025.
SECTION 8.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]