Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 328.542 is amended to read:
328.542. (1) Subject  to the Local Budget Law (ORS 294.305 to 294.565) and to sections 11 and
11b, Article XI, Oregon Constitution,  each school district board shall prepare annually or biennially
the budget of the school district and shall certify ad valorem property taxes to  the assessor as
provided by law.
(2) In addition to the requirements prescribed by ORS 294.305 to 294.565,  a school district
must:
(a) Include at least one member of the educational equity advisory committee  of the school
district on the budget committee.
(b) Encourage community engagement in the budget process, including:
(A) Providing opportunity for the community of the school district to  give input into the
preparation of the budget and taking into consideration that input  when preparing the
budget. The school district must seek the input of:
(i) School employees;
(ii) Students from student groups for  which an additional amount is computed under ORS
327.013 (1)(c); and
(iii) Parents of students described in sub-subparagraph (ii) of this subparagraph.
(B) Requiring approval of the budget by the  school district board at an open meeting,
following:
(i) Provision of  the proposed budget at the main office of the school district and on the
school district’s website;
(ii) Oral presentation of the proposed budget by an administrator of the  school district
to the school district board; and
(iii) Opportunity for the public to comment on the proposed budget at an open meeting.
(C) Ensuring that  the approved budget identifies the intended uses for the additional
amounts received by the  school district as provided by ORS 327.013 (1)(c). The approved
budget also may identify the intended uses for moneys received as average daily membership
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 15
HB 2239
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
under ORS 327.013, minus any additional amounts received  as provided by ORS 327.013 (1)(c).
(D) Making the approved budget available at the main office of the school district  and
on the school district’s website.
(3) Each school district board shall ensure that:
(a) Members of the budget committee receive training on  how to develop a school district
budget; and
(b) Members of the school district board receive training on how  to understand a school
district budget.
(4) For the purpose of assisting school district  boards in the development of budgets for
school districts, the  Department of Education shall develop best practices related to budget
development and make that information available to school district boards.
[2]