Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The  Department of Education shall convene an advisory committee to
recommend for adoption by the State Board of Education a policy regarding the improvement
of school attendance, especially for students who experience language barriers.
(2) The advisory committee shall include representatives from at least:
(a) The Department of Human Services;
(b) The Department of Education;
(c) The State Board of Education;
(d) An association representing school boards;
(e) An association representing Oregon educators;
(f) An association representing Oregon school employees; and
(g) An association representing school district administrators.
(3) The advisory  committee shall provide information that the Department of Education
may use to develop a memorandum of understanding, including information on:
(a) Current practices used to improve attendance, including  but not limited to family
coach programming and other approaches that involve collaboration between school districts
and the Department of Human Services; and
(b) Common practices that involve formal communication  between educators, school
districts and the department.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2330