Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 270.100 to 270.190,  the State Board of Forestry, on
behalf of the State of Oregon, shall offer to convey, to  Coos County, fee simple title to the
real property described in the sale deed recorded on  July 31, 1940, in the deed records of Coos
County under recorder number 62827, consisting of approximately 7,000 acres, which  the
state previously acquired from Coos County pursuant to sections  2 to 6, chapter 478, Oregon
Laws 1939.
(2) The state  shall offer to convey the state’s interest “AS IS, WHERE IS” and without
any representation or warranty of any kind  or nature by the state and without cost to the
county except as provided in subsection (7) of this section.
(3) The state shall extend the offer in writing no later  than 180 days after the effective
date of this 2025 Act.
(4) If the county does not accept the offer within 30 days of  the state extending the offer,
the state may withdraw the offer.
(5) If the county accepts the offer, the state shall  convey the interest pursuant to a
statutory bargain and sale deed under ORS 93.860 and the Department  of State Lands shall
release and transfer to the county all of  the state’s interest in the mineral or geothermal
resources notwithstanding ORS 273.775 to 273.790.
(6) The conveyance must include all fixtures located on the real property, except for fix-
tures that the state determines are  appropriate for transfer to another state property or
facility.
(7) The county shall bear its transaction and closing costs related to the conveyance,
including any applicable recording fees, escrow fees and title insurance.
(8) As a condition of the conveyance described in  this section, the county must agree in
writing:
(a) To preserve the real property as forest lands.
(b) To sustainably manage  the real property for the long-term benefit of county resi-
dents.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1815
SB 876
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
(c) To deposit any revenue generated by  harvesting timber on the real property in the
county general fund.
(d) To use any revenue generated under paragraph (c) of  this subsection for essential
county government services.
(e) To waive any claims that the county may have against the  state based on any re-
venues derived from the real property, including under section 6, chapter 478,  Oregon Laws
1939.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
[2]