Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Assembly declares that racism is a public health crisis in
this state.
SECTION 2. (1) A state agency  that collects demographic data within the course of op-
erations shall comply with the standards, adopted by  the Oregon Health Authority by rule
under ORS 413.161, for the collection of data on race, ethnicity,  preferred spoken and written
languages and disability status.
(2) A state agency that procures  services from a third-party that involve the collection
of demographic data shall ensure that in the collection of the data  the third party complies
with the standards described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 3. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Local public health authority” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431.003.
(b) “Region” includes:
(A) The Oregon coast;
(B) The Portland metropolitan region;
(C) The Willamette Valley;
(D) The Columbia River gorge;
(E) Eastern Oregon; and
(F) Southern Oregon.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide funding to local  public health authorities
to operate mobile health units in every region of this state.
(3) Each mobile health unit shall be staffed by individuals who reflect  the population they
serve and provide the following culturally and linguistically appropriate services,  prioritizing
services to Black and indigenous communities and people of color:
(a) Basic health services;
(b) Behavioral health services;
(c) Oral health services;
(d) Harm reduction screenings; and
(e) Connections to resources related to:
(A) Housing;
(B) Food;
(C) Education;
(D) Transportation;
(E) Domestic violence; and
(F) Criminal justice system involvement.
(4) Local public health authorities shall convene work groups to  identify the number of
[2]
HB 2337
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mobile health units and the diverse staff needed for each region.
(5) Mobile  health units shall collect the following data and report the data to the au-
thority in the form and manner prescribed by the authority:
(a) Number of individuals served;
(b) Demographic data collected in  accordance with standards adopted by the authority
by rule under ORS 413.161;
(c) Services provided; and
(d) Services needed but not available locally.
(6) The authority shall  compile the data reported under subsection (5) of this section and
annually report the  aggregate data to the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided in
ORS 192.245.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Oregon Advocacy Commissions Office, in collaboration with  cul-
turally specific community-based organizations, shall convene affinity group task  forces
consisting of leaders of Black and indigenous communities, people of color  and the nine
federally recognized tribes in Oregon. The  task forces shall discuss and research the specific
needs of the  communities they represent and develop recommendations for specific allo-
cations of resources to address the communities’ needs and health inequities faced  by the
communities. The task forces shall also make recommendations on whether  their work
should continue beyond June 30, 2023.
(2) Based on the research and recommendations of the  affinity group task forces, the
Oregon Health Authority shall establish and fund robust  culturally and linguistically specific
intervention programs  designed to prevent or intervene in the health conditions that result
in inequitable and negative outcomes for individuals who are Black or indigenous, people of
color and tribes. The interventions must focus on aspects of the social determinants  of
health including housing, access  to food, neighborhood safety, education, transportation and
involvement with the criminal justice system.
(3) The  Oregon Advocacy Commissions Office shall report the recommendations of the
task forces to the  Legislative Assembly, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, no later than
September 15, 2022.
SECTION 5. Section 6 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 413.
SECTION 6. (1) The Oregon Health Authority  shall conduct periodic audits of coordinated
care organizations and of providers who are reimbursed by the authority or  coordinated care
organizations to provide health care to  recipients of medical assistance to ensure that the
coordinated care organizations and providers are complying with the language access re-
quirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964.
(2) The authority shall provide technical  assistance to providers as necessary to ensure
that providers have the tools and resources needed to promote greater access to  services for
individuals with limited English proficiency or who communicate in sign language.
(3) The authority shall report the findings from the  audits and actions taken in response
to the findings to the Legislative Assembly, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, every two
years.
SECTION 7.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall conduct periodic audits of health  care
facilities licensed under ORS 441.020 and health  systems to ensure that the facilities and
health systems are complying with the language access requirements of Title VI of  the Civil
Rights Act of 1964.
[3]
HB 2337
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The authority shall report the findings from the  audits and actions taken in response
to the findings to the Legislative Assembly, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, every two
years.
SECTION 8.
(1) The Legislative Equity Office  shall conduct a racial health equity analysis
for each measure reported out of a committee of the Legislative Assembly in the  chamber
where the  measure originated and report the findings to the committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to health care. The Legislative Equity Officer  shall develop the criteria for
the analysis, which must include an explanation or statement of:
(a) What the measure does;
(b) What communities the measure is most likely to impact;
(c) Whether communities likely to be impacted were involved in the development of the
measure and, if so, how;
(d) If the measure will impact  any of the federally recognized tribes in Oregon, whether
the tribes were consulted;
(e) Whether the measure poses negative consequences for Black or  indigenous commu-
nities, people of color or tribes;
(f) How to  strengthen positive impacts from the measure on Black and indigenous com-
munities, people of color and tribes; and
(g) What organizations, individuals, data or other  sources were used in conducting the
analysis.
(2)(a) The Legislative Equity Officer  shall employ an Equity Coordinator to coordinate
and address language barriers and barriers faced by individuals with disabilities who wish  to
participate in the legislative process, including by ensuring language  translation and closed
captioning and ensuring that materials are available in alternative formats.
(b) The Equity Coordinator shall conduct  community outreach to inform community-
based organizations statewide about steps  implemented under paragraph (a) of this sub-
section and to encourage diverse members of the public to engage in the legislative process.
(c) The Equity Coordinator shall prepare a biennial report of:
(A) The number and type of accommodations that were provided;
(B) A summary of the outreach provided and to whom it was provided; and
(C) Lessons learned by the Equity Officer.
SECTION 9.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund,  the amount of $
, which may be expended for carrying out sections 2
to 4, 6 and 7 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 10. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Legislative Assembly, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $ , for the  Legislative Equity Office to carry out section
8 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 11. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Advocacy Commissions Office, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2021,
out of the General Fund, the  amount of $ , which may be expended for carrying out
section 4 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 12. Sections 2 to 4 and 6 to 8 of this  2021 Act become operative on January 1,
2022.
[4]
HB 2337
1
2
3
4
5
SECTION 13.
Section 3 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2024.
SECTION 14. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[5]