Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out
of the  General Fund, the amount of $_______, to be allocated to the Klamath Soil and Water
Conservation District for the purpose of conducting a seepage study in the Klamath Basin.
SECTION 2.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2672