Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Trust for  Cultural Development Board shall study issues related to the
administration of the Trust for  Cultural Development Account established by ORS 359.405
and report to an appropriate committee or interim committee  of the Legislative Assembly
on the results of the study no later than September 15, 2020.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3367