Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Water  Resources Department shall study water management issues.
The department shall submit a report on the study in the manner provided by ORS  192.245,
and may include recommendations for  legislation, to the committees or interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to natural resources no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2776