Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 338.005 is amended to read:
338.005. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Applicant” means any person or group that develops and submits a written proposal for a
public charter school to a sponsor.
(2) “Community sponsor” means:
(a) A chamber of commerce;
(b) A community-based organization;
(c) An industry trade association; or
(d) A corporation or nonprofit organization that  satisfies requirements prescribed by the
State Board of Education by rule.
[(2)] (3) “Public charter  school” means an elementary or secondary school offering a compre-
hensive instructional program operating under a written agreement entered into between a sponsor
and an applicant and operating pursuant to this chapter.
[(3)] (4) “Remote and necessary school district”  means a school district that offers kindergarten
through grade 12 and has:
(a) An  average daily membership (ADM), as defined in ORS 327.006, in the prior fiscal year of
less than 110; and
(b) A school that is located, by the nearest traveled  road, more than 20 miles from the nearest
school or from a city with a population of more than 5,000.
[(4)] (5) “Sponsor” means:
(a) The board of the common  school district or the union high school district in which the public
charter school is located that has  developed a written charter with an applicant to create a public
charter school.
(b) The State Board of Education pursuant to ORS 338.075.
(c) A community sponsor pursuant to ORS 338.075.
[(5)(a)] (6)(a) “Virtual public charter school” means a public charter school that provides online
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3575
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
courses.
(b) “Virtual  public charter school” does not include a public charter school that primarily serves
students in a physical location.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 338.035 is amended to read:
338.035. (1) A public charter school may be established:
(a) As a new public school;
(b) As a virtual public charter school;
(c) From an existing public school or a portion of the school; or
(d) From an existing alternative education program, as defined in ORS 336.615.
(2)(a) Before a public charter school may operate as a public charter school, it must:
(A) Be approved by a sponsor;
(B) Be established as a nonprofit organization under the laws of Oregon; and
(C) Have  applied to qualify as an exempt organization under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  the requirements of paragraph (a)(B) and
(C) of this subsection do not apply to:
(A) A school in a school district that is composed of only one school; and
(B) A school in a school district  that is a remote and necessary school district on the date the
school first begins operation as a public charter school.
(3)(a) Except for a public charter school that is  not required to comply with subsection (2)(a)(B)
and (C)  of this section as provided by subsection (2)(b) of this section, a member of the school dis-
trict board of the school district within which a  public charter school is located may not be a voting
member of the public charter school governing body.
(b) A member of the school district board of the school  district within which a public charter
school is located may act in an advisory capacity on the public charter school governing body.
(4) An applicant seeking to establish  a public charter school shall submit a proposal pursuant
to ORS 338.045 to the school district board of the school district within which the public charter
school will be located by the date identified  by the school district board. The school district board
shall identify a date that is at least 180 days prior to the date on which the public charter  school
would begin operating and that provides a reasonable period of time for the school district board
to complete the approval process described in ORS 338.055 and for the public charter school to begin
operating by the beginning of a school year. An  applicant may consult with the school district board
prior to submitting  a proposal, and the school district board may require an applicant to submit a
letter of intent within a reasonable period of time prior to submitting a proposal.
(5) An  applicant seeking to establish a public charter school shall provide to the State Board
of Education a copy of any proposal submitted to a school district board under  ORS 338.045 and a
copy of any subsequent approval by the school district board.
(6)(a) One or more, but not all, schools in a school district may become public charter schools.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a school in  a school district that is com-
posed of only one school may become a public charter school. For a public  charter school that is
the only school in the school district, the public charter school and the school district may be  con-
sidered to be a single legal entity for the purposes of this chapter if:
(A) The public charter school is not required to comply with subsection (2)(a)(B)  and (C) of this
section;
(B) All of the members of the school district board  are voting members of the public charter
[2]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
school governing body as allowed by subsection (3)(a) of this section;
(C) The school district and the public charter school share employees; and
(D) The school district and the public charter school share assets and liabilities.
(7)(a) An entity described in ORS 338.005 [ (4)] (5) may not approve a public charter  school pro-
posal that authorizes the conversion of any private school that  is tuition based to a public charter
school.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, an entity described in ORS 338.005 [ (4)] (5)
may authorize the conversion of an existing alternative education program, as  defined in ORS
336.615, to a public charter school.
(8) An entity described in ORS 338.005 [ (4)] (5) may not  approve a proposal for a public charter
school that is affiliated with a nonpublic sectarian school or a religious institution.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 338.055 is amended to read:
338.055. (1)(a) Upon receipt of a proposal submitted under ORS 338.045, the  school district board
shall determine  whether the proposal is complete. A proposal is complete if the proposal addresses,
at least minimally, each element required by ORS 338.045 (2) and (3).
(b) The school district board shall notify an applicant within  30 days after receipt of a proposal
if the proposal is not complete and  identify the specific elements of the proposal that are not com-
plete. The school district board shall provide the applicant with a reasonable opportunity to  com-
plete the proposal.
(c) A proposal may be disapproved if the applicant  has received a reasonable opportunity to
complete the proposal and the applicant does not provide a proposal that is complete.
(d) If the school district board disapproves  a proposal as provided by paragraph (c) of this sub-
section, the applicant may appeal the decision to the State Board of Education. The State Board  of
Education may review the proposal only for completeness and may determine that the proposal is:
(A) Not complete and uphold the decision of the school district board; or
(B) Complete and remand the proposal to the school district board for consideration.
(2) Within  60 days after receipt of a completed proposal, the school district board shall hold a
public hearing on the provisions of the proposal.
(3) The school  district board shall evaluate a proposal in good faith using the following criteria:
(a) The demonstrated, sustainable support for the  public charter school by teachers, parents,
students and other community members, including comments received at the public hearing held
under subsection (2) of this section;
(b) The  demonstrated financial stability of the public charter school, including the demonstrated
ability of the school to  have a sound financial management system that is in place at the time the
school begins operating and that meets the requirements of ORS 338.095 (1);
(c) The capability of the applicant, in terms of  support and planning, to provide comprehensive
instructional programs to students pursuant to an approved proposal;
(d) The capability of the applicant, in  terms of support and planning, to specifically provide,
pursuant to an approved proposal, comprehensive  instructional programs to students identified by
the applicant as academically low achieving;
(e) The adequacy of the information provided as required by ORS 338.045 (2) and (3);
(f) Whether the value of the public charter school is outweighed by any directly identifiable,
significant and adverse impact on the quality  of the public education of students residing in the
school district in which the public charter school will be located;
(g) Whether there are arrangements for any necessary  special education and related services for
[3]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
children with disabilities pursuant to ORS 338.165;
(h) Whether there are  alternative arrangements for students and for teachers and other school
employees who choose not to attend or who choose not to be employed by  the public charter school;
and
(i) The prior history, if any, of the applicant in operating a public charter  school or in providing
educational services.
(4) The school district  board must approve a proposal or state in writing the reasons for disap-
proving a proposal within 30 days after the public hearing held under subsection  (2) of this section.
(5)(a) Written notice of the school  district board’s action shall be sent to the applicant. If the
proposal is not approved:
(A) The reasons for the denial and suggested remedial measures, if any,  shall be clearly stated
in the notice sent by the school district board to the applicant; and
(B) The applicant may amend the proposal to address  objections and any suggested remedial
measures and resubmit the proposal to the school district board.
(b) The school district board shall approve  or disapprove the resubmitted proposal within 30
days after receiving it. If the proposal  is not approved, the applicant may appeal the decision of the
school district board to the State Board of Education.
(c) When the State Board of Education receives an  appeal under this subsection, the board may
review the resubmitted proposal only to determine whether:
(A) The school district board used the process required by this section in  denying the proposal;
(B) The proposal meets the criteria described in subsection (3) of this section; and
(C) The reasons stated by the school district board for the denial are valid.
(d) Following a review described in paragraph (c) of  this subsection, the State Board of Educa-
tion may:
(A) Uphold the decision of the school district board to disapprove the proposal; or
(B) Remand the proposal to the school district board for reconsideration.
(6)(a) Individual elements in a  public charter school proposal may be changed through the pro-
posal and chartering process by mutual agreement of the school district board and the applicant.
(b) If the school  district board and the applicant are unable to agree on a change during the
proposal or chartering process, the school district board or the applicant may request  mediation by
the State Board of Education.
(c) If the school district board and the  applicant are unable to reach an agreement following
mediation as described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the proposal submitted under  ORS
338.045, without the change that was the subject of mediation, shall be the proposal that  governs
the public charter school and:
(A) The parties may execute the charter for the public charter school based on the proposal;
(B) The applicant may withdraw the proposal; or
(C) The school district board may disapprove the proposal.
(7) Before an existing public  school is converted to a public charter school, the proposal for the
conversion must be approved by the school district board of the public school.
(8) Entities described  in ORS 338.005 [ (4)] (5) may not charge any fee to applicants for the pro-
posal process.
(9) Upon request by a school district, the State Board of Education may grant an extension  of
any timeline required by this section if the district has good cause for requesting the extension.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 338.065 is amended to read:
[4]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
338.065. (1)(a) Upon approval of a  proposal by a school district board under ORS 338.055, the
school district board shall become the sponsor of the public charter school.
(b) Pursuant to ORS 338.075 [ (2) or (3) ], the State Board of Education or a community sponsor
shall become the sponsor of the public charter school.
(2) The sponsor and the applicant shall develop a  written charter that contains the provisions
of the proposal that have been duly approved by the sponsor and public  charter school governing
body. As provided by ORS 338.055 (6), the sponsor and the applicant may agree to change  elements
of the proposal  prior to incorporating them into the charter. The charter, when duly executed by
the sponsor and the  public charter school governing body, shall act as the legal authorization for
the establishment of the public charter school. The charter shall be legally binding on both  the
sponsor and the public charter school governing body.
(3) The sponsor and the public charter school governing body may amend  a charter by joint
agreement.
(4)(a) The initial charter shall be in effect for a period of not more than five  years and shall be
renewed upon the authorization of the sponsor using the process established under this section.
(b) The first renewal of a charter shall be for the same time period as the initial charter.
(c) Subsequent renewals  of a charter shall be for a minimum of five years but may not exceed
10 years.
(5)(a) The renewal of a charter shall use the process required by this section.
(b) The public charter school governing body shall submit  a written renewal request to the
sponsor for consideration at least 180 days prior to the expiration of the charter.
(c) Within 45  days after receiving a written renewal request from a public charter school gov-
erning body, the sponsor shall hold a public hearing regarding the request for renewal.
(d) Within 30 days after the public hearing, the sponsor  shall approve the renewal of the charter
or state in writing the reasons for denying the renewal of the charter.
(e) If the sponsor approves the renewal of the charter,  the sponsor and the public charter school
governing body shall  negotiate a new charter within 90 days after the date on which the sponsor
approved the renewal of the charter unless the  sponsor and the public charter school governing
body agree  to an extension of the time period. Notwithstanding the time period specified in the
charter, an expiring charter shall remain in effect until a new charter is negotiated.
(f) If the sponsor does not renew the  charter, the public charter school governing body may
address the reasons stated under  paragraph (d) of this subsection and any remedial measures sug-
gested by the sponsor and submit a revised request for renewal to the sponsor.
(g) Notwithstanding paragraphs (b) to (f) of this subsection, a sponsor and a public  charter
school governing body may agree in the charter of the school to a timeline for  renewing the charter
that is different from the timeline required by paragraphs (b) to (f) of this subsection.
(6)(a) If the sponsor does not renew the charter based on  the revised request for renewal sub-
mitted under  subsection (5)(f) of this section, the public charter school governing body may appeal
the decision  of the sponsor to the State Board of Education for a review of whether the sponsor used
the process required by this section in denying the renewal of the charter.
(b) If the state board finds that the sponsor used the process required by this section in denying
the request for renewal, the  state board shall affirm the decision of the sponsor. A public charter
school governing body may seek judicial  review of an order of the state board pursuant to ORS
183.484.
(c) If the state board finds that the sponsor  did not use the process required by this section in
[5]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
denying the request for  renewal, the state board shall order the sponsor to reconsider the request
for renewal.
(d) If after reconsideration pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection the sponsor does not
renew the charter, the public charter school governing body  may seek judicial review of an order
of the sponsor pursuant to ORS 183.484.
(7) If  the State Board of Education is the sponsor of a public charter school and the state board
does not renew the charter based on the revised request for renewal submitted under  subsection
(5)(f) of this section, the public charter school governing body may seek judicial review of an  order
of the state board pursuant to ORS 183.484 for a review of whether the  state board used the process
required by this section in denying the request for renewal.
(8)(a) The sponsor shall base the charter renewal decision on a good faith evaluation  of whether
the public charter school:
(A) Is in compliance with this chapter and all other applicable state and federal laws;
(B) Is in compliance with the charter of the public charter school;
(C) Is meeting or working toward meeting the student performance  goals and agreements spec-
ified in the charter or  any other written agreements between the sponsor and the public charter
school governing body;
(D) Is fiscally stable and has used the sound financial management  system described in the
proposal submitted under ORS 338.045 and incorporated into the  written charter under this section;
and
(E) Is in compliance with any renewal criteria specified  in the charter of the public charter
school.
(b) The sponsor shall base the renewal  evaluation described in paragraph (a) of this subsection
primarily on a review of the public charter school’s annual performance reports, annual  audit of
accounts and annual site visit and review as required by  ORS 338.095 and any other information
mutually agreed upon by the public charter school governing body and the sponsor.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 338.075 is amended to read:
338.075. (1) If a  school district board disapproves a proposal to establish a public charter school
following reconsideration of a proposal pursuant to ORS 338.055 (5), the applicant may :
(a) Request that the  State Board of Education review the decision of the school district
board[.]; or
(b) Submit a proposal to an entity identified in ORS 338.005 (2).
(2)(a) If the State Board of  Education reviews a decision of the school district board, as provided
by subsection (1) of this section, the State Board of Education may  review the decision only to de-
termine whether:
(A) The  school district board used the process required by ORS 338.055 in denying the proposal;
(B) The proposal meets the criteria described in ORS 338.055 (3); and
(C) The reasons stated by the school district board for the denial are valid.
(b) Following a review described in paragraph (a) of  this subsection, the State Board of Educa-
tion may:
(A) Uphold the decision of the school district board to disapprove the proposal;
(B) Remand the proposal to the school district board for reconsideration if the school district
board and applicant agree to the remand; or
(C) Consider becoming the sponsor of the public charter school if the applicant  agrees to the
sponsorship.
[6]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) An applicant may seek judicial review of an order of the  State Board of Education pursuant
to ORS 183.484. If the court finds that the decision of the State Board of Education is not supported
by substantial evidence in the  record, the court shall enter a judgment directing the State Board
of Education to sponsor the public charter school.
(4)(a) An applicant seeking sponsorship by an entity identified in ORS 338.005 (2)  may
submit to the entity the same proposal that was submitted  to the school district board under
ORS 338.045 or a proposal that is modified to  take into consideration the characteristics of
the entity evaluating the proposal under this subsection.
(b) Upon receipt of a proposal, an entity identified in ORS 338.005 (2) may  evaluate the
proposal and may approve or disapprove the proposal. A proposal may be approved only  after
considering the criteria described in ORS 338.055 (3)(b) to (i) and ensuring compliance  with
the provisions of paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(c)(A) The following decisions by an entity identified in ORS  338.005 (2) are final and not
subject to appeal:
(i) Whether to evaluate a proposal for a public charter school; and
(ii) The approval or disapproval of a proposal for a public charter school.
(B) The process by which an entity makes a decision described in  subparagraph (A) of
this paragraph is not subject to appeal.
(d) If a  public charter school has a community sponsor and the public charter school
enters into a contract with a third-party entity to provide educational services for the public
charter school:
(A) A member of the governing body of the public charter school or  the governing body
of the sponsor may not be an employee of the third-party entity, be a member of the gov-
erning board of the third-party entity  or be any other representative of the third-party en-
tity;
(B) An employee of the public charter school may not promote the sale or  benefits of
private supplemental services or classes offered by the third-party entity; and
(C) The educational  services provided by the third-party entity must comply with state
standards and requirements, and any provision of the contract with the third-party entity
that does not allow for the provision of educational services that comply with state standards
and requirements is void.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 338.105 is amended to read:
338.105. (1) During the term of a charter, the sponsor  may terminate the charter on any of the
following grounds:
(a) Failure to meet the terms of an approved charter or this chapter.
(b) Failure to meet the requirements for student performance stated in the charter.
(c) Failure to correct a violation of a federal or state law that is described in ORS 338.115.
(d) Failure to maintain insurance as described in the charter.
(e) Failure to maintain financial stability.
(f) Failure to maintain, for one or more consecutive years, a  sound financial management system
described in the proposal submitted under ORS 338.045  and incorporated into the written charter
under ORS 338.065.
(2)(a) If a charter is terminated under subsection (1) of  this section, the sponsor shall notify the
public charter school governing body at least 60 days prior to the proposed  effective date of the
termination. The notice shall state the grounds for the termination.
[7]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) If the grounds for  termination include failure to maintain financial stability or failure to
maintain a sound financial management  system, the sponsor and the public charter school may agree
to develop a plan to correct deficiencies. Under a plan to correct deficiencies:
(A) The public charter school may  attempt to correct any deficiencies related to financial sta-
bility or to a sound financial management system by a date identified  by the sponsor, which may
not be less than 60 days from the date of the notice;
(B) The proposed effective date of the termination may be extended  to the date identified under
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;
(C) The sponsor  may withhold up to 50 percent of the moneys owed to the public charter school
while the public charter school is on the plan to correct deficiencies  unless the withholding would
create an undue hardship, as determined pursuant to rules of the State Board of Education; and
(D) The sponsor must hold  in trust any moneys withheld under subparagraph (C) of this para-
graph until:
(i) The public charter school complies with  the plan to correct deficiencies, at which time the
public charter school is entitled to the moneys held in trust; or
(ii) The public charter school fails to comply with the  plan to correct deficiencies, at which time
the charter is terminated and the public charter school forfeits any claim to the moneys held  in
trust.
(c) A deadline  to correct deficiencies under paragraph (b)(A) of this subsection may be extended
by mutual agreement of the sponsor and the public charter school.
(d) The public charter school governing body may request  a hearing by the sponsor in relation
to a termination of the charter or a plan to correct deficiencies.
(3) A public charter school governing body may appeal a decision of a sponsor  under this sec-
tion. The appeal shall be to:
(a) The State Board of Education  if the sponsor is an entity described in ORS 338.005 [ (4)(a)]
(5)(a) or (c) . The State Board of Education shall:
(A) Review only:
(i) The grounds for termination under this section as stated by the school district board; or
(ii) A plan to correct deficiencies; and
(B) Adopt  by rule procedures to ensure a timely appeals process to prevent disruption of
students’ education.
(b) The circuit court pursuant to ORS 183.484 if the sponsor is the State Board of Education.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, a sponsor may  terminate a charter imme-
diately and close a public charter school if the public charter school  is endangering the health or
safety of the students enrolled in the public charter school.
(b) The public charter school governing body may  request a hearing from the sponsor on the
termination of the charter under  this subsection. The sponsor shall hold a hearing within 10 days
after receiving the request.
(c) The public charter school governing body may appeal a decision  of a sponsor under this
subsection to the State Board of Education. The State Board of  Education shall hold a hearing
within 10 days after receiving the appeal request.
(d) Throughout the appeals  process, the public charter school shall remain closed at the dis-
cretion of the sponsor unless the State Board of Education orders the sponsor to open the  public
charter school and not terminate the charter.
(5) Termination of a charter shall  not abridge the public charter school’s legal authority to op-
[8]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
erate as a private or nonchartered public school.
(6) If a charter is terminated or a public charter school is dissolved:
(a) The assets of the  public charter school that were purchased with public funds shall be given
to the State Board of Education. The State Board of Education  may disburse the assets of the public
charter school to school districts or other public charter schools.
(b) All student education records of the public charter school shall be transferred to  the ad-
ministrative office of the school district in which the public charter school was located.
(7) A public charter school governing body may  only terminate a charter, dissolve or close a
public charter school at  the end of a semester. If a charter is terminated by the public charter
school governing body or a public charter school is closed or dissolved, the public  charter school
governing body shall notify the sponsor at least 180 days  prior to the proposed effective date of the
termination, closure or dissolution.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 338.120 is amended to read:
338.120. (1) In addition to any other requirements  of this chapter for a public charter school, a
virtual public charter school must have:
(a) A plan for academic achievement that addresses how the school  will improve student learn-
ing and meet academic content standards required by ORS 329.045.
(b) Performance  criteria the school will use to measure the progress of the school in meeting
the academic performance goals set by the school for its first five years of operation.
(c) A plan for implementing the proposed education program of the school  by directly and sig-
nificantly involving parents and guardians  of students enrolled in the school and involving the pro-
fessional employees of the school.
(d) A budget, business plan and governance plan for the operation of the school.
(e) In the charter of the school, a requirement that the school:
(A) Monitor and track student progress and attendance; and
(B) Provide student assessments in a manner that  ensures that an individual student is being
assessed and that the assessment is valid.
(f) Notwithstanding ORS 338.135 (7), a plan to ensure that:
(A) All superintendents, assistant  superintendents and principals of the school are licensed to
administer by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission; and
(B) Teachers who are licensed to teach by  the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission
teach at least 95 percent of the school’s instructional hours.
(g) A plan for maintaining student  records and school records, including financial records, at a
designated central office of operations that is located:
(A) If the sponsor is a school district, within the school district that is  the sponsor and as
specified in the charter of the school; [ or]
(B) If  the sponsor is the State Board of Education, at a central office located in Oregon and as
specified in the charter of the school[ .]; or
(C) If the sponsor is a  community sponsor, within the school district where the public
charter school is located and as specified in the charter of the school.
(h) A plan to provide equitable  access to the education program of the school by ensuring that
each student enrolled in the school:
(A) Has access to and use of computer and printer equipment as needed;
(B) Is offered  an Internet service cost reimbursement arrangement under which the school re-
imburses the parent or guardian of the  student, at a rate set by the school, for the costs of obtaining
[9]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Internet service at the minimum connection speed required to effectively  access the education pro-
gram provided by the school; or
(C) Has access to and  use of computer and printer equipment and is offered Internet service cost
reimbursement.
(i) A plan to provide access to computer and printer equipment  and the Internet service cost
reimbursement as  described in paragraph (h) of this subsection by students enrolled in the school
who are from families that qualify as low-income under  Title I of the federal Elementary and Sec-
ondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. 6301 et seq.).
(j) A plan to conduct school-sponsored optional educational events at  least six times each school
year at locations selected to provide convenient access to all students enrolled  in the school who
want to participate.
(k) A plan to conduct meetings at least twice a week between teachers and students enrolled
in the school, either in person or through the use of conference calls or other technology.
(L) A plan to provide opportunities for  face-to-face meetings between teachers and students en-
rolled in the school at least six times each school year.
(m) A plan to provide, at the time of a student’s  enrollment, written notice to the sponsor and,
if different, to the school district where the student is  a resident. Notification must be provided
within 10 days after enrollment and must include:
(A) The name, age and address of the student; and
(B) The name of the school in which the student was formerly enrolled.
(n) A plan to  provide, at the time of a student’s withdrawal for a reason other than graduation
from high school, written  notice to the sponsor and, if different, to the school district where the
student is a resident.  Notification must be provided within 10 days after withdrawal and must in-
clude:
(A) The name, age and address of the student;
(B) The reason the student no longer is enrolled and, if applicable, the name of the school in
which the student will enroll, if known to the virtual public charter school; and
(C) The last day on which the student was enrolled at the virtual public charter school.
(o) An agreement to provide a student’s education records to the student’s resident school dis-
trict or to the sponsor, upon request of the resident school district or sponsor.
(2) For a virtual public charter school:
(a) A person who is a member of the school district board  for the sponsor of the virtual public
charter school may not be:
(A) An employee of the virtual public charter school;
(B) A member of the governing body of the virtual public charter school; or
(C) An  employee or other representative of any third-party entity with which the virtual public
charter school has entered into a contract to provide educational services.
(b) A person who is a member of  the governing body of the virtual public charter school may
not be an employee of a third-party entity  with which the virtual public charter school has entered,
or intends to enter, into a contract to provide educational services.
(3) If a virtual public charter school enters  into a contract with a third-party entity to provide
educational services for the virtual public charter school:
(a) No employee or member of the  governing board of the third-party entity may attend an
executive session of  the school district board of the school district that is the sponsor of the virtual
public charter school;
[10]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) An employee of the virtual public charter school may not promote  the sale or benefits of
private supplemental services or classes offered by the third-party entity;
(c) The educational services provided by the third-party  entity must be consistent with state
standards and requirements, and must be changed on the same timelines that changes are  imposed
on the nonvirtual public charter schools of this state; and
(d) The virtual public charter school must have on  file the third-party entity’s budget for the
provision of educational services and that budget must itemize:
(A) The salaries of supervisory and management personnel and consultants who are providing
educational or related services for a public charter school in this state; and
(B) The annual operating  expenses and profit margin of the third-party entity for providing ed-
ucational services to a public charter school in this state.
(4)(a) The sponsor or a member of the public may request access to any of  the documents de-
scribed in subsections (1) and (3)(d) of this section that are public records, as provided by  ORS
192.311 to 192.478.
(b) Upon request by a sponsor or a member of the public, a virtual public charter  school must
provide reasonable access to the documents  described in subsections (1) and (3)(d) of this section
that are public records, as provided by  ORS 192.311 to 192.478. The documents may be provided
electronically.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 338.130 is amended to read:
338.130. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Nonsponsoring school district board” means the school district board that:
(A) Is the school district board of the school district in which a public charter  school is oper-
ating, or proposes to operate, a school or a tutoring or testing facility; and
(B) Is not the sponsor of the public charter school.
(b) “Nonvirtual public charter school” means a public charter school that:
(A) Is not a virtual public charter school; and
(B) Is not sponsored by the State Board of Education.
(c) “Sponsoring school district” is the school district of the sponsor of a public charter school.
(2) If a public charter school is a nonvirtual public charter school, the governing body of the
nonvirtual public charter school:
(a) Except as provided by paragraph (c) of this subsection, may operate a  school that is not lo-
cated in the sponsoring school district only if  the governing body has received written permission
from the nonsponsoring school district board. The governing body must receive  written permission
under this paragraph prior to the first day on which students will attend classes at the school.
(b) Except as provided by paragraph (d) of this subsection,  may operate a tutoring or testing
facility that is not located in the sponsoring school district only if the governing  body has received
written permission from the nonsponsoring school district board. The governing body  must receive
written permission under this paragraph prior to  the first day the students will receive tutoring or
testing at the facility.
(c) May operate a school that is not located in the sponsoring school district  and without com-
plying with the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection only if:
(A) For a school that began operating prior to June 6, 2023;
(i) The location of the school has not changed since June 6, 2023; and
(ii) Written notification is provided to  the nonsponsoring school district board each time the
charter for the public charter school is renewed.
[11]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) For a school that began operating after June 6, 2023, and prior to January 1, 2024:
(i) The governing body  operating the school had entered into a charter for a public charter
school in the sponsoring school district prior to January 1, 2023;
(ii) The school district in which the  school will be located is adjacent to the sponsoring school
district; and
(iii) Written notification is provided to the nonsponsoring school district board:
(I) Prior to the first day the students will attend classes at the school; and
(II) Each time the charter for the public charter school is renewed.
(d) May operate a tutoring or  testing facility that is not located in the sponsoring school district
and without complying with the requirements of paragraph (b) of this subsection only if:
(A) The public charter school began operating as a  public charter school prior to January 1,
2023; and
(B) Written notification is provided to the nonsponsoring school district board  each time the
charter for the public charter school is renewed.
(3) If a public charter school is a virtual public charter school, the governing body:
(a) May not operate a school in a school district that is not the sponsoring school district.
(b) May operate administrative offices  in a nonsponsoring school district only after the govern-
ing body provides written notification to the nonsponsoring school district board:
(A) Prior to the first day the administrative offices are open; and
(B) Each time the charter for the public charter school is renewed.
(c) May operate a tutoring or testing  facility that is not located in the sponsoring school district
only if the governing body provides written notification to the nonsponsoring school district board:
(A) Prior to the first day the  students will receive tutoring or testing at the facility for a facility
that began operating after June 6, 2023; and
(B) Each time the charter for the public charter school is renewed.
(4) If a public charter school is sponsored by the State Board  of Education  or a community
sponsor, the governing body of the public charter school may  not operate a school or a testing or
tutoring facility that is not located in the school district specified by the school’s charter.
(5) If the governing body of a public charter school does not comply with the provisions of this
section, the nonsponsoring school district board may file  a complaint with the Superintendent of
Public Instruction. Upon receipt of a  complaint, the superintendent shall schedule a contested case
hearing pursuant to ORS 183.413 to 183.470. Upon a determination that  the governing body did not
comply with the requirements of this section, the superintendent may withhold State School Fund
moneys otherwise  due to the public charter school under ORS 338.155. The superintendent shall
withhold moneys until the governing body is in  compliance or until some other date determined by
the superintendent.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 338.135 is amended to read:
338.135. (1) Employee assignment to a public charter school shall be voluntary.
(2)(a) A public charter school or the sponsor of the public  charter school is considered the em-
ployer of any employees of the public charter school. If a  school district board is not the sponsor
of the public charter school, the school district board may not be the employer of the employees  of
the public charter school  and the school district board may not collectively bargain with the em-
ployees of the public charter school. The  public charter school governing body shall control the
selection of employees at the public charter school.
(b) If a virtual public charter school or the sponsor of a virtual public charter  school contracts
[12]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
with a for-profit entity to provide educational services through the virtual  public charter school, the
for-profit entity may not be the employer of any employees of the virtual  public charter school un-
less:
(A) The employee is an administrator who does not have any teaching responsibilities; and
(B) Both  the executive officer of the sponsor and the public charter school governing body ap-
prove employment by the for-profit entity. The executive officer or governing body may choose  to
grant approval under this subparagraph:
(i) For all employees of the for-profit  entity who meet the description in subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph;
(ii) Based on the job categories of the employees who meet the description in subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph; or
(iii) On a case-by-case basis for each employee  who meets the description in subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph.
(3) The school district board of the school district within which the public charter school  is lo-
cated shall grant a leave of absence to any employee  who chooses to work in the public charter
school. The length and terms of the leave  of absence shall be set by negotiated agreement or by
board policy. However, the length of the leave of absence may not be less than two years unless:
(a) The charter of  the public charter school is terminated or the public charter school is dis-
solved or closed during the leave of absence; or
(b) The employee  and the school district board have mutually agreed to a different length of
time.
(4) An employee of a public charter school operating within a school district who is  granted a
leave of absence from the school district and  returns to employment with the school district shall
retain seniority and benefits  as an employee pursuant to the terms of the leave of absence.
Notwithstanding ORS 243.650 to 243.809, a school district that was  the employer of an employee of
a public charter school not operating within the school district may make provisions for the  return
of the employee to employment with the school district.
(5)(a) For purposes of  ORS chapters 238 and 238A, a public charter school shall be considered
a public employer and as such shall participate in the Public Employees Retirement System.
(b) For purposes of determining the salary paid to an active member of the Public  Employees
Retirement System under ORS 238A.005 (17) during the period between August 29, 2003, and January
1, 2020, remuneration paid to a member  in return for services to a public charter school is deemed
includable in the member’s taxable income under Oregon law during a period of continuous em-
ployment with any public charter school if:
(A) The member was hired in a qualifying position by any  public charter school on or after
August 29, 2003;
(B) The member was informed in writing by the public charter school during the  period of con-
tinuous employment that the member was eligible to participate in the Public  Employees Retirement
System and the public charter school made contributions to the system on the member’s behalf;
(C) The remuneration was, or  would have been if the member were an Oregon resident,
includable  in  the member’s taxable income under Oregon law during the period of continuous em-
ployment; and
(D) The  member resided and performed services in the United States during the period of con-
tinuous employment.
(c) As used in this subsection, “continuous employment” means employment with a  public char-
[13]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ter school that is not interrupted by a period of more than 30 consecutive calendar days.
(6) For teacher licensing, employment  experience in public charter schools shall be considered
equivalent to experience in public schools.
(7)(a) Any person employed as an administrator in a public charter school shall be  licensed or
registered to administer by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission.
(b) Any person employed as a teacher in a public charter school shall be licensed or registered
to teach by the commission.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, at least one-half of  the total full-time
equivalent  (FTE)  teaching and administrative staff at the public charter school shall be licensed by
the commission pursuant to ORS 342.125.
(8) Notwithstanding ORS 243.650,  a public charter school shall be considered a school district
for purposes of ORS 243.650 to 243.809. An employee of  a public charter school may be a member
of a labor organization or  organize with other employees to bargain collectively. Bargaining units
at the public charter school may be separate  from other bargaining units of the sponsor or of the
school district in which the public charter school is located. Employees of  a public charter school
may be part of the bargaining units of  the sponsor or of the school district in which the public
charter school is located.
(9) An entity described in ORS 338.005 [ (4)] (5) may not waive the right  to sponsor a public
charter school in a collective bargaining agreement.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 338.135, as amended by section 9,  chapter 101, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
338.135. (1) Employee assignment to a public charter school shall be voluntary.
(2)(a) A public charter school or the sponsor of the public  charter school is considered the em-
ployer of any employees of the public charter school. If a  school district board is not the sponsor
of the public charter school, the school district board may not be the employer of the employees  of
the public charter school  and the school district board may not collectively bargain with the em-
ployees of the public charter school. The  public charter school governing body shall control the
selection of employees at the public charter school.
(b) If a virtual public charter school or the sponsor of a virtual public charter  school contracts
with a for-profit entity to provide educational services through the virtual  public charter school, the
for-profit entity may not be the employer of any employees of the virtual  public charter school un-
less:
(A) The employee is an administrator who does not have any teaching responsibilities; and
(B) Both  the executive officer of the sponsor and the public charter school governing body ap-
prove employment by the for-profit entity. The executive officer or governing body may choose  to
grant approval under this subparagraph:
(i) For all employees of the for-profit  entity who meet the description in subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph;
(ii) Based on the job categories of the employees who meet the description in subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph; or
(iii) On a case-by-case basis for each employee  who meets the description in subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph.
(3) The school  district board of the school district within which the public charter school is lo-
cated shall grant a leave of absence to any  employee who chooses to work in the public charter
school. The length and terms of the leave of absence shall  be set by negotiated agreement or by
[14]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
board policy. However, the length of the leave of absence may not be less than two years unless:
(a) The charter of the public charter school is terminated or the public charter  school is dis-
solved or closed during the leave of absence; or
(b) The employee and the school district board have mutually agreed to a different  length of
time.
(4) An employee  of a public charter school operating within a school district who is granted a
leave of absence from the school district and returns  to employment with the school district shall
retain seniority and benefits as an employee pursuant to the terms of the  leave of absence.
Notwithstanding ORS 243.650 to 243.809, a school  district that was the employer of an employee of
a public charter school not operating within the school district may make provisions for the  return
of the employee to employment with the school district.
(5)(a) For purposes of  ORS chapters 238 and 238A, a public charter school shall be considered
a public employer and as such shall participate in the Public Employees Retirement System.
(b) For purposes of determining the salary paid to an active member of the Public  Employees
Retirement System under ORS 238A.005 (18) during the period between August 29, 2003, and January
1, 2020, remuneration paid to a member  in return for services to a public charter school is deemed
includable in the member’s taxable income under Oregon law during a period of continuous em-
ployment with any public charter school if:
(A) The member was hired in a qualifying position by any  public charter school on or after
August 29, 2003;
(B) The member was informed in writing by the public charter school during the  period of con-
tinuous employment that the member was eligible to participate in the Public  Employees Retirement
System and the public charter school made contributions to the system on the member’s behalf;
(C) The remuneration was, or  would have been if the member were an Oregon resident,
includable  in  the member’s taxable income under Oregon law during the period of continuous em-
ployment; and
(D) The  member resided and performed services in the United States during the period of con-
tinuous employment.
(c) As used in this subsection, “continuous employment” means employment with a  public char-
ter school that is not interrupted by a period of more than 30 consecutive calendar days.
(6) For teacher licensing, employment  experience in public charter schools shall be considered
equivalent to experience in public schools.
(7)(a) Any person employed as an administrator in a public charter school shall be  licensed or
registered to administer by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission.
(b) Any person employed as a teacher in a public charter school shall be licensed or registered
to teach by the commission.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, at least one-half of  the total full-time
equivalent  (FTE)  teaching and administrative staff at the public charter school shall be licensed by
the commission pursuant to ORS 342.125.
(8) Notwithstanding ORS 243.650,  a public charter school shall be considered a school district
for purposes of ORS 243.650 to 243.809. An employee of  a public charter school may be a member
of a labor organization or  organize with other employees to bargain collectively. Bargaining units
at the public charter school may be separate  from other bargaining units of the sponsor or of the
school district in which the public charter school is located. Employees of  a public charter school
may be part of the bargaining units of  the sponsor or of the school district in which the public
[15]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
charter school is located.
(9) An entity described in ORS 338.005 [ (4)] (5) may not waive the right  to sponsor a public
charter school in a collective bargaining agreement.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 338.155 is amended to read:
338.155. (1)(a)  Students of a public charter school shall be considered to be residents of the
school district in which  the public charter school is located for purposes of distribution of the State
School  Fund.
(b) All amounts to be distributed from the State  School Fund for public charter schools shall
first be distributed to the school district in which the public charter school is located.
(c) For the purpose of determining the amounts to be  distributed to a school district from the
State School Fund for  a public charter school, the district extended ADMw described in ORS 327.013
shall be calculated:
(A) Except  as provided by subparagraph (B) or (C) of this paragraph, as though the students
enrolled at a public charter school are students enrolled at the public schools  of the school district
in which the public charter school is located.
(B) By  not including any portion of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year if the public charter school ceased to operate because of dissolution or closure or because  of
termination or nonrenewal of a charter.
(C) By calculating the current  school year’s ADMw separately for a virtual public charter
school and for the school district if the school district, without  consideration of the ADM of the
virtual public  charter school, had a decrease in ADM or ADMw compared to the previous school
year.
(2) A school district shall contractually establish, with any  public charter school that is spon-
sored by the board of the school district, payment for provision of educational services to  the public
charter  school’s  students. The payment shall equal an amount per weighted average daily member-
ship (ADMw) of the public charter school that is at least equal to:
(a) Eighty percent of the amount of the school district’s General Purpose Grant per ADMw as
calculated under ORS 327.013 for students  who are enrolled in kindergarten through grade eight;
and
(b) Ninety-five percent of the amount of the school district’s General  Purpose Grant per ADMw
as calculated under ORS 327.013 for students who are enrolled in grades 9 through 12.
(3) A school district shall contractually establish, with any  public charter school that is spon-
sored by the State Board of Education or a community sponsor  and that  is within the boundaries
of the  school district, payment for provision of educational services to the public charter school’s
students. The payment  shall equal an amount per weighted average daily membership (ADMw) of the
public charter school that is at least equal to:
(a) Ninety percent of the amount of the school district’s General Purpose Grant per  ADMw as
calculated under ORS 327.013 for students  who are enrolled in kindergarten through grade eight;
and
(b) Ninety-five percent of the amount of the school district’s General  Purpose Grant per ADMw
as calculated under ORS 327.013 for students who are enrolled in grades 9 through 12.
(4) The estimated amount of each school district’s  General Purpose Grant per ADMw shall be
determined each year by the Department of Education and made available to all school districts.
(5) The school district in which the public charter school is  located shall transfer an amount
per weighted average  daily membership (ADMw) of the public charter school that is equal to 50
[16]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
percent of the amount of the school  district’s General Purpose Grant per ADMw as calculated under
ORS 327.013 that is not paid to the public charter school through a contract created pursuant  to
subsection (3) of this section to the Department of Education.
(6) The department may use any moneys received  under this section for activities related to
public charter schools.
(7) A school district and a public charter school may negotiate  to establish a payment for the
provision of educational services to the public charter  school’s students that is more than the min-
imum amounts specified in subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(8) A school district  shall send payment to a public charter school based on a contract negoti-
ated under  this section within 10 days after receiving payments from the State School Fund pursuant
to ORS 327.095.
(9)(a) A public charter  school may apply for any grant that is available to school districts or
nonchartered public schools from the Department of Education. The  department shall consider the
application of the public charter school in  the same manner as an application from a school district
or nonchartered public school.
(b) The department shall award any grant that is available to school districts  based solely on
the weighted average daily membership (ADMw)  of the school district directly to the public charter
school. This paragraph does not apply to any grant from the State School Fund.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 338.165 is amended to read:
338.165. (1)(a) The school district in which a public charter school is  located shall identify, lo-
cate and evaluate students enrolled in the public charter school  to determine which students may
be in need of special education and related services.
(b) The school district in which a public charter school is located:
(A) Shall receive funding from the State School Fund as provided by this section for students
who are eligible for special education and related  services and who are enrolled in the public
charter school; and
(B) Is eligible to receive  high cost disabilities grants as provided by ORS 327.348 for students
who are enrolled in the public charter school.
(c) Students who are  eligible for special education and related services shall be considered stu-
dents of the school district in which the  public charter school is located for purposes of data col-
lection and reporting.
(2) If a student is enrolled in a public charter school  and is eligible for special education and
related services, an additional amount  shall be added to the ADM of the public charter school as
described in ORS 327.013 (1)(c)(A)(i). The payment per ADMw in the public charter school  that is
attributable to the student who is eligible for special  education and related services shall equal an
amount that is at least equal to:
(a) 40 percent of the amount of the General  Purpose Grant per ADMw for the school district in
which the public charter school is located, as  calculated under ORS 327.013, for students who are
enrolled in kindergarten through grade eight; and
(b) 47.5 percent of the amount of the General  Purpose Grant per ADMw for the school district
in which the public charter school is located, as calculated under ORS 327.013, for  students who are
enrolled in grades 9 through 12.
(3) If the State Board of  Education or a community sponsor  is the sponsor of a public charter
school, the school  district in which the public charter school is located, for each ADMw that is at-
tributable to a student enrolled in a public charter school who is eligible for  special education and
[17]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
related services, shall transfer five percent of the amount  of the school district’s General Purpose
Grant per ADMw as calculated under ORS 327.013 to the State Board of Education.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2)  of this section, a school district and a public charter school
may negotiate  on a case-by-case basis for an alternative distribution of funds other than the dis-
tribution prescribed by subsection (2) of this section.
(5) Payments under this  section must be made within 10 days after a school district receives
payment from the State School Fund pursuant to ORS 327.095.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 327.185 is amended to read:
327.185. (1) As used in this section, “eligible applicant” means any of the following entities:
(a) Common school districts and union high school districts.
(b) The Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program.
(c) Public charter schools  that are not virtual public charter schools  or that are not sponsored
by a community sponsor , as those terms are  defined  in ORS 338.005, and that have a student
population of which:
(A) At least 35 percent of the student population is composed of students from the  following
student groups:
(i) Economically disadvantaged, as described in ORS 327.180 (2)(b)(A);
(ii) Racial or ethnic groups that have historically experienced academic disparities, as described
in ORS 327.180 (2)(b)(B); or
(iii) Students with disabilities, as described in ORS 327.180 (2)(b)(C); and
(B) The percentage of the students  from student groups identified under subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph is greater than or equal to:
(i) The percentage of all students in the school district  who are economically disadvantaged, if
eligibility is determined based on the percentage of students who are economically disadvantaged;
(ii) The percentage of all  students in the school district who are from racial or ethnic groups
that have historically experienced academic disparities, if eligibility is determined based on the
percentage of students who are from those racial or ethnic groups; or
(iii) The percentage of all students in the school district who are disabled,  if eligibility is de-
termined based on the percentage of students who are disabled.
(2)(a) Eligible applicants may apply for a grant from  the Student Investment Account to receive
a distribution under ORS 327.190.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 338.155 (9), a public charter school that is not  an eligible applicant
may not apply for a grant under this section.
(3) Prior to preparing a grant application, an eligible applicant must:
(a) If the eligible applicant is a school district, determine whether the school  district will allow
public charter schools sponsored by, or located within, the school district  to participate in the grant
application and the grant agreement.
(b) If the  eligible applicant is a public charter school, determine whether the public charter
school intends to apply for a grant and provide notice of that intent to the school district in  which
the public charter school is located and to the Department of Education.
(4)(a) If an eligible applicant is a school district and  decides to include public charter schools
in the grant application and grant agreement, the school district must provide all  public charter
schools sponsored by, or located within, the school district the  opportunity to participate in the
grant application and grant agreement.
(b)(A) A public charter school is  not required to participate in the grant application and grant
[18]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
agreement of a school district.
(B) If a public charter school does not participate  in a grant application and grant agreement
under this subsection:
(i) The ADMw of  the public charter school may not be used in the calculation of the school
district ADMw for grants distributed under ORS 327.195; and
(ii) The public charter school is not entitled to any  grant moneys distributed under ORS 327.195.
(C) If a public charter school participates in a grant application and grant agreement  under this
subsection:
(i) The public charter school and school district shall enter into an agreement  for the distrib-
ution of moneys or the provision of services, including any accountability  measures required of the
public charter school by the school district;
(ii) The ADMw of the  public charter school shall be used in the calculation of the school district
ADMw for grants distributed under ORS 327.195; and
(iii) The public charter school is entitled to any grant moneys or services provided for in  the
agreement entered into under this subparagraph.
(5)(a) For the purpose of preparing a grant application, an eligible applicant must determine:
(A) Which of the allowed uses identified in ORS 327.180 (3) the  eligible applicant will fund with
grant moneys; and
(B) Which of the eligible uses identified  under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph the eligible
applicant will designate to meeting student mental and behavioral health needs.
(b) An eligible  applicant shall make the determinations required under paragraph (a) of this
subsection by:
(A) Engaging in strategic planning; and
(B) Considering the recommendations of the Quality Education  Commission established under
ORS 327.500 and recommendations from the advisory groups formed by  the Department of Education
for the purposes of the statewide education plans developed and implemented by the department.
(6)(a) The strategic planning required under subsection (5) of this section must include:
(A) A completed needs assessment, as described in ORS 329.095;
(B) An analysis of the potential academic impact, both for the students of the  eligible applicant
and for student groups  identified in ORS 327.180 (2)(b), from the allowed uses that would be funded
by grant moneys; and
(C) The creation of budgets for the allowed uses that would be funded by grant moneys.
(b) The  strategic planning required under subsection (5) of this section must take into consid-
eration:
(A) Input  from the community of the eligible applicant, including school employees, students
from student groups identified in ORS 327.180 (2)(b) and parents of those students; and
(B) Data collected by the eligible applicant to enable the eligible applicant  to make equity-based
decisions.
(7) Based on the strategic planning described in subsection (6) of this section, the eligible ap-
plicant shall develop  a four-year plan for the use of grant moneys. The plan must be updated every
two years and must:
(a) Identify which allowed uses identified in ORS 327.180 (3) will be funded with  grant moneys
and which of those uses will be designated to meet student mental and behavioral health needs.
(b) Describe how the allowed uses identified under paragraph (a)  of this subsection will be used
to:
[19]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Meet students’ mental and behavioral health needs;
(B) Increase academic achievement for students of the eligible applicant; and
(C) Reduce academic disparities for student groups identified in ORS 327.180 (2)(b)  who are
served by the eligible  applicant, and identify which of those student groups will benefit from the
allowed uses that are being funded with grant moneys.
(c) Include the budgets for the allowed uses to be funded with grant moneys.
(d) Be approved by the governing body of the eligible applicant at an open meeting, following:
(A) Provision of the plan at the main office  of the eligible applicant and on the eligible
applicant’s website;
(B) Oral presentation of the plan by an administrator of the eligible  applicant to the governing
body of the eligible applicant; and
(C) Opportunity for the public to comment on the plan at an open meeting.
(e) Be a part of the local district continuous improvement plan described in ORS 329.095, if  the
eligible applicant is a school district.
(8) To apply for a grant, an eligible applicant must submit an  application every two years in a
format and according to timelines prescribed by  the Department of Education. The application must
include:
(a) A completed needs assessment, as described in ORS 329.095;
(b) The plan developed under subsection (7) of this section; and
(c) Budget estimates for  each of the allowed uses identified in the plan developed under sub-
section (7) of this section that will be funded by grant moneys.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 327.195 is amended to read:
327.195. (1)(a) Except as provided  by paragraph (d) of this subsection, the amount of a grant
awarded from the Student Investment Account = the grant recipient’s ADMw ×  (the  total amount
available for distribution as grants in each biennium ÷ the total ADMw of all grant recipients).
(b) For purposes of this subsection and except as provided by paragraph (c) of this  subsection,
ADMw equals:
(A) For school districts, the ADMw as calculated  under ORS 327.013, except that the additional
amount allowed for students who are in poverty  families, as determined under ORS 327.013
(1)(c)(A)(v)(I), shall be 0.5.
(B) For an  educational program under the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile
Detention Education Program, as provided in ORS 327.026.
(c) When calculating ADMw for a school district, the Department of  Education shall remove
from the calculation any amounts that are attributable to:
(A) A virtual public charter school  or a  public charter school sponsored by a community
sponsor, as those terms are  defined in ORS 338.005;
(B) A public charter school that provided  notice of the public charter school’s intent to apply
for a grant as an eligible applicant; and
(C) A public charter school sponsored by, or located within, the school district  that did not
participate in the grant application or grant agreement.
(d) The amount of a grant distributed under this  section may be adjusted by the department to
ensure that:
(A) A grant recipient does not receive any  moneys for uses that are not allowed uses under ORS
327.180 (3).
(B) A school district with an ADMw of 50 or less receives a minimum grant amount.
[20]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Each site of the Youth Corrections Education  Program and the Juvenile Detention Educa-
tion Program receives a grant amount that is no less than the minimum grant amount provided  to
a school district under subparagraph (B) of this paragraph.
(2) The State Board of Education shall adopt any  rules necessary for the distribution of grants
under this section, including establishing:
(a) The minimum grant amounts under subsection (1)(d) of this section; and
(b) Any percentages and timelines for installment  payments and adjustments of those installment
payments.
(3) A grant recipient shall deposit the grant moneys the grant recipient  receives under this
section into a separate account and shall apply  amounts in that account as provided by the grant
agreement.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 327.362 is amended to read:
327.362. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “ADMw” means weighted average daily membership, as calculated under ORS 327.013.
(b) “Eligible public charter school” means a public charter school that is not a virtual public
charter school  or that is  not sponsored by a community sponsor , as those terms are  defined
in ORS 338.005, and that has  a student population of which at least 65 percent of the total student
population is composed of students from the following combined student groups:
(A) Racial or ethnic groups that have historically experienced  academic disparities, as described
in ORS 327.180 (2)(b)(B); and
(B) Students with disabilities, as described in ORS 327.180 (2)(b)(C).
(2) In addition to those moneys distributed through the State School Fund, the Department of
Education shall award  grants under this section to eligible public charter schools from the State-
wide Education Initiatives Account.
(3) The amount of a grant awarded to an eligible public charter school under this section = the
public charter school’s ADMw ×  the difference between:
(a) The amount of the General Purpose Grant per ADMw  for the school district that has
contractually established payment for the provision of educational services  to the public charter
school’s students under ORS 338.155 (2) or (3); and
(b) The amount of the General Purpose Grant  per ADMw that the public charter school receives
under a contract for the  provision of educational services to the public charter school’s students
under ORS 338.155 (2) or (3).
(4) The purpose of grants distributed under this section shall be to increase academic achieve-
ment, including reducing academic disparities, for:
(a) Students from racial or ethnic groups that have historically experienced academic disparities,
as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education; and
(b) Students with disabilities.
(5) Any eligible public charter school may apply for and receive a grant as provided  by this
section. A grant application must:
(a) Describe how grant moneys will be  used to advance the purpose described in subsection (4)
of this section.
(b) Specify the supports that will be:
(A) Provided to students with a disability; or
(B) Used to  enhance special education and related services that are provided by a school district
under ORS 338.165 to the students of the public charter school.
[21]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Identify any applicable longitudinal performance growth targets for the  public charter school
that have been established:
(A) Under contract between  the public charter school and the sponsor of the public charter
school; or
(B) By the public charter school  or the school district in which the public charter school is lo-
cated for purposes of grants from the Student Investment Account, as provided by ORS 327.190.
(d) Be submitted based on the timelines and forms prescribed by the department.
(6)(a) If the department determines that a grant application complies with the  requirements
prescribed under this section, the department shall enter into a grant agreement  with the eligible
public charter school.
(b) A grant agreement must include  longitudinal performance growth targets for the public
charter school. If the grant application identified longitudinal performance growth targets, those
targets shall be included in the grant agreement. If the grant application did  not identify longitudi-
nal performance growth targets, the public charter  school shall collaborate with the department to
develop longitudinal performance growth targets. Longitudinal performance growth targets must:
(A) Be based on data available for longitudinal analysis; and
(B) Use the following applicable metrics:
(i) Third-grade reading proficiency rates, as defined in ORS 327.190;
(ii) Regular attendance rates, as defined in ORS 327.190; and
(iii) Any other metrics identified by the department in collaboration with the public  charter
school.
(7) After the department and the public charter school have entered into a grant agreement,  the
department shall award a grant to the  public charter school in the amount calculated under sub-
section (3) of this section. A grant recipient shall deposit grant moneys  received under this section
into a separate account and shall apply the amounts in that account as provided by the grant
agreement.
(8)(a) Each year, each grant recipient must submit to the department a description of:
(A) How grant moneys received under this section were used to advance  the purpose described
in subsection (4) of this section and to  meet performance growth targets in the grant agreement; and
(B) Progress made by  the grant recipient toward meeting the performance growth targets in the
grant agreement.
(b) A grant recipient shall provide the  information required under this subsection based on the
timelines and forms prescribed by  the department. To the greatest extent practicable, the depart-
ment shall accept the information described in this subsection in the manner that  it is made avail-
able by a public charter school to the sponsor of the public charter school.
(9) To  the greatest extent practicable, any requirements prescribed by the department or the
board under this section in relation to an application, a grant agreement or the submission of in-
formation under subsection (8) of this section shall reduce any redundancies between  a grant
awarded under this section and a grant awarded from the  Student Investment Account. Reduction
in redundancies includes accepting for the purposes of grants awarded under  this section any ap-
plicable forms or information submitted by the  public charter school to the department or a school
district for the purposes of a grant awarded from the Student Investment Account.
(10) A  public charter school and a school district may not consider moneys received by the
public charter school under this section when establishing payment for the  provision of educational
services to the public charter school’s students under ORS 338.155 (2) or (3).
[22]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(11) Prior  to February 1 of each year, the department shall submit to the appropriate interim
legislative committees a  report related to the grants awarded under this section. The report must
describe:
(a) The public  charter schools that applied for the grants and the public charter schools that
received the grants;
(b) The  longitudinal performance growth targets included in grant agreements, as provided by
subsection (6)(b) of this section; and
(c) Progress made toward meeting longitudinal performance growth targets, as reported under
subsection (8)(a) of this section.
(12) The State Board of Education shall adopt  any rules necessary for the distribution of grants
under this section.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 327.825 is amended to read:
327.825. As used in ORS 327.825 to 327.845:
(1) “Early elementary grades” means any grade from prekindergarten through grade three.
(2) “Elementary school” means a school of a school district, or a public charter  school, with
students in early elementary grades.
(3) “High-dosage tutoring” means  one-on-one tutoring or tutoring in small groups, as determined
by rule of the State Board of Education, that:
(a) Is provided in addition to daily instruction;
(b) Is provided two or more times each week over at least a 10-week period; and
(c) Uses a  research-aligned tutoring model that is administered in a culturally responsive man-
ner and that is combined with the training necessary for tutors to implement the model effectively.
(4) “Prekindergarten” means a preschool or prekindergarten program that is:
(a) Provided by a school district or public charter school; or
(b) Delivered in partnership between a school district and another organization.
(5) “Preschool” means  a high-quality program that serves children at least three years of age
but not older than five years of age.
(6) “Public charter school” means a public charter school that:
(a) Is established under ORS chapter 338; and
(b) Is not a virtual public charter school  or is  not sponsored by a community sponsor , as
those terms are  defined in ORS 338.005.
(7) “Qualified tutor” means an  individual who is trained to implement a program providing
high-dosage tutoring.
(8) “Research-aligned literacy strategies” means strategies that:
(a) Are literacy focused;
(b) Are culturally responsive and relevant to diverse learners;
(c) Are based on long-term research derived from the science of reading and writing; and
(d) Apply instructional practices that are developmentally appropriate and specifically  designed
for students with disabilities and students who are English language learners.
(9) “Science of reading and writing” means:
(a) The convergence of findings from research on  reading and writing processes, development
and instruction; and
(b) The teaching of phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency,  vocabulary and comprehension
through explicit and systematic instruction that can  be differentiated to meet the needs of individual
learners through developmentally appropriate practices.
[23]
HB 3215
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
(10) “Student groups that have historically experienced academic disparities” means:
(a) Economically disadvantaged students, as determined under rules  adopted by the State Board
of Education;
(b) Students from racial or ethnic groups that have historically experienced academic disparities,
as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education;
(c) Students with disabilities;
(d) Students who are English language learners;
(e) Students who are foster children, as defined in ORS 30.297;
(f) Students who  are homeless, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Edu-
cation;
(g) Students who attend an elementary school that:
(A) Is identified for comprehensive support and improvement  or for targeted support and im-
provement under the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95, 129 Stat. 1802); or
(B) Qualifies for assistance under Title I of the federal Elementary and Secondary  Education
Act of 1965; or
(h) Any other student groups that have historically experienced academic disparities,  as deter-
mined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education by rule.
[24]