Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 383.001 to
383.245.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Oregon Transportation
Commission is prohibited from establishing any toll on Interstate 205.
SECTION 3.  ORS 383.150 is amended to read:
383.150. (1) The Oregon Transportation Commission shall establish a toll program.
(2) As part of the toll program, after seeking and receiving approval from the Federal Highway
Administration, the commission may assess variable rate tolls. Tolling may include,  but is not lim-
ited to assessing variable rate tolls for the purpose of:
(a) Managing congestion; and
(b) Partially or wholly funding the construction, operation or maintenance of a highway.
(3) The commission shall assess tolls [ in the following locations: ]
[(a) On Interstate 205, beginning at the  Washington state line and ending where it intersects with
Interstate 5 in this state. ]
[(b)] on Interstate 5, beginning at  the Washington state line and ending where it intersects with
Interstate 205.
(4) To the extent necessary and permitted by state and federal law and  Article IX, section 3a,
of the Oregon Constitution, the commission shall ensure tolls assessed pursuant to  subsection (3)
of this section or  tolls assessed as part of the Interstate 5 Boone Bridge and Seismic Improvement
Project:
(a) Reduce traffic congestion by managing demand on the tollway and by  improving operations
on the tollway;
(b) Reduce traffic congestion as a result of the tollway, not only on the tollway but also on  ad-
jacent, connected or parallel highways to the tollways, regardless of ownership;
(c) Improve safety not only on the tollway but also  on adjacent, connected or parallel highways
to the tollways, regardless of ownership; and
(d) Minimize and mitigate impacts  to historically and currently underrepresented and disadvan-
taged communities.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4154
SB 925
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
(5) Any unit of government assessing tolls on highways for which the unit of  government is the
road authority, pursuant to ORS 810.010, shall collaborate with other units of government to:
(a) Determine whether assessing tolls may result in traffic, equity, safety  or climate impacts as
a result of assessing tolls;
(b) Determine  appropriate investments or efforts that may minimize or reduce any potential im-
pacts; and
(c) Periodically review any  investments or efforts identified and implemented under this sub-
section.
(6) Before assessing tolls  in the locations described under subsection (3) of this section, the
commission shall report to the Joint Committee on Transportation established under ORS 171.858.
(7) The commission may enter  into agreements with the State of Washington, or the State of
Washington’s tollway operator or  other designee, relating to establishing, reviewing, adjusting and
collecting tolls for the program described in this section.
(8) As used in this section, “highway” has the meaning given that term in ORS 366.005.
[2]