Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Human Services shall study  necessary improvements
in the regulation  of memory care, including but not limited to Alzheimer’s care units as de-
fined in ORS 443.886. The study must include a review of:
(a) Competency training requirements for staff of memory care facilities.
(b) Staffing requirements and staffing ratios for memory care facilities.
(c) Reimbursement rates for rural memory care facilities.
(2) The department shall report on the results of the study to an appropriate  committee
or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly no later than September 1, 2018.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2017 Act is repealed on January 2, 2019.
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2629