Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out
of the General  Fund, the amount of $250,000 for distribution to the Food Innovation Center
of Oregon State University to support product development relating to milk.
SECTION 2.
 This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3117