Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Environmental Quality, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, to  be deposited in the Residential Solid
Fuel Heating Air  Quality Improvement Fund established under ORS 468A.490 for the purpose
of awarding grants to  support community efforts to improve economic development and
public health by reducing emissions from solid fuel burning devices that burn wood.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the amount of
$1,000,000 is established for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2019,  as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of
Environmental Quality  for deposit in the Residential Solid Fuel Heating Air Quality Im-
provement Fund established under ORS 468A.490.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4243
SB 1031
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the amount of
$1,000,000 is established for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2020,  as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of
Environmental Quality  for deposit in the Residential Solid Fuel Heating Air Quality Im-
provement Fund established under ORS 468A.490.
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
[2]