Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Transportation shall develop and implement a pro-
gram to lend moneys to school districts to aid  in the acquisition of electric-powered school
buses. Under the program:
(a) The department shall enter into agreements with school districts  under which the
department provides loans for the incremental costs of  purchase of electric-powered school
buses. As used in this paragraph, “incremental costs” means the difference between the  cost
of purchasing  a diesel-powered school bus and the cost of purchasing an electric-powered
school bus.
(b) The  department shall make loans from moneys made available for that purpose out
of the Electric Bus Loan Fund established under  section 2 of this 2019 Act. The department
shall deposit moneys repaid under the loans, including interest upon the loans, into  the fund.
(c) The maximum term of a  loan is ______ years. Loans may bear interest at a maximum
rate of ______ percent.
(d) The department shall develop a process for school districts to apply for loans. The
department shall prioritize loans to school districts with  the greatest demonstrated need for
replacement of school buses.
(2) The department may adopt rules as necessary to carry out the  provisions of this
section.
SECTION 2. The Electric Bus Loan Fund  is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct  from the General Fund. The Electric Bus Loan Fund consists of moneys from
repayments of loans made under section 1  of this 2019 Act, including interest upon such
loans, and may include moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited  or transferred to the fund
by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise. The moneys in the fund are continuously appro-
priated to the Department of Transportation for the purposes specified in section 1 of this
2019 Act.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Transportation, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $______, for deposit  in the Electric Bus Loan Fund established
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2353
HB 2309
1
2
under section 2 of this 2019 Act.
[2]