Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 462.725 is amended to read:
462.725. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the Oregon Racing Commission
may adopt rules to:
(a) License and regulate all phases of operation of Multi-Jurisdictional Simulcasting  and Inter-
active Wagering Totalizator Hubs located in Oregon; and
(b) Authorize and license Multi-Jurisdictional  Simulcasting and Interactive Wagering Totalizator
Hubs to conduct simulcast broadcasting of, and mutuel wagering on, animal races, including  previ-
ously held races on which mutuel wagering is lawful in Oregon.
(2) In addition to the other rules of operation adopted by the  commission, the commission shall
adopt a rule setting the amount that may be taken from the gross receipts  of the multi-jurisdictional
mutuel system.
(3) All employees working in Oregon and all officers of any Multi-Jurisdictional Simulcasting
and Interactive Wagering Totalizator Hubs located and operating  in Oregon must obtain a license
from the commission prior  to the commencement of business or employment. The commission shall
adopt rules establishing license fees for the employees and officers, not to exceed $30 per year.
(4) Payments to be made to the commission include:
(a) Multi-Jurisdictional  Simulcasting and Interactive Wagering Totalizator Hub license fee not
more than $200 per operating day.
(b) Not more than one percent of total gross receipts of  mutuel wagering recorded by the
totalizator system.
(5) [Of the ] Moneys  received by the commission under subsection (4)(b) of this section  shall be
expended as follows, subject to section 3 of this 2025 Act: [,]
(a) 10 percent shall be retained by  the commission and may be used for operating ex-
penses, for safety initiatives or to support the horse racing industry in Oregon;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4008
HB 3332
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
(b) 15 percent shall be distributed in equal shares to the Oregon Thoroughbred Owners
and Breeders Association, the Oregon Quarter  Horse Association and the Oregon
Horsemen’s Benevolent and Protective Association to be used to support the horse racing
industry in Oregon; and
(c) 75 percent shall be distributed by the  commission for the benefit of the Oregon pari-
mutuel racing industry pursuant to rules adopted by the commission.  [25 percent shall be paid
to the State Treasurer for deposit  in the General Fund and 75 percent shall be retained by the com-
mission. The commission may adopt rules under which the moneys retained by  the commission may be
distributed for the benefit of the Oregon pari-mutuel racing industry. ]
(6) Wagers on previously held races authorized under subsection (1) of this section are  subject
to the provisions of ORS 462.157.
(7) A Multi-Jurisdictional Simulcasting and Interactive Wagering Totalizator Hub licensee may
establish an account for wagering on  greyhound racing for an individual unless wagering on live
greyhound racing is unlawful in the jurisdiction of the individual’s principal residence.
SECTION 2.
Sections 3 and 4 of this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 462.700
to 462.740.
SECTION 3. (1)(a) Before distributing moneys under ORS  462.725 (5)(b) and (c), the
Oregon Racing Commission shall enter into agreements with the recipients that contain  the
following provisions:
(A) Within 24 months of receiving the moneys,  a recipient must both expend the moneys
and provide a detailed report to the commission on how the moneys were expended.
(B) If any of the moneys  are unexpended within 24 months of receipt, or if a recipient
fails to the report to the commission  on an expenditure within 24 months of receipt, any
amounts unexpended or for which an  expenditure report is not made must be returned to the
commission.
(b) Moneys returned to the commission under paragraph (a)(B)  of this subsection must
be deposited in the Horse Racing Safety Fund established under section 4 of this 2025 Act.
(2) Moneys retained by the commission under ORS 462.725 (5)(a) must be expended  by the
commission during the fiscal biennium in which they are received by the  commission. Any
such moneys that are not expended by the end of the  fiscal biennium must be deposited in
the Horse Racing Safety Fund established under section 4 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. The Horse Racing Safety Fund is established in the State  Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. The Horse Racing Safety Fund  consists of all moneys
credited to the fund, including moneys deposited to the  fund under section 3 of this 2025 Act
and moneys appropriated or transferred  to the fund by the Legislative Assembly. Moneys in
the fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Racing Commission to carry out initi-
atives related to horse and jockey safety.
[2]