Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 163.165 is amended to read:
163.165. (1) A person commits the crime of assault in the third degree if the person:
(a) Recklessly causes serious physical injury to another by  means of a deadly or dangerous
weapon;
(b) Recklessly  causes serious physical injury to another under circumstances manifesting ex-
treme indifference to the value of human life;
(c) Recklessly causes physical injury to another by means of a deadly or dangerous weapon un-
der circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to the value of human life;
(d) Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes, by  means other than a motor vehicle, physical
injury to the operator of a public transit vehicle while the operator is in control of or operating the
vehicle. As used in this  paragraph, “public transit vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS
166.116;
(e) While being aided by another  person actually present, intentionally or knowingly causes
physical injury to another;
(f) While committed to a youth correction facility, intentionally or  knowingly causes physical
injury to another knowing the other person is a staff member while  the other person is acting in the
course of official duty;
(g) Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes physical injury to an emergency medical ser-
vices provider, as defined in ORS 682.025,  while the emergency medical services provider is per-
forming official duties;
(h) Being  at least 18 years of age, intentionally or knowingly causes physical injury to a child
10 years of age or younger;
(i) Intentionally or knowingly causes physical injury to a  health care worker while the
worker is acting in the course of official duty;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1630
HB 2313
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
[(i)] (j)  Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes, by means other than a motor vehicle,
physical injury to the operator of a taxi while the operator is in control of the taxi; or
[(j)] (k)  Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causes physical  injury to a flagger or a highway
worker while the flagger or highway worker is performing official duties.
(2)(a) Assault in the third degree is a Class C felony.
(b) Notwithstanding  paragraph (a) of this subsection, assault in the third degree under sub-
section (1)(a) or (b) of this section is a Class B felony if:
(A) The assault resulted from the operation of a motor vehicle; and
(B) The defendant was the driver of the  motor vehicle and was driving while under the influence
of intoxicants.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Flagger” has the meaning given that term in ORS 811.230.
(b) “Health care worker” means a person  licensed, registered or certified to practice in
this state as a nurse practitioner, a registered nurse, a licensed practical nurse, a  certified
nursing assistant, a physician or a physician associate.
[(b)] (c)  “Highway worker” has the meaning given that term in ORS 811.230.
[(c)] (d) “Staff member” means:
(A) A corrections officer  as defined in ORS 181A.355, a youth correction officer, a youth cor-
rection facility staff member, a Department of  Corrections or Oregon Youth Authority staff member
or a person employed pursuant to a contract with the department or youth authority to work  with,
or in the vicinity of, adults in custody, youths or adjudicated youths; and
(B) A volunteer authorized by the department,  youth authority or other entity in charge of a
corrections facility to work with, or in the vicinity of,  adults in custody, youths or adjudicated
youths.
[(d)] (e)  “Youth correction facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 162.135.
SECTION 2.
(1) Any entity that employs a health care worker shall develop and maintain
a notification program concerning persons who have been convicted of  assaulting a health
care worker employed by the entity. The program shall include:
(a) A database of the names and other identifying information  of all persons who have
been convicted of assaulting a  health care worker employed by the entity, and the name of
the health care worker victim associated with each assault.
(b) A system to notify the victim when:
(A) The convicted person enters the workplace of the victim; or
(B) The victim is assigned to a location in which the convicted person is likely to be.
(2) As used in this section,  “health care worker” means a person licensed, registered or
certified to practice in this state as a nurse practitioner, a registered  nurse, a licensed
practical nurse, a certified nursing assistant, a physician, a  physician associate or an emer-
gency medical services provider.
[2]