Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 260.345 is amended to read:
260.345. (1) Any elector may file with any  filing officer a written complaint alleging that a vio-
lation of an election law  or rule adopted by the Secretary of State under ORS chapters 246 to 260
has occurred and stating the reason for believing that the violation occurred and any  evidence re-
lating to it. A complaint and any evidence relating  to it may be filed electronically. A complaint
alleging a violation involving the Secretary of State, a candidate for the office of Secretary  of State,
or any political committee or person supporting the Secretary of State or a candidate for  the office
of Secretary of State may be filed with the Attorney General. The  Secretary of State or Attorney
General shall not accept an anonymous complaint.
(2) The Secretary of State by  rule shall prescribe the procedure for processing a complaint filed
with any person other  than the Secretary of State. If the complaint concerns the Secretary of State,
any candidate for the office of the Secretary of  State, or any political committee or person sup-
porting the candidacy of the Secretary  of State or of another person for the office of Secretary of
State, the  complaint and any additional information relating to the complaint shall be sent to the
Attorney General.
(3) Upon receipt of a complaint under  subsection (1) or (2) of this section the Secretary of State
or Attorney General immediately shall examine the complaint to  determine whether a violation of
an election law or rule has occurred and shall make any investigation the Secretary of State  or
Attorney General considers necessary. Except as provided in this subsection, within 48  hours of
receiving a complaint under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the Secretary of State or Attorney
General shall notify the person  who is the subject of the complaint that a complaint has been re-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 847
HB 2351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ceived. If the Secretary of State or Attorney General receives a complaint or complaints  involving
25 or more individuals, political committees or petition committees in  any 24-hour period, the Sec-
retary of State or Attorney General need not notify the persons who are the  subjects of those
complaints within 48 hours of receiving the complaints but  shall notify those persons not later than
10 business days after receiving the complaint or complaints.
(4) An individual, political  committee or petition committee that receives a request for
information or documentation pursuant to an investigation  under subsection (3) of this sec-
tion or ORS 260.234 shall provide the requested information or documentation to  the Secre-
tary of State, Attorney General or filing officer not later than  30 calendar days after
receiving the request.
[(4)] (5)  If the Secretary of State believes after an investigation under subsection (3) of  this
section that a violation of an election law or rule has occurred, the secretary:
(a) In the case of a violation that is  subject to a penalty under ORS 260.993, immediately shall
report the findings to  the Attorney General and request prosecution. If the violation involves the
Attorney General, a candidate for  that office or a political committee or person supporting or op-
posing the Attorney General or a  candidate for that office, the Secretary of State shall appoint an-
other prosecutor for that purpose; or
(b) In the case of a violation not subject to a penalty under ORS 260.993, may impose  a civil
penalty under ORS 260.995.
[(5)] (6) Upon receipt of a complaint or report under subsection (1), (2) or [ (4)] (5) of this section
involving  an alleged violation subject to a penalty under ORS 260.993, the Attorney General or other
prosecutor immediately shall examine the complaint or report to  determine whether a violation of
an election law has occurred.  If the Attorney General or prosecutor determines that a violation has
occurred, the Attorney General or prosecutor immediately shall begin prosecution  in the name of
the state. The Attorney General or other  prosecutor shall have the same powers in any county of
this state as the district attorney for the county.
[(6)] (7) Upon receipt of  a complaint under subsection (1) or (2) of this section involving an al-
leged violation of an election law or rule not subject to a penalty under ORS 260.993, the Attorney
General shall examine the complaint to determine whether a violation of an  election law or rule has
occurred  and  shall make any investigation the Attorney General considers necessary. If the Attor-
ney General believes after an investigation that a violation  of an election law or rule has occurred,
the Attorney General may impose a civil penalty under ORS 260.995.
[(7)] (8)  In the case of an alleged violation subject  to a civil penalty under ORS 260.995, a
complaint shall be filed by an elector under this section no later than 90 days following the  election
at which a violation of an election law or  rule is alleged to have occurred, or 90 days following the
date the violation of an election law or rule is alleged to have occurred, whichever is later.
[(8)] (9)  A filing officer  having reason to believe that a violation of an election law or rule has
occurred shall proceed promptly as though the  officer had received a complaint. Except as provided
in ORS 260.234, a filing officer shall proceed under this subsection no  later than two years following
the election at which a violation of an election law or rule  is alleged to have occurred, or two years
following the date the violation of an election law or rule is  alleged to have occurred, whichever is
later. If a filing officer has not proceeded within two years because of fraud,  deceit, misleading
representation or the filing officer could not have  reasonably discovered the alleged violation, the
filing officer shall proceed no later than five years following the  election at which a violation of an
election law or rule is alleged to have occurred, or five  years following the date the violation of an
[2]
HB 2351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
election law or rule is alleged to have occurred, whichever is later.
SECTION 2.  ORS 260.407 is amended to read:
260.407. (1)(a) Except as provided  in paragraph (b) of this subsection, amounts received as con-
tributions by a candidate or the principal campaign committee of  a candidate for public office that
are in excess of any amount necessary to defray expenditures and any  other funds donated to a
holder of public office may be:
(A) Used to defray any expenses incurred in connection with the recipient’s duties  as a holder
of public office;
(B) Transferred to any national, state or local political committee of any political party;
(C) Contributed to  any organization described in section 170(c) of the Internal Revenue Code
or to any charitable corporation as defined in ORS 128.620; or
(D) Used for any other lawful purpose.
(b) Amounts received as contributions by a candidate or the principal campaign committee of a
candidate for public office that are in excess of any amount  necessary to defray expenditures and
other funds donated to a holder of public office may not be:
(A) Converted by any person to any personal use  other than to defray any expenses incurred in
connection with the person’s duties as a holder of public office or to repay to a candidate  any loan
the proceeds of which were used in connection with the candidate’s campaign;
(B) Except as provided in this subparagraph, used to pay any money  award as defined in ORS
18.005 included as part of a judgment in a civil or criminal action or any civil penalty  imposed by
an agency as defined in  ORS 183.310 or by a local government as defined in ORS 174.116. Contri-
butions described in this paragraph  may be used to pay a civil penalty imposed under this chapter,
other than a civil penalty imposed for a violation of this section or ORS 260.409; or
(C) Except as provided in this subparagraph, used to pay any legal expenses  incurred by the
candidate or public official in any civil, criminal or other legal proceeding or  investigation that re-
lates to or arises from the course  and scope of the duties of the person as a candidate or public
official. Contributions described in this paragraph may be used to pay  legal expenses incurred by
the candidate or public official in connection with a legal proceeding brought under  [ this chapter ]
ORS chapters 246 to 260 , other than a proceeding brought under this section or ORS 260.409.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, amounts received as  contributions
by a political committee that is  not a principal campaign committee that are in excess of any
amount necessary to defray expenditures may be:
(A) Used to repay to the political committee any loan  the proceeds of which were used in con-
nection with the campaign;
(B) Transferred to any national, state or local political committee of any political party;
(C) Contributed to any organization described in section 170(c) of the Internal  Revenue Code
or to any charitable corporation as defined in ORS 128.620; or
(D) Used for any other lawful purpose.
(b) Amounts received as contributions by the political committee may not be:
(A) Converted by any person to any personal use;
(B) Except as provided in this subparagraph, used to pay any money  award as defined in ORS
18.005 included as part of a judgment in a civil or criminal action or any civil penalty  imposed by
an agency as defined in  ORS 183.310 or by a local government as defined in ORS 174.116. Contri-
butions described in this subsection may be used to pay a civil penalty imposed under this chapter,
other than a civil penalty imposed for a violation of this section or ORS 260.409; or
[3]
HB 2351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Except as provided in this subparagraph, used to pay any legal  expenses incurred by a
treasurer or director of a political committee in any civil, criminal or other  legal proceeding or in-
vestigation that relates to or arises from the course and scope of the duties  of the person as a
treasurer or director. Contributions described in  this subsection may be used to pay legal expenses
incurred by a  treasurer or director in connection with a legal proceeding  brought under [ this
chapter] ORS chapters 246 to 260 , other than a proceeding brought under this section or ORS
260.409.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, amounts received as  contributions
by a chief petitioner or  treasurer of a petition committee that are in excess of any amount necessary
to defray expenditures may be:
(A) Used to repay to the chief petitioner any loan the proceeds of which  were used in con-
nection with the initiative, referendum or recall petition;
(B) Transferred to any national, state or local political committee of any political party;
(C) Contributed to any organization described in section 170(c) of the Internal  Revenue Code
or to any charitable corporation as defined in ORS 128.620; or
(D) Used for any other lawful purpose.
(b) Amounts received as contributions by a chief  petitioner or treasurer of a petition committee
may not be:
(A) Converted by any person to any personal use;
(B) Except as provided in this subparagraph, used to pay any money  award as defined in ORS
18.005 included as part of a judgment in a civil or criminal action or any civil penalty  imposed by
an agency as defined in  ORS 183.310 or by a local government as defined in ORS 174.116. Contri-
butions described in this subsection may be used to pay a civil penalty imposed under this chapter,
other than a civil penalty imposed for a violation of this section or ORS 260.409; or
(C) Except as provided in  this subparagraph, used to pay any legal expenses incurred by a chief
petitioner or the treasurer of  a petition committee in any civil, criminal or other legal proceeding
or investigation that relates to or arises from the course and scope  of the duties of the person as
a chief petitioner or treasurer. Contributions  described in this subsection may be used to pay legal
expenses incurred by a chief  petitioner or treasurer in connection with a legal proceeding brought
under [ this chapter ] ORS chapters 246 to 260 , other than a proceeding brought under this section
or ORS 260.409.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Contribution” and “expenditure” include a contribution or expenditure to or  on behalf of
an initiative, referendum or recall petition.
(b) “Funds donated” means all funds,  including but not limited to gifts, loans, advances, credits
or deposits of money that  are donated for the purpose of supporting the activities of a holder of
public office. “Funds donated” does not mean funds  appropriated by the Legislative Assembly or
another similar public appropriating body  or personal funds of the office holder donated to an ac-
count containing only those personal funds.
(c) “Public office” does not include national or political party office.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 260.993 is amended to read:
260.993. (1) The penalty for violation  of ORS 260.532 is limited to that provided in ORS 260.532
(6) and (8).
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this  subsection,  violation of ORS 247.125 (1),
247.171 (5), 247.420 (2), 253.710, 260.402, 260.555,  260.558, 260.575, 260.645 or 260.665 (2) or (3) in-
[4]
HB 2351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
volving any action described in ORS 260.665 (2)(d) to (f) or 260.715 is a Class C felony.
(b) For a first-time violation  of ORS 260.715 (1) that results from a person signing a ballot
belonging to a different elector, the Secretary of  State or Attorney General may impose a
civil penalty of $150 if the secretary or the Attorney General  determines that the violation
was not made with the intent to commit fraud.
(3) Violation of ORS 260.695 (4) is a Class A misdemeanor.
(4) Violation of ORS 247.171 (6) is a Class C misdemeanor.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 260.995 is amended to read:
260.995. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, following an investigation under
ORS 260.345, the Secretary of State or Attorney General may impose a civil penalty  not to exceed
$1,000 for each violation of any  provision of Oregon Revised Statutes relating to the conduct of any
election, any rule adopted by the secretary  under ORS chapters 246 to 260 or any other matter
preliminary to or relating to an election, for which a civil penalty is not otherwise provided.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  the secretary or  the Attorney
General may impose a civil penalty not to exceed:
[(a)] (A)  $1,000 plus the amount converted to  personal use for each violation of ORS 260.407;
or
[(b)] (B)  $10,000 for each violation of ORS 260.555, 260.558, 260.575, 260.695 (1) or 260.715  (1) or
[section 1b, ] Article IV , section 1b,  of the Oregon Constitution.
(b) For each violation of ORS 260.407 in which the improper  conversion of moneys for
personal use is accurately  recorded in statements of contributions received and statements
of expenditures made that are timely filed under  this chapter, the secretary or the Attorney
General may impose a civil penalty not to exceed 10 percent of the amount  converted to
personal use.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by this section, civil penalties under this section shall be im-
posed as provided in ORS 183.745.  In addition to the requirements of ORS 183.745, the notice shall
include:
(a) A statement of the authority and jurisdiction under which the hearing is to be held; and
(b) If the person is an agency, corporation or an unincorporated association,  a statement that
such person must be represented by an attorney licensed in Oregon, unless  the person is a political
committee [ which] that  may be represented by any officer identified in the most recent statement
of organization filed with the filing officer.
(4) A hearing  on whether to impose a civil penalty and to consider circumstances in mitigation
shall be held by the secretary or Attorney General:
(a) Upon request of the person against whom  the penalty may be assessed, if the request is made
not later than the  20th day after the date the person received notice sent under subsection (3) of
this section; or
(b) Upon the secretary’s or Attorney General’s own motion.
(5) The person against whom a penalty may be assessed need  not appear in person at a hearing
held under this section, but instead  may submit written testimony or other evidence, sworn to before
a notary public, to the secretary or Attorney General for  entry in the hearing record. The testimony
or other evidence must  be received by the secretary or Attorney General not later than three
business days before the day of the hearing.
(6) All hearings under this section shall be held not later than 45 days after  the deadline for the
person against whom the penalty may be assessed to request a hearing. However, if requested  by
[5]
HB 2351
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
the person against whom the penalty may be assessed, a hearing under subsection (4) of this section
shall be held not  later than 60 days after the deadline for the person against whom the penalty may
be assessed to request a hearing.
(7) The secretary  or Attorney General shall issue an order not later than 90 days after a hearing
or after the deadline for requesting a hearing if no hearing is held.
(8) All penalties recovered under this  section shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited
to the General Fund.
(9) In the case of a civil  penalty imposed under this section for a violation of ORS 260.407, the
person against whom the penalty is assessed:
(a) Is personally responsible for the payment of the civil penalty;
(b) Shall pay the civil penalty from personal funds of the person; and
(c) May not pay the civil  penalty from contributions received by a candidate, a candidate’s
principal campaign committee, a political committee or a petition committee.
SECTION 5.
The amendments to ORS 260.345, 260.407,  260.993 and 260.995 by sections 1
to 4 of this 2017 Act  apply to requests for information and documents made, ballots signed
and campaign moneys used or converted on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
[6]