Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Bureau of Labor and Industries shall conduct a study  of matters relat-
ing to apprenticeship programs in this state. The bureau  shall submit a report in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and  may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to business and labor no  later than Septem-
ber 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1766