Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “public defense attorney” means an attorney:
(a) Who is appointed to represent eligible  individuals as required by Oregon statutes, the
Oregon Constitution or the United States Constitution;
(b) Whose legal work is funded by the office of public defense services; and
(c) Who meets  any further definition of “public defense attorney” set forth by the Oregon
State Bar.
(2) The  Public Defense Services Student Loan Repayment Assistance Program is estab-
lished in the Oregon State Bar.
(3) The program shall provide forgivable loans to an  eligible public defense attorney for
up to  $25,000 in payments of principal and interest on outstanding public or private student
loans for each 12 months of service as a public defense attorney. The program  may provide
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 885
HB 2467
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
forgivable loans to a public defense attorney up to a total of $200,000.
(4) A public defense attorney is eligible for the program if:
(a) The attorney resides in this state;
(b) The attorney practices public defense services in this state  full-time or part-time, as
defined by the Oregon State Bar, while participating in the program;
(c) The attorney commits to provide public defense services for a period of three years;
and
(d) The attorney meets other requirements established by  the Oregon State Bar under
subsection (5) of this section.
(5) The Oregon State Bar shall adopt policies for administration of the program, including
eligibility and application requirements. The policies may provide that amounts of  forgivable
loans for student loan payments be based on the amount of the attorney’s practice that  is
providing public defense services.
SECTION 2.
No later than August 31 of each year, the Oregon State Bar shall report  on
the Public Defense Services Student Loan Repayment Assistance Program to a committee
or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary. The report  must
include:
(1) The number of  attorneys who entered the program, and the month and year of entry.
(2) The average amount of forgivable loans provided to a participant.
(3) The total amount of forgivable loans provided.
(4) The number of attorneys who participated in the program in each county.
(5) The number of clients and cases and the case types in which public defense  services
were provided, disaggregated by anonymous participation.
(6) The number of  attorneys who report that participation in the program is a substantial
factor in removing economic barriers to  the attorney’s ability to perform public defense
services.
(7) The average amount of outstanding student loan debt for each participant.
(8) Other information that is useful in evaluating the program.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon State Bar shall start accepting applications for  the Public
Defense Services Student  Loan Repayment Assistance Program established under section 1
of this 2023 Act no later than October 1, 2023.
(2) The  Oregon State Bar shall make the first report under section 2 of this 2023 Act no
later than August 31, 2024.
SECTION 4. Section 5 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 316.
SECTION 5. (1) In computing Oregon taxable income  for purposes of this chapter, there
shall be subtracted from  federal taxable income an amount equal to loan repayment assist-
ance paid to the taxpayer  under section 1 of this 2023 Act if the individual to whom the as-
sistance was paid is listed on the return.
(2) The amount of subtraction allowed under subsection (1) of this section  shall be re-
duced by any deduction allowed for the same amounts to the taxpayer or any other taxpayer
listed on the return for the tax year under section 221 of the Internal Revenue Code.
SECTION 6. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $__________, which may be transferred to the Oregon State Bar for the
purpose of providing forgivable loans  under the Public Defense Services Student Loan Re-
[2]
HB 2467
1
2
3
4
5
6
payment Assistance Program established under section 1 of this 2023 Act. The Oregon State
Bar may use up to five percent of the moneys transferred  to pay the administrative costs
of the program.
SECTION 7.
This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]