Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 565.447 is amended to read:
565.447. (1) Subject only  to the availability of unobligated net lottery proceeds, there is allocated
from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to :
(a) The County Fair  Account created under ORS 565.445 an amount equal to  eight-tenths of
one percent of the net proceeds from the Oregon State Lottery[ , but not to  exceed $1.53 million an-
nually, adjusted biennially pursuant to an inflation factor  determined by dividing the Consumer Price
Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All  Items), as published by the Bureau of Labor Sta-
tistics of the United States Department of Labor, for January 1 immediately preceding commencement
of the biennium, by the Consumer  Price Index for All Urban Consumers of the Portland, Oregon,
Standard Metropolitan Statistical Area, as compiled by  the United States Department of Labor, Bureau
of Labor Statistics, for January 1, 2001. ]; and
(b) The Horse Racing Account created under section 5  of this 2025 Act an amount equal
to two-tenths of one percent of the net proceeds from the Oregon State Lottery.
(2) The allocation of moneys from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund un-
der this section is subject to the  requirements in section 4, Article XV of the Oregon Constitution,
for deposit of specified amounts of the net proceeds from the Oregon  State Lottery into the Educa-
tion Stability Fund and into  the Parks and Natural Resources Fund and shall be made only after
satisfaction or payment of:
(a) Amounts allocated to Westside lottery bonds issued  under ORS 391.140 or to the reserves
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 231
HB 3101
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or any refunding related to the Westside lottery bonds in  accordance with the priority for allocation
and disbursement established by ORS 391.130;
(b) All liens, pledges or other  obligations relating to lottery bonds or refunding lottery bonds
due or payable during the year for which an allocation is to be made; and
(c) Amounts required by  any other pledges of, or liens on, net proceeds from the Oregon State
Lottery.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall develop a master
plan for  county fairground capital construction. The master plan shall consist of five-year
and 10-year capital construction plans for  each county fairground in this state and any
findings or recommendations of the department regarding  county fairground capital con-
struction.
(2) The department shall retain a consultant to work with each county  fair board, the
board of directors for each fair  association exercising powers under ORS 565.268 and the
board of each fair district operating under ORS 565.275 to identify the five-year and  10-year
capital construction needs for county  fairground facilities. The department shall work with
the consultant in developing the master plan for county  fairground capital construction, in
consultation with the Oregon Racing Commission.
(3) The department shall complete the master plan and shall report the  plan in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the Legislative Assembly during the 2027 regular session.
The department shall provide copies of the report to each county fair board and to the boards
for each fair association and fair district.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon  Business Development Department, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $250,000, which may be expended by the de-
partment for consultant services described in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on July 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. (1) The Horse Racing  Account is established separate and distinct from the
General Fund. The account shall consist  of moneys deposited in the account under ORS
565.447 (1)(b). The moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Racing
Commission to be used as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The commission shall use the moneys in the account to:
(a) Support horse racing events held at events described in  ORS 462.057 (2), and on
fairgrounds in Crook County, Josephine County, Tillamook County and Union County, by:
(A) Maintaining horse racing tracks at the fairgrounds.
(B) Advertising and promoting the horse racing events.
(C) Establishing incentives to increase participation in, and attendance at, the  horse
racing events.
(D) Purchasing horse racing equipment for use at the horse racing events.
(E) Operating the horse  racing events, including paying for the costs of security, staffing,
administration and insurance.
(F) Building or maintaining horse racing infrasructure that enhances or protects the
safety or wellbeing of racehorses.
(b) Address illegal or unsanctioned horse racing within this state.
SECTION 6.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
[2]
HB 3101
1
2
on its passage.
[3]