Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 124.100 is amended to read:
124.100. (1) As used in ORS 124.100 to 124.140:
(a) “Elderly person” means a person 65 years of age or older.
(b) “Financially incapable” has the meaning given that term in ORS 125.005.
(c) “Incapacitated” has the meaning given that term in ORS 125.005.
(d) “Person with a disability” means a person with a physical or mental impairment that:
(A) Is likely to continue without substantial improvement for no fewer than 12 months or  to
result in death; and
(B) Prevents performance of substantially all the ordinary duties  of occupations in which an
individual not having the physical  or mental impairment is capable of engaging, having due regard
to the training, experience and circumstances of the person with the physical or mental impairment.
(e) “Vulnerable person” means:
(A) An elderly person;
(B) A financially incapable person;
(C) An incapacitated person; [ or]
(D) A person with a disability who is  susceptible to force, threat, duress, coercion, persuasion
or physical or emotional injury because of the person’s physical or mental impairment ; or
(E) A person who has not attained 18 years of age .
(2) A vulnerable person who suffers injury, damage or death by reason of physical abuse or fi-
nancial abuse may bring an action against any person who has caused  the physical or financial
abuse or who has permitted another person to engage in physical or  financial abuse. The court shall
award the following to a plaintiff who prevails in an action under this section:
(a) An amount equal to three times  all economic damages, as defined in ORS 31.705, resulting
from the physical or financial abuse, or $500, whichever amount is greater.
(b) An  amount equal to three times all noneconomic damages, as defined in ORS 31.705, resulting
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 924
HB 2302
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
from the physical or financial abuse.
(c) Reasonable attorney fees incurred by the plaintiff.
(d) Reasonable fees for the services of a conservator or guardian ad litem incurred by  reason
of the litigation of a claim brought under this section.
(3) An action may be brought under this section only by:
(a) A vulnerable person;
(b) A guardian, conservator or attorney-in-fact for a vulnerable person;
(c) A personal representative for the estate of a decedent who was a vulnerable  person at the
time the cause of action arose; or
(d) A trustee for a trust on behalf of the trustor or the  spouse of the trustor who is a vulnerable
person.
(4) An action may be  brought under this section only for physical abuse described in ORS
124.105 or for financial abuse described in ORS 124.110.
(5) An action may be brought under this section against  a person for permitting another person
to engage in physical or financial abuse if the person knowingly acts or fails to act under circum-
stances in which a reasonable person should have known of the physical or financial abuse.
(6) A person commencing an  action under this section shall mail a copy of the complaint or
other initial pleading to the Attorney General at the  time the action commences. Failure to mail a
copy of the  complaint or pleading is not a jurisdictional defect and may be cured at any time prior
to entry of judgment. A court may not enter judgment  for the plaintiff until proof of mailing is filed
with the court. Proof of mailing may be by declaration or by return receipt of mailing.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 124.130 is amended to read:
124.130. Notwithstanding ORS 12.117,  an action under  ORS 124.100 to 124.140 must be com-
menced within seven years after discovery of the conduct described in ORS 124.105 and 124.110  that
gives rise to a cause of action under ORS 124.100 to 124.140.
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 124.100 and 124.130 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025
Act apply to physical or financial abuse that occurs  before, on or after the effective date of
this 2025 Act for the purpose  of actions and proceedings that are pending on the effective
date of this 2025 Act or that are commenced on or after the effective  date of this 2025 Act,
but do not operate to revive a cause  of action barred by the operation of ORS 12.160 or
124.130 before the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]