Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 101.
SECTION 2. (1) A continuing  care retirement community may not without the written
consent of the resident materially reduce or eliminate a service or a program,  or take an
action that has the effect of eliminating a service or a program,  for a resident if the service
or program was made a part of the  residency agreement at the time the resident was ad-
mitted. This subsection applies to those services or programs included within the  regular
periodic charges or those that require additional fees.
(2) For residents for whom the service or program was not made  a part of the residency
agreement as described in subsection  (1) of this section, the CCRC may reduce or eliminate
the service or program by a policy change through the process described in ORS 101.112.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies to:
(1) Residency agreements for residents that were executed on or after the effective date
of this 2025 Act; or
(2) Services or programs provided on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 101.052 is amended to read:
101.052. (1) The provider shall file with the Department of Human Services an annual disclosure
statement for the provider’s fiscal year that satisfies the requirements of this section  and ORS
101.050. The statement  shall be filed within four months following the end of the provider’s fiscal
year unless the time is extended by the department.
(2) In addition to the information required for  an initial statement under ORS 101.050, the an-
nual disclosure statement shall include:
(a) An audited financial statement prepared in accordance  with generally accepted accounting
principles for the preceding fiscal year;
(b) A disclosure of any change in ownership or manager;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2630
SB 1021
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) The frequency of residents’ council meetings and the dates of the meetings; and
(d) Copies of all notices of changes in regular  periodic charges , fees or policies under ORS
101.112 [ or notices of proposed changes in fees or services ] that were given to  residents during the
provider’s most recently completed fiscal year.
(3) To amend an annual disclosure statement, a provider  shall file all amended documents and
new materials with the department.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 101.112 is amended to read:
101.112. (1) The governing body or a designated representative  of the provider shall hold
meetings with the residents’ council or meetings that are open  to all of the residents in a continuing
care retirement community at least twice a year for the  purpose of free discussion of subjects that
may include, but are not limited to, facility income, expenditures,  financial trends, resident
concerns , [ and] proposed changes in [ policy, programs and services ] regular periodic charges, fees
or policies under this section or proposed changes to services and programs under  section 2
of this 2025 Act . The meetings shall be open to a designated personal representative of a resident.
In addition, the provider shall present for discussion any issue the residents’ council  or any resident
of the CCRC identifies orally or in writing 14 days or more prior to the date of the meeting.
(2) The provider shall give residents at least 45 days’  notice of proposed changes in fees, regular
periodic  charges  or [ services ] policies. At least 30 days before an increase in regular periodic
charges takes effect, the provider shall hold  a meeting with the residents’ council or a meeting that
is open to all of the residents of a CCRC to present the reasons  for the proposed increase and any
data supporting the need for the increase. A meeting  described in subsection (1) of this section may
be used for this purpose. At least 14 days prior  to the meeting, the provider shall post in a con-
spicuous location and make available to each resident an  agenda for the meeting. At the meeting,
the provider shall make available an accounting of:
(a) Actual and projected income and expenses for the CCRC’s current fiscal year;
(b) Projected income and expenses for the following fiscal year; and
(c) The current charges for each living unit in the CCRC and the proposed increase to  each
charge.
(3) A provider shall review the CCRC budget  with the residents’ council or a committee ap-
pointed by the council during the budget planning process.
(4) A provider shall make available to the residents’ council or a committee appointed by the
council, at least twice each year, a financial statement for the CCRC that compares  actual costs to
budgeted costs, broken down by expense category.
(5) A provider shall maintain  and make available to any resident, upon request, minutes of the
meetings of the provider’s governing body. The provider may remove from the minutes  information
regarding any matters discussed in executive session or that relate to litigation, personnel, compet-
itive advantage or an  individual resident’s personal affairs, but may not remove information re-
garding the  annual budget, increases in regular periodic charges, provider indebtedness or expansion
in new or  existing facilities. A provider shall retain the minutes for no less than three years from
the date the minutes were created.
(6) The governing body of a provider shall allow at least one resident from each CCRC  operated
in this state by the provider to participate as a nonvoting resident representative on the governing
body or along with the owners or managers. The resident representative may be excluded from  any
executive session and from discussion of confidential matters or matters related to  litigation, per-
sonnel, competitive advantage or an individual resident’s personal affairs. The resident  represen-
[2]
SB 1021
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tative may  not be excluded from discussion of matters relating to the annual budget, increases in
regular periodic charges, provider indebtedness or expansion in new or existing facilities.
(7) The resident representative described in subsection (6) of  this section and the
representative’s alternate must be elected by a majority vote of the residents’ council of  each CCRC
or by a majority vote of all  residents of a CCRC. The representative is responsible for submitting
the representative’s  name, address, electronic mail address and telephone number to the provider.
The provider may  establish the term for representatives and the procedures for election and re-
placement of a representative and an alternate.
(8) A provider shall send to each resident representative  and alternate, at the same time and in
the same manner as other members of the governing body, owners or managers of  the provider, the
notice of meeting and any written materials  relevant to the discussions in which the resident rep-
resentative may participate under subsection (6) of this section.
(9) The provider shall pay all reasonable travel expenses  for a resident representative or alter-
nate to attend meetings of the governing body and meetings of governing body committees.
(10) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a provider from allowing greater resident participation
than the minimum requirements set forth in this chapter including, but not limited to, the  require-
ment:
(a) Under subsection (1) of this section to hold meetings  with the residents’ council or meetings
that are open to all of the residents twice each year.
(b) Under subsection  (6) of this section to allow one elected resident representative for each
CCRC to participate in the provider’s governing body or along with owners or managers.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 101.115 is amended to read:
101.115. (1) A provider must assist a resident, upon request, in the  exercise of the resident’s
rights as a [ citizen] resident of the  United States and as a resident of this state. A resident has the
right to exercise all rights that do not infringe upon the rights or safety of other residents.
(2) A resident has the right to review a provider’s disclosure statements.
(3) A provider  may not discriminate or impose any requirement or restriction based on sex,
marital status, race, color, sexual  orientation, gender identity or national origin of a resident, a
prospective resident or a resident’s visitor.
(4) A provider shall make reasonable accommodations to  ensure that services are accessible to
residents who have disabilities.
(5) A provider shall treat each resident with respect and  dignity at all times, and ensure privacy
for each resident during rehabilitation or treatment and when receiving personal care services.
(6) A resident has the right to associate and communicate privately with persons  of the
resident’s choice and to send and receive mail that is not opened by the provider.
(7) A resident has the right to be free from abuse as defined in ORS 124.005.
(8) The residents’ council has the  right to meet with the provider no less than twice each year
and must be allowed free discussion at the meetings of subjects that may include, but need not  be
limited to, facility income, expenditures, financial trends, resident concerns, proposed changes  in
regular periodic charges, fees,  policy, programs and services,  and any other issue identified by the
council or a resident under ORS 101.112 (1).
(9) A resident has the right to participate in social, religious and community activities at the
discretion of the resident.
(10) A resident has the right  to be fully informed, prior to or at the time of admission and during
the resident’s period of  residency, of services available in the continuing care retirement community,
[3]
SB 1021
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
whether the provider participates in the Medicare or Medicaid programs and  the consequences of
the participation or lack of participation by the provider in the Medicare or Medicaid programs.
(11) A resident has the right to refuse medication, treatment, care or participation  in clinical
trials or other research.
(12) A resident has the right to obtain treatment, care and services, including but  not limited
to home health and hospice care, from persons providing health care who  have not entered into a
contract with or are  not affiliated with the provider, subject to policies of the CCRC regarding the
provision of services by persons that are not under contract.
(13) A resident has the right to  submit grievances and to suggest changes in policies and ser-
vices either orally or in writing  to staff or other individuals without fear of restraint, interference,
coercion, discrimination or reprisal by the provider. A provider must adopt  written policies and
procedures for the timely resolution of a resident’s grievance.
(14) A resident has the right to  be free from harassment by other residents and to peaceful en-
joyment of the CCRC without interference from other residents.
(15) A provider shall keep clinical and personal records of  residents confidential. A resident or
an authorized representative of the resident has the right to a  prompt inspection of the records
pertaining to the resident’s care. The provider shall provide photocopies or electronic copies of  a
resident’s records to the resident or the authorized representative at a reasonable charge.
(16) A resident has  the right to receive notice of proposed changes in [ fees or services ] regular
periodic charges, fees  or policies  in accordance with ORS 101.112. The provider must allow resi-
dents a reasonable  opportunity to comment on the proposed changes before the changes become ef-
fective. A resident has the right to the continuation  of services or programs provided in the
residency agreement at  the time the resident was admitted unless the resident agrees to the
change in accordance with section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(17) A provider shall have a procedure in place for a resident to  request that a staff person of
a particular sex be assigned to assist  the resident with activities of daily living. The provider shall
accommodate the request unless the provider is unable to do so. If the provider is unable to ac-
commodate the request, the provider shall notify the resident, in writing, of  the reasons why the
provider is unable to accommodate the  request and shall maintain documentation showing why the
provider cannot accommodate the request.
SECTION 7.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]