Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 654.067 is amended to read:
654.067. (1) In order to carry out the purposes  of ORS 654.001 to 654.295, 654.412 to 654.423 and
654.750 to 654.780, the Director of  the Department of Consumer and Business Services, upon pre-
senting appropriate credentials to the owner, employer or agent in charge, is authorized:
(a) To enter without delay and at reasonable times any place of employment;
(b) To inspect and investigate during regular working hours and at other reasonable times,  and
within reasonable  limits and in a reasonable manner, any such place of employment and all pertinent
conditions, structures, machines, apparatus, devices,  equipment and materials therein, and to ques-
tion privately the owner, employer, agents or employees; and
(c) To conduct a comprehensive inspection of any place of employment as deemed  necessary by
the department based upon the prior violation  history of the place of employment regarding any
state occupational safety or health law, regulation, standard, rule or order.
(2) Whenever  an accident investigation reveals that a violation has caused or contributed to a
work-related fatality at a  place of employment, the director shall conduct a comprehensive in-
spection of the place of employment  within one year following the date on which the closing con-
ference associated with the work-related fatality was held.
(3) Whenever three or more willful or repeated violations occur at  a place of employment within
a one-year period, the director shall conduct a comprehensive inspection of the place of employment
within one year following the date on  which the closing conference associated with the most recent
willful or repeated violation was held.
(4) No  person shall give an owner, employer, agent or employee advance notice of any inspection
to be conducted under ORS 654.001 to 654.295, 654.412 to 654.423 and  654.750 to 654.780 of any place
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 389
HB 2570
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
of employment without authority from the director.
(5) Except in the case of an emergency, or of a place of employment open to the public, if the
director is denied access to any place  of employment for the purpose of an inspection or investi-
gation, such inspection or investigation shall  not be conducted without an inspection warrant ob-
tained pursuant to ORS 654.202 to 654.216, or without such other  authority as a court may grant in
an appropriate civil proceeding.  Nothing contained herein, however, is intended to affect the validity
of a constitutionally authorized inspection conducted without an inspection warrant.
(6) A representative of the employer and a representative authorized by  the employees of the
employer shall be given an opportunity  to accompany the director during the inspection of any place
of employment for the purpose of aiding such inspection. When there is no employee representative,
or the employee representative is not an employee of the employer, the  director [ should] may con-
sult with a reasonable number of employees concerning matters of safety  and health in the place
of employment.
(7) The representative of the employer may, at the employer’s option, be an attorney  retained
by the employer.
(8)(a) The director shall keep confidential and not  disclose to the public any information
obtained during the course  of an investigation or inspection of any place of employment
conducted under ORS 654.001 to 654.295, 654.412 to 654.423 or 654.750  to 654.780 that would
permit the identification of an  employee, other than an agent, who provided information for
or participated in the investigation or inspection, unless:
(A) The employee consents to the disclosure; or
(B) In accordance with criteria established by rule, the  director deems disclosure neces-
sary to carry out the provisions of the Oregon Safe Employment Act.
(b) The director shall  adopt rules and establish procedures necessary to carry out the
provisions of this subsection.
[(8)] (9) As used in this section:
(a) “Accident investigation” means  an official examination of a place of employment conducted
by a compliance officer who is responsible for carrying out inspections  and investigations on behalf
of the department, that includes a systematic  appraisal of an accident sequence to determine causal
factors, corrective actions and preventative measures.
(b) “Closing  conference” means a process that informs the employer and the employee repre-
sentatives, if any, of the findings resulting from an inspection of a place of employment and  any
other pertinent issues related to the inspection.
(c) “Comprehensive  inspection” means a substantially complete inspection of a place of employ-
ment that, in the professional judgment of the inspector who conducts the inspection, may be deemed
comprehensive  although  not all potentially hazardous conditions, operations and practices within the
place of employment are inspected.
[2]