Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 723.
SECTION 2. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 723.752, if a credit union purchases or otherwise
acquires assets of a banking  institution, receipts derived from the business portfolio acquired
from the banking institution are treated, for the purposes of taxation  under ORS chapter 317
and ORS 317A.100 to 317A.158, as if they were received by a banking institution.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “Banking institution” has the meaning given that term in ORS 706.008.
(b) “Business” means any  corporation, partnership, company, cooperative, sole
proprietorship or other legal  entity organized or operating for pecuniary or nonpecuniary
gain.
(c) “Business portfolio” means loans made to businesses and  services provided to busi-
nesses.
(d) “Credit union” has the meaning given that term in ORS 723.006.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of  this 2025 Act applies to assets transferred pursuant to trans-
actions that close on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1694