Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Environmental Quality shall study the impact on this
state of disposing of waste materials generated by wind or solar renewable energy facilities.
(2) In conducting the study, the department shall:
(a) Determine the average useful  life of equipment used in wind and solar renewable en-
ergy facilities before disposal;
(b) Identify the volume and type of materials expected to be discarded;
(c) Identify the size and number of sites needed to dispose of discarded materials;
(d) Recommend locations for disposal sites;
(e) Estimate the costs of disposing of discarded materials  and evaluate which persons are
best suited to cover those costs before a disposal site can be established; and
(f) Evaluate the risks of short-term and long-term  toxic environmental hazards created
by disposal sites.
(3) The department shall submit  a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to the environment no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1370