Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “state agency” means any state officer,  board,
commission, bureau or department, or division thereof, in the executive  branch of state
government.
(2) The Department of Justice shall dedicate one full-time attorney to:
(a) Review and respond to  federal requests for information related to immigrant status
submitted to state agencies.
(b) Process requests for information related to immigrant status in a manner  that pri-
oritizes requests for information about persons with more serious criminal records.
(c) Ensure that immigrant data  privacy is maintained in compliance with ORS 181A.820
and 181A.822 to 181A.829.
(d) Collaborate with  state agencies, local governments and law enforcement to review
federal requests for  information related to immigrant status and provide guidance on how
to manage requests in compliance with the laws of this state.
(e) Offer support to state agencies on how to handle sensitive requests  for information
related to immigrant status.
(f) Monitor the enforcement of sanctuary  laws and other legal protections for immi-
grants.
(g) Prevent the unauthorized sharing of sensitive information about immigrant status.
(h) Regularly update  the Attorney General, the Legislative Assembly and other
stakeholders on trends, challenges and developments regarding federal requests  for infor-
mation about immigrant status.
(3) The department shall establish,  fill and utilize one full-time equivalent investigator
position to:
(a) Conduct investigations into potential violations of data privacy protections and  in-
stances of noncompliance in state agencies with the sanctuary laws of this state.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4727
SB 1185
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Identify agencies or individuals failing to  comply with data privacy protections, doc-
ument cases and ensure accountability.
(c) Oversee the collection of penalties for noncompliance with the sanctuary  laws of this
state.
(d) Assist the attorney appointed under subsection  (2) of this section by gathering and
verifying information needed to review and respond to federal requests effectively.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 181A.826 is amended to read:
181A.826. (1) Public facilities, property, moneys, equipment, technology or  personnel may not be
used for the purpose  of investigating, detecting, apprehending, arresting, detaining or holding indi-
viduals for immigration enforcement.
(2) Actions with a purpose described in subsection (1) of this section include,  but are not limited
to, the following:
(a) Granting a federal immigration agency  access to an area of a facility that is not normally
open to the public.
(b) Supporting or assisting a federal agency in immigration enforcement, including but  not lim-
ited to any of the following:
(A) Providing information,  including but not limited to an individual’s contact information,
country of birth, custody status, release date, parole,  probation or post-prison supervision appoint-
ment dates or times, or home or work address, except as provided in ORS 181A.823;
(B) Investigating or interrogating individuals for immigration enforcement; or
(C) Establishing traffic perimeters for the purpose of supporting or facilitating  immigration
enforcement.
(3)(a) If a public body receives a communication  or request from a federal agency that relates
to immigration enforcement, other than a judicial  subpoena described in ORS 181A.823 (1)(c)(A), the
public body shall [ decline the request and ] document the communication or request[ . The documenta-
tion described  in this subsection must be provided to the director or other similar management per-
sonnel of the public body ] and  forward the communication or request to the attorney
designated under section 1 of this 2025 Act .
(b) The public body  shall submit the information documented under this subsection to the
Oregon Criminal Justice Commission pursuant to procedures established by the commission. The
commission shall require at least monthly  submission of the information described in this subsection.
(c) A public body shall adopt internal procedures to carry out this subsection.
(4)(a) The commission shall publish and  continually update, on a website operated by or on be-
half of the commission, an entry for each communication or request described  in subsection (3) of
this section, the public body that received the communication or request, the federal agency in-
volved in the communication or that made the  request and a summary of the public body’s response
to the communication or request.
(b) The information contained on the website described in this subsection  may not contain any
personally identifiable information of the individuals involved in the communication  or request, in-
cluding of an individual targeted by federal immigration authorities, an  individual who reported the
communication or request, an  individual who witnessed the communication or request or report of
the communication or request or the family members of an individual described in this paragraph.
(c)(A) Information obtained by the commission under this subsection may be  used only for sta-
tistical  purposes  and coordination with the sanctuary violation reporting mechanism established
under ORS 181A.827.
[2]
SB 1185
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
(B) Information described in this subsection that may reveal the identity of an individual de-
scribed in paragraph (b) of this subsection is exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(C) Pursuant to a request from the Department of Justice, the commission may release to  the
department information described in this subsection that is necessary to investigate a report made
to the sanctuary  violation reporting mechanism established under ORS 181A.827 if the information
is used to support an individual described in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(d) [ Not later than July 1, 2022, and at least annually thereafter, ] At least annually,  the com-
mission shall issue a report that summarizes the information reported to the commission  and pub-
lished on the website described in this subsection. The  commission shall provide the report to the
Governor, the Legislative Assembly, the district attorneys of this state,  the Department of State
Police, each law enforcement agency in this state and the Department of Public  Safety Standards
and Training.
(5) Any person  may bring a civil action against a law enforcement agency or public body that
violates subsection (1) of this section to enjoin the violation.
[3]