Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Transportation shall prepare  a report on the progress
of revising the written  test given to applicants seeking a Class C driver license. The report
must include, but need not be limited to:
(a) General information concerning the progress  toward translating the test into lan-
guages other than English and revising the test to increase the reading ease of the test;
(b) A description of when the revised test will be provided;
(c) A description of the process of revising the test for  readability and translating the
test; and
(d) Information regarding the translation of the test into languages other than English,
including the  steps the department used to take into account various dialects and language
variations and the expertise of the individuals who provided the translation services.
(2) The department shall submit the report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for  legislation, to the Joint Committee on Transportation no
later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2390