Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Grants awarded  to school-based health centers by the Oregon Health
Authority under ORS 413.225 (4)(a) must be for a minimum annual amount of $66,000 adjusted
under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) To account for effects of inflation, the authority shall, by  rule, annually adjust the
dollar amount specified in subsection (1) of this section based on the Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All  Items), as published by the Bureau of Labor
Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of  $570,000 to carry out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “School-based health center” has the meaning given that term in ORS 413.225.
(b) “School nurse model” means a model for providing school-based  health services that
is in accord  with guidance from the division of the Oregon Health Authority that addresses
adolescent health.
(2) The authority, in consultation with  the Department of Education, shall select 10
school districts or education  service districts to receive planning grants for district planning
and technical assistance. Each district  receiving a grant, beginning on or after January 1,
2026, and concluding before July 1, 2027, shall:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 532
HB 2729
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Evaluate the need for school-based health services in the community of the district;
and
(b) Develop a school-based health services plan that addresses the need  identified in
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(3) The  authority shall contract with a nonprofit organization with experience in facili-
tating school health planning initiatives and supporting school-based health centers in  order
to facilitate and oversee the planning process and to provide technical assistance  to grantees
to reduce costs and ensure better coordination  and continuity statewide. To the greatest
extent practicable, the nonprofit  organization shall engage with culturally specific organiza-
tions in the grantees’ communities that have experience providing culturally  and linguis-
tically specific services in schools or after-school programs.
(4) Each grantee shall solicit community participation  in the planning process, including,
without limitation, the participation  of the local public health authority, any federally quali-
fied health centers located in the district, a regional health equity  coalition, if any, serving
the district and every coordinated care organization with members residing in the district.
(5) At the conclusion of  the planning process, the authority shall issue additional grants
to appropriate recipients to operate a school-based health  center or school nurse model in
each respective grantee school district or education service district.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $700,000 to carry out the provisions of section  3 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 5.
The Oregon Health Authority shall develop and  implement a grant program
to issue grants to school districts, education  service districts and entities that provide
physical or behavioral health services to be used to increase and improve school-based men-
tal health services and substance use prevention, screening, referral and treatment services.
The authority shall ensure that grants are made for the  benefit of schools both with and
without school-based health centers, as defined in ORS 413.225.
SECTION 6.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the  amount of $7,850,000 to carry out the provisions of section 5 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 7.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall study methods for providing or  in-
creasing reimbursement for mental health services delivered through school-based health
centers, as defined  in ORS 413.225, under medical assistance programs administered by the
authority.
(2) The authority may make written recommendations to the Legislative Assembly in  the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, which may include recommendations for legislation,  in-
cluding continuation or expansion of funding provided under sections 5 and 6 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The authority may adopt rules to  support reimbursements described in subsection (1)
of this section.
SECTION 8.
(1) For  the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Health Authority, the State Treasurer is authorized  to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $10 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated  by the State
[2]
HB 2729
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred  to the
authority for:
(a) Construction and renovation of school-based health centers as defined in ORS  413.225;
(b) Equipment needs of school-based health centers;
(c) Construction of modular school-based health centers  for provision to school districts
or education service districts; and
(d) Provision of  grants to school districts, education service districts or school-based
health center medical sponsors for school-based health center purposes.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will create  jobs,
further economic development, finance public  education or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding that
improving access  to school-based health resources will improve educational outcomes and
create jobs.
SECTION 9.
In each biennium, the Oregon Health Authority  shall, in its agency request
budget filed under ORS 291.208, request moneys sufficient to sustain the ongoing operation
of:
(1) School-based health centers and school nurse models funded under section 3 (5) of this
2025 Act; and
(2) School-based mental health services and substance use  prevention, screening, referral
and treatment services funded under section 5 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 10. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]