Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is  added to and made a part of the Insurance Code.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Pet” means an animal that an individual keeps exclusively for the  purpose of
providing personal companionship or direct aid to the individual.
(B) “Pet” does  not include animals that perform work, are livestock or are otherwise
kept for purposes that do not involve personal companionship or direct aid to an individual.
(b) “Preexisting condition” means a condition  for which a pet received veterinary ser-
vices or treatment, or for which veterinary services  or treatment were recommended, within
six months preceding the effective date of coverage under an insurance policy.
(2) An insurer that issues a policy of insurance in this state that provides  coverage or
benefits to an insured for veterinary services for the insured’s pet may not exclude, limit
or reduce, including by means of waivers or riders of any kind, coverage or benefits provided
under the policy of  insurance on the basis of a preexisting condition that affects the health
or physical condition of the pet, regardless of whether the insured knew of  the preexisting
condition or disclosed the preexisting condition on any application for the insurance.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies to policies of insurance that  an insurer
issues or renews on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1908