Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 8, chapter 96, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  (1) Sections  1 to 7 [ of this 2016 Act ], chapter 96, Oregon Laws 2016,  are repealed on
January 2, [ 2027] 2033.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, property that has been granted a  property tax
incentive program benefit under sections 1 to 7 [ of this 2016  Act ], chapter 96, Oregon Laws 2016,
before the date specified in subsection (1) of this section, shall  continue to receive the benefit for
the period of time for which the benefit was granted.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2109