Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “state forestlands” means lands managed by  the
State Forester under ORS 530.050.
(2) In carrying out state forestland management under  ORS 530.050, the State Forester
shall ensure that timber is sold each calendar year for harvesting from those lands  in an
amount that, on a board feet basis,  is equal to or greater than 125 percent of the amount
of timber sold for harvesting from state forestlands during the 2014 calendar year.
(3) The State Forester shall  annually estimate the board feet of timber that will be sold
for harvesting from state  forestlands during the calendar year. The State Forester shall
complete the annual estimate prior to the first sale that year of timber for  harvesting from
state forestlands. The State Forester shall determine, based upon the estimated board  feet
of timber to be sold during the year, the fraction of the  estimated timber sales that repres-
ents an increase from the amount of timber that was sold for harvesting from  state
forestlands in 2014.
(4) For any moneys received from a timber sale under ORS 530.050,  the State Forester
shall determine the sum obtained  by multiplying the amount of the moneys by the fraction
determined by the State Forester  under subsection (3) of this section for the year of the sale.
Notwithstanding ORS 530.110, when moneys  from the timber sale are paid into the State
Treasury and  credited to the State Forestry Department Account, the sum determined as
provided in this subsection shall be placed in a separate subaccount and distributed as  fol-
lows:
(a) Twenty-five percent  to the Department of Education, for awarding grants under the
Career and Technical Education Revitalization Grant Program established by ORS 344.075.
(b) Twenty-five percent to the Higher  Education Coordinating Commission, for deposit in
the Community College  Support Fund to be distributed to community colleges and commu-
nity college service districts for career and technical education programs.
(c) Twenty-five percent to the Department of Education for deposit to the  STEM In-
vestment Grant Program, to be distributed as described  in ORS 327.380 to public universities.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 392
SB 695
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
(d) Twenty-five percent to the State School  Fund for distribution as described in ORS
327.013.
(5) Any amount placed in a separate  subaccount and distributed as provided under sub-
section (4) of this section shall be disregarded for the  purpose of calculating any other dis-
tribution to be made under ORS 530.110. Notwithstanding ORS  293.190, amounts distributed
under subsection (4)(a)  to (d) of this section that have not been expended on or before the
end of the biennium in which the distribution is received are  not subject to any reversion
and may be retained for later use as provided under subsection (4)(a) to (d) of this section.
[2]