Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 660.380 is amended to read:
660.380. (1) The Prosperity 10,000 Program is established in the  Higher Education Coordinating
Commission for the following purposes:
(a) To provide career coaching, occupational training and job placement services;
(b) To provide wraparound supports and services that  are necessary to facilitate reengagement
and advancement in the workforce, including, but not limited  to, transportation, child care and
rental assistance;
(c) To provide paid work experiences, including stipends and wages and other  income supports
for individuals from priority populations; [ and]
(d) To support targeted recruitment and industry engagement efforts[ .]; and
(e) To build pathways that support career advancement for incumbent workers  by im-
proving job  quality through on-the-job training grants, curriculum development and cus-
tomized training.
(2) The goals of the Prosperity 10,000 Program are to:
(a) Include at least 10,000 total individuals who participate in the program[ ;].
(b) Improve the capacity and responsiveness of the public workforce system in this state by
providing assistance for workforce development program navigation,  expanding access to
community-based career counseling and wraparound supports and services, and  providing opportu-
nities to earn industry-recognized certificates,  credentials and degrees through work-based learning
experiences[ ;].
(c) Ensure that services and  benefits available through workforce programs are provided to in-
dividuals from priority populations[ ;].
(d) Provide increased access for priority populations to services and benefits  available through
workforce programs[ ;].
(e) Support employers and  incumbent workers in high-growth industries by building
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 655
HB 3669
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
pathways that promote advancement in quality jobs,  attained skills and wage and benefit
earnings. As used in this paragraph, “high-growth  industries” includes, but is not limited to,
industry sectors such as clean energy,  semiconductor manufacturing and broadband
infrastructure, child care,  behavioral and mental health, transportation and construction and
other areas deemed essential by  state and local workforce development boards for expanding
economic and workforce development opportunities.
[(e)] (f) Ensure that at least 50 percent of the individuals who participate in the program are
women[;].
[(f)] (g) Ensure that at least 80 percent of the individuals  who participate successfully complete
the program[ ;].
[(g)] (h) Ensure  that at least 75 percent of the individuals who are unemployed at the time
of enrollment  [ participate] in the program successfully obtain employment  and earn at least  $17
per hour.[; and ]
[(h) Ensure that at least 75 percent of the  individuals who participate in the program earn at least
$17 per hour. ]
(i) Ensure that incumbent workers  participating in the program obtain transferable skills
or credentials and increased earnings that  amount to $23 per hour or a percentage increase
of
, whichever is greater.
(3)(a) The Prosperity 10,000 Program shall be administered by local workforce  development
boards. The local workforce development boards shall:
(A) Distribute resources and available funds to nonprofit community-based organizations,  edu-
cational institutions, labor organizations , employers  and other workforce service providers to fa-
cilitate the provision of workforce development services and wraparound supports to individuals who
participate in the program;
(B) Coordinate with state workforce agencies and other workforce partners to  expand regional
community-based partnerships that work to support and sustain workforce development services  and
wraparound supports; and
(C) Connect with businesses and organizations in targeted industry sectors to  identify training
needs and ensure that business needs relating to a skilled workforce are met.
(b) An entity that collaborates  with a local workforce development board to accomplish the
workforce development activities  described under this subsection shall, in accordance with ORS
660.327, participate with local workforce development boards in developing a proposed local plan.
(4)(a) If an entity receives funds distributed from a local workforce development board  under
this section and  provides paid work experience to individuals who participate in the program es-
tablished under this section, the entity shall:
(A) Notwithstanding ORS  653.025 and subsection (2)(h) of this section, pay wages to individuals
participating in the program at a rate that is:
(i) Equivalent to an entry-level training wage as determined by  the entity pursuant to paragraph
(b) of this subsection; and
(ii) In alignment with the wage progression schedule established by  the entity under subpara-
graph (B) of this paragraph;
(B) Establish a wage progression schedule that includes the step progression requirements  and
the rate calculation formula upon which the entity shall make determinations about a  participating
individual’s eligibility to increase the individual’s wage rate  from an entry-level training wage to a
wage rate that  is equivalent to the average area wage standard for an hour’s work in the same trade
[2]
HB 3669
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or occupation in the locality where the labor is performed;
(C) Develop a training plan for individuals participating in the program that includes, at  a
minimum:
(i) The entry-level training wage that will be paid to the individual;
(ii) A statement that the individual shall be paid  according to the wage progression schedule
established by the entity, along with a description of the requirements  that the individual must meet
in order to progress to a higher wage rate under the wage progression schedule;
(iii) A statement that the entry-level training wage  paid to the individual may not be less than
the federal minimum wage rate or the  applicable state minimum wage rate, whichever is greater;
and
(iv) A statement explaining that the entry-level training wage paid  to the individual is a mini-
mum standard  and that a higher wage rate shall be paid to the individual if so required under other
applicable federal or state laws, regulations or a collective bargaining agreement; and
(D) Provide each individual participating in the program  with a copy of the training plan de-
scribed in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph  on the date on which the individual first begins par-
ticipating in the program.
(b) For purposes of paragraph  (a)(A) of this subsection, the entry-level training wage shall be a
percentage amount of the average area wage standard  for an hour’s work in the same trade or oc-
cupation in the locality where the labor is performed, but in no event may  the entry-level training
wage be less than the applicable state minimum wage rate under ORS 653.025.
(c) Each individual who performs work for an entity described in  this subsection shall be con-
sidered an employee of the entity for purposes of state wage and hour laws and state  laws prohib-
iting employment discrimination and retaliation.
(5)(a) As used in  this subsection, “SNAP Employment and Training Program” means the em-
ployment and training component of the  federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program under
7 U.S.C. 2015(d)(4).
(b) To the extent possible, the Department of Human Services shall:
(A) Incorporate the Prosperity 10,000  Program into the statewide plan for the SNAP Employ-
ment and Training Program;
(B) Seek federal reimbursement for 50 percent of  the Prosperity 10,000 Program’s costs and for
other eligible activities as reported by the local workforce development boards;
(C) Refer individuals who receive supplemental nutrition assistance under ORS 411.806 to
411.845 to participate in the Prosperity 10,000 Program; and
(D) Distribute moneys received as reimbursement under  subparagraph (B) of this paragraph to
local workforce development boards, not later than 60 days after the  department receives an invoice
that is consistent with requirements under the SNAP Employment and Training  Program, for rein-
vestment in workforce development and  wraparound supports and services provided under the
Prosperity 10,000 Program.
(6) The State Workforce and  Talent Development Board, in consultation with the Committee for
Continuous Improvement, shall:
(a) Oversee the progress of the Prosperity 10,000 Program;
(b) Ensure that program goals are met; and
(c) Identify areas for program improvement.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 660.385 is amended to read:
660.385. [(1)(a) Not later than 60 days following March 17, 2022, the Higher  Education Coordi-
[3]
HB 3669
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
nating Commission shall distribute the funds specifically appropriated  to the commission under section
13, chapter 28, Oregon Laws 2022, to local workforce development boards to administer the  Prosperity
10,000 Program. ]
(1)(a) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall  distribute the funds specif-
ically appropriated by the  Legislative Assembly for the purpose of administering the Pros-
perity 10,000 Program to local workforce development boards to  carry out such purposes, not
later than 60 days following receipt of the appropriated funds.
(b) The commission shall distribute all moneys received [ from moneys  made available under
sections 13 and 14, chapter 28, Oregon Laws 2022, ] to local workforce development boards using  the
same formula  as required under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C.
3101 et seq.) for the allocation of funds to local workforce development boards.
(2) Each local workforce development board shall compile data on the progress made  toward
carrying  out  the Prosperity 10,000 Program. The boards shall prepare and submit a joint report that
includes data, disaggregated  by race, gender and geography, to the commission and the State
Workforce and Talent Development Board no later than October 31 of each year, in  the manner
provided in ORS 192.245.
[4]