Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 9 of this 2023 Act:
(1) “Eligible costs” means the following costs associated with an  eligible housing project:
(a) System development charges;
(b) Predevelopment funds;
(c) Site-specific infrastructure; and
(d) Land write downs.
(2) “Eligible housing project” means a project to construct housing, or to convert  a
building from a nonresidential use to housing, that is:
(a) If for-sale product, a single-family dwelling, middle housing as defined in ORS 197.758
or a multifamily dwelling affordable at initial sale to households with annual  income not
greater than 120 percent of area median income; or
(b) If rental property:
(A) Middle housing as defined in ORS 197.758;
(B) A multifamily dwelling;
(C) An accessory dwelling unit as defined in ORS 215.501; or
(D) Any other form of affordable or moderate income housing.
(3) “Eligible housing  project property” means the real and personal property constituting
an eligible housing project.
(4) “Increment” means that part of the assessed value of eligible housing project property
attributable to  any increase in the assessed value of the property over the assessed value
specified in the certified statement prepared under section 7 of this 2023 Act.
(5) “Participating jurisdiction” means a city or  county that has complied with section 3
(1) of this 2023 Act.
(6) “Tax increment financing” means the  process for dividing ad valorem property taxes
described in section 6 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) The  Department shall develop and administer an affordable
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2513
HB 2980
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
housing revolving loan program under which the department shall make  loans to participat-
ing jurisdictions for the purpose of funding grant awards to developers for eligible  costs in
accordance with section 5 of this 2023 Act.
(2) Eligible housing project property for  which a developer receives a grant for eligible
costs is not eligible for any other exemption, partial exemption or special assessment  for
purposes of ad valorem property taxes.
(3) For purposes of ORS chapter 457, the provisions of sections 1 to 9  of this 2023 Act do
not make:
(a) The 
 Department or a participating jurisdiction an urban renewal agency.
(b) A participating  jurisdiction or the tax lot on which an eligible housing project is sit-
uated an urban renewal area.
(c) A city’s housing production strategy  amended pursuant to section 3 of this 2023 Act,
an application for a grant submitted by a developer pursuant to section 4 of this 2023 Act, a
resolution adopted by a participating jurisdiction pursuant to section 4 (8)  of this 2023 Act
or a loan agreement entered into  by the department and a participating jurisdiction under
section 5 of this 2023 Act an urban renewal plan.
(d) An eligible housing project with respect to which a developer receives a  grant an ur-
ban renewal project.
SECTION 3.
(1) To participate in the affordable housing revolving loan program developed
under section 2 of this 2023 Act, including the use of tax increment financing to repay  loans
made to the jurisdiction from the Affordable Housing Revolving Loan  Fund established under
section 9 of this 2023 Act, the governing body of a city or county must:
(a) Consult with  the governing bodies of all other taxing districts with territory within
the boundaries of the city or county to discuss  the use of tax increment financing under the
program;
(b) For a  city with a population of 10,000 or more, accordingly amend the city’s housing
production strategy as provided under ORS 197.291; and
(c) Adopt an ordinance or resolution that sets forth:
(A) The kinds of eligible housing projects for  which the city or county may seek a loan
under the program;
(B) Any definition of affordable and moderate income housing the city or county intends
to apply to eligible housing projects; and
(C) Any eligibility requirements the city or county will impose on projects and  developers
in addition to those required under sections 1 to 9 of this 2023 Act.
(2) After adoption of the ordinance or resolution,  and, if required, approval of the
amended housing production strategy by the Department of Land Conservation  and Devel-
opment, the participating jurisdiction is eligible  to receive a loan under section 5 of this 2023
Act.
SECTION 4.
(1) A participating  jurisdiction shall prescribe an application process for
grants to be  awarded under the affordable housing revolving loan program, including forms
and deadlines.
(2)(a) The developer of an eligible housing project may apply at any time  to a participat-
ing jurisdiction for a grant for the purpose of paying eligible costs associated with the eligible
housing project.
(b) No more than one application may be submitted with respect to any  eligible housing
[2]
HB 2980
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
project at any time.
(3) A developer may not apply for a grant with respect to a housing project that is:
(a) Granted any form of ad valorem  property tax exemption, partial exemption or special
assessment;  or
(b) Located in an existing urban renewal area.
(4) The application for a grant must include, at a minimum:
(a) A description of the eligible housing project;
(b) A detailed description of the eligible costs for which the grant is sought;
(c) The amount of the grant sought;
(d) The proposed schedule for the eligible housing project;
(e) A project pro forma that shows  the expected increase in the real market value of the
eligible housing project property over the succeeding 10 years;
(f) A  declaration that the eligible housing project would not be financially feasible without
the grant moneys; and
(g) Any other information, documentation or declaration that the governing  body of the
participating jurisdiction considers necessary  or convenient for the application review pro-
cess.
(5)(a) Within 30 days following receipt of an application, the governing  body of the par-
ticipating jurisdiction shall review the application and:
(A) Recommend approval for the grant amount  sought in the application or for a differ-
ent amount; or
(B) Reject the application.
(b) The participating jurisdiction  may consult with the developer about the application
and the developer, after such consultation, may amend the application on or before a  dead-
line set by the participating jurisdiction that  may extend the review period beyond the 30
days.
(6)(a) The participating  jurisdiction shall forward recommended applications to the
 Department for review.
(b) Within 30 days following receipt of a recommended  application, the department shall
review the application for compliance with the provisions of sections 1 to 9 of this 2023 Act
and the accuracy of the financial projections.
(c) The department shall make final determinations of eligibility and notify the partic-
ipating jurisdiction of its determination.
(7)(a) The participating jurisdiction shall  promptly notify each applicant of the approval
or rejection  of its application and the amount of the grant awarded for an approved applica-
tion.
(b) A grant award:
(A) May not exceed the estimated amount that is capable  of being repaid from 10 con-
secutive years of tax increment  financing revenue derived from the eligible housing project
as determined under section 6 of this 2023 Act.
(B) May include reimbursement for eligible costs incurred for up  to 12 months preceding
the date of local site approval for the eligible housing project.
(c) The amount of a grant and the rejection  of an application may not be appealed, but
a developer may reapply at any time with respect to the same  or another eligible housing
project.
[3]
HB 2980
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(8)(a) The governing body of the participating jurisdiction shall adopt a resolution setting
forth the details of the approved eligible housing project, including, but not limited to:
(A) A description of the project;
(B) A detailed description of the eligible costs;
(C) The amount and terms of the grant award; and
(D) The participating jurisdiction’s intention  to request a loan from the Affordable
Housing Revolving Loan Fund established under section 9 of this 2023 Act  to be repaid using
tax increment financing.
(b) The governing body shall forward a copy of the approved application,  the resolution
and any other material the  governing body considers important, to the 
 Department
and the assessor of the county in which the eligible housing project is located.
SECTION 5. (1) After returning an approved application to a participating jurisdiction
under section 4 of this  2023 Act, the  Department shall make a no-interest loan from
the Affordable Housing Revolving Loan  Fund established under section 9 of this 2023 Act to
the governing body of the participating jurisdiction in the amount of the grant award.
(2)(a) The loan agreement between the participating jurisdiction and the department may
require the participating jurisdiction to:
(A) Pay into the fund any  difference between the total amount of tax increment financing
revenue used by the participating jurisdiction to make loan  payments with respect to an el-
igible housing project and the total amount due.
(B) Submit reports on  the progress of the eligible housing project to the department that:
(i) Contain information the department considers important  to an evaluation of the
project; and
(ii) Are submitted on a schedule determined by the parties.
(b) The department may withdraw from the fund an amount not to exceed  one percent
of the moneys in the fund for the actual costs  of the department in administering sections
1 to 9 of this 2023 Act.
(3) Once the participating jurisdiction has  received the loan proceeds from the fund, the
jurisdiction:
(a) May withhold an origination fee in an amount not to exceed one percent of  the pro-
ceeds for the jurisdiction’s actual costs in administering the grant program; and
(b) Shall pay the balance of  the proceeds over to the developer of the eligible housing
project in the net amount of the grant award.
(4) The department shall deposit all  loan payments made by the participating jurisdiction
in the fund.
SECTION 6.
(1) The ad valorem property taxes levied by any taxing district in which all
or part  of the tax lot on which an eligible housing project for which an application approved
under section 4 of this 2023 Act is situated shall be divided so that  the taxes levied against
any increase in the assessed value of the eligible housing  project property obtaining after the
effective date  of the participating jurisdiction’s resolution approving the grant application
shall be used to repay the loan made to the participating jurisdiction under section 5 of  this
2023 Act to fund the eligible costs associated with the eligible housing project.
(2) Taxes  levied on the eligible housing project property shall be divided in accordance
with this section until the principal amount of the loan made  to the participating jurisdiction
under section 5 of this 2023 Act is repaid to the Affordable Housing  Revolving Loan Fund
[4]
HB 2980
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
established under section 9 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 7.
(1) As soon as practicable  after receipt of an approved grant application and
a participating jurisdiction’s resolution adopted under section 4 (8) of this 2023 Act,  the
county assessor  of the county in which the eligible housing project is located shall prepare,
in triplicate, a certified statement of  the total assessed value, as shown on the county as-
sessment roll last certified prior to the effective date of the resolution, of all the taxable el-
igible housing project property.
(2) Where only a part of an eligible housing project is located in a taxing district, the
assessor shall show on the statement required under  subsection (1) of this section the as-
sessed value of the eligible housing project property that  is located within the taxing district.
(3) The assessor shall file one copy  of the certified statement with the participating ju-
risdiction and one copy with the
 Department, and one copy shall constitute a  part
of the public records of the county assessor’s office.
(4) When  a part of the tax lot on which an eligible housing project is situated comes
within the territory of a taxing district, by annexation, incorporation of a  new taxing district
or consolidation, the county assessor shall file, in the same  manner as under subsection (3)
of this section, a certified statement or an amendment to a  certified statement to show the
assessed value of the eligible housing project property in that part  of the tax lot that has
come within the territory of the taxing district. The  assessed value of the eligible housing
project property shall be determined in the same manner and as of the same date as provided
under subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(5)(a) When a  certified statement is filed as required under subsection (1) of this section,
if the law provides a reduction or increase of the valuation for tax purposes  of the eligible
housing project property at the time of the filing, the assessor shall state  the reduced or
increased total assessed value.
(b) After  a certified statement has been filed as required under subsection (1) of this
section, if a law is enacted that provides  a reduction or increase of the valuation for tax
purposes of the eligible housing project property at  the time the certified statement was
filed, the assessor shall  accordingly amend the certified statement annually or as otherwise
required to reduce  or increase the stated total assessed value of the eligible housing project
property.
(c) An amendment to the certified statement  shall be filed in the manner provided under
subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 8. During the period specified under section 6 (2) of this 2023 Act:
(1) The county assessor shall determine the amount of tax  revenue to be levied each year
within the  county on each tax account containing eligible housing project property in ac-
cordance with section 6 of this 2023 Act.
(2) Not later than September 25 of each  tax year, the assessor of any county in which
eligible housing project property extends  into another county shall provide, to the assessor
of each  other such county, the assessed value of the eligible housing project property that
is located within  the county, including the certified statement value and the increment for
each code area containing any eligible housing project property.
(3) The revenue that may be raised on each tax account by dividing the taxes as  provided
under section 6 of this 2023 Act shall be computed by the county assessor as follows:
(a) The county assessor shall compute the total consolidated ad valorem property tax
[5]
HB 2980
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
rate for each code area in which a part of the eligible housing project property is located.
(b) The total consolidated ad valorem property tax rate shall  exclude any rate derived
from:
(A) A local option tax, as defined in ORS 280.040; or
(B) A tax pledged to repay exempt bonded indebtedness, as defined in ORS 310.140.
(c) The assessor shall determine the amount  of taxes produced by extending the tax rate
computed under paragraph (a) of this subsection against the increment of each code area.
(4)(a) The county assessor  shall certify to the tax collector the amount of revenue to be
raised on  each tax account containing eligible housing project property. The tax collector
shall include the amount so certified in the  percentage schedule of the ratio of taxes on
property prepared under ORS 311.390 and filed with the county treasurer.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 311.395 (6), the county treasurer shall credit  the amount to the
participating jurisdiction that has awarded a grant to  the developer of the eligible housing
project and shall distribute its percentage amount to the  participating jurisdiction as deter-
mined by the schedule at the times other distributions are made under ORS 311.395 (7).
(5) The county assessor shall notify  the participating jurisdiction of the amounts received
under subsection (3) of this section for  each tax account containing an eligible housing
project. Any amounts received by the participating jurisdiction under subsection  (4) of this
section shall  be paid into the Affordable Housing Revolving Loan Fund established under
section 9 of this 2023 Act.
(6) The  Department of Revenue shall establish by rule procedures for purposes of this
section.
(7)(a) This section shall first apply to  the assessment roll next following the assessment
roll referred to in section 7 (1) of  this 2023 Act if the assessor receives the approved grant
application before January 1.
(b) If the assessor receives the approved grant application on or  after January 1 before
the tax year to which  this section would otherwise first apply, this section shall first apply
to the assessment roll next following the assessment roll described in paragraph  (a) of this
subsection.
SECTION 9.
(1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the
General Fund, the  Affordable Housing Revolving Loan Fund. Interest earned by the Afford-
able Housing Revolving Loan Fund shall be credited to the fund.  All moneys in the fund are
continuously appropriated to the Department to be used for the purposes set forth
in this section.
(2) The Affordable Housing Revolving Loan Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated for deposit in, or transferred or otherwise credited  to, the fund
by the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Payments made by participating jurisdictions in repayment of loans  from the fund
made pursuant to sections 1 to 9 of this 2023 Act.
(c) Interest and other earnings on moneys in the fund.
(d) Moneys transferred or otherwise credited to the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in  the Affordable Housing Revolving Loan Fund may be invested as provided
in ORS 293.701 to 293.857.
(4) Moneys in the Affordable Housing Revolving Loan Fund shall be used solely to:
(a) Make loans to participating jurisdictions to fund eligible costs in accordance  with
[6]
HB 2980
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
section 5 of this 2023 Act; and
(b) Reimburse the
 Department its actual costs in administering sections 1 to 9
of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 10. There is appropriated to the  Department, for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $500,000,000, for deposit in the  Af-
fordable Housing Revolving Loan Fund established under section 9 of this 2023  Act, to be
used for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of sections 1 to 9 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 11. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[7]