Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending June 30,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $6,000,000, for distribution to  the Port of Cas-
cade Locks for the Bridge of the Gods seismic analysis and strengthening project.
SECTION 2. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 182