Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A contractor or subcontractor may, before commencing  performance on
a construction project,  execute and deliver a good and sufficient bond to an owner, contrac-
tor or subcontractor in the  amount of any retainage the owner, contractor or subcontractor
would be  authorized under ORS 701.420 to withhold from the contractor or subcontractor
based on the contract price. After commencing  performance, a contractor or subcontractor
may execute and deliver a good and sufficient bond to an  owner, contractor or subcontractor
in the amount of any retainage on the contract price that has not been paid to the contrac-
tor or subcontractor by the owner, contractor or subcontractor.
(2) A bond under this section must be payable for claims and liens, in the same amounts,
manner and priority that the claims and  liens would be payable from moneys withheld as
retainage. The bond must be payable for  claims made prior to 30 days after the contractor
or subcontractor completes work  under the contract and the work is accepted by the owner.
The bond must be issued by one or more corporate sureties authorized to do business in this
state.
(3) If a contractor  or subcontractor delivers a bond to an owner, contractor or subcon-
tractor under this section before the contractor or subcontractor commences work, the
owner, contractor or subcontractor must accept the bond as security in lieu of withholding
retainage from the  amounts payable to the contractor or subcontractor. If the contractor
or subcontractor delivers the bond after commencing work, the owner,  contractor or sub-
contractor receiving  the bond shall immediately release any amounts earned by the con-
tractor or subcontractor  that have been withheld as retainage and shall cease further
withholdings of retainage from amounts due the contractor or subcontractor.
(4) If a contractor or  subcontractor delivers a bond under this section, and later executes
and delivers a performance bond under ORS 701.430, the contractor or  subcontractor may
reduce the amount of the performance bond by the amount of the bond executed and  deliv-
ered under this section.
(5) A  bond described in this section shall expire 30 days after the contractor or subcon-
tractor completes work under the contract and the work is accepted by the owner.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2551
HB 2148
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) This section does not apply to a public contract described in ORS 701.435.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 701.420 is amended to read:
701.420. (1) Partial payment is allowed and may be made  on contracts for construction and home
improvement. Except as otherwise provided in ORS 701.430, 701.435 or section  1 of this 2017
Act, an owner, contractor or subcontractor may withhold as retainage an  amount equal to not more
than five percent of the contract price of the work completed.  Partial payment allowed under this
subsection is not acceptance or approval of some of the work or a waiver of defects in the work.
(2) The owner, contractor or subcontractor shall  pay interest at the rate of one percent per
month on the final payment due the contractor or subcontractor. The  interest shall commence 30
days after the contractor or subcontractor has completed and the owner has accepted the  work
under the contract for construction for which the final payment is due. The interest shall run  until
the date when final payment is tendered to the contractor or subcontractor. When the  contractor
or subcontractor considers  the work that the contractor or subcontractor is contracted to perform
to be complete, the contractor or  subcontractor shall notify the party to whom the contractor or
subcontractor is responsible for performing  the construction work under the contract. The party
shall, within 15 days after receiving the notice, either accept the work or notify the contractor or
subcontractor of work yet to be performed under the contract. If  the party does not accept the work
or does not notify the contractor  or subcontractor of work yet to be performed within the time al-
lowed, the interest required under this subsection shall commence 30 days  after the end of the
15-day period.
(3) [ When a contractor pays a subcontractor in full, including  the amount the contractor withheld
as retainage, the owner with whom the contractor has the contract shall pay the contractor,  out of the
amount that the owner withheld from the contractor as retainage, a sum equal to the amount  of
retainage that the contractor paid the  subcontractor. ] If a contractor pays a subcontractor in full
including any retainage withheld  by the contractor, and the owner has withheld retainage
from the contractor, the owner shall pay the contractor out of the retainage withheld by  the
owner an amount equal to five percent of the  full amount that the contractor paid the sub-
contractor. The contractor shall  notify the owner when the contractor pays a subcontractor in full
under this section and the owner shall, within 15 days after receiving the notice, pay the  contractor
the amount due the contractor  under this subsection. Interest on the amount due the contractor at
the rate of one percent per month  shall commence 30 days after the owner receives notice of full
payment to the subcontractor.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 701.410 is amended to read:
701.410. (1) As used  in ORS 279C.555, 279C.570, 701.410, 701.420, 701.430, 701.435 and 701.440 and
section 1 of this 2017 Act :
(a) “Construction” means:
(A) Excavating, landscaping, demolishing and detaching existing  structures, leveling, filling in
and otherwise preparing land for the making and placement of a building,  structure or superstruc-
ture;
(B) Creating or making a building, structure or superstructure; and
(C) Altering, partially constructing and doing repairs  in and upon a building, structure or
superstructure.
(b) “Contractor” means a person  that contracts with an owner on predetermined terms to be
responsible for performing all or part of a job of construction  in accordance with established spec-
ifications or plans, and that retains control of the means,  method and manner of accomplishing the
[2]
HB 2148
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
desired result.
(c) “Owner” means a person that is or claims  to be the owner in fee or a lesser estate of the
land, building, structure or superstructure on which  construction is performed and that enters into
an agreement with a contractor for the construction.
(d) “Subcontractor” means a person that contracts with a contractor or another subcontractor
on predetermined terms to be responsible for performing all or part of a job of construction in ac-
cordance with established specifications or plans.
(2) As used in ORS 701.410, 701.420, 701.430, 701.435 and 701.440  and section 1 of this  2017
Act, “retainage” means the difference between the amount a contractor or subcontractor earns  un-
der a construction contract and the amount the owner pays on the contract to the  contractor, the
amount the contractor pays on the contract to the subcontractor or the amount the  subcontractor
pays on the contract to another subcontractor.
[3]