Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 8, chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  (1) Notwithstanding ORS 419B.005 (1)(a)(K),  at the conclusion of an investigation under
ORS 419B.020, the Department of  Human Services may not substantiate an allegation of abuse
against personnel  of a public education program [ who have not been trained to the standard estab-
lished in ORS 339.300 but ] who impose [ a] restraint or seclusion on a student if:
[(a) The restraint  is imposed in response to an imminent risk of serious bodily injury of any per-
son;]
[(b)] (a)(A) The  person imposing the restraint or seclusion has not been trained to the
standard established in ORS 339.300 and does not act with [ reckless disregard for student  safety ]
the intent to harm the student; or
(B) The person has been trained to the standard established in ORS 339.300 and the im-
position of the restraint or  seclusion constituted only a minor deviation from the require-
ments under ORS 339.285 to 339.303 and 339.308 ; and
[(c)] (b)  The  restraint or seclusion does not impose a significant risk of impeding the student’s
breathing.
(2)(a) Nothing in this section prohibits the department  from finding that the public education
program is responsible under [ section 2 of this 2023 Act ] ORS 339.296 for abuse arising from the
[untrained] personnel’s inappropriate use of restraint  or seclusion .
(b) If the department finds a public education program  responsible for abuse arising from
the personnel’s inappropriate use of restraint or seclusion, the public education program
shall take appropriate employment action against the personnel if the public education pro-
gram determines that the personnel’s actions violated  an employment policy. The public ed-
ucation program shall determine the appropriate employment action, which  must be
consistent with any collective bargaining requirements and  relevant state and federal laws
and take into consideration  the totality of the circumstances, including any training the
personnel received.
(3) As used  in this section, “public education program ,” [and] “restraint”  and “seclusion”  have
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3990
HB 3485
1
2
the meanings given those terms in ORS 339.285.
[2]