Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Notwithstanding the city’s charter, or any other provision  of law, a city may
not require a property owner to:
(1) Remove, or pay for the removal of, a tree  or other natural growth from public prop-
erty; or
(2) Repair, or pay for repairs  to, a public sidewalk damaged by a tree or other natural
growth on public property.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3733