Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 336.790 to
336.820.
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of Transportation shall establish a program for awarding
grants to providers of  traffic safety education courses to fund Spanish language traffic safety
education courses.
(2) A provider that offers traffic safety education courses in Spanish may apply for  a
grant under this section.
(3) The department shall by rule establish the:
(a) Application process;
(b) Eligibility criteria for the grant program; and
(c) Process of awarding grants under this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) Section 2 of this 2023 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2024.
(2) The Department  of Transportation may take any action before the operative date
specified in  subsection (1) of this section that is necessary for the department to exercise,
on and after  the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties,
functions and powers conferred on the department by section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Transportation, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $ , which  may be expended for awarding grants under
section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2786