Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Cultural burn” means the  intentional application of fire to land by an Indian tribe
or cultural fire practitioner to achieve cultural goals  or objectives, including subsistence,
ceremonial activities, biodiversity or other benefits.
(b) “Cultural fire practitioner” means a  person associated with an Indian tribe with ex-
perience in  burning to meet cultural goals or objectives, including subsistence, ceremonial
activities, biodiversity or other benefits.
(2) The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall:
(a) Establish a Prescribed Fire Liability Pilot Program.
(b) Administer the program or authorize the Oregon Insurance Guaranty Association
created by ORS 734.550 to administer the program.
(3) The program must be administered to:
(a) Increase the pace and scale of the use of prescribed fire and cultural burning.
(b) Reduce barriers for conducting prescribed fires and cultural burning.
(c) Support coverage for  losses from prescribed fires and cultural burning by nonpublic
entities such as cultural fire  practitioners, private landowners and nongovernmental entities.
(4) Under the program the department or association may reimburse claims related to:
(a) A prescribed fire conducted or supervised by the  State Forester, a forest protective
association or a Certified Burn Manager, pursuant to ORS 526.360.
(b) A cultural burn conducted or supervised by a cultural fire practitioner.
(5) The department or association may only reimburse a claim if:
(a) The State Forester, a forest protective association or a Certified Burn Manager re-
viewed and approved a burn plan before the prescribed fire or cultural burning;
(b) Any necessary permit was obtained before the prescribed fire or cultural burning was
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1671
HB 2985
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
conducted; and
(c) The prescribed fire or cultural burning complied with  any requirements under a burn
plan or permit.
(6) The maximum amount that the department or association may pay for a  claim for
losses arising from a prescribed fire or cultural burn is $1,000,000.
(7) The department shall:
(a) Consult with other relevant state agencies, cultural  fire practitioners, the State
Forester, forest protective associations and Certified Burn Managers to establish  guidelines
for the program.
(b) Adopt the guidelines by rule.
(c) Make the guidelines publicly available on a department website.
(8) A person who interacts with  an Indian tribe or cultural fire practitioner pursuant to
this section shall respect tribal sovereignty, customs and culture.
(9) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state’s liability for  all claims for
covered losses established pursuant to this section,  and the guidelines developed by the de-
partment pursuant to subsection (7) of this section, shall be limited as described in this
section and to the amount in the  Prescribed Fire Claims Fund established by section 2 of this
2023 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the
General Fund, the Prescribed Fire Claims Fund. Interest  earned by the fund shall be credited
to the fund. All moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Department of
Consumer and Business Services for the program described in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
(2) The fund shall consist of all moneys credited to the fund, including moneys  appropri-
ated or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(3) If the department authorizes the Oregon Insurance Guaranty  Association to admin-
ister the program, the department shall distribute  moneys in the fund to the association as
necessary for the program.
SECTION 3. (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this 2023 Act are repealed on January 2, 2028.
(2) Any moneys in the Prescribed Fire  Claims Fund that are unexpended and unobligated
on the date of the repeal shall revert to the General Fund.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to  the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for deposit in  the Prescribed Fire
Claims Fund established by section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]