Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 690.005 to
690.225.
SECTION 2. (1) The Board of Cosmetology shall adopt rules  to allow an individual who
holds a provisional certificate issued under this section to  perform in a field of practice un-
der the supervision of a practitioner who holds  a certificate in the same field of practice. The
rules adopted under this subsection must establish:
(a) A process for the Health Licensing Office  to issue a provisional certificate, including
eligibility requirements specifying that the holder of a  provisional certificate shall be actively
working toward holding a certificate; and
(b) A process to enable a practitioner to  supervise the holder of a provisional certificate.
(2) A provisional  certificate issued under this section may not be renewed. The holder
of a provisional certificate may perform only in the  field of practice for which the provisional
certificate is issued, and may hold provisional certificates  in more than one field of practice.
(3) The number of hours of supervised  experience completed by the holder of a provi-
sional certificate shall be credited in an equal  number toward the total number of educa-
tional hours required for issuance of a certificate under ORS 690.046.  The board may
establish by rule  a limit on the number of hours of supervised experience that may be cred-
ited under this subsection.
(4) A practitioner described in subsection (1) of this section may not be required to  pay
a fee in order to supervise the holder of a provisional certificate.
(5) The board may adopt other rules as necessary to carry  out this section, including
rules to establish the amount  of time for which a provisional certificate issued under this
section is valid.
SECTION 3.  ORS 676.562 is amended to read:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1229
SB 207
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
676.562. As used in ORS 676.560 to 676.625:
(1) “Active authorization” means an authorization that is current and not suspended.
(2) “Authorization” means a certificate, provisional certificate, license, permit or  registration
issued by the Health Licensing Office that allows a person to [ practice]:
(a) Practice one of the occupations or professions [ or] subject to the  authority of the boards,
councils and programs listed in ORS 676.565;
(b) Maintain  a facility subject to the authority of the boards, councils and programs listed in
ORS 676.565; or
[(b)] (c) Practice  a profession or occupation subject to direct oversight by the office.
(3) “Expired authorization” means an authorization that has been not current  for more than
three years.
(4) “Inactive authorization” means an authorization that has been not current for three  years
or less.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 690.005 is amended to read:
690.005. As used in ORS 690.005 to 690.225:
(1) “Authorization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 676.562.
(2) “Barbering” means any of  the following practices, when done upon the human body for cos-
metic purposes and not for medical diagnosis or treatment of disease or  physical or mental ailments:
(a) Shampooing, styling, cutting, singeing and conditioning of the hair of an individual.
(b) Applying hair tonics, dressings and rinses.
(c) Massaging of the scalp, face  and neck and applying facial and scalp treatments with creams,
lotions, oils and  other cosmetic preparations, either by hand or mechanical appliances, except that
the mechanical appliances may not be galvanic or faradic.
(d) Shaving, trimming or cutting of the beard or mustache.
(3) “Certificate” means a written authorization for the holder to perform in one or more fields
of practice.
(4) “Cosmetology” means the art or science of  beautifying and improving the skin, nails and hair
and the study of cosmetics and their application.
(5) “Demonstration permit” means a written authorization  for a person to practice, demonstrate
and teach one or more fields of practice on a temporary basis.
(6) “Esthetics” means any of the following skin care or facial care  practices performed on the
human body or face for the purpose of keeping the skin  of the human body or face healthy and at-
tractive and not for medical diagnosis or treatment of disease or physical or mental ailments:
(a) The use of  the hands or mechanical or electric apparatuses, appliances or devices for
cleansing, stimulating, manipulating, exfoliating or applying lotions or creams.
(b) Temporary  removal of hair by using lotion, cream, an appliance, wax, thread, sugar,
tweezers, dermaplaning, a depilatory or other means.
(c) Makeup artistry.
(d) Eyebrow and eyelash services.
(e) Facial and body treatments.
(7) “Facility” means an establishment operated on a regular or irregular basis  for the purpose
of providing services in one or more fields of practice.
(8) “Field of practice” means the following cosmetology disciplines:
(a) Barbering.
(b) Esthetics.
[2]
SB 207
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Hair design.
(d) Nail technology.
(e) Natural hair care.
(9) “Freelance license” means a written authorization that allows a practitioner  to practice
outside or away from a licensed facility.
(10) “Hair design” means any of the following practices, when done upon the human body for
cosmetic purposes and not for medical diagnosis or  treatment of disease or physical or mental
ailments:
(a) Shaving, trimming or cutting of the beard or mustache.
(b) Styling, permanent  waving, relaxing, cutting, singeing, bleaching, coloring, shampooing, con-
ditioning, applying hair products or similar work upon the hair of an individual.
(c) Massaging the scalp and neck when performed in conjunction with activities in  paragraph
(a) or (b) of this subsection.
(11) “Independent contractor” means a practitioner who qualifies as  an independent contractor
under ORS 670.600 and who is not under the control and direction of a facility license holder.
(12) “License” means a written authorization issued under ORS 690.055 to a person  to operate
a facility or freelance business for providing services related to one or more  fields of practice to the
public.
(13)(a) “Mechanical or electrical apparatus, appliance or device” includes, but is not limited to,
galvanic current, high-frequency microcurrents, light-emitting diode therapy and microdermabrasion
that does not penetrate beyond the epidermis except through natural physiological effects.
(b) “Mechanical or electrical apparatus, appliance or device” does not include lasers  or intense
pulsed light or a device, as that term is defined by the Board of Cosmetology by rule, in  collab-
oration with the Board of Certified Advanced Estheticians.
(14) “Nail technology” means any of the following manicuring or pedicuring practices  performed
for cosmetic purposes and not for medical diagnosis  or treatment of disease or physical or mental
ailments:
(a) Cutting,  trimming, polishing, coloring, tinting, cleansing or otherwise treating the nails of the
hands or feet.
(b) Massaging, cleansing, treating or beautifying the hands, arms below the elbow, feet or legs
below the knee.
(c) Applying, sculpturing or removing artificial nails of the hands or feet.
(15)(a) “Natural hair care” means:
(A) The braiding, cornrowing, extending, lacing, locking, sewing, twisting, weaving  or wrapping
of human hair, natural fibers, synthetic  fibers or hair extensions through the use of hands or simple
devices such as clips, combs, hairpins or needle and thread;
(B) The use of scissors to  trim synthetic fibers, hair extensions or sewn-in weave extensions as
is necessary to perform the activities described in this paragraph;
(C) The making of customized wigs from natural hair, natural  fibers, synthetic fibers or hair
extensions; or
(D) Shampooing or conditioning of the hair of an individual.
(b) “Natural hair care” does not include the  use of scissors, except as provided in paragraph
(a)(B) of this subsection, penetrating chemical hair treatments, chemical  hair coloring agents,
chemical hair straightening agents, chemical hair joining agents, permanent  wave styles or chemical
hair bleaching agents.
[3]
SB 207
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
(16) “Practitioner” means  a person certified to perform services included within a field of prac-
tice.
(17) “Provisional certificate” means a written authorization for the  holder to perform in
one field of practice under the supervision of a practitioner who holds a certificate  in the
same field of practice.
[(17)] (18) “Registration” means a  written authorization issued to an independent contractor to
hold forth to the public as a business entity providing services in a field of practice.
[(18)] (19) “School” means an educational establishment that offers a program of study in one
or more fields of practice other than natural hair care, including, but not limited to, a  career school
licensed under ORS 345.010 to 345.340 including  a proficiency-based career school, a community
college or an educational establishment operated by a school district.
[(19)] (20) “Temporary facility  permit” means a written authorization issued under ORS 690.055
to provide services on a temporary basis in one or more fields of practice.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 690.035 is amended to read:
690.035. [A person desiring ] In order to obtain a certificate , provisional certificate  or demon-
stration permit , a person  shall apply in writing to the Health Licensing Office on a  form approved
by the office. [ Each] The application [ shall] must contain :
(1) An affirmation by the applicant that the information contained therein is accurate[ . The ap-
plication must also include ]; and
(2) Evidence establishing to the satisfaction of  the office that the applicant possesses the nec-
essary qualifications.
SECTION 6. (1) Section 2 of this 2025 Act and the  amendments to ORS 676.562, 690.005
and 690.035 by sections 3 to 5 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Board of Cosmetology  and the Health Licensing Office may take any action before
the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the
board and the  office to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1)
of this section,  all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the board and the office
by section 2 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to  ORS 676.562, 690.005 and 690.035 by
sections 3 to 5 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]