Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 9.005 to 9.757.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon State Bar shall require an attorney to provide at least 120
hours of public defense  services in the first three years after the attorney first becomes
admitted to the practice of law in this state.
(2) The Oregon Public Defense Commission shall  provide training in criminal defense law
that prepares attorneys to satisfy the requirements of this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2282