Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Teacher Standards and  Practices Commission shall study the impli-
cations and necessary  changes of law to establish merit-based compensation for the
workforce in kindergarten through post-secondary education in this state. The commission
shall submit a report in  the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommen-
dations for legislation, to the interim committees  of the Legislative Assembly related to ed-
ucation no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4584