Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The purpose of sections 1 to 5 and 7 of this 2018 Act is to:
(1) Ensure that employers pay a fair share penalty for health care coverage  provided to
their employees through the medical assistance program.
(2) Encourage employers to provide affordable health insurance coverage to  low-wage
employees who would otherwise be enrolled in the medical assistance program.
(3) Protect employees who receive medical assistance from retaliation by  their employers
for seeking or obtaining medical assistance.
(4) Pay a  share of the costs of medical assistance provided to working adults who lack
affordable employer-sponsored health insurance, improve reimbursement to  the health care
providers who care for these workers and support the safety net providers that care  for the
remaining uninsured workers.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 1 to 5 of this 2018 Act:
(1)(a) “Covered employee” means an individual who meets all of the  following conditions:
(A) The individual is 18 to 64 years of age.
(B) The individual is employed for an  average of at least 30 hours per week by an em-
ployer that offers health insurance coverage to its employees.
(C) The individual is enrolled in medical assistance  on the basis of the individual’s income
and not by reason of a disability or being over 65 years of age.
(b) “Covered  employee” includes a leased employee or other individual under the direction
and control of the employer.
(2)(a) “Employer” means an employing unit  as defined in ORS 657.020 that employed an
average of at least 50 full-time employees  on business days during the preceding calendar
year.
(b) “Employer”  includes all of the members of a controlled group of corporations. As used
in this paragraph, “controlled  group of corporations” means a controlled group of corpo-
rations as defined in section 1563(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, except that “more  than
50 percent” shall be substituted for “at  least 80 percent” each place it appears in section
1563(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code,  and the determination shall be made without regard
to sections 1563(a)(4) and 1563(e)(3)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(c) “Employer” does not include a public employer as defined in ORS 243.650.
(3) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(4) “Safety net provider” means any provider of  comprehensive primary care or acute
hospital inpatient services that provides these services to a significant number  of medical
assistance and medically indigent patients in relation to the total number of patients served
by the provider.
SECTION 3.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in section 4 of this 2018 Act, every employer
shall pay to the Department of Consumer and Business  Services an employer responsibility
penalty for each covered employee, as determined under subsection (3) of this section.
(2) Each year the department shall determine the  average cost of a full year of
employee-only coverage under a group health benefit plan that  has an actuarial value of 70
[2]
HB 4105
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
percent.
(3) For each employer, the department shall:
(a) Multiply the amount determined under subsection (2) of this section by  the number
of the employer’s covered employees;
(b) Multiply the product calculated in paragraph (a) of this subsection by 0.9; and
(c) Impose an employer responsibility penalty on the employer that is equal  to the prod-
uct calculated in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(4) All moneys collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited  in the Employer Re-
sponsibility for Medical Assistance Trust Fund created in section 5 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Department of Consumer and Business Services has all powers  and
duties necessary to  administer the collection and enforcement of employer responsibility
penalties required to be remitted by employers under this section and section 3 of  this 2018
Act, including but not limited to the power to:
(a) Adopt rules to administer and enforce sections 1 to 5 and 6 of this 2018 Act;
(b) Subpoena documents and subpoena witnesses to testify under oath; and
(c) Institute or prosecute actions for the enforcement of sections 1  to 5 and 6 of this 2018
Act.
(2) An employer shall pay to  the department, for deposit into the Employer Responsibility
for Medical Assistance Trust Fund, any employer responsibility penalties imposed  on the
employer pursuant to section 3 of this 2018 Act.
(3) The department shall annually send to each employer subject to an employer respon-
sibility penalty under section 3 of this 2018 Act a notice of any employer  responsibility pen-
alty imposed and the date on  which payment is due. The amount of the penalty shall become
conclusive and binding upon the employer unless, within 20 days after the  mailing of the
notice to the last-known address of the  employer as shown on the records of the department,
or in the absence of mailing, within 20 days after the delivery  of the notice, the employer
files a request for hearing. Hearings shall be conducted in  accordance with ORS chapter 183.
(4) Interest shall be assessed on  employer responsibility penalties not paid on or before
payment is due at  10 percent per annum. Interest shall begin to accrue the day after the date
the payment is due and  shall be deposited into the Employer Responsibility for Medical As-
sistance Trust Fund.
(5) If an employer responsibility penalty payment is more than  60 days overdue, a penalty
equal to the interest charged as described  in subsection (4) of this section shall be assessed
and due for each month, or part thereof, that the employer responsibility  penalty payment
is not received.
(6) All penalties shall be paid to and  collected by the department at such times and in
such manner as the department may prescribe and  upon collection shall be deposited in the
Employer Responsibility for Medical Assistance Trust Fund.
(7) An employer shall provide information  to all newly hired and existing employees re-
garding the availability of medical assistance for low-income employees and  regarding the
employees’ rights under section 7 of this 2018 Act. The department, in consultation  with the
Oregon Health Authority, shall develop a simple, uniform notice containing the information.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Employer Responsibility for Medical Assistance Trust Fund  is cre-
ated in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General  Fund, and consists of
moneys collected under sections 3 and 4 of this 2018 Act. Interest earned by the Employer
[3]
HB 4105
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Responsibility for Medical Assistance Trust Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the Oregon Health  Authority to be used for
the following purposes:
(a) To pay a portion of the cost of medical assistance provided to covered employees.
(b) To increase the reimbursement paid by the authority to health care providers that:
(A) Contract with the authority to provide services to medical assistance recipients;  and
(B) Are located in health profession shortage areas or  medically underserved areas as
designated by the Office of Rural Health.
(c) To make supplemental medical assistance payments to health care  providers if 30
percent or more of a provider’s patients are medical assistance recipients or uninsured.
(d) To reimburse safety net providers for the cost of providing care,  without expectation
of compensation, to Oregonians who do not have health insurance.
(e) To provide funding for medical residency programs in this state.
(3) All costs to implement and administer sections 1 to 5 and 6 of this  2018 Act shall be
paid from moneys  deposited in the fund, including any necessary costs incurred by the au-
thority, the Department of Consumer and Business Services  or any other state government
agency.
SECTION 6.
(1) The  Oregon Health Authority, the Employment Department, the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services and the Department of  Revenue shall enter
into interagency agreements and take any steps necessary, including  by requesting from a
federal agency a waiver of federal requirements, to share the data required to carry  out the
provisions of sections 1 to 5 of this 2018 Act.
(2) The authority shall provide to the Department of Consumer and  Business Services a
list of employers  with one or more employees who receive medical assistance in order to
permit the  department to determine and collect the employer responsibility penalty imposed
pursuant to section 3 of this 2018 Act.
(3) Any and all shared data identifying recipients  of medical assistance may not be fur-
ther disclosed for purposes other than the administration of  sections 1 to 5 of this 2018 Act
and are subject to the confidentiality requirements in ORS 413.171 and 657.665.
(4) As used in this section, “medical assistance” has the meaning given that  term in ORS
414.025.
SECTION 7. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Employer” has the meaning given that term in section 2 of this 2018 Act.
(b) “Health insurance exchange” has the meaning give that term in ORS 741.300.
(c) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(d) “Premium tax  credits” means tax credits provided under section 36B of the Internal
Revenue Code to a person who is enrolled in a qualified health  plan through a health insur-
ance exchange.
(2) It is an  unlawful employment practice under ORS chapter 659A for an employer to
refuse to hire,  discharge, demote, suspend, retaliate or otherwise discriminate against an
employee who applies for or receives medical assistance or premium tax credits.
(3) An employee who alleges a violation  of subsection (2) of this section may bring a civil
action under ORS 659A.885 or may file a complaint with  the Commissioner of the Bureau of
Labor and Industries in the manner provided by ORS 659A.820.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 657.660 is amended to read:
[4]
HB 4105
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
657.660. (1) Every employing unit shall keep true and  accurate records of all persons employed
by it and such records of hours worked, wages paid  and other statistics as prescribed by the Di-
rector of the Employment Department for the administration of this chapter  and section 6 of this
2018 Act.
(2) Such records  shall be open to inspection by the director or an authorized representative of
the director at any reasonable time. No person  shall refuse to allow the director or authorized
representative to inspect the payroll or other records or documents relative to  the enforcement of
this chapter  and section 6 of this 2018 Act .
(3) The  director may require from any employing unit such reports on the wages, hours, em-
ployment, unemployment and related matters concerning its employees as  the director deems nec-
essary to the effective administration of this chapter  and section 6 of this 2018 Act .
(4) Every employing unit shall fully, correctly and promptly furnish the director all information
required by the director to carry out the purposes and  provisions of this chapter  and section 6 of
this 2018 Act .
SECTION 9.  ORS 657.665 is amended to read:
657.665. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) to (5) of  this section, all information in the
records of the Employment Department pertaining to the administration  of the unemployment in-
surance, employment service and workforce and labor market information programs:
(a) Is confidential  and for the exclusive use and information of the Director of the Employment
Department in administering the unemployment insurance, employment service  and workforce and
labor market information programs in Oregon.
(b) May not be used in any  court action or in any proceeding pending in the court unless the
director or the state is a party to the action or proceeding  or unless the proceeding concerns the
establishment, enforcement or modification of  a support obligation and support services are being
provided by the Division of Child Support or the district attorney pursuant to ORS 25.080.
(c) Is exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(2) The Employment Department shall disclose information:
(a) To any claimant or legal representative, at a hearing before an administrative law judge,  to
the extent necessary for the proper presentation of an unemployment insurance claim.
(b) Upon request to the United States  Secretary of Labor. The Employment Department shall
disclose the information in a form and containing the  information that the United States Secretary
of Labor may require. The  information disclosed is confidential and may not be used for any other
purpose.
(c) Pursuant to  section 303(a)(7) of the Social Security Act, upon request to any agency of the
United States charged with the administration of public works or  assistance through public em-
ployment. Under this paragraph, the Employment Department shall  disclose the name, address, or-
dinary occupation and employment status of each recipient of  unemployment insurance benefits and
a statement of the recipient’s right  to further benefits under this chapter. The information disclosed
is confidential and may not be used for any other purpose.
(d) Pursuant to section 303(c)(1) of the Social  Security Act, to the Railroad Retirement Board.
Under this paragraph, the Employment Department  shall disclose unemployment insurance records.
The information disclosed is confidential and may not be used for any  other purpose. The costs of
disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid by the board.
(e) Pursuant  to section 303(d) of the Social Security Act, upon request to officers and employees
of the United States Department of Agriculture and  to officers or employees of any state Supple-
[5]
HB 4105
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mental Nutrition Assistance Program agency for the purpose of determining an individual’s  eligibil-
ity for or the amount of supplemental nutrition assistance. The  information disclosed is confidential
and may not be used for any  other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph
shall be paid by the United States Department of Agriculture.
(f) Pursuant to section 303(e)(1) and (2)(A)(ii) of the Social Security Act, to state  or local child
support enforcement agencies enforcing child support obligations under Title IV-D of the  Social Se-
curity Act for the purposes of  establishing child support obligations, locating individuals owing child
support obligations and collecting child  support obligations from those individuals. The information
disclosed is confidential and may not be used for  any other purpose. The costs of disclosing infor-
mation under this paragraph shall be paid by the child support enforcement agency.
(g) Pursuant to sections 303(f) and 1137 of  the Social Security Act, to agencies participating in
the income and  eligibility verification system for the purpose of verifying an individual’s eligibility
for benefits, or the  amount of benefits, under unemployment insurance, temporary assistance for
needy families, Medicaid, the Supplemental Nutrition  Assistance Program, Supplemental Security
Income, child support  enforcement or Social Security programs. The information disclosed is confi-
dential and may not be used for any other purpose. The  costs of disclosing information under this
paragraph shall be paid by the requesting agency.
(h) Pursuant to section 303(h) of the Social Security Act and section 3304(a)(16)(B) of the Federal
Unemployment Tax Act, to the United States Department  of Health and Human Services National
Directory of New Hires. The information disclosed is confidential and may  not be used for any other
purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid by the  United States
Department of Health and Human Services.
(i) Pursuant to section 303(i) of the Social Security  Act, to officers and employees of the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development and to representatives of a public housing
agency for the purpose of determining an individual’s eligibility for benefits, or the  amount of ben-
efits, under  a housing assistance program of the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development. The information disclosed is confidential and  may not be used for any other purpose.
The costs of disclosing information  under this paragraph shall be paid by the United States De-
partment of Housing and Urban Development or the public housing agency.
(j) Pursuant to regulations of the United States Secretary of  Health and Human Services issued
under section 3304(a)(16)(A) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, and except as required by sec-
tion 303 of the Social Security  Act, to the state, a political subdivision or a federally recognized
Indian tribe that has signed an agreement with the Department  of Human Services to administer
Part A of Title IV of the Social Security Act for the purpose of determining an individual’s eligibility
for assistance, or the amount of assistance, under a  program funded under Part A of Title IV of the
Social Security Act. The information  disclosed is confidential and may not be used for any other
purpose.
(k) Upon request, to  the United States Attorney’s Office. Under this paragraph, the Employment
Department may disclose an individual’s employment and wage information in response to a  federal
grand jury subpoena or for the purpose of  collecting civil and criminal judgments, including
restitution and special assessment fees. The information disclosed is confidential and  may not be
used for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph shall be paid
by the United States Attorney’s Office.
(3) The Employment Department may disclose information secured from employing units:
(a) To state agencies, federal agencies, local  government agencies, public universities listed in
[6]
HB 4105
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ORS 352.002 and the Oregon  Health and Science University established under ORS 353.020, to the
extent necessary to properly carry out governmental planning, performance measurement,  program
analysis, socioeconomic analysis or policy analysis functions  performed under applicable law. The
information disclosed is confidential and may not be disclosed by the agencies or universities in any
manner that would identify individuals, claimants, employees  or employing units. If the information
disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the costs
of disclosing the information shall be paid by the agency or university requesting the information.
(b) As part of a geographic  information system. Points on a map may be used to represent eco-
nomic data, including the location, employment size class and industrial  classification of businesses
in Oregon. Information presented as part of a geographic information system may  not give specific
details regarding a business’s address, actual  employment or proprietary information. If the infor-
mation disclosed under this paragraph  is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department,
the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the party requesting the information.
(c) In accordance with ORS 657.673.
(4) The Employment Department may:
(a) Disclose information to public employees in the performance of their  duties under state or
federal laws relating to the payment of  unemployment insurance benefits, the provision of employ-
ment services and the provision of workforce and labor market information.
(b) At the discretion of the Director of the Employment Department and subject to an  intera-
gency agreement, disclose information to public officials in the performance  of their official duties
administering or enforcing laws within their authority and to the  agents or contractors of public
officials. The public official shall agree to assume responsibility for misuse of the information by
the official’s agent or contractor.
(c) Disclose information pursuant  to an informed consent, received from an employer or claim-
ant, to disclose the information.
(d) Disclose information to partners under the federal Workforce Innovation  and Opportunity
Act for the purpose of administering state workforce programs  under the Act. The information dis-
closed is confidential and may not be  used for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information
under this paragraph shall be paid by the requesting partner.
(e) Disclose the names and addresses of employing units to the  Bureau of Labor and Industries
for the purpose of disseminating information to employing units.  The names and addresses disclosed
are confidential and may  not be used for any other purpose. If the information disclosed under this
paragraph is not prepared for the use of the  Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the
information shall be paid by the bureau.
(f) Disclose information to the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and  Industries for the
purpose of performing duties under ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870,  658.005 to 658.245 or 658.405 to
658.503 or ORS chapter 652, 653 or 659A. The information disclosed may include the names and ad-
dresses of employers and employees and payroll data of employers and employees. The  information
disclosed is confidential and may not be used for any other purpose. If the information disclosed
under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment  Department, the costs of dis-
closing the information shall be paid by the bureau.
(g) Disclose information required under ORS 657.660 (3)  and (4) to the Public Employees Re-
tirement System for the purpose of determining the eligibility of members  of the retirement system
for disability under  ORS chapters 238 and 238A. The information disclosed is confidential and may
not be used for any other purpose. The costs of disclosing information under this paragraph  shall
[7]
HB 4105
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
be paid by the Public Employees Retirement System.
(h) Disclose to the Oregon Business Development Commission  and the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department information required by the commission  and the department in performing their
duties under  ORS 285A.050 and 285B.630 to verify changes in employment levels following direct
employer participation in department programs or indirect participation through  municipalities un-
der ORS 285B.410 to 285B.482. The information disclosed to the commission  and the department may
include an employer’s employment level, total subject  wages payroll and whole hours worked. The
information disclosed is confidential and may not  be used for any other purpose. The commission
and the  department may not disclose the information in any manner that would identify an employ-
ing unit or employee except to the  extent necessary to carry out the commission’s and the
department’s duties under ORS 285A.050 and 285B.630. If the information disclosed under this para-
graph is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the costs  of disclosing the infor-
mation shall be paid by the commission or the Oregon Business Development Department.
(i) Disclose  information to the Department of Revenue for the purpose of performing its duties
under ORS 293.250 or under the revenue  and tax laws of this state. The information disclosed may
include the names and addresses of employers and employees and  payroll data of employers and
employees. The information disclosed is confidential and  may not be disclosed by the Department
of Revenue in any manner that would identify an employing unit or employee except to  the extent
necessary to carry out the department’s duties under ORS 293.250 or in auditing or reviewing  any
report or return required or permitted to be filed under the revenue and tax laws administered  by
the department. The  Department of Revenue may not disclose any information received to any pri-
vate collection agency or for any  other purpose. If the information disclosed under this paragraph
is not prepared for the use of the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing  the information
shall be paid by the Department of Revenue.
(j) Disclose information to  the Department of Consumer and Business Services for the purpose
of performing its duties under ORS chapters  654 and 656  and sections 1 to 5 and 6 of this 2018
Act. The information disclosed may include the name,  address, number of employees and industrial
classification code of an employer and payroll data of employers and employees. The information
disclosed is confidential and may not be disclosed by  the Department of Consumer and Business
Services in any manner that  would identify an employing unit or employee except to the extent
necessary to carry out the department’s duties  under ORS chapters 654 and 656  and sections 1 to
5 and 6 of this 2018 Act , including administrative hearings  and court proceedings in which the
Department of Consumer and Business Services is a party. If the information disclosed under  this
paragraph is not prepared for the use of the  Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the
information shall be paid by the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(k) Disclose information to the Construction  Contractors Board for the purpose of performing
its duties under ORS chapter 701.  The information disclosed to the board may include the names and
addresses of employers and status of their compliance with this chapter. If the information  disclosed
under this paragraph is not prepared  for the use of the Employment Department, the costs of dis-
closing the information shall be paid by the board.
(L) Disclose information to  the State Fire Marshal to assist the State Fire Marshal in carrying
out duties under ORS 453.307 to 453.414. The  information disclosed may include the name, address,
telephone number and industrial classification code of an employer. The information disclosed  is
confidential and may not be disclosed by the State Fire Marshal in any manner that would  identify
an employing unit except to the extent necessary to carry out duties under ORS  453.307 to 453.414.
[8]
HB 4105
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
If the information  disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of the Employment
Department, the costs of disclosing  the information shall be paid by the office of the State Fire
Marshal.
(m) Disclose information to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  for the purpose of
performing the commission’s duties under ORS  chapter 348 and Title IV of the Higher Education
Act of 1965. The information disclosed may include the names and addresses of employers and em-
ployees and payroll data of employers and employees. The  information disclosed is confidential and
may not be disclosed by the commission in any manner that  would identify an employing unit or
employee except to the extent necessary to carry out the commission’s duties under  ORS chapter
348 or Title IV of the Higher Education Act of 1965.  If the information disclosed under this para-
graph is not prepared for  the use of the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the infor-
mation shall be paid by the commission.
(n) Disclose information to the Department of Transportation to  assist the Department of
Transportation  in  carrying out the duties of the Department of Transportation relating to collection
of delinquent and liquidated debts, including taxes,  under ORS 184.610 to 184.665, 184.670 to 184.733
and 805.263, ORS chapter 319 and the Oregon Vehicle Code. The information disclosed may include
the names and addresses of employers and employees and payroll data of employers and employees.
The information disclosed is confidential and  may not be disclosed by the Department of Transpor-
tation in any manner that  would identify an employing unit or employee except to the extent nec-
essary to carry out the Department of Transportation’s duties relating  to collection of delinquent
and liquidated debts or in auditing or reviewing any report or return required or permitted  to be
filed under the revenue and tax laws administered  by the Department of Transportation. The De-
partment of Transportation may not disclose any information received to any private collection
agency or for any other  purpose. If the information disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared
for the use of the Employment Department,  the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by
the Department of Transportation.
(o) Disclose information to the Department of Human Services and the  Oregon Health Authority
to assist the Department of Human Services and the Oregon Health  Authority in the collection of
debts that the Department  of Human Services and the Oregon Health Authority are authorized by
law to collect. The information disclosed may include the names,  addresses and payroll data of em-
ployers and employees. The information disclosed is  confidential and may not be disclosed by the
Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health Authority in a manner that  would identify an
employing unit or  employee except to the extent necessary for the collection of debts as described
in this paragraph. The Department of  Human Services and the Oregon Health Authority may not
disclose information received under this paragraph to a private collection agency or use the  infor-
mation for a purpose other than  the collection of debts as described in this paragraph. If the infor-
mation disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use  of the Employment Department,
the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the Department  of Human Services or the
Oregon Health Authority.
(p) Disclose to the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission information  required by the commission
in evaluating and measuring  the performance of alcohol and drug prevention and treatment pro-
grams under ORS 430.242 or the impact of the  programs on employment. The information disclosed
to the commission may include total  subject wages payroll and whole hours worked. The information
disclosed under this paragraph  is confidential and may not be used for any other purpose. The
commission  may  not disclose the information in any manner that would identify an employing unit
[9]
HB 4105
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or employee except to the extent necessary to carry out the commission’s duties under ORS  430.242.
If the information disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for the use of  the Employment
Department, the costs of disclosing the information shall be paid by the commission.
(q) Disclose to any person establishment level information secured  pursuant to this chapter from
federal, state and local government agencies, public universities listed  in ORS 352.002 or the Oregon
Health and Science University established under ORS 353.020. If the information disclosed under this
paragraph is not prepared for the use of  the Employment Department, the costs of disclosing the
information shall be paid by the person requesting the information.
(r) Disclose to any person the industrial classification code assigned to an employing  unit. If the
information disclosed under this paragraph is not prepared for  the use of the Employment Depart-
ment, the costs of disclosing the  information shall be paid by the person requesting the information.
(5) The Employment Department may  make public all decisions of the Employment Appeals
Board.
(6) Any officer appointed  by or any employee of the Director of the Employment Department
who discloses confidential information, except with the authority of the director, pursuant to  rules
or as otherwise required by law, may be disqualified from holding any appointment or employment
with the Employment Department.
(7) Any person or any  officer or employee of an entity to whom information is disclosed by the
Employment Department under this section who divulges or uses the  information for any purpose
other than that specified in the provision of law or agreement authorizing the use or  disclosure may
be disqualified from performing any service under contract or disqualified from holding any  ap-
pointment or employment with the state  agency that engaged or employed that person, officer or
employee. The Employment Department may immediately cancel or modify  any information sharing
agreement with an  entity when a person or an officer or employee of that entity discloses confi-
dential information, other than as specified in law or agreement.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 659A.885, as amended by section 9, chapter 197, Oregon Laws  2017, and
section 13, chapter 691, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
659A.885. (1) Any person claiming to be aggrieved by  an unlawful practice specified in sub-
section (2) of this section may file  a civil action in circuit court. In any action under this subsection,
the court may order injunctive relief and  any other equitable relief that may be appropriate, in-
cluding but  not limited to reinstatement or the hiring of employees with or without back pay. A
court may order back pay in an action under this subsection only for the two-year period imme-
diately preceding the filing  of a complaint under ORS 659A.820 with the Commissioner of the Bureau
of Labor and Industries, or if a complaint was not filed before the action  was commenced, the two-
year period immediately preceding the filing of the  action. In any action under this subsection, the
court may allow the prevailing party costs and reasonable attorney fees at trial and on appeal.  Ex-
cept as provided in subsection (3) of this section:
(a) The judge shall determine the facts in an action under this subsection; and
(b) Upon  any appeal of a judgment in an action under this subsection, the appellate court shall
review the judgment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (3).
(2) An action may be brought under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of:
(a) ORS 10.090, 10.092, 25.337, 25.424, 171.120, 408.230, 408.237 (2), 475B.281, 476.574,  652.020,
652.220, 652.355, 653.060, 653.263, 653.265, 653.547,  653.549, 653.601 to 653.661, 659.852, 659A.030,
659A.040, 659A.043, 659A.046, 659A.063, 659A.069, 659A.082, 659A.088, 659A.103 to  659A.145,
659A.150 to  659A.186, 659A.194, 659A.199, 659A.203, 659A.218, 659A.228, 659A.230, 659A.233,
[10]
HB 4105
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
659A.236, 659A.250 to 659A.262, 659A.277, 659A.290, 659A.300, 659A.306, 659A.309,  659A.315,
659A.318, 659A.320, 659A.355 or 659A.421  or section 7 of this 2018 Act ; or
(b) ORS 653.470, except an action may not be brought for a claim relating to ORS 653.450.
(3) In any action under subsection (1)  of this section alleging a violation of ORS 25.337, 25.424,
652.220, 652.355, 653.547, 653.549,  659.852, 659A.030, 659A.040, 659A.043, 659A.046, 659A.069,
659A.082, 659A.103 to 659A.145, 659A.199,  659A.203, 659A.228, 659A.230, 659A.250 to 659A.262,
659A.290, 659A.318, 659A.355 or 659A.421  or section 7 of this 2018 Act :
(a) The court may award, in addition  to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
compensatory damages or $200, whichever is greater, and punitive damages;
(b) At the request of any party, the action shall be tried to a jury;
(c) Upon appeal of any judgment finding a violation, the appellate court shall review the  judg-
ment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (1); and
(d) Any attorney fee agreement shall be subject to approval by the court.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 31.730, in an action under subsection (1) of this section alleging  a vi-
olation of ORS 652.220, the court may award punitive damages if:
(a) It is proved by clear and convincing evidence that an employer has  engaged in fraud, acted
with malice or acted with willful and wanton misconduct; or
(b) An employer was previously adjudicated in  a proceeding under this section or under ORS
659A.850 for a violation of ORS 652.220.
(5) In any action under subsection (1) of this  section alleging a violation of ORS 653.060, the
court may award, in addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of  this section,
compensatory damages or $200, whichever is greater.
(6) In any action under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS  171.120, 476.574
or 659A.218, the court may award, in addition to  the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this
section, compensatory damages or $250, whichever is greater.
(7) In any action under  subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS 10.090 or 10.092,
the court may award, in  addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section, a civil
penalty in the amount of $720.
(8) Any individual against whom any distinction,  discrimination or restriction on account of
race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, marital status  or age, if the individual
is 18 years of age or older, has been made by any place of public accommodation, as defined in ORS
659A.400, by any employee or person acting on behalf of the place or by  any person aiding or
abetting the place or person in violation of ORS 659A.406 may  bring an action against the operator
or manager of the  place, the employee or person acting on behalf of the place or the aider or abettor
of the place or person. Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, in an  action under this sub-
section:
(a) The court may award, in addition  to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
compensatory and punitive damages;
(b) The operator or manager of the place of  public accommodation, the employee or person
acting on behalf of the place, and any aider or abettor shall  be jointly and severally liable for all
damages awarded in the action;
(c) At the request of any party, the action shall be tried to a jury;
(d) The court shall award reasonable attorney fees to a prevailing plaintiff;
(e) The court may award reasonable attorney  fees and expert witness fees incurred by a de-
fendant who prevails only if the court determines that the  plaintiff had no objectively reasonable
[11]
HB 4105
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
basis for asserting a claim or no  reasonable basis for appealing an adverse decision of a trial court;
and
(f) Upon  any appeal of a judgment under this subsection, the appellate court shall review the
judgment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (1).
(9) When the commissioner or the Attorney General  has reasonable cause to believe that a
person or group of persons is engaged in a pattern or practice of resistance to the rights  protected
by ORS  659A.145 or 659A.421 or federal housing law, or that a group of persons has been denied
any of the rights protected by ORS  659A.145 or 659A.421 or federal housing law, the commissioner
or the  Attorney General may file a civil action on behalf of the aggrieved persons in the same
manner as a person or group of persons may file a civil action  under this section. In a civil action
filed under this subsection, the court may assess against the  respondent, in addition to the relief
authorized under subsections (1) and (3) of this section, a civil penalty:
(a) In an amount not exceeding $50,000 for a first violation; and
(b) In an amount not exceeding $100,000 for any subsequent violation.
(10) In any action under subsection (1) of this section  alleging a violation of ORS 659A.145 or
659A.421 or alleging discrimination under federal housing law, when  the commissioner is pursuing
the action on behalf of an aggrieved complainant, the  court shall award reasonable attorney fees to
the commissioner if the commissioner prevails in the action.  The court may award reasonable at-
torney fees and expert witness fees  incurred by a defendant that prevails in the action if the court
determines that the commissioner had no objectively reasonable basis for asserting the  claim or for
appealing an adverse decision of the trial court.
(11) In an action under subsection (1) or (9)  of this section alleging a violation of ORS 659A.145
or 659A.421 or discrimination under federal housing law:
(a) “Aggrieved person” includes a person who believes that the person:
(A) Has been injured by an unlawful practice or discriminatory housing practice; or
(B) Will be injured by an unlawful practice or discriminatory housing  practice that is about to
occur.
(b) An aggrieved  person in regard to issues to be determined in an action may intervene as of
right in the action. The  Attorney General may intervene in the action if the Attorney General cer-
tifies that the case is  of general public importance. The court may allow an intervenor prevailing
party costs and reasonable attorney fees at trial and on appeal.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 659A.885, as amended by sections 9 and 10,  chapter 197, Oregon Laws 2017,
and section 13, chapter 691, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
659A.885. (1) Any person claiming to be  aggrieved by an unlawful practice specified in sub-
section (2) of this section may file  a civil action in circuit court. In any action under this subsection,
the court may order injunctive relief and any other equitable  relief that may be appropriate, in-
cluding but not limited to reinstatement or the hiring of employees with or without back pay.  A
court may order back pay in an action under this subsection only for the two-year period imme-
diately preceding the filing  of a complaint under ORS 659A.820 with the Commissioner of the Bureau
of Labor and Industries, or  if a complaint was not filed before the action was commenced, the two-
year period immediately preceding the filing of the action.  In any action under this subsection, the
court  may  allow the prevailing party costs and reasonable attorney fees at trial and on appeal. Ex-
cept as provided in subsection (3) of this section:
(a) The judge shall determine the facts in an action under this subsection; and
(b) Upon any appeal of a judgment in an action under this subsection, the appellate court  shall
[12]
HB 4105
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
review the judgment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (3).
(2) An action may be brought under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of:
(a) ORS  10.090, 10.092, 25.337, 25.424, 171.120, 408.230, 408.237 (2), 475B.281, 476.574, 652.020,
652.220, 652.355, 653.060, 653.263, 653.265, 653.547, 653.549,  653.601 to 653.661, 659.852, 659A.030,
659A.040, 659A.043,  659A.046, 659A.063, 659A.069, 659A.082, 659A.088, 659A.103 to 659A.145,
659A.150 to 659A.186, 659A.194, 659A.199, 659A.203, 659A.218, 659A.228, 659A.230,  659A.233,
659A.236, 659A.250  to 659A.262, 659A.277, 659A.290, 659A.300, 659A.306, 659A.309, 659A.315,
659A.318, 659A.320, 659A.355, 659A.357 or 659A.421  or section 7 of this 2018 Act ; or
(b) ORS 653.470, except an action may not be brought for a claim relating to ORS 653.450.
(3) In any action under subsection (1) of this section alleging  a violation of ORS 25.337, 25.424,
652.220, 652.355, 653.547, 653.549, 659.852, 659A.030, 659A.040,  659A.043, 659A.046, 659A.069,
659A.082, 659A.103 to 659A.145, 659A.199, 659A.203, 659A.228,  659A.230, 659A.250 to 659A.262,
659A.290, 659A.318, 659A.355, 659A.357 or 659A.421  or section 7 of this 2018 Act :
(a) The court may award, in addition  to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
compensatory damages or $200, whichever is greater, and punitive damages;
(b) At the request of any party, the action shall be tried to a jury;
(c) Upon  appeal of any judgment finding a violation, the appellate court shall review the judg-
ment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (1); and
(d) Any attorney fee agreement shall be subject to approval by the court.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 31.730, in an action under subsection (1) of this section alleging  a vi-
olation of ORS 652.220, the court may award punitive damages if:
(a) It is proved by clear and convincing evidence that an employer has  engaged in fraud, acted
with malice or acted with willful and wanton misconduct; or
(b) An employer was previously adjudicated in  a proceeding under this section or under ORS
659A.850 for a violation of ORS 652.220.
(5) In any action under subsection (1) of this  section alleging a violation of ORS 653.060, the
court may award, in addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of  this section,
compensatory damages or $200, whichever is greater.
(6) In any action under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS  171.120, 476.574
or 659A.218, the court may award, in addition to  the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this
section, compensatory damages or $250, whichever is greater.
(7) In any action under  subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS 10.090 or 10.092,
the court may award, in  addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section, a civil
penalty in the amount of $720.
(8) Any individual against whom any distinction,  discrimination or restriction on account of
race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, marital status  or age, if the individual
is 18 years of age or older, has been made by any place of public accommodation, as defined in ORS
659A.400, by any employee or person acting on behalf of the place or by  any person aiding or
abetting the place or person in violation of ORS 659A.406 may  bring an action against the operator
or manager of the  place, the employee or person acting on behalf of the place or the aider or abettor
of the place or person. Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, in an  action under this sub-
section:
(a) The court may award, in addition  to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
compensatory and punitive damages;
(b) The operator or manager of the place of  public accommodation, the employee or person
[13]
HB 4105
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
acting on behalf of the place, and any aider or abettor shall  be jointly and severally liable for all
damages awarded in the action;
(c) At the request of any party, the action shall be tried to a jury;
(d) The court shall award reasonable attorney fees to a prevailing plaintiff;
(e) The court may award reasonable attorney  fees and expert witness fees incurred by a de-
fendant who prevails only if the court determines that the  plaintiff had no objectively reasonable
basis for asserting a claim or no  reasonable basis for appealing an adverse decision of a trial court;
and
(f) Upon  any appeal of a judgment under this subsection, the appellate court shall review the
judgment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (1).
(9) When the commissioner or the Attorney General  has reasonable cause to believe that a
person or group of persons is engaged in a pattern or practice of resistance to the rights  protected
by ORS  659A.145 or 659A.421 or federal housing law, or that a group of persons has been denied
any of the rights protected by ORS  659A.145 or 659A.421 or federal housing law, the commissioner
or the  Attorney General may file a civil action on behalf of the aggrieved persons in the same
manner as a person or group of persons may file a civil action  under this section. In a civil action
filed under this subsection, the court may assess against the  respondent, in addition to the relief
authorized under subsections (1) and (3) of this section, a civil penalty:
(a) In an amount not exceeding $50,000 for a first violation; and
(b) In an amount not exceeding $100,000 for any subsequent violation.
(10) In any action under subsection (1) of this section  alleging a violation of ORS 659A.145 or
659A.421 or alleging discrimination under federal housing law, when  the commissioner is pursuing
the action on behalf of an aggrieved complainant, the  court shall award reasonable attorney fees to
the commissioner if the commissioner prevails in the action.  The court may award reasonable at-
torney fees and expert witness fees  incurred by a defendant that prevails in the action if the court
determines that the commissioner had no objectively reasonable basis for asserting the  claim or for
appealing an adverse decision of the trial court.
(11) In an action under subsection (1) or (9)  of this section alleging a violation of ORS 659A.145
or 659A.421 or discrimination under federal housing law:
(a) “Aggrieved person” includes a person who believes that the person:
(A) Has been injured by an unlawful practice or discriminatory housing practice; or
(B) Will be injured by an  unlawful practice or discriminatory housing practice that is about to
occur.
(b) An aggrieved person in regard to issues to be determined in an action may intervene  as of
right in the action. The Attorney General may intervene in the action if  the Attorney General cer-
tifies that the case is of general public importance. The court may  allow an intervenor prevailing
party costs and reasonable attorney fees at trial and on appeal.
SECTION 12.
Sections 1 to 7 of this 2018 Act and the amendments to ORS  657.660, 657.665
and 659A.885 by sections 8 to 11 of this 2018 Act become operative on January 1, 2020.
SECTION 13. (1) The Department of Consumer and Business Services, the Employment
Department, the Oregon Health  Authority and the Department of Revenue may take any
action prior to the operative date specified in section 12 of this 2018 Act  that is necessary
to carry out sections 1 to 6 of this 2018 Act and the amendments to ORS 657.660 and  657.665
by sections 8 and 9  of this 2018 Act on and after the operative date specified in section 12
of this 2018 Act.
[14]
HB 4105
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
(2) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries may take any action  prior
to the operative date specified in section 12 of this 2018 Act  that is necessary to carry out
section 7 of this 2018 Act and the amendments to ORS 659A.885 by sections  10 and 11 of this
2018 Act on and after the operative date specified in section 12 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 14. This 2018 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2018
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[15]