Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Public Defense Services Commission shall conduct a study on methods
of improving the provision of public defense services and present  the results of the study,
along with any recommended legislative changes, in a report to  the interim committees of
the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary in the manner  provided under ORS 192.245
on or before September 15, 2020.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2019 Act is repealed on January 2, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 908