Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made  a part of ORS chapter 468A.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Leaded fuel” means any fuel containing more than 0.05 grams of lead per gallon.
(b) “Racing vehicle” means a vehicle used solely  for competition in sanctioned racing
events.
(2) A person may not use leaded fuel to power  a racing vehicle on the premises of a race
track located within the limits of a city with a population of 500,000 or greater.
(3) The owner or operator of a race track located  within the limits of a city with a pop-
ulation of 500,000 or greater may not permit any person to operate a racing vehicle powered
by leaded fuel on the premises of the race track.
SECTION 3.
(1) Section 2 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Environmental Quality Commission and  the Department of Environmental Qual-
ity may take any action before the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section
that is  necessary for the department or the commission to exercise, on and after the oper-
ative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all  of the duties, functions and powers
conferred on the department and the commission by section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 175