Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the  State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the
biennium beginning July 1,  2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $100,000 for the
purpose of funding programs that award $5  for each take of a pikeminnow, if the take com-
plies with  the wildlife laws. This appropriation is available continuously until expended for
the purpose specified in this section.
SECTION 2. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1969