Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 326.051 is amended to read:
326.051. Subject to ORS 417.300 and 417.305:
(1) In addition to such other duties as are  prescribed by law and pursuant to the requirement
of ORS chapter 183, the State Board of Education shall:
(a) Establish state standards for public kindergartens and public elementary and secondary
schools consistent with the policies stated in ORS 326.011.
(b) Adopt  rules for the general governance of public kindergartens and public elementary and
secondary schools.
(c) Prescribe required or minimum courses of study.
(d) Adopt rules for public kindergartens and public elementary and secondary  schools consistent
with the policy stated in ORS 342.437.
(e) Adopt rules regarding school and interscholastic activities.
(f) Adopt rules that provide that no public elementary  or secondary school shall discriminate in
determining participation in interscholastic activities. As  used in this paragraph, “discrimination”
has the meaning given that term in ORS 659.850.
(g) Adopt rules that will  eliminate the use and purchase of elemental mercury, mercury com-
pounds and mercury-added instructional materials by public elementary and secondary schools.
(2) The State Board of Education may:
(a) Consistent with the laws  of this state, accept money or property not otherwise provided for
under paragraph (b) of this subsection, which is donated for the use or benefit of the  public
kindergartens and public elementary and secondary  schools and use such money or property for the
purpose for which it was donated. Until it is used, the board shall deposit any money received  under
this paragraph in a special fund with the State Treasurer as provided in ORS 293.265 to 293.275.
(b) Apply for federal funds, accept  and enter into any contracts or agreements on behalf of the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1180
HB 3132
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
state for the receipt of funds from the federal government or its agencies and disburse or expend
the federal funds as provided by ORS 327.128. This paragraph applies  to federal funds to be used for:
(A) Educational purposes, including but not limited to any funds  available for the school lunch
program;
(B) Career and technical education programs in public elementary and secondary schools; and
(C) Any  grants available to the state or its political subdivisions for general federal aid for
public kindergartens, public elementary schools and public secondary schools  and their auxiliary
services, improvement of teacher preparation, teacher salaries, construction of school buildings,  ad-
ministration of the Department of  Education and any other educational activities under the juris-
diction of the State Board of Education.
(c) Adopt rules to administer the United States  Department of Agriculture’s National School
Lunch Program and School Breakfast Program for public and  private prekindergarten through grade
12 schools and residential child care facilities.
(3) Any  rules adopted by the State Board of Education in relation to school district
boards and school districts shall be advisory only. The State  Board of Education, the De-
partment of Education and the Superintendent  of Public Instruction are prohibited from
taking any  adverse action against a school district board or a school district for failure to
comply with a rule adopted by the State Board of Education or any other policy or  standard
adopted by the Department of Education.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 326.111 is amended to read:
326.111. (1) The Department of Education is created  and shall function under the direction and
control of the State Board of Education  with the Superintendent of Public Instruction serving as an
administrative officer for public school matters.
(2) The Department of Education shall consist of:
(a) Agencies and officers that are added by law to the Department of Education; and
(b) The administrative organizations  and staffs required for the performance of the department’s
functions.
(3) All administrative functions of the State Board of Education  shall be exercised through the
Department of Education, and the department shall exercise all administrative functions of  the state
relating to the supervision[ , management and control ] of schools not conferred by law on some other
agency.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 332.107 is amended to read:
332.107. Each district school board shall establish rules for the government of  the schools and
pupils. As determined in the discretion of the district school board, the rules shall  be  con-
sistent with the rules of the State Board of Education. If a district rule is not consistent  with a
state rule, the State Board of Education, the Department of Education and the  Superinten-
dent of Public Instruction are prohibited from taking any adverse action  against the district
school board or the school district.
SECTION 4.  ORS 327.103 is amended to read:
327.103. (1)  All school districts are presumed to maintain a standard school district until the
school district has been  found to be deficient by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, pursuant
to standards and rules of the State Board of Education.
[(2) If any deficiencies are not corrected before the beginning of the school year next following  the
date of the finding of deficiency and if an  extension has not been granted under subsection (3) of this
section, the Superintendent of Public Instruction may withhold portions of State School Fund  moneys
[2]
HB 3132
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
otherwise allocated to  the school district for operating expenses until such deficiencies are corrected
unless the withholding would create an undue hardship, as determined pursuant to rules of the State
Board of Education. ]
[(3)(a)] (2)(a) Within 90 days of the finding  of deficiency, a school district found not to be in
compliance shall submit a plan, acceptable to  the Superintendent of Public Instruction, for meeting
standardization requirements. A  team of Department of Education staff shall contact the school
district  and  offer technical assistance. When an acceptable plan for meeting standardization re-
quirements has been submitted, the Superintendent of Public Instruction may  allow an extension of
time before [ withholding moneys] considering the school district to be nonstandard , not to exceed
12 months, if the superintendent determines that such deficiencies cannot be corrected  or removed
before the beginning of the next school year.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  the Superintendent of Public Instruction
may not grant an extension of time if a  school district could correct the deficiency through merger.
(c) For the period  of the extension of time under this subsection, the school district shall be
considered a conditionally standard school district.
[(4)(a) Regardless of whether the Superintendent of Public Instruction has granted  a school district
an extension of time under subsection (3) of this section and  except as provided in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, a school district that fails to submit a plan for  meeting standardization requirements within
the time specified by the superintendent may not receive further State School Fund moneys until a  plan
acceptable to the superintendent is submitted. ]
[(b) Pursuant to  rules adopted by the State Board of Education, the Superintendent of Public In-
struction may extend the time specified for submitting a plan if the superintendent determines that a
human-created disaster or a natural disaster  affects the ability of the school district to comply with the
date requirement. ]
(3) If a school district is found to be nonstandard or conditionally  standard under this
section, the State Board of Education, the Department of Education and  the Superintendent
of Public Instruction are prohibited from taking any adverse action against the school dis-
trict board or the school district.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 328.205 is amended to read:
328.205. (1) Common and union high school districts may contract  a bonded indebtedness for any
one or more of the following purposes for the district:
(a) To acquire, construct, reconstruct, improve, repair, equip or furnish a school building or
school buildings or additions thereto;
(b) To fund or refund the removal or containment of asbestos substances in school buildings  and
for repairs made necessary by such removal or containment;
(c) To acquire or to improve all property, real and personal, to  be used for district purposes,
including school buses;
(d) To fund or refund outstanding indebtedness; and
(e) To provide for the payment of the debt.
(2) However, when a common or union high school district  is found under ORS 327.103 not to
be a standard school  or when a school district is operating a conditionally standard school under
ORS 327.103 [ (3)], the school district may  contract a bonded indebtedness only for the purposes
enumerated in subsection (1) of this section that are  approved by the Superintendent of Public In-
struction pursuant to rules of the State Board of Education.
(3) The  school district may use the proceeds received from the sale of school district bonds to
[3]
HB 3132
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
pay for any costs incurred by the school district in authorizing, issuing, carrying or  repaying the
bonds, including,  but not limited to, attorney, consultant, paying agent, trustee or other professional
fees and the cost of publishing notices of bond elections, printing such bonds and advertising such
bonds for sale.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 336.580 is amended to read:
336.580. (1) Every child at a youth care center, as defined in ORS  420.855, is entitled to receive
appropriate education suited to the needs of the child in the least restrictive environment in which
the child can function  until the child is no longer of compulsory school age or receives a high school
diploma or an equivalent.
(2)(a) Except as provided  by paragraph (b) of this subsection, the school district in which the
youth care center is located shall develop an educational plan for the  children in the youth care
center in consultation with the  director of the center. The plan shall be approved annually by the
school district board.
(b) For  children placed at a youth care center within a detention facility, as defined in ORS
419A.004, the children shall receive educational  services through the Juvenile Detention Education
Program as described in ORS 326.695.
(3) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall have the authority to enforce the provisions
of ORS 336.575 and 339.137 and this section. If a district fails to comply,  the superintendent shall
find the district deficient and shall [ apply the penalty provided in ] find the district nonstandard
under ORS 327.103.
(4) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules to implement this section.
[4]