Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 107.105 is amended to read:
107.105. (1) Whenever the court renders a judgment of marital annulment, dissolution  or sepa-
ration, the court may provide in the judgment:
(a) For the future care and custody, by one party or jointly, of all  minor children of the parties
born, adopted or conceived during the marriage and for minor children born to the  parties prior to
the marriage, as the court may deem just  and proper under ORS 107.137. The court may hold a
hearing to decide the custody issue prior to any other  issues. When appropriate, the court shall
recognize the value of close contact with both parents and encourage joint parental  custody and
joint responsibility for the welfare of the children.
(b)(A) For  parenting time rights of the parent not having custody of such children and for
visitation rights pursuant to a petition filed under ORS 109.119 , consistent with this paragraph .
(B) When a parenting plan has been developed as required by ORS 107.102,  the court shall re-
view the parenting plan and, if approved, incorporate the parenting plan into the court’s  final order.
When incorporated into a final order, the parenting plan is determinative of parenting time rights.
(C) If the parents have been unable to develop a parenting plan or if either of the  parents re-
quests the  court to develop a detailed parenting plan, the court shall develop the parenting plan in
the best interest of the child, ensuring the noncustodial parent sufficient  access to the child to
provide for appropriate quality parenting time and ensuring the safety of the parties, if implicated.
(D) The court shall deny parenting time to a parent under this paragraph if the court finds that
the parent has been convicted of rape under ORS 163.365 or 163.375 or other comparable law of
another jurisdiction and the rape resulted in the conception  of the child. Otherwise, the court may
deny parenting time to the noncustodial parent under this subsection only  if the court finds that
parenting time would endanger the health or safety of the child.
(E) In the case of a noncustodial parent who has a disability as defined by the  Americans with
Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. 12101 et seq.), the court may consider the noncustodial  parent’s
disability in determining parenting time only if the court finds that behaviors or limitations related
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3293
SB 1130
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to the noncustodial parent’s  disability are endangering or will likely endanger the health, safety or
welfare of the child.
(F) The court  shall recognize the value of close contact with both parents and encourage, when
practicable, joint responsibility  for the welfare of such children and extensive contact between the
minor children of the divided marriage and the parties . However,  the court may not award a
noncustodial parent more than 50 percent visiting time .
(G) If the court awards parenting time to  a noncustodial parent who has committed abuse, other
than being convicted for rape as described in  this paragraph, the court shall make adequate pro-
vision for the safety of the child and the other parent in accordance  with the provisions of ORS
107.718 (6).
(c) For the support of  the children of the marriage by the parties. In ordering child support, the
formula established under ORS 25.275  shall apply. The court may at any time require an accounting
from the custodial  parent with reference to the use of the money received as child support. The
court is not required to order support for any minor child who  has become self-supporting,
emancipated or married or for  any child who has ceased to attend school after becoming 18 years
of age. A general judgment entered under this section may include an amount for support as re-
quested in  a petition filed under ORS 107.085 or under a motion for relief made pursuant to ORS
107.095 (1)(b) for which a limited judgment was not entered, payment of which  commences no earlier
than the date the petition or motion was served on the nonrequesting party, and the amount  shall
be considered a request for relief that has been decided by the  general judgment for purposes of
ORS 18.082 (3).
(d) For spousal support, an amount of money  for a period of time as may be just and equitable
for one party to contribute to the other, in gross or in installments or  both. Unless otherwise ex-
pressly provided in the judgment and except  for any unpaid balance of previously ordered spousal
support, liability for the payment of  spousal support shall terminate on the death of either party,
and there shall be no liability for either the payment  of spousal support or for any payment in cash
or property as a substitute  for the payment of spousal support after the death of either party. The
court may approve an agreement for the entry of an order for the  support of a party. A general
judgment entered under this section may include an amount for support as  requested in a petition
filed under ORS 107.085 or under a motion for relief made pursuant to ORS 107.095 (1)(b)  for which
a limited judgment was not entered, payment of which commences no earlier than the  date the pe-
tition or motion was served on the  nonrequesting party, and the amount shall be considered a re-
quest for relief that has been  decided by the general judgment for purposes of ORS 18.082 (3). In
making the spousal support order, the court  shall designate one or more categories of spousal sup-
port and shall make findings of the relevant factors in the decision. The court may order:
(A) Transitional spousal support as needed for a party  to attain education and training neces-
sary to allow the party to prepare for reentry into the job market or for advancement  therein. The
factors to be considered  by the court in awarding transitional spousal support include but are not
limited to:
(i) The duration of the marriage;
(ii) A party’s training and employment skills;
(iii) A party’s work experience;
(iv) The financial needs and resources of each party;
(v) The tax consequences to each party;
(vi) A party’s custodial and child support responsibilities; and
[2]
SB 1130
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(vii) Any other factors the court deems just and equitable.
(B) Compensatory spousal support when there  has been a significant financial or other contri-
bution by one party to  the education, training, vocational skills, career or earning capacity of the
other party and when an order for compensatory spousal support is otherwise just and equitable  in
all of the circumstances. The factors to be considered by the court in awarding  compensatory
spousal support include but are not limited to:
(i) The amount, duration and nature of the contribution;
(ii) The duration of the marriage;
(iii) The relative earning capacity of the parties;
(iv) The extent to which the marital estate has already benefited from the contribution;
(v) The tax consequences to each party; and
(vi) Any other factors the court deems just and equitable.
(C) Spousal maintenance as a contribution by one  spouse to the support of the other for either
a specified or an  indefinite period. The factors to be considered by the court in awarding spousal
maintenance include but are not limited to:
(i) The duration of the marriage;
(ii) The age of the parties;
(iii) The health of the parties, including their physical, mental and emotional condition;
(iv) The standard of living established during the marriage;
(v) The relative income and  earning capacity of the parties, recognizing that the wage earner’s
continuing income may be a basis for support distinct from the income that the  supported spouse
may receive from the distribution of marital property;
(vi) A party’s training and employment skills;
(vii) A party’s work experience;
(viii) The financial needs and resources of each party;
(ix) The tax consequences to each party;
(x) A party’s custodial and child support responsibilities; and
(xi) Any other factors the court deems just and equitable.
(e) For the delivery to one party  of such party’s personal property in the possession or control
of the other at the time of the giving of the judgment.
(f) For the division or other disposition between the parties of the real  or personal property, or
both, of  either or both of the parties as may be just and proper in all the circumstances. In deter-
mining the division of property under this paragraph, the following apply:
(A) A retirement plan or pension or an interest therein shall be considered as property.
(B) The court shall consider the contribution of a party as a homemaker as a contribution  to
the acquisition of marital assets.
(C) Except as provided in  subparagraph (D) of this paragraph, there is a rebuttable presumption
that both parties have contributed equally to  the acquisition of property during the marriage,
whether such property is jointly or separately held.
(D)(i) Property acquired by  gift to one party during the marriage and separately held by that
party on a continuing basis from the time of receipt is  not subject to a presumption of equal con-
tribution under subparagraph (C) of this paragraph.
(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, “property acquired by gift” means  property acquired by
one party through gift, devise, bequest, operation of law, beneficiary designation or inheritance.
(E) Subsequent to the filing of a petition for annulment or dissolution of marriage or  separation,
[3]
SB 1130
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the rights of the parties in the marital assets shall be considered a species of co-ownership,  and a
transfer of marital assets under a judgment of annulment or dissolution of marriage or of  separation
entered on or after October 4, 1977, shall be considered a partitioning of jointly owned property.
(F) The court shall require full disclosure of all assets by the parties in arriving at  a just
property division.
(G) In arriving at a just and proper division of property, the court shall consider reasonable
costs of sale of assets, taxes and any other costs reasonably anticipated by the parties.
(H)(i) If a party  has been awarded spousal support in lieu of a share of property, the court shall
so state on the record and shall order the obligor to provide for and maintain life  insurance in an
amount commensurate with the obligation and  designating the obligee as beneficiary for the dura-
tion of the obligation.
(ii) The obligee or attorney of the obligee shall cause a certified copy of the  judgment to be
delivered to the life insurance company or companies.
(iii) If the obligee or the attorney of the obligee delivers  a true copy of the judgment to the life
insurance  company  or companies, identifying the policies involved and requesting such notification
under this section, the company or companies shall notify the obligee, as  beneficiary of the insur-
ance policy, whenever the policyholder takes any action that will change the  beneficiary or reduce
the benefits of the policy. Either party may request notification by the insurer  when premium pay-
ments have not been made. If the obligor is ordered to provide  for and maintain life insurance, the
obligor shall provide to the obligee a true copy of the  policy. The obligor shall also provide to the
obligee written notice of any action that will reduce the benefits or change the designation  of the
beneficiaries under the policy.
(g) For the creation of trusts as follows:
(A) For the appointment of  one or more trustees to hold, control and manage for the benefit of
the children of the parties, of the marriage or otherwise such of the real or  personal property of
either or both of the parties, as the court may order to  be allocated or appropriated to their support
and welfare, and to collect, receive, expend, manage or invest any sum of money awarded for  the
support and welfare of minor children of the parties.
(B) For the appointment of one or more trustees to hold, manage and control such amount of
money or such real or personal property of either or both  of the parties, as may be set aside, allo-
cated or appropriated for the support of a party.
(C) For the establishment of the terms of the trust and provisions for the disposition or  distrib-
ution of such money or property to or between the parties, their  successors, heirs and assigns after
the purpose of the trust has  been accomplished. Upon petition of a party or a person having an in-
terest in the trust showing a change of circumstances warranting  a change in the terms of the trust,
the court may make and direct reasonable modifications in its terms.
(h) To change the name of either spouse to a name the spouse held before the  marriage. The
court shall order a change if it is requested by the affected party.
(i) For a money award for any sums of money found  to be then remaining unpaid upon any order
or limited judgment entered under ORS 107.095. If a limited judgment was entered under  ORS
107.095, the limited judgment shall continue to be enforceable for any  amounts not paid under the
limited judgment unless those amounts are included  in the money award made by the general judg-
ment.
(j) For an award of reasonable attorney fees and costs and expenses reasonably incurred in  the
action in favor of a party or in favor of a party’s attorney.
[4]
SB 1130
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) In determining the proper amount of support and the proper  division of property under sub-
section  (1)(c),  (d) and (f) of this section, the court may consider evidence of the tax consequences
on the parties of its proposed judgment.
(3) Upon the filing of the  judgment, the property division ordered shall be deemed effective for
all purposes. This transfer by judgment, which shall affect solely owned property transferred to the
other spouse as well as commonly owned property  in the same manner as would a declaration of a
resulting trust in favor of the spouse to whom the property is awarded, is not a taxable sale  or ex-
change.
(4) If an appeal  is taken from a judgment of annulment or dissolution of marriage or of sepa-
ration or from any part of a judgment rendered in pursuance of the provisions of ORS  107.005 to
107.086, 107.095, 107.105, 107.115 to 107.174, 107.405, 107.425, 107.445 to 107.520, 107.540 and 107.610,
the court rendering the judgment may provide in a supplemental judgment for any relief  provided
for in ORS 107.095 and shall provide that  the relief granted in the judgment is to be in effect only
during the pendency of the appeal. A supplemental judgment under this  subsection may be enforced
as provided in ORS 33.015 to 33.155 and ORS chapter 18. A supplemental  judgment under this sub-
section may be appealed in the same manner as provided for supplemental judgments  modifying a
domestic relations judgment under ORS 19.275.
(5) If an appeal is taken from the judgment or other appealable order in  a suit for annulment
or dissolution of a marriage or for separation and the  appellate court awards costs and disburse-
ments to a  party, the court may also award to that party, as part of the costs, such additional sum
of money as it may adjudge reasonable as an attorney fee on the appeal.
(6) If, as a result of a suit for the annulment or dissolution of a marriage or for  separation, the
parties to such suit  become owners of an undivided interest in any real or personal property, or
both, either party may maintain supplemental proceedings by filing a petition in such suit for  the
partition  of  such real or personal property, or both, within two years from the entry of the judgment,
showing among other things  that the original parties to the judgment and their joint or several
creditors having a lien upon any such real or personal property,  if any there be, constitute the sole
and only necessary parties  to such supplemental proceedings. The procedure in the supplemental
proceedings, so far as applicable, shall be the procedure provided in ORS  105.405 for the partition
of real property, and the court granting the judgment shall have in the first instance and retain
jurisdiction in equity therefor.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 107.434 is amended to read:
107.434. (1) The presiding judge of  each judicial district shall establish an expedited parenting
time enforcement procedure that may or may not include a  requirement for mediation or partic-
ipation in an alternative dispute resolution conference  under ORS 107.103. The procedure must be
easy to understand and initiate. Unless the parties  otherwise agree or an alternative dispute resol-
ution conference under ORS 107.103  is scheduled, the court shall conduct a hearing no later than
45 days after the filing of a motion seeking enforcement of a parenting time order. The court shall
provide forms for:
(a) A motion filed by either party alleging a violation of parenting time or substantial  violations
of the parenting plan. When a person files this form, the person must include a copy of  the order
establishing the parenting time.
(b) An order requiring the parties to appear and show  cause why parenting time should not be
enforced in a specified manner. The party filing the motion shall  serve a copy of the motion and
the order  on the other party in the manner provided by law for service of a summons. The order
[5]
SB 1130
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
must include:
(A) A notice of the remedies imposable under  subsection (2) of this section and the availability
of a waiver of any mediation requirement; and
(B) A notice in substantially the following form:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
When pleaded and shown in a separate legal action, violation of  court orders, including
visitation and parenting time orders, may also result  in a finding of contempt, which can lead to
fines, imprisonment or other penalties, including compulsory community service.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(c) A motion, supported by an affidavit or  a declaration under penalty of perjury in the form
required by ORCP 1 E, and an order  that may be filed by either party and providing for waiver of
any mediation requirement on a showing of good cause.
(2) In addition to any other remedy the court may impose  to enforce the provisions of a judg-
ment relating to the parenting plan, the court may:
(a) Modify the provisions relating to the parenting plan by:
(A) Specifying a detailed parenting time schedule;
(B) Imposing additional terms and conditions on the existing parenting time schedule; or
(C) Ordering additional parenting time, in the best interests  of the child, to compensate for
wrongful deprivation of parenting time;
(b) Order the party who is violating the parenting plan provisions to post bond or security;
(c) Order either  or both parties to attend counseling or educational sessions that focus on the
impact of violation of the parenting plan on children;
(d) Award the prevailing party expenses,  including, but not limited to, attorney fees, filing fees
and court costs, incurred in enforcing the party’s parenting plan;
(e) Terminate, suspend or modify spousal support;
(f) Terminate, suspend or modify child support as provided in ORS 107.431; [ or]
(g) Schedule a hearing for modification of custody as provided in ORS 107.135 (11) ; or
(h) Appoint an individual or a panel or designate a program, as described in ORS 107.425
(3)(a), to assist the parties with implementing the parenting plan .
(3) In addition to any other remedy the court may impose to enforce  the provisions of a
judgment relating to a parenting plan, if the court finds that parenting time is not occurring
as required in the parenting plan, the court shall:
(a) Impose remedies  to ensure the parenting plan is immediately followed, regardless of
whether the court finds that the deprivation of parenting time is wrongful; and
(b) If the court finds that  a party has been deprived of over 21 consecutive days of
scheduled parenting time:
(A) Order additional parenting time, immediately effective, to compensate for  the de-
prived days of parenting time; and
(B) Order the other party to post bond in the minimum amount of $1,000.
(4) The court may only deny a party parenting time under this section if the  court finds
that ordering the parenting time would endanger the health or safety of the child  or the
court finds that the party wrongfully deprived the other party of  more than 21 consecutive
days of scheduled parenting time.
[6]
SB 1130
1
2
3
4
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 107.105 and 107.434 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025
Act apply to parenting time ordered or remedies imposed on or  after the effective date of
this 2025 Act.
[7]