Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A person commits the crime of threatening a mass injury event if:
(a) The person intentionally causes fear, alarm or terror in  another person by conveying
a threat to cause unlawful serious physical injury or death to four or more  persons at a
school, place of worship, health care  facility, place of business, government building, mass
transit facility, park, plaza, event space or other place of assembly;
(b) The person expresses the intent to imminently carry out the threat; and
(c) A reasonable person would:
(A) Be placed in fear, alarm or terror by the threat; and
(B) Believe that the threat  was credible and presents a reasonable likelihood of
imminently being carried out.
(2)(a) Threatening a mass injury event is a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  threatening a mass injury event is
a Class C felony if the person has one or more convictions under this section at the time  the
offense is committed.
(c) The Oregon Criminal  Justice Commission shall classify threatening a mass injury
event under paragraph (a) of this subsection as a person  Class A misdemeanor under the
rules of the commission.
(d) The commission shall classify threatening a mass injury  event under paragraph (b)
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 200
HB 4135
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of this subsection as a person felony under the rules of the commission.
(3) A threat under this section may be conveyed orally, in writing or telephonically,  or
may be an electronic threat as defined in ORS 166.065.
(4) For purposes of pretrial release, plea negotiations and sentencing, the victim  of an
offense under this section includes both the person to whom the  threat is conveyed and the
persons against whom the threat is made.
(5) When a court imposes  sentence on a person convicted under this section who was
under 18 years of age at the time of the offense, but who was not subject to  the jurisdiction
of the juvenile court under ORS 419C.005 due to the person attaining 18 years of age  prior
to the  commencement of prosecution, the court shall consider the age of the person at the
time of the offense as a mitigating circumstance.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 166.250 is amended to read:
166.250. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section or ORS 166.260, 166.270,  166.273,
166.274, 166.291, 166.292 or 166.410 to 166.470, a person commits the  crime of unlawful possession
of a firearm if the person knowingly:
(a) Carries any firearm concealed upon the person;
(b) Possesses a handgun that is concealed and readily accessible to the person within any vehi-
cle;
(c) Possesses a firearm and:
(A) Is under 18 years of age;
(B)(i) While a minor, was found to be within the jurisdiction of  the juvenile court for having
committed an act which, if committed by an adult, would constitute a felony or a  misdemeanor in-
volving violence, as defined in ORS 166.470; and
(ii) Was discharged  from the jurisdiction of the juvenile court within four years prior to being
charged under this section;
(C) Has been convicted of a felony;
(D) Was committed to the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 426.130;
(E) Was found to  be a person with mental illness and subject to an order under ORS 426.130 that
the person be prohibited from purchasing or possessing a firearm as a result of that mental illness;
(F) Is presently subject to an order under ORS 426.133 prohibiting the person from  purchasing
or possessing a firearm;
(G) Has been found guilty except for insanity under ORS 161.295 of a felony; [ or]
(H) The possession of the firearm by the person is prohibited under ORS 166.255; or
(I) Has been convicted of threatening a mass injury event under section 1  of this 2024
Act; or
(d) Possesses an unfinished frame or receiver and is prohibited from possessing  firearms under
paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(2) This section does not prohibit:
(a) A minor,  who is not otherwise prohibited under subsection (1)(c) of this section, from pos-
sessing a firearm:
(A) Other than a handgun, if the firearm was transferred to the minor by the minor’s parent  or
guardian or by another person with the consent of the minor’s parent or guardian; or
(B) Temporarily for hunting, target practice or any other lawful purpose; or
(b) Any citizen of the United States over the age of 18  years who resides in or is temporarily
sojourning within this state, and who is  not within the excepted classes prescribed by ORS 166.270
[2]
HB 4135
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and subsection (1) of this section, from owning, possessing  or keeping within the person’s place of
residence or place of business any handgun, and no permit or license to purchase, own,  possess or
keep any such firearm at the person’s place of residence or place of  business is required of any such
citizen. As used in this subsection, “residence” includes a  recreational vessel or recreational vehicle
while used, for whatever period of time, as residential quarters.
(3) Firearms carried openly in  belt holsters are not concealed within the meaning of this section.
(4)(a) Except as provided in paragraphs  (b) and (c) of this subsection, a handgun is readily ac-
cessible within the meaning of this section if the handgun is within  the passenger compartment of
the vehicle.
(b) If a vehicle,  other than a vehicle described in paragraph (c) of this subsection, has no storage
location that is outside the passenger  compartment of the vehicle, a handgun is not readily acces-
sible within the meaning of this section if:
(A) The handgun is stored  in a closed and locked glove compartment, center console or other
container; and
(B) The key is not inserted into the lock,  if the glove compartment, center console or other
container unlocks with a key.
(c) If the vehicle  is a motorcycle, an all-terrain vehicle or a snowmobile, a handgun is not
readily accessible within the meaning of this section if:
(A) The handgun is in a locked container within or affixed to the vehicle; or
(B) The handgun is equipped with a trigger lock or  other locking mechanism that prevents the
discharge of the firearm.
(5) Unlawful possession of a firearm is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 166.274 is amended to read:
166.274. (1) Except  as provided in subsection (11) of this section, a person barred from possessing
or receiving  a firearm may file a petition for relief from the bar in accordance with subsection (2)
of this section if:
(a) The person is barred from possessing a firearm under  ORS 166.250 (1)(c)(A), (C) , [ or] (H)  or
(I) or 166.270; or
(b) The person is barred from receiving a firearm under ORS 166.470 (1)(a) or (b)  or, if the per-
son has been convicted of a misdemeanor involving violence, ORS 166.470 (1)(g).
(2) A petition for relief described in this section must be filed in the circuit court in the
petitioner’s county of residence.
(3) A person may apply once per calendar year for relief under the provisions of this section.
(4)(a) A person petitioning for relief under this section shall serve a copy of the petition on:
(A) The city chief of police if the court in which the petition is filed is located in a city; or
(B) The sheriff of the county in which the court is located.
(b) The copy of the petition shall be served on the chief of police or sheriff at the  same time the
petition is filed at the court.
(5)(a) When a petition is denied,  the judge shall cause that information to be entered into the
Department of State Police computerized criminal history files.
(b) When a petition is  granted, the judge shall cause that information and a fingerprint card of
the petitioner to be entered into the  Department of State Police computerized criminal history files.
If, after a petition is granted,  the petitioner is arrested and convicted of a crime that would dis-
qualify the petitioner from purchasing or possessing a firearm, the Department  of State Police shall
notify the court that granted relief under this section. The  court shall review the order granting
[3]
HB 4135
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
relief and determine whether to rescind the order.  The Department of State Police may charge a
reasonable fee, under ORS 192.324, for  the entry and maintenance of information under this section.
(6) Notwithstanding the  provisions of ORS 9.320, a party that is not a natural person, the state
or any city, county, district or other political subdivision or  public corporation in this state, without
appearance by attorney, may appear as a party to an action under this section.
(7) If the petitioner seeks relief from the bar on possessing or purchasing a firearm, relief shall
be granted when the petitioner demonstrates, by clear  and convincing evidence, that the petitioner
does not pose a threat to the safety of the public or the petitioner.
(8) Petitions filed under  this section shall be heard and disposed of within 15 judicial days of
filing or as soon as is practicable thereafter, but not more than 30 days thereafter.  The judge shall
then make findings and conclusions and issue a judgment based on the findings and  conclusions in
accordance with the requirements of law.
(9) A person filing a petition  under this section must pay the filing fee established under ORS
21.135.
(10)(a) Initial appeals of petitions shall be heard de novo.
(b) Any party to  a judgment under this subsection may appeal to the Court of Appeals in the
same manner as for any other civil action.
(c) If  the governmental entity files an appeal under this subsection and does not prevail, it shall
be ordered to pay the attorney fees for the prevailing party.
(11) The court may not grant relief under this section to a person who:
(a) Has been convicted of a  person felony, as that term is defined in the rules of the Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission, or the statutory counterpart to a person felony  in any other jurisdic-
tion, if the offense involved the use of a firearm or a deadly weapon as defined in ORS 161.015;
(b) Has been convicted of an offense listed in ORS 137.700 or the statutory counterpart  to an
offense listed in ORS 137.700 in any other jurisdiction; or
(c) Is currently  serving a felony sentence as defined in ORS 10.030 or has served a felony sen-
tence in the one-year period preceding the filing of the petition.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 423.478 is amended to read:
423.478. (1) The Department of Corrections shall:
(a) Operate prisons for offenders sentenced to terms of incarceration for more than 12 months;
(b) Provide central information and data services sufficient to:
(A) Allow tracking of offenders; and
(B) Permit analysis of correlations between sanctions, supervision, services  and programs, and
future criminal conduct; and
(c) Provide interstate compact administration and jail inspections.
(2) Subject to ORS 423.483, each county, in partnership with the department, shall assume  re-
sponsibility for community-based supervision, sanctions and  services for offenders convicted of felo-
nies, designated drug-related misdemeanors , [ or] designated person misdemeanors or threatening a
mass injury event under section 1 (2)(a) of this 2024 Act,  who are:
(a) On parole;
(b) On probation;
(c) On post-prison supervision;
(d) Sentenced, on or after January 1, 1997, to 12 months or less incarceration;
(e) Sanctioned, on or after January  1, 1997, by a court or the State Board of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision to 12 months or less incarceration for violation of a condition  of parole, pro-
[4]
HB 4135
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
bation or post-prison supervision; or
(f) On conditional release under ORS 420A.206.
(3) Notwithstanding the  fact that the court has sentenced a person to a term of incarceration,
when an offender is committed to the custody of the supervisory authority of a county  under ORS
137.124 (2) or (4),  the supervisory authority may execute the sentence by imposing sanctions other
than incarceration if deemed appropriate by  the supervisory authority. If the supervisory authority
releases a person from custody under this subsection and the  person is required to report as a sex
offender under ORS  163A.010, the supervisory authority, as a condition of release, shall order the
person to report to the Department of State Police, a city police department or a  county sheriff’s
office or to the supervising agency, if any:
(a) When the person is released;
(b) Within 10 days of a change of residence;
(c) Once each year within 10 days of the person’s birth date;
(d) Within 10 days of the first  day the person works at, carries on a vocation at or attends an
institution of higher education; and
(e) Within 10 days of a change in work, vocation or attendance  status at an institution of higher
education.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Attends,” “institution  of higher education,” “works” and “carries on a vocation” have the
meanings given those terms in ORS 163A.005.
(b) “Designated drug-related misdemeanor” means:
(A) Unlawful possession of fentanyl under ORS 475.752 (8)(a);
(B) Unlawful possession of methadone under ORS 475.824 (2)(b);
(C) Unlawful possession of oxycodone under ORS 475.834 (2)(b);
(D) Unlawful possession of heroin under ORS 475.854 (2)(b);
(E) Unlawful possession of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine under ORS 475.874 (2)(b);
(F) Unlawful possession of cocaine under ORS 475.884 (2)(b); or
(G) Unlawful possession of methamphetamine under ORS 475.894 (2)(b).
(c) “Designated person misdemeanor” means:
(A) Assault in the fourth degree constituting domestic violence if the judgment document  is as
described in ORS 163.160 (4);
(B) Menacing constituting  domestic violence if the judgment document is as described in ORS
163.190 (3); or
(C) Sexual abuse in the third degree under ORS 163.415.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 423.483 is amended to read:
423.483. (1)(a) The baseline funding for biennia beginning after June 30, 1999, is the current
service level for the expenses of providing management, support services,  supervision and sanctions
for offenders described in ORS 423.478 (2).  At a minimum, each biennium’s appropriation must be
established at this baseline.
(b) The baseline funding described in paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) May not be decreased as a result of a reduction under ORS 137.633.
(B) May  not be increased as a result of community-based sanctions, services and programs that
are funded under section 53, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013.
(2) If the total state community corrections  appropriation is less than the baseline calculated
under subsection  (1) of this section, a county may discontinue participation by written notification
[5]
HB 4135
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to the director 180 days prior to implementation of the change. If a  county discontinues partic-
ipation, the responsibility for correctional services transferred to the  county and the portion of
funding made available to the county under ORS 423.530  revert to the Department of Corrections.
Responsibility for supervision of and provision of correctional services to misdemeanor  offenders
does not revert to the department under  any circumstances except those of offenders convicted of
designated drug-related misdemeanors , [or] designated person misdemeanors  or threatening  a mass
injury event under section 1 (2)(a) of this 2024 Act .
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Current service level” means  the calculated cost of continuing current legislatively funded
programs, phased in programs and increased caseloads  minus one-time costs, decreased caseloads,
phased out programs and pilot programs with the remainder adjusted for inflation  as determined by
the Legislative Assembly in its biennial appropriation to the Department of Corrections.
(b) “Designated drug-related misdemeanor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 423.478.
(c) “Designated person misdemeanor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 423.478.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 423.483, as amended by section 22, chapter 649, Oregon Laws 2013,  section
3, chapter 140, Oregon Laws 2015, and section 2, chapter 341, Oregon Laws 2023, is  amended to
read:
423.483. (1)(a) The baseline funding for biennia beginning after June 30, 1999, is the current
service level for the expenses of providing management, support services,  supervision and sanctions
for offenders described in ORS 423.478 (2).  At a minimum, each biennium’s appropriation must be
established at this baseline.
(b) The baseline funding described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may  not be decreased as
a result of a reduction under ORS 137.633.
(2) If the total state community corrections  appropriation is less than the baseline calculated
under subsection  (1) of this section, a county may discontinue participation by written notification
to the director 180 days prior to implementation of the change. If a  county discontinues partic-
ipation, the responsibility for correctional services transferred to the  county and the portion of
funding made available to the county under ORS 423.530  revert to the Department of Corrections.
Responsibility for supervision of and provision of correctional services to misdemeanor  offenders
does not revert to the department under  any circumstances except those of offenders convicted of
designated drug-related misdemeanors , [or] designated person misdemeanors  or threatening  a mass
injury event under section 1 (2)(a) of this 2024 Act .
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Current service level” means  the calculated cost of continuing current legislatively funded
programs, phased in programs and increased caseloads  minus one-time costs, decreased caseloads,
phased out programs and pilot programs with the remainder adjusted for inflation  as determined by
the Legislative Assembly in its biennial appropriation to the Department of Corrections.
(b) “Designated drug-related misdemeanor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 423.478.
(c) “Designated person misdemeanor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 423.478.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 423.525 is amended to read:
423.525. (1) A county, group of counties  or intergovernmental corrections entity shall apply to
the Director of the Department of Corrections in a manner and form prescribed by  the director for
funding made  available under ORS 423.500 to 423.560. The application shall include a community
corrections plan. The  Department of Corrections shall provide consultation and technical assistance
to counties to aid in the development and implementation of community corrections plans.
[6]
HB 4135
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2)(a) From July 1, 1995, until June 30, 1999, a county, group of counties  or intergovernmental
corrections entity may make  application requesting funding for the construction, acquisition, ex-
pansion or remodeling of correctional facilities to serve the county, group  of counties or intergov-
ernmental corrections entity. The department shall review the application  for funding of
correctional facilities in accordance with criteria that consider design, cost,  capacity, need, operat-
ing efficiency and viability based on the county’s, group  of counties’ or intergovernmental cor-
rections entity’s ability to provide for ongoing operations.
(b)(A) If the application is approved, the department shall present the application  with a request
to finance the facility with financing agreements to the  State Treasurer and the Director of the
Oregon Department of  Administrative Services. Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (B)
of this paragraph, upon approval of the request by the State Treasurer and the Director  of the
Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, the facility may be financed with financing agree-
ments, and certificates of participation issued pursuant thereto, as provided in ORS 283.085 to
283.092. All decisions approving or denying applications and requests  for financing under this sec-
tion are final. No such decision is subject to judicial review of any kind.
(B) If requests to finance county correctional facility projects are  submitted after February 22,
1996, and the requests have not been approved by the department on  the date a session of the
Legislative Assembly convenes, the requests are also  subject to the approval of the Legislative As-
sembly.
(c) After approval but prior to the solicitation of bids or proposals for the  construction of a
project, the county, group of counties or intergovernmental corrections entity and  the department
shall enter into a written agreement that determines the procedures, and  the parties responsible, for
the awarding of contracts and the administration of the  construction project for the approved
correctional facility. If the  parties are unable to agree on the terms of the written agreement, the
Governor shall decide the terms of the agreement. The Governor’s decision is final.
(d) After approval of a construction project, the administration of the  project shall be conducted
as provided in the agreement required  by paragraph (c) of this subsection. The agreement must re-
quire at a  minimum that the county, group of counties or intergovernmental corrections entity shall
submit to the department any change order or alteration of the design  of the project that, singly or
in the aggregate, reduces the capacity of the correctional facility or materially changes  the services
or functions of the project. The change order or alteration is  not effective until approved by the
department. In reviewing the change order or alteration,  the department shall consider whether the
implementation of the change order or alteration  will have any material adverse impact on the
parties to any financing agreements or the holders of any certificates of participation issued to fund
county correctional facilities under this section. In  making its decision, the department may rely on
the opinions of the Department of Justice, bond counsel or professional financial advisers.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 283.085,  for purposes of this section, “financing agreement” means a
lease purchase agreement, an installment sale agreement, a loan  agreement or any other agreement
to finance a correctional facility described in this section,  or to refinance a previously executed fi-
nancing agreement  for the financing of a correctional facility. The state is not required to own or
operate a correctional facility in order to finance it under ORS 283.085 to  283.092 and this section.
The state,  an intergovernmental corrections entity, county or group of counties may enter into any
agreements, including, but not limited to, leases  and subleases, that are reasonably necessary or
generally accepted by the financial community for purposes of  acquiring or securing financing as
authorized by this section. In  financing county correctional facilities under this section, “property
[7]
HB 4135
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
rights” as used in ORS 283.085 includes leasehold mortgages of the state’s  rights under leases of
correctional facilities from counties.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, county  charter or ordinance, a county may
convey or lease to the State of Oregon, acting by and through the  Department of Corrections, title
to interests in, or a lease of, any real property, facilities or personal property owned by  the county
for the purpose of financing  the construction, acquisition, expansion or remodeling of a correctional
facility. Upon the payment of all principal and  interest on, or upon any other satisfaction of, the
financing agreement used  to finance the construction, acquisition, expansion or remodeling of a
correctional facility, the state  shall reconvey its interest in, or terminate and surrender its leasehold
of, the property or facilities, including the financed construction, acquisition, expansion or remod-
eling, to the county.  In addition to any authority granted by ORS 283.089, for the purposes of ob-
taining financing, the state may enter into agreements under which the state may grant to  trustees
or lenders leases, subleases and other security interests in county property conveyed  or leased to
the state under this subsection and in the property or facilities financed by financing agreements.
(5) In connection with the financing of correctional facilities, the  Director of the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services may  bill the Department of Corrections, and the Department
of Corrections shall pay the amounts billed, in the same manner as provided in ORS 283.089. As
required by ORS  283.091, the Department of Corrections and the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services shall include in the Governor’s  budget all amounts that will be due in each fiscal
period under financing agreements for correctional facilities. Amounts payable by  the state under
a financing agreement for the construction, acquisition, expansion or remodeling of  a correctional
facility are limited to available funds as defined in ORS 283.085, and no lender, trustee, certificate
holder or  county has any claim or recourse against any funds of the state other than available funds.
(6) The director shall adopt rules that may  be necessary for the administration, evaluation and
implementation of ORS 423.500 to 423.560. The standards shall be sufficiently flexible  to foster the
development of new and improved supervision  or rehabilitative practices and maximize local control.
(7) When a county assumes responsibility under ORS 423.500 to 423.560 for  correctional services
previously provided by the department, the county and the  department shall enter into an inter-
governmental agreement that includes a local community corrections plan consisting  of program
descriptions, budget allocation, performance objectives and methods of evaluating each  correctional
service to be provided by  the county. The performance objectives must include in dominant part
reducing future criminal  conduct. The methods of evaluating services must include, to the extent
of available information systems resources, the collection and  analysis of data sufficient to deter-
mine the apparent effect of the services on future criminal conduct.
(8) All community corrections plans shall comply with rules adopted pursuant to  ORS 423.500
to 423.560, and shall include but  need not be limited to an outline of the basic structure and the
supervision, services and local sanctions to be applied to offenders convicted  of felonies, designated
drug-related misdemeanors , [ and] designated person misdemeanors and threatening a mass injury
event under section 1 (2)(a) of this 2024 Act  who are:
(a) On parole;
(b) On probation;
(c) On post-prison supervision;
(d) Sentenced, on or after January 1, 1997, to 12 months or less incarceration;
(e) Sanctioned, on or after January  1, 1997, by a court or the State Board of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision to 12 months or less incarceration for a violation of a condition of  parole, pro-
[8]
HB 4135
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
bation or post-prison supervision; and
(f) On conditional release under ORS 420A.206.
(9) All community corrections plans shall designate a community  corrections manager of the
county or counties and shall provide that  the administration of community corrections under ORS
423.500 to 423.560 shall be under such manager.
(10) No amendment to or modification of a county-approved  community corrections plan shall
be placed  in effect without prior notice to the director for purposes of statewide data collection and
reporting.
(11) The obligation of the  state to provide funding and the scheduling for providing funding of
a project  approved under this section is dependent upon the ability of the state to access public
security markets to sell financing agreements.
(12) No later than January 1 of each odd-numbered year, the Department of Corrections shall:
(a) Evaluate the community corrections policy established in ORS 423.475, 423.478,  423.483 and
423.500 to 423.560; and
(b) Assess the effectiveness of local revocation options.
(13) As used in this section, “designated  drug-related misdemeanor” and “designated person
misdemeanor” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 423.478.
SECTION 8.
Beginning no  later than January 1, 2027, and biennially thereafter, the
Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall report to the  relevant interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly, in the manner described in ORS 192.245, concerning the following  in-
formation pertaining to the previous biennium:
(1) The number of persons  charged with threatening a mass injury event under section
1 of this 2024 Act, disaggregated by race, age, ethnicity, gender, disability and county;
(2) To the degree practicable, the number of persons who were  victims of the offense
described in section 1 of this 2024 Act or  who were otherwise targeted by a person convicted
under section 1 of this 2024 Act, disaggregated by race, age, ethnicity, gender,  disability and
county; and
(3) The amount of  moneys distributed to and expended by the Oregon Youth Authority
and county juvenile departments for the costs of detaining and supervising persons found  to
be within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court under ORS 419C.005 for committing  an act
that, if committed by an adult, would constitute an offense under section 1 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 9.  ORS 161.005 is amended to read:
161.005. ORS 161.005 to 161.055,  161.065, 161.085 to 161.125, 161.150 to 161.175, 161.190 to
161.275, 161.290 to 161.373, 161.405 to 161.485, 161.505 to 161.585, 161.605, 161.615 to 161.685, 161.705
to 161.737, 162.005, 162.015 to 162.035,  162.055 to 162.115, 162.135 to 162.205, 162.225 to 162.375,
162.405 to 162.425, 162.465,  163.005, 163.095, 163.107, 163.115, 163.125 to 163.145, 163.149, 163.160 to
163.208, 163.191, 163.196, 163.215 to  163.257, 163.261, 163.263, 163.264, 163.266, 163.275, 163.285,
163.305 to 163.467, 163.429,  163.432, 163.433, 163.472, 163.505 to 163.575, 163.665 to 163.693, 163.700,
163.701, 163.715, 164.005, 164.015 to 164.135, 164.138, 164.140, 164.205 to 164.270,  164.305 to 164.377,
164.395 to 164.415,  164.805, 164.857, 164.886, 165.002 to 165.102, 165.109, 165.118, 165.805, 165.815,
166.005 to 166.095, 166.119, 166.125, 166.128, 166.350, 166.382, 166.384, 166.660, 167.002  to 167.027,
167.057, 167.060 to 167.100, 167.117, 167.122 to 167.162, 167.203 to 167.252,  167.310 to 167.340, 167.350,
167.810 and 167.820 and section 1 of this  2024 Act  shall be known and may be cited as Oregon
Criminal Code of 1971.
SECTION 10. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2024
[9]
HB 4135
1
2
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[10]