Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 3, chapter 85, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) The Office of Emergency Management shall develop a grant program [ for the dis-
bursement of moneys from the Fuel Storage Facility Compatibility Fund ] for the purpose  of installing
generator connectors on fuel sources at cardlock facilities in this state.
(2) Pursuant to the grant program:
(a) The office may solicit and  receive applications for grants from owners or operators of
cardlock  facilities  in this state. The office shall establish standards for the qualification of appli-
cants.
(b) The office shall  establish criteria by which to determine which applicants will receive grants,
with the goal of maximizing the availability  of fuel to emergency response personnel in the case of
emergency.
(c) The office shall enter into agreements with grant recipients that require grant  recipients to
install generator connectors on cardlock facilities.
(d) The  office shall specify one or more types of generator connectors that a grant recipient
must install. In specifying types of generator connectors, the office shall consult with the Depart-
ment of Transportation and the State  Fire Marshal and shall have the goal of maximizing the com-
patibility of cardlock facilities in  this state with generators possessed or controlled by the office, the
department and the Oregon National Guard.
(e) The office may not issue grants in excess of  $4,000 per cardlock facility. [ The total amount
of grants issued may not exceed $100,000. ]
(3) The office shall adopt rules to administer and implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Military Department, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $100,000  for deposit in the Fuel Storage Facility Compatibility
Fund established under section 1, chapter 85, Oregon Laws 2016.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2660
SB 235
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
SECTION 3. Any actions before the effective  date of this 2019 Act that would have been
valid under section 3, chapter 85, Oregon Laws 2016, as amended by section 1 of this 2019
Act, are validated.
SECTION 4.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
[2]