Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Commission on Autism Spectrum Disorder is established.
(2) The commission consists of 17 members as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall  appoint one member from among the members of
the Senate;
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from  among
the members of the House of Representatives;
(c) The Governor shall appoint:
(A) Two members, each of whom is either a parent of an individual diagnosed with autism
spectrum disorder or an individual with autism spectrum disorder;
(B) Two members who represent health care providers  who are licensed or otherwise
authorized to provide services to individuals with autism spectrum disorder;
(C) One member who represents autism or disability advocacy organizations;
(D) One member who represents the medical community in this state;
(E) One member who represents health insurers;
(F) One member who represents the mental health care community;
(G) One member who represents higher education;
(H) One member who represents a local education entity;
(I) One member who represents the Department of Education;
(J) One member who represents the Department of Human Services;
(K) One member who represents the Oregon Health Authority  and who is recommended
by the Director of the Oregon Health Authority; and
(L) Two members at large who represent the public  or who provide expertise helpful to
the commission, and who  may include a representative of housing, early learning, first
responders or justice.
(3) The members  of the commission must be residents of this state who are knowledge-
able about autism spectrum disorder or systems that serve  individuals with autism spectrum
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 850
HB 2542
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
disorder.
(4) The term of office of each member of the commission is two years, but a member
serves at the pleasure of the appointing authority. A member may serve  up to two terms,
except that the members described in subsection (2)(c)(I),  (J) and (K) of this section may
serve for an unlimited number of terms and may assign a  representative to attend meetings
of the commission as needed. Before the expiration of the term of a member,  the appointing
authority shall appoint a successor whose term begins on January 1 next following. A  mem-
ber is eligible for reappointment. If there is  a vacancy for any cause, the appointing au-
thority shall make an appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(5) The appointment of each member of the commission is subject to confirmation by the
Senate in the manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
(6) The Governor shall select  one member of the commission as chairperson and another
as vice chairperson, for terms and with duties and powers necessary for the performance of
the functions of the offices as the  commission determines. The chairperson shall establish
an agenda for the commission and provide leadership and direction.
(7) A majority of  the members of the commission constitutes a quorum for the trans-
action of business.
(8) The commission shall meet at  least once every three months at a time and place de-
termined by the chairperson or the Governor. The commission also may meet at other times
and places specified by the call  of the chairperson, the Governor or a majority of the mem-
bers of the commission.
(9) The commission may establish subcommittees as the commission determines neces-
sary.
(10) The Department of Education, the Department of Human Services and  the Oregon
Health Authority shall provide staff support and other support necessary  to facilitate the
duties and the activities of the commission, subject to the availability of funding.
(11) The commission may accept gifts, grants or contributions from any source.  Any
moneys received by the commission shall be deposited in the Oregon  Commission on Autism
Spectrum Disorder Account established under section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Commission on Autism Spectrum Disorder established under
section 1 of this 2025 Act shall continue the mission and work  of the Oregon Commission on
Autism Spectrum Disorder established by Executive Order 09-07 and continued by Executive
Order 18-30.
(2) The Oregon Commission on Autism Spectrum Disorder  established under section 1
of this 2025 Act shall:
(a) Develop, and monitor implementation of,  the commission’s strategic plan and incor-
porate biennial benchmarks for this state to address the  growing number of individuals with
autism spectrum disorder who require services from one or more programs or agencies;
(b) Provide leadership and serve as a forum to establish priorities related  to autism
spectrum disorder, create performance measures, facilitate collaboration,  ensure support
and monitor outcomes;
(c) Engage  key stakeholders to develop, promote and implement state plan goals and ex-
pected outcomes, and continue expanding and strengthening state and community  partner-
ships among systems serving individuals with autism spectrum disorder;
(d) Develop and provide recommendations to the Governor for how state agencies in the
[2]
HB 2542
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
long term can  better integrate capacities of the agencies and communities to support indi-
viduals with autism spectrum disorder and their families;
(e) Advise the Governor and state agency directors on plan implementations that require
executive or agency approval and do not require legislative action;
(f) Provide regular updates regarding the status  of strategic plan goals and outcomes to
the Governor’s office; and
(g) If legislative action is needed, make recommendations for legislation.
(3) The commission may adopt rules to carry out its duties.
(4) Once every three years, the commission shall submit a report  to the Governor and
in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the committees of the Legislative Assembly related
to health care. The report must include at least:
(a) An update on implementation and outcome  priorities identified in the commission’s
most recent strategic plan;
(b) Recommendations to state agencies concerning policies or procedures  to improve
services that benefit  individuals with autism spectrum disorder, or that improve coordination
among state agencies providing  services that benefit individuals with autism spectrum dis-
order; and
(c) Any recommendations for legislation.
SECTION 3.
The Oregon Commission on Autism Spectrum Disorder Account is  estab-
lished in the State Treasury, separate and  distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned
by the account shall be credited to the account. All moneys received  by the commission shall
be paid into the account. Such moneys are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Com-
mission on Autism Spectrum Disorder established under section 1 of this  2025 Act and shall
be used only for the purposes of carrying out the duties  of the commission specified in sec-
tion 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
(1) In appointing members to the Oregon Commission on Autism Spectrum
Disorder, the  Governor, the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Rep-
resentatives shall, where feasible, appoint individuals who served as members of  the Oregon
Commission on Autism Spectrum Disorder established by  Executive Order 09-07 and contin-
ued by Executive Order 18-30.
(2) Notwithstanding the term  of office specified in section 1 of this 2025 Act, of the
members first appointed to the Oregon Commission on Autism Spectrum Disorder:
(a) Four shall serve for terms ending December 31, 2026.
(b) Four shall serve for terms ending December 31, 2027.
(c) Four shall serve for terms ending December 31, 2028.
(d) Five shall serve for terms ending December 31, 2029.
(3) The report required by section 2 of this 2025 Act is first due on  or before October 30,
2026.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]