Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Employment Department shall conduct a study of unemployment in-
surance in Oregon. The department shall submit a report of its findings to  the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to employment in the manner provided under
ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1288