Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 569.175 to
569.195.
SECTION 2. (1) The State Department of Agriculture shall expend moneys  from the
Pollinator Forage Pilot Project Fund to  conduct a pilot program to evaluate options, methods
and costs to replace noxious weeds that provide high levels of pollen and nectar  for
pollinating insects with noninvasive forage plants that have  the same bloom succession,
growth requirements and habitat preferences and can supply equal or  greater sources of
pollen and nectar for  the same pollinating insects. The department shall conduct the pilot
program in at least one test area west of the Cascade  Mountains and at least one test area
east of the Cascade Mountains.
(2) The department, acting through its  State Weed Board, shall identify noxious weeds
described in subsection (1) of this section that are widely distributed  throughout this state
and identify noninvasive forage plants capable of replacing those noxious weeds as described
in subsection (1) of this section. The department may consider any properties  within a test
area that are infested with noxious weeds and  are owned and occupied by public bodies as
defined in ORS 174.109 for participation in the pilot  program. The department shall identify
and prioritize private lands infested with noxious  weeds within the test area that may benefit
from participation in the program and  encourage participation in the pilot program by own-
ers and occupants  of those private lands the department considers to be of a higher priority.
The department shall provide owners and occupants participating in the pilot program  with
seeds or plant starts of noninvasive forage plants, care  advice and other goods and services
the department  deems appropriate for promoting the successful growth of the plants. The
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1730
SB 814
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
department shall conduct a survey of owners and occupants of lands that are included in the
pilot program to determine:
(a) The best choices for noninvasive forage plants for various pollinating insects;
(b) Good practices for promoting the successful growth of noninvasive forage plants;
(c) The comparative effect on pollinating  insect populations of pilot program activities
and traditional noxious weed control, including  but not limited to effects in relation to crit-
ical times within a beekeeping cycle; and
(d) Any other information the department deems beneficial for assessing  the effect of
pilot program activities on pollinating insect populations.
(3) The department shall carry out the pilot  project in consultation and cooperation with
the Oregon  State University Extension Service, weed control districts and owners and
occupiers of private and public lands where noxious weeds described in  subsection (1) of this
section are present.
SECTION 3.
The State Department of Agriculture  shall conduct the pilot program de-
scribed in section  2 of this 2017 Act for a four-year period. The department shall determine
and evaluate the results of noxious weed control  under the pilot program, including but not
limited to  the comparative effect on pollinating insect populations, and prepare a report of
its findings.  The department shall report its findings and any related recommendations for
legislation to an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly regarding natural  resources
in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2022.
SECTION 4. (1) The Pollinator Forage Pilot Program Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Pollinator
Forage Pilot Program Fund shall be credited to the  fund. Moneys in the fund are contin-
uously appropriated to the State Department of  Agriculture for the purpose of carrying out
sections 2 and 3 of this 2017 Act.
(2) In addition to any moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly for  the specific
purpose of carrying out sections 2 and 3 of this 2017 Act, the State Department of  Agricul-
ture may seek gifts, grants or donations of moneys  to the fund from public or private
sources.
SECTION 5. (1) Sections 2, 3 and 4 of this 2017 Act are repealed January 2, 2023.
(2) Any unexpended and unobligated moneys remaining in the Pollinator Forage  Pilot
Program Fund  on January 2, 2023, shall be transferred to the Department of Agriculture
Account. Notwithstanding ORS 561.150, the department shall expend any moneys transferred
under this subsection for the purpose of issuing grants to counties under ORS 569.520.
SECTION 6. Sections 2 and 3 of this 2017 Act become operative January 1, 2018.
SECTION 7. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
[2]