Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 180.
SECTION 2. (1) The Attorney General, by rule, shall adopt  and periodically revise a list
of foreign adversaries to the United States, including any person known  or believed to have
engaged in a long-term pattern or serious  instances of conduct significantly adverse to the
national security of the United States or the security and safety of United States persons.
(2) Upon inclusion on the list, a person is ineligible to receive an  interest in real property
as described in section 4 of this 2025 Act.
(3) In adopting the list  under this section, the Attorney General shall consider including
those persons that are:
(a) Listed as  foreign adversaries by the United States Secretary of Commerce under 15
C.F.R. 791.4;
(b) Subject to a prohibition on the trade of  defense articles or services with the United
States under 22 C.F.R. 126.1; or
(c) Included within the United  States Department of Treasury’s List of Specially Desig-
nated Nationals and Blocked Persons or any other list or identification  of sanctioned persons
or property maintained by the Office of Foreign Assets Control.
(4) A person added to the list:
(a) Is not entitled to notice.
(b) May file an appeal challenging the validity of the  person’s inclusion on the list at any
time, notwithstanding any limitations on review under ORS 183.400.
(5) The Attorney General may take any appropriate action to:
(a) Ratify the nullification of an instrument made void by section 4 of this 2025 Act;
(b) Prevent a foreign adversary from owning, occupying,  using, controlling or profiting
from an interest in real property as provided by section 4 of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3826
HB 3340
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) Any action brought pursuant  to subsection (5) of this section must be filed in the
circuit court where the subject property is located.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 93.
SECTION 4. (1) A deed, sales  agreement or any other instrument is void if the instru-
ment, whether or not recorded, conveys any interest in any real property to  a person who,
on the date that the instrument is executed or recorded, is:
(a) A listed foreign adversary as described in section 2 of this 2025 Act; or
(b) An entity in  which a listed foreign adversary controls 50 percent or more of the
ownership interests or owns any rights or interest  which allows the adversary to direct the
business and affairs of such entity without the requirement or consent of any other party.
(2) This section applies only to real property that, at the time of conveyance, is:
(a) Zoned for exclusive farm use, forest use or mixed farm and forest use; or
(b) Primarily being used for a forest use or for a farm use,  as defined in ORS 215.203, and
including the cultivation of plants in the genus Cannabis.
(3) This section applies to the conveyance of an interest  in real property of any type,
including any legal or  equitable title, interest, estate, remainder, reversion or leasehold of
real property or any other right to possess, occupy, control or use real property.
(4) A person purporting to acquire an interest in real property made  void by this section
is barred from:
(a) Making a claim against  any party for restitution of any purchase price paid or based
on any loss of interest in the property;
(b) Conveying, leasing or otherwise profiting from the interest,  or any part of the inter-
est.
SECTION 5.
Section 4 of this  2025 Act applies only to instruments executed on or after
the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6. Section 7 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 561.
SECTION 7. (1) Based on the information possessed by the  State Department of Agri-
culture, including reports received pursuant to the federal Agricultural Foreign Investment
Disclosure Act, 7 U.S.C. 3501 et seq., the department shall, on or before July 1 of each  year,
create a report for the preceding calendar year containing all of the following, if available:
(a) The total amount of agricultural land in this state that is under foreign ownership;
(b) The percentage change in foreign ownership of agricultural land in this state  for each
year over the prior 10 years;
(c) The purpose for which foreign-owned agricultural land in this state is  being used
currently;
(d) Any significant recent changes or trends in the  uses of foreign-owned agricultural
land in this state;
(e) With the  assistance of relevant state agencies, information regarding the extent of,
and any recent changes in, foreign ownership of energy production, storage or distribution
facilities in this state; and
(f) Any legislative or policy changes  recommended by the department relating to the in-
formation in this report.
(2) Copies of the report created under this section must be:
(a) Published to the department’s website;
(b) Delivered to the Governor; and
[2]
HB 3340
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
(c) Submitted in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the interim committees  of the
Legislative Assembly related to agriculture or land use.
SECTION 8.
Section 7 of this 2025 Act applies to reports for calendar  years beginning on
and after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 9. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]