Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
STUDENT INTERNSHIP PROGRAMS
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Apprenticeable occupation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(b) “Intern” means a person  who performs work for an employer for the purpose of
training if:
(A) The employer is not committed to hire the person  performing the work at the con-
clusion of the training period; and
(B) The work performed:
(i) Supplements training given in an educational environment that  may enhance the
employability of the intern;
(ii) Provides experience for the benefit of the person performing the work;
(iii) Does not displace regular employees;
(iv) Is performed under the close supervision of existing staff; and
(v) Provides no immediate advantage to the  employer providing the training and may
occasionally impede the operations of the employer.
(c) “Local joint committee” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(d) “Youth job development organization” has the  meaning given that term in ORS
344.415.
(2) The Department of Education, in collaboration with the Office of Community Colleges
and Workforce Development, the Bureau of  Labor and Industries and the State Apprentice-
ship and Training Council, shall establish criteria for recognizing student internship pro-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3159
HB 3274
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
grams for high school students who are 16 years of age  or older. To meet the criteria
required by this section, a student internship program must:
(a) Be available to any student 16 years of age or older who is enrolled in high school or
an approved high  school equivalency program such as a General Educational Development
(GED) program and who is on track for graduation or completion of the program;
(b) Be developed and administered based on Department of Education best practices; and
(c) Offer occupational skills training that:
(A) Is recognized as counting toward meeting high school graduation requirements; and
(B) If the student internship program is  in an apprenticeable occupation, is recognized
by the local joint committee that is operating an apprenticeship  program in the applicable
locality for that apprenticeable occupation as  previous creditable work experience, education
or training for which advance credit must be given to  an apprentice entering the appren-
ticeship program.
(3) A student internship program described in  this section may be established or admin-
istered by a school district, education service district, public school, public  charter school
or community college or any combination thereof or  in partnership with one or more youth
job development organizations or local employers. In licensed  trades for building and con-
struction and for the operation of equipment and machinery defined as  hazardous, on-the-job
training for student interns 16 or 17 years of age may be simulated  cooperatively at a
training site.
(4) Criteria established under subsection (2) of this section must address how  the ad-
ministrator of the student internship program will:
(a) Ensure that there is a clear understanding between student interns and employers
that there is no expectation or entitlement of employment for student interns;
(b) Provide for academic credit-bearing  training similar to training given in an educa-
tional environment, including clinical or other hands-on training;
(c) Structure student internships to be limited in duration and to be made  available
during the school year and during the summer months between school years;
(d) Assume responsibility for specific jobs or work tasks to be completed by  student in-
terns; and
(e) Share the costs of utilizing student interns,  including but not limited to supervision
and oversight, discipline and responsibility for workers’ compensation coverage.
(5)(a) The  administrator of a student internship program shall cooperate with local
school districts to develop educationally aligned articulations for internships.
(b) For an internship in an apprenticeable occupation, employers under  ORS 660.002 to
660.210 shall cooperate with the State Director of Apprenticeship and Training through the
applicable apprenticeship committee, and with the  administrator of the student internship
program, to develop  training guidelines consistent with providing training standards for the
apprenticeable occupation that a student intern may earn credit for through completion  of
the student internship.
(c) Articulations and guidelines  developed pursuant to this subsection must provide a
listing of work processes and related  training to be provided that will permit a student intern
to acquire necessary skills. A student intern’s  progress must be evaluated during the term
of the internship based on a schedule agreed upon between the school district, the employer
and the administrator of the student internship program.
[2]
HB 3274
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) A student intern may not displace a regular  employee of an employer participating in
a student internship program.
(7) The Department of Education  may apply for and obtain gifts and grants of money
from any public or private source for the use and benefit of  student internship programs and
shall expend funds received in accordance with the terms of the gifts or grants.
STUDENT INTERNSHIP PROGRAM FUNDING;
CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM FUNDING
SECTION 2.
 ORS 327.372 is amended to read:
327.372. (1) Activities  related to science, technology, engineering and mathematics education and
activities related to career and technical education  that can lead to [ high wage and ] high demand
jobs shall be funded as provided by this section.
(2) The  Department of Education shall distribute moneys in the Connecting Education to Ca-
reers Account established by ORS 327.376 as follows:
(a) Forty percent for activities related to science,  technology, engineering and mathematics ed-
ucation that are described in subsection (3) of this section. Moneys shall  be distributed by the de-
partment under this paragraph based on recommendations of the STEM Investment Council.
(b) Sixty percent for activities related to career and  technical education that can lead to [ high
wage and ] high demand jobs and that are described  in subsection (4) of this section. Moneys shall
be distributed by  the department under this paragraph based on recommendations of the committee
established under ORS 344.075.
(3) Moneys distributed as provided by subsection (2)(a) of  this section to fund activities related
to science, technology, engineering and mathematics education shall be used to:
(a) Expand and sustain regional networks that support science, technology, engineering and
mathematics.
(b) Award grants that expand the  implementation of effective programs related to science,
technology, engineering and mathematics, that propose innovative approaches or  programs related
to science, technology, engineering and mathematics or that provide professional development re-
lated to teaching science, technology, engineering and mathematics.
(c) Provide funding  to recruit, retain and support underserved students, as defined by the State
Board of Education by rule, for programs that are offered at community colleges and public uni-
versities and that can lead to [ high wage and ] high demand jobs related to science, technology, en-
gineering and mathematics.
(d) Develop a systematic survey of facility use to determine  how savings for science, technology,
engineering and mathematics education can be achieved.
(e) Fund any other activities related to science, engineering and  mathematics education that are
identified by the STEM Investment Council.
(4) Moneys distributed as provided by subsection (2)(b) of  this section to fund activities related
to career and technical education that can  lead to [ high wage and ] high demand jobs shall be used
for:
(a) Programs that expose students to career and technical education programs  that can lead to
[high wage and ] high demand jobs.
(b) Career and Technical Education Revitalization grants awarded under ORS 344.075.
(c) Student leadership organizations and youth job development organizations, as defined  in
[3]
HB 3274
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ORS 344.415, related to career and technical education programs  that can lead to [ high wage and ]
high demand jobs.
(d) Distribution to school districts to support career  and technical education programs in the
school district that are approved by the Department of Education  as being high quality and that can
lead to [ high wage and ] high  demand jobs. Moneys must be distributed to each school and public
charter school in the school district based on the number of  students enrolled at the school with the
following characteristics:
(A) Students who are enrolled in and earned three or more  credits for courses that are part of
a career and technical education program that can lead to  [ high wage and ] high demand jobs and
that are approved by the Department of Education.
(B) Students who acquire an industry credential that can lead to a [ high wage and ] high demand
job and that is approved by the Department of Education.
(C) Students described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph who are historically  under-
served, as defined by the State Board of Education by rule.
(e) Administration of  grants for the purpose of expanding teacher training programs and oppor-
tunities related to career and technical education that can lead to [ high wage and ] high demand
jobs.
(f) Administration of a pilot  program to increase students’ exposure and access to career and
technical education that can lead to [ high wage and ] high demand jobs.
(g) Funding any other activities related to career and technical education that can lead to [ high
wage and ] high demand jobs and that  are identified by the committee established under ORS 344.075.
(5) Except as otherwise provided,  moneys distributed under subsections (3) and (4) of this section
shall be distributed to school districts, education service districts, public schools, public  charter
schools,  community  colleges, public universities or statewide nonprofit organizations promoting stu-
dent leadership in career and technical  education , youth job development organizations, as de-
fined in ORS 344.415,  or any combination thereof or  in partnership with [ youth job development
organizations, as defined in ORS 344.415, ] other nonprofit organizations or  other entities identified
by the State Board of Education by rule.
(6) From the moneys available under subsection (2) of  this section, the Department of Education,
the STEM Investment Council and the committee established under ORS 344.075 combined  may re-
tain no more  than a total of five percent of all moneys distributed for a fiscal year for administrative
expenses incurred under this section.
(7) The Department of Education, in collaboration with the STEM  Investment Council and the
committee established under ORS 344.075, shall submit a biennial  report to the Legislative Assembly
related to distributions made under this section. The  report must include metrics that identify how
distributions made under  this section are contributing to the development of a skilled workforce that
is able to secure [ high wage and ] high demand jobs.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 344.059 is amended to read:
344.059. The Department of Education shall advance the policy on career and technical  educa-
tion described in ORS 344.055 by:
(1) Administering the distribution of grants or entering into  contracts for the purpose of ex-
panding teacher training programs related to career and technical education that can lead  to [ high
wage and ] high demand jobs. Grants awarded,  or contracts entered into, under this subsection may
be funded with moneys available under ORS 327.372 and must:
(a) Not exceed $250,000 per grant or contract;
[4]
HB 3274
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Be awarded to,  or be entered with, an educator preparation program or an educator prepa-
ration provider, regardless of whether courses are offered in a traditional  setting, by an alternative
delivery method or by an alternative time frame;
(c) Be awarded or entered into for an educator preparation program that has  a plan for re-
cruiting students to the program;
(d) Be used to develop and provide coursework that:
(A) Qualifies for  credit or as professional development and that satisfies licensure or endorse-
ment requirements; and
(B) Is provided in a  broad group of instructional areas that are grouped to give context for ac-
ademic, technical and career learning; and
(e) To the extent practicable, align  with grant distribution requirements of the Career and
Technical Education Revitalization Grant Program described in ORS 344.075.
(2) Developing  and supporting the infrastructure for an online system that is accessible state-
wide and that delivers courses and professional  development to teachers of career and technical
education. For the purpose of this subsection, the department may retain up to eight  percent of the
moneys available to the department under this section.
(3) Collaborating with the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission to:
(a) Enable experts in trade or industry to become teachers of career and technical education;
(b) Coordinate communications about career and technical education, including  communications:
(A) Intended to identify potential teachers of career and  technical education from trade or in-
dustry;
(B) With experts in trades or industry  about the requirements for transitioning from employment
in a trade or an industry to teaching; and
(C) With educator preparation programs and educator preparation providers  about teaching op-
portunities related to career and technical education; and
(c) Review statutes and rules for necessary  changes and to review and recommend alternative
methods to increase available funding options.
(4) Developing and maintaining the website described in ORS 344.141.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 344.075 is amended to read:
344.075. (1) The Career and Technical Education  Revitalization Grant Program is established
within the Department of Education.
(2) Subject to the availability of funds, the department shall award grants each biennium to
school districts, education  service districts, public schools or public charter schools, or any combi-
nation thereof or in partnership with youth job development organizations as defined in ORS 344.415,
for the uses described in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) Grants received under this section must be used to enhance  the collaboration between edu-
cation providers and employers by:
(a) Developing or enhancing career and technical education programs of study;
(b) Expanding the professional growth of  and career opportunities for students through career
and technical education programs or student internship programs under section 1 of this 2025
Act;
(c) Assessing the ability of each career and technical education program or student internship
program to meet workforce needs and give students  the skills required for jobs in this state that
[provide high wages and ] are in high demand; and
(d) Supporting the achievement of the high school diploma and modified diploma requirements
[5]
HB 3274
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
established under ORS 329.451.
(4) Any school district, education service district,  public school or public charter school, or any
combination thereof or in partnership with a youth job development organization  as defined in ORS
344.415, may apply for a grant under this section.
(5)(a) The department and the  Bureau of Labor and Industries shall jointly establish a committee
to:
(A) Assist with the grant program established under  this section, including setting goals for the
program, developing grant criteria, reviewing all grant applications and making recommendations
related to the awarding of grants.
(B) Make recommendations to the Superintendent of Public Instruction related to the distrib-
ution of moneys under ORS 327.372.
(b) The committee established  by this subsection must equally represent business, industry, labor
and education providers.
(c) The  department in awarding grants, and the committee in fulfilling its duties related to
grants, shall award grants based on the ability of the applicant  to use the grant as required under
subsection (3) of this section. In addition, the  department and the committee shall give priority to
applicants that:
(A) Represent a diverse number of students served and a diverse selection of geographic  lo-
cations;
(B) Have received commitments from business,  industry, labor or education providers to enhance
collaboration and to provide resources for any collaborative efforts; and
(C) Demonstrate that the collaboration between education  providers and employers enhanced
by the grant will be sustainable beyond the life of the grant.
(6) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the implementation  of this
section.
(7) The department may pay the expenses incurred by the department in administering this
section out of moneys that are available to the department  for purposes of awarding grants under
this section. For each biennium, the department may spend on administrative  expenses an amount
that does not exceed five percent of the total amount of moneys available  to the department during
the biennium for purposes of awarding grants under this section.
YOUTH APPRENTICESHIP AND TRAINING AND WORK BASED LEARNING PROGRAMS
SECTION 5.
 ORS 344.745 is amended to read:
344.745. (1) The State Apprenticeship and Training Council and the Department of Education
shall establish youth apprenticeship and training and work based learning programs to provide oc-
cupational skill training for  [ up to 2,000 individual ] high school students [ in each biennium.
Notwithstanding the limitation on the number of program participants,  the department and the Bureau
of Labor and Industries may increase the number of participants if federal funds become available for
such an increase. In the building and construction trades industries, there shall be a maximum of 100
youth apprentices or trainees per biennium.  However, the council has the authority to increase the
number of youth apprentices in building  and construction trades on the basis of demonstrated industry
need].
(2) Participating students must be 16 years of age or  older and must be enrolled in a high school
career and technical  education program that is applicable to the specific youth apprenticeship and
[6]
HB 3274
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
training or work based  learning program for which they are applying. Students must demonstrate
mastery of the essential  competencies contained in an approved career exploration curriculum prior
to being registered as a youth apprentice or trainee.  In licensed trades for building and construction
and for the operation of equipment and machinery defined as hazardous, on-the-job  training for stu-
dents 16 or 17 years of age may be simulated cooperatively at a training site.
(3) Participating  schools shall develop and maintain a list of students eligible for youth appren-
ticeship and training programs. In a cooperative effort, school districts,  education service districts
and local apprenticeship and training committee members shall review and select students for par-
ticipation from the list of eligible students established under this subsection.
(4) Employers under ORS 660.002 to 660.210 shall cooperate  with the State Director of Appren-
ticeship and Training through the applicable apprenticeship committee to develop training guidelines
consistent with youth apprenticeship  and training standards for a specific trade. The guidelines shall
provide listing of work processes and related training to be done that will permit the  student to
acquire  necessary  skills. The employer, school and youth apprentice shall evaluate [ monthly], on a
schedule agreed upon between the parties,  the student’s progress in high school curriculum,  re-
lated training and on-the-job training.
(5) No registered youth apprentice or trainee  shall displace a regular employee of an approved
employer.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 344.125 is amended to read:
344.125. (1) Representatives from the  Department of Education, the Office of Community Col-
leges and Workforce Development  and the Bureau of Labor and Industries shall meet at least four
times each year for the purpose of promoting collaboration among the  agencies on issues related to
career and technical education.
(2) Issues to be  addressed by the agencies shall include the development and implementation of
long-term goals that:
(a) Ensure that  career and technical education programs are available at the public schools of
this state and through youth job development  organizations as defined in ORS 344.415, are founded
on partnerships with business and industry and receive appropriate investments of time,  money and
other resources.
(b) Develop regional centers that establish any appropriate partnerships between public schools,
community colleges, public universities, businesses,  unions and other entities and that ensure that
every student of this state has access to a regional center in person or online.
(c) Encourage the establishment of joint  high school and community college advisory committees
that may include representatives of  public schools, community colleges, public universities, busi-
nesses and unions to:
(A) Make more effective use of resources;
(B) Promote articulation and pathways between high school programs and post-secondary  school
programs;
(C) Ensure that current industry workforce  needs are considered and that curriculum is kept
current with state standards; and
(D) Increase opportunities for internships, apprenticeships  and other opportunities that may lead
to employment in the region.
(d) Address academic requirements and regulatory barriers that  inhibit successful movement of
students in career and technical education from high schools to post-secondary school programs  and
the workforce.
[7]
HB 3274
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
(e) Implement accelerated college credit programs  that allow students to move seamlessly from
public schools to post-secondary education or training to the workforce.
(f) Increase  professional development opportunities for teachers and learning opportunities for
students through industry mentorships, internships, summer programs, after-school programs and
career-based student leadership opportunities.
(g) Establish partnerships between public and private entities for the  purpose of educating stu-
dents, parents, teachers, school advisors, policymakers and the general  public about the benefits and
opportunities related to career and technical education.
(h) Increase opportunities for incorporating into  career and technical education pro-
grams student internship programs described under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The agencies identified  in subsection (1) of this section shall make a joint report by Decem-
ber 31 of each year  to the appropriate legislative committees concerning progress on the develop-
ment and implementation  of the goals described in subsection (2) of this section and may submit
recommendations for legislation that will promote  opportunities related to career and technical ed-
ucation.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 7.
The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader  and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
[8]