Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
REGISTERING OF URGENT CARE CENTERS
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “urgent care center” means a medical clinic that
accepts walk-in patients and is equipped to provide care for  illnesses or injuries that require
prompt attention but typically are not so serious as to require emergency  department ser-
vices.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt by rule criteria for registering  an urgent
care center in this state. The rules must ensure that a registered urgent care center:
(a) Is certified or accredited by a  nationally recognized organization or other entity ap-
proved by the authority under ORS 441.062;
(b) Has expanded hours of operation;
(c) Is equipped to diagnose and treat a broad spectrum of illnesses or injuries that are
not life-threatening or so serious as to require emergency department services;
(d) Has on-site radiology, laboratory services and emergency equipment;
(e) Accepts unscheduled, walk-in patients during all hours of operation;
(f) Conforms to the accessibility standards established by the Americans with  Disabilities
Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. 12101 et seq.); and
(g) Is equipped to respond to an emergency situation, including enhanced security meas-
ures in the event of a public safety incident.
(3) An urgent care center registered in this state must provide the following services:
(a) Medical examination, diagnosis and  treatment and follow-up medical examinations,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1357
SB 716
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
procedures and treatments; and
(b) Same-day ambulatory health care, including on-demand and scheduled  medical,
wellness and screening services for:
(A) Employees of employers offering employer-sponsored  insurance or that are self-
insured;
(B) Injured workers with workers’ compensation coverage;
(C) Individuals covered by commercial insurance,  Medicare, medical assistance or
TRICARE; and
(D) Individuals who wish to pay for their own care.
(4) The authority shall prescribe by rule the fee  for registering an urgent care center,
which may not exceed the authority’s costs related to administering the  registration re-
quirements and must be based on the size and complexity of the urgent care center.
(5) The authority may  revoke an urgent care center’s registration for failing to meet the
requirements established in this section or the rules adopted  by the authority to carry out
this section.
INSURANCE REIMBURSEMENT
SECTION 2.
Section 3 of this 2025 Act is  added to and made a part of the Insurance Code.
SECTION 3. (1) A policy or  certificate of health insurance issued in this state that re-
imburses the cost of medical care must reimburse the cost of services provided by  an urgent
care center registered pursuant to section 1 of this  2025 Act in an amount 20 percent higher
than the reimbursement  paid for the same services when provided by a medical clinic that
is associated with a licensed hospital or an unregistered urgent care center.
(2) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
(3) As used in this section, “urgent care center” has the meaning given that term  in
section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 243.144, as amended by section 9, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2024, is  amended
to read:
243.144. Benefit plans offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board that reimburse the  cost
of medical and other health services and supplies must comply with  the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810;
(10) ORS 743A.325; [ and]
(11) ORS 743A.051 (2)(c)[ .]; and
(12) Section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
 ORS  243.144, as amended by sections 9 and 10, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2024, is
[2]
SB 716
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
amended to read:
243.144. Benefit  plans offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board that reimburse the cost
of medical and other health  services and supplies must comply with the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810; [ and]
(10) ORS 743A.325[ .]; and
(11) Section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 243.877, as amended by section 11, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
243.877. Benefit  plans offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board that reimburse the cost
of medical and other health  services and supplies must comply with the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810;
(10) ORS 743A.325; [ and]
(11) ORS 743A.051 (2)(c)[ .]; and
(12) Section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 243.877, as amended by sections 11 and 12, chapter 17, Oregon Laws  2024, is
amended to read:
243.877. Benefit  plans offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board that reimburse the cost
of medical and other health  services and supplies must comply with the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
[3]
SB 716
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(9) ORS 743B.810; [ and]
(10) ORS 743A.325[ .]; and
(11) Section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 750.055, as amended by section  3, chapter 24, Oregon Laws 2024, section 4,
chapter 35, Oregon  Laws 2024, section 21, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, and section 162, chapter
73, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
750.055. (1) The following provisions apply to health care service contractors  to the extent not
inconsistent with the express provisions of ORS 750.005 to 750.095:
(a) ORS 705.137, 705.138 and 705.139.
(b) ORS 731.004 to 731.150, 731.162, 731.216 to 731.362, 731.382,  731.385, 731.386, 731.390, 731.398
to 731.430, 731.428, 731.450,  731.454, 731.485, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, ORS
731.488, 731.504, 731.508,  731.509, 731.510, 731.511, 731.512, 731.574 to 731.620, 731.640 to 731.652,
731.730, 731.731, 731.735, 731.737, 731.750, 731.752, 731.804, 731.808 and 731.844 to 731.992.
(c) ORS 732.215, 732.220, 732.230, 732.245, 732.250, 732.320, 732.325  and 732.517 to 732.596, not
including ORS 732.582, and ORS 732.650 to 732.689.
(d) ORS 733.010  to 733.050, 733.080, 733.140 to 733.170, 733.210, 733.510 to 733.680 and 733.695
to 733.780.
(e) ORS 734.014 to 734.440.
(f) ORS 742.001 to 742.009, 742.013, 742.016, 742.061, 742.065, 742.150 to 742.162 and 742.518  to
742.542.
(g) ORS  743.004, 743.005, 743.007, 743.008, 743.010, 743.018, 743.020, 743.022, 743.023, 743.025,
743.028, 743.029, 743.038, 743.040, 743.044,  743.050, 743.100 to 743.109, 743.402, 743.405, 743.406,
743.417, 743.472, 743.492, 743.495, 743.498, 743.522, 743.523, 743.524, 743.526, 743.535, 743.550, 743.650
to 743.656, 743.680 to 743.689, 743.788 and 743.790.
(h) ORS 743A.010, 743A.012, 743A.014,  743A.020, 743A.034, 743A.036, 743A.040, 743A.044,
743A.048, 743A.051, 743A.052, 743A.058,  743A.060, 743A.062, 743A.063, 743A.064, 743A.065, 743A.066,
743A.068, 743A.070, 743A.080, 743A.082, 743A.084, 743A.088, 743A.090,  743A.100, 743A.104, 743A.105,
743A.108, 743A.110, 743A.124, 743A.140,  743A.141, 743A.148, 743A.150, 743A.160, 743A.168, 743A.169,
743A.170, 743A.175, 743A.185, 743A.188, 743A.190, 743A.192, 743A.250, 743A.252,  743A.260, 743A.310
and 743A.315 and section 2, chapter 771, Oregon Laws 2013, and section 2, chapter 70,  Oregon Laws
2024, and section 3 of this 2025 Act .
(i) ORS 743B.001, 743B.003  to 743B.127, 743B.128, 743B.130, 743B.195, 743B.197, 743B.200,
743B.202, 743B.204, 743B.220, 743B.221, 743B.222,  743B.225, 743B.227, 743B.250, 743B.252, 743B.253,
743B.254, 743B.255, 743B.256, 743B.257, 743B.258, 743B.280 to 743B.285, 743B.287, 743B.300, 743B.310,
743B.320, 743B.323, 743B.330, 743B.340, 743B.341, 743B.342, 743B.343 to 743B.347, 743B.400, 743B.403,
743B.407, 743B.420, 743B.423, 743B.450, 743B.451, 743B.452,  743B.453, 743B.470, 743B.475, 743B.505,
743B.550, 743B.555, 743B.601, 743B.602 and  743B.800 and section 2, chapter 24, Oregon Laws 2024,
and section 2, chapter 35, Oregon Laws 2024.
(j) The following provisions of ORS chapter 744:
(A) ORS 744.052 to 744.089,  744.091 and 744.093, relating to the regulation of insurance produc-
ers;
(B) ORS 744.602 to 744.665, relating to the regulation of insurance consultants; and
(C) ORS 744.700 to 744.740, relating to the regulation of third party administrators.
(k) ORS 746.005 to 746.140, 746.160, 746.220 to 746.370, 746.600, 746.605, 746.607, 746.608, 746.610,
746.615, 746.625, 746.635, 746.650, 746.655, 746.660, 746.668, 746.670, 746.675, 746.680 and 746.690.
[4]
SB 716
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The following provisions of the Insurance Code apply  to health care service contractors ex-
cept in the case of group practice  health maintenance organizations that are federally qualified
pursuant to Title XIII of the Public Health Service Act:
(a) ORS 731.485, if  the group practice health maintenance organization wholly owns and oper-
ates an in-house drug outlet.
(b) ORS 743A.024, unless  the patient is referred by a physician, physician associate or nurse
practitioner associated with a group practice health maintenance organization.
(3) For the purposes of this section, health care service contractors are insurers.
(4) Any  for-profit health care service contractor organized under the laws of any other state that
is not governed by the insurance laws of the other state  is subject to all requirements of ORS
chapter 732.
(5)(a) A health care service contractor is a domestic insurance company for the purpose of  de-
termining whether the health care service contractor is a debtor, as defined in 11 U.S.C. 109.
(b) A health care service contractor’s classification  as a domestic insurance company under
paragraph (a) of this subsection does not subject the health care service contractor to ORS 734.510
to 734.710.
(6) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business  Services may, after notice and
hearing, adopt reasonable rules not inconsistent with this section and ORS 750.003,  750.005, 750.025
and 750.045 that are necessary for the proper administration of these provisions.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 750.055, as amended by section 21, chapter 771, Oregon Laws 2013,  section
7, chapter 25, Oregon Laws 2014, section 82, chapter 45, Oregon Laws 2014,  section 9, chapter 59,
Oregon Laws 2015, section 7, chapter 100, Oregon Laws 2015,  section 7, chapter 224, Oregon Laws
2015, section 11, chapter 362, Oregon Laws 2015, section 10, chapter 470, Oregon Laws 2015,  section
30, chapter 515, Oregon Laws 2015,  section 10, chapter 206, Oregon Laws 2017, section 6, chapter
417, Oregon Laws 2017, section 22, chapter 479, Oregon Laws 2017, section 10, chapter 7,  Oregon
Laws 2018, section 69,  chapter 13, Oregon Laws 2019, section 38, chapter 151, Oregon Laws 2019,
section 5, chapter 441,  Oregon Laws 2019, section 85, chapter 97, Oregon Laws 2021, section 12,
chapter 37, Oregon Laws 2022,  section 5, chapter 111, Oregon Laws 2023, section 2, chapter 152,
Oregon Laws 2023, section 4, chapter 24, Oregon Laws 2024, section 5,  chapter 35, Oregon Laws
2024, section 22,  chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, and section 163, chapter 73, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
750.055. (1) The following provisions apply to health care service contractors  to the extent not
inconsistent with the express provisions of ORS 750.005 to 750.095:
(a) ORS 705.137, 705.138 and 705.139.
(b) ORS 731.004 to 731.150, 731.162, 731.216 to 731.362, 731.382,  731.385, 731.386, 731.390, 731.398
to 731.430, 731.428, 731.450,  731.454, 731.485, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, ORS
731.488, 731.504, 731.508,  731.509, 731.510, 731.511, 731.512, 731.574 to 731.620, 731.640 to 731.652,
731.730, 731.731, 731.735, 731.737, 731.750, 731.752, 731.804, 731.808 and 731.844 to 731.992.
(c) ORS 732.215, 732.220, 732.230, 732.245, 732.250, 732.320, 732.325  and 732.517 to 732.596, not
including ORS 732.582, and ORS 732.650 to 732.689.
(d) ORS 733.010  to 733.050, 733.080, 733.140 to 733.170, 733.210, 733.510 to 733.680 and 733.695
to 733.780.
(e) ORS 734.014 to 734.440.
(f) ORS 742.001 to 742.009, 742.013, 742.016, 742.061, 742.065, 742.150 to 742.162 and 742.518  to
742.542.
[5]
SB 716
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(g) ORS  743.004, 743.005, 743.007, 743.008, 743.010, 743.018, 743.020, 743.022, 743.023, 743.025,
743.028, 743.029, 743.038, 743.040, 743.044,  743.050, 743.100 to 743.109, 743.402, 743.405, 743.406,
743.417, 743.472, 743.492, 743.495, 743.498, 743.522, 743.523, 743.524, 743.526, 743.535, 743.550, 743.650
to 743.656, 743.680 to 743.689, 743.788 and 743.790.
(h) ORS 743A.010, 743A.012, 743A.014,  743A.020, 743A.034, 743A.036, 743A.040, 743A.044,
743A.048, 743A.051, 743A.052, 743A.058,  743A.060, 743A.062, 743A.063, 743A.064, 743A.065, 743A.066,
743A.068, 743A.070, 743A.080, 743A.082, 743A.084, 743A.088, 743A.090,  743A.100, 743A.104, 743A.105,
743A.108, 743A.110, 743A.124, 743A.140,  743A.141, 743A.148, 743A.150, 743A.160, 743A.168, 743A.169,
743A.170, 743A.175, 743A.185, 743A.188, 743A.190, 743A.192, 743A.250, 743A.252,  743A.260, 743A.310
and 743A.315 and section 2, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024 , and section 3 of this 2025 Act .
(i) ORS 743B.001, 743B.003  to 743B.127, 743B.128, 743B.130, 743B.195, 743B.197, 743B.200,
743B.202, 743B.204, 743B.220, 743B.221, 743B.222,  743B.225, 743B.227, 743B.250, 743B.252, 743B.253,
743B.254, 743B.255, 743B.256, 743B.257, 743B.258, 743B.280 to 743B.285, 743B.287, 743B.300, 743B.310,
743B.320, 743B.323, 743B.330, 743B.340, 743B.341, 743B.342, 743B.343 to 743B.347, 743B.400, 743B.403,
743B.407, 743B.420, 743B.423, 743B.450, 743B.451, 743B.452,  743B.453, 743B.470, 743B.475, 743B.505,
743B.550, 743B.555, 743B.601, 743B.602 and  743B.800 and section 2, chapter 24, Oregon Laws 2024,
and section 2, chapter 35, Oregon Laws 2024.
(j) The following provisions of ORS chapter 744:
(A) ORS 744.052 to 744.089,  744.091 and 744.093, relating to the regulation of insurance produc-
ers;
(B) ORS 744.602 to 744.665, relating to the regulation of insurance consultants; and
(C) ORS 744.700 to 744.740, relating to the regulation of third party administrators.
(k) ORS 746.005 to 746.140, 746.160, 746.220 to 746.370, 746.600, 746.605, 746.607, 746.608, 746.610,
746.615, 746.625, 746.635, 746.650, 746.655, 746.660, 746.668, 746.670, 746.675, 746.680 and 746.690.
(2) The following provisions of the Insurance Code apply  to health care service contractors ex-
cept in the case of group practice  health maintenance organizations that are federally qualified
pursuant to Title XIII of the Public Health Service Act:
(a) ORS 731.485, if  the group practice health maintenance organization wholly owns and oper-
ates an in-house drug outlet.
(b) ORS 743A.024, unless  the patient is referred by a physician, physician associate or nurse
practitioner associated with a group practice health maintenance organization.
(3) For the purposes of this section, health care service contractors are insurers.
(4) Any  for-profit health care service contractor organized under the laws of any other state that
is not governed by the insurance laws of the other state  is subject to all requirements of ORS
chapter 732.
(5)(a) A health care service contractor is a domestic insurance company for the purpose of  de-
termining whether the health care service contractor is a debtor, as defined in 11 U.S.C. 109.
(b) A health care service contractor’s classification  as a domestic insurance company under
paragraph (a) of this subsection does not subject the health care service contractor to ORS 734.510
to 734.710.
(6) The Director of the Department  of Consumer and Business Services may, after notice and
hearing, adopt reasonable rules not inconsistent with this section and ORS 750.003,  750.005, 750.025
and 750.045 that are necessary for the proper administration of these provisions.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 750.333, as amended by section 5,  chapter 24, Oregon Laws 2024, and section
23, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
[6]
SB 716
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
750.333. (1) The following provisions apply to trusts  carrying out a multiple employer welfare
arrangement:
(a) ORS 705.137, 705.138 and 705.139.
(b) ORS  731.004 to 731.150, 731.162, 731.216 to 731.268, 731.296 to 731.316, 731.324, 731.328,
731.378, 731.386, 731.390, 731.398, 731.406,  731.410, 731.414, 731.418 to 731.434, 731.454, 731.484,
731.486, 731.488, 731.512, 731.574 to 731.620, 731.640  to 731.652, 731.804, 731.808 and 731.844 to
731.992.
(c) ORS 733.010 to 733.050,  733.140 to 733.170, 733.210, 733.510 to 733.680 and 733.695 to 733.780.
(d) ORS 734.014 to 734.440.
(e) ORS 742.001 to 742.009, 742.013, 742.016, 742.061 and 742.065.
(f) ORS 743.004, 743.005,  743.007, 743.008, 743.010, 743.018, 743.020, 743.023, 743.028, 743.029,
743.053, 743.405, 743.406, 743.524, 743.526, 743.535 and 743B.221.
(g) ORS 743A.010, 743A.012, 743A.014, 743A.020, 743A.024,  743A.034, 743A.036, 743A.040,
743A.048, 743A.051, 743A.052, 743A.058, 743A.060, 743A.062, 743A.063,  743A.064, 743A.065, 743A.066,
743A.068, 743A.070, 743A.080, 743A.082,  743A.084, 743A.088, 743A.090, 743A.100, 743A.104, 743A.105,
743A.108, 743A.110, 743A.124, 743A.140, 743A.141, 743A.148, 743A.150,  743A.160, 743A.168, 743A.169,
743A.170, 743A.175, 743A.180,  743A.185, 743A.188, 743A.190, 743A.192, 743A.250, 743A.252, 743A.260
and 743A.310 and section 2, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024 , and section 3 of this 2025 Act .
(h) ORS  743B.001, 743B.003 to 743B.127 (except 743B.125 to 743B.127), 743B.195, 743B.197,
743B.200, 743B.202, 743B.204, 743B.220, 743B.222,  743B.225, 743B.227, 743B.250, 743B.252, 743B.253,
743B.254, 743B.255, 743B.256, 743B.257, 743B.258, 743B.310,  743B.320, 743B.321, 743B.330, 743B.340,
743B.341, 743B.342, 743B.343, 743B.344, 743B.345,  743B.347, 743B.400, 743B.403, 743B.407, 743B.420,
743B.423, 743B.451, 743B.453, 743B.470, 743B.505, 743B.550, 743B.555  and 743B.601 and section 2,
chapter 24, Oregon Laws 2024.
(i) The following provisions of ORS chapter 744:
(A) ORS 744.052 to 744.089, 744.091 and 744.093, relating to the  regulation of insurance produc-
ers;
(B) ORS 744.602 to 744.665, relating to the regulation of insurance consultants; and
(C) ORS 744.700 to 744.740, relating to the regulation of third party administrators.
(j) ORS 746.005 to 746.140, 746.160 and 746.220 to 746.370.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) A trust carrying out a multiple employer welfare arrangement is an insurer.
(b) References  to certificates of authority are references to certificates of multiple employer
welfare arrangement.
(c) Contributions are premiums.
(3) The provision of health benefits under ORS 750.301 to 750.341 is the transaction  of health
insurance.
(4) The Department of Consumer  and Business Services may adopt rules that are necessary to
implement the provisions of ORS 750.301 to 750.341.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 11.
The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
[7]
SB 716
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
OPERATIVE DATE
SECTION 12.
(1) Sections 1 and 3 of this  2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 243.144,
243.877, 750.055 and 750.333 by sections 4 to 10 of this 2025  Act become operative on January
1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall take all steps prior  to the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that are necessary  to carry out the provisions of section 1
of this 2025 Act on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 13. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[8]