Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Secretary of State shall study methods for reducing the paperwork filing
burden on businesses in this state. The Secretary of State shall  submit a report in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to business  no later than September
15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1510