Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 316.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Armed Forces of the United States” includes the regular and reserve  components
of the Army, Navy,  Air Force, Marine Corps, Coast Guard and Space Force of the United
States and the National Guard.
(b) “Veteran” means an individual who is a veteran, as defined in  ORS 408.225, except the
individual may be discharged or released under honorable or other than honorable conditions.
(2) There shall be subtracted from federal taxable income for  a taxpayer who is a veteran
all retirement pay or pension that the taxpayer received for service  in the Armed Forces of
the United States that is included in the taxpayer’s federal taxable income for the tax year.
(3) The total amount subtracted under  subsection (2) of this section may not exceed the
taxpayer’s total retirement pay or pension received  for service in the Armed Forces of the
United States that is included in the taxpayer’s federal taxable income for the tax year.
(4) The  amount subtracted under subsection (2) of this section may not include any
amount of retirement pay or pension received for  service in the Armed Forces of the United
States that is subtracted under ORS 316.680 (1)(e).
(5) The Department of Revenue  may adopt rules for carrying out the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2025  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2026.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 889