Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 498.164 is amended to read:
498.164. (1) [ Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, ] A person may  not use
bait to attract or take black  bears or use one or more dogs to hunt or pursue black bears or
cougars.
(2) [Nothing in ] Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section :
(a) [ prohibits the use of bait  or one or more dogs by ] Employees or agents of county, state or
federal agencies  may use bait to attract or take black bears or use one or  more dogs to hunt
or pursue black bears or cougars  while acting in their official capacities.
[(3)] (b)  [ Nothing in subsection (1) of this section prohibits the ] A person  may  use [ of] bait or
dogs [ by persons ] for the  taking of black bears or cougars in accordance with the provisions of ORS
498.012 relating to taking wildlife that is causing damage.
(c) A person may use one or more dogs to hunt or pursue  cougars on private property
owned by the person or with the written consent of the property owner or owners.
[(4)] (3) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section commits  a Class A misdemeanor
and, upon  conviction, shall in addition to appropriate criminal penalties have the person’s privilege
to apply for any hunting license  suspended for a period of five years for a first offense and perma-
nently suspended for any subsequent offense.
[(5)] (4)  For the purposes of this section, “bait” means any material placed for  the purpose of
attracting or attempting to attract bears.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “livestock” has the meaning given that term in
ORS 610.150.
(2) The State Fish and Wildlife Commission shall:
(a) Assess cougar depredation of livestock based on factors including reports  of persons
whose livestock have been preyed on by cougars.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 933
HB 3153
1
2
3
4
5
(b) Establish a threshold of cougar depredation  of livestock that constitutes chronic
depredation of livestock.
(c) Reduce cougar populations, through means including  the lethal taking of cougars, as
needed to address chronic depredation of livestock.
[2]