Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated  to the Department of Human Services, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $2,000,000 for the
purpose of providing transition services to foster children.
SECTION 2. This 2020 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2020
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 233