Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “CORE3 center” means  the multiagency coordi-
nation center for emergency operations under development in Deschutes County.
(2) The following state agencies shall  work collaboratively with local and regional officials
in coordinating and planning the development of the CORE3 center:
(a) The Oregon Department of Emergency Management;
(b) The Department of the State Fire Marshal;
(c) The State Forestry Department;
(d) The Oregon Military Department;
(e) The Department of State Police;
(f) The Department of Public Safety Standards and Training;
(g) The Department of Corrections;
(h) The Department of Human Services;
(i) The Department of Transportation; and
(j) The Department of Environmental Quality.
(3) State agencies shall incorporate the CORE3 center as an element  of the agencies’
plans related to emergencies and disasters.
(4) Each state agency specified in subsection (2) of this section shall  evaluate whether
financial participation by the  agency in the construction or operation of the CORE3 center
is in the long-term  interest of Oregon residents. The agencies shall report their conclusions
to the standing or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to emergency
management as soon as practicable.
(5) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall issue  a grant to the Central
Oregon Intergovernmental Council to be used for planning, developing or constructing  the
CORE3 center.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2746
HB 3084
1
2
3
4
5
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $15,750,000 to carry out  the provisions of
section 1 (5) of this 2025 Act.
[2]