Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 658.750 is amended to read:
658.750. (1) Every farmworker camp  operator shall register with the Department of Consumer
and Business Services each farmworker camp operated by the operator.
(2) The department shall establish, by rule, procedures for annual  registration of farmworker
camps. The department may adopt any other rule necessary to  implement the provisions of ORS
658.705 to 658.850. Rules adopted under this subsection must be  consistent with federal regu-
lations governing health and safety standards for farmworker housing promulgated by  the
Employment and Training Administration and the Occupational Safety and Health Adminis-
tration of the United States Department of Labor.
(3) Upon  receipt of an initial application for registration, the department shall conduct a pre-
occupancy consultation with the operator of the farmworker camp if:
(a) The camp was not registered with the department prior to January 1, 1989, and  has not been
registered with the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries or  the Director of the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services in a prior year; or
(b) The camp operator requests a consultation.
(4) The department shall register the camp  if  the department has determined that the health
and safety conditions existing at the camp are [ not] in conformance with  [the rules of the department,
the department shall not register the camp until the  department determines that the camp has been
brought into compliance. ] federal regulations governing health and safety standards as follows:
(a) A farmworker camp with housing the construction  of which was begun on or after
April 3, 1980, and that was not under a contract for construction as of  March 4, 1980, must
comply with the health  and safety standards promulgated by the Occupational Safety and
Health Administration of the  United States Department of Labor under 29 C.F.R. part
1910.142, as in effect on January 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4285
HB 3640
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
(b) A farmworker camp with housing the construction of which was completed  or in
progress prior to April 3, 1980,  or that was under a contract for construction prior to March
4, 1980, must comply with  either the health and safety standards described under paragraph
(a) of this subsection or with the health and safety standards promulgated by the Employ-
ment and Training Administration of the United States Department of Labor under  20 C.F.R.
part 654.404 et seq., as in effect on January 1, 2025.
(5) Upon registration of a camp, the department shall transmit a copy of the  registration to the
Bureau of Labor and Industries.
(6) The department shall compile periodically a list  of all registered camps and make the list
available to the bureau and other interested persons.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 658.750 by section 1  of this 2025 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2028.
[2]