Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A city or county that maintains a facility to perform animal control
functions, a facility with which a city  or county has contracted to perform animal control
functions or a humane society:
(a) May not cause a dog or cat to be  destroyed, as described in ORS 609.405, on the basis
of a lack of space for housing the dog or cat.
(b) Shall establish a clear and documented limit for  housing dogs and cats that is ap-
proved by the State Department of Agriculture.
(c) Shall submit a report to the department by July 1 of each year describing:
(A) The intake of dogs and cats since the last report under this paragraph.
(B) Limits for housing dogs and cats that are established under paragraph (b) of  this
subsection.
(C) Any destruction  of animals, including dogs or cats, since the last report under this
paragraph, including reasons for the destruction.
(2) Subsection (1)(a) of this section  does not apply to the destruction of a dog or cat that
is suffering from a terminal illness  or severe injury, as determined by a licensed
veterinarian.
(3) The department shall:
(a) Establish a process for approving limits for housing dogs and cats, as  described in
subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(b) Report, in the manner prescribed by ORS 192.245, to  committees or interim commit-
tees of the Legislative  Assembly related to animals, on or before September 1 of each year,
on the reports the department received  pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this section since the
department’s last report under this paragraph.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3251