Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall study mule deer in the
Steens Mountain herd range area to determine the effects of:
(a) Mule deer maternal condition on population levels.
(b) Habitat conditions on mule deer maternal conditions.
(c) Predation on mule deer survival rates.
(2) In  conducting the study, the department shall use parameters and metrics that are
consistent with parameters  and metrics that the department has used to study the Murder-
ers Creek and Klamath herd range areas.
(3) The department shall begin the study on or before December 31, 2026.
(4) The department shall submit a report on the study in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the  committees or interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to natural resources no later than September
15, 2028.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to the State Department  of Fish and Wildlife, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000 for the
purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1  of this 2025 Act. This appropriation is
available continuously until expended for the purpose specified in this section.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4047