Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Policy  and Research Director shall cause to be studied the
accuracy of the fiscal impact  statements that are submitted by school districts to the Leg-
islative Fiscal Office during the legislative session.  The director shall submit a report on the
study in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the interim  committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to education no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 777