Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Early Learning and  Care shall establish a program
to award grants to child care resource and referral entities in Oregon  to provide resources
and referral services to parents or guardians of children, including but not limited to:
(a) Interviewing parents or guardians of  a child to determine the specific child care needs
of the parent  or guardian and child, including but not limited to needs related to age, devel-
opment, culture, language, hours and affordability.
(b) Coaching parents or guardians of children  who need child care services on how to
evaluate and apply to different child care providers and engage in effective self-advocacy.
(c) Vetting child care providers on behalf of a parent or guardian of a child  to assist with
determining whether a child care provider is able to provide  child care services that meet
the needs of the child of the parent or guardian.
(d) Providing a parent or guardian of a child a list of child care providers in  the parent
or guardian’s primary language that  have been vetted under paragraph (c) of this subsection
that meet  the needs of the child of the parent or guardian based upon the interview con-
ducted under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) Before issuing a grant under this  section, the department shall enter into a grant
agreement with the recipient.
(3) A recipient of a grant under this section may use the awarded moneys to cover ordi-
nary operating expenses, including but not limited to:
(a) Employing a part-time referral services specialist;
(b) Employing a part-time outreach specialist;
(c) Data collection;
(d) Interpretation services;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 883
HB 2452
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
(e) Technology;
(f) Rent; or
(g) Any  other reasonable expense associated with operating a child care resource and
referral entity.
(4) In determining the amount of a  grant, the department shall consider circumstances
justifying additional financial support, including but not limited to:
(a) The geographic location of the child care resource and referral entity;
(b) The number of families needing services in the geographic region;
(c) The difficulty of engaging in outreach;
(d) The  amount of interpretation services that will be needed to serve the community of
the region; and
(e) Any other unique operational or community needs.
(5) Each  recipient of a grant shall collect information about the child care needs of
families in the community and supply that information to:
(a) Child care providers in the community.
(b) Economic development organizations in the community.
(c) Local, state and federal policymakers, the Early Learning Council,  the school district
in which the recipient operates and any other interested community partner.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Early Learning  and Care, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $ , to administer  and award grants under
section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]