Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Higher Education Coordinating Commission  shall conduct a study to
determine the best method for allocating moneys to public post-secondary institutions  of
education. The commission shall submit a report in the manner  provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to higher education no later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2600