Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Financial institution” means a bank, a commercial  bank, a national bank, a savings
bank, a savings and  loan association, a credit union or other similar entity authorized to do
business in this state.
(b) “Provider” means a financial institution  or other provider of loan guarantees,
coinsurance or other forms of credit guarantees.
(c) “Qualified borrower” means:
(A) A veteran as defined in ORS 408.225;
(B) A  person who is a member of the Oregon National Guard who has been demobilized
after serving on federal active duty for more than 30 days; or
(C) A person who is an  Oregon resident, is a member of the reserves and has been de-
mobilized after serving on federal active duty for more than 30 days.
(2)(a) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall develop  a program under which provid-
ers contracting  with the department provide loan guarantees, coinsurance in conjunction
with other  providers of loan guarantee programs or other forms of credit guarantees for
qualified borrowers for the purpose of refinancing existing purchase-money mortgages or
similar mortgages of homes used primarily as principal residences by qualified borrowers.
(b) The department may enter into contracts with one or  more providers to implement
the program.
(c) A contract entered into between the department and a provider under this subsection
must require the provider to finance and service loans and mortgages refinanced under the
program. The contract  must prohibit the provider from selling loans or mortgages refinanced
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2554
HB 2878
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under the program to a third party.
(3) In administering the  program, the department shall consult and cooperate with the
providers contracting with the  department under subsection (2) of this section. The program
must be administered  so that administrative procedures and application procedures are as
responsive to  the needs of qualified borrowers and providers as practicable, consistent with
prudent investment and lending practices and criteria.
(4) The department shall prescribe by rule the procedure for a provider to submit a  loan
or credit guarantee application to the department on behalf of a qualified borrower.
(5) When the department approves a  loan or credit guarantee, the department shall enter
into a loan or credit guarantee agreement with the provider. The department may enter into
an agreement under this subsection only if sufficient funds are available  in the Veterans
Refinancing and Reintegration Services Fund established  in section 2 of this 2021 Act. The
agreement must specify:
(a) The fee to be charged to the provider, if any;
(b) The evidence of debt assurance of, and security for, the loan or credit guarantee;
(c) A loan or credit guarantee that does not exceed 15 years;
(d) That amounts that become due  and payable, including interest, under the agreement
are payable solely from amounts available in  the Veterans Refinancing and Reintegration
Services Fund;
(e) That amounts due and payable under the agreement  do not constitute a debt of the
state or a lending of the credit of  the state within the meaning of any constitutional or
statutory limitation, although nothing in this section  or in the terms of an agreement en-
tered into pursuant to  this section is intended to impair the rights of the provider to exercise
any rights granted to the providers against the security  for the loan or credit guarantee; and
(f) Other terms and conditions considered necessary or desirable by the department.
(6) The department may not pay  amounts due under a loan or credit guarantee agree-
ment from any source other than available funds in  the Veterans Refinancing and Reinte-
gration Services Fund. If there are insufficient available funds to pay amounts due  under a
loan or credit  guarantee agreement, the provider may exercise any rights granted to the
provider in the agreement against the security for the loan or credit guarantee and  may
apply amounts so received toward payments due under the agreement.
(7) The department, with due regard  for the possibility of losses and administrative costs,
shall set  fees and other terms at levels sufficient to reasonably ensure that the program is
self-financing.
SECTION 2.
(1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the
General Fund, the Veterans Refinancing and Reintegration Services Fund. Interest earned
on the  Veterans Refinancing and Reintegration Services Fund must be deposited into the
fund. All moneys in  the fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of Veterans’
Affairs for the following purposes:
(a) Payment of claims pursuant to contracts for loan or credit guarantees under section
1 of this 2021 Act.
(b) Payment of actual  and necessary expenses incurred by the department in adminis-
tering the fund and  establishing and maintaining the program developed under section 1 of
this 2021 Act.
(c) Repayment of transfers of funds required or authorized by law.
[2]
HB 2878
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
(d) Purchase or buyout of superior or prior liens, mortgages or security interests.
(2) Moneys in the Veterans Refinancing and Reintegration Services Fund consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the department by the  Legislative Assembly for deposit in the
fund.
(b) Proceeds from collateral assigned to the department.
(c) Interest earned on moneys in the fund.
(d) Transfers of moneys to the fund from any source.
(e) Fees assessed for guarantees, as determined by the department by rule.
(f) Moneys from gifts.
(g) Moneys from any  grant made to the department by any federal agency for deposit in
the fund.
SECTION 3.
The Oregon Department  of Administrative Services shall include in the
Governor’s budget for each fiscal period amounts sufficient  to permit the payment of all
amounts that will be due on unpaid loan and credit guarantees  under section 1 of this 2021
Act during that fiscal period.
[3]