Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Court Administrator shall study the most common types of
lawsuits brought in the Oregon courts and report to an appropriate committee or  interim
committee of the Legislative Assembly no later than September 1, 2018.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3399