Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 329.
SECTION 2. Every public school student in kindergarten through grade five, and every
public school student in grade six at a  school that teaches kindergarten through grade six,
shall be provided recess time of at least 30 minutes for each  school day that is at least five
hours.
SECTION 3. (1) Section 2 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
(2) Section 2 of this 2025 Act first applies to the 2026-2027 school year.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 339.250 is amended to read:
339.250. (1) Public school students shall comply with rules for the government of such  schools,
pursue the  prescribed course of study, use the prescribed textbooks and submit to the teachers’ au-
thority.
(2) Each district school board  shall adopt written policies for the discipline, suspension or ex-
pulsion of any refractory student. The policies:
(a) May allow  discipline, suspension or expulsion for conduct that includes, but is not limited
to:
(A) Willful disobedience;
(B) Open defiance of the authority of a school employee;
(C) Possession or distribution of tobacco, alcohol, drugs or other controlled substances;
(D) Use or display of profane or obscene language;
(E) Willful damage or injury to school property;
(F) Use of threats, intimidation,  harassment or coercion against a student or a school employee;
(G) Assault of a school employee or another student; or
(H) Intentional attempts, by word or conduct, to place a school employee or another  student in
fear of imminent serious physical injury.
(b) Must  require consideration of the age of a student and the past pattern of behavior of a
student prior to imposing the suspension or expulsion of a student.
(c) Must limit the use of expulsion to the following circumstances:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4427
SB 1126
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) For conduct that poses a threat to the health or safety of students or school employees;
(B) When other strategies  to change student conduct have been ineffective, except that expul-
sion may not be used to address truancy; or
(C) When the expulsion is required by law.
(d) In addition to any limitations imposed by paragraph  (c) of this subsection, for a student who
is in fifth grade or lower,  must limit the use of out-of-school suspension or of expulsion to the fol-
lowing  circumstances:
(A) For nonaccidental conduct causing serious physical harm to a student or school employee;
(B) When a school administrator determines, based  upon the administrator’s observation or upon
a report from a school employee, that the student’s conduct poses a direct threat  to the health or
safety of students or school employees; or
(C) When the suspension or expulsion is required by law.
(e) When an out-of-school  suspension is imposed as provided under paragraph (d) of this sub-
section, must require the school district to take steps to prevent  the recurrence of the behavior that
led to the out-of-school  suspension and return the student to a classroom setting so that the dis-
ruption of the student’s academic instruction is minimized.
(f) Must be limited so that:
(A) The duration of an expulsion may not be more than one calendar year.
(B) The duration of a suspension may not be more than 10 school days.
(g) Notwithstanding ORS  336.010, may require a student to attend school during nonschool hours
as an alternative to suspension if the total number of hours does not exceed the equivalent of 10
school days.
(h) May not allow for the withholding of  recess time or the imposition of physical activity
as a form of discipline.
(3) Pursuant to the policies adopted as provided by subsection (2) of this section, each  school
district shall develop a student handbook, code of conduct or other document that:
(a) Defines and helps create a learning environment that students respect;
(b) Defines acceptable  norms of behavior for students and the types of behavior that are subject
to discipline;
(c) Establishes procedures  to address behavior or circumstances that pose a threat to the safety
of students or employees of the school;
(d) Establishes a system of consequences that are designed to correct student misconduct  and
promote behavior within acceptable norms; and
(e) Makes  the system of consequences known to the school community through the dissemination
of information to students, parents, legal guardians and school district employees.
(4) Each district school board shall  adopt written policies on managing students who threaten
violence  or  harm in public schools. The policies adopted by a district school board under this section
shall include all of the following:
(a) Staff reporting methods.
(b) Provisions that allow an administrator to  consider and implement any of the following
options:
(A) Immediately removing from the classroom setting any student who has  threatened to injure
another person or to severely damage school property.
(B) Placing the student in a setting  where the behavior will receive immediate attention, in-
cluding, but not limited to, the  office of the school principal, vice principal, assistant principal,
[2]
SB 1126
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
counselor or a school  psychologist licensed by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission or
the office of any licensed mental health professional.
(C) Requiring that a school obtain an evaluation of a student by a licensed mental  health pro-
fessional before allowing the student to return to the classroom setting.  A student who is removed
from the classroom setting for an evaluation may not be removed for more than  10 school days un-
less the administrator is able to show good  cause that an evaluation could not be completed in that
time period. The policy must describe the circumstances under which the district school board may
enter into contracts with  licensed mental health professionals to perform any evaluations required
under this subparagraph.
(c) The requirement that an administrator provide to the parent or legal  guardian of the student
notification that describes the student’s behavior and the school’s response.
(d) A provision for the allocation of any funds necessary for the school  district to implement the
policies described in this subsection.
(5) In establishing  and enforcing discipline, suspension and expulsion policies, a district school
board shall ensure that the policy is designed to:
(a) Protect students and school employees from harm;
(b) Provide opportunities for students to learn from their mistakes;
(c) Foster positive learning communities;
(d) Keep students in school and attending class;
(e) Impose disciplinary sanctions without bias  against students from a protected class, as defined
in ORS 339.351;
(f) Implement a graduated  set of age-appropriate responses to misconduct that are fair,
nondiscriminatory and proportionate in relation to each student’s individual conduct;
(g) Employ a range of strategies  for prevention, intervention and discipline that take into ac-
count a student’s developmental  capacities and that are proportionate to the degree and severity
of the student’s misbehavior;
(h) Propose, prior to  a student’s expulsion or leaving school, alternative programs of instruction
or instruction combined with counseling for the student that are appropriate and accessible to  the
student in the following circumstances:
(A) Following a second or subsequent occurrence within any three-year period of a severe  dis-
ciplinary problem with the student; or
(B) When a parent or legal guardian applies for the student’s exemption from compulsory  at-
tendance on a semiannual basis as provided in ORS 339.030 (2);
(i) To the extent practicable, use  approaches that are shown through research to be effective in
reducing student misbehavior and promoting safe and productive social behavior; and
(j) Ensure that school conduct and discipline codes  comply with all state and federal laws con-
cerning the education of students with disabilities.
(6) Except for policies  adopted under subsection (7) of this section, any policies adopted under
this section must provide for the dissemination  of information about alternative programs of in-
struction  or  instruction combined with counseling, as described in subsection (5)(h) of this section,
in writing to the student and the parent, legal guardian or person in parental relationship with the
student at least once  every six months, unless the information has changed because of the avail-
ability of new programs.
(7) Each district school board shall adopt  a written policy involving firearms, as defined in 18
U.S.C. 921. The policy shall:
[3]
SB 1126
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Require expulsion from  school for a period of not less than one year of any student who is
determined to have:
(A) Brought a firearm  to a school, to school property under the jurisdiction of the school district
or to an activity under the jurisdiction of the school district;
(B) Possessed, concealed or used a firearm in a school, on  school property under the jurisdiction
of the school district or at an activity under the jurisdiction of the school district; or
(C) Brought  to or possessed, concealed or used a firearm at an interscholastic activity adminis-
tered by a voluntary organization.
(b) Allow exceptions:
(A) For courses, programs and activities approved  by the school district that are conducted on
school property, including, but not  limited to, hunter safety courses, Reserve Officer Training Corps
programs, firearm-related sports or firearm-related vocational courses; and
(B) Identified by and adopted by the State Board of Education by rule.
(c) Allow a superintendent of a school district to:
(A) Modify the expulsion requirement for a student on a case-by-case basis.
(B) Propose  alternative programs of instruction or instruction combined with counseling for a
student that are  appropriate and accessible to the student. If alternative programs are appropriate
for a student,  the superintendent shall ensure that information about programs of instruction or in-
struction combined with counseling is provided  in writing to the student and the parent, legal
guardian or person in parental  relationship with the student at least once every six months, or at
any time the information changes because of the availability of new programs.
(d) Require  a referral to the appropriate law enforcement agency of any student who is expelled
under this subsection.
(e) Require an annual reporting to the Department of Education of the name of  each school that
had an expulsion under this subsection and the number of students expelled from each school.
(8) Each district school board shall adopt and disseminate written policies for the use of physical
force upon a student. The policies  must allow an individual who is a teacher, administrator, school
employee or school  volunteer to use reasonable physical force upon a student when and to the ex-
tent the application of force is consistent with ORS 339.285 to 339.303.
(9)(a) The authority to discipline a student does not  authorize the infliction of corporal punish-
ment. Every resolution, bylaw, rule, ordinance or other act of a district school board, a public
charter school or the  Department of Education that permits or authorizes the infliction of corporal
punishment upon a student is void and unenforceable.
(b) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Corporal punishment” means the willful infliction of, or willfully causing the  infliction of,
physical pain on a student.
(B) “Corporal punishment” does not include:
(i) The use of physical force  authorized by ORS 161.205 (2), (4) or (5) for the reasons specified
therein; or
(ii) Physical pain or  discomfort resulting from or caused by participation in athletic competition
or other such recreational activity, voluntarily engaged in by a student.
(10) For purposes of this section,  calculations of the number of school days that a student is
removed from a classroom setting shall be as follows:
(a) As a half day  if the student is out of school for half, or less than half, of the scheduled school
day; and
[4]
SB 1126
1
2
(b) As a full day if the student is out of school for more than half of the scheduled school day.
[5]