Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at the request  of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  after the department consults with the Historic
Portland Public Market Foundation, the State Treasurer is  authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $10 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of this  section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds  of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS Economic  Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to the Historic Portland Public Market Foundation  for
construction of the James Beard Public Market in Portland.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will create  jobs,
further economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding that
the James Beard Public Market will facilitate economic development by  invigorating down-
town Portland, promoting local farming and food  industries and providing a central location
for local vendors.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4013