Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 178.335 is amended to read:
178.335. (1) An account owner may establish an account  by  completing the appropriate plan
application and making an initial contribution to the Oregon 529  Savings Network in the name of
the designated beneficiary. An applicant must select from the investment options offered  by a
plan. Once a contribution is made it becomes part of the network and subject to  the provisions of
ORS 178.300 to 178.355.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, to the extent allowed by federal  law,
if an applicant does not  select from the investment options offered by a plan, the applicant
shall be enrolled in the investment option that the Oregon 529 Savings Board determines is
most appropriate for the  greatest number of participants. The board may delegate responsi-
bility for making the determination under this subsection  to a person designated by the
board.
[(2)] (3) Any person may make a contribution to an account once an account is opened.
[(3)] (4) Contributions to an account shall be made only in  cash and may be deposited as pro-
vided in ORS 305.796.
[(4)] (5) Total contributions to all accounts established on behalf of a particular beneficiary  may
not exceed those reasonably necessary to provide for  the qualified higher education expenses of the
designated beneficiary. The [ Oregon 529 Savings ] board shall establish maximum contribution limits
applicable to network accounts and shall require the provision of any  information from the account
owner and the designated beneficiary that the board deems necessary to establish these limits.
[(5)] (6) Separate records  and accounting shall be required for each account and reports shall
be made no less frequently than annually to the account owner.
[(6)] (7) The board  may collect application, account or administrative fees to defray the costs
of the network.
[(7)] (8) This section applies only to accounts established for qualified higher  education ex-
penses.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 178.335 by section 1 of this 2017 Act apply to ap-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2314
HB 2508
1
2
plications made on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
[2]