Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Behavioral health clinician” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(b) “Behavioral health crisis” means a disruption in an individual’s mental or emotional
stability or functioning resulting in an urgent need for  immediate treatment to prevent a
serious deterioration in the individual’s mental or physical health.
(c) “Caring contacts”  means brief communications with an individual that begin when the
individual transitions from one level of care or care setting  to another level of care or care
setting, or when an individual misses an appointment or withdraws from treatment,  and
continue as long as a provider deems necessary.
(d) “Patient” means an individual admitted to  a hospital, or presenting to an emergency
department of a hospital, for behavioral health treatment.
(e) “Provider” means a behavioral health clinician or any of  the following individuals, as
defined in ORS 414.025:
(A) Peer support specialist.
(B) Peer wellness specialist.
(C) Family support specialist.
(D) Youth support specialist.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish or  contract for the establishment of a
statewide mental health  crisis support access line to provide to hospital staff the following
services:
(a) Facilitating caring contacts for a patient who presented with a behavioral health cri-
sis to transition to a provider in the community; and
(b) Follow-up services for a patient who presented with a behavioral  health crisis to en-
sure a successful transition to outpatient services.
(3) If a behavioral health clinician determines that  a patient attempted suicide or expe-
rienced suicidal ideation, the statewide mental health crisis support access line must attempt
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2091
SB 141
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
to initiate caring contacts within 48 hours of the patient’s release from the hospital.
SECTION 2. The Oregon Health Authority shall report to the regular session  of the
Eighty-first Legislative Assembly, in the  manner provided in ORS 192.245, on the barriers
within each community in this state that limit the availability  of appropriate follow-up care
for a patient released or discharged from  a hospital following treatment for a behavioral
health crisis, as defined in section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. No later  than September 15, 2020, the Oregon Health Authority shall report
to the interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to health, in the manner
provided in ORS 192.245, recommendations for increasing  access to providers in each com-
munity in this state to meet  the needs of each patient who is released from an emergency
department following treatment for a behavioral health crisis, as defined in section 1 of this
2019 Act.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,000, which  may be expended for carrying out the provisions
of section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 5.
Section 1 of this 2019 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2019.
SECTION 6. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]