Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 419B.005  to
419B.050.
SECTION 2. (1) An interview conducted by the Department of Human Services or a law
enforcement agency in the course of an investigation under ORS 418.258 and  418.259 or under
ORS 419B.020 shall be electronically recorded if the subject of the interview is the alleged
perpetrator of the abuse.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) A statement made before a grand jury;
(b) A statement made on the record in open court;
(c) An interview conducted in another state in compliance with the laws of that state;
(d) An interview conducted by a federal law enforcement  officer in compliance with the
laws of the United States;
(e) A statement that was spontaneously volunteered and did not result from an interview;
(f) A statement made during arrest processing in response to a routine question; or
(g) An  interview for which the state demonstrates good cause for the failure to elec-
tronically record the interview.
(3) An interview conducted by the Department  of Human Services or a law enforcement
agency in the course of an investigation under ORS 418.258 and 418.259 or 419B.020  may be
electronically recorded if the subject of the  interview is not the alleged perpetrator of the
abuse.
(4) For purposes of ORS 419B.035, a recording made under this section is a record.
(5) As used in this section “good cause” includes, but is not limited  to, situations in
which:
(a) The subject of the interview refused, or expressed an unwillingness,  to have the
interview electronically recorded;
(b) The failure to  electronically record the interview was the result of equipment failure
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2099
SB 743
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
and a replacement device was not immediately available;
(c) The  person operating the recording equipment believed, in good faith, that the
equipment was recording the interview;
(d) Electronically recording the interview would jeopardize the safety of any person;
(e) Exigent circumstances prevented the recording of the interview; or
(f) The person  conducting the interview reasonably believed, at the time the interview
began, that the  interview was conducted in connection with a matter unconnected to the
investigation or that the  subject of the interview was not a suspected perpetrator of the
abuse.
[2]