Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is created within the Criminal Justice Division of the Department of
Justice a Deadly Force Prosecutions Unit specializing in the investigation and  prosecution
of cases involving law enforcement use of force that results in death.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to  the Department of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended for purposes of  the Deadly Force
Prosecutions Unit created in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3275