Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department of Energy shall conduct a study to:
(a) Quantify and compare the costs:
(A) Approved by the Public Utility Commission and incurred or to be incurred  by
investor-owned utilities in this state for acquiring or  maintaining renewable energy gener-
ation facilities; and
(B) Paid by investor-owned utilities to qualifying facilities  under the terms of the Public
Utility Regulatory Policies Act of 1978 (16 U.S.C. 2601 et. seq.);
(b) Further examine and develop the findings on the costs of small-scale renewable en-
ergy projects developed by the work group convened  pursuant to section 18, chapter 508,
Oregon Laws 2021; and
(c) Analyze the accuracy  of avoided cost schedules over time comparing the avoided costs
under contract terms with the costs actually paid under the contracts.
(2) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed, to the ex-
tent permitted by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish  such information and advice to
the department as the department considers necessary to complete the study under this
section.
(3) The department shall submit a report in the manner provided  by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim  committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to energy no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1704