Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 471.705 is amended to read:
471.705. (1) There  is created the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission, consisting of nine
commissioners appointed by the Governor[ .] as follows:
(a)(A) One commissioner must be  from among the residents of each congressional district of this
state.
(B) One additional commissioner must be from eastern Oregon.
(C) One additional commissioner must be from western Oregon.
(D) One additional commissioner must represent the public at large.
(E) One commissioner must be from the food and alcoholic beverage retail industry.
(F) At least one of the commissioners must hold a license issued under ORS 475C.065,
475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097.
(b) Not more than five commissioners may be of the same political party.
(c) The Governor shall designate one commissioner to be chairperson of the commission.
(d) The commissioners are entitled to compensation and expenses as provided in ORS 292.495.
(2) Each commissioner at the time of appointment  must be a resident of this state and must have
resided in this state for at least five years next preceding appointment and qualification. Each
commissioner must be an elector in this state and may not be less than 30 years of age. The term
of office  of a commissioner terminates if the commissioner ceases to possess the residency or in-
dustry qualification for appointment. If the term of office of a  commissioner terminates under this
subsection, the Governor shall appoint a qualified individual to complete  the unexpired term of the
commissioner.
(3) The term of office  of a commissioner is four years from the time of appointment and quali-
fication and until a successor qualifies for  appointment. The terms of the commissioners commence
April 1. If a commissioner is allowed to hold office  after the expiration of a term, the Governor shall
appoint the successor for the remainder of the unexpired term. If a vacancy occurs  in the commis-
sion, the Governor shall appoint the successor  for the remainder of the unexpired term. Each com-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 842
SB 557
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
missioner is eligible for reappointment, but an  individual is not eligible to serve for more than two
full terms.
(4) Appointments of commissioners by the Governor  under this section are subject to confirma-
tion by the Senate pursuant to [ section 4, ] Article III, section 4, of the  Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 2.
The amendments  to ORS 471.705 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to com-
missioners appointed to the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission on or after  the effec-
tive date of this 2025 Act.
[2]