Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Law Libraries is established.
(2) The task force consists of nine members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint one  member from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall appoint seven members as follows:
(A) Three representatives of law libraries in counties of various sizes;
(B) One judge of a circuit court;
(C) One district attorney;
(D) One public defense attorney; and
(E) One representative of an organization that provides legal aid services.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Develop a definition of “law library services” to provide more guidance to counties
on how law library funds should be used to effectively serve the public; and
(b) Explore ways to make funding  for county law libraries sufficient to provide these
services.
(4) A  majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(5) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority  of the voting
members of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2056
HB 3763
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for  legislation, to an interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly related to the judiciary no later than December 15, 2026.
(11) The Judicial Department shall provide staff support to the task force.
(12) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force  are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(13) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(14) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]