Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 164.055 is amended to read:
164.055. (1) A person commits the crime of theft in the first degree if, by means  other than
extortion, the person commits theft as defined in ORS 164.015 and:
(a) The total value of the property in a single or aggregate transaction is $1,000 or more;
(b) The theft is committed during a riot, fire, explosion,  catastrophe or other emergency in an
area affected by the riot, fire, explosion, catastrophe or other emergency;
(c) The theft is  theft by receiving committed by buying, selling, borrowing or lending on the
security of the property;
(d) The subject of the theft is a firearm or explosive;
(e) The subject of the theft is a livestock  animal, a companion animal or a wild animal removed
from habitat or born of a wild animal removed from habitat, pursuant to ORS 497.308 (2)(c);
(f) The subject of the theft is a precursor substance; [ or]
(g) The subject of the theft is a controlled substance or a prescription medication; or
[(g)] (h)  During the commission of the theft, the person recklessly  engages in conduct that cre-
ates a substantial risk of serious physical injury to another person.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “Companion animal”  means a dog or cat possessed by a person, business or other entity for
purposes of companionship, security, hunting, herding or providing assistance in relation  to a phys-
ical disability.
(b) “Controlled substance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475.005.
(c) “Drug” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475.005.
[(b)] (d)  “Explosive” means a chemical compound,  mixture or device that is commonly used or
intended for the purpose  of producing a chemical reaction resulting in a substantially instantaneous
release of gas and  heat, including but not limited to dynamite, blasting powder, nitroglycerin,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3775
HB 3697
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
blasting caps and nitrojelly, but excluding fireworks as  defined in ORS 480.111, black powder,
smokeless powder, small arms ammunition and small arms ammunition primers.
[(c)] (e)  “Firearm” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.210.
[(d)] (f)  “Livestock animal” means a ratite, psittacine, horse, gelding,  mare, filly, stallion, colt,
mule, ass, jenny, bull, steer, cow, calf, goat, sheep, lamb, llama, pig or hog.
(g) “Practitioner” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475.005.
[(e)] (h)  “Precursor substance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475.940.
(i) “Prescription medication” means a  drug prepared under the written, oral or elec-
tronically transmitted direction of a practitioner.
(3) Theft in the first degree is a Class C felony.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 164.205 is amended to read:
164.205. As used in ORS 164.205 to 164.270, except as the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Building,” in addition to its ordinary meaning, includes any booth, vehicle,  boat, aircraft
or other  structure adapted for overnight accommodation of persons or for carrying on business
therein. Where a building consists  of separate units, including, but not limited to, separate apart-
ments, offices or rented rooms, each unit is, in addition to being a part of  such building, a separate
building.
(2) “Controlled substance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475.005.
(3) “Drug” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475.005.
[(2)] (4) “Dwelling” means a building which regularly  or intermittently is occupied by a person
lodging therein at night, whether or not a person is actually present.
[(3)] (5) “Enter or remain unlawfully” means:
(a) To enter or  remain in or upon premises when the premises, at the time of such entry or re-
maining, are not open to the public and when the entrant is not otherwise licensed  or privileged to
do so;
(b) To fail to leave premises that are open to the public after being lawfully directed  to do so
by the person in charge;
(c) To enter premises that are open to  the public after being lawfully directed not to enter the
premises; or
(d) To enter or remain in a motor vehicle when the entrant is not authorized to do so.
[(4)] (6) “Open to the public” means premises  which by their physical nature, function, custom,
usage, notice or lack thereof or other circumstances at  the time would cause a reasonable person
to believe that no permission to enter or remain is required.
[(5)] (7) “Person in charge” means a person, a representative or employee of  the person who has
lawful control of premises by ownership, tenancy, official position  or other legal relationship. “Per-
son in charge” includes[ ,] but is not limited to  the person, or holder of a position, designated as the
person or position-holder in charge by the Governor, board, commission or governing body of  any
political subdivision of this state.
(8) “Pharmacy” has the meaning given that term in ORS 689.005.
(9) “Practitioner” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475.005.
[(6)] (10) “Premises” includes any building and any real property, whether  privately or publicly
owned.
(11) “Prescription medication” means a drug prepared  under the written, oral or elec-
tronically transmitted direction of a practitioner.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 164.225 is amended to read:
[2]
HB 3697
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
164.225. (1) A person commits the crime  of burglary in the first degree if the person violates
ORS 164.215 and :
(a) The building is a dwelling[ , or ];
(b) The building is primarily used as a pharmacy;
(c) The building contains a pharmacy, and the person enters  or remains unlawfully in the
building with intent to commit theft  of prescription medications or controlled substances
therein; or
(d) If in effecting entry or while in a building or in immediate flight therefrom the person:
[(a)] (A)  Is armed with a burglary tool or theft device as defined in ORS  164.235 or a deadly
weapon;
[(b)] (B)  Causes or attempts to cause physical injury to any person; or
[(c)] (C) Uses or threatens to use a dangerous weapon.
(2) Burglary in the first degree is a Class A felony.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]