Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $4,000,000, for the  purpose of screening newborns under the
Northwest Regional Newborn Bloodspot Screening Program for:
(1) Mucopolysaccharidosis type II (MPS II).
(2) Guanidinoacetate methyltransferase deficiency (GAMT).
(3) Krabbe disease.
(4) Duchenne muscular dystrophy.
(5) Cytomegalovirus.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1910