Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in  this section, “local workforce development board” and
“workforce program” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 660.300.
(2) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall provide  grants to soil and
water conservation districts organized  under ORS 568.210 to 568.808 and 568.900 to 568.933 and
counties for the removal of western juniper to minimize the negative impacts of  western
juniper on water resources and ecological health.
(3) Grant recipients shall use grant funds only to:
(a) Remove western juniper in areas where removal will  provide the greatest benefit to
water resources and ecological health, as determined by the grant recipient;
(b) Remove  western juniper at times, and using methods, that will reduce the risk of
repropagation after removal; and
(c) Cover the administrative expenses of the grant recipient related to the grant  pro-
gram, except that no more than eight percent of  grant funds may be used to cover admin-
istrative expenses.
(4) Grant applicants may consult with Oregon State University, local governments,  as
defined in ORS 174.116, conservation organizations  or other organizations or experts to
identify areas that meet the criteria described in subsection (3)(a) of this section.
(5) A grant recipient shall:
(a) Work with Oregon State University to track and  monitor the effects of the program
on water resources, ecological health and economic and workforce development and  to pro-
vide quarterly and annual reports to the department; and
(b) Work with a local workforce development board to establish a workforce program
that provides services to individuals performing western juniper removal work or to allow
individuals performing western juniper removal work to participate in an existing workforce
program.
(6) The department shall prepare an annual report based on the reports received  by the
department under subsection (5)(a) of this section.  The department shall submit the report
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2481
HB 3142
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
in the manner  provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation,
to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to water no later  than Sep-
tember 15 of each year.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the following amounts which may be expended for the
purposes of providing grants under section 1 of this 2023 Act, as follows:
(1) $1,750,000 for providing a grant to a soil and water conservation  district located in
Crook County.
(2) $1,250,000 for providing  a grant to a soil and water conservation district located in
Jefferson County.
(3) $1,000,000 for providing a grant to a soil and water conservation  district located in
Klamath County.
(4) $500,000 for providing a grant to a soil and water conservation district located in
Deschutes County.
(5) $2,500,000 for  providing a grant to soil and water conservation district located in
Harney County.
(6) $1,000,000 for providing  a grant to a soil and water conservation district located in
Lake County.
(7) $1,000,000 for providing a grant to Wheeler County.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning  July 1,
2023, out of the General Fund, $800,000  for distribution to Oregon State University for the
purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4. The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall provide  the grants
described in section 2 of this 2023 Act  no later than July 1, 2023, or 60 days after the effective
date of this 2023 Act, whichever is later.
SECTION 5. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]