Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 8 of this 2021 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
197.
SECTION 2. Changes to planning goals to address climate justice.  (1) The Land Conser-
vation and Development Commission shall make changes  to the statewide land use planning
goals, including by amending  existing goals or adopting additional goals, to support climate
change adaptation and mitigation and environmental justice for disadvantaged communities.
(2) Changes to the goals under this section:
(a) Notwithstanding ORS 197.235, require only a single public hearing before adoption.
(b) Must be conducted in the manner provided in ORS 197.235, 197.240 and 197.245,  to the
extent not inconsistent with this section.
(c) Must contain implementation standards and guidelines.
(d) Must be completed by December 31, 2026.
(3) With respect to climate change, the changes  to goals under this section must include
requirements or guidelines compelling local governments and applicable state agencies to:
(a) Establish and update measurable targets and processes for obtaining the targets for:
(A) Climate change mitigation,  including any activities that reduce greenhouse gas
emissions or enhance the sinks of greenhouse gases.
(B) Climate change adaptation, including any processes  of adjustment to actual or ex-
pected climate and the effects of changes to the expected climate.
(C) The sequestration  and storage of greenhouse gases, including any process, activity
or mechanism that removes a greenhouse gas, an aerosol or a  precursor of a greenhouse gas
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1900
HB 2488
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
from the atmosphere.
(b) Identify and map anticipated impacts to public  resources and local communities from
climate change.
(4) With  respect to environmental justice, the changes to goals under this section must
include requirements or guidelines compelling local governments and applicable  state agen-
cies to:
(a) Include disadvantaged communities in land use planning and decisions.
(b) Determine and address local issues of diversity,  equality and environmental justice,
including through impacts on the health, economic and social conditions of  disadvantaged
communities.
(c) Identify and map disadvantaged communities, using relevant,  credible data, including
data from the United States Environmental Protection Agency, other federal  or state agen-
cies, nonprofit organizations and local programs.
(d) Identify, quantify and  map unique and cumulative health risks to disadvantaged
communities caused by land uses, including risks from:
(A) Pollution exposure;
(B) Climate-related or other natural hazards;
(C) Lack of access to public facilities, including  schools, parks, community centers,
emergency shelters, emergency command centers and facilities for  emergency communi-
cations, transportation, water supply, sewage and solid waste and health care; and
(D) Lack of access to services, healthful foods, affordable and adequate housing,  open
spaces or spaces for physical activity.
(e) Reduce or mitigate  unique and cumulative health risks to disadvantaged communities.
(f) Build a resilient and equitable response to future climate impacts to public health and
safety.
(g) Require equal and fair notice to Native American  tribes and tribal communities and
provide consultation  and mutual concurrence when land use decisions impact lands and na-
tural resources that are owned and managed by a tribal government.
(h) Develop land use objectives and policies that build a resilient and equitable response
to future climate impacts to public health and safety.
(i) Achieve broad,  diverse, fair and equitable notice and participation by disadvantaged
communities in consideration of:
(A) Land use decision-making, not limited to environmental justice issues; and
(B) Strategies and methods for achieving the goals under this subsection.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) “Communities” means groups  of people living in a common geographic area within a
shared political jurisdiction or  area in which they live, work, learn and practice spirituality
and culture.
(b) “Disadvantaged communities” includes communities  with a population largely com-
posed of individuals who are low income, very low income or persons of color.
(c) “Environmental justice” means equal protection  from environmental and health haz-
ards, and meaningful public participation  in decisions that affect the environment in which
people live, work, learn and practice spirituality and culture.
(d) “Low income” and “very low income” have the meanings given those terms in ORS
458.610.
[2]
HB 2488
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) “Persons of color” may include,  as determined by the commission, individuals who
identify as:
(A) Black or African American;
(B) Hispanic or Latino;
(C) Asian or Asian American;
(D) Native Hawaiian or Pacific Islander;
(E) American Indian or Alaska Native having origins in one of  the original peoples of
North America;
(F) Arabic or North African;
(G) Middle Eastern;
(H) Mixed-race or mixed-ethnicity; or
(I) Another ethnicity or race that, historically and currently, experiences health, eco-
nomic and ecological disparities.
SECTION 3.
Compliance with goals.  Notwithstanding ORS 197.250, comprehensive plans,
land use regulations, plans and zoning ordinances rules must comply with the  changes to the
statewide land use planning goals under section 2 of this 2021 Act on or before the date:
(1) 90 days after the adoption of the changes for state agencies, for cities with  a popu-
lation of more than 25,000 and for counties with a population of more than 250,000.
(2) 270 days after the adoption of the changes for cities with a population  of at least
10,000 and not more than 25,000 and for counties with a population of at least 100,000 and  not
more than 250,000.
(3) 540 days after the adoption of the changes for cities with  a population of less than
10,000 and for counties with a population of less than 100,000.
SECTION 4. Environmental justice advisory committee.  (1) On or before 60 days following
the effective date  of this 2021 Act, the Department of Land Conservation and Development
shall establish an advisory committee to advise the department on environmental justice
changes to the statewide land use planning goals under section 2 (4) of this 2021 Act.
(2) The department shall appoint up to 11 individuals as  members of the committee, in-
cluding:
(a) A majority with experience and interests in working  with environmental and social
justice communities and issues.
(b) At least one member with significant  academic or professional knowledge and exper-
tise in using modern technology and communications to enhance and promote  governmental
public outreach, engagement and interactive participation.
(3) The chairperson of the Land Conservation and Development Commission shall select
one member of the advisory  committee to serve as chairperson of the advisory committee,
with the duties  and powers necessary to perform the functions of the office as the chair-
person of the commission determines.
SECTION 5.
Interim climate justice standards.  (1) On or before July 1, 2021, the  Land
Conservation and Development Commission shall adopt by rule interim standards to operate
in lieu of the goal amendments required by section 2 of this 2021 Act for local governments.
(2) The interim standards shall include standards for:
(a) Environmental justice, equity and public participation, taking  into consideration the
Environmental Justice Task Force best practices handbook and the State  of Oregon’s Cli-
mate Equity Blueprint;
[3]
HB 2488
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Climate adaptation risks and responses based on the  commission’s December 2010
“Oregon Climate Change Adaptation Framework” and November  15, 2020, “Draft Oregon
Climate Change Adaptation Framework”;
(c) Reducing greenhouse gases; and
(d) Capturing, storing and sequestering greenhouse gases on:
(A) Lands zoned for exclusive farm use as described in ORS 215.203;
(B) Lands zoned for forest uses; and
(C) Other lands of this state.
(3) The interim standards under subsection (2)(b) to (d) of this section must take into
consideration state  and federal goals for reducing greenhouse gases, including under ORS
468A.205.
(4) The interim standards adopted  under this section apply to land use decisions, expe-
dited land divisions and limited land use decisions of a local government from 60 days  after
the standards are adopted until the local government has adopted changes to the local
government’s comprehensive plan or regional framework plan that  are acknowledged by the
commission to be in compliance with the goals as changed under section 2 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 6.
Local government report to commission.  On  a schedule published by the
Land Conservation and Development Commission, each local government shall  report to the
Department of Land Conservation and Development  on the local government’s compliance
with the interim standards under section 5 of this 2021 Act or  the adopted changes to the
statewide land use planning goals under section 2 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 7. Commission report to  Legislative Assembly.  No later than September 15 of
each year, the Land Conservation and Development Commission shall provide a report  to the
appropriate interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly, in the manner provided under
ORS 192.245, on  the progress under sections 2 to 8 of this 2021 Act by the commission, local
governments and the advisory committee established under section 4 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 8. Climate Justice Planning Goals Fund.  (1) There is established the Climate
Justice Planning Goals Fund, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The Climate Justice Planning Goals Fund shall consist of moneys credited to the fund
from moneys appropriated or transferred to  the fund by the Legislative Assembly or received
from the federal government or other grants, gifts or donations from any source.
(3) All moneys received under this section by the Land Conservation and  Development
Commission, Department of Land Conservation and Development or the  advisory committee
established under section 4 of  this 2021 Act must be paid into the State Treasury to the
credit of the fund.
(4) Moneys  in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Land Conservation and De-
velopment Commission for purpose of  administering and implementing sections 2 to 8 of this
2021 Act.
SECTION 9. Sunset. (1) Sections 5 to 7 of this 2021 Act are repealed on January 2, 2030.
(2) Sections 2 to 4 and 8 of this 2021 Act are repealed on January 2 of the year following
the adoption of changes to the statewide  planning goals under section 2 of this 2021 Act as
certified by the  Land Conservation and Development Commission to the Secretary of State
and the Legislative Counsel.
(3) The repeal of section 2 of this 2021 Act by this  section does not affect any amendment
to the statewide land use planning goals under section  2 of this 2021 Act or excuse compli-
[4]
HB 2488
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
ance with the amended goals, including under ORS 197.250.
SECTION 10.
Appropriation. In addition  to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,
there is  appropriated to the Department of Land Conservation and Development, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $850,000, for deposit
into the Climate Justice Planning Goals Fund under section 8 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 11. Section captions.  The section captions used  in this 2021 Act are provided
only for the convenience of the reader and do not become part  of the statutory law of this
state or express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 12. Emergency clause.  This 2021 Act being  necessary for the immediate pres-
ervation of the public peace, health  and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this
2021 Act takes effect on its passage.
[5]