Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Medical Board shall study the benefits and drawbacks of issuing
licenses to physicians and physician associates who received training outside of  the United
States. The board shall submit a report in  the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may
include recommendations for  legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative As-
sembly related to health care no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1774