Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 163A.230 is amended to read:
163A.230. (1)(a) When information about a person is first entered into the Law Enforcement Data
System under ORS 163A.035, the person will be assigned a registry identification number.
(b) A victim shall be issued a victim identification number and shall be given the registry  iden-
tification number of the person who committed the crime against the victim:
(A) At any time, upon request by the victim; and
(B) Upon verification of the identification of the victim.
(2) The Department of State Police shall establish a  toll-free telephone number to provide vic-
tims with updates on the  prison status, release information, parole status and any other information
authorized for release under ORS 163A.005 to 163A.235  regarding the person who committed the
crime against the victim. The telephone line shall be operational within the state during normal
working hours.
(3) Access of the victim to the telephone line shall be  revoked if the victim makes public, or
otherwise misuses, information received.
(4) When a victim receives notification under ORS 144.750 of upcoming parole  release hearings,
or at any other time that the victim is notified concerning the offender, the victim shall be provided
a notice of rights under this section and information about the toll-free telephone number.
(5) As used in this section, “victim” means:
(a) Any person determined by the prosecuting attorney, the court or the department to
have suffered direct psychological or physical harm as a  result of the sex crime that resulted
in a person having to report as a sex offender;
(b) Any person determined by the department to  have suffered direct psychological or
physical harm as a result of some other crime  connected to the sex crime that resulted in
a person having to report as a sex offender, or connected to the sentence for that sex  crime,
including but not limited to crimes connected through plea negotiations,  crimes admitted at
trial to prove an element of the offense or crimes  used as a basis for a departure sentence,
a merged conviction or a concurrent or consecutive sentence; or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4577
SB 1009
1
2
3
4
(c) Any person against whom the person who must report as a sex offender has admitted
to committing conduct constituting a sex crime,  if the conduct was not the subject of a
criminal prosecution due to the time limitations described in ORS 131.125.
[2]