Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $2,500,000, for purposes of implementing
section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall enter into a
contract with the Oregon Association of Water Utilities to implement this section. The con-
tract must include, but need not be limited to, a provision requiring the association to:
(a) Provide technical assistance, or enter into a contract  with a third party to provide
technical assistance, to address the needs and vulnerabilities of small and very small com-
munity water systems as identified in the report generated  under section 24, chapter 606,
Oregon Laws 2023.
(b) Construct and procure equipment for a  water utility training center to provide tech-
nical, financial and managerial support and  resources to individuals, including support and
resources related to:
(A) Water supply reliability.
(B) Source and treated water quality.
(C) Utility board and operations management.
(D) Workforce development.
(E) Infrastructure.
(F) Emergency preparedness and response.
(G) Information technology, management and cyber security.
(H) Funding, financial stability and water rates.
(I) Regulations and safe drinking water standards.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1475
HB 3121
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
(J) Applying for and managing funds  associated with state and federal funding programs.
(K) Assessing and supporting opportunities for emergency interties,  system consolidation
and regionalization.
(c) Employ three staff to provide support and resources to address the needs and  vul-
nerabilities of small and very small community water systems in this state.
(2) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services  shall distribute moneys to the
Oregon Association of Water Utilities for the purposes of carrying out subsection (1) of this
section.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]