Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department  of Human Services shall prescribe by rule a uniform pay-
ment methodology for providers  of independent living program transition services for foster
children that:
(1) Takes into consideration the number of  hours a provider spends providing in-person
services;
(2) Takes into  consideration the amount of time a provider spends on outreach to foster
children who are difficult to reach, including  time locating and communicating with foster
children and encouraging foster children to enroll in transition services; and
(3) Ensures adequate capacity  to provide services, based on the average monthly popu-
lation served over the prior 12 months, to ensure that staff  is not lost during participation
fluctuations.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3403