Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Transportation,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000 for the  purpose of funding projects that promote
safe road crossings and connectivity for wildlife as defined in  ORS 496.004. This appropriation
is available continuously until expended for the purpose specified in this section.
(2) The department shall consult with the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife when
distributing moneys appropriated under this section, and  shall take into consideration rele-
vant information, including  the Wildlife Corridor Action Plan described in ORS 496.272, the
Oregon Conservation Strategy adopted by the State  Fish and Wildlife Commission and pub-
lished by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife in September of 2006  and the Oregon
Connectivity Assessment and Mapping Project.
(3) The Department of Transportation:
(a) May distribute moneys under  this section for the full range of wildlife corridor project
needs, including but not limited to project feasibility  studies, planning, construction, retrofit
and maintenance of wildlife road crossing infrastructure, roadkill tracking and studies, ani-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 189
HB 4130
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
mal detection systems, signage, exclusionary fencing and wildlife jump outs.
(b) Shall prioritize distributions for projects  that fill funding gaps for wildlife road
crossings and connectivity that are not otherwise  budgeted for or required under other fed-
eral or state obligations.
(c) May make distributions under  this section to assist projects with state match re-
quirements of federal grant programs relating to wildlife corridors.
SECTION 2.
This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]