Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) There  is appropriated to the Oregon Business Development Department,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,775,000.
(2) Of the moneys appropriated under this section:
(a) The Oregon Business Development Department may withhold $
 for the  actual
costs it incurs in administering section 2 of this 2023 Act; and
(b) The balance may be used solely for  the purposes set forth in section 2 of this 2023
Act.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “eligible community” means, as applicable:
(a) A city or unincorporated  community that contains one or more census tracts with a
federal poverty rate of 23 percent or more; or
(b) The governing body of such a city or unincorporated community.
(2) The  Oregon Business Development Department shall use the moneys appropriated
under section 1 of this  2023 Act to award grants to eligible communities for the purpose of
developing local poverty reduction plans that:
(a) Demonstrate the eligible community’s  engagement with businesses, financial insti-
tutions, governmental  bodies, nonprofit organizations, philanthropic organizations, faith
communities, local schools and individuals directly affected by poverty;
(b) Are informed by the eligible community’s analysis of local data related to poverty;
(c) Map local economic resources and gaps;
(d) Are informed by research on best practices for reducing local poverty; and
(e) Create performance measures by  which the eligible community’s progress toward its
poverty reduction goals may be tracked.
(3)(a) The department shall  prescribe a process, including forms and deadlines, by which
an eligible community may apply to the department for a grant under this section.
(b) The application form must, at least, require an applicant to include:
(A) Information and documents showing that the applicant  is an eligible community and
is currently capable of developing a local poverty reduction plan; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4143
HB 3466
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
(B) An itemized estimate of the amount of funding  the applicant expects the plan devel-
opment process to require.
(4)(a) If the department determines that an eligible  community’s application qualifies for
funding under this section, the department shall offer the eligible community a  grant
agreement for an award in the following amounts:
(A) For an eligible community with  a population of less than 25,000 residents, not more
than $75,000;
(B) For an eligible community with a  population of at least 25,000 residents but less than
100,000 residents, not more than $150,000; and
(C) For an eligible community with a population of at least 100,000 residents,  not more
than $300,000.
(b) If  the department determines that an eligible community’s application does not qual-
ify for funding under this section:
(A) The department may consult with the eligible community about  the application’s de-
ficiencies; and
(B) After such consultation, the eligible community may  submit, according to a schedule
agreed to by the department, an amended  application, which is subject to the same require-
ments and award limitations as the original application.
(c) If the  department makes a final determination that the eligible community does not
qualify for funding under this section, the determination is not subject to appeal.
(5) An eligible community that enters into a grant agreement with the department under
subsection (4) of this section shall deliver to the department  the completed local poverty
reduction plan no later than the date established in the grant agreement.
(6)(a) If the department determines that the completed  local poverty reduction plan does
not meet the requirements established under this section or the grant  agreement, the de-
partment shall notify the eligible community of:
(A) Its determination;
(B) The deficiencies of the plan; and
(C) Recommendations and a timeline for curing the deficiencies.
(b) Upon request, the department shall consult with  the eligible community about curing
the deficiencies of the plan.
(7) If an eligible community fails to cure  the deficiencies of its local poverty reduction
plan to the satisfaction of the department within  a reasonable period of time prescribed by
the department, the department may  bring a civil action to secure repayment of the amount
of the grant award, plus interest at a rate of 
 percent for each month or fraction of
a month that the amount remains unpaid and the department’s legal costs in obtaining
judgment for the amount.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]