Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon State Bar shall study  methods for providing legal representation
for indigent persons in civil matters  and report to an appropriate committee or interim
committee of the Legislative Assembly no later than September 15, 2020.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2315