Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
ELK DAMAGE PREVENTION AND COMPENSATION PILOT PROGRAM
SECTION 1.
As used in this section and sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Best preventive measures” has the meaning given that term  in rule by the State
Department of Agriculture.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 251
HB 2363
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) “Eligible damage”:
(a) Means elk  damage on eligible land to standing or harvested agricultural crops, in-
cluding livestock forage, or to infrastructure, including fences or agricultural  equipment,
that has not been covered by insurance.
(b) May include the cost of third-party assessment of the damage.
(3) “Eligible land” means land:
(a) That is privately owned.
(b) That is not enrolled in a conservation reserve program.
(c) That is in a pilot program area, as determined under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(d) For which no  compensation is received in exchange for, or that relates to, providing
permission for a person to hunt on the land.
(4)(a) “Eligible person” means a person who:
(A) Lives on or leases eligible land for  at least six consecutive months in the calendar
year before the person  enrolls in the elk damage prevention and compensation pilot program
described in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(B) Derives $10,000 or more per year, on average, from  producing agricultural crops on
the eligible land.
(C) Controls crops or infrastructure that is damaged by elk.
(b) “Eligible person” does not include a person who:
(A) Merely owns real property or pays property taxes in this state; or
(B) Claims resident privileges in another state or country for any purpose.
(5) “Eligible preventive measure” means a measure that is reasonably expected to  reduce
elk damage on eligible land, including:
(a) Repellants.
(b) Temporary or permanent barriers, such as fencing.
(c) Reasonable time spent on nonlethal deterrence activities such as hazing, but  not in-
cluding labor to build barriers.
SECTION 2.
(1) The State Department  of Agriculture shall establish and implement an
elk damage prevention and compensation pilot program.
(2) Under the pilot program, the department shall use available moneys in the Elk  Dam-
age Prevention and Compensation  Fund established under section 4 of this 2025 Act to pro-
vide compensation for eligible damages and eligible preventive measures to eligible  persons
who suffer loss due to elk damage.
(3) In consultation with the State Department of Fish  and Wildlife, the State Department
of Agriculture shall select, as two pilot program areas, one area east  of the Cascade Moun-
tains and one area west of the Cascade Mountains after considering, for the areas:
(a) The history of elk damage to agriculture.
(b) The timing of elk damage, including throughout the year or seasonally.
(c) Past actions by agencies and landowners to alleviate elk damage.
(d) Elk population sizes and distribution.
(e) Agricultural crop types.
(4) Under the pilot program, the  department may award compensation for eligible dam-
ages and eligible preventive measures to  an eligible person who demonstrates that the eligi-
ble person:
(a) Has used one or more best preventive measures to prevent elk damage on the eligible
[2]
HB 2363
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
land in the preceding five calendar years.
(b) Has not intentionally or unreasonably created circumstances  that attract elk to the
eligible land or otherwise encourage elk damage on the eligible land.
SECTION 3.
To implement the elk damage and compensation pilot program  described in
section 2 of this 2025 Act, the State Department of Agriculture shall  adopt rules to establish:
(1) A process for enrolling in, and periodically renewing enrollment in,  the pilot program
that includes verification of whether or not:
(a) The person qualifies as an eligible person.
(b) The person has implemented one or more best preventive measures to  prevent elk
damage on the eligible land in the preceding five calendar years.
(c) The person has intentionally or unreasonably created  circumstances that attract elk
to the eligible land or otherwise encourage elk damage on the eligible land.
(2) A process for submitting claims, including evidence of eligible damage that includes
a finding by an  agent of the department, an agent of the United States Department of Agri-
culture or a crop adjuster licensed under ORS 744.531 (3) that elk caused  or probably caused
the eligible damage.
(3) A process for assessing claims that describes:
(a) How the State Department of Agriculture will assess the cost of eligible damage.
(b) The role and selection of professional damage assessors.
(c) Whether, or under what circumstances, an  eligible person may be reimbursed for the
cost of third-party damage assessment as part of compensation for eligible damages.
(4) Methods for determining:
(a) Compensation amounts for eligible damage, such  as a net loss in production at the
end of a growing season relative to regional averages and anticipated loss rates.
(b) Compensation amounts for reasonable time spent on  nonlethal elk deterrence activ-
ities such as hazing.
(c) How to reduce the amount of a claim that has been partially compensated  by an in-
surance company.
(d) Maximum amounts  for compensation for eligible damages and eligible preventive
measures.
(5) A process for prioritizing awards of compensation to eligible persons who:
(a) Can demonstrate having made significant efforts to prevent or mitigate elk damage.
(b) Allow  persons licensed by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife to take elk on
the property that is affected by the elk damage.
(6) A definition of the term “best preventive measures” that lists ways to  deter elk
damage, including:
(a) Nonlethal deterrence activities; and
(b) The provision of hunting access for the lethal taking of  elk, consistent with applicable
laws and  rules, by permission, to the public or to individuals, without receipt of compen-
sation in exchange for, or that relates to, the permission.
(7) The terms for awarding compensation for large area barriers, such as  fencing, in-
cluding requiring:
(a) Matching funds from the eligible person.
(b) That the eligible  person demonstrate previous use of repellants, hazing and temporary
barriers and that those measures did not adequately prevent elk damage.
[3]
HB 2363
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) That the  large area barriers conform to design standards established by the State
Department of Agriculture pursuant to subsection (8) of this section.
(8) Design standards for large  area barriers, in consultation with the State Department
of Fish and Wildlife.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Elk Damage Prevention and Compensation Fund is  established in the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the  Elk
Damage Prevention and Compensation Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The Elk Damage Prevention and  Compensation Fund consists of moneys appropriated
by the Legislative Assembly for deposit in the fund, grant funds received  by the State De-
partment of Agriculture, and other moneys  appropriated to, allocated to, deposited in, cred-
ited to or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated  to the department for purposes
described in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. (1) Sections 1 to 4 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2031.
(2) Any moneys remaining in the Elk Damage Prevention and Compensation Fund es-
tablished under section 4 of this 2025 Act that  are unexpended and unobligated on the date
specified in subsection (1) of this section shall revert to the General Fund.
REPORTS
SECTION 6. As soon as there is sufficient data and no later than September 15, 2029:
(1) The State Department of Agriculture shall report,  in the manner prescribed in ORS
192.245, to committees or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to natural
resources on the elk damage prevention and compensation  pilot program described in section
2 of this 2025 Act. The report must include:
(a) A summary of pilot program descriptive statistics, including but not limited to:
(A) The number of persons participating in the pilot program.
(B) The types and quantities of damage reported under the pilot program.
(C) The amounts awarded under the pilot program.
(b) An evaluation of successes and challenges in administering the pilot program.
(c) A proposal for a permanent elk damage and compensation program.
(d) An evaluation of the benefits  and drawbacks of transitioning to a program that is
partially administered by counties.
(2) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall report, in the manner prescribed in
ORS 192.245, to committees or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to
natural resources on the pilot program. The report must:
(a) Compare the occurrence of elk damage inside and outside,  and over time within, the
pilot program areas.
(b) Analyze changes to elk hunting opportunities within the pilot program areas.
(c) Summarize information on elk population sizes throughout this state.
(d) Summarize any available information on elk distribution throughout this state.
(e) Describe the types of data that would assist with better understanding elk distribution
throughout this state and how the data might be obtained.
APPROPRIATION
[4]
HB 2363
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
SECTION 7.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out
of the General Fund,  the amount of $600,000, for deposit in the Elk Damage Prevention and
Compensation Fund established by section 4  of this 2025 Act, to be expended as described in
section 4 of this 2025 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 8.
The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader  and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 9. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[5]