Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 1 to 6 of this 2017 Act shall be known and may be cited as the
Mental Health for Deaf and Hard of Hearing Individuals’ Bill of Rights.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 1 to 6 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Accessible mental  health services” means the full range of mental health services
provided, with the use  of auxiliary aids or services, by appropriately licensed mental health
professionals who are not fluent in the primary communication mode, style or language  of
the individual requiring such services.
(2) “American  Sign Language” means the visual language used by deaf and hard of
hearing people in the  United States and Canada, with semantic, syntactic, morphological and
phonological rules that are distinct from English.
(3) “Auxiliary aids or services” includes but is not limited to:
(a) Qualified interpreters;
(b) Signed English;
(c) Cued speech;
(d) Written communications; and
(e) Assistive listening devices.
(4) “Communication mode, style or language”  means the following systems or methods
of communication used by deaf and hard of hearing individuals:
(a) American Sign Language;
(b) English-based manual or  sign systems that use manual signs in English word order,
sometimes with added affixes that are not present in American Sign Language; and
(c) Minimal  sign language systems to communicate with others who use home-based
signs, idiosyncratic signs or a sign system or language from another country.
(5) “Culturally and linguistically affirmative mental health services”  means the full range
of mental health services  provided, without the use of an interpreter or other auxiliary aids
[2]
HB 3415
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or services,  to a deaf or hard of hearing individual by appropriately licensed mental health
professionals fluent in the  primary communication mode, style or language as well as the
cultural needs of the individual requiring such services.
(6) “Deaf individual” means an individual who has a hearing loss which is  so severe that
the individual has difficulty in processing linguistic information through hearing, with  or
without amplification or other assistive technology.
(7) “Hard  of hearing individual” means an individual who has a hearing loss, which may
be permanent or fluctuating or corrected  by amplification or other assistive technology or
means, that presents challenges in processing linguistic information through hearing.
(8) “Primary communication mode, style  or language” means the communication mode,
style or language that is preferred by and most effective for a particular individual, as de-
termined by appropriate language assessment undertaken  by individuals proficient in the
communication mode, style or language being assessed.
SECTION 3.
The Oregon Health Authority shall:
(1) Make available throughout this state mental  health programs that provide culturally
and linguistically affirmative mental health services to deaf and hard  of hearing individuals
in their primary communication mode, style or language.
(2) Develop, train  and retain a mental health professional workforce sufficient to ensure
appropriate culturally and linguistically affirmative mental health services for  deaf and hard
of hearing individuals in their primary communication mode, style or language,  including but
not limited to:
(a) Occupational therapists familiar with the unique needs of individuals who  are deaf or
hard of hearing;
(b) Prevention specialists;
(c) Chemical dependency counselors; and
(d) Social workers.
(3) Develop, train and make available resources sufficient to ensure appropriate, acces-
sible mental health services for deaf and hard of hearing individuals in their  primary com-
munication mode, style or language, including but not limited to:
(a) Qualified interpreters certified or otherwise able  to render effective communication
in the mental health setting;
(b) Relay or certified deaf interpreters; and
(c) Foreign sign language interpreters.
(4) Monitor state-funded mental health  programs, schools, courts, medical facilities, long
term care facilities and providers  of addiction and substance abuse treatment to ensure that
deaf and hard of hearing individuals of all ages are adequately served.
(5) Allocate adequate funding for all  mental health programs that provide accessible
mental health services to deaf and hard of hearing individuals.
(6) Develop and implement strategies and plans to address the unmet need in geograph-
ical areas where there are an insufficient  number of mental health professionals adequately
trained in any communication mode, style or language to treat deaf or hard of  hearing indi-
viduals, including but not limited to authorizing qualified mental health professionals licensed
by another state to treat or otherwise serve the needs of deaf  or hard of hearing individuals
in this state.
(7) Authorize the use  of technology, in treatment, that allows deaf or hard of hearing
[3]
HB 3415
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
individuals to receive culturally and linguistically affirmative mental health  services from
mental health professionals who are licensed in this state or another state.
SECTION 4. (1) An individual who is deaf or hard of hearing may not be denied access
to culturally and linguistically affirmative mental health services in the individual’s preferred
communication mode, style or language on the basis that:
(a) The individual has a residual hearing ability, whether assisted or not; or
(b) The individual has previous experience with another communication mode, style  or
language.
(2) This section does not prohibit the provision of mental health treatment  in more than
one communication mode, style or language for  any particular individual. An individual shall
receive treatment in the communication mode, style or language that is determined to be
most effective.
(3) Violation of subsection  (1) of this section is an unlawful practice that is subject to
enforcement under ORS chapter 659A.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall  appoint a Coordinator of Mental
Health Services for  Deaf and Hard of Hearing Individuals to coordinate the statewide pro-
vision of  culturally and linguistically affirmative mental health services to deaf and hard of
hearing individuals.
(2) The  coordinator must have leadership abilities and extensive experience in treating
deaf individuals and must:
(a) Be fluent in American Sign Language  and possess a thorough understanding of the
culture of the deaf community;
(b) Have completed  clinical training and possess a minimum of five years of experience
providing direct services to deaf individuals with mental health needs;
(c) Possess at least a master’s degree in a behavioral health or other  relevant clinical
field, with a preference given to individuals who are licensed to practice independently;
(d) Know and understand applicable federal and state laws;
(e) Be  capable of or have experience in creating or integrating programs in the mental
health service delivery system in this state to ensure that  deaf and hard of hearing individ-
uals have access to the full continuum of mental health care; and
(f) Demonstrate the aptitude to develop policies and procedures based on  the actual ser-
vice needs of deaf and hard of hearing individuals.
(3) The coordinator shall be responsible for ensuring  that culturally and linguistically
affirmative mental health services are available to deaf and hard of hearing individuals
statewide and shall have the authority to:
(a) Take steps necessary to ensure access  to training, consultation and technical assist-
ance by mental health treatment providers in various  settings, including but not limited to
inpatient hospitalization, outpatient treatment and residential programs  serving deaf and
hard of hearing  individuals with mental health needs or addiction or substance abuse disor-
ders;
(b) Facilitate  collaboration between state agencies and departments to maximize the use
of state resources and joint planning;
(c) Develop, oversee  and directly supervise staff responsible for the statewide delivery
of accessible mental health services;
(d) Establish statewide  mental health standards for the care of deaf and hard of hearing
[4]
HB 3415
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
individuals, including standards for American Sign Language skills in mental health settings;
(e) Allocate mental health funds or grants to public and  private mental health providers
to achieve optimum service delivery within the system of care in this state; and
(f) Collect and  evaluate clinical and programmatic outcomes data from each mental
health service provider serving deaf or hard of hearing individuals in this state.
SECTION 6. (1) A deaf or hard of hearing individual admitted to a  hospital or residential
treatment center must be assigned to a qualified staff  member or clinical treatment team
with the  primary responsibility for coordinating and implementing the individual’s treatment
plan.
(2) A hospital  or residential treatment center must have written procedures to ensure
that deaf or hard of hearing individuals are provided culturally and linguistically affirmative
mental health services, including but not limited to the following:
(a) Direct access to  mental health services by a staff member who meets qualification
criteria adopted by  the Oregon Health Authority by rule for fluency in the language or
communication mode, style or language preferred by the individual.
(b) If the services described in paragraph (a) of this subsection cannot be made  available,
free language assistance in compliance with federal and state laws. All interpreters must  be
qualified to work in  the treatment setting according to standards adopted by rule by the
authority. Family members may not be used as interpreters under any circumstances.
(3) The authority or the coordinator shall specify how mental health services  must be
provided if in-person interpreters are not available. If remote interpreters  are used, the
provider of mental health services shall be responsible for ensuring that  the remote inter-
preters are qualified to provide the interpretation of mental health services.
(4) If qualified interpreters are offered but refused by a deaf  or hard of hearing individual
in need of mental health services, the mental health service provider must  obtain a signed
waiver from the individual of the right to accessible mental health services  and retain the
waiver in the individual’s case record.
(5) Diagnostic testing of  deaf and hard of hearing individuals requires expertise in the
administration and interpretation of standardized objective or projective tests and must be
performed by qualified mental health treatment providers with the level  of fluency in sign
language or other mode of communication prescribed by the authority by rule.
SECTION 7.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority may impose a civil penalty of up to $5,000
on a person for failure to comply with section 6 of this 2017 Act.
(2) Civil  penalties under this section must be imposed in the manner provided by ORS
183.745.
(3) All penalties recovered under this section shall be paid into the State Treasury and
credited to the Oregon Health Authority Fund established under ORS 413.101.
SECTION 8. The requirements of  section 4 of this 2017 Act apply to conduct occurring
on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
[5]