Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department of Energy shall:
(a) Work and consult  with stakeholders to identify areas of inquiry regarding energy and
energy use in this state that, if  researched and analyzed, could provide important and useful
information, data or datasets as a resource for the Legislative Assembly or Governor.  The
stakeholders must  represent a diverse range of interests, expertise and education,
socioeconomic communities and geographic areas of the state;
(b) Develop research options using  the areas of inquiry identified under paragraph (a) of
this subsection and in consultation with federal and  state agencies that oversee or have ex-
pertise in the areas of inquiry identified under paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Convene  an advisory group to develop a set of recommendations and benchmarks
around energy and energy use in this state using  the research options developed under par-
agraph (b) of this subsection.
(2)(a) The department shall produce a report that consolidates a final set of recommen-
dations around energy and energy use in this state. The report must include:
(A) A final set of recommendations and background information regarding the  work and
decision-making that led to the final set of recommendations;
(B) The areas of inquiry  identified under subsection (1)(a) of this section and background
information regarding the work that led to the areas of inquiry;
(C) The research options developed under subsection (1)(b) of this section and background
information regarding the work that led to the research options; and
(D) The  set of recommendations and benchmarks developed by the advisory group under
subsection (1)(c) of this section and background information regarding the work that led to
the set of recommendations.
(b) The department shall submit the report  produced under paragraph (a) of this sub-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2190
SB 126
1
2
3
4
5
6
section to the Governor and  the appropriate interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]