Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 243.650 to
243.782.
SECTION 2. (1) A labor organization that is  the exclusive representative of an appropri-
ate bargaining unit shall prepare an annual financial disclosure report containing:
(a) An itemized accounting of the:
(A) Total amount of moneys received by the labor  organization as dues, fees, assess-
ments, fair-share fees or in-lieu-of dues payments;
(B) Expenditures made for political activities, including lobbying services; and
(C) Contributions to a nonprofit organization described  in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code that is exempt  from income tax under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue
Code;
(b) The salaries and wages paid to:
(A) A person who is an officer of the labor organization; and
(B) The 10 highest paid employees of the labor organization who are not officers;
(c) A summary of each expenditure as determined by the labor organization to be related
or unrelated to collective bargaining  or contract administration, including information ex-
plaining the basis for the labor organization’s determination; and
(d) An affidavit signed by  the president of the labor organization attesting to the accu-
racy and validity of the information described in this subsection.
(2)(a) The labor organization shall submit a copy  of the report to the Employment Re-
lations Board on or before December 31 of each year.
(b) The board shall make a copy of the report available to  the public in a searchable da-
tabase that is accessible on the Internet.
(3) Within  seven days after submitting the report to the board, the labor organization
shall make the  report available to the employees within the bargaining unit in the manner
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3428
SB 847
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
prescribed by the board by rule.
(4) Except for the information in the report that  is otherwise exempt from disclosure
under ORS 192.311 to 192.478, the report is a public record.
(5)(a) In addition to any other penalty provided under ORS 243.672, the board may  impose
a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed 0.25 percent of the labor organization’s annual
gross receipts for failure to comply with the requirements of this section.
(b) The  board shall publish on the board’s website the name of each labor organization
that has received a penalty under this subsection.
(6) The board  may adopt any rules necessary to implement and enforce the requirements
of this section.
[2]