Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Assembly  finds that the State of Oregon will benefit from
having public universities listed in ORS 352.002 and community colleges operated under ORS
chapter 341 that:
(1) Provide education pathways, certificates and degrees that  enable graduates to pursue
careers in the semiconductor and advanced manufacturing industries;
(2) Provide a range of degrees, certificates  and credentials that meet the needs and re-
quirements of the semiconductor and advanced manufacturing industries;
(3) Communicate the wide range of career  opportunities in the semiconductor and ad-
vanced manufacturing industries to students and their families; and
(4) Provide a variety of  apprenticeship or other opportunities that enable students to
earn money by working in the  semiconductor and advanced manufacturing industries while
simultaneously continuing coursework.
SECTION 2. The intent of section 3  of this 2023 Act is for the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission to award grants to support  programs and curricula at public universities
listed in ORS 352.002 and community colleges operated  under ORS chapter 341 that provide
the best practicable education, training and research to support  the semiconductor and ad-
vanced manufacturing industries in  a manner that will both propel industry innovation and
productivity and provide rewarding careers for residents of this state.
SECTION 3. (1) The Semiconductor and Advanced Manufacturing Talent Grant program
is established within the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(2) Under the program, the commission shall award grants to  support proposed programs
or curricula at public universities listed in ORS  352.002 and community colleges operated
under ORS  chapter 341 that will effectively impart to students skills and proficiencies that
are demonstrably in demand in the semiconductor and advanced manufacturing industries.
(3) The commission shall by  rule develop the criteria it will use to determine which pro-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4586
SB 1102
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
posed programs and curricula at public universities and community colleges will be supported
by grants awarded under this section. The criteria must prioritize the awarding  of grants to
public universities and community colleges for programs and curricula that include:
(a) The substantial involvement of qualified educators or trainers;
(b) The participation of students  who would otherwise have relatively low access to op-
portunities for training in the applicable skills or proficiencies;
(c) A strategic plan for sustaining the program or curriculum at an operational  level for
at least five years;
(d) Current or prospective  support from private, nonprofit or other stakeholder groups
that would meaningfully enhance available resources for the program or curriculum;
(e) Meaningful collaboration with other educational  or training institutions, high tech-
nology companies, business associations or youth support organizations; and
(f) Sufficient administrative  infrastructure to implement, and competently report to the
commission on, the program or curriculum.
(4) When awarding grants under this section:
(a) At least 40  percent of the total amount of grant moneys awarded must be awarded
to support programs or curricula at community colleges;
(b) At least 40 percent of the total amount of grant moneys awarded  must be awarded
to support programs or curricula at regional public universities;
(c) The minimum amount of a grant awarded under this section is $2 million; and
(d) The maximum amount of a grant awarded under this section is $15 million.
(5) The commission shall:
(a) No later than September 1, 2023, develop and make publicly  accessible the criteria
described in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) No later than September 15, 2023, publicly distribute requests for grant  proposals
from public universities and community colleges;
(c) Require  that all grant applications be submitted to the commission no later than
November 1, 2023;
(d) No later than January 1, 2024, announce the programs and curricula that will  be
supported by grants awarded under this section; and
(e) No later than February 1, 2024, make an  initial installment of any grants awarded
under this section.
(6)(a) The commission shall submit, in the manner provided by  ORS 192.245, a report that
describes the rationale for each grant awarded under this section, to both  the Governor and
the committees of the Legislative Assembly related to higher education,  no later than Feb-
ruary 2, 2024.
(b) The commission shall submit, in the manner  provided by ORS 192.245, a report that
describes the  current status of the Semiconductor and Advanced Manufacturing Talent
Grant program, to both the Governor and the committees of the Legislative  Assembly re-
lated to higher education, no later than January 1, 2025.
(7) As used in this section, “regional public universities” means:
(a) Eastern Oregon University;
(b) Southern Oregon University; and
(c) Western Oregon University.
SECTION 4.
Sections 1 to 3 of this 2023 Act are repealed on January 2, 2026.
[2]
SB 1102
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
SECTION 5.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning  July 1,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $100,000,000,  for the purposes of awarding grant
moneys in the manner described in section 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[3]