Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Real Property Title Fraud Prevention is established.
(2) The task force consists of at least 13 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint two nonvoting  members from among
members of the Senate, one from the majority party and one from the minority party.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives  shall appoint two nonvoting members
from among members of the House of Representatives, one  from the majority party and one
from the minority party.
(c) The county clerk of Multnomah County shall serve ex officio but  may appoint a
designee to represent the clerk’s office.
(d) The Governor shall appoint two members who  are serving as county clerks at the
time of appointment, as follows:
(A) One county clerk of a mid-sized county; and
(B) One county clerk of a frontier or rural county.
(e) The Governor shall appoint four members as follows:
(A) One member representing licensed notary publics.
(B) One member representing title companies.
(C) One member representing real estate agents for residential property.
(D) One member representing commercial property owners.
(f) The  Secretary of State shall appoint one member with expertise in public records
management.
(g) The Attorney General shall  appoint one member from the Department of Justice who
can help identify changes needed in the criminal code related to real property title fraud.
(h) The task force may appoint other  nonvoting members that it considers necessary or
convenient for the work of the task force.
(3) The task force shall identify:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2120
SB 391
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
(a) The prevalence of real property title fraud in Oregon;
(b) Methods for preventing real property title fraud;
(c) The needs of county clerks and recorders with respect to  enhancements and upgrades
to technology and their associated costs;
(d) Changes to the criminal code related to sentencing for theft through real property
title fraud; and
(e) Any other matters related to real property title fraud that  the task force considers
necessary or convenient for the work of the task force.
(4) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for  the
transaction of business.
(5) Official action by  the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become  immediately effective. The departure of a nonvoting member appointed un-
der subsection (2)(h)  of this section does not create a vacancy for purposes of this
subsection.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim  committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to real property transactions no later than December 15, 2026.
(11) The Legislative Policy Research Director shall provide staff support to  the task
force.
(12) Members of  the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(13) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(14) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]