Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Director  of the Employment Department shall conduct a study of
methods of allowing employers to  pay quarterly unemployment insurance taxes over an ex-
tended period. The director shall report the findings of the study in the  manner provided by
ORS 192.245 to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to employment
on or before September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2908