Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act:
(1) “Covered costs” means the costs of  completing a degree program as determined by
the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by rule. Covered costs must include:
(A) Tuition;
(B) Mandatory and incidental fees;
(C) Textbooks and other supplies;
(D) Housing; and
(E) Any other cost of attending a degree program identified by the commission by rule.
(2) “Degree program” means a degree or certificate program offered by an institution.
(3) “Eligible individual” means an individual who seeks to enroll in the Guaranteed Op-
portunity Program and who:
(a) Is between 18 and 65 years of age; and
(b)(A) Graduated from a high school in this state; or
(B) During the previous year paid taxes as a resident of this state.
(4) “Institution” means:
(a) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(b) The Oregon Health and Science University;
(c) A community college operated under ORS chapter 341; or
(d) A career school as defined in ORS 345.010.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3206
HB 2855
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) “Participant” means an eligible individual who is enrolled in a degree program as part
of the Guaranteed Opportunity Program.
(6)(a) “Payment period” means the period beginning three months after a participant
completes the Guaranteed Opportunity Program and ending on the date the  participant ei-
ther retires or reaches 65 years of age, whichever is later.
(b) If an eligible  individual enrolls in the Guaranteed Opportunity Program multiple
times, the payment  period described in paragraph (a) of this subsection is deferred during
all periods in which the individual is enrolled in the program.
(7) “Program” or “Guaranteed Opportunity Program”  means the program described in
sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) There is created the Guaranteed Opportunity Program to be administered
by the Office of Student Access and Completion pursuant to rules adopted by the  Higher
Education Coordinating Commission.
(2) An eligible individual who wishes to enroll in the program  shall submit a request in
a manner determined by the commission by rule.
(3) After submitting a  request, the eligible individual shall meet with a counselor at the
Office of Student Access and Completion and execute an agreement:
(a) Stating the institution at which the eligible individual will enroll;
(b) Stating the degree program in which the eligible individual will enroll;
(c) Setting forth the  grade point average and graduation track requirements that the
commission has established by rule for  continuing participation in the Guaranteed Opportu-
nity Program; and
(d) Stating that in return  for the Office of Student Access and Completion paying the
covered costs for the degree program,  the eligible individual will repay the office in the
manner set forth in subsections (4) and (5) of this section.
(4) In exchange  for receiving the covered costs for a degree program, an eligible individ-
ual shall agree to pay to the Office of Student Access and  Completion a percentage of the
individual’s future  adjusted gross annual income during the payment period. The percentage
of future adjusted gross annual income that the individual shall agree to pay is:
(a) Two percent, for a degree program that will result in  an associate’s degree or a cer-
tificate degree;
(b) Three percent, for a degree program that will result in a bachelor’s degree;
(c) Four percent, for a degree program that will result in  a master’s degree, law degree
or other professional post-baccalaureate degree; and
(d) Five percent, for a degree program that will result in a doctorate degree.
(5) There is no  limit on the number of times an eligible individual may enroll in the
Guaranteed Opportunity Program. If  an eligible individual receives multiple certificates or
degrees through the program, the agreement entered into by the individual under subsection
(3) of this section  shall require the individual to repay the Office of Student Access and
Completion at the rate required for  the highest level degree obtained by the individual under
the program, as set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(6) In addition to the requirements set forth in subsection (3) of this section,  the com-
mission may by  rule require participants in the Guaranteed Opportunity Program to preau-
thorize the Office of Student Access  and Completion, the federal Internal Revenue Service
or any other entity in  this or any other state to provide data on the participant necessary
[2]
HB 2855
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to verify the participant’s income or to impose any appropriate conditions of payment  during
the payment period.
(7) Data compiled by the office on participants in the program shall be recorded  in an
aggregate format and the  office may not publicly release any information containing personal
information about a participant.
(8) Any personal information obtained by the office for  the purpose of administering the
program may not be disclosed as a public record under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(9) The commission may make any additional rules necessary to implement this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Office of Student Access and Completion shall use moneys from the
Guaranteed Opportunity Program Implementation Fund established in section 6 of this 2021
Act to pay all covered costs for participants in the Guaranteed Opportunity Program.
(2) The office may enter into arrangements and  agreements with institutions to deter-
mine the schedule and method of disbursements made under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may make rules to implement this
section.
SECTION 4. (1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall by rule determine
the payment schedule and method of payment of  covered costs for each participant in the
Guaranteed Opportunity Program.
(2)(a) During each tax year of the payment  period, the Director of the Department of
Revenue shall provide the Office of Student Access  and Completion with income tax data for
the participant and the participant’s household.
(b) The office and the  director may enter into an agreement to determine the schedule
and method of providing the information required by this subsection.
(3) If the participant does not reside in this state,  the office may enter into agreements
with the federal Internal Revenue Service or government entities in other  states in order to
verify the income of the participant and the participant’s household.
(4) If the office  determines that a participant has failed to remit the required payments
within a  reasonable period of time, the office may take any action the office considers nec-
essary to collect any amounts due, including but not limited to:
(a) Informing the director about  the participant’s delinquency and having the director
assign a  deficiency to the participant’s income tax payments for the appropriate amount,
including any administrative costs; or
(b) Contracting with a collections agency  to collect any amounts due, including any ad-
ministrative costs.
(5) The commission may make rules to implement this section.
SECTION 5.
(1) Every two years the  State Workforce and Talent Development Board
shall analyze the state’s workforce needs and  recommend whether the state workforce would
benefit from changing the percentages of future income that participants in the Guaranteed
Opportunity Program are required to pay under section 2  of this 2021 Act. The analysis
conducted under this subsection may include  an examination of whether the state’s
workforce needs would benefit from changing the percentages paid by participants in certain
programs or majors, but not in others.
(2) By September 15 of each even numbered year, the board shall submit a  report in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245  to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to  higher education. The report shall summarize the board’s analysis and recommen-
[3]
HB 2855
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
dations, including recommendations for legislation.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Guaranteed Opportunity Program Implementation Fund is estab-
lished in the State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General Fund. Earnings on
moneys in the Guaranteed Opportunity Program Implementation Fund must be credited  to
the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated  to the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission for the purpose  of financing and administering the Guaranteed Opportu-
nity Program established under sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act.
(3) The commission shall deposit in the fund:
(a) Amounts appropriated  or otherwise provided by the Legislative Assembly for deposit
in the fund;
(b) Amounts resulting from the issuance of bonds for deposit in the fund;
(c) Gifts, devises or  bequests received by the commission for the purpose described in
subsection (2) of this section or received for  the purpose of providing student assistance and
not directed to a particular fund or account; and
(d) Moneys received as repayment of or in exchange for the grant or loan of  moneys in
the fund.
SECTION 7.
(1) The Task  Force on Implementing the Guaranteed Opportunity Program
is established.
(2) The task force consists of 13 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint two nonvoting  members from among
members of the Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives  shall appoint two nonvoting members
from among members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The State Treasurer shall appoint one voting member with expertise in state  bonding.
(d) The executive  director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall ap-
point:
(A) One voting member to represent the Office of Student Access and Completion; and
(B) One voting member to represent the interests of career  schools as defined in ORS
345.010.
(e) The presidents of the University of Oregon, Oregon State University  and Portland
State University shall  jointly select one voting member to represent the universities’ inter-
ests.
(f) The presidents of the Oregon Institute of Technology, Eastern Oregon University,
Western Oregon University and Southern Oregon University  shall jointly select one voting
member to represent the universities’ interests.
(g) The presidents of  community colleges operated under ORS chapter 341 shall jointly
select one voting member to represent the interests of community colleges.
(h) The  Oregon Student Association shall appoint one voting member to represent the
interests of students in this state.
(i) The Governor shall appoint two voting members from this state.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Determine the amount of moneys the Guaranteed Opportunity Program will  need to
raise through bonding to be able to fully fund all eligible individuals who seek  to enroll in the
program beginning in 2041;
[4]
HB 2855
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Determine the  amount of moneys the Guaranteed Opportunity Program will need to
raise on an annual basis beginning in 2041 in  order to fund all eligible individuals who seek
to enroll in the program;
(c) Analyze  whether the percentages of future income that participants in the Guaran-
teed Opportunity Program are required to pay under section  2 of this 2021 Act need to be
amended;
(d) Analyze methods for preventing the bad faith participation  of individuals in the
Guaranteed Opportunity Program; and
(e) Review currently offered grant and scholarship programs and  determine which pro-
grams should be repealed as unnecessary in 2041.
(4) The task force  may suggest legislation to supplement implementation of the Guaran-
teed Opportunity Program.
(5) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for  the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by  the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to higher education no later than September 15, 2022.
(12) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall provide staff  support to the
task force.
(13) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force  are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of the task force’s duties and, to  the extent permitted by
laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice  the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 8.
Section 7 of this 2021 Act is repealed on December 31, 2022.
SECTION 9. Sections 1 to 5 of this 2021 Act become operative on January 1, 2041.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding section 9  of this 2021 Act, the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission shall, on the effective date of this 2021 Act, begin the  process of devel-
oping the policy and rules necessary to implement sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding section 9  of this 2021 Act, the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission shall submit a report on the  progress the commission has made in de-
veloping the policy and rules necessary to implement sections 1 to 6 of this 2021 Act to the
committees of the Legislative  Assembly relating to public finance and higher education dur-
[5]
HB 2855
1
2
3
4
5
ing the 2022 and 2023 regular sessions of the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 12.
Section 11 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2024.
SECTION 13. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[6]