Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 284.781 is amended to read:
284.781. The Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Board, in collaboration  with and
with the  assistance of the Oregon Business Development Department, has the following duties,
functions and powers:
(1) To identify policies and strategies that will:
(a) Promote workforce development, including development of residential housing  necessary to
attract and keep employees in the region, and economic development;
(b) Facilitate the development , [ or] and prevent the decline , of regionally significant industrial
sites;
(c) Create [ or] and maintain jobs in the region; and
(d) Improve access to career and technical  education, workforce training programs and higher
education to enhance the availability of a qualified workforce for employers in the region.
(2) To make recommendations to the Legislative Assembly for policies  and strategies intended
to improve the availability of career and  technical education, workforce training programs and
higher education for the purpose of improving the availability  of a qualified workforce for employers
in the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Region.
(3) To  identify specific laws that place specific workforce development [ or] and economic de-
velopment efforts in the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Region,  including the de-
velopment of  residential housing necessary to attract and keep employees in the region, at a
competitive disadvantage with respect to the same type of efforts in the  areas across the Oregon
border as described in ORS 284.786.
(4) To establish  programs through which one or more grants may be awarded, or one or
more loans may be made, or both.
(5) To operate a program described in subsection (4) of this section directly or to contract
with a third-party administrator to operate the program.
[(4)] (6) Subject to the availability of funds in the  Eastern Oregon Border Economic Develop-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 303
HB 4165
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ment Board Fund established under ORS 284.801, to [ make] award grants [ or] and make loans [ to
qualified applicants pursuant to  ORS 284.791, not to exceed a  total of 10 active grants at any one
time] under ORS 284.791  through programs established pursuant to subsection (4) of this
section and operated in accordance with subsection (5) of this section .
[(5)] (7) To establish a means to evaluate grants [ or] awarded and loans made  [by the board and
the department ] under ORS 284.791 , including, but not  limited to, determining the number of busi-
nesses or regionally significant industrial sites  assisted, the types and amount of resources lever-
aged, return on investment criteria,  performance and outcome measures and methods to evaluate the
impact on jobs and wages in  any area of the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Region
[to] in which grant or loan moneys [ were applied or in which they ] were utilized.
[(6)] (8)  To facilitate collaboration among employers, local governments, state  agencies and
stakeholders for the purpose of enhancing and expanding workforce development and economic de-
velopment in the region.
[(7)] (9) To consult with affected school districts, community colleges  and universities and the
Employment Department  in identifying policies and strategies that will enhance and promote
workforce  development  to improve the availability of a qualified workforce for employers in the
Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Region.
[(8)] (10) To report  [ annually] on or before December 31 of each year to standing and interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to  economic development regarding [ implementation
and] the administration of the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development  Board and [ grants or
loans made by the board and the Oregon Business Development Department pursuant to ] the imple-
mentation and administration of programs under  ORS 284.791. The report  may include recom-
mendations [ regarding proposed ] for legislation and strategies to improve workforce development
and economic development in the region.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 284.791 is amended to read:
284.791. (1)(a) Subject  to the availability of funds in the Eastern Oregon Border Economic De-
velopment Board Fund established under ORS 284.801, the Eastern Oregon Border  Economic De-
velopment Board may award  grants [ or] and make loans to eligible applicants to enhance and
expand workforce development [ or] and economic development in  the Eastern Oregon Border Eco-
nomic Development Region. [ Repayment of  loans made under this section is subject to subsection (8)
of this section. The board shall make the decision to approve and award grants or loans under this
section, but the Oregon Business Development  Department shall be responsible for the actual payment
of the grants or loans from the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Board Fund. ]
(b) Grants shall be awarded and loans made through programs established by  the board
pursuant to ORS 284.781 (4) and operated in accordance with ORS 284.781 (5).
(c) No more than  10 programs may be active at any time. A program is active as long
as any loan made through the program remains outstanding or any work  or project funded
or financed by a grant awarded through the program  has not been completed in accordance
with the grant agreement.
(2) Eligible applicants for grants and loans  include, but are not limited to:
(a) Local governments;
(b) Institutions of higher education as defined in ORS 348.582;
(c) Private or nonprofit businesses whose principal place of business, or the majority  of whose
workforce, is located in the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Region;
(d) Small business development centers established under ORS 285B.165 to 285B.171;
[2]
HB 4165
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) Economic development organizations;
(f) School districts; and
(g) Other entities as defined by the board by rule.
(3)(a) An eligible applicant may  apply for a grant or loan by submitting an application and
paying the required  application fee, if any .[, in accordance with rules adopted by the board in con-
sultation with the department. The rules must, at a minimum: ]
[(a)] (b) [ Establish criteria for the award of grants or loans under this section that  provide that
the] An applicant must demonstrate that the grant or loan moneys will be used for:
(A) Economic development that  will lead to private investment, job creation or retention and the
establishment or expansion of viable businesses in the region;
(B) Expansion of [ a] transportation infrastructure [ sufficient] to facilitate moving traded sector
goods or services in the region to market;
(C) Enhancement and expansion of workforce development in the region, including development
of residential housing necessary to attract and keep employees in the region, that is responsive to
the needs of the region’s businesses and industries;
(D) Certification of regionally significant industrial sites within the region;
(E) Extension of private utilities, including, but not limited to, gas and electrical  connections,
to regionally significant industrial sites within the region;
(F) A due diligence assessment pursuant to the  Oregon Industrial Site Readiness Assessment
Program under ORS 285B.635 to 285B.640 or other assessments or evaluations that prepare a site
for development; or
(G) Provision  of support services and technical assistance to entrepreneurs and business owners
in the region, including,  but not limited to, small business development centers established under
ORS 285B.165 to 285B.171 .[; and ]
[(b) Establish  criteria for repayment of loans, collection of moneys owed and repayment of grant
proceeds in the event of default. ]
[(4)] (c) Applications for loans must contain:
[(a)] (A) A plan for repayment [ by the  applicant to the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Devel-
opment Board Fund ] of moneys borrowed from the fund [ plus] with interest; and
[(b)] (B) If required by the Oregon Business Development Department and the board, evidence
of debt assurance of, or security for, repayment by the applicant.
(d) The board, in consultation with  the department, shall adopt rules that, at a minimum,
establish criteria for awarding grants and making loans under this section, in addition  to the
criteria set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
[(5)] (4) Loans may not be  made under this section[ :]
[(a)] [ may not be ] for a  [ loan] term that exceeds the [ usable] useful  life of the work or project
for which the loan funds will be used or a specified number of years from  completion, whichever is
less.[; and]
[(b) Are subject  to subsection (8) of this section regarding repayment of loans made by the depart-
ment.]
[(6)(a)] (5)(a) Grants [ or] awarded and loans made under this section are payable solely  from
the Eastern  Oregon Border Economic Development Board Fund [ established under ORS 284.801 ].
Amounts paid as grants [ or] and loans shall not constitute a  debt of the state or a lending of the
credit of the state within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation.
(b) [ Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, ] Nothing in  this section is intended to im-
[3]
HB 4165
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
pair the exercise of rights granted against the security for a loan, if any.
[(7)] (6) The department shall assist  the board in evaluating applications for grants [ or] and
loans under this section by:
(a) Evaluating timelines  for completion of work and projects for which grant [ or] and loan
moneys requested in the application will be used;
(b) Investigating whether necessary permits  for development, if needed, have been or can be
secured in a timely manner;
(c) Recommending how to maximize use of grant or loan  moneys to ensure successful completion
of the work or project for which the grant or loan moneys will be used;
(d) Assessing the ability of the applicant to repay the grant or loan;
(e) Documenting the strengths, weaknesses and risks of the applicant and the work or  project;
and
(f) Making recommendations regarding  terms and conditions for approval of a grant or loan
application.
[(8)] (7)(a) The department shall adopt rules governing the repayment of loans made  under this
section , the repayment of grant proceeds in the event of default by the grantee under the
grant agreement  and the collection of moneys owed to the  Eastern Oregon Border Economic De-
velopment Board Fund.
(b) The department may seek appropriate legal remedies to secure repayment of  any loans made
under this section [ that are due to the fund ].
[(9)] (8) The department may assess and charge fees, including, but not limited to, application
fees, for loans [ or] and grants made under this section.
SECTION 3.
This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]