Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 315.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Eligible premises” means a location in this state at which an entity that at the close
of the tax year has fewer than 50 full-time equivalent employees throughout the state is do-
ing business.
(b) “Security alarm system” means  a device or system of interconnected devices, hard-
ware and related appurtenances, designed to give warning of activities indicative of criminal
conduct or unauthorized entry upon protected premises. “Security alarm system” does not
include a system that does not incorporate an audible annunciator,  a remote annunciator or
an automatic dialer or a system  that is owned, maintained and monitored by any government
law enforcement agency in furtherance of law enforcement duties.
(c) “Upgrade to a security alarm system” means the installation of additional equipment
or enhancement of service provided by an existing security alarm system.
(2) A credit against taxes that are  otherwise due under ORS chapter 316 or, if the tax-
payer is a corporation, under ORS chapter  317 or 318 is allowed to a taxpayer for the in-
stallation of or upgrades to a security alarm system at an eligible premises  owned or leased
by the taxpayer during the tax year.
(3) The credit under this section is allowed for:
(a) The installed price of a security alarm  system that is installed during the tax year
at an eligible premises:
(A) That lacks a current security alarm system; or
(B) At which the  current security alarm system was initially installed more than 10 years
prior to the current tax year, and has not been upgraded; or
(b) The installed price of upgrades to a security alarm system.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1130
HB 2235
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) The credit shall be claimed on a form prescribed by  the Department of Revenue that
contains the information required by the department.
(5) The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the tax  liability of the taxpayer
for the tax year.
(6) Any tax credit otherwise allowable under this section that is not  used by the taxpayer
in a particular tax year may be carried forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax  liability
for the next succeeding tax year. Any credit remaining unused in  the next succeeding tax
year may be carried forward and used in the second succeeding tax year, and likewise any
credit not used in that second succeeding  tax year may be carried forward and used in the
third succeeding tax year but may not be  carried forward for any other succeeding tax year.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 314.772 is amended to read:
314.772. (1) Except as provided in ORS 314.766 (5)(b), the tax credits allowed or allowable  to a
C corporation for purposes  of ORS chapter 317 or 318 shall not be allowed to an S corporation. The
business tax credits allowed or allowable for purposes of ORS chapter 316 shall be allowed  or are
allowable to the shareholders of the S corporation.
(2) In determining the tax imposed under ORS chapter 316, as provided under ORS 314.763, on
income of the  shareholder of an S corporation, there shall be taken into account the shareholder’s
pro rata share of  business tax credit (or item thereof) that would be allowed to the corporation (but
for subsection (1) of this section) or  recapture or recovery thereof. The credit (or item thereof), re-
capture or recovery shall be passed through to shareholders in pro rata shares as determined in the
manner prescribed under section 1377(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) The character of any item included in a shareholder’s pro rata  share under subsection (2)
of this section shall be determined as if such item were realized  directly from the source from which
realized by the corporation, or incurred in the same manner as incurred by the corporation.
(4) If the shareholder is a nonresident and there is a requirement applicable  for the business tax
credit that in the case of a nonresident the credit be allowed  in the proportion provided in ORS
316.117, then that provision shall apply to the nonresident shareholder.
(5) As used in this section, “business  tax credit” means the following credits: ORS 315.104
(forestation and reforestation), ORS 315.124 (small forest option), ORS 315.133 (agricultural overtime
pay), ORS 315.138 (fish screening, by-pass  devices, fishways), ORS 315.141 (biomass production for
biofuel), ORS  315.156 (crop gleaning), ORS 315.164 and 315.169 (agriculture workforce housing), ORS
315.176 (bovine manure), ORS 315.204 (dependent care assistance), ORS 315.208 (dependent care fa-
cilities), ORS 315.213 (contributions for child care), ORS  315.237 (employee and dependent scholar-
ships), ORS 315.271  (individual development accounts), ORS 315.283 (affordable housing sales), ORS
315.304 (pollution control facility),  ORS 315.326 (renewable energy development contributions), ORS
315.331 (energy conservation  projects), ORS 315.336 (transportation projects), ORS 315.341
(renewable energy resource equipment  manufacturing facilities), ORS 315.354 and 469B.151 (energy
conservation facilities), ORS  315.506 (tribal taxes on reservation enterprise zones and reservation
partnership zones), ORS 315.507 (electronic commerce), ORS 315.514 (film production development
contributions), ORS 315.518 (semiconductors),  ORS 315.523 (employee training programs), ORS
315.533 (low income community jobs initiative), ORS 315.593 (short  line railroads), ORS 315.640
(university venture development funds), ORS 315.643 (Opportunity Grant Fund contributions), ORS
315.675 (Trust for Cultural Development Account contributions), ORS 317.097 (loans for affordable
housing), ORS 317.124 (long term enterprise zone facilities), ORS 317.147  (loans for agriculture
workforce housing), ORS 317.152  (qualified research expenses) and ORS 317.154 (alternative qualified
[2]
HB 2235
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
research  expenses)  and section 9, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2013 (alternative fuel vehicle contribu-
tions), and section 2 of this 2025 Act (security alarm systems) .
SECTION 4.
 ORS 318.031 is amended to read:
318.031. It being the intention of the Legislative Assembly that this chapter and ORS chapter
317 shall be administered as uniformly as possible (allowance being  made for the difference in im-
position of the taxes), ORS 305.140 and 305.150, ORS chapter 314 and  the following sections are in-
corporated  into  and made a part of this chapter: ORS 315.104, 315.124, 315.133, 315.141, 315.156,
315.176, 315.204, 315.208, 315.213, 315.283, 315.304, 315.326, 315.331, 315.336, 315.506, 315.507, 315.523,
315.533, 315.593 and 315.643 and section 2  of this 2025 Act (all only to the extent applicable to a
corporation) and ORS chapter 317.
SECTION 5. Section 2 of this 2025  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]