Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
LAND USE AND WILDFIRE POLICY ADVISORY COMMITTEE
SECTION 1.
(1) The Director of the Department of Land Conservation and  Development,
in consultation with counties and cities, shall organize a Land Use and Wildfire Policy Advi-
sory Committee. The committee shall consist of members appointed as described in  sub-
sections (2) to (5) of this section.
(2) The  director and the State Forester, in consultation with counties and cities, shall
jointly appoint the following to be voting members of the committee:
(a) One member who is a representative of  a city government serving a population of less
than 10,000.
(b) One member who is a representative of  a city government serving a population of
10,000 or more but less than 25,000.
(c) One member who is a representative of a  city government serving a population of
25,000 or more.
(d) One member who is a representative of a county government serving a population  of
less than 30,000.
(e) One member  who is a representative of a county government serving a population of
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2212
HB 2794
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
30,000 or more but less than 100,000.
(f) One member who is a representative of  a county government serving a population of
100,000 or more.
(g) One member who is a city land use planning director.
(h) One member who is a county land use planning director.
(i) One member who is a representative of a utility company.
(j) One member who is a representative of environmental interests.
(k) One member who is a representative of special districts.
(L) One member who is a representative of farming landowners.
(m) One member who is a representative of ranching landowners.
(n) One member who is a representative of realty interests.
(o) One member who is a representative of land and housing development firms.
(p) One member who is a representative of citizen land use planning organizations.
(q) One member  who is a representative of state or regional land use planning organiza-
tions.
(r) One member who is a representative of public health interests.
(s) One member who is a representative of small forestland owners.
(t) One member who is a representative of large forestland owners.
(u) One member who is a representative of economic development organizations.
(v) One member who is a representative of federally recognized Indian tribes.
(w) One member who is a representative of the Oregon Fire Chiefs Association.
(x) Additional members as determined by the director in consultation with counties and
cities.
(3) The director and the State Forester shall make the  joint appointments under sub-
section (2) of this section from nominations submitted by entities related  to the represented
interest or entities. The related entities for appointments:
(a) Under subsection (2)(a), (b), (c) and (g)  of this section is the League of Oregon Cities.
(b) Under subsection (2)(d), (e), (f) and (h) of  this section is the Association of Oregon
Counties.
(c) Under subsection (2)(i) of this section is any  one or more of the investor-owned util-
ities and consumer-owned utilities in this state.
(d) Under subsection (2)(j) of this section is the Oregon League of Conservation Voters.
(e) Under subsection (2)(k) of this section is the Special Districts Association of Oregon.
(f) Under subsection (2)(L) of this section is the Oregon Farm Bureau.
(g) Under subsection (2)(m) of this section is the Oregon Cattlemen’s Association.
(h) Under subsection (2)(n) of this section is the Oregon Association of Realtors.
(i) Under subsection (2)(o) of this section is the Oregon Home Builders Association.
(j) Under subsection (2)(p) of this section is the Oregon Property Owners Association.
(k) Under subsection (2)(q) of this section is 1000 Friends of Oregon.
(L) Under subsection (2)(r) of this section is the Oregon Health Authority.
(m) Under subsection (2)(s) of this section is the Oregon Small Woodlands Association.
(n) Under subsection (2)(t) of this section is the Oregon Forest & Industries Council.
(o) Under subsection (2)(u) of this section is Business Oregon.
(p) Under subsection (2)(v) of this section is one  or more of the tribal governing bodies
for Indian tribes in this state.
[2]
HB 2794
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(q) Under subsection (2)(w) of this section is the State Fire Marshal.
(4) In addition to the members described under subsection (2) of  this section, the fol-
lowing shall serve as nonvoting members of the committee:
(a) One member appointed by the State Forester.
(b) One member appointed by the State Fire Marshal.
(c) One member appointed by the Director of the Oregon Health Authority.
(d) One member appointed by the Environmental Justice Task Force.
(e) One member appointed by the director of the Institute for Natural Resources.
(f) One member appointed by the Director of the Department of Land Conservation and
Development.
(g) One member appointed by the Director of  the Department of Consumer and Business
Services from the Division of  Financial Regulation of the Department of Consumer and
Business Services.
(h) One member appointed by the  Director of the Department of Consumer and Business
Services from department staff having expertise in building codes.
(5)(a) The President of the Senate, in consultation with the Senate  Minority Leader, shall
appoint two members from among the members of the  Senate to be nonvoting members of
the committee. The two members  appointed under this paragraph may not be from the same
political party.
(b) The Speaker of the  House of Representatives, in consultation with the House Minority
Leader, shall appoint  two members from among the members of the House of Represen-
tatives to be nonvoting members  of the committee. The two members appointed under this
paragraph may not be from the same political party.
(6) Members of the Legislative  Assembly appointed to the committee are nonvoting
members of the committee and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(7) The members of the committee shall  elect a voting member to be chair of the com-
mittee and a voting member to be vice-chair, with all powers appropriate to those offices.
(8) The committee shall meet at times  and places determined by the chair or by the Di-
rector of the Department of Land Conservation and  Development. A majority of the voting
members shall be a quorum for the conducting of business. Official  actions by the committee
require approval by a majority of the voting members.
(9) The Department of Land Conservation and Development  shall provide staff services
for the committee.
(10) Notwithstanding ORS 171.072, members of the committee who  are members of the
Legislative Assembly are not entitled to mileage expenses or a per diem and serve as  volun-
teers on the committee. Other members of the committee are not entitled  to reimbursement
for expenses and serve as volunteers on the committee. However, the Director of the De-
partment of Land Conservation and Development may, in the discretion of the director,  re-
imburse voting members of the committee for unforeseen expenses  from moneys available
for purposes of carrying out the functions of the committee.
SECTION 2.
All agencies of  state government as defined in ORS 174.111 are directed to
assist the Land  Use and Wildfire Policy Advisory Committee and the Department of Land
Conservation and Development in the performance of committee and department duties un-
der sections 3 and 4 of this 2021 Act.
[3]
HB 2794
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
REGIONAL WILDFIRE RISK
SECTION 3.
(1) The State Forestry Department and Oregon  State University, in consul-
tation with the Department of Land Conservation and Development, shall for  each wildfire
risk region of this state  jointly consult with fire protection agencies and districts, fire offi-
cials and personnel and cities and counties  in the region. The departments and the university
shall analyze the wildfire risk for each region to develop recommendations for reducing the
wildfire risk to people, public and  private property, businesses, infrastructure and natural
resources in that region.
(2) The State Forestry Department and the university, in consultation  with the Depart-
ment of Land Conservation and Development, shall  report the recommendations for regional
wildfire risk reduction to the Land Use and Wildfire Policy Advisory Committee no later than
October 1, 2021.
(3) The departments and the committee shall analyze and evaluate the material to  de-
velop recommendations regarding  possible means for implementing the final recommen-
dations produced by the Governor’s Council on Wildfire Response through the statewide  land
use planning program and  local governments to minimize the risks from wildfires to people,
public and private property, businesses, infrastructure and natural resources.
IMPLEMENTATION OF COUNCIL RECOMMENDATIONS
SECTION 4. (1) The Department of Land Conservation and Development, in collaboration
with the  State Forestry Department and the Land Use and Wildfire Policy Advisory Com-
mittee, shall report to an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly relating to natural
resources in  the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than February 1, 2022, re-
garding possible means for implementing the final recommendations produced by  the
Governor’s Council on Wildfire Response.
(2) The report must include, but need not be limited to, the following:
(a) The recommendations developed under section 3 of this 2021 Act.
(b) Existing state and local maps that identify wildfire risk.
(c) To the extent the  Land Use and Wildfire Policy Advisory Committee and the depart-
ments deem appropriate, new map resources that account for  regional differences in pro-
gram information.
(d) Identification of state and local resources needed  to develop, maintain and update
wildfire risk maps.
(e) Multiple recommendations  regarding possible means for using the statewide planning
program and local governments including, but  not limited to, recommendations regarding
revisions and updates to the statewide land use planning program and local zoning codes.
(f) Planning goals related to natural hazards, including but not limited to Goal 7.
(g) Existing state and  local programs that minimize wildfire risk, including, but not lim-
ited to, programs that identify wildlife risk through mapping  or that define minimum
defensible space.
(h) Identification of revisions to the  statewide land use planning program and to local
building codes appropriate to minimize wildfire risks, including, but not limited to, provisions
regarding sufficient defensible space, safe evacuation, adequate access for wildfire fighting
[4]
HB 2794
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
equipment and personnel, and considerations regarding development in areas of high wildfire
risk that allow for regional  differences in topography, vegetation, soil types and other rele-
vant factors.
(i) Funding, staffing  and other administrative resources necessary for state, county and
city governments to implement wildfire reduction programs, including, but not limited to, the
costs of program development, implementation and  ongoing operations and the need for
stable long-term funding for the programs.
(j) A description of areas of  agreement and disagreement among the departments and
members of the Land Use and Wildfire Policy Advisory Committee.
COUNCIL
SECTION 5.
The Governor may assign duties to the Governor’s Council on Wildfire Re-
sponse as the Governor deems appropriate to assist  state and local agencies and officials to
oversee and assist  in the implementation of wildfire risk reduction programs. The council’s
duties may include, but need not be limited  to, providing advice, suggesting priorities, re-
commending future actions and providing coordination with federal agencies.
SECTION 6. (1) As used in this section, “sustainable” means short-term and long-term
financial stability that provides the ability  to implement, carry out, expand and maintain
activity.
(2) The Governor’s Council on Wildfire  Response shall report detailed recommendations
of the council for a sustainable model for funding a comprehensive wildfire strategy that is
consistent with the strategy contained  in the “November 2019: Report and
Recommendations” of the council.
(3) The council shall  report its recommendations to the Legislative Assembly as provided
in ORS 192.245, and to the Governor, no later than October 31, 2021.
(4) In developing recommendations and preparing the report described in this section, the
council:
(a) Shall cooperate with relevant state agencies including, but not limited to, the State
Forestry Department, the State Fire Marshal, the Oregon  Health Authority, the Office of
Emergency Management, the Department of Land Conservation and Development, the  De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services, the  State Department of Fish and Wildlife, the
Department of Environmental Quality and the Oregon Department of Administrative Ser-
vices;
(b) Shall invite comments, advice or assistance from relevant federal  agencies including,
but not limited to, the United States Forest Service and the Bureau of Land Management;
(c) May contract with outside consultants and experts; and
(d) Shall use the regular meetings of the council as a forum  for receiving input from
council members and the public regarding content for the report.
FUEL LOAD DISPOSAL STUDY
SECTION 7.
(1) The State Department of Energy shall  commission a study to determine
whether renewable energy generation is a feasible means  for disposing of materials from
wildfire fuel load reduction projects. The study shall include, but need not be limited  to, an
[5]
HB 2794
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
evaluation of the financial and operational  feasibility of using the materials for renewable
energy generation  instead of disposing of the materials through controlled fires or other
means.
(2) The entity commissioned by the department to conduct the study:
(a) Must have expertise in western United States energy markets;
(b) Must have expertise related to wildfire fuel load reduction; and
(c) Must be capable of conducting  the study in conformance with transparency require-
ments and other requirements of Oregon law.
(3) The department shall award a contract commissioning  the study no later than August
31, 2021. The amount of the contract may not exceed $500,000.
(4) The department shall require the commissioned entity to  complete the study no later
than January 15, 2022.
(5) The Director of the State Department of Energy shall  appoint an advisory committee
to provide advice to the commissioned entity  in conducting the study and to act as a re-
viewing body for the  study results. To the extent practicable, the director shall appoint ad-
visory committee members  representing a diverse range of stakeholder interests, expertise
and education, racial, ethnic and economic groups and geographic  areas of the state. The
director shall appoint the advisory committee members on or before July 31, 2021.
(6) Members of the advisory committee are entitled to  compensation and expenses in-
curred by them in the performance of their official duties in the manner and  amounts pro-
vided in ORS 292.495. Claims for compensation and expenses shall be paid out of funds
appropriated to the department for that purpose.
(7) The members of the advisory  committee shall elect one of the members to be chair
of the advisory committee  and one member to be vice-chair, with all powers appropriate to
those offices.
(8) The advisory committee shall  meet at times and places determined by the chair or
by the director. A  majority of the advisory committee members shall be a quorum for the
conducting of business. Official actions by the advisory committee  require approval by a
majority of the members.
(9) The department shall provide staff services for the advisory committee.
APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 8.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Land  Conservation and Development, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $350,000, which may  be expended for
carrying out department activities under sections 1, 3 and 4 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 9. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Forestry Department, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $100,000, which may be expended for  carrying out department
activities under sections 3 and 4 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 10. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to Oregon State University, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2021, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $50,000, which may be expended for carrying out university
activities under section 3 of this 2021 Act.
[6]
HB 2794
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
SECTION 11.
In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Energy, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $61,900, which may be expended as follows:
(1) Not more than $56,900 to cover additional  personnel costs of the department in car-
rying out department duties, functions and powers related to section 7 of this 2021 Act; and
(2) Not more than $5,000 to cover department costs associated with the advisory com-
mittee appointed by the Director of the State Department  of Energy under section 7 of this
2021 Act.
SUNSETS
SECTION 12. Sections 1, 2, 3, 4 and 6 of this 2021 Act are repealed on July 1, 2022.
SECTION 13. Section 5 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 14. Section 7 of this 2021 Act is repealed on July 1, 2022.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 15. The unit captions used in this 2021 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
EMERGENCY
SECTION 16. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[7]