Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Building Maintenance Account is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund.  The State Treasurer shall create a subaccount
within the Building Maintenance Account for each of the agencies  specified in subsection (2)
of this section. Interest earned by a subaccount within the Building  Maintenance Account
must be  credited to the subaccount. Each subaccount consists of moneys deposited in the
subaccount from any source and may include moneys appropriated, allocated,  deposited or
transferred to the subaccount by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise  and interest earned
on moneys  in the subaccount. The moneys in each subaccount are continuously appropriated
to the agency for which the subaccount is created for the purposes of repairing and  main-
taining buildings owned by the agency.
(2) The Building Maintenance Account consists of subaccounts created for each of the
following agencies:
(a) Department of Corrections.
(b) Department of Education.
(c) Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(d) Department of State Lands.
(e) Department of State Police.
(f) Department of Transportation.
(g) Department of Veterans’ Affairs.
(h) Employment Department.
(i) Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(j) Oregon Department of Aviation.
(k) Oregon Health Authority.
(L) Oregon Liquor Control Commission.
(m) Oregon Military Department.
(n) Oregon Youth Authority.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 548
HB 2095
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
(o) Public Employees Retirement System.
(p) State Department of Agriculture.
(q) State Department of Fish and Wildlife.
(r) State Forestry Department.
(s) State Parks and Recreation Department.
SECTION 2.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
[2]