Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) No later than July 1, 2018, the Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall
conduct a statewide study regarding the status of small businesses owned by  veterans in
Oregon. The study must identify barriers to veteran-owned small  business expansion and
capitalization and must make recommendations to improve support  and opportunities for the
veteran-owned small businesses in this state. The department shall  collaborate with the
Oregon Business Development Department in conducting the study under this subsection.
(2) No later than  November 1, 2018, the Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall submit a
report to the interim legislative committees related  to veterans’ affairs regarding the study
conducted in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2017 Act is repealed on January 2, 2019.
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4217