Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Early Learning Division shall establish, in coordination with existing
training systems, a statewide child care provider business training program  that will educate
child care providers on how  to start and operate a child care business. The program must
include:
(a) Training and supports to recruit, train and retain qualified child care providers;
(b) Technical assistance in applying  for licensing and certification, including resources
to assist child care  providers in understanding and complying with state and federal child
care regulations;
(c) Assistance in meeting quality rating and improvement system standards;
(d) Guidance in providing culturally appropriate care; and
(e) Outreach,  support programs and training to all types of child care providers, including
child care centers and child care providers who are family, friends or neighbors.
(2) The  division shall encourage providers to register with the employment-related day
care program described in ORS 329A.500.
(3) The division shall provide technical assistance resources to help child care  providers
understand and comply with state and federal child care regulations.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Early Learning  Division, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______ for the purpose of carrying  out the provisions of sec-
tion 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Early Learning Division, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______ for the purpose of  providing small grants in the
amount of no more than $____ each to assist child care providers with the  costs associated
with providing quality care, including required equipment, facility improvements and training
opportunities for child care providers and staff.
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2309
HB 2349
1
2
3
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
[2]