Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall study issues  re-
lated to temporary protections for commercial  real estate, including moratoriums on
evictions and  foreclosures in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, and present the results
of the study in a report to an appropriate committee or interim committee of the  Legislative
Assembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 on or before September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on December 31, 2022.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3159