Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 4, 5 and 6, chapter 531, Oregon Laws 2019, are repealed.
SECTION 2. If this 2021 Act does not become effective until after  June 30, 2021, any
otherwise lawful action or obligation undertaken under authority of section 1,  chapter 531,
Oregon Laws 2019,  on or after July 1, 2021, and before the effective date of this 2021 Act is
ratified and approved.
SECTION 3. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2021, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, to be allocated to the State Department of Fish and  Wildlife
for the purposes of the Oregon Conservation and Recreation Fund.
(2) The State  Fish and Wildlife Director may request that the board release funds ap-
propriated under this section. The board may only release the appropriated funds in  incre-
ments that match deposits into the Oregon Conservation and Recreation Fund between July
1, 2019, and June  30, 2023, from sources other than state government, as defined in ORS
174.111.
SECTION 4.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2033