Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in sections 1 to 3 of this 2025 Act:
(a) “Nonprofit organization” means an entity:
(A) Organized not for profit, pursuant  to ORS chapter 65 or any predecessor or successor
of ORS chapter 65; or
(B) Described in section 501(c)(3) of  the Internal Revenue Code that is exempt from in-
come tax under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(b) “Rural” means located entirely outside the  acknowledged Portland Metropolitan Area
Regional Urban Growth Boundary and  the acknowledged urban growth boundaries of all
cities with populations of 30,000 or more.
(c) “Service jurisdiction” means:
(A) Rural cities and counties;
(B) Economic development districts as defined in ORS 285B.636  other than the Greater
Portland, Inc.—Portland-Vancouver Economic Development District; and
(C) Regional councils of government other than Metro.
(2)(a) The Oregon Business Development Department shall select an entity to serve as a
statewide rural community resource center  with the duties and powers set forth in this
section and section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(b) The entity shall be:
(A) A nonprofit organization that specializes in public-private partnerships; or
(B) A statewide local government association of cities or counties.
(3)(a) The department shall prescribe by rule an application process  for the selection of
the entity, including the forms, the information  and materials to be included with applica-
tions and the deadlines.
(b) Upon approval of an application,  the department shall negotiate an agreement with
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 783
HB 3104
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the entity under  which the entity shall perform the duties and exercise the powers assigned
to it as the rural community resource center under law and the agreement.
(4)(a) The rural community resource center shall provide  technical assistance to service
jurisdictions that lack staff capacity and expertise to:
(A) Develop plans for community  facilities, infrastructure, revitalization, housing and
economic development;
(B) Develop and submit proposals for any public and private awards to fund such  plans,
including but not limited to grants; and
(C) Manage the funds awarded them to carry out the plans.
(b) The rural community resource center shall have a staff of seven professionals, each
of whom provides the  technical assistance described in paragraph (a) of this subsection in
one of the following areas:
(A) Public works.
(B) Engineering.
(C) Community development.
(D) Housing.
(E) Transportation.
(F) Project management.
(G) Public administration and finance.
(c) In addition to providing  the technical assistance described in this subsection, the ru-
ral community resource center shall:
(A) Serve as a hub for funding and resources available to service jurisdictions.
(B) Provide a network to connect  service jurisdictions to resources for project develop-
ment, grant writing and management assistance.
(C) Support leaders of service jurisdictions in establishing priorities for plans described
in subsection (4)(a)(A) of this section.
(D) Connect service jurisdictions with  regional intermediaries that also provide such
technical assistance.
(E) Research the gaps in public and civic investment systems and identify opportunities
for improvement and leverage.
SECTION 2.
(1)(a) The rural community resource center described in section  1 of this
2025 Act shall use moneys available  in the Rural Community Resource Leverage Fund es-
tablished under section 3 of this 2025  Act to assist service jurisdictions in developing and
submitting proposals for public and private awards, including but  not limited to grants, to
fund plans described in section 1 (4)(a)(A) of this 2025 Act.
(b) In  awarding assistance grants under this section, the rural community resource
center shall give preference to proposals to obtain public or private grants or other  awards
that require matching funds.
(2) The center may also use moneys in the fund to directly seek public and private awards
for deposit in the fund.
SECTION 3. (1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the
General Fund, the Rural Community Resource Leverage  Fund. All moneys in the fund are
continuously appropriated to the Oregon  Business Development Department for distribution
to the entity selected by the department under section 1 of this 2025 Act to serve as the rural
community resource center. The center may use the moneys solely to fund:
[2]
HB 3104
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
(a) The activities of the  professional staff described in section 1 (4)(b) of this 2025 Act
and other operating expenses of the center; and
(b) The uses specified in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The Rural Community Resource Leverage Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated  or otherwise allocated or transferred to the fund by the Legis-
lative Assembly or the department;
(b) Interest earned on moneys in the fund; and
(c) Moneys or property, or the proceeds of property, of any  kind received from any public
or private source by the department or the center for deposit in the fund.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon  Business Development Department, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $6,000,000, to be distributed to the entity se-
lected by the department under section 1 of this 2025  Act to serve as the rural community
resource center, as follows:
(1) $3,000,000 for the activities of the professional  staff described in section 1 (4)(b) of this
2025 Act and other operating expenses of the center; and
(2) $3,000,000 for the uses specified in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]