Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “clean energy technology” means a facility, piece
of equipment or other property that:
(a) Produces energy from the sun, water, wind, geothermal deposits or  other renewable
resources, including fuel cells, microturbines or energy storage systems and components;
(b) Enables  energy conservation in heating, cooling or ventilating residential or com-
mercial buildings;
(c) Facilitates or  assists in manufacturing or expanding infrastructure to support electric
vehicles, particularly medium-duty or heavy-duty electric vehicles; or
(d) Is otherwise capable, in the judgment of the Director of the  Oregon Department of
Administrative Services, of conserving energy  or producing energy from renewable and low-
emission sources.
(2)(a) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall  adopt rules under ORS
279A.070 to govern procurements of clean energy technology that the department  conducts
on behalf of state agencies under ORS 279A.140.
(b) In adopting rules as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the department shall
solicit input from and cooperate with other state  agencies with expertise in energy pro-
duction and conservation and in reducing or mitigating environmental impacts.
(c) The  department’s rules must permit prospective contractors to submit in response
to clean energy technology procurements proposals that include:
(A) A local employment plan under  which the prospective contractor specifies how the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2606
HB 3579
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
prospective contractor will create  and retain high-skilled manufacturing jobs in areas in this
state in  which the prospective contractor operates, or the area in this state in which the
clean energy technology will be used, by recruiting disadvantaged workers and investing in
preapprenticeship, apprenticeship and other training opportunities; or
(B) An employment plan under which the prospective contractor specifies  how the pro-
spective contractor will create and retain  high-skilled manufacturing jobs throughout the
United States by recruiting disadvantaged workers and investing  in preapprenticeship, ap-
prenticeship and other training opportunities, if federal moneys fund all or a portion of  the
procurement.
(d) The department’s rules may provide for giving a preference  to a prospective con-
tractor that under paragraph (c)  of this subsection submits as part of the prospective
contractor’s proposal a credible employment plan.
(3) The department may enter into cooperative procurements  and intergovernmental
agreements under which the department procures clean energy technology  in combination
with other governmental bodies within this state, the State of Washington and the  Province
of British Columbia, Canada, as a market incentive  for clean energy technology manufac-
turers and suppliers  to create and retain high-skilled manufacturing jobs within this state,
the State of Washington and the Province of British Columbia.  The cooperative procure-
ments and intergovernmental  agreements may require prospective contractors to submit in
response to requests for proposals plans to recruit disadvantaged workers and invest in
preapprenticeship, apprenticeship and other training opportunities.
(4) All state agencies that are subject  to ORS 279A.140 shall cooperate with the depart-
ment in adopting and implementing the rules described in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Task Force on Attracting and Supporting Regional  Manufacturing
of Clean Energy Technology is established.
(2) The task force consists of seven members appointed  by the Director of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services as follows:
(a) The state chief procurement officer;
(b) A representative from the Department of Transportation;
(c) A representative from a large regional manufacturing firm;
(d) A representative from a labor organization that represents  regional manufacturing
industry workers;
(e) A representative from a labor organization that represents workers in  building trades
or construction;
(f) A representative of a firm that installs energy technology; and
(g) A representative from an organization with an interest in combatting or reducing the
effects of climate change.
(3) The task force shall study and recommend  methods to attract and foster manufac-
turing firms and operations to this state, with an emphasis on using  public procurements
of clean energy  technology to create a market and to give incentives to prospective con-
tractors to create  and retain high-skill jobs by, at a minimum, recruiting disadvantaged
workers and investing in preapprenticeship, apprenticeship and other training methods.
(4) The task force may:
(a) Cooperate with or join other task forces in the State  of Washington or the Province
of British Columbia, Canada, with a similar mission to form a regional strategy for attracting
[2]
HB 3579
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and fostering clean energy manufacturing within the region.
(b) Appoint other members to the task force by majority vote.
(5) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the members
of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a report in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245, and may
include recommendations for legislation,  to an interim committee of the Legislative Assem-
bly related  to energy technology, with copies to the Director of the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services and the Director of Transportation, no later  than September 15,
2024.
(12) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall provide staff  support to the
task force.
(13) Members of the task  force are not entitled to compensation or reimbursement for
expenses and serve as volunteers on the task force.
(14) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is repealed on December 31, 2024.
SECTION 4. Section 5 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 315.
SECTION 5. (1) A credit against taxes that are otherwise due under  ORS chapter 316 or,
if the taxpayer is a corporation, under ORS chapter 317 or 318, is allowed to  a taxpayer that
is eligible for, and claims, an advanced manufacturing production tax credit under section
45X of the Internal Revenue Code. The credit shall be allowed in an amount equal to 10 per-
cent of the tax credit as allowed to the taxpayer for  the same tax year under section 45X
of the Internal Revenue Code and properly  claimed on the taxpayer’s federal income tax re-
turn.
(2) Prior to claiming the credit allowed under this section, a taxpayer must:
(a) Obtain written certification of eligibility from the State Department of Energy;
(b) Provide copies of any information or  registration the federal Secretary of the Treas-
ury required from the taxpayer under 26 U.S.C. 45X(a)(3)(B)(ii).
(c) Demonstrate with appropriate attestation  and supporting documentation that, to the
extent required for manufacturing, supplying, constructing or installing  an advanced energy
project under the  terms and conditions of a public contract, the taxpayer has complied with
ORS 279C.533 and 279C.800 to 279C.870.
(3) The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the tax  liability of the taxpayer
for the tax year.
(4) Any tax credit otherwise allowable under this section that is not  used by the taxpayer
[3]
HB 3579
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in a particular tax year may be carried forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax  liability
for the next succeeding tax  year. Any credit remaining unused in the next succeeding tax
year may be carried forward and used in the second succeeding tax year, and likewise any
credit not used in that second succeeding tax year may be  carried forward and used in the
third succeeding tax year but may not be carried forward for any tax year thereafter.
(5) If a change in the tax year of the taxpayer occurs as described in ORS 314.085, or if
the Department of Revenue terminates the taxpayer’s tax year under ORS  314.440, the credit
allowed under this section shall be prorated or computed  in a manner consistent with ORS
314.085.
(6) The State Department of Energy shall adopt rules for  the purposes of this section,
including policies and procedures for verifying taxpayer eligibility for the credit allowed un-
der this section.
(7) The State Department of Energy shall provide  information to the Department of Re-
venue about all taxpayers that are eligible for a tax  credit under this section, if required as
provided in ORS 315.058.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 314.772, as amended by section 11,  chapter 34, Oregon Laws 2022, and section
15, chapter 115, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
314.772. (1) Except as provided in ORS 314.766 (5)(b), the tax credits allowed or allowable  to a
C corporation for purposes  of ORS chapter 317 or 318 shall not be allowed to an S corporation. The
business tax credits allowed or allowable for purposes of ORS chapter 316 shall be allowed  or are
allowable to the shareholders of the S corporation.
(2) In determining the tax imposed under ORS chapter 316, as provided under ORS 314.763, on
income of the  shareholder of an S corporation, there shall be taken into account the shareholder’s
pro rata share of  business tax credit (or item thereof) that would be allowed to the corporation (but
for subsection (1) of this section) or  recapture or recovery thereof. The credit (or item thereof), re-
capture or recovery shall be passed through to shareholders in pro rata shares as determined in the
manner prescribed under section 1377(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) The character of any item included in a shareholder’s pro rata  share under subsection (2)
of this section shall be determined as if such item were realized  directly from the source from which
realized by the corporation, or incurred in the same manner as incurred by the corporation.
(4) If the shareholder is a nonresident and there is a requirement applicable  for the business tax
credit that in the case of a nonresident the credit be allowed  in the proportion provided in ORS
316.117, then that provision shall apply to the nonresident shareholder.
(5) As used in this section, “business  tax credit” means the following credits: ORS 315.104
(forestation and reforestation), ORS 315.138 (fish screening, by-pass devices,  fishways), ORS 315.141
(biomass production for biofuel), ORS  315.156 (crop gleaning), ORS 315.164 and 315.169 (agriculture
workforce housing), ORS 315.176 (bovine manure), ORS 315.204 (dependent care assistance), ORS
315.208 (dependent care facilities), ORS 315.213  (contributions for child care), ORS 315.237 (employee
and dependent scholarships), ORS 315.271 (individual development accounts), ORS  315.304 (pollution
control facility), ORS 315.326 (renewable energy development  contributions), ORS 315.331 (energy
conservation projects), ORS 315.336 (transportation projects), ORS 315.341  (renewable energy re-
source equipment manufacturing facilities), ORS 315.354 and 469B.151 (energy  conservation facili-
ties), ORS  315.506 (tribal taxes on reservation enterprise zones and reservation partnership zones),
ORS 315.507 (electronic commerce), ORS 315.514 (film production development contributions), ORS
315.523 (employee training programs), ORS  315.533 (low income community jobs initiative), ORS
[4]
HB 3579
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
315.593 (short line railroads), ORS 315.640 (university venture development funds), ORS  315.643
(Opportunity Grant Fund contributions), ORS 315.675 (Trust for  Cultural Development Account
contributions), ORS 317.097 (loans for affordable housing), ORS 317.124 (long term enterprise zone
facilities), ORS 317.147 (loans for agriculture workforce housing), ORS 317.152 (qualified research
expenses) and ORS 317.154 (alternative qualified research expenses) and  section 9, chapter 774,
Oregon Laws 2013 (alternative fuel vehicle  contributions), section 2, chapter 34, Oregon Laws 2022
(small forest option), [ and] section 8, chapter 115, Oregon Laws 2022 (agricultural overtime  pay) ,
and section 5 of this 2023 Act (advanced manufacturing production) .
SECTION 7.
 ORS 318.031, as amended by section 12,  chapter 34, Oregon Laws 2022, and section
16, chapter 115, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
318.031. It being the intention of the Legislative Assembly that this chapter and ORS chapter
317 shall be administered as uniformly as  possible (allowance being made for the difference in im-
position of the taxes), ORS 305.140  and 305.150, ORS chapter 314 and the following sections are in-
corporated into and made a part of this chapter: ORS 315.104, 315.141, 315.156, 315.176,  315.204,
315.208, 315.213, 315.304, 315.326, 315.331, 315.336, 315.506,  315.507, 315.523, 315.533, 315.593 and
315.643 and section 2, chapter 34, Oregon Laws 2022, [ and] section  8, chapter 115, Oregon Laws
2022, and section 5 of this 2023 Act (all only to the extent applicable to a corporation) and  ORS
chapter 317.
SECTION 8. Section 5 of this 2023  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2024, and before January 1, 2030.
SECTION 9. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[5]