Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 36, chapter 913, Oregon Laws 2009, as amended by  section 9, chapter 750,
Oregon Laws 2013, and section 27, chapter 579, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 36.  A credit may not be claimed under  ORS 316.157 for tax years beginning on or after
January 1, [ 2026] 2032.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3627