Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The governing  body of a city or county may adopt an ordinance imposing
a public transit incentive surcharge on the amount of any fine, fee or  other charge imposed
for violation of any section of the respective city’s or county’s motor vehicle parking code.
(2) The surcharge may be imposed in an amount not to exceed 30 percent of the  amount
of the fine, fee or other charge.
(3) The surcharge shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as the fine,
fee or other charge.
(4) The surcharge may be contested in the same manner as the fine, fee or other charge.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2698