Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A person commits the crime of threatening a mass injury event if:
(a) The person intentionally causes fear, alarm or terror in  another person by conveying
a threat to cause unlawful serious physical injury or death to two or more persons;
(b) The person expresses the intent to carry out the threat; and
(c) A reasonable person would:
(A) Be placed in fear, alarm or terror by the threat; and
(B) Believe that the threat was likely to be carried out.
(2) Threatening a mass injury event is a Class C felony.
(3) A threat under this section may be conveyed orally, in writing or telephonically,  or
may be an electronic threat as defined in ORS 166.065.
(4) In a prosecution under this section, the state is not required  to specifically identify
the two or more persons against whom the threat is made.
SECTION 2.
(1)(a) The Department of Corrections shall distribute moneys to counties to
fund supervision services for persons convicted under section 1 of this 2023 Act.
(b) The Oregon Youth Authority shall  distribute moneys to counties to fund supervision
services for persons found to be within the  jurisdiction of the court under ORS 419C.005 for
committing an act that, if committed by an adult, would constitute  an offense under section
1 of this 2023 Act.
(2) The obligation of the department and authority  to distribute moneys under subsection
(1) of this section is limited to the  extent of moneys specifically appropriated to the depart-
ment and authority for that purpose.
SECTION 3.  ORS 161.005 is amended to read:
161.005. ORS 161.005 to 161.055, 161.085 to  161.125, 161.150 to 161.175, 161.190 to 161.275, 161.290
to 161.373, 161.405 to 161.485, 161.505 to 161.585, 161.605, 161.615  to 161.685, 161.705 to 161.737,
162.005, 162.015 to 162.035, 162.055 to 162.115, 162.135 to 162.205, 162.225 to  162.375, 162.405 to
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 604
HB 3035
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
162.425, 162.465, 163.005,  163.095, 163.107, 163.115, 163.125 to 163.145, 163.149, 163.160 to 163.208,
163.191, 163.196, 163.215 to 163.257, 163.261, 163.263, 163.264, 163.266, 163.275, 163.285,  163.305 to
163.467, 163.432, 163.433,  163.472, 163.505 to 163.575, 163.665 to 163.693, 163.700, 163.701, 163.715,
164.005, 164.015 to 164.135, 164.138, 164.140, 164.205 to 164.270, 164.305 to  164.377, 164.395 to 164.415,
164.805, 164.857, 164.886, 165.002 to 165.102, 165.109, 165.118, 165.805, 165.815, 166.005  to 166.095,
166.350, 166.382, 166.384, 166.660, 167.002 to 167.027, 167.057, 167.060 to 167.100, 167.117, 167.122 to
167.162, 167.203 to 167.252, 167.310 to 167.340, 167.350, 167.810  and 167.820  and section 1 of this
2023 Act shall be known and may be cited as Oregon Criminal Code of 1971.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Corrections, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund,  the amount of $
, for distribution to counties for the purpose of
carrying out section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Youth Authority, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $ , for distribution to counties for the purpose  of
carrying out section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]