Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2019 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
chapter 215.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Accessory dwelling unit” has the meaning given that term in ORS 215.501.
(b) “Area zoned for rural residential use” has the meaning  given that term in ORS
215.501.
(c) “Single-family dwelling” has the meaning given that term in ORS 215.501.
(d) “Vacation occupancy” has the meaning given that term in ORS 90.100.
(2) Consistent with its comprehensive plan, a county may allow  an owner of a lot or
parcel within an area zoned for rural  residential use to construct one accessory dwelling unit
on the lot or parcel, provided:
(a) The lot or parcel is not located within in an area designated as an urban  reserve as
defined in ORS 195.137;
(b) The lot or parcel is at least two acres in size;
(c) One single-family dwelling is sited on the lot or parcel;
(d) The existing single-family dwelling or the lot or parcel is  not subject to an order de-
claring it a nuisance or subject to any pending action under ORS 105.550 to 105.600;
(e) The accessory dwelling unit will comply with  all applicable laws and regulations re-
lating to sanitation and wastewater disposal and treatment;
(f) The accessory dwelling unit will have a floor area of no greater than 900 square feet;
(g) The accessory dwelling unit will be located no further  than 100 feet from the existing
single-family dwelling;
(h) If the water supply source for the accessory dwelling unit or associated lands  or
gardens will be a well,  no portion of the lot or parcel is within a critical ground water area
as designated under ORS 537.730 to  537.740 or within any area in which ground water with-
drawals have been restricted by the Water Resources Commission;
(i) No portion of the lot or parcel is within a designated area of critical  state concern;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 876
SB 88
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
and
(j) The department identifies the lot or parcel under section 3 of this 2019 Act as:
(A) Low risk;
(B) Moderate risk, and the accessory dwelling unit and the  existing single-family dwelling
each comply with rules of the State Board of Forestry under ORS 477.015 to 477.061; or
(C) High or very high risk, and the  accessory dwelling unit and the existing single-family
dwelling each comply with rules of the State Board of Forestry under ORS  477.015 to 477.061
and with:
(i) The class  1 ignition-resistant construction material requirements for new con-
struction under section 504 of the International Wildland-Urban Interface Code (2015); or
(ii) Any ignition-resistant construction requirements for newly  constructed dwellings
adopted in the Oregon residential speciality code after the effective date  of this 2019 Act that
relate specifically to construction in areas of high fire risk in the wildland-urban interface.
(3) A county may impose  conditions on the use of accessory dwelling units for vacation
occupancy. A county may consider the following factors when allowing vacation occupancy:
(a) The cumulative impact on the county’s  implementation of statewide land use planning
goals related to housing and transportation.
(b) Whether the owner uses the existing single-family dwelling as a primary residence.
(c) Other factors, including requiring neighbor notification or a  visitor and neighbor local
point of contact.
(4) A county that allows construction of an  accessory dwelling unit under subsection (2)
of this section may not approve:
(a) A subdivision, partition or other division of the lot or  parcel so that the existing
single-family dwelling is situated on a different lot or parcel than the accessory dwelling unit.
(b) Construction of an additional accessory dwelling unit on the same lot or parcel.
(5) A county may require that an accessory dwelling unit constructed under this section
be served by the same water  supply source or water supply system as the existing single-
family dwelling. If the accessory dwelling unit is served by a well,  the construction of the
accessory dwelling unit shall maintain all setbacks from the well  required by the Water Re-
sources Commission or Water Resources Department.
(6) An existing single-family  dwelling and an accessory dwelling unit allowed under sub-
section (2) of this section are  considered a single unit for the purposes of calculating ex-
emptions under ORS 537.545 (1).
SECTION 3.
The Land Conservation and Development Commission shall  adopt rules by
which counties may classify lands that are within a fire protection  district as described in
ORS chapter 478 as low, moderate,  high or very high fire risk. In determining the level of
risk, the department shall require consideration of whether a community  wildfire protection
plan, as defined in 16 U.S.C. 6511, has been created or updated in the past five years.
[2]