Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Public Defense Services Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,  out
of the General Fund, the amount of $  for  Metropolitan Public Defender Services, and
an office providing public defender services for a rural county, for a pre-entry pilot program.
SECTION 2. The Public Defense Services  Commission shall study the results of the pre-
entry pilot program described in  section 1 of this 2017 Act and report to the interim com-
mittees of the Legislative  Assembly related to the judiciary in the manner provided under
ORS 192.245 on or before February 1, 2019.
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3042