Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Education shall study  the adequacy of the statutory re-
quirements related to reports of abuse and sexual conduct in public schools  under ORS
339.370 to 339.400. The department shall  submit a report in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees  of the
Legislative Assembly related to education no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4495