Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Human Services shall provide grants to  assist indi-
viduals who are noncitizens and  who do not possess valid immigration documentation to
change their immigration status or obtain lawful permanent resident status.
(2)(a) A grant provided under this section  must be used to cover the costs of immigration
legal services or the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services  fees associated with
the process  for changing an immigration status or obtaining a lawful permanent resident
status.
(b) Grant moneys awarded under this section shall be paid on behalf of a grant  recipient
to an immigration legal services provider that has  been approved by the department or to
the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.
(c) An individual may be awarded no more than one grant under this section.
(3) An individual shall be eligible for a grant under this section in the following amounts:
(a) $1,500 for an individual who  has an annual gross income for the prior tax year that
is not greater than $60,000.
(b) $1,000 for an individual who has an annual gross income for  the prior tax year that
is greater than $60,000 and not greater than $70,000.
(c) $750 for  an individual who has an annual gross income for the prior tax year that is
greater than $70,000 and not greater than $80,000.
(4) The department  shall prescribe the form and manner in which an individual may apply
for a grant under this section.
(5) The department  may, in consultation with community-based organizations that have
connections to or experience working with immigrants or  immigrant populations, establish
eligibility criteria that an individual must meet to qualify for a grant under this section.
(6) The department may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 131
HB 4085
1
2
3
4
5
6
ated to the Department of Human Services, for the biennium ending June 30,  2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $6,000,000,  for the purpose of providing grants under section 1
of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]