Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,526,167 for distribution  to the Oregon
Campus Resilience Consortium for the purpose of implementing emergency response, conti-
nuity and recovery initiatives at post-secondary educational institutions  in this state, which
may include:
(a) Development of a  statewide training program focusing on prevention, preparedness,
incident response,  continuity of operations and recovery, including the establishment of all-
hazard incident management teams to serve post-secondary educational  institutions in this
state;
(b) Development of a mutual aid agreement process for  post-secondary educational in-
stitutions in this state;
(c) Development of campus-specific training and outreach materials  for preparedness and
mitigation to benefit students, faculty and staff  of post-secondary educational institutions in
this state; and
(d) Establishment  of an online resource sharing and collaboration center for higher edu-
cation practitioners charged with  maintaining campus safety, emergency preparedness and
disaster resilience.
(2) As used in this section, “post-secondary educational institution” means:
(a) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(b) A community college as defined in ORS 341.005;
(c) The Oregon Health and Science University; and
(d) A nonprofit private school that is authorized to confer academic degrees under ORS
348.594 to 348.615.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3015
SB 231
1
2
3
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]