Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 251.305 is amended to read:
251.305. (1) The county clerk of a county shall prepare, print and distribute a  county
voters’ pamphlet for any primary election and general election.
(2) The county clerk of any county may prepare, print and  distribute a county voters’ pamphlet
that is not otherwise required under subsection (1)  of this section  for any election  other than
a primary election or general election .
SECTION 2.  ORS 251.315, as amended by section 5, chapter  55, Oregon Laws 2024, and section
2, chapter 56, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
251.315. (1)  [ If a county produces a county voters’ pamphlet, the ] A county voters’ pamphlet
[shall] must include, when applicable, at least the following information:
(a) Requirements for a citizen to qualify as an elector.
(b) Requirements for registration and updates of registration.
(c) Elector instructions, including the right of an elector to request a second ballot if  the first
ballot is spoiled and the right of an elector to seek assistance in marking the ballot.
(d) The  hours and locations of places designated under ORS 254.470 for deposit of official ballots.
(e) Any  portraits and statements relating to candidates submitted in accordance with the pro-
visions of ORS 251.305 to 251.435.
(f) Any ballot titles, explanatory statements and arguments submitted in accordance with the
provisions of ORS 251.305 to 251.435.
(g)(A) Statements  in the information section of the voters’ pamphlet on the pages immediately
following the page containing the letter of the county clerk, filing office or  other public election
official, to the extent reasonably practicable, that:
(i) Are written in English and the 10 additional common languages for the  county listed by the
Secretary of State under ORS 251.167;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3869
HB 3514
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(ii) Explain that an electronic copy of  portions of the voters’ pamphlet is publicly available in
that language; and
(iii) Provide the website address to the translated voters’ pamphlet.
(B) The statements required under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph must be written so  as to
be clearly readable.
(C) The Secretary of State may adopt rules necessary to implement this paragraph.
(h) Such other information as the county clerk considers to be appropriate  or necessary to in-
form the voters.
(2) The county clerk shall mail or otherwise distribute the county voters’ pamphlet not later
than the last day for mailing ballots to electors as provided in ORS 254.470.
(3)(a) The name of the county clerk or other filing officer may not appear in the county voters’
pamphlet in the county clerk’s or filing officer’s official  capacity if the county clerk or filing officer
is a candidate in the election for which the voters’ pamphlet is printed.
(b) As used in this subsection, “filing officer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 254.165.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 251.335 is amended to read:
251.335. (1) As used in this section, “district” has the meaning given that term in ORS 255.012.
(2) Not later than the date specified by the Secretary of State, any candidate for  nomination or
election to county, city or special district office within the  county, or an agent of the candidate,
may file with the county clerk [ of a county that prepares a ] for purposes of the  county voters’
pamphlet a portrait of the candidate  and a typewritten statement of the reasons the candidate
should be elected.  The portrait and statement must comply with the applicable rules of the Secretary
of State.
(3) The county clerk may not accept the filing of a  statement or portrait of any candidate unless
the filing is accompanied by the appropriate fee described in ORS 251.325.
(4) At the bottom of each  allotted space of the county voters’ pamphlet containing a portrait and
statement filed by a candidate, the county clerk shall include:
(a) A statement identifying the person who furnished the portrait and statement; and
(b) A disclaimer in boldfaced type in substantially the following form:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
The above information has not been verified for accuracy by the county.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
SECTION 4.
 ORS 251.345 is amended to read:
251.345. Not later than the date specified by  the Secretary of State, [ in a county that prepares
a] for purposes of the county voters’ pamphlet, the governing body for any electoral  district that
has referred a measure to the voters shall submit an impartial, simple  and understandable statement
explaining the measure and its effect.
SECTION 5.  ORS 251.355 is amended to read:
251.355. (1) Not later than the date specified by the Secretary  of State by rule, [ in a county that
prepares a ] for purposes of the  county voters’ pamphlet, any person may file with the county clerk
a typewritten argument supporting or opposing any measure to be submitted to the voters on the
ballot. The county clerk may not accept  any arguments that are not accompanied by the fee estab-
lished by the Secretary of State or a petition in a  form prescribed by the Secretary of State. A pe-
tition shall contain  the signatures of at least four percent of the electors in the county eligible to
[2]
HB 3514
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vote on the measure to which the argument refers, or the  signatures of 1,000 electors in the county
eligible to vote on the measure  to which the argument refers, whichever is less. The number of
registered electors in an electoral district, for the purposes of this section, shall be  calculated on
January 1 of each year. Each  person signing the petition shall subscribe to a statement that the
person has read and agrees  with the argument. The signatures on each petition shall be certified
by the county clerk in the manner provided in ORS 249.008. The petition shall be  filed with the
county clerk.
(2) The county clerk shall include in the county  voters’ pamphlet, on the page of the printed
argument, the name of the person who submitted the argument,  the name of the organization the
person represents, if any, whether the argument supports or opposes the measure and  a disclaimer
that the argument does not  constitute an endorsement by the county and that the county does not
warrant the accuracy or truth of any statement made in the argument.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 251.365 is amended to read:
251.365. (1) [ Any county clerk ] For purposes of  preparing, printing and distributing a  county
voters’ pamphlet , a county clerk  may apportion  the cost of preparing, printing and distributing the
county voters’ pamphlet as a cost of the election according to  the formula established by the Sec-
retary of State for the allocation of election costs.  The apportioned election costs shall be reduced
for each electoral district by the amount of any revenue received by the county clerk from the
submission of candidate portraits, statements and arguments for that electoral district.
(2) Any revenue collected by the county clerk from the submission  of candidate portraits,
statements or  arguments for any electoral district which may exceed the apportioned cost of the
election for that electoral district shall be applied to reduce the shared costs of the election  for all
remaining electoral districts.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 251.067 is amended to read:
251.067. (1) A candidate or agent on behalf  of the candidate for nomination or election to any
county or city office, or to an elected office of a metropolitan service district organized under ORS
chapter 268, may file a portrait or statement for inclusion in the state  voters’ pamphlet under ORS
251.065 if a  county voters’ pamphlet [ described in ORS 251.305 to 251.435 ] is not required under
ORS 251.305 and is  not prepared for the election in each county in which the electoral district of
the candidate is located.
(2) A community college district measure relating to bonding, a county measure  or a measure
of a  metropolitan service district organized under ORS chapter 268, and the ballot title, explanatory
statement and arguments relating to the  measure, shall be included in the state voters’ pamphlet
as provided in ORS 251.285, if a  county voters’ pamphlet [ described in ORS 251.305 to 251.435 ] is
not required under ORS 251.305 and  is not prepared:
(a) For the election on the county measure; or
(b) In each county in which the community college district  or metropolitan service district is
located, for the election on the community college district measure  relating to bonding or metro-
politan service district measure.
(3) If a county voters’ pamphlet described in ORS 251.305 to 251.435 is prepared for an election
at which a candidate for nomination or election to any county or city office, or  to an elected office
of a  metropolitan service district organized under ORS chapter 268, is listed on the ballot, or at
which a community  college district measure relating to bonding, a county measure or a measure of
a metropolitan service district organized  under ORS chapter 268 is listed on the ballot, the county
voters’ pamphlet shall include  the county or city office, the office of the metropolitan service district
[3]
HB 3514
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or the  community college district measure relating to bonding, county measure or measure of the
metropolitan service district.  Such offices and measures [ shall] may  not be included in any state
voters’ pamphlet prepared for the election  and distributed in the county for which the county voters’
pamphlet is prepared.
(4) If a city, metropolitan service district organized under  ORS chapter 268 or community col-
lege district is located in more than one county, and a county in which the city, metropolitan service
district or community college district is located does not prepare a  county voters’ pamphlet de-
scribed in ORS 251.305 to 251.435 for  the election, candidates for nomination or election to any city
office or an elected office of the metropolitan service district, and any community college district
measure relating to bonding or measure of the metropolitan service district, [ shall] must  be included
in the state voters’ pamphlet to be distributed to the county that does not prepare a  county voters’
pamphlet. The Secretary of State shall designate the candidates and measures  that may be included
in the state voters’ pamphlet under this subsection.
(5) As used in  this section, “community college district” has the meaning given that term in ORS
341.005.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 254.485, as amended by section 3, chapter 56, Oregon Laws 2024, is  amended
to read:
254.485. (1) Ballots may be tallied by a vote tally system or  by a counting board. A counting
board may tally ballots at the  precinct or in the office of the county clerk. In any event, the ballots
shall be tallied and returned by precinct.
(2) If a counting board has been appointed, the tally of ballots may begin  on the date of the
election.
(3)(a) If ballots are tallied by a counting board, after the tally has begun it shall continue  until
completed. Except as provided in  paragraph (b) of this subsection, a counting board shall tally
without adjournment and in the presence of the clerks and persons authorized to attend.
(b) A counting board may be relieved by  another board if the tally is not completed after 12
hours.
(4) A counting board shall audibly announce the tally as it proceeds. The board shall use  only
pen and ink to tally.
(5) For ballots cast using a voting machine, the county clerk shall:
(a) Enter the ballots cast using the machine into the vote tally system; and
(b) In the event of a  recount, provide the paper record copy recorded by the machine to the
counting board.
(6) A person other than  the county clerk, a member of a counting board or any other elections
official designated by the county clerk may not tally ballots under this chapter.
(7) The county clerk shall cause to be published  on the website maintained by the county,
after 8 p.m.  on the day of a primary election and general election, an unofficial tally of votes
for that county. The county clerk shall cause to be published  an update to the unofficial tally
of votes described under this subsection not less than one time on the day of the election.
[(7)] (8) The Secretary of State shall by rule establish a procedure for announcing the status of
the tally of the  ballots received after the date of the election. Rules adopted under this subsection
must:
(a) Consider the number of ballots being released in relation to the size of the district;
(b) Prioritize voter anonymity; and
(c) After prioritizing voter anonymity  under paragraph (b) of this subsection, prioritize the im-
[4]
HB 3514
1
2
portance of timely reporting election results.
[5]