Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 (1) There is created the Community Outreach and Labor  Education Program
within the Apprenticeship and Training Division of the Bureau of Labor  and Industries, as
a grant program to fund outreach, education and technical assistance to Oregon  workers
pertaining to employee rights in the workplace.
(2) Grants provided through the Community Outreach and Labor Education Program may
be used for activities including:
(a) Door-to-door outreach;
(b) Community-based education events;
(c) Training materials;
(d) Technical assistance;
(e) Counseling; and
(f) Referral services.
(3) When considering  applications for grants, the program administrators shall give pri-
ority to pilot projects that provide services to:
(a) Low-wage workers;
(b) Women;
(c) Immigrant and refugee workers;
(d) Lesbian, gay, bisexual or transgender individuals;
(e) Workers under 20 years of age;
(f) Disabled workers; and
(g) Workers of color.
(4) Grants will be distributed in a manner that ensures populations  around the state will
be served and reached.
(5) Grant recipients must have experience serving the  populations they propose serving
with grant funds.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2888
HB 2856
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ated to  the Bureau of Labor and Industries, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $_______, for grants described in section 1  of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3.  ORS 659A.885, as amended  by section 5, chapter 73, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended
to read:
659A.885. (1) Any person claiming to be  aggrieved by an unlawful practice specified in sub-
section (2) of this section may file  a civil action in circuit court. In any action under this subsection,
the court may order injunctive relief and any other equitable  relief that may be appropriate, in-
cluding but not limited to reinstatement or the hiring of employees with or without back pay.  A
court may order back pay in an action under this subsection only for the two-year period imme-
diately preceding the filing  of a complaint under ORS 659A.820 with the Commissioner of the Bureau
of Labor and Industries, or  if a complaint was not filed before the action was commenced, the two-
year period immediately preceding the filing of the action.  In any action under this subsection, the
court  may  allow the prevailing party costs and reasonable attorney fees at trial and on appeal. Ex-
cept as provided in subsection (3) of this section:
(a) The judge shall determine the facts in an action under this subsection; and
(b) Upon any appeal of a judgment in an action under this subsection, the appellate court  shall
review the judgment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (3).
(2) An  action may be brought under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS
10.090, 10.092, 25.337, 25.424, 171.120, 408.230, 408.237 (2), 475B.233, 476.574, 652.355, 653.060, 653.601
to 653.661, 659.852, 659A.030, 659A.040, 659A.043, 659A.046, 659A.063, 659A.069, 659A.082, 659A.088,
659A.103 to 659A.145, 659A.150 to  659A.186, 659A.194, 659A.199, 659A.203, 659A.218, 659A.228,
659A.230, 659A.233, 659A.236, 659A.250 to 659A.262, 659A.277, 659A.290, 659A.300,  659A.306,
659A.309, 659A.315, 659A.318, 659A.320, 659A.355, 659A.421, 653.547 or 653.549.
(3) In any action under subsection (1)  of this section alleging a violation of ORS 25.337, 25.424,
652.355, 653.060, 653.601 to 653.661, 659.852, 659A.030, 659A.040, 659A.043,  659A.046, 659A.069,
659A.082, 659A.103 to 659A.145, 659A.150 to 659A.186, 659A.194, 659A.199, 659A.203, 659A.228,
659A.230, 659A.250 to 659A.262, 659A.277, 659A.290, 659A.318, 659A.421, 653.547 or 653.549:
(a) The court may award, in addition  to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
compensatory damages or $200, whichever is greater, and punitive damages;
(b) At the request of any party, the action shall be tried to a jury;
(c) Upon appeal of any judgment finding a violation, the appellate court shall review the  judg-
ment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (1); and
(d) Any attorney fee agreement shall be subject to approval by the court.
(4) In any action under subsection (1)  of this section alleging a violation of ORS [ 652.355 or
653.060] 659A.355, the court may award, in addition to the relief  authorized under subsection (1) of
this section, compensatory damages or $200, whichever is greater.
(5) In any action under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS  171.120, 476.574
or 659A.218, the court may award, in addition to  the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this
section, compensatory damages or $250, whichever is greater.
(6) In any action under  subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS 10.090 or 10.092,
the court may award, in  addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section, a civil
penalty in the amount of $720.
(7) Any individual against whom any distinction,  discrimination or restriction on account of
race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation,  national origin, marital status or age, if the individual
is 18 years of age or older, has been made by any place of public accommodation, as defined in ORS
[2]
HB 2856
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
659A.400, by any employee or  person acting on behalf of the place or by any person aiding or
abetting the place or person in violation of ORS 659A.406 may  bring an action against the operator
or manager of the  place, the employee or person acting on behalf of the place or the aider or abettor
of the place or person.  Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, in an action under this sub-
section:
(a) The court may award, in addition  to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
compensatory and punitive damages;
(b) The operator or manager of the  place of public accommodation, the employee or person
acting on behalf of the place, and any  aider or abettor shall be jointly and severally liable for all
damages awarded in the action;
(c) At the request of any party, the action shall be tried to a jury;
(d) The court shall award reasonable attorney fees to a prevailing plaintiff;
(e) The court may award reasonable attorney  fees and expert witness fees incurred by a de-
fendant who prevails only if the court determines that the  plaintiff had no objectively reasonable
basis for asserting a claim or no  reasonable basis for appealing an adverse decision of a trial court;
and
(f) Upon  any appeal of a judgment under this subsection, the appellate court shall review the
judgment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (1).
(8) When the commissioner or the Attorney General  has reasonable cause to believe that a
person or group of persons is engaged in a pattern or practice of resistance to the rights  protected
by ORS  659A.145 or 659A.421 or federal housing law, or that a group of persons has been denied
any of the rights protected by ORS  659A.145 or 659A.421 or federal housing law, the commissioner
or the  Attorney General may file a civil action on behalf of the aggrieved persons in the same
manner as a person or group of persons may file a civil action  under this section. In a civil action
filed under this subsection, the court may assess against the  respondent, in addition to the relief
authorized under subsections (1) and (3) of this section, a civil penalty:
(a) In an amount not exceeding $50,000 for a first violation; and
(b) In an amount not exceeding $100,000 for any subsequent violation.
(9) In any action under subsection (1) of this section  alleging a violation of ORS 659A.145 or
659A.421 or alleging discrimination under federal housing law, when  the commissioner is pursuing
the action on behalf of an aggrieved complainant, the  court shall award reasonable attorney fees to
the commissioner if the commissioner prevails in the action.  The court may award reasonable at-
torney fees and expert witness fees  incurred by a defendant that prevails in the action if the court
determines that the commissioner had no objectively reasonable basis for asserting the  claim or for
appealing an adverse decision of the trial court.
(10) In an action under subsection (1) or (8)  of this section alleging a violation of ORS 659A.145
or 659A.421 or discrimination under federal housing law:
(a) “Aggrieved person” includes a person who believes that the person:
(A) Has been injured by an unlawful practice or discriminatory housing practice; or
(B) Will be injured by an  unlawful practice or discriminatory housing practice that is about to
occur.
(b) An aggrieved person in regard to issues to be determined in an action may intervene  as of
right in the action. The Attorney General may intervene in the action if  the Attorney General cer-
tifies that the case is of general public importance. The court may  allow an intervenor prevailing
party costs and reasonable attorney fees at trial and on appeal.
[3]
HB 2856
1
2
3
4
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
[4]