Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Level III trauma hospital” means a trauma  system hospital that provides resusci-
tation, stabilization and assessment  of a severely injured patient and either provides treat-
ment or transfers the patient to a higher level trauma system hospital.
(b) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(c) “Trauma system hospital” means a hospital designated by the Oregon Health  Au-
thority to receive and provide services to trauma patients.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide reimbursement in the state medical as-
sistance program for inpatient and  outpatient hospital services provided by a hospital that
meets the criteria under subsection (3) of this section at a rate that  is no less than 150
percent of the reimbursement rates paid to the hospital as  of the effective date of this 2025
Act.
(3) A hospital is eligible for the reimbursement  rates described in subsection (2) of this
section if the hospital:
(a) Receives Medicare reimbursement on the basis of diagnostic related groups;
(b) As of January 1, 2025, was classified by the  Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Ser-
vices as a rural referral center in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1395ww(d)(5)(C)(i);
(c) As of January 1, 2025,  was classified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Ser-
vices as a sole community hospital in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1395ww(d)(5)(D)(iii);
(d) As of January 1, 2025, was designated by the authority as a Level III trauma  hospital;
(e) As of January 1, 2025, had fewer than 200 acute care licensed beds;
(f) Maintains a cardiac catheterization laboratory that is equipped, staffed and capable
of providing routine primary percutaneous coronary interventions; and
(g)(A) Operates as  a nonprofit organization described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code that is exempt from income tax under section 501(a)  of the Internal Revenue
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4948
SB 1214
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
Code; or
(B) Is owned and operated by the state or a political subdivision of the state.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 414.743,  a coordinated care organization shall reimburse a hos-
pital that  meets the criteria under subsection (3) of this section at the rates described in
subsection (2) of this section.
(5) At any time that the authority increases the  reimbursement rates that are paid to
hospitals that do not meet the criteria under subsection (3) of  this section, the authority and
a coordinated care organization shall increase the rates described in  subsection (2) of this
section by an equivalent percentage.
SECTION 2.
Section 1  of this 2025 Act applies to contracts between a coordinated care
organization and the Oregon Health Authority entered  into, amended or renewed on or after
the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]