Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2019 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
chapter 468.
SECTION 2.  Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the Department of Envi-
ronmental Quality shall deposit no less than 50  percent of the total annual amount of all civil
penalties imposed by the Environmental Quality Commission or the department for violations
of water quality  rules or standards in the Waterway Enhancement Fund established under
section 3 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Waterway Enhancement Fund is established in the State  Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund.  Moneys in the Waterway Enhancement Fund
are continuously appropriated to the Department of Environmental Quality for  the purposes
specified in this section.
(2) The fund shall consist of moneys deposited in the  fund under section 2 of this 2019
Act.
(3) Moneys in the fund may be used:
(a) To pay the expenses of the department in activities associated  with the removal and
disposal of debris in waterways; and
(b) To provide grants for activities associated with the removal  and disposal of debris in
waterways.
(4) The  Environmental Quality Commission shall adopt rules to implement the provisions
of this section and section 2 of this 2019 Act.  Rules adopted under this subsection shall in-
clude, but need not be limited to, rules for establishing a grant program for the distribution
of moneys in the fund consistent with subsection (3)(b) of this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2173