Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A public institution of  higher education may apply for a “Hunger Free
Campus” designation. An application under this subsection shall be made to the Higher Ed-
ucation Coordinating Commission under a process adopted by rule by the commission.
(2) The commission shall award a “Hunger Free  Campus” designation under this section
to each public institution of higher education that applies  under subsection (1) of this section
and demonstrates that the institution has:
(a) Established a hunger task force that:
(A) Meets three or more times per academic year;
(B) Creates two or more action plans to combat hunger among students enrolled at  the
institution; and
(C) Includes two or more representatives of the current student body on the task force;
(b) Designated a staff member who is  responsible for assisting students with enrollment
in the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program;
(c) Provided:
(A) Options for students to use federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program ben-
efits at campus stores; or
(B) Information on establishments near  the campus of the public institution of higher
education where students could use Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits to
purchase products;
(d) Hosted a campus awareness event during national Hunger  and Homelessness Aware-
ness Week;
(e)(A) Provided at least one physical food pantry on the campus of the institution; or
(B) Enabled students to receive food through a direct, stigma-free arrangement  estab-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2046
HB 3089
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
lished between the institution and a local food pantry or food bank that is near campus;
(f)(A) Developed a student meal credit donation program; or
(B) Designated moneys  from the institution to provide free meal vouchers for students;
and
(g) Conducted a biennial student survey on hunger at the institution:
(A) That is developed by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission; and
(B) The results of which are disaggregated  by race, gender, sexual orientation, parenting
status and financial aid status.
(3) When the  commission determines that sufficient moneys are available, the commis-
sion shall administer a  grant program to provide moneys for funding student hunger pro-
grams and innovations  at public institutions of higher education. The commission shall by
rule establish a process for public  institutions of higher education to apply for grant moneys
under this subsection. When deciding  which applications to award grants to, the commission
shall prioritize based on the percentage of students at the institution who meet at least one
of the following criteria:
(a) Are recipients of federal Pell grants;
(b) Are recipients of Oregon Opportunity Grants;
(c) Are recipients of moneys from the Oregon Promise program;
(d) Are eligible to receive resident tuition under ORS 352.287; and
(e) Are enrolled in:
(A) A GED program as defined in ORS 339.460;
(B) Adult basic skills classes;
(C) Nonreimbursable courses that are not taken for academic credit; or
(D) Workforce development courses.
(4) The commission may adopt rules to implement this section.
(5) As used in this section, “public institution of higher education” means:
(a) A public university listed in ORS 352.002; and
(b) A community college operated under ORS chapter 341.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2023, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, to fund the grant program described
in section 1 (3) of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2023.
[2]