Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) There is allocated for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, from the Ad-
ministrative Services Economic Development Fund, the amount of  $1,680,000 for the purpose
of making the distributions described in subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) The department shall distribute $70,000 for each  year of the biennium to each of
the 12 economic development districts defined in ORS 285B.636.
(b) Each  district shall use the moneys to receive federal matching grants awarded by the
United States Economic Development  Administration of the United States Department of
Commerce.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1090