Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 471.230 is amended to read:
471.230. (1) A distillery license allows the licensee  to import, manufacture, distill, rectify, blend,
denature and store distilled liquor, to sell the distilled liquor to  the Oregon Liquor Control Com-
mission and to transport the distilled liquor out of this state for sale outside  this state. Distillery
licensees may purchase and  sell distilled liquor from or to another distillery licensee in containers
having a capacity greater than one  U.S. gallon for blending and manufacturing purposes. A distillery
licensee  may  not sell any alcoholic beverage within this state except to the commission or as pro-
vided in this section. However, any agricultural producer or association  of agricultural producers
or the legal agents of an agricultural producer or association of agricultural producers  that manu-
factures and converts agricultural surpluses, by-products and wastes into denatured ethyl and in-
dustrial alcohol for use in the arts and industry are not required to obtain a license from the
commission.
(2) If a distillery licensee holds a valid  distilled spirits plant basic permit issued by the federal
Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau for the licensed premises, the distillery licensee may:
(a) Permit tastings of distilled liquor approved by the commission for sale in Oregon and manu-
factured in Oregon  by the distillery licensee or by another distillery licensee. Tastings may be of
the distilled liquor alone or with a mix of other liquids. If any of the  other liquids are distilled li-
quors, they must be distilled liquors on the list of products  approved by the commission for retail
sale in Oregon and must be purchased by the licensee at the retail price established  by the com-
mission. This paragraph does  not authorize sales by the drink of distilled liquor. The tastings may
be conducted on the licensed premises of the distillery  and at no more than five other premises
owned or leased  by the licensee. The commission may allow more than one distillery licensee to use
the same premises at the same time for conducting tastings if  the premises are a primary production
location and the licensees share the premises or are owned by the same entity. If  the manufacturer
of the distilled liquor obtains distilled liquor for conducting  tastings from the inventory of the
commission, the licensee shall pay the commission a processing fee.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 26
SB 1565
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Obtain a special events distillery license.
(c) Apply for appointment by the commission as a distillery  retail outlet agent for purposes of
retailing distilled liquor at locations  where tastings are permitted under paragraph (a) of this sub-
section or subsection (4)(a) of this section. A distillery  retail outlet agent may sell at locations
where tastings are allowed under paragraph (a) of this subsection only distilled liquor that is on  the
list of products approved by the commission for retail sale  in Oregon and is manufactured in Oregon
by the distillery licensee or by another distillery licensee that uses the same  premises as a primary
production location or is owned by the same entity as the distillery licensee.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 471.392 to 471.400, a distillery licensee may hold  one or more full on-
premises sales licenses. All distilled liquor sold under a full on-premises sales license must be pur-
chased from the commission.
(4) A distillery licensee that holds a special  events distillery license may conduct an event on
premises designated in the special events distillery license. Except as provided in  this subsection,
a special events distillery license may be valid for a period not exceeding five days. The  commission
shall limit the approval of special events distillery licenses for a distillery licensee at the  same lo-
cation to not more than 62 days during a calendar year. A distillery licensee conducting  a special
event may:
(a) Permit tastings of distilled liquor approved by the commission for sale in Oregon and manu-
factured in Oregon by the distillery  licensee. Tastings may be of the distilled liquor alone or with
a mix of other liquids. If any of the other liquids are distilled liquors, they must  be distilled liquors
on the list of products approved by the  commission for retail sale in Oregon and must be purchased
by the licensee at the retail price established by the commission. If the manufacturer of  the distilled
liquor obtains distilled liquor for conducting  tastings from the inventory of the commission, the
licensee shall pay the commission a processing fee.
(b) Permit sales by the drink of distilled liquor. A drink  that a distillery licensee sells under this
paragraph must include distilled liquor that the licensee manufactured in Oregon.  Any distilled li-
quor contained in the drink must be on the list of products approved  by the commission for retail
sale in  Oregon. The distillery licensee selling the drink must purchase all distilled liquor contained
in the drink at the retail price set by the commission for the month in which the drink is sold.
(c) If the distillery licensee  has been appointed as a distillery retail outlet agent under sub-
section (2)(c) of this section, sell distilled  liquor in factory-sealed containers for consumption off the
licensed premises. A distillery retail  outlet agent may sell at a location where tastings are allowed
under paragraph (a) of  this subsection only distilled liquor that is on the list of products approved
by the commission for retail sale  in Oregon and is manufactured in Oregon by the distillery licensee.
The distillery retail outlet agent must sell the distilled liquor at the retail price set  by the com-
mission for the month of sale.
(5) The commission shall pay a distillery retail outlet agent compensation for distilled li-
quor retail sales by the agent under subsection (2)(c) or  (4)(c) of this section. The compen-
sation rate shall be:
(a) For the first $250,000 of annual total combined retail sales from all distillery  retail
outlet agent tasting  locations operated by the distillery licensee under subsection (2)(a) or
(4)(a) of this section,  45 percent of the retail price set by the commission for the sold distilled
liquor.
(b) For distilled liquor retail sales by the agent that are not described in  paragraph (a)
of this subsection, 17 percent of the  retail price set by the commission for the sold distilled
[2]
SB 1565
1
2
3
4
5
liquor.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 471.230 by section  1 of this 2020 Act apply to dis-
tilled liquor retail sales made by a distillery retail outlet agent on or after  the effective date
of this 2020 Act.
[3]