Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife,  in consultation with the De-
partment of State Lands and the State Parks and Recreation Department, shall study  the
potential for developing commercial seaweed production to produce feed for livestock as  a
means to reduce methane emissions.
(2) The State Department of  Fish and Wildlife shall present the study in a report to an
appropriate committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly,  in the manner
provided under ORS 192.245, on or before September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3196