Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Water Resources Department shall:
(1) In cooperation with the United States Geological Survey,  the ground water advisory
committee and other interested parties, develop and publish a report that:
(a) Identifies each ground water basin in this state; and
(b) For each ground water basin in this state, summarizes the  known status of subsur-
face geology, ground water reservoirs, ground water levels, ground water budgets,
consumptive ground water  use, ground water-dependent ecosystems and other information
that affects the management of ground water resources.
(2) Identify ground water use issues associated with each ground water basin.
(3) Develop recommendations for:
(a) How to determine  which ground water basins most need detailed ground water studies
and management; and
(b) Methods to regularly report to the Legislative  Assembly on statewide consumptive
ground water  use, historical use of ground water to irrigate fields and estimates of water
evaporation, since 1984, from all major reservoirs in this state.
(4) Identify a  comprehensive network for monitoring ground water levels that will im-
prove estimates of ground water use.
(5) Report to a committee of  the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly related to water, in
the manner provided in ORS 192.245, on the department’s:
(a) Estimated  costs and timing of providing regular basin reports on ground water re-
charge, consumptive  ground water use, evapotranspiration, ground water levels and trends,
the status of ground water-dependent ecosystems and methods for monitoring ground  water
use;
(b) Estimated costs and timing of conducting ground water basin studies; and
(c) Recommendations for how to  prioritize water management in the major hydrological
basins in this state.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3240
HB 3242
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
SECTION 2.
There is appropriated to the Water Resources Department,  for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2021,  out of the General Fund, the amount of $250,000 for the purposes de-
scribed in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]