Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Human Services shall study how to simplify the provision
of child welfare services  in this state. The department shall submit a report in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for  legislation, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to human services no later than  September
15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2842