Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Environmental Quality shall contract with  an inde-
pendent third party to  study and assess the potential for requiring owners or operators of
bulk oils or liquid fuels terminals, as  defined in ORS 468B.510, to obtain insurance, a surety
bond or other evidence of  financial assurance for costs associated with a catastrophic release
of oil or liquid fuels as a result of an earthquake.
(2) No Later than September 15, 2026, the department shall submit the findings of the
study and assessment in a report to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to the environment in the manner provided by ORS 192.245.  The report may include
recommendations for legislation.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2550