Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall develop a master
plan for  county fairground capital construction. The master plan shall consist of five-year
and 10-year capital construction plans for  each county fairground in this state and any
findings or recommendations of the department regarding  county fairground capital con-
struction.
(2) The department shall retain a consultant to work with each county  fair board, the
board of directors for each fair  association exercising powers under ORS 565.268 and the
board of each fair district operating under ORS 565.275 to identify the five-year and  10-year
capital construction needs for county  fairground facilities. The department shall work with
the consultant in developing the master plan for county fairground capital construction.
(3) The department shall  complete the master plan and shall report the plan in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the Eightieth Legislative Assembly during  the 2020 reg-
ular session. The department shall provide copies  of the report to each county fair board
and to the boards for each fair association and fair district.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium  beginning July 1,
2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $250,000, which may be expended by the  de-
partment for consultant services described under section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2019 Act is repealed July 1, 2021.
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 739