Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section and section 2 of this 2023 Act:
(a) “Federal firearms licensee” means a person licensed as  a dealer, manufacturer or
importer under 18 U.S.C. 923.
(b) “Firearm” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.210.
(c) “Firearm hold agreement” means a private transaction  between a federal firearms
licensee and an individual firearm owner, in which the licensee takes physical possession of
the owner’s lawfully possessed, locked firearm at  the owner’s request, stores the locked
firearm for an agreed-upon period of time and returns the  locked firearm to the owner ac-
cording to the terms of the agreement.
(d) “Locked”  means that a firearm is secured with an engaged trigger or cable lock or
in a locked container.
(2)(a) A federal firearms licensee  may enter into a firearm hold agreement with a firearm
owner. The firearm hold agreement may not require the payment of  a fee to the licensee in
exchange for storing the firearm.
(b) ORS 166.412 does not apply to the return of a firearm to the firearm owner after
storage of the firearm pursuant to a  firearm hold agreement described in this section, and
a federal firearms licensee  need not perform a criminal background check prior to the return
of the firearm except as required under federal law.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a federal  firearms licensee
who takes physical possession of a locked firearm pursuant to  a firearm hold agreement, and
who stores the locked  firearm, is immune from civil liability arising from taking possession
of the firearm, storing the firearm or returning the firearm to the owner.
(b) The immunity described in paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply:
(A) If  the licensee returns the firearm to a person the licensee knows, or reasonably
should know, is a danger to self or others.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4516
HB 3615
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) In a civil action based upon the licensee’s negligence or unlawful conduct.
(4) The  existence of an individual firearm hold agreement may not be disclosed by the
licensee except pursuant to a warrant or subpoena or as required under federal law.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon  Health Authority shall by rule create a grant program to
fund the storage of firearms pursuant to firearm hold agreements.  The authority shall es-
tablish grant eligibility criteria and an application and selection process for the program.
(2) A federal firearms licensee  who intends to store or is storing a firearm pursuant to
a firearm hold agreement may apply to the authority  for a grant to fund the storage of the
firearm.
(3) Grant funds awarded under this section may be used for any costs  associated with
storing firearms pursuant to a firearm hold agreement.
(4) The authority shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $3,000,000, to fund the grant program  described in section 2 of
this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 166.291, as amended by section 5, chapter 97, Oregon Laws 2022, is  amended
to read:
166.291. (1) The sheriff of  a county, upon a person’s application for an Oregon concealed
handgun license, upon receipt of the appropriate fees and after  compliance with the procedures set
out in this section, shall issue the person a concealed handgun license if the person:
(a)(A) Is a citizen of the United States; or
(B) Is a  legal resident noncitizen who can document continuous residency in the county for at
least six months and has declared in writing to the  United States Citizenship and Immigration Ser-
vices  the  intent to acquire citizenship status and can present proof of the written declaration to the
sheriff at the time of application for the license;
(b) Is at least 21 years of age;
(c) Is a resident of the county;
(d) Has no outstanding warrants for arrest;
(e) Is not free on any form of pretrial release;
(f) Demonstrates competence with a handgun by any one of the following:
(A) Completion of any hunter education or hunter safety course approved by  the State Depart-
ment of Fish and Wildlife or a similar agency of another state  if handgun safety [ was a component ]
and the use of firearm hold agreements for firearm suicide  prevention were components  of
the course;
(B) Completion  of any National Rifle Association firearms safety or training course if handgun
safety [was a component ] and the use of firearm hold agreements for firearm suicide prevention
were components of the course;
(C) Completion of any  firearms safety or training course or class available to the general public
offered by law enforcement, community college, or private or public institution or organization  or
firearms training school utilizing instructors certified by the National Rifle Association  or a law
enforcement agency if handgun safety [ was a  component] and the use of firearm hold agreements
for firearm suicide prevention were components  of the course;
(D) Completion of any  law enforcement firearms safety or training course or class offered for
security guards, investigators, reserve law enforcement  officers or any other law enforcement offi-
[2]
HB 3615
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cers if handgun safety  [ was a component ] and the use of firearm hold agreements for firearm
suicide prevention were components of the course;
(E) Presents evidence of equivalent experience with a handgun through participation  in organ-
ized shooting competition or military service;
(F) Is licensed or has been licensed to carry a firearm in this state, unless  the license has been
revoked;  or
(G) Completion of any firearms  training or safety course or class conducted by a firearms in-
structor certified by a law  enforcement agency or the National Rifle Association if handgun safety
[was a component ] and the use of firearm hold agreements for firearm suicide  prevention were
components of the course;
(g) Has never been  convicted of a felony or found guilty, except for insanity under ORS 161.295,
of a felony;
(h) Has not been convicted of a misdemeanor or found guilty, except for insanity under  ORS
161.295, of a misdemeanor within the four  years prior to the application, including a misdemeanor
conviction for the possession of marijuana as described in paragraph (L) of this subsection;
(i) Has not been committed to the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 426.130;
(j) Has not been found to be a person with mental illness and is  not subject to an order under
ORS 426.130 that the person be prohibited from purchasing or possessing a firearm as a result  of
that mental illness;
(k) Has been discharged from the jurisdiction of the juvenile  court for more than four years if,
while a minor, the person was found to be  within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court for having
committed an act that, if committed by an adult, would constitute a felony or  a misdemeanor in-
volving violence, as defined in ORS 166.470;
(L) Has not been convicted of  an offense involving controlled substances or participated in a
court-supervised drug diversion program, except  this disability does not operate to exclude a person
if:
(A) The person can demonstrate that the person has been convicted only  once of a marijuana
possession offense that constituted a misdemeanor or violation under the law of the jurisdiction of
the offense, and has not completed a drug diversion program for a marijuana possession offense  that
constituted a misdemeanor or violation under the law of the jurisdiction of the offense; or
(B) The person can demonstrate that the  person has only once completed a drug diversion pro-
gram for a marijuana possession offense that constituted a misdemeanor or violation  under the law
of the jurisdiction of the offense, and has not been convicted of a  marijuana possession offense that
constituted a misdemeanor or violation under the law of the jurisdiction of the offense;
(m) Is not subject to  a citation issued under ORS 163.735 or an order issued under ORS 30.866,
107.700 to 107.735 or 163.738;
(n) Has not received a dishonorable discharge from the Armed Forces of the United States;
(o) Is not required to register as a sex offender in any state; and
(p) Is not presently subject to an order under ORS 426.133 prohibiting the person from pur-
chasing or possessing a firearm.
(2) A person who has been granted relief under ORS 166.273, 166.274 or  166.293 or 18 U.S.C.
925(c) or has had the person’s  record expunged under the laws of this state or equivalent laws of
other jurisdictions is not subject to the disabilities in subsection (1)(g) to (L) of this section.
(3) Before the sheriff may issue a license:
(a) The application must  state the applicant’s legal name, current address and telephone number,
[3]
HB 3615
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
date and place of birth, hair and eye color and height and weight. The application must also list  the
applicant’s residence address or addresses for the previous three years. The application must contain
a statement by the applicant that the applicant meets the requirements of subsection (1)  of this
section. The application may include the  Social Security number of the applicant if the applicant
voluntarily provides this number. The application must be signed by the applicant.
(b) The applicant must  submit to fingerprinting and photographing by the sheriff. The sheriff
shall fingerprint and photograph  the applicant and shall conduct any investigation necessary to
corroborate the requirements listed under subsection  (1) of this section. If a nationwide criminal
records check is necessary, the sheriff shall request  the Department of State Police to conduct the
check, including fingerprint identification, through the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The Federal
Bureau of  Investigation shall return the fingerprint cards used to conduct the criminal records
check and may not keep any record  of the fingerprints. The Department of State Police shall report
the results of the fingerprint-based criminal records check  to the sheriff. The Department of State
Police shall also furnish the sheriff with any  information about the applicant that the Department
of State Police may have in its possession including, but  not limited to, manual or computerized
criminal offender information.
(4) Application forms for concealed  handgun licenses shall be supplied by the sheriff upon re-
quest. The forms shall be uniform throughout this state in substantially the following form:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
APPLICATION FOR LICENSE TO CARRY
CONCEALED HANDGUN
 Date
I hereby declare as follows:
I am a citizen of the United States or a legal  resident noncitizen who can document continuous
residency in the county for at least six  months and have declared in writing to the United States
Citizenship and Immigration Services my intention to become a citizen  and can present proof of the
written declaration to the sheriff at the time of  this application. I am at least 21 years of age. I have
been discharged from the jurisdiction of the juvenile court for more than four  years if, while a mi-
nor, I was found to be within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court  for having committed an act that,
if committed by an adult, would constitute a felony or  a misdemeanor involving violence, as defined
in ORS 166.470. I have never been convicted of a felony or found guilty, except for  insanity under
ORS 161.295, of a felony in the State of  Oregon or elsewhere. I have not, within the last four years,
been convicted of a misdemeanor or found guilty, except for insanity under ORS 161.295, of  a
misdemeanor. Except as provided in ORS 166.291 (1)(L), I have not  been convicted of an offense in-
volving controlled substances or  completed a court-supervised drug diversion program. There are
no outstanding warrants for my arrest and I am not free  on any form of pretrial release. I have not
been committed to the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 426.130, nor  have I been found to be a
person with mental illness and  presently subject to an order prohibiting me from purchasing or
possessing a firearm because of mental illness. I am not under a court order to participate  in as-
sisted outpatient treatment that includes an order prohibiting me  from purchasing or possessing a
firearm. If any of the previous conditions do apply to me,  I have been granted relief or wish to pe-
tition for  relief from the disability under ORS 166.273, 166.274 or 166.293 or 18 U.S.C. 925(c) or have
had the records expunged. I am not subject to a citation issued under ORS 163.735 or an order is-
sued under ORS 30.866,  107.700 to 107.735 or 163.738. I have never received a dishonorable discharge
[4]
HB 3615
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
from the Armed Forces of the United States. I am not required to register as a sex offender  in any
state. I understand I will be fingerprinted and photographed.
Legal name 
Age  Date of birth 
Place of birth 
Social Security number 
(Disclosure of your Social Security account number is voluntary.  Solicitation of the number is au-
thorized under ORS 166.291. It will be used only as a means of identification.)
Proof of identification (Two pieces of current identification are  required, one of which must bear a
photograph of the applicant. The type of identification and the number on the identification are to
be filled in by the sheriff.):
1.
2.
Height  Weight 
Hair color  Eye color 
Current address 
 (List residence addresses for the
 past three years on the back.)
City  County  Zip 
Phone 
I have read the entire text of this application, and the statements  therein are correct and true.
(Making false statements on this application is a misdemeanor.)
 (Signature of Applicant)
Character references.
Name:  Address
Name:  Address
Approved  Disapproved  by 
Competence with handgun demonstrated by  (to be filled in by sheriff)
Date  Fee Paid 
License No. 
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(5)(a) Fees for concealed handgun licenses are:
[5]
HB 3615
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
(A) $15 to the Department of State Police for conducting the  fingerprint check of the applicant.
(B) $100 to the sheriff for the initial issuance of a concealed handgun license.
(C) $75 to the sheriff for the renewal of a concealed handgun license.
(D) $15 to the sheriff for the duplication of a license because of loss or change of address.
(b) The sheriff may enter into an agreement with  the Department of Transportation to produce
the concealed handgun license.
(6) No civil or criminal liability  shall attach to the sheriff or any authorized representative en-
gaged in the receipt and review of, or an investigation connected with,  any application for, or in the
issuance, denial or revocation of, any license under  ORS 166.291 to 166.295 as a result of the lawful
performance of duties under those sections.
(7) Immediately upon acceptance of an application for a concealed handgun license, the  sheriff
shall enter the applicant’s name into the Law Enforcement  Data System indicating that the person
is an applicant for a concealed handgun license or is a license holder.
(8) The county sheriff may waive the residency requirement in subsection  (1)(c) of this section
for a resident of a contiguous state who has a compelling business  interest or other legitimate
demonstrated need.
(9) For purposes of subsection (1)(c) of this section, a person is a resident of  a county if the
person:
(a) Has  a current Oregon driver license issued to the person showing a residence address in the
county;
(b) Is registered to vote in the county and has  a voter notification card issued to the person
under ORS 247.181 showing a residence address in the county;
(c) Has documentation showing that the  person currently leases or owns real property in the
county; or
(d) Has documentation showing that  the person filed an Oregon tax return for the most recent
tax year showing a residence address in the county.
(10) As used in this section, “drug diversion program” means a  program in which a defendant
charged with a marijuana possession offense completes a program  under court supervision and in
which the marijuana possession offense is  dismissed upon successful completion of the diversion
program.
SECTION 5.
The amendments to ORS 166.291 by section 4 of this 2023 Act apply only to
applications for new concealed handgun licenses submitted  on or after the effective date of
this 2023 Act, and do not apply to renewals of concealed  handgun licenses occurring on or
after the effective date of this 2023 Act.
[6]