Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of  Justice shall study issues related to the eligibility for
compensation awards under ORS 147.005 to 147.367 of victims of sex trafficking crimes.
(2) The department shall provide the results of the study in a report to  the appropriate
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided under  ORS 192.245
no later than December 31, 2021.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2022.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3382