Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 681.
SECTION 2. An audiologist may:
(1) For the  correction or relief of a condition for which they are used, prescribe, order,
sell, dispense and fit to an individual:
(a) Hearing aids;
(b) Hearing assistive technologies and assistive listening devices;
(c) Tinnitus treatment devices;
(d) Vestibular treatment devices;
(e) Auditory processing treatment devices; and
(f) Auditory rehabilitation devices;
(2) For the correction or relief of a condition for which they are used,  prescribe, order,
sell, dispense and externally fit a sound processor to an osseointegrated device, cochlear
implant or an auditory brainstem implant; and
(3) Perform the following:
(a) Conduct health screenings;
(b) Remove a cerumen from the external auditory canal;
(c) Remove a foreign body from the external auditory canal;
(d) Order and perform an  in-office, nonradiographic scanning or imaging of the external
auditory canal;
(e) Order radiographic and nonradiographic imaging; and
(f) Order cultures of blood work.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 681.205 is amended to read:
681.205. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Approved  college or university” means a college or university offering a graduate program
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2703
SB 943
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of study in speech-language pathology  or audiology, leading to a master’s or doctoral degree, that
is [ fully accredited or conditionally approved by the  American Speech-Language-Hearing Association,
or its successor agency,  or has been otherwise determined by the State Board of Examiners for
Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology to meet the association standards  as incorporated into
board rules.]:
(a) Fully accredited or conditionally approved by the Council on Academic  Accreditation,
or its successor organization, or the Accreditation Commission for Audiology Education, or
its successor organization,  and approved by the State Board of Examiners for Speech-
Language Pathology and Audiology; or
(b) Otherwise determined by the board  to meet the standards of another association
similar to those described in this subsection, as adopted by the board by rule.
(2) “Audiologist” means a person [ who practices audiology ] licensed under this chapter  to
practice audiology and who uses publicly any title or  description of services incorporating the
words “audiologist,” “doctor of audiology,”  “hearing clinician,” “hearing specialist,”  “hearing
therapist” or any similar titles or descriptions of service.
(3) “Conditional license” means a license issued to an applicant under ORS 681.325.
(4)(a) “Practice of audiology” means:
[(a) To apply the principles, methods  and procedures of measurement, prediction, evaluation, test-
ing, counseling, consultation  and instruction that relate to the development and disorders of hearing,
vestibular functions and related language  and speech disorders to prevent or modify the disorders or
to assist individuals in auditory and related skills for communication. ]
[(b) To fit or sell hearing aids. ]
(A) To screen  for, prevent, diagnose, measure, identify, monitor, test, interpret, evaluate,
manage, treat, modify and rehabilitate auditory or vestibular conditions of the human ear
and the auditory and vestibular systems and related  language, speech and communication
disorders;
(B) To counsel, consult, educate and instruct on auditory or vestibular  conditions of the
human ear and the auditory and vestibular systems  and related language, speech and com-
munication disorders; and
(C) Perform or undertake an action described in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(b) “Practice of audiology” does not include  osseointegrated device surgery or cochlear
implant surgery.
(5) “Practice speech-language pathology” means to apply the principles, methods and  procedures
of measurement, prediction, evaluation, testing, counseling, consultation  and instruction that relate
to the development and disorders of  speech, voice, swallowing and related language and hearing
disorders to prevent  or modify the disorders or to assist individuals in cognition-language and com-
munication skills.
(6) “Speech-language pathologist” means a person who practices speech-language pathology  and
who uses publicly any title or description of services  including but not limited to the words
“speech-language pathologist,” “speech correctionist,”  “speech therapist,” “speech clinician,” “lan-
guage pathologist,” “language therapist” or any similar titles or descriptions of services.
(7) “Speech-language  pathology assistant” means a person who provides speech-language
pathology  services  under the direction and supervision of a speech-language pathologist licensed
under ORS 681.250.
(8) “Unethical conduct” means:
[2]
SB 943
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Obtaining any fee by fraud or misrepresentation.
(b) Employing directly or indirectly  any person who is unlicensed or whose license is suspended
to perform any work covered by this chapter.
(c) Using or causing or promoting the use of any advertising matter, promotional literature,
testimonial, guarantee, warranty, label, brand, insignia, or any other representation, however dis-
seminated or published, that is misleading, deceiving, improbable or untruthful.
(d) Representing that the  services or advice of a person licensed to practice medicine will be
used or  made available in the practice of speech-language pathology or audiology if that is not true,
or using the word “doctor” or “professor” or other like words, abbreviations, or symbols  inaccu-
rately.
(e) Permitting a person other than the license or conditional license holder  to use the license
or conditional license.
(f) Violating the ethical standards of practice adopted by the board under ORS 681.420.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 681.230 is amended to read:
681.230. (1) Without obtaining a license under this chapter, a person may  use a procedure in-
cluded in the practice of speech-language pathology or audiology  if the procedure is within the
person’s scope of practice and the person is:
(a) Licensed by a health professional regulatory board as defined in ORS 676.160;
(b) Performing basic audiometric  testing under the direct supervision or general  supervision
of an audiologist, a  physician licensed under ORS chapter 677 or a naturopathic physician licensed
under ORS chapter 685 [and representing that the person is a medical assistant or audiology
assistant];
(c) A teacher who :
(A) Is licensed by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission [ and who ];
(B) Holds [ a hearing  impaired ] an endorsement related to the education of individuals who
are deaf or hard of hearing that is  issued by the commission;  and
(C) Is working in consultation with a speech-language pathologist or audiologist;
(d) A student participating  in supervised field work or supervised course work in speech-
language pathology or audiology as part of a college or university  program approved by the State
Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology; or
(e) A student taking an undergraduate course in speech-language pathology approved by  the
board.
(2) A person practicing  speech-language pathology or audiology without a license under sub-
section (1) of this section may not represent or imply that the person  is a speech-language
pathologist, speech-language pathology assistant or audiologist.
(3) A person practicing  speech-language pathology or audiology without a license under sub-
section (1)(d) or (e) of this section:
(a) [ Must] Shall use a title that indicates that the person is a student trainee.
(b) May not be paid for speech-language pathology or audiology  services provided by the person,
except that the person may be provided a reasonable educational stipend.
(4) Without obtaining a license under this chapter, a person may:
(a) Consult with or disseminate the person’s research  findings and scientific information to an
accredited academic institution or a governmental agency; and
(b) Offer lectures to the public for a fee, monetary or otherwise.
(5) As used in this section:
[3]
SB 943
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) “Consultation”  means the approval and review of the activities of a person not li-
censed under this chapter, without the assumption  of responsibility for conduct, by a person
licensed under this chapter.
(b) “Direct supervision” means  on-site and personal oversight by a person licensed under
this chapter who assumes responsibility for the conduct of the person being supervised.
(c) “General supervision” means personal review of clinical work and documentation of
work by a person licensed under this chapter who  assumes responsibility for the conduct of
the person being supervised.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 681.250 is amended to read:
681.250. (1)(a) [ A license shall be issued to qualified persons either in speech-language pathology
or audiology. ] The State Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology
shall issue a license to practice speech-language pathology or audiology.
(b) A  person may be licensed in both [ areas] speech-language pathology and audiology if the
person meets the respective qualifications [ and in such instances the license fee shall be as though
for one license ] for licensure .
(2) [ No person shall ] A person may not  practice  speech-language pathology or audiology or
purport to be a speech-language pathologist or audiologist in this state unless the person is licensed
in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 681.270 is amended to read:
681.270. (1) [A person desiring ] In order  to  obtain a license or conditional license from the State
Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology to practice speech-language
pathology or audiology, a person  shall [ make application] apply to the board.
(2) The application [ shall be made upon ] must be on  a form and  in the manner prescribed by
the board.
(3) The application required by this section [ shall] must  be accompanied by  a nonrefundable
application fee established by the board. If a person applies for  a license or conditional license
to practice both speech-language pathology and audiology, the application  fee may not be
higher than the application fee  for a license or conditional license to practice in only one
area.
SECTION 7.  ORS 681.290 is amended to read:
681.290. (1) The State Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology  may
examine by written or oral examination, or by  both. Standards for acceptable performance shall be
determined by  the board. The board may examine or direct the applicant to be examined for
knowledge in whatever theoretical or applied fields in speech-language pathology or audiology  [ it]
the board  considers  appropriate. The board may also examine the candidate with regard to the
professional skills and judgment of the candidate  in the utilization of speech-language pathology or
audiology techniques and methods.
(2) The board may waive the written examination if the applicant has successfully  passed the
Educational Testing Service Praxis II Specialty Area Examination  in speech-language pathology , as
adopted by the board by rule,  or a national examination in audiology , as adopted by the board
by rule.
(3) The board shall grade the examination or  direct [ it] the examination  to be graded. The
board shall retain examination papers [ shall be retained by the board ] for at least one year.
SECTION 8.  ORS 681.300 is amended to read:
681.300. The  State Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology may waive
[4]
SB 943
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the examination described in ORS 681.290 and [ grant] issue  a license to:
(1) An  applicant who holds the Certificate of Clinical Competence , approved by the board by
rule, of  the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association , or its successor organization, in the
area for which the person is applying for a license[ .]; or
(2) An applicant for a license to practice  audiology [ applicant] who is certified by the Ameri-
can Board  of Audiology , or its successor organization, and that certification is approved by
the State Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology by rule .
SECTION 9.
 ORS 681.490 is amended to read:
681.490. (1) The State Board of Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology:
(a) May, upon its own motion, investigate any alleged violation of this chapter.
(b) Shall, upon the complaint of any resident of this  state, investigate any alleged violation of
this chapter.
(2)(a) Upon opening an investigation,  the board shall notify in writing the person who is
the subject of the investigation that a  complaint has been filed against the person or that
the person is otherwise under investigation by  the board. The notice must also provide to the
person:
(A) A statement  of the person’s rights during the investigation and general information
about the investigation process; and
(B) An expected timeline of the investigation.
(b) In conjunction with the notice described in this subsection,  or at the earliest practi-
cable time, the board shall provide  to the person a copy of the complaint by mail or elec-
tronic mail. The board may redact portions of the complaint as necessary.
(c) The board shall allow the person to submit a  written response to the complaint not
later than 21 calendar days  after the date on which the board sent the copy of the complaint
under paragraph (b) of this subsection. The board shall  consider a response submitted under
this subsection in the investigation.
[(2)] (3) In the conduct of investigations, the board may:
(a) Take evidence;
(b) Take the depositions of witnesses, including  the person charged, in the manner provided by
law in civil cases;
(c) Compel the appearance of witnesses, including the person charged, before the  board in per-
son the same as in civil cases;
(d) Require answers to interrogatories; and
(e) Compel the production of books,  papers, accounts, documents and testimony pertaining to the
matter under investigation.
[(3)] (4) In exercising its authority under subsection [ (2)] (3) of this section, the board may issue
subpoenas over the signature of the board chairperson, vice chairperson or  executive director and
the seal of the board in the name of the State of Oregon.
[(4)] (5) The board may bring a cause of action for injunction or other appropriate remedy  to
enforce any provision of this chapter.
[(5)] (6) In addition to  or in lieu of any other sanction permitted under this chapter, the board
may impose a civil penalty of up to  $5,000 for each violation of the provisions of this chapter or
rules adopted by the board under this chapter. A civil penalty imposed under this section  shall be
imposed in the manner provided in ORS 183.745.
(7) The board shall  adopt rules to establish a reasonable timeline for carrying out inves-
[5]
SB 943
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
tigations under this section. The rules must include specified  times for at least the following:
(a) Responding to complaints;
(b) Issuing notices;
(c) Holding hearings;
(d) Issuing decisions; and
(e) Holding appeals.
(8) Subject to  relevant state and federal laws, upon request from a licensing authority
or similar  body of another state or jurisdiction or interstate compact governing body, the
board shall provide information regarding an ongoing or closed investigation  for the purpose
of assisting the regulatory and enforcement  duties of the requesting licensing authority,
similar body or interstate compact governing body.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 681.495 is amended to read:
681.495. Upon receipt of a complaint under this chapter,  the State Board of Examiners for
Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology shall conduct an investigation as described under ORS
676.165 and 681.490.
SECTION 11.
(1) Section 2 of this 2025 Act and  the amendments to ORS 681.205, 681.230,
681.250, 681.270, 681.290, 681.300, 681.490 and 681.495 by sections 3 to 10 of this 2025 Act become
operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The State Board of  Examiners for Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology may
take any action before the operative date  specified in subsection (1) of this section that is
necessary to enable the board to exercise, on  and after the operative date specified in sub-
section (1) of this section, all of the  duties, functions and powers conferred on the board by
section 2 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS  681.205, 681.230, 681.250, 681.270,
681.290, 681.300, 681.490 and 681.495 by sections 3 to 10 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 12. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[6]