Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
chapter 468.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(b) “Qualifying electric  bicycle” means an electric assisted bicycle, as defined in ORS
801.258, that meets criteria established by the Environmental Quality Commission by rule.
(c) “Qualifying equipment” means a bicycle helmet or a bicycle lock purchased in the
same transaction as a qualifying electric bicycle.
(d) “Qualifying individual” means an Oregon resident who:
(A) Is 16 years of age or older; and
(B) Is currently enrolled in the state program that provides medical  assistance or who
has been enrolled in the program within the previous 12 months.
(2) The Environmental Quality Commission shall  establish by rule a program for provid-
ing rebate vouchers to qualifying individuals for the purchase  of qualifying electric bicycles
and qualifying equipment. Rules adopted by the commission must  include policies and pro-
cedures for reimbursement of retailers that accept a rebate voucher as  payment for a qual-
ifying electric bicycle and qualifying equipment.  The Department of Environmental Quality
may hire or contract with a third-party organization to implement and serve as the admin-
istrator of the program required by this section.
(3) Rebate vouchers under the program shall be:
(a) In the amount of $1,200 or the  purchase price of the qualifying electric bicycle and
any qualifying equipment purchased in the same transaction, whichever is less.
(b) Made only for qualifying electric bicycles and qualifying  equipment purchased from a
retailer located in Oregon.
(c) Made from moneys credited to or deposited in  the Electric Bicycle Incentive Fund
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 549
HB 2963
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
established under section 3 of this 2025 Act.
(4) A qualifying individual may  not receive more than one rebate voucher under the
program.
(5) The department shall coordinate with  the Department of Human Services and the
Oregon Health Authority to ensure that a  qualifying individual may apply for a rebate
voucher using the Oregon Eligibility (ONE) system.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Electric Bicycle  Incentive Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from  the General Fund. Interest earned by the Electric Bicycle Incen-
tive Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the  Legislative As-
sembly;
(c) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any public or private source; and
(d) Interest earned by the fund.
(3) Moneys in the  fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of Environ-
mental Quality to be used to carry out the provisions of section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(4) No  more than 10 percent of the moneys deposited in the fund per biennium may be
expended to pay administrative expenses incurred in  the administration of section 2 of this
2025 Act by:
(a) The department; and
(b) Any third-party organization that the department hires  or contracts with under sec-
tion 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department  of Environmental Quality, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the General Fund,  the amount of $6,000,000, for deposit in the Electric Bicycle Incen-
tive Fund established under section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]