Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 414.667 is amended to read:
414.667. As used in ORS [ 414.667, 414.668 and 414.669,] 414.665 to 414.669:
(1) “Community health registered nurse” means a registered nurse licensed under ORS
678.010 to 678.410 who engages in  the practice of nursing, as that term is defined in ORS
678.010, to provide patient care outside of a health care facility and in a setting that combines
primary care and public health.
(2) “Doula” means an individual who meets criteria for a doula adopted by the  Oregon Health
Authority in accordance with ORS 414.665.
(3) “Traditional health worker” includes any of the following:
(a) A community health worker.
(b) A personal health navigator.
(c) A peer wellness specialist.
(d) A peer support specialist.
(e) A doula.
(f) A tribal traditional health worker.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 414.665 is amended to read:
414.665. [(1) As used in this section, “traditional health worker” includes any of the following: ]
[(a) A community health worker. ]
[(b) A personal health navigator. ]
[(c) A peer wellness specialist. ]
[(d) A peer support specialist. ]
[(e) A doula. ]
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 960
SB 529
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(f) A tribal traditional health worker. ]
[(2)] (1) In consultation with the Traditional Health Workers Commission  established under ORS
413.600, the Oregon Health Authority, for purposes  related to the regulation of traditional health
workers, shall adopt by rule:
(a) The qualification criteria, including  education and training requirements, for the traditional
health workers utilized by coordinated care organizations;
(b) Appropriate professional designations for supervisors of the traditional health workers; and
[(c) Processes by which other occupational classifications may be approved to supervise the tradi-
tional health workers. ]
(c) Requirements for the supervision of traditional health workers.
(2) The requirements for the  supervision of traditional health workers under this section
must:
(a) Create processes to allow other occupational  classifications to be approved by the
authority to supervise traditional health workers;
(b) Allow individuals who are not licensed  but who have sufficient professional experi-
ence, as determined by the authority, to supervise traditional health workers; and
(c) Establish a level and frequency of supervision of traditional health  workers that will
allow for group supervision and remote supervision.
(3) The criteria and requirements established under [ subsection (2) of ] this section:
(a) Must be broad enough to encompass the potential  unique needs of any coordinated care or-
ganization;
(b) Must meet requirements  of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to qualify for
federal financial participation; and
(c) May not require certification by the Home Care Commission.
SECTION 3.
Sections 4 and 5 of this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 414.665
to 414.669.
SECTION 4. (1) The Oregon Health  Authority shall adopt rules related to the regulation
of community health registered  nurses. The rules adopted under this section must include
qualification criteria, including training and education requirements, for  community health
registered nurses utilized by coordinated care organizations.
(2) The criteria and requirements established under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Must be broad enough to encompass the potential unique needs of any  coordinated
care organization;
(b) Must meet requirements of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services  to qualify
for federal financial participation; and
(c) May not require supervision of community health registered nurses.
SECTION 5.
The Oregon Health Authority shall:
(1) Contract directly with individual traditional health workers, community  health regis-
tered nurses  and community-based organizations to provide services to medical assistance
recipients; and
(2) Make information about how to access services  from traditional health workers and
community health registered nurses available on a website operated by or on behalf of the
authority and shall provide the information in print whenever a printed explanation of  ben-
efits is available.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 414.668 is amended to read:
[2]
SB 529
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
414.668. A coordinated care organization shall :
(1) Contract directly  with individual traditional health workers, community health regis-
tered nurses and community-based organizations to provide services to members  of the co-
ordinated care organization. The coordinated care organization  shall reimburse traditional
health workers,  community health registered nurses and community-based organizations
using fee-for-service rates or alternative payment methodologies that are  based on quality
and that include the cost of necessary administrative and infrastructure costs; and
(2) Make information about how to access [ doula] services  from traditional health workers
and community health registered nurses  available on a website operated by  or on behalf of the
coordinated care organization and shall  provide the information in print whenever a printed expla-
nation of benefits is available.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 414.669 is amended to read:
414.669. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish comprehensive billing codes  to
include reimbursement for the  cost of a wide range of preventive and social support services
provided by traditional health workers and community  health registered nurses to medical
assistance recipients.
(2) [ The Oregon Health authority, in coordination with the Traditional Health  Workers Commis-
sion, shall in each even-numbered year review, and revise if necessary, any rates of reimbursement  for
doulas.] In each even-numbered year the authority shall:
(a) In coordination with the Traditional Health  Workers Commission, review and revise
if necessary any rates of reimbursement for traditional health workers.
(b) Review and revise if necessary any  rates of reimbursement for community health
registered nurses.
(3) When reviewing and revising rates of reimbursement  under this  section, the authority shall
consider factors including retention of [ doulas] traditional health workers and community health
registered nurses, administrative costs to support traditional health workers  and community
health registered nurses , access to culturally specific [ doulas] traditional health workers and
community health registered nurses  and evidence-based factors and empirical studies related to
the cost-effectiveness of services provided by [ doulas] traditional health  workers and community
health registered nurses.
(4) The authority may not require a  medical diagnosis as a condition of reimbursing the
cost of a service provided by a traditional health worker  or a community health registered
nurse to a medical assistance recipient when the service is  provided outside of a health care
facility.
SECTION 8. Sections 4 and 5 of this 2025 Act and the amendments  to ORS 414.665,
414.667, 414.668 and 414.669 by sections 1, 2, 6 and  7 of this 2025 Act become operative on
January 1, 2026.
SECTION 9. The Oregon Health  Authority may take any action before the operative date
specified in section 8 of this 2025 Act that is necessary to  enable the authority to exercise,
on and after  the operative date specified in section 8 of this 2025 Act, all of the duties,
functions and powers conferred on the authority  by sections 4 and 5 of this 2025 Act and the
amendments to ORS 414.665, 414.667, 414.668 and 414.669 by sections 1, 2, 6 and 7 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 10.
The amendments to ORS 414.668 by section 6 of this 2025 Act  apply to
contracts between a coordinated care organization  and the Oregon Health Authority entered
[3]
SB 529
1
2
3
4
5
6
into, amended or renewed on or after  the operative date specified in section 8 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 11.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]