Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 327.531 is amended to read:
327.531. (1)(a) A school or school  district that meets the eligibility requirements of the special
provisions  of  the United States Department of Agriculture’s National School Lunch Program or
School Breakfast Program may apply to the Department of Education to offer reimbursable
breakfasts, lunches or both at no charge and without  consideration of individual eligibility [ by ap-
plying to the Department of Education ].
(b) If the school or school district is approved under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the school
or school district must offer breakfasts, lunches or both to  all students of the school or school dis-
trict at no charge to the student.
(c) For each breakfast or  lunch that a school or school district provides at no charge as de-
scribed in this  subsection, the Department of Education shall provide reimbursement pursuant to
ORS 327.545 (2).
(2)(a) If a school or school district does not offer reimbursable  breakfasts or lunches as de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section, the school district :
(A) May ensure that each school of the school district:
(i) Offers lunch at no charge to students.
(ii) Offers breakfast at no charge to students, if breakfast must  be offered pursuant to
ORS 327.535.
(B) If the school district does  not elect to provide breakfast and lunch as described in
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph,  must ensure that each school of the school district:
[(A)] (i) Offers lunch at no charge  to students from households with incomes that do not exceed
300 percent of the federal poverty guidelines.
[(B)] (ii) Offers breakfast at no charge to  students from households with incomes that do not
exceed 300 percent of the federal poverty guidelines, if breakfast must be offered pursuant to ORS
327.535.
(b) For each breakfast or lunch that a school or school district provides  at no charge as de-
scribed in this subsection, the Department of Education shall provide reimbursement  pursuant to
ORS 327.545 (3).
(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this  section, a school or school district is not re-
quired to provide breakfast or lunch at no charge to students if :
(a) The Department of Education has insufficient funds to provide reimbursement pursuant  to
ORS 327.545 (2) or (3). The State Board of Education shall adopt rules that describe:
[(a)] (A) The method for determining when the department has insufficient funds;
[(b)] (B) The content and timing of the notice to be provided to school districts when the de-
partment determines that the department has insufficient funds; and
[(c)] (C) The procedures the school or school district must follow upon receiving notice  of in-
[2]
HB 3435
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sufficient funds.
(b) The  Department of Education determines, based on criteria established by the State
Board of Education by rule, that providing breakfast  or lunch at no charge to students would
create a financial hardship for the school or school district due to  changes in federal law
related to eligibility  requirements for providing reimbursable breakfast and lunch at no
charge to all students without consideration of individual eligibility for free  or reduced price
meals.
(4) To the greatest extent practicable, the Department  of Education shall apply for
statewide participation in federal programs and projects that expand the availability of free
or reduced price meals for the students of this state.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 327.545 is amended to read:
327.545. (1) For  school districts with schools that provide United States Department of Agricul-
ture reimbursable meals to students as described in ORS 327.531 and  327.535, the Department of
Education shall reimburse  the school districts for costs incurred by the school districts in providing
the meals.  The amounts of the reimbursements may not exceed the amounts prescribed by sub-
sections (2) and (3) of this section.
(2) For schools that offer reimbursable breakfast and lunch at no charge to all students of the
school without consideration of individual eligibility for free or reduced price  meals as described in
ORS 327.531 (1), the amount  of reimbursements provided under this section may not exceed the dif-
ference between:
(a) The free reimbursement rate established by  the United States Department of Agriculture for
reimbursable meals; and
(b) Any amounts otherwise reimbursed or paid by state, federal or other sources.
(3) For schools that offer reimbursable breakfast and  lunch at no charge to students [ from
households with incomes that do not exceed 300 percent of  the federal poverty guidelines ] as described
in ORS 327.531 (2), the amount of reimbursements provided under this section [ may not exceed ] shall
equal the difference between:
(a) The free reimbursement rate established by  the United States Department of Agriculture for
reimbursable meals; and
(b) Any amounts otherwise reimbursed or paid by state, federal or other sources.
(4) The State Board of Education  may adopt any rules necessary for making reimbursements
under this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 327.531, as amended by section 1 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
327.531. (1)(a) A school or school district that meets the  eligibility requirements of the special
provisions of the United States Department of Agriculture’s National School Lunch Program  or
School Breakfast Program  [ may] must apply to the Department of Education to offer reimbursable
breakfasts, lunches or both at no charge and without consideration of individual eligibility.
(b) If the school or school district is approved under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the school
or school district must offer breakfasts, lunches or both to  all students of the school or school dis-
trict at no charge to the student.
(c) For each breakfast or  lunch that a school or school district provides at no charge as de-
scribed in this  subsection, the Department of Education shall provide reimbursement pursuant to
ORS 327.545 (2).
(2)(a) If a school or school district does not offer reimbursable  breakfasts or lunches as de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section, the school district[ :]
[3]
HB 3435
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(A) May ] must ensure that each school of the school district:
[(i)] (A) Offers lunch at no charge to students.
[(ii)] (B) Offers breakfast at no charge to students, if breakfast must be offered pursuant to  ORS
327.535.
[(B) If the school district does not elect to provide breakfast and lunch as described  in subpara-
graph (A) of this paragraph, must ensure that each school of the school district: ]
[(i) Offers lunch at  no charge to students from households with incomes that do not exceed 300
percent of the federal poverty guidelines. ]
[(ii) Offers breakfast at no charge to students from households with incomes that do not exceed  300
percent of the federal poverty guidelines, if breakfast must be offered pursuant to ORS 327.535. ]
(b) For each breakfast or lunch that a school or school district provides  at no charge as de-
scribed in this subsection, the Department of Education shall provide reimbursement  pursuant to
ORS 327.545 (3).
(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this  section, a school or school district is not re-
quired to provide breakfast or lunch at no charge to students if:
(a) The Department of Education has insufficient  funds to provide reimbursement pursuant to
ORS 327.545 (2) or (3). The State Board of Education shall adopt rules that describe:
(A) The method for determining when the department has insufficient funds;
(B) The content and  timing of the notice to be provided to school districts when the department
determines that the department has insufficient funds; and
(C) The procedures the school or  school district must follow upon receiving notice of insufficient
funds.
(b) The Department of Education determines, based on  criteria established by the State Board
of Education by rule, that providing breakfast or lunch  at no charge to students would create a fi-
nancial hardship for the school or  school district due to changes in federal law related to eligibility
requirements for providing  reimbursable breakfast and lunch at no charge to all students without
consideration of individual eligibility for free or reduced price meals.
(4) To the greatest extent  practicable, the Department of Education shall apply for statewide
participation in federal programs and projects that expand the  availability of free or reduced price
meals for the students of this state.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 327.535 is amended to read:
327.535. (1) As used in this section, “eligible student” means  a student who is eligible for free
or reduced price meals under the United  States Department of Agriculture’s National School Lunch
Program or School Breakfast Program.
(2) A school district may make breakfast accessible at any school  site and shall make breakfast
accessible if required by this section.
(3) Subject to [ subsections (4) and (5) ] subsection (4)  of  this section, a school district that pro-
vides lunch at any school site shall  make breakfast accessible as part of a breakfast program if 25
percent or more of the students at the school site are eligible students or the school site qualifies
for assistance under Chapter I of Title I of the  federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act
of 1965.
(4) A  school district that makes breakfast accessible as provided under subsection (3) of this
section  may  apply to the Department of Education for a waiver for all or for particular grade levels
if the school district  is financially unable to implement a breakfast program. The department may
grant a waiver to the school district for a  period not to exceed two years, after which the school
[4]
HB 3435
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
district must reestablish its claim of financial hardship if the waiver is to be extended.
[(5) If the per meal federal reimbursement for the  breakfast program falls below the 1991 re-
imbursement levels, a school district may elect to discontinue the program until federal funding is re-
stored to those levels. No waiver is required for such election. ]
[(6)] (5) A school  district that makes breakfast accessible at any school site shall make breakfast
accessible at that school site at no charge as provided by ORS 327.531 (1) or  (2). The department
shall provide reimbursement to the school district for each breakfast provided at  no charge as pro-
vided by ORS 327.545.
[(7)(a)] (6)(a) Except as provided by [ subsection (8) of this section ] paragraph (e) of  this sub-
section, a school district that makes  breakfast accessible at a school site [ may choose to ] must
make breakfast accessible at that school site after the beginning of the school day.
(b) Time spent by students consuming breakfast is considered instructional time  when students
consume breakfast in the students’ classroom  and instruction is being provided while students are
consuming breakfast. No more than 15 minutes may be considered instructional time  when students
are consuming breakfast.
[(8)(a) If 70 percent or more of the students at a school site are eligible students, the school district
must make breakfast accessible at that school site after the beginning of the school day. ]
[(b)] (c) A school district that [ is required to make breakfast accessible as prescribed by  para-
graph (a) of this subsection ] makes breakfast accessible  must ensure that breakfast is:
(A) Accessible to all students after the beginning of the school day,  regardless of grade or ar-
rival time; and
(B) Provided at no charge  to all students[ , regardless of whether a student is an eligible
student].
[(c)] (d) The department shall provide technical assistance to school districts to meet the  re-
quirements of this subsection. Technical assistance may include the development of breakfast de-
livery models.
[(d)] (e) [ Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, ] If a school  district can demonstrate
that 70 percent or more of the [ eligible] students at a school site who regularly receive lunch at
the school site also  regularly receive breakfast at the school site without  the school district com-
plying with paragraph (a) of this subsection,  the school district is not required to comply with par-
agraph (a) of this subsection.
[(9)(a)] (7)(a) The  department may award grants or enter into contracts to enable school dis-
tricts to make breakfast accessible as required under subsection [ (8)] (6) of this section. Each grant
or contract may not exceed $5,000 per school site and must  be used to purchase or upgrade neces-
sary equipment required to provide breakfast after the beginning of the school day.
(b) The department may enter into a contract with a  public or private entity for the purposes
of the entity providing:
(A) Technical assistance to applicants for and recipients of grants; and
(B) Administration of the grant program.
[(10)] (8) The State Board of Education  may adopt any rules necessary for the implementation
of this section.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 327.545, as amended by section 2 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
327.545. (1) For school districts with schools that provide United States Department  of Agricul-
ture reimbursable meals to students  as described in ORS 327.531 and 327.535, the Department of
Education shall reimburse the school districts for costs  incurred by the school districts [ in providing
[5]
HB 3435
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
the meals. The amounts of the reimbursements may not exceed the amounts prescribed  by subsections
(2) and (3) of this section. ] as provided by this section.
(2) Reimbursement shall be provided by state sources to school districts:
(a) For meals that meet the stricter of the following nutrition standards:
(A) The nutrition standards prescribed by federal law for reimbursable meals; or
(B) The nutrition standards  prescribed by 7 C.F.R. 210.10 and 220.8, as required to be
implemented by July 1, 2027, as in effect on July 1, 2024.
(b) In amounts that do not exceed the amounts prescribed  by subsections (3) and (4) of
this section.
[(2)] (3) For  schools that offer reimbursable breakfast and lunch at no charge to all students of
the school without consideration of individual eligibility  for free or reduced price meals as described
in ORS 327.531 (1), the amount of reimbursements provided under  this section may not exceed the
difference between:
(a) The free reimbursement rate established by  the United States Department of Agriculture for
reimbursable meals; and
(b) Any amounts otherwise reimbursed or paid by state, federal or other sources.
[(3)] (4) For schools  that offer reimbursable breakfast and lunch at no charge to students as
described in ORS 327.531 (2), the amount of reimbursements provided under this section shall equal
the difference between:
(a) The free reimbursement rate established by  the United States Department of Agriculture for
reimbursable meals; and
(b) Any amounts otherwise reimbursed or paid by state, federal or other sources.
[(4)] (5) The State Board of Education may adopt  any rules necessary for making reimburse-
ments under this section.
SECTION 6.
(1) The amendments to  ORS 327.531, 327.535 and 327.545 by sections 3 to 5
of this 2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2026.
(2) The amendments  to ORS 327.531, 327.535 and 327.545 by sections 3 to 5 of this 2025
Act first apply to the 2026-2027 school year.
SECTION 7. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $4,000,000, which may be expended for:
(1) Paying any costs owed  by parents or guardians for costs incurred before the effective
date of this 2025 Act for a reimbursable meal; and
(2) Assisting  school districts in purchasing or upgrading equipment necessary to ensure
compliance with the amendments to ORS 327.531 and 327.535 by sections 3 and 4 of  this 2025
Act.
SECTION 8. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[6]