Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
ORS 153.657, 339.035, 339.095 and 339.990 are repealed.
SECTION 2.  ORS 153.633 is amended to read:
153.633. (1) In any criminal action in a circuit court in which a fine is imposed, the lesser  of the
following amounts is payable to the state before any other distribution of the fine is made:
(a) $65; or
(b) The amount of the fine if the fine is less than $65.
(2) In any criminal action in  a justice or municipal court in which a fine is imposed, the lesser
of the following amounts is payable to the state before any other distribution of the fine is made:
(a) $50; or
(b) The amount of the fine if the fine is less than $50.
(3) A justice or municipal court shall forward the amount prescribed under subsection  (2) of this
section to the Department of Revenue for deposit in the Criminal Fine Account.
[(4)(a) The provisions of this section do not apply to fines imposed under ORS 339.990. ]
[(b)] (4) The provisions of subsection (2) of this section do not apply to  fines imposed in justice
and municipal courts under ORS 811.590, 814.485, 814.486, 814.534, 814.536, 814.600 or 830.990 (1).
SECTION 3.
 ORS 153.675 is amended to read:
153.675. (1) Amounts payable to the state under ORS 153.633, 153.645[ ,] and 153.650 [ and
153.657] shall be transferred  by the court to the Department of Revenue for distribution as provided
in ORS 305.830. Except as provided in ORS 153.640 (2)(b), amounts payable to a local government
under ORS 153.640 to 153.680 [ and 153.657] shall be deposited by the court  in the local government’s
general fund and are available for general governmental purposes.
(2) Justice and  municipal courts must make the transfer required by subsection (1) of this sec-
tion under ORS 153.633, 153.645[ ,] and 153.650 [and 153.657] not later than the last day  of the month
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3692
HB 2187
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
immediately following the month in which a payment on a judgment is received by the court.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 305.830 is amended to read:
305.830. (1) Amounts transferred to the Department of Revenue by justice  and municipal courts
under ORS 153.633, 153.645[ ,] and  153.650 [ and 153.657] shall be deposited in a suspense account
established under ORS 293.445 for the purpose of receiving criminal fines and assessments.
(2) In carrying out its duties under this section, the  Department of Revenue shall have access
to the records and  dockets of those courts charged with the duty to transfer moneys to the depart-
ment under ORS 153.633, 153.645[ ,] and 153.650 [ and 153.657].
(3) The Department of Revenue may retain from the  funds transferred under ORS 153.633,
153.645[,] and 153.650 [ and 153.657] an amount not to exceed two percent annually for its actual
costs of collection and disbursement of funds under this section, including the cost of  all examina-
tions, investigations and searches, and of all traveling  and other expenses in connection therewith.
The department shall deposit the net amount  of moneys in the suspense account described in sub-
section (1) of this section into the Criminal Fine Account.
(4) All judicial,  municipal and county officers shall cooperate with the Department of Revenue
with respect to the collections, searches and investigations and  shall furnish the Department of
Revenue with any  information contained in any of the records under their respective custodies re-
lating thereto.
(5) The Department of State Police shall cooperate in the investigation of fines, penalties  and
forfeitures.
SECTION 5.  ORS 334.175 is amended to read:
334.175. (1) An education service district  shall provide regionalized core services to component
school districts. The goals of these services are to:
(a) Assist component school districts in meeting the requirements of state and federal law;
(b) Improve student learning;
(c) Enhance the quality of instruction provided to students;
(d) Enable component school districts and  the students who attend schools in those districts to
have equitable access to resources; and
(e) Maximize operational and fiscal efficiencies for component school districts.
(2) The services provided by  an education service district shall be provided according to a local
service plan developed by the education service district and component school districts. The educa-
tion service district and component school districts shall develop the local service plan  to meet the
goals specified in subsection (1) of this section.  The local service plan must include services in at
least the following areas:
(a) Programs for children with  special needs, including [ but not limited to ] special education
services and services for at-risk students.
(b) Technology support for component school districts and the  individual technology plans of
those districts, including [ but not limited to ] technology infrastructure  services, data services, in-
structional technology services and distance learning.
(c) School improvement services for component school districts, including [ but not limited to ]:
(A) Services designed to support component school  districts in meeting the requirements of state
and federal law;
(B) Services designed to allow the education service district  to participate in and facilitate a
review of the state and federal standards related to  the provision of a quality education by compo-
nent school districts;
[2]
HB 2187
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Services designed to support and facilitate continuous school improvement planning;
(D) Services designed to address schoolwide behavior and climate issues; and
(E) Services designed to support career and technical education.
(d) Administrative and support services for component school districts, including [ but not limited
to] services designed to consolidate component school district business functions[ ,] and liaison ser-
vices between the Department of Education and component school districts  [ and registration of
children being taught by private teachers, parents or legal guardians pursuant to ORS 339.035 ].
(e) Other services that an  education service district is required to provide by state or federal
law, including [ but not limited to ] services required under ORS 339.005 to 339.090.
(3) In addition to the services specified in subsection (2) of this section,  a local service plan may
include other services that are designed to meet regional needs.
(4) A local  service plan shall also contain annual performance measures for the education ser-
vice  district.
(5) A local service plan must:
(a) Be adopted by the board of the education service district.
(b) After being adopted by the board of the education service district,  be approved on or before
March 1 by resolution of two-thirds of the component school districts  that are a part of the educa-
tion service district and that  have at least a majority of the pupils included in the average daily
membership of the education service district, as determined by the reports of such  school districts
for the preceding year, enrolled in the schools of the school districts.
(6) Notwithstanding the process for approval and adoption required by subsection (5) of  this
section, if the component school districts approve an amendment to a local  service plan pursuant
to subsection (5)(b) of this section, the board of an education service district may amend a local
service plan that has been previously adopted by  the board and approved by the component school
districts. An amendment to a local service plan may be done at any time.
(7) If  a component school district determines that a local service plan, or the provision of ser-
vices under a local service  plan, does not meet the service needs of the component school district,
the component school district may contract with a public entity for the provision of services.
(8) An education  service district may provide the services required by the local service plan
directly through the staff of the district. In addition, an education  service district may provide ser-
vices required by the local  service plan through the operation of a public school, a public charter
school pursuant to ORS chapter 338, an alternative school or a preschool.
(9) An education service district may provide the services required by the local  service plan in
cooperation with another  education service district or with a school district. In addition, an educa-
tion service district may contract with a public or private entity for the provision of services.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 339.460 is amended to read:
339.460. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “High school equivalency  program” means a program provided to assist a student in earning
a certificate for passing an approved high school equivalency test such  as the General Educational
Development (GED) test.
(b) “High  school equivalency student” means a student who is eligible to attend school under
ORS 339.115 (1) and who is enrolled in a high school equivalency program.
(c) “Homeschooled student” means a  child who is taught by a private teacher, a parent or a
legal guardian, as described in ORS 339.030.
(d) “Interscholastic activities” includes:
[3]
HB 2187
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) For students in any grade from kindergarten through grade 12, athletics, music, speech and
other similar or related activities.
(B) For students in any grade from kindergarten through  grade eight, activities that are offered
only before or after regular school hours and that may, but are not required to,  involve interaction
among other schools.
(e) “Public charter school” has the meaning given that term in ORS 338.005.
(2) A school district may not deny a high school  equivalency student, a homeschooled student
or a student who attends  a public charter school that does not provide interscholastic activities the
opportunity to participate in all interscholastic activities available in the school district  within the
attendance boundaries in  which the high school equivalency student, homeschooled student or public
charter school student resides if the student fulfills the following conditions, as applicable:
(a)(A) For a high school equivalency student or a homeschooled student, the student must meet
all school district eligibility requirements except:
(i) The school district’s school or class attendance requirements; and
(ii) The class requirements of the voluntary  association that administers the interscholastic ac-
tivity, if applicable.
(B) For a student who attends a public charter school,  the student must meet all school district
eligibility requirements except the school district’s school or class attendance requirements.
(b) For a homeschooled  student or a student who attends a public charter school, the student
must demonstrate academic eligibility by meeting one of these requirements:
(A) Achieve a minimum score that places the student at or  above the 23rd percentile[ , based on
national norms, on an examination from the list the State  Board of Education adopts under ORS
339.035] on a nationally normed standardized achievement  test selected from a list adopted
by the State  Board of Education by rule . The student must take the [ examination] test prior to
the beginning of the school year in which the student will participate in an  interscholastic activity
and for which academic eligibility is being determined, and the student’s parent  or legal guardian
must submit the results to the school district for use in determining  the student’s academic eligi-
bility.
(B) Meet alternative requirements that a school district adopts, in consultation with  the
student’s parent or legal guardian, to participate in interscholastic activities, including [ but not
limited to ] a requirement that a student  submit a portfolio of work samples to a school district
committee for review to determine whether  the student is eligible to participate in interscholastic
activities.
(c) For a high school equivalency student, the student must demonstrate academic  eligibility by
showing that, prior to beginning  the interscholastic activity, the student has passed at least one
practice test administered through the high school equivalency program.
(3)(a) In addition to the requirements set forth in subsection  (2) of this section, a public charter
school that enrolls a student who intends to  participate in an interscholastic activity must pay to
the school district or school that offers  the interscholastic activity, as appropriate and if the school
district or school requires payment as provided by this subsection:
(A) An annual fee that is equivalent  to not more than five percent of the amount of the school
district’s General Purpose Grant per ADMw, as calculated under ORS 327.013; and
(B) An additional annual  fee that is equivalent to not more than five percent of the amount of
the school district’s General Purpose Grant per ADMw,  as calculated under ORS 327.013, if partic-
ipating in the interscholastic activity requires the student to enroll in a course for credit.
[4]
HB 2187
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The school district and the public charter  school shall enter into an agreement to specify the
amount of the fees described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) A  public charter school is required to pay a fee described in paragraph (a) of this subsection
only once per year per student participating in an interscholastic activity at a school in the  school
district, regardless of the number of interscholastic activities in which the student participates.
(4) A high school  equivalency student, a homeschooled student or a student who attends a public
charter  school  may participate in interscholastic activities while awaiting [ examination or practice ]
test results unless the student is awaiting the results to restore academic eligibility.
(5) A high school  equivalency student, a homeschooled student or a student who attends a public
charter school who does not maintain academic eligibility is ineligible to participate in interscho-
lastic activities for the school year in which the  student is determined to be academically ineligible
unless:
(a) At least 18 weeks have passed from the later of the date that the student:
(A) Was determined to have not maintained academic eligibility; or
(B) Became a high school equivalency student or a homeschooled student; and
(b) The student takes the  required [ examinations or practice ] tests and meets the standards de-
scribed in subsection (2)(b) or (c) of this section.
(6)(a) A high school equivalency student,  a homeschooled student or a student who attends a
public charter school must fulfill the same responsibilities and standards  of behavior and perform-
ance, including related class  or practice requirements, as other students who participate in the
interscholastic activity. The student must also comply with all  public school requirements during
the time of participation.
(b) A student who attends a public charter school must be allowed to participate in  an inter-
scholastic activity in the same manner that a resident of  the school district may participate in the
interscholastic activity. A school district may not give priority to residents  of the school district to
participate in interscholastic activities, but may require a student  who attends a public charter
school to satisfy any standards for acceptance for participation.
(7) A high school  equivalency student, a homeschooled student or a student who attends a public
charter  school  who participates in interscholastic activities must reside within the attendance
boundaries of the school at which the student participates unless  the school district has a policy
that allows  any student attending a school of the school district to participate in interscholastic
activities at any school of the school district.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 341.522 is amended to read:
341.522. (1) The Office of Student Access and Completion  shall administer the Oregon Promise
program as provided by this section.
(2) Subject to subsections (7) to  (10) of this section, the office shall provide a grant for commu-
nity college courses to a person who meets the criteria described in subsections  (3) to (6) of this
section. The grant shall be limited as provided by subsections (7) to (10) of this section.
(3) A grant shall be awarded under this section to a person who meets the following criteria:
(a) Is enrolled in courses that are:
(A) Offered at a community college in this state; and
(B) Determined  by the office, in accordance with rules adopted by the Higher Education Coor-
dinating Commission, to be required for completion of:
(i) A one-year curriculum for students who plan to  transfer to another post-secondary institution
of education;
[5]
HB 2187
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(ii) An associate degree; or
(iii) A program in career and technical education;
(b) Except as provided in subsection  (5) of this section, has been a resident of this state for at
least 12 months prior to enrolling in the courses described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(c) Attained the  person’s highest level of education, except as provided in subsection (5) of this
section, in this state prior to:
(A) Receiving a diploma under ORS 329.451;
(B) Receiving a certificate for passing an approved  high school equivalency test such as the
General Educational Development (GED) test as provided by ORS 350.175;
(C) Completing grade 12 , as determined by a private  teacher, parent or legal guardian as
described in ORS 339.030 (1)(d) or (e)  [ in compliance with the requirements of ORS 339.035 ]; or
(D) Completing grade 12 at a private or parochial school, as described in ORS 339.030 (1)(a);
(d) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section,  attained the person’s highest
level of education as described in paragraph (c) of this subsection within  six months from the date
that the person first enrolls in courses described in  paragraph (a) of this subsection for the purpose
of receiving a grant under this section;
(e) Earned a cumulative grade point average of 2.0 or better in  high school or otherwise dem-
onstrated an equivalent academic ability, as determined by the office according to rules adopted  by
the commission;
(f) Completed and  submitted the Free Application for Federal Student Aid for each academic
year and accepted all state and federal aid grants available to  the person, if eligible to file the ap-
plication;  and
(g) Has not completed either of the following:
(A) More than  a total of 90 credit hours, or the equivalent, at a post-secondary institution of
education; or
(B) A curriculum, degree or program, as described in paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection.
(4)(a) If a person otherwise meets the required criteria and has been awarded  a grant under
subsection (3) of this  section, but the person enters into service with a career and technical student
organization relating to agriculture or  farming that is approved by the Department of Education
under ORS 344.077 within six months  after the person attained the person’s highest level of educa-
tion as described in subsection (3)(c) of this section, the person will continue to be eligible to receive
the grant if the person first enrolls in courses  described in subsection (3)(a) of this section within
six months of finishing the person’s service with the career and technical student organization.
(b) In addition to the situation  described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the commission may
waive the requirement set forth in subsection (3)(d) of this section for a person who shows  that the
person was unable to timely enroll in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this section due to a
significant hardship. The commission may adopt rules to implement this paragraph.
(5)(a) A member of the  Oregon National Guard who has completed initial active duty training
is not required to comply with the criteria set forth in subsection (3)(d) of this section in order to
receive a grant, provided that the member first enrolls in  courses described in subsection (3)(a) of
this section within six  months after completing initial active duty training, as evidenced by an offi-
cial form issued by the United States Department of Defense.
(b)(A) A  person who completes the highest level of education as described in subsection (3)(c)
of this section while confined in a correctional facility, either serving a  sentence of incarceration
or as a young person, youth or adjudicated youth, is not required to comply with the criteria set
[6]
HB 2187
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
forth in subsection (3)(d) of this  section in order to receive a grant, provided that the person first
enrolls in courses described  in subsection (3)(a) of this section within six months after the date on
which the person is first released from a  correctional facility following completion of the highest
level of education described in subsection (3)(c) of this section.
(B) The eligibility requirements described in subsection (6)(a)(C) of this section  may be waived
by the office according to rules  adopted by the commission for a person who receives a grant under
this section in the manner described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) As used in this paragraph:
(i) “Adjudicated youth,” “detention facility,” “young person” and “youth” have the  meanings
given those terms in ORS 419A.004.
(ii) “Correctional facility” means any place used  for the confinement of young persons, youths
or adjudicated youths or persons charged with or convicted of a crime or otherwise confined  under
a court order, including a:
(I) Youth correction facility;
(II) Detention facility;
(III) Department of Corrections institution;
(IV) Local correctional facility; or
(V) State hospital or a secure intensive community inpatient facility, with respect to  persons
detained therein who are youths or  adjudicated youths, who are charged with or convicted of a
crime or who are detained therein after  having been found guilty except for insanity of a crime
under ORS 161.290 to 161.373 or having  been found responsible except for insanity under ORS
419C.411.
(iii) “Department of Corrections institution” has the meaning given that term in ORS 421.005.
(iv) “Local correctional facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 169.005.
(v) “Youth correction facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 420.005.
(c)(A) If a person was a foster child:
(i) The person shall be treated as meeting the residency criteria for eligibility  under subsection
(3)(b) of this  section if, but for the person’s placement in out-of-state foster care, the person other-
wise meets the requirements of subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(ii) The person shall be treated as attaining the person’s highest  level of education in this state
under subsection (3)(c) of this section if the person  attained the person’s highest level of education
while placed in out-of-state foster care and the person’s highest  level of education substantially
meets the requirements under subsection (3)(c) of this section.
(iii) The person is not required to comply with the  criteria set forth in subsection (3)(d) of this
section in order to receive a grant provided that the  person completes the highest level of education
as described in subparagraph (A)(ii) of this paragraph while in a treatment program and the  person
first enrolls in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this section within 12 months  after the date
on which the person is released from the treatment program.
(B) Upon request from the commission, the Department of Human Services  shall provide doc-
umentation of the placement status of a person described in paragraph (c)(A) of this subsection.
(C) As used in this paragraph:
(i) “Foster care” means substitute care for children placed  by the Department of Human Ser-
vices  or  a tribal child welfare agency away from the child’s parents and for whom the department
or agency  has placement and care responsibility, including placements in foster family homes, foster
homes of  relatives, group homes, emergency shelters, residential facilities, child care institutions and
[7]
HB 2187
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
preadoptive homes.
(ii) “Foster child” means a child over whom the Department of Human Services retained juris-
diction under ORS 417.200 for the duration of the child’s placement in foster care outside the  State
of Oregon.
(6)(a) A person continues to remain eligible  to receive a grant under this section if the person,
in addition to satisfying the criteria specified in subsection (3) of  this section, meets the following
criteria:
(A) Maintains at least the minimum cumulative grade point average prescribed by the  commis-
sion based on federal aid grant requirements;
(B) Makes satisfactory academic  progress toward a curriculum, degree or program, as described
in subsection (3)(a)(B) of this section, as prescribed by the commission based on federal  aid grant
requirements; and
(C) Enrolls in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this section  for a sufficient number of
credit hours to be considered at least a half-time  student each term for at least three terms in each
consecutive academic year.
(b) A person who fails to meet  an eligibility requirement described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection becomes ineligible to receive a grant under this section  for the term after which the
person fails to meet the eligibility requirement, unless the eligibility requirement  is waived by the
office according to rules adopted by the commission.
(7)(a) The  total amount of a grant awarded under this section shall be based on each term that
a person is  enrolled in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this section. Except as provided in
subsections (9) and (10) of this  section, after the amount of tuition for the person for the term is
reduced by any amounts received by the person in state and federal aid grants, the person shall  be
eligible for a grant under this section in an amount that equals:
(A) Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, not less than the greater of:
(i) $2,000, adjusted for inflation based on the  increase of the average cost of tuition at a com-
munity college operated under this chapter in a manner determined by the commission by  rule; and
(ii) The person’s actual cost for tuition.
(B) Not more than the lesser of:
(i) The average cost of tuition at a community  college in this state, as determined by the office;
and
(ii) The person’s actual cost for tuition.
(b)(A) If the office determines both that the person’s actual cost for tuition exceeds the amount
set forth in paragraph (a)(A)(i) of this subsection and that the person’s actual  cost for tuition ex-
ceeds the average cost  of tuition at a community college in this state, the person shall be eligible
for a grant in an  amount that equals the average cost of tuition at a community college in this state.
(B) If the office determines that the person’s actual cost for tuition is less  than the amount set
forth in paragraph (a)(A)(i) of  this subsection, the person shall be eligible for a grant in an amount
that equals the amount set forth in paragraph (a)(A)(i) of this subsection.
(c) The minimum amount of a grant, as calculated under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this sub-
section, may be prorated  for a person who is enrolled in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this
section for a sufficient number  of credit hours to be considered at least a half-time student but not
a full-time student.
(d) The commission may prescribe by rule whether to include fees,  and any limitations related
to the inclusion of  fees, when determining the actual cost of tuition or the average cost of tuition
[8]
HB 2187
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under this subsection.
(8) The commission may adopt by rule the priority by which grants are awarded, which  may
allow for preference to be  given to persons enrolled in school districts or high schools that meet
specified criteria.
(9) Prior to the  start of the fall term of each academic year, the commission shall determine
whether there are sufficient  moneys to award a grant under this section to each person who meets
the criteria described in subsections (3) to (6) of this section. When making a  determination under
this subsection, the commission  may consider both projected resources and statutory modifications
that will take effect during the  current biennium. On the basis of this determination the commission
may:
(a) Limit eligibility to receive a grant under this section to a person whose  financial resources,
as determined by the commission by rule, are at or below the level the commission  determines is
necessary to allow the commission to operate the Oregon Promise program with available moneys;
or
(b) Reduce or eliminate any limitation on eligibility previously  imposed by the commission under
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(10)(a) If at any time the commission determines that there are insufficient  moneys to provide
a grant to each person who has been awarded a grant under this section, the  commission may de-
crease the total amount of the grant awarded.
(b) If at any time the commission determines that the amount  of moneys available to operate the
Oregon Promise program exceeds the amount determined under  subsection (9) of this section, the
commission may reduce or eliminate  any limitation on eligibility to receive a grant under this sec-
tion that was previously imposed by the commission under subsection (9)(a) of this section.
(c) The commission shall promptly notify  the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
responsible for higher education each time the commission takes any action under paragraph (a) or
(b) of this subsection.
(11) The commission shall adopt  any rules necessary for the administration of this section, in-
cluding any requirements related to:
(a) Specifying the form and timelines for submitting an application for a grant under this section;
(b) Determining whether a person is eligible for a grant under  this section, including whether
the person shall be given priority as allowed under subsection (8) of this section;
(c) Implementing programs or  policies that improve the academic success or completion rates for
persons who receive a grant under this section;
(d) Prescribing eligibility requirements and grant calculations for persons dually enrolled in a
community college and a public university; and
(e) Evaluating the impact of the program established under this section, including any  require-
ments for reporting data needed for evaluations.
(12) No later than December 31 of each even-numbered year, the commission shall submit  to an
interim legislative committee related to  education a report that summarizes the commission’s
findings on the impact of the program established under this section. The report shall include:
(a) Student completion rates of curricula, degrees and programs described in subsection (3)(a)(B)
of this section;
(b) The  amount of federal aid grants received by persons who received a grant under this sec-
tion;
(c) The financial impact of the program  on school districts that had students receive a grant
[9]
HB 2187
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under this section;
(d) The financial impact  and the enrollment impact of the program on community colleges and
public universities in this state; and
(e) The overall success rate of the program and financial impact of the program.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 343.331, as amended by section 1, chapter 59, Oregon Laws 2024, is  amended
to read:
343.331. ORS 343.322, 343.324, 343.326 and 343.328 do not apply to any of the following:
(1) Any abbreviated  school days that are a component of discipline imposed in compliance with
ORS 339.250, 339.252 or 343.155 (5) or that are the result  of a placement made as provided by ORS
343.177.
(2) A student’s exclusion from schools  due to the student’s immunization status or due to the
student’s exposure to a restrictable disease, as provided by ORS 433.235 to 433.284.
(3) The exclusion of a student from schools or the closure or  restriction of access to schools due
to actions taken under a public health emergency authorized under ORS 433.441 to 433.452.
(4) A  student who has fulfilled all state requirements for graduation with a high school diploma,
as described in ORS 329.451 (2), when the parent or foster parent has agreed to the  abbreviated
school day program.
(5) A student enrolled in a program  described in ORS 336.585, 336.590, 339.129, 343.261, 343.961
(1)(c)(A)(i) or 346.010, if the student has meaningful  access to the same number of hours of instruc-
tion and educational services as the majority of other  students enrolled in the same program as the
student.
(6) A student [ whose parent or foster parent has notified an education  service district that the
student] who is being taught by a parent, legal guardian or private teacher [ under ORS 339.035 ].
(7) A student who is excluded from, or limited access to, school due to a court order.
(8) A high school student who is voluntarily enrolled in an alternative education program  in
compliance with ORS 336.635, the Expanded Options Program under ORS  340.005 to 340.090 or an
accelerated college credit program as defined in ORS 340.300, when:
(a) The majority of the students of the program are not students with disabilities;
(b) The student is not restricted  to attending fewer hours of instruction and educational services
than the  number of hours of instruction and educational services attended by the majority of stu-
dents without disabilities who are in the same grade and who attend the same program; and
(c) For an alternative education program in which the student is enrolled under ORS  336.635,
the school district informs the parent or foster parent, in writing and in a  language and format ac-
cessible to the parent or foster parent, that  upon written request of the parent or foster parent, the
student will be immediately restored to a school that allows  the student to access the same number
of hours  of instruction and educational services that are provided to the majority of other students
who are in the same grade within the student’s resident school district.
(9) A student who, when registering for classes  for a term or semester of a school year, volun-
tarily does not schedule a class  for one or more class periods. The provisions of this subsection
apply only if the student is:
(a) In grade 11 or 12 and is on track to fulfill all state requirements  for graduation with a high
school diploma, as described in ORS 329.451 (2), or a modified diploma, as  described in ORS 329.451
(7), within four years of starting grade 9; or
(b) On track to fulfill all state requirements for  graduation with a high school diploma, as de-
scribed in ORS 329.451 (2), or  a modified diploma, as described in ORS 329.451 (7), by the end of the
[10]
HB 2187
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
school year in which the student voluntarily does  not schedule a class for one or more class periods.
(10) Asynchronous instruction if the instruction:
(a) Is for only one class per term or semester;
(b) Satisfies a credit  requirement for a high school diploma, as described in ORS 329.451 (2), or
a modified diploma, as described in ORS 329.451 (7);
(c) Is a credit recovery class or is a class not otherwise available to the student;
(d) Is offered to students on a voluntary basis and is not restricted to only students  with a dis-
ability; and
(e) Is accessible to a student while the student  is at school and while staff of the school are
immediately available to the student.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 350.292 is amended to read:
350.292. (1) A public university  listed in ORS 352.002 or a community college shall charge an
enrolled student who  is not a resident of this state and who is attending classes as an undergraduate
or graduate student on a public university or community college campus in this  state tuition and
fees no greater than the resident rate if the student:
(a)(A) Is Native American; or
(B) Is an Alaska Native; and
(b)(A) Received a diploma under ORS 329.451;
(B) Completed grade 12 , as determined by  a private teacher, parent or legal guardian as
described in ORS 339.030 (1)(d) or (e)  [ in compliance with the requirements of ORS 339.035 ]; or
(C) Completed grade 12 at a private or parochial school, as described in ORS 339.030 (1)(a).
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “Alaska Native” means an individual who is an Eskimo  or Aleut or other Alaska Native; and
(b) “Native American” means an individual who:
(A) Is a member of a federally recognized Native American  tribe or band, as defined by the tribe
or band;
(B) Is a member of a  Native American tribe or band, as defined by the tribe or band, that had
the tribe or band’s federal recognition terminated in 1940 or later; or
(C) Is  a member of a Native American tribe that is historically based in Oregon, as determined
by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by rule.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 807.066 is amended to read:
807.066. (1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section,  the Department of Transportation may not
issue driving privileges to a person who is under 18 years of age unless:
(a) The  person has graduated from high school and provides the department with proof of
graduation satisfactory to the department;
(b) The person has received a  certificate for passing an approved high school equivalency test,
such as the General Educational Development (GED) test, from a  community college and provides
the department with proof of the certificate satisfactory to the department; or
(c) The person’s parent or legal guardian certifies that the person is:
(A) Enrolled in a school of this state, or any other state or any other country;
(B) Enrolled in a community  college and making satisfactory progress toward a certificate for
passing an approved high school equivalency  test, such as the General Educational Development
(GED) test, a high school diploma or a modified diploma;
(C) Being taught by a private teacher, legal guardian or parent , as described in ORS  339.030
(1)(d) or (e)  [ in compliance with ORS 339.035 ];
[11]
HB 2187
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
(D) Exempted from school attendance requirements due  to circumstances beyond the control of
the person; or
(E) Exempt under ORS 339.030 (2) from the requirement to attend school.
(2) The department may not issue driving privileges  to a person who is under 18 years of age
and whose driving privileges are suspended for withdrawing from school unless the person:
(a) Has graduated from high school and provides  the department with proof of graduation sat-
isfactory to the department;
(b) Has received a certificate for passing an approved high school equivalency test,  such as the
General Educational Development (GED) test, from  a community college and provides the depart-
ment with proof of the certificate satisfactory to the department;
(c) Provides the department with a form provided  by the department and signed by the principal,
or the designee  of the principal, of the school attended by the person that declares that the person
is enrolled in a school of this state, or any other state or any other country;
(d) Provides the department with a form  provided by the department and signed by the author-
ized representative of the community  college attended by the person that declares that the person
is making satisfactory progress toward a certificate  for passing an approved high school equivalency
test such as the General Educational Development (GED) test;
(e) Provides the department with a form provided by the department  and signed by the author-
ized representative of the community college attended by the person that  declares that the person
is making satisfactory progress toward a high school diploma or a modified diploma;
(f) Provides the department with a form provided by the department and signed by  [ the author-
ized representative of the education service district or school district  having jurisdiction over the area
of the person’s residence  that declares that the person is being taught by a private teacher, legal
guardian or parent in compliance with ORS 339.035 ] a parent or  legal guardian of the person that
declares that the person is taught by  a private teacher or by a parent or legal guardian of
the person;
(g) Provides the department with documentation satisfactory to the  department that indicates
that the person is exempted  from school attendance requirements due to circumstances beyond the
control of the person; or
(h) Provides the department with  documentation satisfactory to the department that the person
is exempt under ORS 339.030 (2) from the requirement to attend school.
SECTION 11.
The amendments to ORS 807.066 by section 10 of this 2025 Act apply  to
driving privileges issued on or after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 12. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[12]