Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The administrator of the Oregon  Prescription Drug Program shall, using
powers and duties prescribed in ORS 414.312, undertake bulk purchases of opioid  reversal
medications for  the purpose of expanding access to opioid reversal medications throughout
this state by entities that serve vulnerable populations, including but not limited to:
(a) Hospitals and emergency departments;
(b) First responders;
(c) Law enforcement agencies;
(d) Courts and other departments within the criminal justice system;
(e) Organizations that provide services to homeless individuals;
(f) Veterans’ organizations;
(g) Religious organizations;
(h) Schools and universities;
(i) Substance abuse treatment and recovery facilities, including  inpatient, outpatient,
residential facilities and sobering centers;
(j) Public libraries; and
(k) County public health or behavioral health agencies.
(2) To make the bulk purchases of opioid reversal  medications under this section, the
administrator may use funds from the Opioid  Reversal Medication Bulk Purchasing Fund
established in section 2  of this 2023 Act or from gifts, grants, bequests, endowments or do-
nations made for the purchase of opioid reversal medications from the Prescription Drug
Purchasing Fund established in ORS 414.318.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Opioid Reversal Medication Bulk  Purchasing Fund is established in
the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the
Opioid Reversal Medication Bulk Purchasing Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The  Opioid Reversal Medication Bulk Purchasing Fund consists of moneys received
by the Oregon Health Authority from opioid litigation settlements, grants from the Sub-
stance Abuse and Mental Health Services  Administration within the United States Depart-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2193
HB 3299
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
ment of Health and Human Services for  the purpose of addressing the opioid overdose
epidemic and appropriations from the Legislative Assembly.
(3) The moneys in the Opioid  Reversal Medication Bulk Purchasing Fund are contin-
uously appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority  for the purpose of carrying out section
1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 414.320 is amended to read:
414.320. The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules to implement and administer  ORS
414.312 to 414.318  and section 1 of this 2023 Act . The rules shall include but are not limited to
establishing procedures for:
(1) Issuing prescription drug identification cards to individuals and entities  that participate in
the Oregon Prescription Drug Program; and
(2) Enrolling pharmacies in the Oregon Prescription Drug  Program.
[2]