Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 196.571 is amended to read:
196.571. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that :
(a) Ocean acidification and hypoxia severely endanger the state’s commercially  and culturally
significant ocean resources ; and
(b) Strategic investments are necessary to address  the risks and vulnerabilities caused
by ocean acidification and hypoxia that threaten the state’s economy and ecosystems .
(2) The Legislative Assembly therefore declares it to be the policy  of the state to ensure a co-
ordinated, effective response  to ocean acidification and hypoxia. To facilitate efforts that are coor-
dinated and effective, it is the state’s policy to support ocean acidification and hypoxia actions and
initiatives that are developed through close collaborations between federal,  state and local agencies,
academic institutions and commercial industries, among others.
SECTION 2.
The State Department of Fish and Wildlife, in consultation with  the Oregon
Coordinating Council on Ocean  Acidification and Hypoxia, shall by rule establish and imple-
ment an ocean acidification and hypoxia strategic investment  program. The department
shall expend moneys under  the program, in the form of grants or allocations, on strategic
investments identified by the coordinating council in the following:
(1) Monitoring of key  oceanographic and biological indicators of impacts from ocean
acidification and hypoxia;
(2) Projects  or programs that promote coastal economic and ecosystem resilience to
ocean acidification and hypoxia; and
(3) Public information tools and strategies  to increase awareness of ocean acidification
and hypoxia science, impacts and solutions for Oregon.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019,
out of the General Fund, the  amount of $1,900,000, which may be expended by the department
in the form of grants  or allocations under the program established under section 2 of this
2019 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
[2]