Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Court Administrator shall study methods for assigning a  single
judge to domestic  relations cases to serve throughout the duration of the case. The State
Court Administrator  shall report on the results of the study to an appropriate committee
or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly no later than September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2901