Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 818.100 is amended to read:
818.100. This section establishes  exemptions from the maximum size limitations under ORS
818.080 and 818.090. The exemptions under this section  are in addition to any exemptions under ORS
801.026. Operation in accordance with one of the exemptions described is not subject to ORS 818.090.
Exemptions are partial or complete as described in the following:
(1) The maximum size limits do not apply on any way, thoroughfare or place owned by  a district
formed under ORS [ chapters] chapter 545, 547[ ,] or 551 or  a corporation formed under ORS chapter
554.
(2) The  maximum size limits do not apply on any road or thoroughfare or property in private
ownership or any road or thoroughfare, other than a state highway or county road, used  pursuant
to any agreement with any agency of the United States or with a licensee of such agency or both.
(3) The maximum size limits do not apply to any vehicle, combination of vehicles, article,  ma-
chine or other equipment while being used by the federal government, the  State of Oregon or any
county or incorporated city in  the construction, maintenance or repair of public highways and at
the immediate location or site of such construction, maintenance or repair.
(4) The maximum size limits do not apply to  vehicles while being used on the roads of a road
authority by mass transit districts for the purposes authorized under ORS 267.010 to 267.394, pro-
vided the size of the vehicles is approved by the road authority for the roads.
(5) Size limits are not applicable in any place and to the extent size limits are modified by a road
authority under ORS  810.060. The exemption under this subsection is subject to the limitations im-
posed by the road authority exercising the powers granted under ORS 810.060.
(6) Operations authorized to exceed  size limits by a variance permit issued under ORS 818.200
are subject to the terms of the permit. It shall be a defense to any charge of violation of ORS 818.090
if the person so charged produces a variance permit issued under ORS  818.200 authorizing the op-
eration of the vehicle or combination of vehicles issued prior to and valid at the time of the  offense.
(7) Pneumatic tires made of elastic material,  flexible mud flaps, flexible fenders, safety accesso-
ries such as clearance lights, rub rails and binder chains, and appurtenances  such as door handles,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3651
HB 2643
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
door  hinges  and turning signal brackets may exceed the maximum allowable width described in Ta-
ble I of ORS 818.080 by a distance not greater than two inches on each side of the vehicle.
(8) Rearview mirrors may exceed the maximum  allowable width described in Table I of ORS
818.080.
(9) Notwithstanding  the maximum allowable length of vehicles and loads on vehicles under Table
I of ORS 818.080, public  utilities, telecommunications utilities, people’s utilities districts, munici-
palities and electric cooperatives, or common  or contract carriers when acting as an agent for or
on direct orders  of a public utility, telecommunications utility, people’s utility district, municipality
or electric cooperative, for the purpose of transporting and hauling  poles, piling or structures used
or to be used in connection with their operations, may use and operate  upon any highway of this
state any combination of vehicles having an overall length, including  load, that does not exceed 80
feet, except that the  overall length may exceed 80 feet if an emergency exists. For purposes of this
subsection, an unplanned disruption in the services  provided by a public utility, telecommunications
utility, people’s utility  district, municipality or electric cooperative occurring outside the normal
business hours of the road authority or authorized private contractor from which the public utility,
telecommunications utility, people’s  utility district, municipality or electric cooperative would ac-
quire a variance permit is an emergency.
(10) The load on  a semitrailer may exceed the maximum length established under ORS 818.080
providing the load does not:
(a) Extend beyond the rear of the semitrailer by more than five feet;
(b) Extend forward of the rear of the cab of the towing vehicle; or
(c) Exceed an overall length permitted by a  rule, resolution or ordinance adopted under ORS
810.060.
(11) The load upon a truck tractor and pole  trailer may exceed the maximum length established
under ORS 818.080 if the overall length does not exceed that authorized by a rule, resolution or
ordinance adopted under ORS 810.060.
(12) None of the size limits described under  ORS 818.080 except the maximum limit of allowable
extension beyond the last axle of a combination of vehicles  under Table II apply to implements of
husbandry hauled,  towed or moved upon any highway not a part of the Federal Interstate Highway
System if the movement is incidental  to a farming operation and the owner of the implement of
husbandry is  engaged in farming or if the owner is hired by or under contract to a farmer to perform
agricultural activities.
(13) The rear overhang  of a combination of vehicles described in this subsection may extend
more than one-third but not more than one-half  the length of the wheelbase of the combination of
vehicles. This subsection is applicable to any combination  of vehicles consisting of a motor vehicle
towing any of the following:
(a) A travel trailer.
(b) Any trailer designed to carry a single nonmotorized aircraft.
(14) The rear overhang of  a combination consisting of a motor vehicle towing a manufactured
structure may exceed one-third, but may not exceed  one-half, the length of the wheelbase of the
combined vehicle and structure.
(15) A recreational vehicle may exceed the maximum width established under ORS  818.080 if the
excess width is attributable to an appurtenance that does not extend beyond the body of the vehicle
by more than four inches, or  if a passenger-side awning, by more than six inches. As used in this
subsection, “appurtenance” means an  appendage that is installed by a factory or a vehicle dealer
[2]
HB 2643
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and is intended as an integral part of the recreational vehicle. “Appurtenance” does not  include an
item temporarily affixed or attached to the exterior of a vehicle for the  purpose of transporting the
item from one location to another. “Appurtenance” does not include  an item that obstructs the
driver’s rearward vision.
(16)(a) A recreational vehicle may  exceed the maximum length established under ORS 818.080
if the vehicle is not more than 45 feet long.
(b) A combination that includes a recreational vehicle that is not more than 45 feet long, when
operating  on  Group 1 or Group 2 highways as designated by the Department of Transportation, may
exceed the maximum  length for vehicles in a combination established under ORS 818.080 if the
combination is not more than 65 feet long.
(17) A motor vehicle transporter may exceed the  maximum lengths established in ORS 818.080
for a single vehicle, a vehicle in a combination of  vehicles and a load if the length of the single
vehicle, vehicle in a combination or load does not exceed 45 feet.
(18) A motor vehicle transporter towing another vehicle, when operating on a Group  1 or Group
2 highway as designated by the department, may exceed the maximum length established  in ORS
818.080 for a combination of vehicles if the overall length does not exceed 65 feet.
(19) A school bus or school  activity vehicle may exceed the maximum length established under
ORS 818.080 if the vehicle is not more than 45 feet long.
(20) The following combination of three  vehicles may exceed the maximum length estab-
lished in ORS 818.080 for a combination of vehicles:
(a) A motor vehicle;
(b) A trailer attached to the motor vehicle; and
(c) A farm trailer attached to the trailer so long as the farm trailer:
(A) Is attached to the trailer using a hitch that does not swivel; and
(B) Does not exceed eight feet in length.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 818.120 is amended to read:
818.120. This section establishes exemptions from ORS 818.110. The  exemptions under this sec-
tion are in addition to any exemptions under ORS 801.026. Operation in  accordance with one of the
exemptions described is not subject to ORS 818.110. Exemptions  are partial or complete as described
in the following:
(1) The limit  on the number of vehicles that may be operated in combination does not apply on
any way, thoroughfare or place owned by a  district formed under ORS [ chapters] chapter 545,
547[,] or 551 or a corporation formed under ORS chapter 554.
(2) The limit  on the number of vehicles that may be operated in combination does not apply on
any road or thoroughfare or property in private ownership or any road or thoroughfare,  other than
a state highway or county road, used pursuant to any agreement with any agency of the United
States or with a licensee of such agency or both.
(3) The limit on the number of vehicles that  may be operated in combination does not apply to
any vehicles, combination of vehicles, articles, machines or other equipment while being  used by the
federal government, the State of Oregon or  any county or incorporated city in the construction,
maintenance or repair of public highways  and at the immediate location or site of such construction,
maintenance or repair.
(4) The limit on the number of vehicles that  may be operated in combination does not apply to
any vehicles while being used on the roads of a road authority  by mass transit districts for purposes
authorized under ORS 267.010 to 267.394, provided the use of the vehicles is approved by the  road
[3]
HB 2643
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
authority for its roads.
(5) Operations authorized to exceed the limit on the number of vehicles that  may be operated
in combination by a variance permit issued under  ORS 818.200 are subject to the terms of the per-
mit. It shall be a defense to any charge of violation of ORS 818.110 if the person so charged produces
a variance permit issued under ORS 818.200 authorizing  the operation of the combination of vehicles
issued prior to and valid at the time of the offense.
(6) In drive-away  operations, three vehicles may be coupled together by a double saddle-mount
method or by a single saddle-mount  and tow bar method or four vehicles by a triple saddle-mount
method.
(7) A combination of three implements of husbandry  or two implements of husbandry hauled or
towed by another vehicle may be operated on a highway without  violation of the limits under ORS
818.110.
(8) A truck tractor and semitrailer  drawing one trailer or a truck tractor and semitrailer
drawing one additional semitrailer mounted on a dolly equipped with a fifth  wheel hitch may be
operated on a highway without violation of the limits under ORS 818.110.
(9) A truck tractor and semitrailer drawing a balance trailer with a length  not in excess of 15
feet and a loaded weight not in excess of 8,000 pounds or drawing  a dolly may be operated on a
highway without violation of the limits under ORS 818.110.
(10) A combination of vehicles described in ORS 818.100 (20) may be operated on a high-
way without violation of the limits described under ORS 818.110.
[4]