Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of  $ , which may be expended for funding a staff position
at the department, or contracting with a qualified entity, to:
(1) Advise  local communities concerning voluntary agreements among ground water us-
ers from the same ground water reservoir, as described in ORS 537.745;
(2) Assist the communities with development of the voluntary agreements; and
(3) Assess the opportunities and limitations of the voluntary agreements.
SECTION 2.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2179