Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Foods of minimal nutritional value” includes soda water, water ices,  chewing gum,
hard candy, jellies and gums, marshmallow candies, fondant, licorice, spun candy  and
candy-coated popcorn.
(b) “Jellies and gums” means a mixture of  carbohydrates that are combined to form a
stable gelatinous system of jelly-like character and are generally flavored and colored, such
as gum drops, jelly beans and jellied and fruit-flavored slices.
(c) “Spun candy” means a product that is made from  sugar that has been boiled at a high
temperature and spun at a high speed in a special machine.
(d) “Water ices” has the meaning given that term in 21 C.F.R. 135.160.
(2) Subject to the  approval of the United States Department of Agriculture under 7 U.S.C.
2026 or other appropriate legal authority, the Department of Human Services shall  operate
a four-year pilot program in which recipients  of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
benefits are prohibited from using the benefits to purchase:
(a) Foods of minimal nutritional value; or
(b) Foods, as determined by  the Department of Human Services in collaboration with the
United States Department of Agriculture, for which  the per-serving sodium, sugar or fat
content exceeds the nutrition guidelines established by the United States Department  of
Agriculture.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Department of Human Services shall submit  to the United States
Department of Agriculture a request for approval  of the pilot program described in section
1 of this 2025 Act no later than 90 days after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(2) The Department of Human Services shall report to the Legislative  Assembly, during
the 2026 regular legislative session, on the status of the request for approval and, if approval
has been granted, the status of the pilot program.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4040
SB 1018
1
2
3
4
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]