Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 496.
SECTION 2. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds that barred  owls are known to prey on
spotted owls.
(2) The State Fish and Wildlife Commission shall:
(a) Issue an order authorizing the taking of barred owls; and
(b) Establish a program that awards $5 for each taking of a barred owl.
SECTION 3.
There is appropriated to the  State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the
biennium beginning July 1,  2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $100,000 for the
purpose specified in section 2 (2)(b) of this 2023 Act. This appropriation is  available contin-
uously until expended for the purpose specified in section 2 (2)(b) of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1986