Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 468A.280 is amended to read:
468A.280. (1) In addition  to any registration and reporting that may be required under ORS
468A.050, the Environmental Quality Commission  by rule may require registration and reporting by:
(a) Any person who imports,  sells, allocates or distributes for use in this state electricity, the
generation of which emits greenhouse gases.
(b) Any person who imports, sells or distributes for use  in this state fossil fuel that generates
greenhouse gases when combusted.
(2) Rules adopted by the commission under this section for electricity that is imported, sold, al-
located or distributed for use in this state may require reporting of information necessary  to deter-
mine greenhouse  gas emissions from generating facilities used to produce the electricity and related
electricity transmission line losses.
(3)(a) The commission shall allow consumer-owned utilities, as defined  in ORS 757.270, to comply
with reporting requirements imposed under this section  by the submission of a report prepared by
a third party. A report  submitted under this paragraph may include information for more than one
consumer-owned utility, but must include all information required by the commission for  each indi-
vidual utility.
(b) For the purpose of determining greenhouse gas emissions  related to electricity purchased
from the Bonneville Power Administration by a consumer-owned utility, as defined in  ORS 757.270,
the commission may require only that the utility report:
(A) The number of megawatt-hours of electricity purchased by the  utility from the Bonneville
Power Administration, segregated by the types  of contracts entered into by the utility with the
Bonneville Power Administration; and
(B) The percentage of each fuel  or energy type used to produce electricity purchased under each
type of contract.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3813
HB 3539
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4)(a) Rules adopted by the commission pursuant to this section for electricity that  is purchased,
imported, sold,  allocated or distributed for use in this state by an electric company, as defined in
ORS 757.600, must be limited to the reporting of:
(A) Greenhouse  gas emissions emitted from generating facilities owned or operated by the elec-
tric company;
(B) Greenhouse gas emissions emitted from transmission  equipment owned or operated by the
electric company;
(C) The number of megawatt-hours of electricity  purchased by the electric company for use in
this state, including information, if known, on:
(i) The seller of the electricity to the electric company; and
(ii) The original generating facility fuel type or types; and
(D) An estimate of the amount of greenhouse gas emissions, using default  greenhouse gas emis-
sions factors established by the commission by rule, attributable to:
(i) Electricity purchases made by a particular seller to the electric company;
(ii) Electricity purchases from an unknown origin or from a seller who is unable  to identify the
original generating facility fuel type or types;
(iii) Electricity purchases for which  a renewable energy certificate under ORS 469A.130 has
been issued but subsequently transferred or sold to a person other than the electric company;
(iv) Electricity transmitted for others by the electric company; and
(v) Total energy losses from electricity transmission and distribution  equipment owned or oper-
ated by the electric company.
(b) Pursuant to paragraph  (a) of this subsection, a multijurisdictional electric company may rely
upon a cost allocation methodology approved  by the Public Utility Commission for reporting emis-
sions allocated in this state.
(c)(A) For the purpose of  determining the greenhouse gas emissions factor applicable to
electricity purchases  described in paragraph (a)(D)(ii) of this subsection, the commission, or
the Department of Environmental Quality at the direction of the  commission, shall contract
with an independent third party to study and determine an emissions factor  for electricity
purchased from unspecified sources that is based on sources of electricity reasonably  avail-
able to electric companies in this state.
(B) The commission  shall cause a study required under this paragraph to be completed
no less than once every five years.
(5) Rules adopted by  the commission under this section for fossil fuel that is imported, sold or
distributed for use in this state may require reporting of  the type and quantity of the fuel and any
additional information necessary  to determine the carbon content of the fuel. For the purpose of
determining greenhouse gas emissions related to liquefied petroleum gas, the commission  shall allow
reporting using publications or submission of  data by the American Petroleum Institute but may
require reporting of such other information necessary to achieve  the purposes of the rules adopted
by the commission under this section.
(6) To an extent that is consistent with  the purposes of the rules adopted by the commission
under this section, the commission shall minimize the burden of the reporting required under this
section by:
(a) Allowing concurrent reporting of information that is also reported to another state agency;
(b) Allowing electronic reporting;
(c) Allowing use of good engineering practice calculations in  reports, or of emission factors
[2]
HB 3539
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
published by the United States Environmental Protection Agency;
(d) Establishing thresholds for the amount of specific greenhouse gases that  may be emitted or
generated without reporting;
(e) Requiring  reporting by the fewest number of persons in a fuel distribution system that will
allow the commission to acquire the information needed by the commission; or
(f) Other appropriate means and procedures determined by the commission.
(7) As used in this  section, “greenhouse gas” has the meaning given that term in ORS 468A.210.
SECTION 2.
The Environmental Quality Commission  shall update the emissions factor
applicable to electricity purchases described in  ORS 468A.280 (4)(a)(D)(ii), based on a study
conducted under ORS 468A.280 (4)(c), no later than January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]