Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall study and prepare  a strategic plan for
the State of  Oregon to address medication-induced movement disorders. The plan, at a min-
imum, must:
(a) Analyze existing resources and identify opportunities to expand existing resources  for
medication-induced movement disorders for patients, providers and caregivers in this state.
(b) Develop, publish and distribute guidance and best practices for health care and mental
health professionals on screening, diagnosing and treating medication-induced movement
disorders in accordance with the document prepared  by the Oregon Health Authority titled
“Recognition and Management of  Antipsychotic-induced Movement Disorders,” dated April
2024.
(c) Develop recommendations to ensure minority  populations have equitable access to
existing and expanded resources for medication-induced movement disorders for patients,
providers and caregivers in this state.
(d) Analyze how restrictions on the authority to prescribe medications have affected the
ability of behavioral health  patients to be screened, diagnosed and treated for medication-
induced movement disorders.
(e) Develop educational materials for law  enforcement and public safety professionals to
assist in recognizing and responding to medication-induced movement disorders.
(f) Explain how the authority will implement the opportunities identified in paragraph (a)
of this subsection and recommendations developed under paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(2) The authority shall submit a report on the strategic plan described in subsection (1)
of this section, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245,  and may include recommendations
for legislation, to  the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to public health
and health care no later than December 31, 2025.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 717
SB 448
1
2
3
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]