Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Higher Education Coordinating  Commission shall adopt a statewide
higher education equity plan.
(2) The  statewide higher education equity plan must include recommended strategies for
decreasing the gap in  educational attainment experienced by diverse and underserved groups
in this state compared to the overall population.
(3) In developing the plan, the commission shall:
(a) Collaborate with public universities listed in  ORS 352.002, community college districts
and private and independent institutions of higher education, as defined in ORS 350.635; and
(b) Consult with  individuals from diverse and underserved groups and with individuals
representing such groups.
(4) The commission shall take into  account the statewide higher education equity plan in
carrying out its duties described in ORS 350.075 (6).
SECTION 2.
 ORS 350.065 is amended to read:
350.065. (1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall appoint an executive director
to serve at the pleasure of the commission.
(2) The appointment  of the executive director must be by written order, filed with the Secretary
of State.
(3) Subject to any applicable provisions of ORS chapter 240, the executive director shall  appoint
all subordinate officers and employees of the commission,  prescribe their duties and fix their com-
pensation.
(4) The executive director shall appoint an individual to serve full-time as  a Diversity,
Equity and Inclusion Officer. The role  of the Diversity, Equity and Inclusion Officer is to
oversee and promote the statewide  higher education equity plan developed under section 1
of this 2019 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3086
HB 2942
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(4)] (5)  The executive director shall coordinate with the  Chief Education Officer as provided
by section 2, chapter 519, Oregon Laws 2011.
SECTION 3.  ORS 350.065, as amended by section 60,  chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015, is
amended to read:
350.065. (1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall appoint an executive director
to serve at the pleasure of the commission.
(2) The appointment  of the executive director must be by written order, filed with the Secretary
of State.
(3) Subject to any applicable provisions of ORS chapter 240, the executive director shall  appoint
all subordinate officers and employees of the commission,  prescribe their duties and fix their com-
pensation.
(4) The executive  director shall appoint an individual to serve full-time as a Diversity,
Equity and Inclusion Officer. The role of the Diversity, Equity  and Inclusion Officer is to
oversee and promote the statewide higher education equity plan  developed under section 1
of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 4.  ORS 350.075 is amended to read:
350.075. (1) As used in this section, “student access programs” means  scholarship, loan, grant
and access programs described in ORS chapter 348.
(2) The  Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall be guided by the legislative findings
in ORS 341.009, 350.001 and 350.005 and the goals  and mission of post-secondary education set forth
in ORS 350.009 and 350.014.
(3) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall:
(a) Develop state goals for the state post-secondary education system, including  community col-
leges and public universities listed in ORS 352.002, and for student access programs.
(b) Determine strategic investments in the state’s community colleges, public  universities and
student access programs necessary to achieve state post-secondary education goals.
(c) Coordinate the post-secondary elements of data collection and structure, with the advice and
recommendation of the state’s  independent institutions, community colleges and public universities,
as appropriate, in order to construct a state longitudinal data system.
(d) Adopt a strategic plan for achieving state post-secondary education goals,  taking into con-
sideration the contributions of this state’s independent institutions,  philanthropic organizations and
other organizations dedicated to helping Oregonians reach state goals. State post-secondary educa-
tion goals as described in this section should include, but need not be limited to:
(A) Increasing the educational attainment of the population;
(B) Decreasing the gap in educational  attainment experienced by diverse and underserved
groups in this state compared to the overall population;
[(B)] (C)  Increasing this state’s global economic competitiveness and the quality of life of its
residents;
[(C)] (D)  Ensuring affordable access for qualified Oregon students at  each college or public
university;
[(D)] (E)  Removing barriers to on-time completion; and
[(E)] (F)  Tracking progress toward meeting the state’s post-secondary  education goals estab-
lished in the strategic plan described in this paragraph.
(e)(A) Each biennium, after receiving funding requests from the  state’s community colleges and
public universities as authorized by law, recommend to the  Governor a consolidated higher educa-
[2]
HB 2942
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tion agency request budget aligned with the strategic [ plan] plans described in paragraph (d) of this
subsection  and section 1 of this 2019 Act , including appropriations for:
(i) Student access programs;
(ii) Public universities listed in ORS 352.002, including but not limited to  education and general
operations, statewide public services and state-funded debt service;
(iii) Community colleges, including but  not limited to education and general operations and
state-funded debt service;
(iv) New facilities or programs;
(v) Capital improvements and deferred maintenance;
(vi) Special initiatives and investments; and
(vii) Any  other program, duty or function a public university listed in ORS 352.002 is authorized
to undertake.
(B) In the development of the consolidated higher education agency request budget:
(i) Determine the costs necessary to provide quality post-secondary education;
(ii) Solicit input from educators, education policy experts,  appropriate legislative committees,
students and other persons interested in the development of the funding model; and
(iii) Solicit public input regarding educational priorities.
(f) Adopt rules governing the distribution of appropriations from  the Legislative Assembly to
community colleges, public universities listed  in ORS 352.002 and student access programs. These
rules must be based on allocation formulas developed in consultation with the  state’s community
colleges and public universities, as appropriate.
(g) Approve or disapprove  any significant change to the academic program of a community col-
lege or a public university listed in ORS 352.002. In reaching a decision under this  paragraph, the
commission shall consider the recommendation  from the community college or public university
seeking to make  the change to an academic program that is issued pursuant to the obligation of the
governing board of a community college or public university  to review and approve academic pro-
grams. The commission shall ensure that approved programs:
(A) Are consistent with the mission statement of the community college or public university;
(B) Do not unnecessarily duplicate academic programs  offered by Oregon’s other community
colleges or public universities;
(C) Are not located in a geographic  area that will cause undue hardship to Oregon’s other
community colleges or public universities; and
(D) Are allocated among Oregon’s community colleges and public  universities to maximize the
achievement of statewide needs and requirements.
(h) For public universities listed in ORS 352.002:
(A) Approve the mission statement adopted by a governing board of a public university.
(B) Review and determine whether a proposed annual  increase of resident undergraduate en-
rollment fees of greater than five percent is appropriate.
(C) Advise the Governor and the Legislative Assembly on issues of university governance.
(D) Approve and authorize degrees.
(E) Perform the evaluation and certification required by ORS 350.095.
(i) Authorize degrees to be offered by independent post-secondary  institutions in this state under
ORS 348.594 to 348.615.
(j) Oversee the licensing of career schools under ORS 345.010 to 345.450.
(k) Have the authority  to enter into and administer interstate agreements regarding the pro-
[3]
HB 2942
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vision of post-secondary distance education. The participation by an educational  institution that is
not based in this state in distance learning courses or programs that are part of an  interstate
agreement entered into and administered under this paragraph does  not constitute operating in this
state for purposes of ORS 348.594 to 348.615. The commission, by rule, may impose a fee on any
educational institution that seeks to operate under or participate  in such interstate agreements. The
fee amount shall be established to recover designated expenses incurred by the commission  in par-
ticipating in such agreements.
(L) Coordinate and collaborate with  the Chief Education Office as provided by section 1, chapter
519, Oregon Laws 2011.
(4)(a) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission  shall implement a process to review and
appropriately act on student complaints regarding any school operating  in this state. As part of the
process implemented under this subsection, the commission may:
(A) Receive student complaints from students regarding a school;
(B) Specify the type of information that must be included in a student complaint;
(C) Investigate and resolve student complaints that relate to state financial aid;
(D) Refer a student complaint to another entity for investigation and resolution as provided  in
paragraph (b) of this subsection;
(E) Adopt rules to implement the provisions of this subsection; and
(F) Enter into agreements to implement the provisions of this subsection.
(b) The commission may refer the investigation and resolution of a student complaint to:
(A) An appropriate state agency if the complaint alleges that a  school has violated a state law
concerning consumer protection, civil rights, employment rights or environmental quality;
(B) A  school’s accrediting association if the complaint relates to the school’s authorization to
offer academic degree programs or to the quality of the school’s academic degree programs; or
(C) The school at which  the student is enrolled if the commission determines that the complaint
should be resolved through the school’s internal review process.
(c) As used in this subsection:
(A)(i) “School” means an independent institution of higher education that meets the  require-
ments of ORS 348.597 (2)(a).
(ii) “School” does not mean a school that is exempt from ORS 348.594 to 348.615 under ORS
348.597 (2)(b) or (c).
(B) “Student” means a person who  is enrolled at a school for the purpose of obtaining a degree,
certificate or other recognized educational credential offered by that school.
(5) A student complaint that is received by the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, in-
cluding but not limited to a student complaint filed under subsection  (4) of this section, is not sub-
ject to disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(6) In addition to the duties described in subsections (2) to (4) of this section, the Higher  Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission shall advise the Legislative Assembly, the Governor,  community
colleges, public universities and other state boards and commissions on policies in order to:
(a) Ensure or improve access to higher education by diverse and underserved populations.
(b) Encourage student success and completion initiatives.
(c) Improve the coordination of the provision of educational services, including:
(A) Transfers and coenrollment throughout the higher education system;
(B) Accelerated college credit programs for high school students;
(C) Applied baccalaureate and other transfer degrees;
[4]
HB 2942
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(D) Programs and grants that span multiple institutions; and
(E) Reciprocity agreements with other states.
(d) In coordination with the State Board of Education, enhance  the use and quality of dual
credit, career and technical pathways and efforts to  create a culture of college attendance in this
state.
(e) In coordination with  the State Workforce and Talent Development Board, local workforce
development boards, the  Oregon Health and Science University and independent institutions, ensure
that the state’s colleges and universities offer  programs in high-demand occupations that meet
Oregon’s workforce needs.
(f) Improve economies of scale  by encouraging and facilitating the use of the shared services
among post-secondary institutions in this state.
(7) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission, in a  manner consistent with ORS chapter
183, may adopt administrative rules.
(8) With the exception of the rulemaking authority granted in subsection (7) of this  section, the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission may delegate any of its  powers, duties or functions to
a committee of the commission or to the executive director of the commission.
(9) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may, subject to the Public Contracting Code,
enter into contracts and agreements, including grant  agreements, with public and private entities
for those higher education and workforce development  activities that are consistent with ORS
350.001 and 350.005, with the policies set forth in ORS chapters  341 and 348 and with statutory
policies related to career schools and public universities.
(10) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may exercise  only powers, duties and
functions expressly granted by the Legislative Assembly.  Except as otherwise expressly provided by
law, all other authorities reside at the institutional level with the  respective boards of the post-
secondary institutions.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 350.075, as amended by section 61, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015,  section
6, chapter 30, Oregon Laws 2016, section 56, chapter 117, Oregon Laws 2016,  section 8, chapter 66,
Oregon Laws 2017, section 2, chapter 98, Oregon Laws 2017, section  6, chapter 185, Oregon Laws
2017, section 22, chapter 297, Oregon Laws 2017, and section 2b, chapter 440, Oregon  Laws 2017, is
amended to read:
350.075. (1) As used in this section, “student access programs” means  scholarship, loan, grant
and access programs described in ORS chapter 348.
(2) The  Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall be guided by the legislative findings
in ORS 341.009, 350.001 and 350.005 and the goals  and mission of post-secondary education set forth
in ORS 350.009 and 350.014.
(3) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall:
(a) Develop state goals for the state post-secondary education system, including  community col-
leges and public universities listed in ORS 352.002, and for student access programs.
(b) Determine strategic investments in the state’s community colleges, public  universities and
student access programs necessary to achieve state post-secondary education goals.
(c) Coordinate the post-secondary elements of data collection and structure, with the advice and
recommendation of the state’s  independent institutions, community colleges and public universities,
as appropriate, in order to construct a state longitudinal data system.
(d) Adopt a strategic plan for achieving state post-secondary education goals,  taking into con-
sideration the contributions of this state’s independent institutions,  philanthropic organizations and
[5]
HB 2942
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
other organizations dedicated to helping Oregonians reach state goals. State post-secondary educa-
tion goals as described in this section should include, but need not be limited to:
(A) Increasing the educational attainment of the population;
(B) Decreasing the gap in educational  attainment experienced by diverse and underserved
groups in this state compared to the overall population;
[(B)] (C)  Increasing this state’s global economic competitiveness and the quality of life of its
residents;
[(C)] (D)  Ensuring affordable access for qualified Oregon students at  each college or public
university;
[(D)] (E)  Removing barriers to on-time completion; and
[(E)] (F)  Tracking progress toward meeting the state’s post-secondary  education goals estab-
lished in the strategic plan described in this paragraph.
(e)(A) Each biennium, after receiving funding requests from the  state’s community colleges and
public universities as authorized by law, recommend to the  Governor a consolidated higher educa-
tion agency request budget aligned with the strategic [ plan] plans described in paragraph (d) of this
subsection  and section 1 of this 2019 Act , including appropriations for:
(i) Student access programs;
(ii) Public universities listed in ORS 352.002, including but not limited to  education and general
operations, statewide public services and state-funded debt service;
(iii) Community colleges, including but  not limited to education and general operations and
state-funded debt service;
(iv) New facilities or programs;
(v) Capital improvements and deferred maintenance;
(vi) Special initiatives and investments; and
(vii) Any  other program, duty or function a public university listed in ORS 352.002 is authorized
to undertake.
(B) In the development of the consolidated higher education agency request budget:
(i) Determine the costs necessary to provide quality post-secondary education;
(ii) Solicit input from  educators, education policy experts, appropriate legislative committees,
students and other persons interested in the development of the funding model; and
(iii) Solicit public input regarding educational priorities.
(f) Adopt rules governing the  distribution of appropriations from the Legislative Assembly to
community colleges, public universities listed in ORS 352.002 and student  access programs. These
rules must be  based on allocation formulas developed in consultation with the state’s community
colleges and public universities, as appropriate.
(g) Approve or disapprove any significant change to the academic program of  a community col-
lege or a  public university listed in ORS 352.002. In reaching a decision under this paragraph, the
commission shall consider the recommendation from the community  college or public university
seeking to make  the change to an academic program that is issued pursuant to the obligation of the
governing board of a community college or  public university to review and approve academic pro-
grams. The commission shall ensure that approved programs:
(A) Are consistent with the mission statement of the community college or public university;
(B) Do not unnecessarily duplicate academic  programs offered by Oregon’s other community
colleges or public universities;
(C) Are not located in a geographic area that will  cause undue hardship to Oregon’s other
[6]
HB 2942
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
community colleges or public universities; and
(D) Are allocated among Oregon’s  community colleges and public universities to maximize the
achievement of statewide needs and requirements.
(h) For public universities listed in ORS 352.002:
(A) Approve the mission statement adopted by a governing board of a public university.
(B) Review and determine whether a  proposed annual increase of resident undergraduate en-
rollment fees of greater than five percent is appropriate.
(C) Advise the Governor and the Legislative Assembly on issues of university governance.
(D) Approve and authorize degrees.
(E) Perform the evaluation and certification required by ORS 350.095.
(i) Authorize degrees to be offered by independent post-secondary  institutions in this state under
ORS 348.594 to 348.615.
(j) Oversee the licensing of career schools under ORS 345.010 to 345.450.
(k) Have the authority  to enter into and administer interstate agreements regarding the pro-
vision of post-secondary distance education. The participation by an educational  institution that is
not based in this state in distance learning courses or programs that are part of an  interstate
agreement entered into and administered under this paragraph does  not constitute operating in this
state for purposes of ORS 348.594 to 348.615. The commission, by rule, may impose a fee on any
educational institution that seeks to operate under or participate  in such interstate agreements. The
fee amount shall be established to recover designated expenses incurred by the commission  in par-
ticipating in such agreements.
(4)(a) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission  shall implement a process to review and
appropriately act on student complaints regarding any school operating  in this state. As part of the
process implemented under this subsection, the commission may:
(A) Receive student complaints from students regarding a school;
(B) Specify the type of information that must be included in a student complaint;
(C) Investigate and resolve student complaints that relate to state financial aid;
(D) Refer a student complaint to another entity for investigation and resolution as provided  in
paragraph (b) of this subsection;
(E) Adopt rules to implement the provisions of this subsection; and
(F) Enter into agreements to implement the provisions of this subsection.
(b) The commission may refer the investigation and resolution of a student complaint to:
(A) An appropriate state agency if the complaint alleges that a  school has violated a state law
concerning consumer protection, civil rights, employment rights or environmental quality;
(B) A  school’s accrediting association if the complaint relates to the school’s authorization to
offer academic degree programs or to the quality of the school’s academic degree programs; or
(C) The school at which  the student is enrolled if the commission determines that the complaint
should be resolved through the school’s internal review process.
(c) As used in this subsection:
(A)(i) “School” means an independent institution of higher education that meets the  require-
ments of ORS 348.597 (2)(a).
(ii) “School” does not mean a school that is exempt from ORS 348.594 to 348.615 under ORS
348.597 (2)(b) or (c).
(B) “Student” means a person who  is enrolled at a school for the purpose of obtaining a degree,
certificate or other recognized educational credential offered by that school.
[7]
HB 2942
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) A student complaint that is received by the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, in-
cluding but not limited to a student complaint filed under subsection  (4) of this section, is not sub-
ject to disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(6) In addition to the duties described in subsections (2) to (4) of this section, the Higher  Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission shall advise the Legislative Assembly, the Governor,  community
colleges, public universities and other state boards and commissions on policies in order to:
(a) Ensure or improve access to higher education by diverse and underserved populations.
(b) Encourage student success and completion initiatives.
(c) Improve the coordination of the provision of educational services, including:
(A) Transfers and coenrollment throughout the higher education system;
(B) Accelerated college credit programs for high school students;
(C) Applied baccalaureate and other transfer degrees;
(D) Programs and grants that span multiple institutions; and
(E) Reciprocity agreements with other states.
(d) In coordination with the State Board  of Education, enhance the use and quality of dual
credit, career and technical pathways and efforts to create  a culture of college attendance in this
state.
(e) In coordination with the State Workforce and Talent Development  Board, local workforce
development boards, the  Oregon Health and Science University and independent institutions, ensure
that the state’s colleges and universities offer  programs in high-demand occupations that meet
Oregon’s workforce needs.
(f) Improve economies of scale by encouraging and facilitating the use  of the shared services
among post-secondary institutions in this state.
(7) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission,  in a manner consistent with ORS chapter
183, may adopt administrative rules.
(8) With the exception of the rulemaking authority granted in subsection (7) of this  section, the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission may delegate  any of its powers, duties or functions to
a committee of the commission or to the executive director of the commission.
(9) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may, subject to the Public Contracting Code,
enter into contracts and agreements, including grant  agreements, with public and private entities
for those higher education and workforce development  activities that are consistent with ORS
350.001 and 350.005, with the policies set  forth in ORS chapters 341 and 348 and with statutory
policies related to career schools and public universities.
(10) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may exercise  only powers, duties and
functions expressly granted by the Legislative Assembly.  Except as otherwise expressly provided by
law, all other authorities reside at the institutional level with the  respective boards of the post-
secondary institutions.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 350.075, as amended by section 61, chapter 774, Oregon Laws 2015,  section
6, chapter 30, Oregon Laws 2016, section 56, chapter 117, Oregon Laws 2016,  section 8, chapter 66,
Oregon Laws 2017, sections 2 and 3,  chapter 98, Oregon Laws 2017, section 6, chapter 185, Oregon
Laws 2017, section 22, chapter 297, Oregon Laws 2017, and section 2b, chapter 440, Oregon Laws
2017, is amended to read:
350.075. (1) As used  in this section, “student access programs” means scholarship, loan, grant
and access programs described in ORS chapter 348.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall be guided by the legislative  findings
[8]
HB 2942
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in ORS 341.009, 350.001 and 350.005 and the goals  and mission of post-secondary education set forth
in ORS 350.009 and 350.014.
(3) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall:
(a) Develop state  goals for the state post-secondary education system, including community col-
leges and public universities listed in ORS 352.002, and for student access programs.
(b) Determine strategic  investments in the state’s community colleges, public universities and
student access programs necessary to achieve state post-secondary education goals.
(c) Coordinate the post-secondary elements of data collection and structure, with the advice and
recommendation of the state’s independent institutions, community colleges  and public universities,
as appropriate, in order to construct a state longitudinal data system.
(d) Adopt a strategic plan for achieving state post-secondary education goals,  taking into con-
sideration the contributions of this state’s independent institutions,  philanthropic organizations and
other organizations dedicated to helping Oregonians reach state goals. State post-secondary educa-
tion goals as described in this section should include, but need not be limited to:
(A) Increasing the educational attainment of the population;
(B) Decreasing the gap in educational  attainment experienced by diverse and underserved
groups in this state compared to the overall population;
[(B)] (C)  Increasing this state’s global economic competitiveness and the quality of life of its
residents;
[(C)] (D)  Ensuring affordable access for qualified Oregon students at  each college or public
university;
[(D)] (E)  Removing barriers to on-time completion; and
[(E)] (F)  Tracking progress toward meeting the state’s post-secondary  education goals estab-
lished in the strategic plan described in this paragraph.
(e)(A) Each biennium, after receiving funding requests from the  state’s community colleges and
public universities as authorized by law, recommend to the  Governor a consolidated higher educa-
tion agency request budget aligned with the strategic [ plan] plans described in paragraph (d) of this
subsection  and section 1 of this 2019 Act , including appropriations for:
(i) Student access programs;
(ii) Public universities listed in ORS 352.002, including but not limited to  education and general
operations, statewide public services and state-funded debt service;
(iii) Community colleges, including but  not limited to education and general operations and
state-funded debt service;
(iv) New facilities or programs;
(v) Capital improvements and deferred maintenance;
(vi) Special initiatives and investments; and
(vii) Any  other program, duty or function a public university listed in ORS 352.002 is authorized
to undertake.
(B) In the development of the consolidated higher education agency request budget:
(i) Determine the costs necessary to provide quality post-secondary education;
(ii) Solicit input from  educators, education policy experts, appropriate legislative committees,
students and other persons interested in the development of the funding model; and
(iii) Solicit public input regarding educational priorities.
(f) Adopt rules governing the  distribution of appropriations from the Legislative Assembly to
community colleges, public universities listed in ORS 352.002 and student  access programs. These
[9]
HB 2942
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
rules must be  based on allocation formulas developed in consultation with the state’s community
colleges and public universities, as appropriate.
(g) Approve or disapprove any significant change to the academic program of  a community col-
lege or a  public university listed in ORS 352.002. In reaching a decision under this paragraph, the
commission shall consider the recommendation from the community  college or public university
seeking to make  the change to an academic program that is issued pursuant to the obligation of the
governing board of a community college or  public university to review and approve academic pro-
grams. The commission shall ensure that approved programs:
(A) Are consistent with the mission statement of the community college or public university;
(B) Do not unnecessarily duplicate academic  programs offered by Oregon’s other community
colleges or public universities;
(C) Are not located in a geographic area that will  cause undue hardship to Oregon’s other
community colleges or public universities; and
(D) Are allocated among Oregon’s  community colleges and public universities to maximize the
achievement of statewide needs and requirements.
(h) For public universities listed in ORS 352.002:
(A) Approve the mission statement adopted by a governing board of a public university.
(B) Review and determine whether a  proposed annual increase of resident undergraduate en-
rollment fees of greater than five percent is appropriate.
(C) Advise the Governor and the Legislative Assembly on issues of university governance.
(D) Approve and authorize degrees.
(E) Perform the evaluation and certification required by ORS 350.095.
(i) Authorize degrees to be offered by independent post-secondary  institutions in this state under
ORS 348.594 to 348.615.
(j) Oversee the licensing of career schools under ORS 345.010 to 345.450.
(k) Have the authority  to enter into and administer interstate agreements regarding the pro-
vision of post-secondary distance education. The participation by an educational  institution that is
not based in this state in distance learning courses or programs that are part of an  interstate
agreement entered into and administered under this paragraph does  not constitute operating in this
state for purposes of ORS 348.594 to 348.615. The commission, by rule, may impose a fee on any
educational institution that seeks to operate under or participate  in such interstate agreements. The
fee amount shall be established to recover designated expenses incurred by the commission  in par-
ticipating in such agreements.
(4) In addition to the  duties described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the Higher Ed-
ucation  Coordinating  Commission shall advise the Legislative Assembly, the Governor, community
colleges, public universities and other state boards and commissions on policies in order to:
(a) Ensure or improve access to higher education by diverse and underserved populations.
(b) Encourage student success and completion initiatives.
(c) Improve the coordination of the provision of educational services, including:
(A) Transfers and coenrollment throughout the higher education system;
(B) Accelerated college credit programs for high school students;
(C) Applied baccalaureate and other transfer degrees;
(D) Programs and grants that span multiple institutions; and
(E) Reciprocity agreements with other states.
(d) In coordination with the State Board of Education, enhance  the use and quality of dual
[10]
HB 2942
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
credit, career and technical pathways and efforts to  create a culture of college attendance in this
state.
(e) In coordination with  the State Workforce and Talent Development Board, local workforce
development boards, the  Oregon Health and Science University and independent institutions, ensure
that the state’s colleges and universities offer  programs in high-demand occupations that meet
Oregon’s workforce needs.
(f) Improve economies of scale  by encouraging and facilitating the use of the shared services
among post-secondary institutions in this state.
(5) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission, in a  manner consistent with ORS chapter
183, may adopt administrative rules.
(6) With the exception of the rulemaking authority granted in subsection (5) of this  section, the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission may delegate any of its  powers, duties or functions to
a committee of the commission or to the executive director of the commission.
(7) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may, subject to the Public Contracting Code,
enter into contracts and agreements, including grant  agreements, with public and private entities
for those higher education and workforce development  activities that are consistent with ORS
350.001 and 350.005, with the policies set forth in ORS chapters  341 and 348 and with statutory
policies related to career schools and public universities.
(8) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may  exercise only powers, duties and func-
tions expressly granted by the Legislative Assembly. Except as otherwise expressly  provided by law,
all other authorities reside at  the institutional level with the respective boards of the post-secondary
institutions.
[11]