Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Human Services shall  study adult foster homes licensed
by the division of the department that provides services for aging and people with disabilities.
The department shall submit a report in the manner provided by  ORS 192.245, and may in-
clude recommendations for  legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assem-
bly related to health no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1564