Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 811.540 is amended to read:
811.540. (1) A person commits the crime of fleeing or attempting to elude a police officer if:
(a) The person is operating a motor vehicle; and
(b) A  police officer who is in uniform and prominently displaying the police officer’s badge of
office or operating a vehicle appropriately marked showing it to be an official police vehicle gives
a visual or audible signal to bring  the vehicle to a stop, including any signal by hand, voice, emer-
gency light or siren, and either:
(A) The person, while still in the vehicle, knowingly flees or attempts to elude a pursuing police
officer;  or
(B) The person gets out of the vehicle and knowingly  flees or attempts to elude the police offi-
cer.
(2) It is an affirmative  defense to a prosecution of a person under this section that, after a police
officer operating a vehicle not marked as an official police vehicle signaled the person to bring the
person’s vehicle to a stop, the person proceeded lawfully to an area the person reasonably believed
was necessary to reach before stopping.
(3) The offense described in this section, fleeing or attempting to elude a police officer,  is ap-
plicable upon any premises open to the public and:
(a) Is a Class C felony if committed as described in subsection (1)(b)(A) of this section; or
(b) Is a Class A misdemeanor if committed as described in subsection (1)(b)(B) of this section.
(4) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall classify attempting to  elude a police
officer as a crime category 6 of the  sentencing guidelines grid of the commission when the
crime is committed under the circumstances described  in subsection (1)(b)(A) of this section
and:
(a) The defendant’s act results in damage to property of another; or
(b) The defendant is also convicted of violating any of the following arising  out of the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1292
HB 3097
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
same criminal episode:
(A) The offense of careless driving under ORS 811.135; or
(B) The offense of driving while under the influence of intoxicants under ORS 813.010.
(5) The commission  shall classify attempting to elude a police officer as a crime category
8 of the sentencing guidelines grid of  the commission when the crime is committed under the
circumstances described in subsection (1)(b)(A) of this section and:
(a) The defendant has one or more prior convictions under subsection (1)(b)(A) of  this
section or an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction;
(b) At the time of  the offense there was a passenger in the motor vehicle who was under
18 years of age; or
(c) The defendant is also  convicted of violating any of the following arising out of the
same criminal episode:
(A) The offense of reckless driving under ORS 811.140; or
(B) The offense of recklessly endangering another person under ORS 163.195.
(6) The commission shall classify attempting to elude a police officer as a person felony
and a crime category 8 of the sentencing guidelines grid of the commission  when the crime
is committed under the circumstances described in subsection (1)(b)(A)  of this section and
the defendant’s act results in physical injury to any other person.
(7) As used in this section:
(a) “Criminal episode” has the meaning given that term in ORS 131.505.
(b) “Person felony” has the meaning  given that term in the rules of the Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 811.540 by section 1 of this 2025 Act  apply to con-
duct occurring on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[2]