Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Higher Education  Coordinating Commission may not distribute
moneys to the University of Oregon for the 2025-2027 biennium unless  the University of
Oregon transfers to  the commission for distribution to Oregon State University the excess
balance of any  contract receipts the University of Oregon receives from the athletic confer-
ence of which the University of Oregon is a member.
(2) The commission may not  distribute any moneys under subsection (1) of this section
to Oregon State University that the Attorney General determines is inconsistent with the
requirements of Article I, section 21, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1403