Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 681.740 to
681.758.
SECTION 2. (1) The Health Licensing Office may issue a license to engage in  the practice
of art therapy as a provisional licensed art therapist to an applicant who:
(a) Is at least 18 years of age;
(b) Has received at least a master’s degree from a  program accepted by the Art Therapy
Credentials Board, Inc., or its successor organization, and approved by the office;
(c) Submits sufficient proof, as determined by the office, of:
(A) As approved by the  office by rule, satisfying the requirements as a provisional reg-
istered art therapist  by the Art Therapy Credentials Board, Inc., or its successor organiza-
tion;
(B) Engagement in a supervisory relationship with a qualified supervisor; and
(C) Being in good standing in any other states where the applicant  is authorized to
practice art therapy; and
(d) Pays a licensure fee.
(2) A provisional licensed art therapist may apply to the  office for a license under ORS
681.743 or 681.746 once the provisional licensed art therapist:
(a) Completes two  years of supervised mental health practice, as defined by the Art
Therapy Credentials Board, Inc.,  or its successor organization, and approved by the office
by rule; and
(b) Meets other requirements established by the office by rule.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 681.740 is amended to read:
681.740. As used in ORS 681.740 to 681.758:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3866
HB 3760
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(1) “Art therapy” means the integrated use of  psychotherapeutic principles, visual art media and
the creative process to assist  clients in increasing awareness of self and others, coping with symp-
toms, stress and traumatic experiences, enhancing cognitive abilities and identifying  and imple-
menting therapeutic interventions to meet developmental,  behavioral, cognitive and emotional needs.
(2) “Board certified art therapist” means a person who is credentialed by the Art Therapy  Cre-
dentials Board, Inc., or its successor organization, as a board certified art therapist.
(3) “Licensed art therapist” means a person who is licensed by the Health Licensing Office  to
practice art therapy under ORS 681.743.
(4) “Licensed certified art therapist” means a person who is licensed  by the office to practice
art therapy under ORS 681.746.
(5) “Practice of art therapy” means  to engage professionally and for compensation in providing
art therapy services that include, but are not limited to:
(a) Evaluation during client sessions;
(b) Using treatment activities that provide clients  with opportunities for expression through the
creative  process;
(c) Using  art therapy assessment methods to determine treatment goals and implement
therapeutic art interventions to meet clients’ developmental, emotional and mental needs; and
(d) Employing art media, the creative process and  the resulting artwork to assist clients in
coping with and reducing psychiatric symptoms, including anxiety,  attachment disorders, depression
and post-traumatic stress, enhancing neurological,  cognitive and verbal abilities and promoting ap-
propriate skills development.
(6) “Provisional licensed art therapist” means a person who is licensed by the office  to
practice art therapy under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
[(6)] (7) “Registered art therapist” means a person who is credentialed by the  Art Therapy
Credentials Board, Inc., or its successor organization, as a registered art therapist.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 681.743 is amended to read:
681.743. The Health  Licensing Office may issue a license to engage in the practice of art therapy
as a licensed art therapist to an applicant who:
(1) Is at least 18 years of age;
(2) Has received at least a master’s  degree from a program accepted by the Art Therapy Cre-
dentials Board, Inc., or its successor organization, and approved by the office;
(3) Submits sufficient proof, as determined by the office, of:
(a) Having completed two years of supervised mental health practice as a provisional  li-
censed art therapist;
[(a)] (b) As approved by the office by rule, satisfying the requirements to  be credentialed as a
registered art therapist by the Art Therapy Credentials Board, Inc., or its  successor organization;
and
[(b)] (c) Being in good standing in any other states where the applicant is [ licensed or certified ]
authorized to practice art therapy; and
(4) Pays a licensure fee.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 681.746 is amended to read:
681.746. The Health  Licensing Office may issue a license to engage in the practice of art therapy
as a licensed certified art therapist to an applicant who:
(1) Is at least 18 years of age;
(2) Has received at least a master’s degree from a program  accepted by the Art Therapy Cre-
[2]
HB 3760
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
dentials Board, Inc., or its successor organization, and approved by the office;
(3) Submits sufficient proof, as determined by the office, of:
(a) Having completed two years of supervised mental health practice as a provisional li-
censed art therapist;
[(a)] (b) As approved by the office by rule, satisfying the requirements as a board certified  art
therapist by the Art Therapy Credentials Board, Inc., or its successor organization; and
[(b)] (c) Being in good standing in any other states where the applicant is [ licensed or certified ]
authorized to practice art therapy; and
(4) Pays a licensure fee.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 681.749 is amended to read:
681.749. (1) A licensed art therapist  [ and], a licensed certified art therapist and a provisional
licensed art therapist  shall comply with the rules adopted by the Health Licensing  Office pursuant
to ORS 681.758.
(2) A  licensed art therapist [ or], licensed certified art therapist or provisional licensed art
therapist may, in accordance with that person’s education and  training, administer and use appro-
priate assessment instruments to measure  and treat a client’s affective, behavioral and cognitive
disorders or problems. A licensed art  therapist [ or], licensed certified art therapist or provisional
licensed art therapist  shall refer a client who presents with a  disorder or problem that is beyond
the education and training of the  licensed art  [ therapist’s or ] therapist,  licensed certified art
[therapist’s education and training ] therapist or provisional licensed art therapist  to a licensed
health care practitioner qualified to treat that disorder or problem.
(3) A licensed art therapist [ or], licensed certified art therapist or provisional licensed  art
therapist may not perform psychological or other assessments or testing  designed to diagnose or
measure mental illness.
SECTION 7.  ORS 681.752 is amended to read:
681.752. (1) A person may not engage in the practice  of art therapy, purport to be engaged in
the practice of art therapy or use a title, word or  abbreviation, including “art therapist,” to indicate
or imply that the person is authorized or qualified to engage in the  practice of art therapy unless
the person is licensed under ORS 681.743 or 681.746  or section 2 of this 2025 Act .
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) The practice of art  therapy as an integral part of a supervised course of study in art therapy;
(b) A person who holds a master’s degree  in art therapy and who is engaged in the practice of
art therapy  under supervision as part of clinical training to fulfill the supervised experience re-
quirement to be credentialed as a registered art therapist;
(c) A person licensed under the laws of this state in a profession or occupation  other than art
therapy who uses art in a manner incidental to the person’s practice;
(d) A person who has training and national certification that attest  to the person’s preparation
and ability and who practices the profession or occupation in which the  person is certified, if the
person does not represent that the person is an art therapist;
(e) A person who is employed by a state, local or federal government agency or by a community
mental health program or drug and alcohol  treatment program authorized by this state, if the person
provides  services  within the person’s scope of employment and the person does not use the term
“art therapy” in connection with the services; or
(f) A person who is authorized by this state to provide mental health services if  the person
provides those services within the person’s authorized scope of practice and does not  use the title
[3]
HB 3760
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
“art therapist” in connection with the services.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 681.758 is amended to read:
681.758. The Health Licensing Office shall adopt rules to:
(1) Establish a process for issuing licenses under ORS 681.743 and 681.746  and section 2 of this
2025 Act;
(2) Establish licensure  fees for licenses issued under ORS 681.743 and 681.746  and section 2 of
this 2025 Act ;
(3) Determine qualifications for  applicants for initial licensure, license renewal and licensure by
reciprocity for licenses under ORS 681.743 and 681.746 and section 2 of this 2025 Act ;
(4) Develop and maintain a publicly available record of  licensed art therapists [ and], licensed
certified art therapists  and provisional licensed art therapists ; and
(5) Establish standards  of professional practice and standards of ethical conduct for licensed art
therapists [ and], licensed  certified art therapists and provisional licensed art therapists  that take
into consideration the code of ethics, conduct and disciplinary procedures of the Art Therapy Cre-
dentials Board, Inc., or its successor organization.
SECTION 9.
The amendments to ORS 681.743 and 681.746 by sections 4 and 5 of this 2025
Act apply to individuals who apply for licensure under ORS 681.743 or 681.746 on  or after
January 1, 2028.
SECTION 10. (1) Section 2 of this  2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 681.740, 681.743,
681.746, 681.749, 681.752 and 681.758 by sections 3 to 8 of this 2025 Act become operative on
January 1, 2026.
(2) The Health Licensing Office may take  any action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that  is necessary to enable the office to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the office by section 2 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS
681.740, 681.743, 681.746, 681.749, 681.752 and 681.758 by sections 3 to 8 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 11. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]