Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 280.070 is amended to read:
280.070. (1) An election within a county for the purpose of approving a tax levy or tax rate un-
der ORS 280.060 shall be called by the county court or board of county commissioners and shall  be
held on [ a] the date specified in ORS 203.085 (1)(d) of an even-numbered year .
(2) An election within a city for the purpose of approving a tax levy or tax rate  under ORS
280.060 or under [ section 11 (3)(c), ] Article  XI , section 11 (3)(c),  of the Oregon Constitution, shall
be called by the governing body of the city and held on  [a] the date specified in ORS 221.230 (1)(d)
of an even-numbered year .
(3) An election within a  political subdivision other than a county or city for the purpose of ap-
proving a tax levy or tax rate under ORS 280.060 or under [ section 11 (3)(c), ] Article XI , section 11
(3)(c), of the  Oregon Constitution, shall be called by the governing body of the subdivision and held
on [ a] the date specified in ORS 255.345 (1)(d) of an even-numbered year .
(4)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the ballot title for  a measure au-
thorizing the imposition of local option taxes shall contain the following additional statement:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
This measure may cause property taxes to increase more than three percent.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(b) The ballot title for a measure authorizing the renewal of current local option taxes shall
contain the following additional statement:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
This measure renews current local option taxes.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3949
HB 3656
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(c) The statement required by this subsection shall be placed after the  question on the ballot
title and may not be considered for purposes of the word count limitations under ORS 250.035.
(5) As part of  the question, the ballot title for a measure authorizing or renewing the authori-
zation of the imposition of local option taxes shall state:
(a) The length in years of the period  during which the proposed local option tax will be imposed.
(b) The first fiscal year in which the proposed local option tax will be imposed.
(6) As part of the question, the ballot title for a  measure authorizing the establishment of a
permanent rate limitation shall contain the following information:
(a) The tax rate per $1,000 of assessed value of the proposed permanent rate limitation.
(b) The first fiscal year in which the proposed permanent rate limitation will be imposed.
(7) The ballot title for a measure  authorizing the imposition of local option taxes or a permanent
rate limitation shall be in compliance with ORS 250.036.
SECTION 2.
Section 3 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 280.040 to
280.090.
SECTION 3. (1) This section applies to a local option tax that will  expire in the calendar
year succeeding a  general election at which a local option tax measure seeking to extend the
tax was rejected by the people.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 280.070 (1) to (3), the municipal  corporation seeking to extend
the local option tax may place a local option tax measure on the ballot at an election  held
on the date of the primary election in the succeeding odd-numbered  year if the measure will
extend the term of the local option tax without making any other substantive changes  to the
tax.
(b) The measure may have retroactive effect to the date of expiration  of the local option
tax that it extends.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]