Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
FOREST PRODUCTS HARVEST TAX FOR
WILDFIRE MITIGATION AND SUPPRESSION
SECTION 1.
 ORS 321.011 is amended to read:
321.011. The prevention  and suppression of , and preparedness for,  forest fires on forestlands ,
for the preservation of forest resources and the continuous  growth of timber on lands suitable
therefor , are declared to be the public policy of the State of Oregon. The  Legislative Assembly re-
cognizes that:
(1) The forested areas situated within eastern Oregon predominate in Ponderosa  pine trees and
associated species, and that the forested  areas situated within western Oregon predominate in
Douglas fir and associated species;
(2) Because of this difference in species, different forest fire  protection problems exist in eastern
and western Oregon, and  different logging conditions and circumstances in each necessitate varied
forest practices in the disposal of forest slashings and debris; and
(3) Therefore, in order to give recognition to such differences and their effect on the accom-
plishment of the public policy stated in this section, certain classifications of  forestlands within the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 102
HB 4133
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
State of Oregon are established by ORS 321.005 to 321.185 and 321.560 to 321.600.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 321.012 is amended to read:
321.012. The Legislative Assembly finds that it  is in the interest of the State of Oregon that the
public as a whole share responsibility for protecting the forests of  this state, by making funds
available [ from time to time ] for suppression of fires [ caused by the public ].
SECTION 3.  ORS 321.015 is amended to read:
321.015. (1) For the calendar years beginning January 1, 2024, and January  1, 2025, there is
levied a privilege tax of 90.00 cents per thousand feet,  board measure, upon taxpayers for the priv-
ilege of harvesting of all merchantable forest products harvested on forestlands. Subject to  ORS
321.145, the proceeds of the tax shall be transferred as provided in ORS 321.152 (2) to the  Forest
Research and Experiment Account for use for the forest resource research, experimentation  and
studies described in ORS 526.215 and for the Forest Research Laboratory established  under ORS
526.225.
(2)(a) [ Except as provided in  ORS 477.760, ] In addition to the tax levied by subsection (1) of this
section, there is levied a forest products harvest tax upon taxpayers of [ 62.5] 100 cents per thousand
feet, board measure,  for the privilege of harvesting all merchantable forest products harvested on
forestlands for the payment of benefits related to fire suppression as provided in ORS 321.005  to
321.185, 321.560 to 321.600 and 477.440 to 477.460.
(b)(A) Except  as provided by subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, the rate established by
paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be adjusted annually for  inflation since 2024 based on
the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items).
(B) If the annual adjustment  under this paragraph results in a rate that is lower than
the rate for the previous year, the rate shall remain unchanged from the previous year.
(3) For the calendar years beginning January 1, 2024, and January 1, 2025, in addition  to the
taxes levied under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, there is levied a privilege tax  upon tax-
payers for the privilege of harvesting all merchantable forest  products harvested on forestlands in
the amount of 253.46 cents per  thousand feet, board measure, for the purpose of administering the
Oregon Forest Practices Act in an amount not to exceed 40 percent of the total expenditures  ap-
proved by the Legislative Assembly for this purpose, including salary adjustments approved by  the
Legislative Assembly for fiscal years 2024 and 2025.
(4) For the calendar years beginning January 1, 2024, and January 1, 2025, in addition  to the
taxes levied  by subsections (1) to (3) of this section, there is levied a privilege tax of 21 cents per
thousand feet, board measure, upon taxpayers for the privilege of harvesting all merchantable forest
products harvested on  forestlands. Subject to ORS 321.145, the proceeds of the tax shall be trans-
ferred as provided in ORS 321.152 (5) to the subaccount established pursuant to ORS 350.520 for use
by Oregon State University for the purpose of making  investments in professional forestry education
at the College of Forestry.
(5) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, the  taxes shall be measured by and be applicable to
each per thousand feet, board measure, on the total quantity of  forest products harvested in this
state measured by use of any log scale which  is or may be in general use in the logging industry
and which  is designed to measure total volume of merchantable forest products in board feet. How-
ever, if the Department of Revenue finds that the scale used  by any taxpayer in computing the taxes
due under  ORS 321.005 to 321.185 and 321.560 to 321.600 does not accurately reflect the total
quantity of merchantable  forest products harvested by the taxpayer, it may require the taxpayer to
adopt another log scale in general use in the industry which in the department’s  opinion will accu-
[2]
HB 4133
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
rately reflect merchantable harvest in board feet.
(6) The first 25,000 feet, board measure, of forest products harvested annually by any  taxpayer
during each calendar year shall be excluded from the total quantity of harvested forest products that
constitutes the measure of the taxes under ORS 321.005 to 321.185 and 321.560 to 321.600.
(7)(a) Not later than March 10 of each odd-numbered  year, the Legislative Assembly shall begin
considering the biennial forest products harvest tax rates levied under subsections (1),  (3) and (4)
of this section.
(b) Upon request of the Legislative Revenue Officer or  the Legislative Fiscal Officer, the State
Forestry Department shall provide the respective officers with relevant timber harvest data  for the
purposes of paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 321.005 is amended to read:
321.005. As used in ORS 321.005 to  321.185, 321.560 to 321.600 and 477.440 to 477.460, unless the
context requires otherwise:
(1) “Board” means the State Board of Forestry.
[(2) “Protected  forestlands” means those lands which are protected from the starting or spread of
fire thereon or therefrom by: ]
[(a) The State Forester, with the approval of the board; ]
[(b) The United States of America through contract with the State Forester; ]
[(c) Any forest protective agency under contract with the State Forester or  the board pursuant to
ORS 477.406; or ]
[(d) Any forest protective agency, described in paragraph (c)  of this subsection, under an agreement
with the United States  of America wherein such agency agrees to protect specific federal forestlands
and, in return, the United States of America agrees to protect specific lands of such agency. ]
[(3) “Department” means the Department of Revenue. ]
[(4)] (2) “Committee” means the Emergency Fire Cost Committee.
(3) “Consumer Price  Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items)” means the
Consumer Price Index for All  Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as published by
the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(4) “Department” means the Department of Revenue.
(5) “Forestland” means any land producing forest products.
(6) “Forest products” means products from harvested timber, but does not include products from
short rotation fiber grown under agricultural conditions as described in  ORS 321.267 (3) or 321.824
(3), western juniper or products from harvested western juniper.
(7) “Harvest” means the point  at which timber that has been cut, severed, or removed for pur-
poses of sale or use is first measured in the ordinary course  of business as determined by reference
to common practice in the timber industry.
(8) “Merchantable stand of timber” means any stand on forestlands containing  living or dead
timber which is being or can be harvested.
(9) “Owner of timber” means any  individual or combination of individuals, partnership,
firm, corporation or association of whatever nature holding title  to harvested timber by
virtue of:
(a) An instrument of conveyance;
(b) The harvesting of the timber; or
(c) The harvesting of the timber and payment therefor.
[(9) “Taxpayer” means the owner of timber at time of harvest. ]
[3]
HB 4133
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(10) “Taxes” means the taxes provided for in ORS 321.015.
[(11) “Owner of  timber” means any individual or combination of individuals, partnership, firm,
corporation or association of whatever nature holding title to harvested timber by virtue of: ]
[(a) An instrument of conveyance; ]
[(b) The harvesting of the timber; or ]
[(c) The harvesting of the timber and payment therefor. ]
(11) “Taxpayer” means the owner of timber at time of harvest.
(12) “Timber”  means all logs which can be measured in board feet and other forest products as
determined by department rule.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 321.017 is amended to read:
321.017. (1) In addition to the taxes levied under ORS 321.015 (1) to  (4), there hereby is levied
a privilege tax upon taxpayers on  the harvesting of all merchantable forest products harvested on
forestlands in the amount provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The rate of tax levied in subsection  (1) of this section shall be established annually at the
beginning of each calendar year by the  board of directors of the Oregon Forest Resources Institute,
at a rate not to exceed 75 cents per thousand feet,  board measure, adjusted annually for inflation
since 1991 based on the Consumer  Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items)[ ,
as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor ].
(3) The tax shall be measured by and be  applicable to each per thousand feet, board measure,
and such shall be subject to and determined by the procedures and  provisions of ORS 321.015 (5)
and (6).
(4) The tax levied by subsection (1) of this  section shall be due and payable to the Department
of Revenue in the manner and procedure, including penalties and interest, as set forth for the  col-
lection of the privilege tax in ORS 321.005 to 321.185.
(5) The revenue from the tax levied by subsection (1) of  this section shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer who shall deposit it in a suspense account established  under ORS 321.145 (1). After
payment of refunds, which shall be paid in the same manner as other forest  products harvest tax
refunds are paid in ORS 321.145 (2), the balance of  the additional tax imposed under subsection (1)
of this section shall be deposited in the Oregon Forest Resources Institute Fund.
STATE FORESTRY DEPARTMENT LARGE WILDFIRE FUND
SECTION 6. (1) The State Forestry Department Large Wildfire Fund is established in  the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The State Forestry Department Large Wildfire Fund  consists of moneys appropriated
by the Legislative Assembly  for deposit in the fund and other moneys appropriated, allocated,
deposited or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise.
(3) Moneys  in the fund are continuously appropriated to the State Forestry Department
for wildfire mitigation and suppression.
DEFINITION OF “CENTRALIZED ADMINISTRATION COSTS”
SECTION 7.  ORS 477.001 is amended to read:
477.001. As used in this chapter[ , unless the context otherwise requires ]:
(1) “Additional fire hazard” means a hazard that has been determined to exist  by the forester
[4]
HB 4133
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
pursuant to ORS 477.580.
(2) “Board” means the State Board of Forestry.
(3) “Campfire” means any open fire used for cooking, personal warmth, lighting, ceremonial  or
aesthetic purposes that is hand built and that is not associated with any debris disposal activities.
(4) “Centralized administration costs” means all costs associated with:
(a) Administration of the State Forestry Department; and
(b) Fire protection provided statewide and in areas of this state by the  State Forestry
Department.
[(4)] (5) “Department” means the State Forestry Department.
[(5)] (6) “District” means a forest protection district organized under ORS 477.225.
[(6)] (7)  “Every reasonable effort” means the use of the reasonably available personnel and
equipment under the supervision and control of an owner or operator, which  are needed and effec-
tive to fight the fire in the judgment of the forester and which can be brought to bear on the  fire
in a timely fashion.
[(7)] (8) “Fire season” means a period designated pursuant to ORS 477.505.
[(8)] (9) “Fiscal year” means the period beginning on July 1 of any year and ending on June  30
of the next year.
[(9)] (10) “Forestland”  means any woodland, brushland, timberland, grazing land or clearing that,
during any  time of the year, contains enough forest growth, slashing or vegetation to constitute, in
the judgment of the forester, a fire hazard, regardless of  how the land is zoned or taxed. As used in
this subsection, “clearing” means any grassland, improved area, lake, meadow, mechanically or
manually cleared area, road, rocky  area, stream or other similar forestland opening that is sur-
rounded by or contiguous to forestland and that has  been included in areas classified as forestland
under ORS 526.305 to 526.370.
[(10)] (11) “Forest patrol assessment” means the costs levied and assessed under ORS 477.270.
[(11)] (12)  “Forest protective association”  or “association” means an association, group or
agency composed of owners of forestlands, organized for  the purpose of protecting such forestlands
from fire.
[(12)] (13)  “Forest resource” means the various types of vegetation normally growing on
Oregon’s forestland, the associated harvested  products and the associated residue, including but not
limited to brush, grass, logs, saplings, seedlings, trees and slashing.
[(13)] (14) “Forester” means the State Forester or authorized representative.
[(14)] (15)  “Governing body” of a  county means the county court or board of county commis-
sioners.
[(15)] (16) “Grazing land” is defined by ORS 477.205.
[(16)] (17) “Open  fire” means any outdoor fire that occurs in such a manner that combustion air
is not effectively controlled and combustion products are not effectively vented  through a stack or
chimney.
[(17)] (18) “Operation” means any  industrial activity, any development or any improvement on
forestland inside or within one-eighth of one mile of a forest protection  district, including but not
limited to the harvesting  of forest tree species, the clearing of land, the use of power-driven ma-
chinery and the use of fire, excluding, however, the culture and harvesting of agricultural crops.
[(18)] (19) “Operation area” means the area on which an operation is being conducted and the
area on which operation activity may have resulted in the ignition of a fire.
[(19)] (20) “Operation in progress” means that time when workers are on  an operation area for
[5]
HB 4133
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the purpose of an operation, including  the period of time when fire watches are required to be on
the operation area pursuant to ORS 477.665.
[(20)] (21)  “Operator” means any person who, either  personally or through employees, agents,
representatives or contractors, is carrying on or has carried on any operation.
[(21)] (22)  “Owner” means an individual, a combination  of individuals, a partnership, a corpo-
ration, the State of Oregon or a political subdivision thereof, or an  association of any nature that
holds an ownership interest in land.
[(22)] (23) “Political subdivision” includes,  but is not limited to, counties, cities and special dis-
tricts.
[(23)] (24) “Rangeland” is defined by ORS 477.315.
[(24)] (25) “Routine road maintenance” is defined by ORS 477.625.
[(25)] (26) “Side” means  any single unit of a logging operation employing power-driven machin-
ery.
[(26)] (27)  “Slashing” means the forest debris or refuse on any forestland resulting from the
cutting, killing, pruning, severing or removal of brush, trees or other forest growth.
[(27)] (28) “State Forester” means the person appointed State Forester pursuant  to ORS 526.031
or the person serving in the position on an interim or delegated basis.
[(28)] (29)  “Summit of the Cascade Mountains” is  considered to be a line beginning at the
intersection of the northern boundary of the State of Oregon and the western boundary  of Wasco
County; thence southerly  along the western boundaries of Wasco, Jefferson, Deschutes and Klamath
Counties to the southern boundary of the State of Oregon.
[(29)] (30) “Timberland” is defined by ORS 477.205.
[(30)] (31) “Warden” means a fire warden appointed under ORS 477.355.
FOREST PROTECTION DISTRICTS
SECTION 8.
 ORS 477.205 is amended to read:
477.205. As used in ORS 477.205 to 477.281[ , unless the context requires otherwise ]:
(1) “Budget” means an estimate of a fire protection district of the  amount the district
needs for preparedness for, and for the  prevention and suppression of, forest fires on
forestland.
[(1)] (2)  “Grazing land”  means forestland, within a forest protection district, that has been
classified as Class 3, agricultural class, as provided by ORS 526.305 to 526.370.
[(2)] (3)  “Timberland” means forestland, within a forest protection district, that has not been
classified as Class 3, agricultural class, under ORS 526.305 to 526.370.
SECTION 9.  ORS 477.230 is amended to read:
477.230. (1) The annual cost of protection  provided by the [ forester] State Forester  for
forestland within a forest protection district shall be as follows:
(a) Grazing land within the district shall be protected by the [ forester] State Forester  at  a pro
rata cost per acre for  all grazing land within the district boundary. However, forest patrol assess-
ments levied  and assessed under ORS 477.270 against [ such] grazing lands that are not owned by
public agencies may not exceed one-half of the pro rata cost per acre[ , exclusive of any assessment
per acre under ORS 477.880 ].
(b) Timberland within the district shall be protected by  the [ forester] State Forester  at a pro
rata cost per acre  for all timberland within the district boundary. However, forest patrol assess-
[6]
HB 4133
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ments levied and  assessed under ORS 477.270 against [ such lands ] timberland  that [ are] is  not
owned by public agencies may not exceed one-half of the pro rata cost per acre[ , exclusive of any
assessment per acre under ORS 477.880 ].
(c) Pro rata costs per acre must be at least:
(A) Sixty cents per acre for grazing land owned by public agencies.
(B) Thirty cents per acre for grazing land not owned by public agencies.
(C) Two dollars per acre for timberland owned by public agencies.
(D) One dollar per acre for timberland not owned by public agencies.
(d) Pro rata costs per acre may not be calculated to include centralized administration
costs.
(2) The cost of protection described in this section shall  be in accordance with a budget for the
district approved by the State Board of Forestry.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 477.232 is amended to read:
477.232. Subject to the forest patrol assessment limitations set forth in ORS 477.230:
(1) Actual costs incurred by the [ forester in the prevention and suppression of ] State Forester
in accordance with ORS 321.011 for adequate protection against  fire on  grazing land or
timberland located within a forest protection district, in excess of the amount budgeted as  required
by ORS 477.230, but not  including those costs eligible for [ equalization by the Oregon Forest Land
Protection Fund ] emergency fire cost suppression , shall be,  without regard to proceedings for the
collection of the costs:
(a) Included in the budget  of a forest protection district  for the next fiscal year; and
(b) Levied and assessed against the grazing land or timberland in the district.
(2) Budgeted  amounts not expended may be carried forward as a credit to the assessment rate
for the ensuing year.
MINIMUM ASSESSMENT AND SURCHARGE
SECTION 11.
 ORS 477.277 is amended to read:
477.277. (1)(a) In addition to any other assessment prescribed by ORS 477.205 to 477.281, [ in any
fiscal year in which the Emergency Fire Cost Committee determines pursuant to ORS 477.760 that  the
unencumbered balance of the Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund  is less than $22.5 million, ] a sur-
charge shall  annually be levied and assessed in the  amount of [ $47.50] $69.50 for each improved lot
or parcel[ , except as provided in ORS 477.760, ] to defray the increased cost of fire suppression on
forestland that is caused by the existence of the improvements.
(b)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B)  of this paragraph, the surcharge estab-
lished by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be adjusted annually for  inflation since 2024
based on  the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as
published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(B) If the  annual adjustment under this paragraph results in a surcharge that is lower
than the surcharge for the previous year,  the surcharge shall remain unchanged from the
previous year.
(2) All surcharge moneys collected pursuant to this section shall be paid into the Oregon Forest
Land Protection Fund.
(3) If an owner of forestland files a forest protection plan  with the forester which is approved
by the State Board of Forestry under ORS 477.210  (2), the owner shall not be required to pay the
[7]
HB 4133
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
surcharge levied under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) Contiguous lots included in a combined lot  that is described in ORS 477.295 [ (3)(a)] (2)(a) and
whose owner has made application to the forester under ORS 477.295 [ (4)] (3) are considered  one lot
for purposes of subsection (1) of this section.
(5) As used in this section, a lot or parcel is “improved” if it is indicated as improved in the
county assessor’s property classification files or if a manufactured  dwelling is sited on the lot or
parcel.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 477.281 is amended to read:
477.281. (1) The obligation of an owner of timberland or  grazing land for payment of assessments
and taxes for fire protection of forestland is limited to:
(a) The payment of moneys pursuant  to ORS 321.015 (2), 477.277[ ,] and 477.295[, 477.760 (4) and
477.880] to [ maintain] the Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund; and
(b) The payment of forest protection district assessments pursuant to ORS 477.205 to 477.281.
(2) As used in this section, “obligation of an owner of  timberland or grazing land for payment
of assessments and taxes for  fire protection of forestland” does not include the duties or obligations
of the  owner under ORS 477.066, 477.068 or 477.120 or the obligations of an owner of land included
in a rural fire protection district pursuant to ORS 478.010.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 477.295 is amended to read:
477.295. (1)(a) For purposes of making the levy and assessment of costs against forestland under
ORS 477.270, the minimum cost to provide fire protection  or suppression for any lot or parcel of real
property separately assessed for ad valorem taxes or other taxes provided  by law in lieu thereof,
on the current assessment roll  shall be not less than [ $18.75] $27.55[, except as provided in ORS
477.760. Three dollars and seventy-five  cents of each minimum assessment shall be paid into the Oregon
Forest Land Protection Fund. Otherwise, ]. Such assessments shall  be determined under ORS 477.230
and 477.270.
(b)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph,  the minimum cost es-
tablished by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be  adjusted annually for inflation since
2024 based on the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All  Items),
as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(B) If the annual adjustment under this paragraph results in a minimum cost that  is
lower than the minimum cost for the previous year,  the minimum cost shall remain un-
changed from the previous year.
[(2) In any fiscal year in which the Emergency Fire Cost Committee determines pursuant  to ORS
477.760 that the unencumbered balance of the Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund has: ]
[(a) Increased to an amount: ]
[(A) More than $22.5 million but less than or equal  to $30 million, the minimum assessment re-
ferred to in subsection (1) of this section shall be $16.88 for each lot or parcel. Of  that amount, $1.88
of each minimum assessment shall be paid into the Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund. ]
[(B) More than $30 million, the minimum assessment referred to in subsection (1) of this  section
shall be $15 for each lot or parcel.  This amount shall be treated in the same manner as assessments
under ORS 477.230 and 477.270. ]
[(b) Decreased to an amount that is at or below $22.5 million,  the minimum assessment referred to
in subsection (1) of this section shall be $18.75 for each lot or parcel.  This amount shall be treated in
the same manner as assessments under subsection (1) of this section. ]
[(3)] (2)  Upon application to the  [ forester] State Forester  under subsection [ (4)] (3) of this sec-
[8]
HB 4133
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tion, contiguous lots held under identical ownership  shall be considered as one combined lot for
purposes of subsection (1) of this section. However, the following may not be  included in a combined
lot:
(a) Except as provided in this paragraph,  a lot on which a structure has been placed or im-
provements made for the purpose  of erecting any temporary or permanent structure. One lot on
which a  single-family dwelling has been placed, and lots on which the structures and improvements
that are appurtenant to that single-family dwelling have been placed, may  be included in a combined
lot that does not exceed 20 acres.
(b) A lot that is in a subdivision containing lots that have been or are being offered for sale.
(c) A lot that is  not designated forest or agricultural land for the purpose of land use or special
tax assessment purposes.
[(4)] (3) To qualify under subsection [ (3)] (2) of this section[ ,]:
(a) An  owner of forestland [ shall] must  make an application to the [ forester] State Forester
no later than April 15 of the fiscal year preceding [ each] the fiscal year  for which the owner desires
the land to be assessed under subsection [ (3)] (2) of this section. The application [ shall] must  be on
a form prescribed by the State Forester. The State Forester may charge  a fee of $25 per combined
lot [ shall], to  be paid to the [ forester] State Forester  at the time of  [ first] application for the com-
bined lot.
(b) After an application under paragraph (a) of this subsection is approved, the owner of
the forestland must apply again, as described in paragraph (a) of  this subsection, every five
years. [An additional ] The State Forester may charge a  fee of $25 per combined lot [ shall], to
be paid to the  [ forester] State Forester  at the time of subsequent application[ , if an application for
the combined lot was not made for the previous fiscal year ].
[(5)] (4)  The State Board of Forestry may adopt rules for the administration of the  provisions
of subsections [ (3) and (4) ] (2) and (3)  of this section.
[(6)] (5) For the purposes of this section,  “lot” and “subdivision” have the meanings given those
terms in ORS 92.010.
EMERGENCY FIRE COST COMMITTEE
SECTION 14.
 ORS 477.440 is amended to read:
477.440. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Grazing land owner” means  an individual, combination of individuals, partnership,
corporation or association that holds an ownership interest in grazing land in this state.
(b) “Large  forest owner” means an individual, combination of individuals, partnership,
corporation or association that holds an ownership interest  in at least 5,000 acres of
timberland in this state.
(c) “Small forest owner” means an individual, combination  of individuals, partnership,
corporation or association that holds:
(A) An ownership  interest in at least 10 acres, but less than 5,000 acres, of timberland
in this state; and
(B) All  of the acres within a single tax lot and within contiguous parcels owned by the
same individual, combination of individuals, partnership, corporation or association.
(2) The  State Board of Forestry shall appoint an Emergency Fire Cost Committee  for the pur-
pose of carrying  out the provisions of this section and ORS 477.445, 477.450, 477.455, 477.460,
[9]
HB 4133
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
477.755, 477.760, 477.770 and 477.775.
(3) The committee may:
(a) Make recommendations  to the board concerning the minimum qualifications for
serving on the committee.
(b) Establish standards,  requirements or procedures that the committee considers nec-
essary for the effective administration of the committee.
(4) The committee shall [consisting] consist of [ four] six members, including one nonvoting
representative of the board and five voting members  who are appointed by the board as fol-
lows:
(a) Two members  who [ shall be ] are, or are representatives of, large  forest [ landowners or
representatives of forest landowners ] owners  whose forestland is being assessed for forest  fire pro-
tection within a forest protection district.
(b) Two members who are, or are representatives of, small  forest owners whose
forestland is being assessed for forest fire protection within a forest protection district.
(c) One member who is, or is a representative of, a grazing land owner  whose forestland
is being assessed for forest fire protection within a forest protection district.
(5) The  board shall appoint at least one member [ shall be selected ] from each forest region [ of
the state ] established under ORS 527.640 .
(6) Members shall serve at the pleasure of the board.
[(2)] (7)  Members [ of the  Emergency Fire Cost Committee ] shall be appointed [ by the board ] for
four-year terms. [Appointments under this subsection shall be made by the board within 60 days after
July 21, 1987. ]
(8) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the board shall make an  appointment to become imme-
diately effective for the unexpired term.
SECTION 15.
(1) The State Board of Forestry  shall appoint the first five voting members
of the Emergency Fire Cost Committee described in ORS 477.440,  as amended by section 14
of this 2024 Act, on or before December 31, 2024.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 477.440 (7), of the voting members of the committee first ap-
pointed by the board:
(a) One shall serve for a term ending one year after the date of appointment.
(b) One shall serve for a term ending two years after the date of appointment.
(c) One shall serve for a term ending three years after the date of appointment.
(d) Two shall serve for a term ending four years after the date of appointment.
(3) The board may appoint  to the committee persons serving on the committee on the
effective date of  this 2024 Act who qualify under ORS 477.440, as amended by section 14 of
this 2024 Act.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 477.445 is amended to read:
477.445. The Emergency Fire Cost Committee shall :
(1) [ Supervise and control ] Oversee  the distribution of funds from the Oregon Forest  Land Pro-
tection Fund established under ORS 477.750.
(2) Review expenditures from the fund.
(3) Review  budgets for forest protection districts and provide recommendations on the
budgets to the State Board of Forestry.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 477.450 is amended to read:
477.450. (1) [ After July 1, 1961, ] The Emergency Fire Cost Committee shall meet and elect one
[10]
HB 4133
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of its members as chairperson. [The chairperson shall hold office  for a period determined by the
committee.]
(2) Whenever the office of chairperson of  the committee becomes vacant, the committee at its
next regular or special meeting shall elect one of its members to fill the vacancy.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 477.455 is amended to read:
477.455. (1) Regular meetings of the Emergency Fire Cost Committee shall  be held quarterly
[prior to the day set for meetings of the State Board of Forestry ], as otherwise provided by law.
(2) Special meetings of the committee may be called  by its chairperson or by [ three] a majority
of the voting  members.
(3) The act or decision of  [ any three ] a majority of the voting  members shall be deemed the
act or decision of the committee.
[(2)] (4)  A staff member of the State Forestry Department shall be designated by the State
Forester to serve as administrator for the committee.
(5) The committee may employ staff members, in coordination with the State Forester.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 477.460 is amended to read:
477.460. (1) The administrator  described in ORS 477.455  shall :
(a) Act as secretary of the Emergency Fire Cost Committee ; and [ shall]
(b) Carry out the provisions of ORS 477.440 to 477.460 in such manner  as the committee shall
direct.
(2) The salary  and other expenses of the administrator  and of staff members  shall be paid from
the Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund as are other expenses of the committee.
[(2)] (3)  Members of the committee are entitled to compensation and expenses as  provided in
ORS 292.495.
OREGON FOREST LAND PROTECTION FUND
SECTION 20.  ORS 477.750 is amended to read:
477.750. (1) The Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund is created, separate and distinct  from the
General Fund.
(2) [This fund ] The Oregon Forest  Land Protection Fund shall be held by the State Treasurer
as a trust fund for the uses and purposes provided in ORS 477.750 to 477.775 [ and 477.880].
(3) The State  Treasurer shall deposit and invest moneys in the fund as provided by law, taking
into account its uses and purposes. Interest earned by the fund shall be credited to the fund.
[(2)] (4) Notwithstanding any other law and as limited by ORS  477.750 to 477.775 [ and 477.880],
that part of the suspense account created by  ORS 321.145 that is derived from the tax levied by ORS
321.015 (2) after refunds and other costs permitted by law, shall be credited  to the Oregon Forest
Land Protection Fund.
SECTION 21.  ORS 477.755 is amended to read:
477.755. (1) As used in this section,  “annual expenditure” means the expenses of the Oregon
Forest Land Protection Fund obligated in any 12-month period [ designated by the  Emergency Fire
Cost Committee by rule, corresponding to the policy period of any insurance  for emergency fire costs ],
consistent with the fiscal year budgeting of the State Forestry Department .
(2) Notwithstanding  ORS 291.238, the moneys in the Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund are
continuously appropriated to the Emergency Fire Cost Committee for the purposes of:
(a) [ Equalizing emergency fire suppression costs for safeguarding forestland in any ] Making
[11]
HB 4133
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
payments for the fiscal year budgets of  forest protection [ district] districts,  but not for cen-
tralized administration costs ;
(b) Paying necessary [ administrative] expenses, not  to exceed the limit authorized by the Legis-
lative Assembly each biennium;
[(c) Contributing to the payment of emergency fire suppression costs insurance  premiums, subject
to the payment limitation established in ORS 477.775 (4); ]
[(d) Paying costs related to the  availability and mobilization of emergency fire suppression re-
sources on a statewide basis; and ]
[(e)] (c)  Paying for  nonroutine purchases of supplemental fire prevention, detection or sup-
pression resources  that will enhance the ability of the forester to perform fire protection responsi-
bilities within a forest protection district[ .]; and
(d) Issuing loans to the department or forest protection associations that relate to  nec-
essary wildfire costs.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the annual expenditure from the Oregon  Forest
Land Protection Fund from revenues received from ORS 321.015 [ (2)], 477.277 [ (1), 477.295 (1) and
(2),] and 477.750 [ (1) and (2), 477.760 (4) and 477.880 ] may not exceed the lesser of:
(a) [ $13.5 million] Ninety-seven percent of the revenues ; or
(b) The sum of[ :] expenditures described in subsection (2) of this section.
[(A) The lesser of $10 million or 50 percent of the eligible annual fire suppression  costs determined
by the committee; ]
[(B) Necessary administrative expenses as  determined by the committee and authorized under the
limit described in subsection (2)(b) of this section; ]
[(C) Contributions to the payment of emergency fire suppression costs insurance premiums,  subject
to the payment limitation established in ORS 477.775 (4); ]
[(D) The lesser of $3 million or three-fifths of the actual cost of activities described in  ORS 477.777
(1)(b) and (c); and ]
[(E) Any amounts expended for nonroutine purchases described in subsection (2)(e) of  this
section.]
SECTION 22.
 ORS 477.760 is amended to read:
477.760. [(1) The reserve base of the Oregon  Forest Land Protection Fund is $22.5 million. On or
about the last day of February of each year ] The Emergency Fire Cost Committee shall :
(1) Adopt rules relating to the reserve base of the Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund.
(2) [ Meet and ] Annually  determine  the unencumbered balance of the fund as of  the end of  the
preceding [ February 16 ] calendar year .
[(2) In order to maintain the reserve base of the fund at $22.5 million, the Emergency Fire Cost
Committee may  request and the State Treasurer may approve transfers to the fund in accordance with
ORS 293.205 to 293.225, if the  moneys in this fund fall below the reserve base, whether or not there
are sufficient moneys in the fund to pay the obligations of the fund. Repayment of any  such transfers
shall be made from moneys  paid into the fund pursuant to ORS 321.015 (2), 477.277 and 477.880 and
from such other moneys as may be credited to the fund therefor. ]
[(3) If the committee determines that the moneys in the fund exceed: ]
[(a) The reserve base, and that no repayment obligations are outstanding from  transfers made
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, then the Department of Revenue shall reduce the taxes de-
scribed in ORS 321.015 (2) by  50 percent for the following calendar year and the surcharge for each
improved lot or parcel described in ORS 477.277 and the assessments  described in ORS 477.880 shall
[12]
HB 4133
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
be reduced by 50 percent for the following fiscal year. ]
[(b) $30 million, and that no repayment  obligations are outstanding from transfers made pursuant
to subsection (2) of this section, then the Department of Revenue may not  collect the taxes described in
ORS 321.015 (2) for the following calendar year and the surcharge for each improved lot or parcel
described in ORS 477.277 and the assessments described in ORS 477.880 may not be collected  until the
calendar year or fiscal year following the determination of the committee that  the unencumbered bal-
ance in the fund is less than or equal to $22.5 million. ]
[(4)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law,  if the funds referred to in subsection (2) of this
section are inadequate to cover repayment of transfers from the State Treasurer or  from other sources,
the State Forester shall increase the  following taxes, assessments and charges in an amount adequate
to ensure repayment of the transfers, and any interest accrued thereon, allowing for contingencies in
valuation, assessment and collection: ]
[(A) The harvest tax referred to in ORS 321.015 (2). ]
[(B) The surcharge on developed lots referred to in ORS 477.277. ]
[(C) The minimum assessment referred to in ORS 477.295. ]
[(D) The acreage assessments referred to in ORS 477.880 (2). ]
[(b) The  increases to taxes, assessments and charges shall be apportioned based upon the propor-
tionate levels of revenues received  from each source by the Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund. Any
such increases shall be computed on or before January 1 of each year,  and shall be based upon re-
venues received during the previous four quarters. Any such  increases shall be made in the appropriate
calendar or fiscal year following  that in which the requested transfers from the State Treasurer or from
other sources are made. ]
SECTION 23.
(1) As soon as practicable after the effective date of  this 2024 Act, the
Emergency Fire Cost Committee shall complete all audits of  moneys in the Oregon Forest
Land Protection Fund.
(2) On the effective date of this 2024 Act, all moneys in  the fund shall remain in the fund.
(3) All moneys due to the fund on or before the effective date of this 2024  Act shall be
credited to the fund.
SECTION 24.  ORS 477.770 is amended to read:
477.770. (1) In addition to the rules described in ORS 477.760,  the Emergency Fire Cost
Committee shall promulgate rules relating  to the disposition of moneys from the Oregon Forest Land
Protection Fund.
(2) [ Under such ] The rules [ the committee] may :
(a) Require that prior to the  payment of moneys from the fund the forest protection district
expend an amount [ for emergency fire suppression not to exceed a per  acre amount determined to be
10 percent of the total  budgeted amount of all districts as set forth in ORS 477.220 to 477.415 divided
by the total protected acres  of all districts. However, any such amount per acre shall apply uniformly
to each forest protection district ] prescribed in the rules .
(b) Set forth a process for reviewing the disbursement of moneys from the fund.
(c) Establish best practices for reviewing emergency fire suppression costs.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 477.775 is amended to read:
477.775. (1) [Prior to February 1 of each year ] At the first regularly scheduled meeting of  the
Emergency Fire Cost Committee  in a calendar year , the [ Emergency Fire Cost Committee ] com-
mittee and the [ forester] State Forester  shall consult regarding  the purchase of emergency fire
suppression costs insurance and the level of coverage to purchase for the fire season of that year.
[13]
HB 4133
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) In determining whether the purchase  of insurance is advisable, the [ forester] State Forester
and the committee shall consider:
(a) The cost, coverage and deductible of insurance available from private insurance carriers;
(b) The funding available for fire  suppression [ from the Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund and
other sources ];
(c) The current condition of forests;
(d) Long-term weather predictions;
(e) Available fire fighting resources; and
(f) Available funds for the purchase of insurance.
(3) If [ the committee and the forester agree ] the State Forester decides to purchase insurance,
the [ forester] State Forester  shall purchase insurance through the Oregon  Department of Adminis-
trative Services [ to cover any  lawful expense incurred by the State Forestry Department, or contractors
or cooperators,  that is payable by the Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund ]. The insurance may be
obtained through negotiation or competitive bids, whichever is in the best interest  of the state[ , its
contractors and cooperators ].
[(4) The Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund may not be charged  for payment of more than one-
half of any premium for the insurance. ]
SECTION 26.
 ORS 477.777 is amended to read:
477.777. (1) As part of the preparation of the  agency request budget submitted to the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services pursuant to ORS 291.208 for the State Forestry  Department,
the State Forester shall prepare, in addition to any amounts budgeted  for forest protection districts
pursuant to ORS  477.205 to 477.281, a request for a General Fund appropriation for the following
purposes:
(a) Providing funds for the purchase of emergency fire  suppression costs insurance under ORS
477.775.
(b) Acquiring and placing centrally managed fire suppression resources for statewide use.
(c) Acquiring  fast-mobilizing, short-term contingency resources to be used based on predictions
of severe fire weather, widespread  lightning events or serious resource shortage due to a heavy fire
season in this state, in the western region of the United States or nationally.
(d) Enhancing forest protection  district resources in cases where land productivity or other
economic factors seriously limit the ability  of the [ forester] State Forester  to perform fire pro-
tection responsibilities.
(e) Mitigating forest patrol assessment rates in cases where land productivity  or other economic
factors seriously limit the ability of the owners of forestlands in the forest protection  district to
comply with ORS 477.210 (1).
(f) Providing funds for costs associated with  state and local wildfire protection and
agency administration costs.
(g) Providing funds for costs associated with obligations to the General Fund due to es-
timated emergency fire fighting costs.
(2) The State Forester shall utilize critical discretion  in the expenditure of the funds provided
to the State Forestry Department pursuant to the separate request required under subsection (1) of
this section.
(3) The State Forester shall  report to the Emergency Board, each year, after the close of the fire
season, on:
(a) The nature and severity of the fire season;
[14]
HB 4133
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The moneys expended on fire suppression;
(c) The balance remaining from the biennial appropriation; and
(d) Any matters arising out of the fire season that may require attention  or warrant future
consideration by the board or the Legislative Assembly.
(4) When reporting the nature and severity of the fire season under subsection (3) of this section,
for each fire consuming 1,000 or more acres, the State Forester shall provide  information regarding
[the resulting losses on private lands of timber, buildings, fencing and livestock and  of grazing land
capacity if the land is expected to be unavailable for two or more grazing seasons. ]:
(a) The number of buildings that were damaged  or destroyed by fire during the fire sea-
son.
(b) The number  of acres of forestland that were burned during the fire season and an
estimate of the economic value of the effects on the forestland.
(c) The number of acres of grazing land that  were burned during the fire season and an
estimate of the economic value of the effects on the grazing land.
(d) Any other information the State Forester deems relevant.
SECTION 27.
 ORS 291.055 is amended to read:
291.055. (1) Notwithstanding any other law that  grants to a state agency the authority to es-
tablish fees, all new state agency fees or fee increases adopted during the period  beginning on the
date of adjournment sine die of a regular  session of the Legislative Assembly and ending on the date
of adjournment sine die of the next regular session of the Legislative Assembly:
(a) Are not effective for agencies in the executive department  of government unless approved
in writing by the Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services;
(b) Are not effective for agencies  in the judicial department of government unless approved in
writing by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court;
(c) Are not effective for agencies in  the legislative department of government unless approved
in writing by the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives;
(d) Shall be reported by  the state agency to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
within 10 days of their adoption; and
(e) Are rescinded on adjournment sine die of the next regular session of the Legislative Assem-
bly as described in this subsection, unless otherwise authorized  by enabling legislation setting forth
the approved fees.
(2) This section does not apply to:
(a) Any tuition or fees charged by a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(b) Taxes or other payments made  or collected from employers for unemployment insurance re-
quired by  ORS chapter 657 or premium assessments required by ORS 656.612 and 656.614 or contri-
butions and assessments calculated by cents per hour for  workers’ compensation coverage required
by ORS 656.506.
(c) Fees or payments required for:
(A) Health care services provided by the Oregon Health and Science University, by  the Oregon
Veterans’ Homes pursuant to ORS 408.362 and 408.365 to 408.385 and  by other state agencies and
institutions pursuant to ORS 179.610 to 179.770.
(B) Copayments and premiums paid to the Oregon medical assistance program.
(C) Assessments paid to the  Department of Consumer and Business Services under sections 3
and 5, chapter 538, Oregon Laws 2017.
(d) Fees  created or authorized by statute that have no established rate or amount but are cal-
[15]
HB 4133
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
culated for each separate instance for each fee payer and are based  on actual cost of services pro-
vided.
(e) State agency charges on employees for benefits and services.
(f) Any intergovernmental charges.
(g) Forest protection district assessment rates established by  ORS 477.210 to 477.265 [ and the
Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund fees established by ORS 477.760 ].
(h) State Department of Energy assessments required by ORS 456.595 and 469.421 (8).
(i) Assessments on premiums charged by the Director of the Department  of Consumer and
Business Services pursuant to ORS 731.804 or fees charged by the director to banks,  trusts and
credit unions pursuant to ORS 706.530 and 723.114.
(j) Public Utility Commission operating assessments required  by ORS 756.310 or charges paid to
the Residential Service Protection Fund required by chapter 290, Oregon Laws 1987.
(k) Fees charged by the  Housing and Community Services Department for intellectual property
pursuant to ORS 456.562.
(L) New or increased fees that are  anticipated in the legislative budgeting process for an
agency,  revenues  from which are included, explicitly or implicitly, in the legislatively adopted
budget or the legislatively approved budget for the agency.
(m) Tolls approved by the Oregon Transportation Commission pursuant to ORS 383.004.
(n) Portal provider fees as defined in ORS 276A.270 and established by  the State Chief Infor-
mation Officer under ORS 276A.276 (3) and recommended by  the Electronic Government Portal Ad-
visory  Board.
(o) Fees set by the State Parks  and Recreation Director and approved by the State Parks and
Recreation Commission under ORS 390.124 (2)(b).
(3)(a) Fees temporarily decreased for competitive or promotional reasons  or because of unex-
pected and temporary revenue surpluses may  be increased to not more than their prior level without
compliance with subsection (1) of this section if, at the time the fee is decreased,  the state agency
specifies the following:
(A) The reason for the fee decrease; and
(B) The conditions under which the fee will be increased to not more than its prior level.
(b) Fees that are decreased for reasons other than those described in paragraph (a) of  this sub-
section may not be subsequently increased except as allowed by ORS 291.050 to 291.060  and 294.160.
REPEAL OF ACREAGE ASSESSMENT
SECTION 28.
ORS 477.880, 477.960 and 477.970 are repealed.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 29. The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 30. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2024
[16]
HB 4133
1
2
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[17]