Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 656.
SECTION 2. The State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation, in setting premium rates
for workers’ compensation insurance, may:
(1) Evaluate the risk the corporation has  insured for employers during the past three
years and reduce the premium the corporation charges an employer to reflect reductions or
mitigations in the risk that result from  an agreement between the employer and the corpo-
ration.
(2) Specify in an agreement with a person that owns a  new business or that assumes
ownership of an existing business conditions under which the corporation will  charge the
person a reduced premium rate for a probationary period during  which the corporation
evaluates the person’s adherence to  the terms of the agreement. If the person adheres to
the agreement,  the corporation may extend the reduced premium rate for an additional pe-
riod. If during  the probationary period the person does not adhere to the agreement, the
corporation may rescind the reduced premium rate and may charge a premium  rate that
reflects the corporation’s assessment of the risk the person presents.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2220