Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Early Learning and Care shall enter into an agree-
ment with a nongovernmental organization to establish and administer a child care  subsidy
pilot program.
(2) The purposes of the pilot program are to  leverage private-public partnerships to make
child care affordable  for working families, help employers attract and retain employees and
support the financial sustainability of child care providers.
(3) The agreement shall specify  policies and procedures for the administration of the pilot
program, including but not limited to:
(a) The amount, or a formula to determine the amount, of:
(A) A child care subsidy awarded under this section;
(B) A contribution made by an  employer for a child care subsidy awarded under this
section;
(C) A contribution  made by the department for a child care subsidy awarded under this
section; and
(D) The percentage of child care costs, if any, for  which an eligible individual must pay
as a condition to receive a child care subsidy under this section.
(b) The  form and manner of documentation for eligible individuals to apply for a child
care subsidy, employers to contribute to a child care subsidy and child care  providers to re-
ceive a child care subsidy.
(c) Procedures to verify that moneys have been used for the purposes  for which they
were prescribed.
(d) Data collection, reporting and other accountability mechanisms.
(4) To be eligible to receive a child care subsidy under this section, an individual must:
(a) Have custody or control of a child who needs child care services;
(b) Be an employee or designee of an employer that  commits to contribute to a child care
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4312
SB 1097
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
subsidy, as specified in the agreement under subsection (3) of this section;
(c) Be capable of paying any percentage of the cost of child care services for which an
individual may be responsible as determined under subsection (3) of this 2025 Act;
(d) Be from a  household with income that does not exceed 300 percent of the federal
poverty guidelines; and
(e) Reside in Crook County, Deschutes County, Jefferson County or the territory  of the
Confederated Tribes of Warm Springs.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Tri-Share Child Care Subsidy Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. The Tri-Share  Child Care Subsidy
Fund consists of moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or transferred to  the fund by the
Legislative Assembly or otherwise.
(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, moneys in the  fund are continuously appro-
priated to the Department of Early Learning  and Care to distribute to a nongovernmental
organization pursuant to an agreement entered into under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(3) Moneys in the Tri-Share Child Care Subsidy  Fund may not be distributed to a non-
governmental organization under subsection (2) of this section unless philanthropic organ-
izations have donated at least $2 million to the fund for  purposes of carrying out section 1
of this 2025 Act.
(4) No more  than 12 percent of the moneys deposited in the Tri-Share Child Care Subsidy
Fund may be used for administrative costs incurred under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 are repealed on January 2, 2027.
(2) Any moneys remaining in the Tri-Share Child Care  Subsidy Fund on January 2, 2027,
that are unexpended, unobligated and not subject to any conditions  shall revert to the Gen-
eral Fund.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Early Learning  and Care, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000,  for deposit in the Tri-Share Child Care
Subsidy Fund to carry out section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]