Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 291.349 is amended to read:
291.349. (1) As soon as practicable after adjournment sine die of the odd-numbered  year regular
session of the Legislative Assembly, the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services shall report
to the Legislative Revenue Officer and the Legislative Fiscal Officer the estimate as of  July 1 of the
first year of the biennium of General Fund and State Lottery  Fund revenues that will be received
by the state during  that biennium. The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall base its
estimate on the  last forecast given to the Legislative Assembly before adjournment sine die of the
odd-numbered year regular session on which the printed, adopted budget prepared in  the Oregon
Department of  Administrative Services is based, adjusted only insofar as necessary to reflect
changes in laws adopted at that session. The report  shall contain the estimated revenues from cor-
porate income and excise taxes separately from the estimated revenues from other General  Fund
sources.  The  Oregon Department of Administrative Services may revise the estimate if necessary
following adjournment sine die of a special session or an  even-numbered year regular session of the
Legislative Assembly, but any revision does not affect the basis  of the computation described in
subsection (3) or (4) of this section.
(2) As soon as practicable after the end of  the biennium, the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services shall report to the Legislative Revenue Officer and  the Legislative Fiscal Officer,
or the Legislative Assembly if it is in session, the amount of General Fund  revenues collected as
of the last June 30 of the preceding biennium. The report shall contain  the collections from corpo-
rate income and excise taxes separately from collections from other sources.
(3) If the  revenues received from the corporate income and excise taxes during the biennium
exceed the amounts estimated to be received from such  taxes for the biennium, as estimated after
adjournment sine die of  the odd-numbered year regular session, by two percent or more, the total
amount of that excess shall be retained in the General Fund and used, in the manner described in
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1634
SB 399
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ORS 291.345, to provide additional funding for public education, kindergarten through grade 12.
(4) If the revenues received from General Fund revenue  sources, exclusive of those described in
subsection (3) of this section, during the biennium exceed the  amounts estimated to be received from
such sources for the biennium, as  estimated after adjournment sine die of the odd-numbered year
regular session, by two percent or  more, there shall be [ credited] refunded to personal income tax-
payers an amount equal to the total amount of that excess, reduced by the cost certified  by the
Department of Revenue under ORS 291.351  as being allocable to [ credits] refunds described under
this subsection. The excess amount to be [ credited shall be credited ] refunded shall be paid to per-
sonal income taxpayers in a percentage amount  of prior year personal income tax liability as de-
termined under subsection (5) of this section.
(5)(a) If there is an  excess to be [ credited under subsection (4) of ] refunded under this section,
on or before [ November 1 ] September 15 , following the end of each biennium, the Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services shall determine and certify to  the Department of Revenue the per-
centage amounts of [ credit for purposes of subsection  (4) ] refund payment for purposes  of this
section. The percentage amounts determined shall be  percentage amounts to the nearest one-tenth
of a percent that will distribute the excess to be [ credited] refunded to personal income taxpayers.
(b) The percentage amount applicable  to subsection (4) of this section shall equal the amount
distributed under subsection (4) of  this section divided by the estimated total personal income tax
liability for all personal income taxpayers for tax years beginning in the  calendar year immediately
preceding the calendar year in which the excess is determined.
(c) The amount of the surplus [ credit under subsection (4) of ] refund under this section is  de-
termined by multiplying the percentage amount determined under paragraph (b) of this subsection
by the total amount of a personal income taxpayer’s tax liability for the tax year beginning  in the
calendar year immediately preceding the calendar year in which the excess is determined in order
to calculate the amount to be [ credited] refunded to the taxpayer.
(d) The [ credit] refund shall be determined based on the tax liability as shown on the  return of
the taxpayer or as corrected by the Department of Revenue.
[(e) The credit shall be computed after the allowance of a credit provided under ORS 316.082,
316.131 or  316.292, but before the allowance of any other credit or offset against tax liability allowed
or allowable under any provision of law  of this state, and before the application of estimated tax pay-
ments, withholding or other advance tax payments. ]
[(f) For personal income taxpayers, if a credit applied against tax liability as described in para-
graph (e) of this subsection reduces tax liability to zero and an amount of  the credit remains unused,
the remaining unused amount shall be refunded to the taxpayer. For purposes of ORS chapters 305,
314, 315 and 316, refunds issued under this paragraph are refunds  of an overpayment of tax imposed
under ORS chapter 316. ]
[(g) The Department of Revenue may prescribe by rule the  manner of calculating and claiming a
credit if the filing status of a taxpayer changes between the tax year for which a credit may be  claimed
and the succeeding tax year. ]
(6) A refund may not be made under this section to a  taxpayer if the amount of the refund is
less than $1.
[(7) Not later than November 15 following the end of the biennium, the  Department of Revenue
shall provide information and guidance to taxpayers relating to the calculation  of the credit. The de-
partment may make the information and guidance available electronically or otherwise. ]
[(8) The Department of Revenue may adopt rules  specifying the manner for issuing refunds under
[2]
SB 399
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
this section to taxpayers who filed returns for the tax year  on which the credit is computed but who
are not required to file returns for the year in which the credit could be claimed. ]
(7)(a) The refund described under this section shall be mailed by the Department of Re-
venue to personal income taxpayers eligible for the payment on  or before December 15 fol-
lowing the end of the biennium  for which the payment described under this subsection is
being made.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the department shall mail the  re-
fund at the earliest date of practicable convenience in the case of a return that is first filed
on or after August 15 after the end of the biennium.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 291.351 is amended to read:
291.351. If, based on the report made under ORS 291.349 (2),  an amount will be [ credited] re-
funded to personal income taxpayers  under ORS 291.349  (4), the Department of Revenue shall
certify the costs that are incurred in calculating  and [ administering the credits ] providing the re-
fund checks under ORS 291.349 (4). The  amount of the costs certified by the department under this
section may not exceed  $250,000. Costs shall be certified by the department within 15 days of the
date the report under ORS 291.349  (2) is made. As used in this section, “costs” means and is limited
to those costs  that, absent the requirement of providing [ credits] refunds under ORS 291.349 (4),
would not be incurred by the department.
SECTION 3. (1) The amendments to ORS 291.349 and  291.351 by sections 1 and 2 of this
2025 Act apply to surplus revenue refunds issued for biennia beginning on or after  July 1,
2025.
(2) ORS 305.792 applies to surplus revenue refunds issued for  biennia ending on or before
June 30, 2025.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]