Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 414.611 is amended to read:
414.611. (1) Unless doing so diminishes patient care,  the Oregon Health Authority [ may] shall
approve the transfer of  500 or more members from one coordinated care organization  or dental care
organization to  another coordinated care organization  or dental care organization  if the transfer
meets all of the following conditions :
(a) The members’ provider has contracted  with the receiving organization and has stopped ac-
cepting patients from or has terminated providing services to members of  the transferring
organization[ ; and].
(b) Members are offered the choice of remaining members of the transferring  organization.  The
members’ provider may communicate  directly or indirectly with members to inform the
members about the members’ options for continuing under the care of the provider.
(c) The transfer of  members from one dental care organization to another dental care
organization does not entail a  transfer of the members from one coordinated care organiza-
tion to another coordinated care organization.
(2) Members may not be transferred under this section until the authority  has evaluated the
receiving organization and determined that the organization meets criteria established by  the au-
thority by rule, including but not limited to criteria that ensure that  the organization meets the
requirements of ORS 414.609 (1).
(3) The authority shall  provide notice of a transfer under this section to members that will be
affected by the transfer at least 90 days before the scheduled date of the transfer.
(4)(a) The authority may not approve the transfer of members under this section if:
(A) The transfer results from the termination of a  provider’s contract with a coordinated care
organization for just cause; and
(B) The coordinated care organization has  notified the authority that the provider’s contract
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4753
HB 3923
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
was terminated for just cause.
(b) A provider is entitled to a contested case hearing in accordance with ORS chapter 183, on
an expedited basis, to dispute the denial of a transfer of members under this subsection.
(c) As used in this subsection, “just cause” means that the contract was  terminated for reasons
related to quality  of care, competency, fraud or other similar reasons prescribed by the authority
by rule.
(5) The provider and the organization shall be the parties to any contested case proceeding  to
determine whether the provider’s  contract was terminated for just cause. The authority may award
attorney fees and costs to the  party prevailing in the proceeding, applying the factors in ORS 20.075.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]