Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 458.
SECTION 2. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall disburse moneys
to Community LendingWorks to provide grants to public benefit corporations to:
(a) Acquire affordable housing owned by the Housing Authority of Clackamas County;
(b) Repair and renovate the housing for energy efficiency and to make the housing eligi-
ble for refinancing;
(c) Operate the housing as a community land trust, which  must include maintaining each
housing unit as affordable housing for purchase as described in subsection  (2) of this section;
and
(d) Provide home buyer education and  counseling to purchasers and prospective pur-
chasers of the housing.
(2) Each housing unit sold must be made available only to first-time home buyers  and
subject to an affordability restriction, such as a  restriction as described in ORS 456.270 to
456.295, that:
(a) Has the effect of limiting the purchaser’s ability to gain  equity from the appreciation
of the dwelling’s value; and
(b) Requires that the purchaser be a low income household as defined in ORS 456.270.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $4,200,000, to disburse to Community
LendingWorks for the purposes in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2569