Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 14 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Account” means a cohort account or a designated beneficiary account.
(2) “Cash” means money in physical or electronic forms.
(3) “Cohort account”  means an account within the Oregon Bright Futures Fund that
corresponds to a calendar quarter, as described in section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(4) “Designated beneficiary” means the individual for whom qualified  withdrawals may
be made from a designated beneficiary account  for the payment of qualified post-secondary
education expenses.
(5) “Designated beneficiary  account” means an account held by the Department of Con-
sumer and Business Services at a participating financial institution for  the benefit of a spe-
cific individual about whom the department  receives information under section 3 of this 2017
Act.
(6) “Financial institution” means a bank, a commercial bank,  a national bank, a savings
bank, a savings and loan, a thrift institution, a credit  union, an insurance company, a trust
company, a mutual fund, an investment firm or other similar entity  authorized to do busi-
ness in this state.
(7) “Internal Revenue Code” means the federal  Internal Revenue Code, as amended and
in effect on December 31, 2016.
(8) “Participating financial institution” means a financial institution that enters into an
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1141
SB 996
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
agreement with the  Department of Consumer and Business Services under section 5 of this
2017 Act.
(9) “Post-secondary education institution” means:
(a) A public university;
(b) A community college;
(c) Oregon Health and Science University;
(d) A  career school licensed under ORS 345.010 to 345.450 or a similar law in another
state;
(e) A private post-secondary  institution authorized to confer academic degrees under
ORS 348.594 to 348.615 or a similar law in another state; and
(f) A private post-secondary  institution that meets the criteria set forth in ORS 348.597
(2).
(10) “Qualified post-secondary education expenses” means:
(a) Expenses incurred in the acquisition of post-secondary education or job  training at a
post-secondary education institution, including but not limited to  tuition, extracurricular
nontuition expenses designed to prepare a designated beneficiary for post-secondary educa-
tion or job training; and
(b) Expenses constituting qualified higher education expenses under section 529(e) of the
Internal Revenue Code.
(11) “Qualified withdrawal” means a withdrawal made from an  account to pay the quali-
fied post-secondary education expenses of a designated  beneficiary as prescribed in section
14 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Bright Futures Fund is established in  the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon Bright Futures
Fund shall be credited to  the fund. All moneys credited to the Oregon Bright Futures Fund
are continuously appropriated to the Department of Consumer and Business Services for the
purposes specified in sections 1 to 14 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The department shall create a cohort account  within the Oregon Bright Futures Fund
for each calendar quarter.
(3) The Oregon Bright Futures Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly for deposit in the fund;
(b) Moneys transferred to the  fund from the federal government or any public body as
defined in ORS 174.109;
(c) Any gifts,  contributions or donations made to the State of Oregon for deposit in the
fund; and
(d) Earnings on moneys in the fund.
(4) The department may use the moneys in  the Oregon Bright Futures Fund to make
qualified withdrawals for post-secondary education expenses  of a designated beneficiary, to
pay the administrative  costs and expenses of the department related to the administration
of accounts under sections 1 to 14 of  this 2017 Act, to provide or make available scholarships,
grants and other incentives to designated beneficiaries or to further any other purpose of
sections 1 to 14 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) For each child born in Oregon to  residents of this state, the State
Registrar of the  Center for Health Statistics shall, on a quarterly basis, send or deliver by
secure electronic or other reasonable means to the Department of  Consumer and Business
[2]
SB 996
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Services a data file containing  the names of the child and of the parents of the child, the
county of the child’s birth and the mother’s mailing address for the purpose  of implementing
section 4 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The state registrar and the department shall  enter into an agreement to implement
the provisions of  this section. The agreement must include provisions governing the transfer,
storage and destruction of data files.
SECTION 4. (1) Within 120 days after  receiving information about the birth of a child
from the State Registrar of  the Center for Health Statistics under section 3 of this 2017 Act,
the Department of Consumer and Business Services  shall, using the name of the child, the
county of the child’s birth  and a unique identifier, establish a designated beneficiary account
at a participating financial institution for the benefit of the child.
(2) The  department shall notify the parents of the child whose birth information was re-
ceived that  the designated beneficiary account was established. Notice must be sent to the
mother’s mailing address as received from the state  registrar and must include, at a mini-
mum, the following information:
(a) The unique identifier assigned to the designated beneficiary account;
(b) The purpose of the designated beneficiary account;
(c) Any  actions the parents may take to participate in the post-secondary education
savings provisions of sections 1 to 14 of this 2017 Act; and
(d) How,  when and for what purposes the department may make qualified withdrawals
from the designated beneficiary account.
(3) If a parent was an Oregon resident at the time of  the birth of a child of the parent
and the child was born outside of Oregon, the parent may apply to the department to es-
tablish a designated beneficiary account under  this section, provided that the parent is an
Oregon resident at the time of application.
(4) The department shall, upon determining  that a child for whom a designated benefici-
ary account has not been established under this section has been lawfully adopted,  establish
a designated beneficiary account and send notice as provided in this section  to the adoptive
parents.
SECTION 5.
A financial institution may become a participating financial institution  by
entering into  an agreement with the Department of Consumer and Business Services that,
at a minimum:
(1) Provides a  method for the department to open designated beneficiary accounts with
the financial institution according to terms and conditions specified by the department; and
(2) Requires the financial institution  to advertise the program established under sections
1 to 14 of this 2017 Act using marketing materials developed by the department.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law that requires consideration of
one or more financial circumstances of an individual for the purpose of determining the  el-
igibility to receive, or the amount of, any assistance  or benefit authorized by law to be pro-
vided to or for the benefit of the individual, any amount in a  designated beneficiary account
established under sections 1 to 14 of this 2017 Act for the benefit of the  individual, including
earnings on the  account, any contributions to the account and any qualified withdrawal, shall
be disregarded for such purpose.
SECTION 7. Upon the establishment  of a designated beneficiary account under section 4
of this 2017 Act, the Department of Consumer and Business Services, out of the  cohort ac-
[3]
SB 996
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
count in the Oregon Bright Futures  Fund established by section 2 of this 2017 Act corre-
sponding to the calendar quarter in which the designated beneficiary was born, shall  deposit
the amount of $  in the designated beneficiary account.
SECTION 8. The Department of  Consumer and Business Services has the following pow-
ers, duties and functions:
(1) To establish, develop, implement and maintain cohort accounts and designated bene-
ficiary accounts.
(2) To adopt rules for the general administration of sections 1 to 14 of this 2017 Act.
(3) To make and enter into any and all contracts, agreements or arrangements,  and to
retain, employ and contract for the services of private and  public financial institutions, de-
positories, consultants, investment  advisors or managers and third-party plan administrators
and for  research, technical and other services necessary or desirable for carrying out the
purposes of sections 1 to 14 of this 2017 Act.
(4) To accept donations or receive funds into a cohort  account for purposes of providing
scholarships, grants and other incentives to designated beneficiaries or furthering any of  the
purposes of sections 1 to 14 of this 2017 Act.
(5) To award scholarships or grants, provide or make available other incentives to  des-
ignated beneficiaries or enter  into promotional arrangements with third parties as the de-
partment considers desirable.
SECTION 9.
Moneys deposited into accounts  under sections 1 to 14 of this 2017 Act are
considered moneys of the State of Oregon. Except as otherwise provided  by law, the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services is the trustee of the moneys and earnings.
SECTION 10. (1) The Department of Consumer and Business Services  may accept con-
tributions of money  to the Oregon Bright Futures Fund or a cohort account or designated
beneficiary account once an account is established. The department  shall adopt rules de-
scribing persons who may contribute, methods by which  contributions may be made and any
conditions that may apply to the crediting of contributions to accounts.
(2) Money contributed to a cohort account or designated beneficiary  account is subject
to the provisions of sections 1 to 14 of this 2017 Act.
(3) Contributions to an account may be made only in cash.
(4) Total contributions to a designated beneficiary account  may not exceed amounts
reasonably necessary to provide for the  qualified post-secondary education expenses of the
designated beneficiary. The department shall establish maximum  contribution limits appli-
cable to designated beneficiary accounts and may  require the provision of any information
from a designated beneficiary  that the department considers necessary to establish such
limits.
(5) The department shall maintain separate records and  accountings for each cohort ac-
count and designated beneficiary account, and make reports at least annually to  designated
beneficiaries.
(6) If the department determines that moneys in a designated  beneficiary account will
not be or are highly unlikely to be used to pay qualified  post-secondary education expenses,
the department shall terminate the designated  beneficiary account and credit any amount in
the designated beneficiary account to the appropriate cohort account.
(7) The department shall allow information regarding amounts held in designated  benefi-
ciary accounts to be electronically  linked using financial aggregation software to financial
[4]
SB 996
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
accounts held at  financial institutions, to accounts established under the Oregon 529 Savings
Network or to other accounts, entities, persons or locations as specified by the department
by rule.
SECTION 11.
(1) The Department of Consumer and Business  Services and the State of
Oregon may not insure any account or guarantee any rate of return or any interest  rate on
any moneys in an account.
(2) The department and the State of Oregon are not  liable for any loss incurred by any
person as a result of having  a designated beneficiary account established for the person’s
benefit or as a result of contributing to an account.
SECTION 12. (1) Moneys in an account, including any interest, may not be  assigned or
pledged or otherwise used to secure or obtain a loan or other advancement.
(2) The right of  a designated beneficiary to the payment of qualified post-secondary edu-
cation expenses, or to payments and withdrawals made in  exercise of that right, and to
moneys or property held within an account is exempt from  garnishment and is not subject
to execution, attachment or any other  process or to the operation of any bankruptcy or
insolvency law.
(3) A  refund of a qualified withdrawal may not be paid by a post-secondary education in-
stitution directly to the designated beneficiary. Any refund owed by a post-secondary educa-
tion institution on account of  an overpayment made or reimbursed from a qualified
withdrawal must be refunded to  the Department of Consumer and Business Services for de-
posit in the appropriate designated beneficiary account.
SECTION 13.
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of  this section, information relating to desig-
nated beneficiary accounts, including but not limited to names, addresses, telephone num-
bers, balances, amounts contributed and earnings  on amounts contributed and the unique
identifier assigned by the Department  of Consumer and Business Services, is confidential and
may not be disclosed.
(2) Information relating to designated beneficiary accounts may be disclosed:
(a) In the aggregate, such that  the disclosed information cannot be used to identify,
contact or locate any single individual;
(b) To the extent necessary to administer sections 1 to 14 of this 2017 Act; or
(c) If the person to whom  the information relates expressly agrees in writing that the
information may be disclosed.
SECTION 14.
(1) The Department of Consumer and Business Services may withdraw
moneys from an account in the Oregon Bright Futures Fund for the payment  of qualified
post-secondary education expenses only in the manner prescribed by the department by rule.
(2) The  department shall notify a designated beneficiary of any withdrawal from the
designated beneficiary account held for the designated beneficiary.
SECTION 15. (1) The Financial  Institution Community Education Fund is established in
the State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the
Financial Institution Community Education Fund shall be credited to the fund. All  moneys
credited to the Financial Institution Community Education Fund are  continuously appropri-
ated to the Department of Consumer and Business Services for any purpose for which  mon-
eys in the Oregon Bright Futures Fund established under section 2 of this 2017 Act may  be
used.
(2) The Financial Institution Community Education Fund shall consist of:
[5]
SB 996
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Contributions or  donations made by participating financial institutions for deposit in
the fund; and
(b) Earnings on moneys in the fund.
(3) The department may accept contributions to the fund from  participating financial
institutions, as defined in section 1 of this 2017 Act. The department may not  accept contri-
butions to the fund from any other source.
SECTION 16.
(1) The Department of Consumer and  Business Services shall report the
department’s findings and recommendations regarding the implementation of sections 1 to
14 of this 2017 Act to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to educa-
tion, in the manner provided  by ORS 192.245, no later than September 15, 2018, and may in-
clude recommendations for legislation.
(2) In addition to the report required under subsection (1) of  this section, the department
shall report its findings and recommendations regarding the implementation of sections  1 to
14 of this 2017 Act to the Legislative Assembly in the manner  provided by ORS 192.245 no
later than April 1, 2019, and may include recommendations for legislation.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 295.101 is amended to read:
295.101. (1) The following public funds are not subject to the  provisions of ORS 295.001 to
295.108:
(a) Funds that are deposited for the purpose of paying principal, interest  or premium, if any, on
bonds, as defined in  ORS 286A.001 and 287A.001, and related costs or securing a borrowing related
to an agreement for exchange of interest rates entered into under ORS 286A.110 or 287A.335.
(b) Funds that are invested in authorized investments under  provisions of law other than ORS
295.001 to 295.108. Funds invested under  ORS 293.701 to 293.857 are invested in authorized invest-
ments for purposes of this subsection from the time the funds are transferred  by the State Treasurer
to a third party under the terms of a contract for investment or  administration of the funds that
requires such a transfer until the time the funds are returned  to the treasurer or paid to another
party under the terms of the contract.
(c) Negotiable certificates  of deposit purchased by the State Treasurer under ORS 293.736 or
by an investment manager under ORS 293.741.
(d) Funds that are held by a public official and  are required by federal law or contractual pro-
visions to be collateralized at 100 percent, if the funds are deposited in an account that  is separate
from other accounts of the public official in a depository, and the public official and the  depository
have entered into a  written agreement that provides a perfected security interest to the public of-
ficial in collateral valued at an amount  at least equal to the amount of funds in the account in a
manner substantially similar to a pledge agreement described in ORS 295.001 (15).
(e) Funds that are maintained by the Department of  Consumer and Business Services
under sections 1 to 14 of this 2017 Act.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1)  of this section, funds deposited by a custodial officer under
ORS 294.035 (3)(d) are subject to the provisions of ORS 295.001 to 295.108.
SECTION 18. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2017, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $_______, for deposit in the Oregon
Bright Futures Fund established under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 19. (1) Sections 1 to 14  of this 2017 Act and the amendments to ORS 295.101
by section 17 of this 2017 Act become operative on January 1, 2018.
[6]
SB 996
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
(2) The State Registrar of the Center for Health Statistics  and the Department of Con-
sumer and Business Services may take any action  before the operative date specified in
subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the  state registrar or department
to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1)  of this section, all the
duties, functions and  powers conferred on the state registrar or department by sections 1
to 14 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 20. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[7]