Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department of Energy and Department of Land Conservation
and Development shall convene a work group to examine renewable energy and transmission
project siting in this state.
(2) The work group membership must include:
(a) One Representative appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;
(b) One Senator appointed by the President of the Senate;
(c) One representative from the State Department of Agriculture;
(d) One representative from the State Forestry Department;
(e) One representative from the Department of State Lands;
(f) The State Historic Preservation Officer or the officer’s designee;
(g) One representative from the State Department of Fish and Wildlife;
(h) One member of the Land Conservation and Development Commission;
(i) One member of the Energy Facility Siting Council; and
(j) Individuals who represent:
(A) Renewable energy developers;
(B) Transmission providers in this state;
(C) Regional planning entities;
(D) Electric utilities, as defined in ORS 757.600;
(E) Cities and counties  located in geographical areas with high renewable energy and
transmission infrastructure development or potential;
(F) Tribal governments;
(G) The renewable energy workforce;
(H) Environmental justice communities;
(I) Natural and working lands;
(J) Oregon fisheries;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1897
HB 3181
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(K) Organizations with expertise in conservation and habitat restoration or preservation
of land and marine environments;
(L) Entities with expertise in land use;
(M) Entities with expertise in climate; and
(N) Entities with expertise in energy or ratepayer issues.
(3) The work group shall address:
(a) The current state and local regulatory framework for renewable energy and trans-
mission development;
(b) Barriers in the current  state and local regulatory framework to renewable energy and
transmission development and to meeting Oregon’s energy goals;
(c) Issues and opportunities in the current regulatory framework for:
(A) Tribal consultation and the preservation of historic and cultural and natural re-
sources;
(B) Environmental justice communities, including  rural and coastal communities, im-
pacted by renewable energy and transmission development;
(C) The preservation and productivity of natural and working lands and fisheries;
(D) Habitat and wildlife corridor preservation and restoration;
(E) Reducing conflict associated with renewable energy and  transmission project siting
in this state;
(F) Encouraging development  of renewable energy and transmission projects in this
state;
(G) Increasing resilience from the development of renewable  energy and transmission
projects in this state; and
(H) Increasing benefit through renewable energy development for:
(i) Tribal governments and treaty rights;
(ii) Environmental justice communities, including rural and coastal communities;
(iii) Natural and working lands and fisheries;
(iv) Habitat preservation and restoration; and
(v) Historic and cultural resources;
(d) Recommendations for changes to the current regulatory  framework that can help to
reduce conflict, mitigate challenges and maximize opportunities for:
(A) Project development to meet Oregon’s energy goals;
(B) Tribal governments;
(C) Environmental justice communities;
(D) Natural and working lands and fisheries; and
(E) Habitat and wildlife corridor preservation and restoration;
(e) The amount of generation that is needed to meet Oregon’s energy goals;
(f) The  aggregate amount of land and marine areas that may be needed in order to site
sufficient renewable energy and transmission resources in this state to  help meet Oregon’s
energy goals; and
(g) Incentives for renewable energy and transmission development.
(4) Upon request from the State Department  of Energy and Department of Land Con-
servation and Development,  members of the work group shall provide data related to the
areas of study listed under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The work group may meet by phone or video conference or  in person. Meetings that
[2]
HB 3181
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
are held in person shall be held in different regions of the state.
(6) The  State Department of Energy and Department of Land Conservation and Devel-
opment shall submit a report on the  work group’s findings and recommendations in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to energy no later than  September
15, 2024.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 3. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Energy for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $_______,  for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of
section 1 of this 2023 Act.
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to the
Department of Land Conservation and Development for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023,
out of the General Fund, the  amount of $_______, for the purpose of carrying out the pro-
visions of section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]