Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
LICENSE FEES FOR ANIMAL RESCUE ENTITIES
SECTION 1.
The State Department of Agriculture shall charge the following for a  license
or license renewal for an animal rescue entity, as defined in ORS 609.415, that is:
(1) An animal control agency, animal shelter  or humane society, a fee of $600, adjusted
annually for inflation for every year after 2026 to account for changes  in the Consumer Price
Index for All  Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as published by the Bureau of La-
bor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(2) An animal sanctuary, a fee of $400, adjusted  annually for inflation for every year after
2026 to account for changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers,  West
Region (All Items).
(3) Not described in subsection (1) or (2) of this section, a fee of  $350, adjusted annually
for inflation for  every year after 2026 to account for changes in the Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items).
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
LICENSING PROGRAM FOR ANIMAL BREEDERS
SECTION 3. (1) As used in this section and ORS 609.420:
(a) “Breeder” means a person that breeds, raises and sells as pets:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1807
SB 1076
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Birds, other than livestock or exotic animals.
(B) Cats.
(C) Dogs.
(D) Small mammals, other than exotic animals.
(b) “Cat” means a member of the species Felis catus or a hybrid of that species.
(c) “Dog” means a member of the subspecies Canis lupus familiaris or a hybrid  of that
subspecies.
(d) “Exotic animal” has the meaning given that term in ORS 609.305.
(e) “Livestock” has the meaning given that term in ORS 609.125.
(2) The State Department of Agriculture shall adopt  rules to establish the following for
breeders:
(a) A licensing program.
(b) Licensing requirements.
(c) Standards of care.
(d) Fees for licenses and license renewals, adjusted annually for inflation for every  year
after 2026 to account for changes in the Consumer Price  Index for All Urban Consumers,
West Region (All Items), as  published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States
Department of Labor.
(3) In adopting the rules, the department:
(a) Shall consider relevant factors, including the sizes of breeders and the costs of regu-
lation and enforcement related to breeders.
(b) Shall consider whether the fees are proportional to department funding needs  for
staff, including the potential need to hire a veterinarian.
(c) May set fees for licenses and license renewals that differ based on the sizes  of
breeders.
(4) Rules adopted under this section that  apply to breeders that breed dogs shall apply
in addition to, and not in lieu of, any  applicable requirements under ORS 167.374 and 167.376.
SECTION 4.
(1) Section 3 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
(2) Notwithstanding the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, the
State Department of Agriculture:
(a) Shall adopt the rules described in section 3 of this  2025 Act on or before June 30, 2026.
(b) May not enforce the provisions of section 3 of this 2025 Act before January 1, 2028.
(c) May take any action before the operative date specified in subsection  (1) of this sec-
tion that is necessary for the department to exercise, on and after the operative  date speci-
fied in subsection (1) of this section,  all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the
department by section 3 of this 2025 Act.
INVESTIGATION AND INSPECTION
SECTION 5.
 ORS 609.420 is amended to read:
609.420. (1) Whenever an authorized representative of [ an enforcing agency ] the State  Depart-
ment of Agriculture  is advised or has reason to believe that an animal rescue entity  or a breeder
is operating without a license,  the authorized representative may visit and conduct an on-site in-
vestigation of the premises of the animal rescue entity  or breeder . The purpose of  an investigation
under this section is to determine whether the animal rescue entity  or breeder  is  [ subject to ] in
[2]
SB 1076
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
compliance with the requirements of ORS 609.415  or rules adopted under section 3  of this 2025
Act.
(2) At any reasonable time,  an authorized representative of [ an enforcing agency ] the depart-
ment, a law enforcement agency or  the United States Department of Agriculture may conduct an
on-site investigation of the premises  of any licensed animal rescue entity  or breeder  to determine
whether the [ entity] animal rescue entity or  breeder is in compliance with ORS 609.415  or rules
adopted under section 3 of this 2025 Act .
(3) An authorized representative of the [ enforcing agency ] department  or  a law enforcement
agency shall conduct an  on-site investigation of the premises of any licensed animal rescue entity
or breeder  if the  authorized representative or law enforcement  agency receives  a complaint
about the animal rescue entity  or breeder related to [ the] a failure  to comply with the requirements
of ORS 609.415 that the  authorized representative or law enforcement  agency determines  is
credible and serious. The investigation [ by the agency ] shall be limited to determining if the animal
rescue entity  or breeder  has failed  to comply with the requirements of ORS 609.415  or rules
adopted under section 3 of this 2025 Act .
(4) Any state agency that receives a complaint  about a licensed animal rescue entity  or breeder
shall notify the [ enforcing agency ] department about the complaint and any subsequent action taken
by the state agency based on that complaint.
(5) A licensed animal rescue entity  or breeder  shall permit an authorized representative of  the
[enforcing agency ] department to inspect records of  the animal rescue entity  or breeder  and shall
furnish any reports and information required by the [ enforcing agency ] department.
(6) If, during the course of an inspection made under  this section, the [ enforcing agency ] de-
partment finds evidence of animal cruelty in violation  of ORS 167.310 to 167.351, 167.352, 167.355
or 167.360 to 167.372, the [ enforcing agency ] department shall seize the evidence and report the vi-
olation to law enforcement. Evidence of animal cruelty found through  a valid inspection under this
section shall be presumed admissible in any subsequent criminal proceeding.
SECTION 6.
The amendments to ORS 609.420 by section 5  of this 2025 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2028.
PENALTIES
SECTION 7.  ORS 609.992 is amended to read:
609.992. (1) Violation of ORS 609.341  or a rule adopted under section 3 of this 2025 Act  is a
Class B misdemeanor.
(2) In addition to  and not in lieu of any jail sentence or fine it may impose, a court may require
a defendant convicted under ORS 609.341 or a rule adopted under section 3 of this 2025 Act  to
forfeit any rights of the defendant in any exotic animal  or other animal  kept in violation thereof
and to  repay reasonable costs incurred by any person, city, county or state agency in caring for the
exotic animal or other  animal prior to judgment.
(3) When the court orders the defendant’s rights  in the exotic animal  or other animal  to be
forfeited, the court may further order that those  rights be given over to an appropriate person or
agency demonstrating a willingness to accept and care for the  exotic animal or  other  animal or
to the county or an appropriate animal care agency for  further disposition in accordance with ac-
cepted  practices  for humane treatment of animals. This subsection shall not constitute or authorize
any limitation upon the right  of the person or agency to whom rights are granted to resell or oth-
[3]
SB 1076
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
erwise make disposition of the  exotic animal or other  animal. A transfer of rights under this sub-
section constitutes a transfer of ownership.
SECTION 8.
The amendments to ORS 609.992  by section 7 of this 2025 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2028.
APPROPRIATION
SECTION 9. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2025, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $_______ to be expended for the purposes of:
(a) Carrying out the provisions of section 3 of this 2025 Act.
(b) Conducting education and outreach related to  implementing section 3 of this 2025 Act.
(c) Paying any legal fees or costs related to implementing section 3 of this 2025 Act.
(2) This appropriation is available continuously until  expended for the purposes specified
in this section.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 10.
The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 11. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]