Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
INVESTMENT, RENOVATION AND JOB CREATION TAX CREDIT
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 315.
SECTION 2. (1) A credit is allowed against the taxes otherwise due  under ORS chapter
316 or, if the taxpayer is a corporation, under ORS chapter 317  or 318, for expanding or lo-
cating a qualified facility that is certified under sections 4 to 12 of this 2023 Act.
(2) Except as  provided in subsection (3) of this section, the amount of the credit allowed
shall be the least of:
(a) Ten percent of the amount the taxpayer has made in total qualifying investment in
the qualified facility;
(b) $20,000 for each net new full-time employment position filled by the taxpayer that has
job duties associated with a qualified facility; or
(c) $30 million, if the qualifying investment made in the first 12 months after preliminary
certification under section 7 of this 2023 Act exceeds $250,000.
(3) If  the qualifying investment is a qualified environmental investment, the amount of
the credit allowed shall be the lesser of:
(a) Twenty percent of the amount the taxpayer has made in total qualifying  investment
in the qualified facility;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1175
HB 3253
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) $25,000 for each net new full-time employment position filled by the taxpayer that has
job duties associated with a qualified facility; or
(c) $50 million, if the qualifying investment made in the first 12 months after preliminary
certification under section 7 of this 2023 Act exceeds $250,000.
(4) Only capital investments in a qualified facility that are made not more than 36 months
prior to  the submission by the taxpayer of an application for preliminary certification are
included in the computation of the credit.
(5) The credit shall be claimed over five  consecutive tax years, with the amount allowed
in each of  the five tax years not exceeding the lesser of 20 percent of the total or the tax
liability of the taxpayer.
(6) In order for a tax credit to be allowable under this section:
(a) The qualified facility must be located in Oregon.
(b) At least 51 percent of the net new full-time employment positions with job duties  as-
sociated with the qualified facility must  pay a wage that equals or exceeds 125 percent, or
100 percent in the case of a qualified facility in  a rural area, of the median annual wage for
production occupations in this state.
(c) All net new full-time employment  positions must include health insurance coverage
for the  employees for which the taxpayer pays at least 65 percent of the premium or mem-
bership cost.
(d) The qualified facility must have received final certification  from the Director of the
Oregon Business Development Department under sections 4 to 12 of this 2023 Act.
(7) The Department of Revenue may require that  the Oregon Business Development De-
partment provide information about the  final certification issued under section 8 of this 2023
Act, if required by the Department of Revenue as provided in ORS 315.058.
(8) Each taxpayer shall maintain a record of the written certification of the amount  of
the tax credit under this section for  a period of at least five years after the tax year in which
the credit is claimed and provide the written certification to  the Department of Revenue
upon request.
(9) The credit shall be claimed  on a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue that
contains the information required by the department.
(10) Any tax credit otherwise allowable  under this section that is not used by the tax-
payer in a particular tax year may be carried forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax
liability for the next succeeding tax year. Any credit  remaining unused in the next succeed-
ing tax year may be carried forward and  used in the second succeeding tax year, and likewise
any credit  not used in that second succeeding tax year may be carried forward and used in
the third succeeding tax year,  and any credit not used in that third succeeding tax year may
be carried forward and used in the fourth succeeding tax year, but may  not be carried for-
ward for any tax year thereafter.
(11) In the case of a credit allowed under this section:
(a) A nonresident  shall be allowed the credit under this section in the proportion provided
in ORS 316.117.
(b) If  a change in the status of the taxpayer from resident to nonresident or from non-
resident to resident occurs, the credit allowed by this section shall be determined in  a man-
ner consistent with ORS 316.117.
(c) If a change in the tax year of the taxpayer occurs as described in ORS 314.085, or  if
[2]
HB 3253
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the department terminates the taxpayer’s tax year under ORS 314.440,  the credit allowed
under this section shall be prorated or computed in a manner consistent with ORS 314.085.
(12) A person that has earned a tax  credit under this section may transfer the credit to
a taxpayer subject to tax under ORS chapter 316, 317 or 318. The transfer  must comply with
ORS 315.056.
(13) The  Director of the Oregon Business Development Department may order the sus-
pension or revocation of a final certification issued under  section 8 of this 2023 Act, as pro-
vided in ORS 315.061.
(14) The credit  allowed under this section is not in lieu of any depreciation or amorti-
zation deduction for the qualified facility to which  the taxpayer otherwise may be entitled for
purposes of ORS chapter 316, 317 or 318 for such year.
(15) The taxpayer’s adjusted basis for determining gain or loss may not be  decreased by
any tax credits allowed under this section.
(16) The definitions in section 4 of this 2023 Act apply to this section.
SECTION 3.
Sections 4 to 12 of this 2023 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 285C.
SECTION 4. As used in sections 2 and 4 to 12 of this 2023 Act:
(1) “Capital  investment” means an expenditure to acquire, lease or improve land,
buildings, machinery, equipment or fixtures or other property that is used in  operating a
business.
(2) “Environmental benefit” means:
(a) The prevention, control or reduction of air pollution or water pollution;
(b) The prevention,  control or reduction of the generation or storage of solid waste, as
defined in ORS 459.005, or hazardous waste, as defined in ORS 466.005; or
(c) The recycling or environmentally safe disposal of used oil.
(3) “Facility” means a single  parcel, contiguous parcels or parcels that are separated only
by a public thoroughfare or  right-of-way, of owned or leased land in this state, the structures
and personal property contained on the land or any part of the structures occupied by  the
owner.
(4) “Headquarters” means a principal central administrative  office where primary head-
quarters related functions and services  are performed, including financial, personnel, ad-
ministrative, legal, planning and similar business functions.
(5)(a) “Manufacturing” means fabricating, producing or manufacturing raw or  prepared
materials into usable products, imparting new forms, qualities,  properties and combinations.
(b) “Manufacturing” does not include generating electricity.
(6) “Qualified environmental investment”  means the amount of an investment in goods
and services reasonably necessary to produce an environmental benefit.
(7) “Qualified facility” means a facility in this state that devotes at least  80 percent of
the property and payroll at the facility to one or more of the following:
(a) Qualified manufacturing.
(b) Qualified headquarters.
(c) Qualified research.
(d) An environmental benefit.
(8) “Qualified headquarters” means a global, national or  regional headquarters for a
taxpayer that derives at least 65 percent of its  revenue from sales made outside of this state.
[3]
HB 3253
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(9) “Qualified manufacturing” means manufacturing tangible products in this state if at
least 65 percent of the product is at least one of the following:
(a) Directly sold out of state.
(b) Directly sold to one or more qualified facilities.
(10) “Qualified research” has the meaning given that term in  section 41(d) of the Internal
Revenue Code, except that the research must be conducted by a taxpayer involved in manu-
facturing that derives at least 65 percent of its revenue from out-of-state sales.
(11)(a) “Qualifying investment” means  investment in land, buildings, machinery, equip-
ment and fixtures  for expansion of an existing qualified facility or establishment of a new
qualified facility in this state. If the  qualified facility is a build-to-suit facility leased to the
taxpayer, “qualifying investment” includes the costs prescribed in this  paragraph that are
spent by the third-party developer with respect to the qualified facility.
(b) “Qualifying investment” does not include relocating an  existing qualified facility in
this state to another location in this state without additional capital investment  of at least
$250,000.
(12) “Rural area” has the meaning given that term in ORS 285C.350.
SECTION 5.
For a qualified facility, the total amount of potential tax credit  that receives
a preliminary certification from  the Director of the Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment may not exceed $30 million.
SECTION 6. (1) Prior to the placement in service of a qualified facility, any person may
apply to the Oregon Business Development Department  for preliminary certification under
section 7 of this 2023 Act if:
(a) The qualified  facility complies with the standards adopted by the Director of the
Oregon Business Development Department; and
(b) The applicant will be the  owner, contract purchaser or lessee of the qualified facility
at the time of placement in service of the qualified facility.
(2) An application for preliminary certification shall be made in writing on a  form pre-
pared by the department and shall contain:
(a) The applicant’s name, address, telephone  number and federal taxpayer identification
number or numbers.
(b) The name, address, telephone number and e-mail address of a contact person for  the
applicant.
(c) The address of the site where the qualified facility will be located.
(d) A detailed description of the qualified facility and fixed capital assets.
(e) An estimate of the capital investment and number of employment positions with job
duties associated with the qualified facility, including:
(A) A schedule of qualifying investments.
(B) A list  of full-time employment positions, the estimated number of employees to be
hired for the positions each year during the first five years of  operation and the annual
wages for each position, calculated without employee-related benefits.
(f) Other information as required by the department to determine eligibility for the  in-
come tax credits and the amount of income tax credits, as prescribed by this section.
(g) An affirmation, signed by an  authorized executive representing the applicant, that the
applicant:
(A) Agrees to furnish records of expenditures for qualifying investments to the  depart-
[4]
HB 3253
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ment on request.
(B) Will continue in business at  the qualified facility for five full calendar years after
final certification for the credit, other than for reasons beyond the control of the applicant.
(C) Agrees to furnish to the department information regarding the amount of  income tax
credits claimed each year.
(D) Authorizes the Department of Revenue to provide tax information to the Oregon
Business Development Department for the purpose of determining any inconsistency  in in-
formation furnished by the applicant.
(E) Agrees to allow site visits and audits to verify  the applicant’s continuing qualification
and the accuracy of information submitted to the department.
(F) Consents to the adjustment or recapture of any amount of income tax  credit due to
noncompliance with this section.
(h) Letters of good standing from the Department  of Revenue stating that the applicant
is not delinquent in paying taxes.
(i) The anticipated total qualifying investment.
(j) Information on the number and type of employment positions that  will be created by
the qualified facility, the number of employment positions sustained throughout the con-
struction and operation  of the qualified facility and the benefits of the qualified facility with
regard to overall economic activity in this state.
(k) Information demonstrating that the qualified facility will comply with  applicable state
and local laws and regulations and obtain required licenses and permits.
(L) Any other information the director considers necessary to determine  whether the
qualified facility is in accordance with the provisions of  sections 4 to 12 of this 2023 Act, and
any applicable rules or standards adopted by the director.
(3) An application  for preliminary certification shall be accompanied by a fee established
under section 9 of  this 2023 Act.  The  director may refund all or a portion of the fee if the
application for certification is rejected.
SECTION 7.
(1) The Director  of the Oregon Business Development Department may re-
quire an applicant for certification of a qualified  facility to submit plans, specifications and
contract terms, and after examination of the  plans, specifications and terms may request
corrections and revisions.
(2) If the director determines that the qualified facility is technically feasible and  should
operate in accordance with the representations made by the applicant,  and is in accordance
with the provisions of sections 4 to 12 of this 2023 Act and any applicable rules  or standards
adopted by the director, the director may  issue a preliminary certificate approving the
placement in service of the qualified facility. The certificate  shall indicate the potential
amount of tax credit allowable and shall list any conditions for claiming the credit.
(3) In  accordance with ORS chapter 183, the director may issue an order altering, con-
ditioning, suspending or denying preliminary certification if the director determines that:
(a) The qualified facility does not comply with the provisions of sections 4 to  12 of this
2023 Act and applicable rules and standards;
(b) The applicant has previously received preliminary or final certification for the quali-
fied facility;
(c) The applicant  was directly involved in an act for which any state agency has levied
civil penalties or revoked, canceled or suspended any certification; or
[5]
HB 3253
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) The applicant or the principal, director,  officer, owner, majority shareholder or
member of the applicant, or the manager of the applicant  if the applicant is a limited liability
company, is in arrears for payments  owed to any government agency while in any capacity
with direct or indirect control over a business.
SECTION 8.
(1) The Director of the  Oregon Business Development Department may issue
a final certification for a qualified facility under this section only if:
(a) The qualified facility was installed or constructed under a preliminary certificate of
approval issued under section 7 of this 2023 Act;
(b) The applicant demonstrates the ability  to provide the information required by section
6 (2) of this 2023 Act and does not violate any  condition that may be imposed as described in
subsection (4) of this section; and
(c) The qualified facility was installed or constructed  in accordance with the applicable
provisions of sections 4 to 12 of this 2023 Act and  any applicable rules or standards adopted
by the director.
(2) Any person may apply to the Oregon Business Development  Department for final
certification of a qualified facility:
(a) If the person received  preliminary certification for the qualified facility under section
7 of this 2023 Act; and
(b) After placement in service of the qualified facility.
(3) An application for final  certification shall be made in writing on a form prepared by
the department and shall contain:
(a) A statement that the conditions  of the preliminary certification have been complied
with;
(b) The actual amount of the qualifying  investment, including copies of receipts for pur-
chase and installation of the qualified facility;
(c) The amount of the credit under section 2 of this 2023 Act that is to be claimed;
(d) The number and type of employment positions created by the operation and  mainte-
nance of the qualified facility over the five-year period beginning with the year of preliminary
certification under section 7 of this 2023 Act and information  on the benefits of the qualified
facility with regard to overall economic activity in this state;
(e) Information  sufficient to demonstrate that the qualified facility will remain in opera-
tion for at least five years, unless the director by rule specifies another period of operation;
(f) Documentation of compliance with applicable  state and local laws and regulations and
licensing and permitting requirements as defined by the director; and
(g) Any other information determined by the director  to be necessary prior to issuance
of a final certificate, including inspection of the qualified facility by the department.
(4) After the filing of the application under this section, the  director may issue the cer-
tificate together with any  conditions that the director determines are appropriate to promote
the purposes of sections 2 and 4 to 12 of this 2023 Act. If the  applicant is an entity subject
to regulation by the Public Utility Commission, the director may  consult with the commis-
sion prior to issuance of the certificate. The action of  the director shall include certification
of the actual cost of the qualified facility. However, the  director may not certify an amount
for tax credit  purposes that is more than the amount approved in the preliminary certificate
issued for the qualified facility.
(5) If the director rejects an application for final certification,  or certifies a lesser
[6]
HB 3253
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
amount of credit than was claimed in the application, the director shall send  to the applicant
written notice of the action, together  with a statement of the findings and reasons for the
action, by certified mail,  before the 60th day after the filing of the application. Failure of the
director to act constitutes rejection of the application.
(6) Upon approval  of an application for final certification of a qualified facility, the di-
rector shall certify  the qualified facility. The final certification shall indicate the amount of
qualifying investment attributable to the qualified facility and the  total qualified facility cost.
(7) The director may establish by rule  timelines and intermediate deadlines for sub-
mission of application materials.
SECTION 9.
By rule and after hearing, the Director of the  Oregon Business Development
Department may adopt a schedule of reasonable fees that  the Oregon Business Development
Department may require of applicants  for preliminary or final certification of a qualified fa-
cility under sections 4 to 12 of this 2023 Act. Before the  adoption or revision of the fees, the
department shall estimate the total cost of the program to the department. The fees shall
be used to recover the anticipated cost of  administering and enforcing the provisions of
sections 4 to 12 of this  2023 Act, including filing, investigating, granting and rejecting appli-
cations for certification and ensuring compliance with sections 4 to 12 of this  2023 Act, and
shall be designed not to exceed the total cost estimated by  the department. Any excess fees
shall be held by the department and shall be used by the department to reduce any future
fee increases.  The fee may vary according to the size and complexity of the qualified
facility. The fee is not considered part of the cost of the qualified facility to be certified.
SECTION 10.
(1) A certificate issued under section 8 of this 2023 Act is required  for
purposes of obtaining tax credits  in accordance with section 2 of this 2023 Act. Such certi-
fication shall be granted  for a period not to exceed five years. The five-year period shall begin
with the  tax year of the applicant during which the completed application for final certifica-
tion of the qualified facility under section 8 of this 2023 Act  is received by the Oregon Busi-
ness Development Department.
(2) If the original owner of the certificate uses any portion of the credit, the  certificate
becomes nontransferable.
(3) For a transferee holding a credit that has been  transferred, the five-year period shall
begin with the tax year in which the transferee pays for the credit.
SECTION 11. (1) The total amount of potential tax credits for all qualified facilities in this
state may not, at the time of preliminary certification under section 7 of this  2023 Act, ex-
ceed $  million for any tax year.
(2) In the event that the  Director of the Oregon Business Development Department re-
ceives applications for preliminary certification with a total amount of potential tax credits
in excess of  the limitation in subsection (1) of this section, the director shall allocate the
issuance of preliminary certifications according to standards and  criteria established by rule
by the director.
SECTION 12.
The Oregon Business Development Department shall by rule establish pol-
icies and procedures for the administration and enforcement of the provisions of sections 2
and 4 to 12 of this 2023 Act, including standards for what constitutes  a single qualified fa-
cility.
SECTION 13. Sections 2  and 4 to 12 of this 2023 Act apply to new capital investments
made in a qualified facility on or after July 1, 2023, and to tax years beginning on or after
[7]
HB 3253
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2030.
FAMILY WAGE TAX CREDIT
SECTION 14.
Section 15 of this  2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 315.
SECTION 15. (1) A credit against taxes that are otherwise  due under ORS chapter 316
or, if the taxpayer is a  corporation, under ORS chapter 317 or 318 is allowed to a taxpayer
that is an employer  and that adds net full-time employment positions, including remote em-
ployment positions, during the tax year. The credit  may be claimed for any newly filled em-
ployment position that remains filled in subsequent tax years, for as many as  four
consecutive tax years.
(2) For the taxpayer to claim  the credit allowed under this section, any added employ-
ment positions that are to be considered for eligibility must be filled by employees that:
(a)(A) Receive a wage throughout the tax year that is at least 150  percent of the mini-
mum wage under ORS 653.025 for the location in which the employment position  is filled or,
if the worker is working remotely, the location in which the taxpayer is doing business; or
(B) Meet the wage requirements of  ORS 285C.160, if applicable, for the location in which
the taxpayer is doing business;
(b) Are subject to the tax imposed under ORS chapter 316; and
(c) Remain employed by the taxpayer for at least 12 consecutive months.
(3) The amount of the credit allowed under this section shall  equal 10 percent of the
wages paid by the taxpayer to new employees during the tax year but, for  the tax year, may
not exceed $5,000 per employment position or $5 million total for the taxpayer.
(4) Prior  to claiming the credit allowed under this section, a taxpayer is required to re-
ceive written certification of eligibility from the Oregon Business Development Department.
(5) The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the tax  liability of the taxpayer
for the tax year.
(6) If a change in the taxable year of the taxpayer occurs  as described in ORS 314.085,
or if the Department of Revenue terminates the taxpayer’s  taxable year under ORS 314.440,
the credit allowed by  this section shall be prorated or computed in a manner consistent with
ORS 314.085.
(7) A person that has earned a tax credit under  this section may transfer the credit to
a taxpayer subject to tax under ORS chapter 316, 317 or 318. The transfer  must comply with
ORS 315.056.
(8) The Director of  the Oregon Business Development Department may order the sus-
pension or revocation of a certification issued under this section, as provided in ORS 315.061.
(9) The Oregon Business Development Department shall adopt rules for the  purposes of
this section, including  policies and procedures for certifying taxpayers as eligible for the
credit allowed under this section as provided in subsection (4) of this section.
SECTION 16.
Section 15 of this 2023 Act applies to tax years beginning on or  after Jan-
uary 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2030.
INCORPORATION OF TAX CREDIT PROVISIONS
SECTION 17.  ORS 314.772, as amended by section 11, chapter 34, Oregon  Laws 2022, and sec-
[8]
HB 3253
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tion 15, chapter 115, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
314.772. (1) Except  as provided in ORS 314.766 (5)(b), the tax credits allowed or allowable to a
C corporation for purposes  of ORS chapter 317 or 318 shall not be allowed to an S corporation. The
business tax credits  allowed or allowable for purposes of ORS chapter 316 shall be allowed or are
allowable to the shareholders of the S corporation.
(2) In determining the tax imposed under ORS chapter 316, as provided under ORS 314.763, on
income of the shareholder of an S corporation, there shall be taken into account  the shareholder’s
pro rata share of  business tax credit (or item thereof) that would be allowed to the corporation (but
for subsection (1) of this section) or recapture or recovery thereof.  The credit (or item thereof), re-
capture or recovery shall be passed through to shareholders in pro rata shares as determined in the
manner prescribed under section 1377(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) The character of any  item included in a shareholder’s pro rata share under subsection (2)
of this section shall be determined as if such item were realized  directly from the source from which
realized by the corporation, or incurred in the same manner as incurred by the corporation.
(4) If the shareholder is a nonresident and there is a requirement applicable  for the business tax
credit that in the case of a  nonresident the credit be allowed in the proportion provided in ORS
316.117, then that provision shall apply to the nonresident shareholder.
(5) As used in this section, “business tax credit”  means the following credits: ORS 315.104
(forestation and reforestation), ORS  315.138 (fish screening, by-pass devices, fishways), ORS 315.141
(biomass production for biofuel), ORS 315.156 (crop gleaning), ORS  315.164 and 315.169 (agriculture
workforce housing), ORS 315.176 (bovine manure), ORS 315.204 (dependent care assistance), ORS
315.208 (dependent care facilities), ORS 315.213  (contributions for child care), ORS 315.237 (employee
and dependent scholarships), ORS 315.271 (individual development accounts), ORS  315.304 (pollution
control facility), ORS 315.326 (renewable  energy development contributions), ORS 315.331 (energy
conservation projects), ORS 315.336  (transportation projects), ORS 315.341 (renewable energy re-
source equipment manufacturing  facilities), ORS 315.354 and 469B.151 (energy conservation facili-
ties), ORS 315.506 (tribal taxes on reservation enterprise zones and reservation partnership  zones),
ORS 315.507 (electronic commerce), ORS 315.514 (film production development contributions),  ORS
315.523 (employee training programs), ORS 315.533 (low income  community jobs initiative), ORS
315.593 (short  line railroads), ORS 315.640 (university venture development funds), ORS 315.643
(Opportunity Grant Fund contributions),  ORS 315.675 (Trust for Cultural Development Account
contributions), ORS 317.097 (loans for affordable housing), ORS 317.124 (long term enterprise zone
facilities), ORS 317.147 (loans for agriculture workforce housing), ORS 317.152 (qualified research
expenses) and ORS 317.154 (alternative  qualified research expenses) and section 9, chapter 774,
Oregon Laws 2013 (alternative fuel vehicle contributions), section 2,  chapter 34, Oregon Laws 2022
(small forest option), and section 8, chapter  115, Oregon Laws 2022 (agricultural overtime pay) , and
section 2 of this 2023  Act (qualified facilities) and section 15 of this 2023 Act (new employ-
ment positions).
SECTION 18.
 ORS 318.031, as  amended by section 12, chapter 34, Oregon Laws 2022, and sec-
tion 16, chapter 115, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
318.031. It being the intention of the Legislative Assembly that this chapter and ORS chapter
317 shall be administered as uniformly as  possible (allowance being made for the difference in im-
position of the taxes), ORS 305.140  and 305.150, ORS chapter 314 and the following sections are in-
corporated into and made a part of this chapter: ORS 315.104, 315.141, 315.156, 315.176,  315.204,
315.208, 315.213, 315.304, 315.326, 315.331, 315.336, 315.506,  315.507, 315.523, 315.533, 315.593 and
[9]
HB 3253
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
315.643 and section  2, chapter 34, Oregon Laws 2022, and section 8, chapter 115, Oregon Laws 2022,
and sections 2 and 15 of this 2023 Act (all only  to the extent applicable to a corporation) and ORS
chapter 317.
RESEARCH ACTIVITIES TAX CREDITS
SECTION 19.
Section 20 of this  2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 317.
SECTION 20. (1) If 75 percent of the amount allowable as a credit  under ORS 317.152 or
317.154, when added to the sum of the amount of estimated tax paid under ORS 314.515 and
any other  tax prepayment amounts, exceeds the taxes imposed by ORS chapters 314 and 317
for the tax year  (reduced by any nonrefundable credits allowable for purposes of ORS chapter
317 for the  tax year), the amount of the excess determined under this subsection shall be
refunded to the taxpayer as provided in ORS 314.415.
(2) This  section applies only to taxpayers with fewer than 150 employees, wherever lo-
cated, at the close of the tax year.
SECTION 21.  ORS 317.152 is amended to read:
317.152. (1) A credit against taxes otherwise due under this chapter shall be allowed to eligible
taxpayers for increases in qualified research expenses and basic research payments.  The credit shall
be determined in accordance with section 41 of the Internal Revenue Code, except as follows:
(a) If the excess amount as described  in section 41(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code is
$2.5 million or less,  the applicable percentage specified in section 41(a)  of the Internal Revenue
Code shall be [ five] 24 percent.
(b) If the excess amount as described in section 41(a)(1) of the  Internal Revenue Code is
more than $2.5 million, the applicable  percentage specified in section 41(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code shall be 15 percent.
[(b)] (c) “Qualified research” and  “basic research” shall consist only of research conducted in
Oregon.
[(c)] (d) The following do not apply to the credit allowable under this section:
(A) Section 41(c)(4) of the  Internal Revenue Code (relating to the alternative incremental credit).
(B) Section 41(h) of the Internal Revenue Code (relating to termination of the federal credit).
(2) For purposes of this section, “eligible taxpayer”  means a corporation, other than a corpo-
ration excluded under Internal Revenue Code section 41(e)(7)(E).
(3) The Income Tax Regulations as prescribed by  the Secretary of the Treasury under authority
of section 41 of the Internal Revenue Code apply for purposes  of this section, except as modified by
this section or as provided in rules adopted by the Department of Revenue.
(4) The maximum credit under this section may not exceed [ $1 million] $9 million.
(5) A deduction may not be taken for the portion of expenses or  payments, otherwise allowable
as a deduction, that is equal to the amount of the credit claimed under this section.
(6) Any tax credit that is otherwise allowable under this section  and that is not used by the
taxpayer in that year may be carried forward and  offset against the taxpayer’s tax liability for the
next succeeding tax year. Any credit remaining unused in such  next succeeding tax year may be
carried forward and used in the  second succeeding tax year, and likewise any credit not used in that
second succeeding tax year may be carried forward and used  in the third succeeding tax year, and
any credit not used in that third succeeding tax year may be carried forward and used in the fourth
succeeding tax year, and any credit not used  in that fourth succeeding tax year may be carried
[10]
HB 3253
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
forward and used in the fifth succeeding tax year, but may not be carried forward for any tax year
thereafter.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 317.154 is amended to read:
317.154. (1) A credit against taxes otherwise due under this chapter shall be allowed for quali-
fied research expenses that exceed 10 percent of Oregon sales.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) “Oregon sales” shall be computed using the laws and administrative rules  for calculating the
numerator of the Oregon sales factor under ORS 314.665.
(b) “Qualified  research” has the meaning given the term under section 41(d) of the Internal Re-
venue Code and shall consist only of research conducted in Oregon.
(3) The credit under this section is equal to five percent of the amount by which  the qualified
research expenses exceed 10 percent of Oregon sales.
(4) The credit under  this section [ shall] may not exceed $10,000 times the number of percentage
points by which the qualifying research expenses exceed 10 percent of Oregon sales.
(5) The maximum credit under this section may not exceed [ $1 million] $9 million.
(6) A deduction may  not be taken for the portion of expenses or payments, otherwise allowable
as a deduction, that is equal to the amount of the credit claimed under this section.
(7) Any tax credit that is otherwise allowable  under this section and that is not used by the
taxpayer in that year may be carried forward and  offset against the taxpayer’s tax liability for the
next succeeding tax year. Any credit remaining  unused in such next succeeding tax year may be
carried forward and used in the  second succeeding tax year, and likewise any credit not used in that
second succeeding tax year may be carried forward  and used in the third succeeding tax year, and
any credit not used in that third succeeding tax year may be carried forward and used in the fourth
succeeding tax year, and any credit not used in that  fourth succeeding tax year may be carried
forward and used in the fifth succeeding tax year, but may not be carried forward for any tax year
thereafter.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 317.850, as amended by  section 14, chapter 115, Oregon Laws 2022, is
amended to read:
317.850. (1)  The net revenue from the tax imposed by this chapter, after deduction of refunds,
shall be paid over to the State Treasurer and held in the General Fund  as miscellaneous receipts
available generally to meet any expense or obligation of the State of Oregon lawfully incurred.
(2) A working balance of unreceipted revenue from  the tax imposed by this chapter may be re-
tained for the payment of refunds, but such working balance [ shall] may not at  the close of any
fiscal year exceed the sum of $500,000.
(3) Moneys are continuously appropriated to the Department of Revenue to make:
(a) The refunds authorized under subsection (2) of this section; [ and]
(b) The refund payments  in excess of tax liability authorized under section 8, chapter 115,
Oregon Laws 2022[ .]; and
(c) The refund payments in excess of tax liability authorized under section 20 of this 2023
Act.
SECTION 24.
Section 25 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 317A.100 to
317A.158.
SECTION 25. Notwithstanding ORS 317A.100, any  amounts of credit against taxes im-
posed under ORS chapter 317 that are allowed a taxpayer under ORS 317.152 or 317.154 for
qualified research expenses are excluded from the definition of “commercial activity” and are
[11]
HB 3253
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
exempt from the tax imposed under ORS 317A.116.
SECTION 26.
 Section 6, chapter 911, Oregon Laws 1989, as amended  by section 14, chapter 746,
Oregon Laws 1995, section 1, chapter 548, Oregon Laws  2001, section 15, chapter 739, Oregon Laws
2003, section 86,  chapter 94, Oregon Laws 2005, and section 7, chapter 730, Oregon Laws 2011, is
amended to read:
Sec. 6.  ORS 317.152 [ to], 317.153 and 317.154 apply to amounts paid or incurred in tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 1989, and before January 1, 2018 , or in tax years beginning on
or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2030 .
SECTION 27. (1) Section 20 of this 2023 Act and the amendments to ORS 317.152, 317.154
and 317.850 by sections 21 to 23 of  this 2023 Act apply to tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2030.
(2) Section 25 of this 2023 Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January 1,  2024,
and before January 1, 2030.
SUNSET EXTENSIONS FOR ECONOMIC INCENTIVES PROGRAMS
SECTION 28.  ORS 285C.255 is amended to read:
285C.255. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS 285C.050 to 285C.250:
(a) An area may not be designated as an enterprise zone after June 30, [ 2025] 2035;
(b) A business firm may not obtain  authorization under ORS  285C.140 after June 30, [ 2025]
2035; and
(c) An enterprise zone, except for a reservation enterprise  zone or a reservation partnership
zone, that is in existence on June 29, [ 2025] 2035, is terminated on June 30, [ 2025] 2035.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section:
(a) A reservation enterprise zone may be designated, and  a reservation partnership zone may
be cosponsored, under ORS 285C.306 after June 30, [ 2025] 2035; and
(b) A business firm may obtain authorization under ORS 285C.140 after June 30, [ 2025] 2035:
(A) If located in a reservation enterprise zone or a reservation partnership zone; or
(B) As allowed under ORS 285C.245 (1)(b).
SECTION 29.
 ORS 285C.406 is amended to read:
285C.406. In order for a taxpayer to claim  the property tax exemption under ORS 285C.409 or
a corporate excise or income tax credit under ORS 317.124:
(1) The written agreement between the business  firm and the rural enterprise zone sponsor that
is required under ORS 285C.403 (3)(c) must be entered into  prior to the termination of the enterprise
zone under ORS 285C.245; and
(2)(a) For the purpose of the property  tax exemption, the business firm must obtain certification
under ORS 285C.403 on or before June 30, [ 2025] 2035; or
(b) For the purpose of the  corporate excise or income tax credit, the business firm must obtain
certification under ORS 285C.403 on or before June 30, 2018.
SECTION 30.  Section 6, chapter 905, Oregon Laws 2007, as amended by  section 5, chapter 757,
Oregon Laws 2015, and section 11, chapter 82, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  (1) ORS 285C.615 and 285C.635 apply to:
(a) Tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2009.
(b) Income taxes attributable to eligible  projects that first become exempt from property taxa-
tion under ORS 307.123 on or after January 1, 2008.
[12]
HB 3253
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Distributions under ORS 285C.635 (3) may not be made after July 15, [ 2025] 2035.
SECTION 31.
 ORS 285B.627 is amended to read:
285B.627. (1) In consultation with  the Department of Revenue, the Oregon Business Development
Department shall  establish and administer the Oregon Industrial Site Readiness Program. The pur-
pose of the program is to:
(a) Enter into tax reimbursement arrangements with qualified project  sponsors pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section; or
(b) Provide loans, including  forgivable loans, to qualified project sponsors pursuant to subsection
(5) of this section.
(2)(a) Subject to standards and procedures that the Oregon Business Development  Department
shall establish by rule, the department shall  designate regionally significant industrial sites for
inclusion in the program.
(b) A regionally significant  industrial site designated under this section must be an industrial
site that is planned and zoned for industrial use.
(3) A project sponsor may apply to participate in the program by submitting an  application and
development plan in writing in a form prescribed by the department by rule.
(4) The department shall establish by rule criteria and standards  for the qualification of project
sponsors to participate in the program.
(5) Upon qualification of a project sponsor under this section, and before July 1, [ 2023] 2033, the
department may:
(a) Enter into  a tax reimbursement arrangement with the project sponsor pursuant to which the
project sponsor shall receive an amount equal  to 50 percent of the estimated incremental income tax
revenues generated by  an eligible employer per tax year, beginning with the first tax year following
the tax year in  which a project sponsor is qualified under this section, until the total investment
of the qualified project sponsor in the eligible site preparation costs,  including interest, established
under subsection (7) of this section has been recovered, at  which time the tax reimbursement ar-
rangement shall end; or
(b) Enter into a loan agreement with the project sponsor under  terms and conditions specified
and required by the department. In making  a determination to enter into a loan agreement with the
project sponsor, the department  shall consider the reasonableness of the project sponsor’s estimated
costs to prepare the site for industrial use, including  but not limited to eligible site preparation
costs established by the department pursuant to subsection (7) of this  section. The agreement may
specify that a portion of the loan may be  forgiven if the project sponsor enters into a contract with
an eligible employer to conduct a  business in the traded sector industry on a regionally significant
industrial site within seven years after the project sponsor was qualified under this section.
(6)(a) The total amount of the  loan that may be forgiven under subsection (5) of this section is
the lesser of:
(A) Fifty percent of the total cost of eligible site preparation costs; or
(B) Fifty  percent of the amount of the estimated incremental income tax revenues for the eligible
employer for the term of the loan.
(b) Loan forgiveness may not be allowed under subsection (5) of this section if any  portion of
the loan that would not  be forgiven would be repaid by the project sponsor with state funds received
from any source.
(7) The department shall establish, by rule, eligible site preparation costs  including, but not
limited to, some or all of the following:
[13]
HB 3253
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
(a) Acquisition and assembly costs associated with creating large development parcels.
(b) Transportation improvements such as  access roads, intersections, turning lanes, signals,
sidewalks, curbs, transit stops and storm drains.
(c) Water and sewer infrastructure.
(d) Natural resource mitigation.
(e) Site grading activities.
(f) Environmental remediation and mitigation activities to address brownfields  issues in accord-
ance with state and federally approved remediation plans.
(g) Planning, engineering  and administrative costs associated with applying for necessary local,
state and federal permits.
(h) Interest-carrying costs incurred  by a project sponsor for amounts borrowed to develop a re-
gionally significant industrial site, not to exceed 20 percent of the total amount forgiven,  if any,
under subsection (5) of this section.
(8) The total amount of tax reimbursement arrangements and loan amounts authorized under this
section may not exceed $10 million per year.
(9) Funds received pursuant to  a tax reimbursement arrangement or a loan agreement under
subsection (5) of this section may not be used for the payment of:
(a) A penalty or fine; or
(b) Environmental remediation activities conducted at a regionally significant industrial site that
is listed or proposed to  be listed as a national priority pursuant to the Comprehensive Environ-
mental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of  1980 (42 U.S.C. 9605) for which the project
sponsor, eligible employer or any party to the tax reimbursement  arrangement or loan agreement
is liable under 42 U.S.C. 9607 at that regionally significant industrial site.
(10) The department shall adopt rules  to administer and implement the provisions of this section.
APPROPRIATION FOR SMALL BUSINESS EXPANSION LOANS
SECTION 32.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Business Development Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $  to be
deposited in the Small Business Expansion Loan Fund established under ORS 285B.133 for the
purpose of carrying out the provisions of ORS 285B.130.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 33. The unit captions used in this 2023 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 34. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[14]