Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 6,  chapter 880, Oregon Laws 2007, as amended by section 1, chapter 750,
Oregon Laws 2013, and section 32, chapter 579, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  ORS 315.266 applies to tax years beginning before January 1, [ 2026] 2032.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3531