Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 315.
SECTION 2. (1) A resident or nonresident individual who is not entitled  to the tax credit
described in ORS 315.613 shall be allowed a credit against taxes that are otherwise due under
ORS chapter 316 if during the tax year the individual is:
(a)(A) A physician licensed under ORS chapter 677 who practices anesthesiology; or
(B) A certified registered nurse anesthetist licensed under ORS 678.279; and
(b) Engaged in  the practice of anesthesiology for at least 20 hours per week, averaged
over the month, during the tax year.
(2) The amount of the credit allowed under this section shall be $3,000.
(3) The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the tax  liability of the taxpayer
and may not be carried forward to another tax year.
(4) A nonresident shall be  allowed the credit under this section in the proportion provided
in ORS 316.117. If a change in the status of a taxpayer  from resident to nonresident or from
nonresident to resident occurs, the credit allowed by this section  shall be determined in a
manner consistent with ORS 316.117.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 315.613 is amended to read:
315.613. (1) An annual credit  against the taxes otherwise due under ORS chapter 316 shall be
allowed to a resident or nonresident individual who is:
(a) Certified as eligible under ORS 442.563;
(b) Licensed under ORS chapter 677;
(c) Engaged in the practice of medicine, and engaged for at least 20 hours per week,  averaged
over the month, during the tax year in a rural practice; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1155
HB 2591
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Has adjusted gross income not in excess of  $300,000 for the tax year. The limitation in this
paragraph does  not apply to a physician who practices as a general surgeon, specializes in
obstetrics, specializes in family or  general practice and provides obstetrical services [ or], practices
emergency medicine or practices as an anesthesiologist  in a county that is a frontier rural prac-
tice county under rules adopted by the Office of Rural Health.
(2) The amount of credit allowed shall be based on the distance from  a major population center
in a qualified metropolitan  statistical area at which the taxpayer maintains a practice or hospital
membership:
(a) If at least 10 miles but fewer than 20 miles, $3,000.
(b) If at least 20 miles but fewer than 50 miles, $4,000.
(c) If 50 or more miles, $5,000.
(3) The credit shall be allowed during the time in which the  individual retains such practice and
membership if the individual is actively practicing in and is a member of the medical staff  of one
of the following hospitals:
(a) A type A hospital designated as such by the Office of Rural Health;
(b) A type B hospital designated as such by the Office of Rural Health if the hospital is:
(A) Not within the boundaries of a metropolitan statistical area;
(B) Located 30 or more miles from the closest hospital  within the major population center in a
metropolitan statistical area; or
(C) Located in a county with a population of less than 75,000;
(c) A type C rural hospital, if the Office of Rural Health makes the findings  required by ORS
315.619;
(d) A rural critical access hospital; or
(e) A hospital:
(A) Classified  by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services as a rural referral center in
accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1395ww(d)(5)(C)(i); and
(B) Classified by the  Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services as a sole community hospital
in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1395ww(d)(5)(D)(iii).
(4) In order to claim  the credit allowed under this section, the individual must remain willing
during the tax  year to serve patients with Medicare coverage and patients receiving medical as-
sistance  in  at least the same proportion to the individual’s total number of patients as the Medicare
and medical assistance populations represent of the total number of persons determined by the Of-
fice of Rural Health to be in need of care in the county served by the practice, not  to exceed 20
percent Medicare patients or 15 percent medical assistance patients.
(5) A nonresident individual  shall be allowed the credit under this section in the proportion
provided  in ORS 316.117. If a change in the status of a taxpayer from resident to nonresident or from
nonresident to resident  occurs, the credit allowed by this section shall be determined in a manner
consistent with ORS 316.117.
(6) For purposes of this section,  an “individual’s practice” shall be determined on the basis of
actual time spent in practice each week in hours  or days, whichever is considered by the Office of
Rural Health to be more appropriate. In the case of a shareholder of a corporation or a  member of
a partnership, only the time of the individual shareholder or partner shall  be considered and the full
amount of the credit shall be allowed to each shareholder or partner who qualifies in an individual
capacity.
(7) As used in this section:
[2]
HB 2591
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
(a) “Qualified metropolitan statistical area”  means only those counties of a metropolitan statis-
tical area that are located in Oregon if the largest city  within the metropolitan statistical area is
located in Oregon.
(b) “Rural critical access hospital” means a facility that meets the criteria set forth  in 42 U.S.C.
1395i-4 (c)(2)(B) and that has been designated a critical access  hospital by the Office of Rural Health
and the Oregon Health Authority.
(c) “Type A hospital,” “type B hospital” and “type C hospital”  have the meaning for those terms
provided in ORS 442.470.
SECTION 4.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 315.613 by  section 3
of this 2025 Act apply to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 5. The Oregon Health Authority  shall adopt rules to include as qualified health
care providers eligible for participation in the health care provider incentive program created
under ORS 676.454 an individual who is, or who is training to become:
(1) A physician licensed under ORS chapter 677 who practices anesthesiology; and
(2) A certified registered nurse anesthetist licensed under ORS 678.279.
SECTION 6.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]