Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 44, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended by section  14, chapter 699,
Oregon Laws 2015, and section 219, chapter 767, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 44.  (1) There is established the Oregon Marijuana Account, separate and distinct  from the
General Fund.
(2) The account shall consist of  moneys transferred to the account under [ section 11 of this 2015
Act] ORS 475B.760.
(3) Subject to subsection (4)  of this section, the Department of Revenue shall certify the amount
of moneys available for distribution in the Oregon Marijuana Account  and distribute the moneys as
follows:
[(a) Forty percent must be transferred to the Common School Fund; ]
[(b) Twenty percent must be transferred to  the Mental Health Alcoholism and Drug Services Ac-
count established under ORS 430.380; ]
[(c) Fifteen percent must be transferred to the State Police Account established under ORS
181.175;]
[(d) To assist local law enforcement  in performing its duties under sections 3 to 70, chapter 1,
Oregon Laws 2015, 10 percent must be transferred to the cities of this state in the following shares: ]
[(A) For all  distributions made from the Oregon Marijuana Account before July 1, 2017, in such
shares as the population of each city bears to the population of the  cities of this state, as determined
by Portland State University last preceding such apportionment, under ORS 190.510 to 190.610; and ]
[(B) For all distributions made from the Oregon Marijuana Account on or after July 1, 2017: ]
[(i) Fifty percent of the  10 percent must be transferred in such shares as the number of licenses
issued by the commission under sections 19 to 21, chapter 1, Oregon Laws  2015, during the calendar
year preceding the date of the distribution for premises located  in each city bears to the number of such
licenses issued by the commission during such calendar year for all premises in this state; and ]
[(ii) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in such  shares as the number of licenses
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2377
HB 2203
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
issued by  the commission under section 22, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2015, during the calendar year
preceding the date of the distribution for  premises located in each city bears to the number of such li-
censes issued by the commission during such calendar year for all premises in this state; ]
[(e) To  assist local law enforcement in performing its duties under sections 3 to 70, chapter 1,
Oregon Laws 2015, 10 percent must be transferred to counties in the following shares: ]
[(A) For all  distributions made from the Oregon Marijuana Account before July 1, 2017, in such
shares as their respective populations bear to the total population of this state,  as estimated from time
to time by Portland State University; and ]
[(B) For all distributions made from the Oregon Marijuana Account on or after July 1, 2017: ]
[(i) Fifty percent of the  10 percent must be transferred in such shares as the number of licenses
issued by the commission under sections 19 to 21, chapter 1, Oregon Laws  2015, during the calendar
year preceding the date of the distribution for premises  located in each county bears to the number of
such licenses issued by the commission during such calendar year for all premises in this state; and ]
[(ii) Fifty percent of the 10 percent  must be transferred in such shares as the number of licenses
issued by the commission under section 22, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2015, during the calendar  year
preceding the date of the distribution for premises located in each county bears  to the number of such
licenses issued by the commission during such calendar year for all premises in this state; and ]
[(f) Five  percent must be transferred to the Oregon Health Authority to be used for the establish-
ment, operation and maintenance of alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early  intervention and treat-
ment services. ]
(a) 20 percent shall be transferred to  the Oregon Health Authority for deposit in the
Mental Health Alcoholism and Drug Services Account established under ORS 430.380;
(b) 15 percent shall be  transferred to the Department of State Police for deposit in the
State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020;
(c) 5 percent shall be transferred to the Oregon Health  Authority for deposit in the
Oregon Health Authority Fund established  under ORS 413.101, to be used for the establish-
ment, maintenance and operation of alcohol and drug abuse prevention,  early intervention
and treatment services;
(d) 30 percent shall be distributed among the cities of this state in the following shares:
(A) 25 percent of the 30 percent shall be transferred in shares  that reflect the total area
of all grow canopies associated with marijuana producer licenses issued by the Oregon Liquor
Control Commission under ORS 475B.070 during the  calendar year preceding the date of the
distribution for all premises located in the city compared to the total area  of all grow
canopies associated with  marijuana producer licenses issued by the commission under ORS
475B.070 during the calendar year preceding the date of the distribution for all premises lo-
cated in all incorporated areas of this state; and
(B) 75 percent of the 30 percent shall be transferred in shares that  reflect the total
number of marijuana retailer licenses issued by the commission under ORS 475B.110  during
the calendar year preceding the date of the distribution for  all premises located in the city
compared to the total  number of marijuana retailer licenses issued by the commission under
ORS 475B.110 during the calendar year preceding the date of the distribution for all  premises
located in all incorporated areas of this state; and
(e) 30 percent shall be  distributed among the counties of this state in the following
shares:
(A) 25 percent of the 30 percent shall be transferred in shares  that reflect the total area
[2]
HB 2203
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
of all grow  canopies associated with marijuana producer licenses issued by the commission
under ORS 475B.070 during the calendar year  preceding the date of the distribution for all
premises located in the unincorporated area of  the county compared to the total area of all
grow canopies associated with marijuana producer licenses issued by the commission under
ORS 475B.070 during the calendar year preceding the date of the distribution for all  premises
located in all unincorporated areas of this state; and
(B) 75 percent of the 30 percent shall be transferred in shares that  reflect the total
number of marijuana retailer licenses issued by the commission under ORS 475B.110  during
the calendar year preceding the date  of the distribution for all premises located in the
unincorporated area of the county compared  to the total number of marijuana retailer li-
censes issued by the commission  under ORS 475B.110 during the calendar year preceding the
date of the distribution for all premises located in all unincorporated areas of this state.
[(4) A city or county that adopts ordinances prohibiting the establishment of a  premises for which
a license is issued under section 19, 20,  21 or 22, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2015, or prohibiting the es-
tablishment of an entity for which registration is required under  ORS 475.300 to 475.346, is not eligible
to receive distributions under this section. ]
(4)(a) A city that adopts an ordinance prohibiting the establishment  of a premises for
which issuance of a license under  ORS 475B.070 is required is not eligible to receive distrib-
utions under subsection (3)(d)(A) of this section.
(b) A city that adopts an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a  premises for which
issuance of  a license under ORS 475B.110 is required is not eligible to receive distributions
under subsection (3)(d)(B) of this section.
(c) A county that adopts an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a  premises for
which issuance of a license under ORS 475B.070 is required is  not eligible to receive distrib-
utions under subsection (3)(e)(A) of this section.
(d) A county that adopts an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises  for
which issuance of a license under ORS 475B.110 is required is  not eligible to receive distrib-
utions under subsection (3)(e)(B) of this section.
(5) It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly  that the moneys distributed from the Oregon
Marijuana Account to the persons listed in subsection (3) of this section  are in addition to, and not
in lieu of, any other moneys available to [ such] the persons.
SECTION 2. The amendments to section 44, chapter 1,  Oregon Laws 2015, by section 1
of this 2017 Act apply to moneys distributed by the Department of Revenue on  and after the
effective date of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]