Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 337.260, as amended by section 3,  chapter 202, Oregon Laws 2019, and section
2, chapter 328, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
337.260. (1) Every district school board, the State Board of  Education and every committee or
officer responsible for the adoption of textbooks and other  instructional materials for use in the
public schools shall adopt textbooks and other instructional materials on American  history and
government that adequately stress  the services rendered by those who achieved our national inde-
pendence, who established our form of constitutional government and who preserved our federal
union. Textbooks and other instructional materials shall  adequately address the roles in and con-
tributions to the economic, political and social development of  Oregon and the United States by men
and women who:
[(1)] (a) Are Native American;
[(2)] (b) Are of  European, African, Asian, Pacific Island, Chicano, Latino, Middle Eastern or
Jewish descent;
[(3)] (c) Have disabilities;
[(4)] (d) Are immigrants or refugees; or
[(5)] (e) Are lesbian, gay, bisexual or transgender.
(2) To comply with the  prohibition on discrimination required by ORS 659.850, a district
school board or a committee or officer responsible for the  adoption of textbooks or other
instructional materials under this section may not prohibit the use of,  or refuse to approve
the use of, textbooks and  instructional materials on the basis that the textbooks or in-
structional materials  include a study of the roles and contributions of any individual or group
identified in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 337.120 is amended to read:
337.120. (1)(a) A district school board, with the assistance of teachers and administrators  of the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 281
SB 1583
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
district, shall adopt a list of textbooks and other instructional materials for each grade and  subject
for which instruction is provided by the school district.
(b) When adopting a list of textbooks  and other instructional materials, the district school
board:
(A) Shall consider whether the textbooks and other instructional materials  are available
through online resources that enable students  with print disabilities to receive the textbooks and
instructional materials free of charge[ .]; and
(B) To comply  with the prohibition on discrimination required by ORS 659.850, may not
prohibit the use of, or refuse to approve the use of,  textbooks and instructional materials
on the basis that the textbooks or instructional materials include a study of the  roles and
contributions of any individual or group against whom discrimination is prohibited  under
ORS 659.850.
(c) The district school board shall adopt the list in compliance  with ORS 337.141 and shall in-
volve parents and citizens in the process.
(2) The district school  board shall cause the textbooks or other instructional materials, accord-
ing to titles, that are included on the list adopted under subsection (1) of this section to be used  in
its schools at the beginning  of the next school year following the state adoption under ORS 337.141,
except when, pursuant to rules of the State Board  of Education, the district school board is au-
thorized by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to postpone use for  a reasonable period of time.
(3) District school boards shall establish a  process and timeline for regularly determining
whether textbooks and instructional materials on the list adopted under subsection (1) of this section
are available through online resources that enable students with print disabilities to receive text-
books and instructional materials free of charge.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 336.082 is amended to read:
336.082. (1) The State Board of  Education shall encourage the development and implementation
of curriculum for public elementary and secondary schools in  Oregon that will improve instructional
effectiveness or efficiency and that does not [ discriminate] include discrimination.
(2) The State Board of Education  shall stimulate the development of nondiscriminatory courses
of study or parts  of courses to improve instructional effectiveness or efficiency in public elementary
and secondary schools in Oregon. The board may direct the Department of Education or  contract
with appropriate public educational agencies to  develop program materials and to establish a
mechanism for the purpose of introducing the materials and implementing the techniques.
[(3) As used  in subsection (1) of this section, “discriminate” has the meaning given
“discrimination” in ORS 659.850. ]
(3) To comply with the prohibition on discrimination required by  ORS 659.850, a district
school board or any person responsible for the development or implementation  of curriculum
in a  public elementary or secondary school in Oregon may not prohibit the use of, or refuse
to approve the use of, program materials on the basis  that the program materials include a
study of the roles and  contributions of any individual or group against whom discrimination
is prohibited.
(4) As used in this section, “discrimination”  has the meaning given that term in ORS
659.850.
SECTION 4. To comply with the prohibition on discrimination required by ORS 659.850,
a district school  board or any person responsible for the selection or retention of books in
the library of a public elementary or secondary school of this state may  not prohibit the
[2]
SB 1583
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
selection or retention of, or refuse to select or retain, a  library book on the basis that the
library book includes a study or story of any individual or group against whom discrimination
is prohibited under ORS 659.850.
SECTION 5.
This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]