Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall  establish a pilot project to determine
whether the availability of telehealth services in K-12 schools increases  student access to
health care services.  The department shall contract with a provider described in subsection
(2) of this section to provide,  for the 2025-2026 school year, telehealth services to students
in participating school districts.
(2) The provider selected by the department must:
(a) Have experience in  providing telehealth services in educational settings, and at the
time of the contract, be providing access to telehealth services to at least 50,000 students;
(b) Have experience in providing culturally competent pediatric care;
(c) Demonstrate the ability to provide high-quality physical and  behavioral health ser-
vices and care coordination through telehealth;
(d) Demonstrate the ability to establish an adequate network of licensed telehealth  pro-
viders in this state to provide services under the pilot project;
(e) Have  a technology platform for the provision and coordination of telehealth services
that will be made available to participating school districts;
(f) Have the ability to bill health carriers and  government health care programs, includ-
ing but not limited to medical assistance and the Oregon Health Plan;
(g) Agree to provide telehealth services free of charge to students who are uninsured,
and to waive or reimburse students for cost-sharing incurred  for telehealth services received
through the pilot project; and
(h) Agree to cooperate with the department and school districts in evaluating the  pilot
project and to share information necessary for the evaluation.
(3) To participate in the pilot project, a school district must apply, agree  to make tele-
health services available through the  pilot project to all students within the school district
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2578
SB 701
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
and agree to cooperate with the department and the provider in evaluating  the pilot project.
(4) The department, in cooperation with  participating school districts, shall evaluate the
extent to which the pilot project increased student  access to health care services and make
recommendations on  whether the pilot project should be continued or expanded to other
school districts in this state. The department shall submit a report in the manner provided
by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to education and health care no later than September 15,
2026.
SECTION 2.
There is appropriated to the Department of  Education, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000 for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]