Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Forestry Department shall endeavor to enter into a fire response
and fire suppression contract with the United States Forest Service that:
(1) Pertains to fire response and fire suppression in Douglas County and Linn County.
(2) Is modeled after any similar, existing contract  between the department and the Bu-
reau of Land Management, to the extent practicable.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2274