Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 254.085 is amended to read:
254.085. (1) The Secretary of State, not later than the 61st  day before the date of a primary or
general election, shall file with each county clerk a statement of the federal and state offices to be
filled or  for which candidates are to be nominated in the county at the election, information con-
cerning all candidates for the offices, and the state measures to be voted on.
[(2) The information concerning candidates for  the Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, Oregon Tax
Court and circuit court shall include a designation of incumbent  for each candidate who is the regu-
larly elected or appointed judge of the court  to which the candidate seeks election. If a candidate was
regularly elected or appointed to a specific position or department on the court, the  candidate shall be
designated as the incumbent only if the person is a candidate for that position or department. ]
[(3)] (2)  Included with each state measure shall be the measure number, the latest ballot  title
certified by the Attorney General under ORS 250.067 (2) or, if the Supreme Court has  reviewed the
title under ORS 250.085, the title certified by the court and the financial estimates under ORS
250.125. The Secretary of State shall keep a copy of the statement.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 254.125 is amended to read:
254.125. (1) The names of candidates for a  nonpartisan office at a nominating election held on
the date of the primary election shall be  listed without political party designation on a nominating
ballot under the title, and department or position number if any, of the office.
(2) At the primary election or general election[ :]
[(a) The ], the  names of candidates who are opposed for nomination or election to the Supreme
Court, Court of Appeals,  Oregon Tax Court and circuit court shall be printed on the ballot before
the names of candidates for those offices who are unopposed[ ; and ]
[(b) The word “incumbent” shall follow  the name of each candidate for the Supreme Court, Court
of Appeals, Oregon Tax Court or circuit court who is  designated the incumbent by the Secretary of
State under ORS 254.085 ].
SECTION 3.  ORS 254.135 is amended to read:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 301
HB 4032
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
254.135. (1) The official general or special election ballot shall be styled  “Official Ballot” and
shall state:
(a) The name of the county for which it is intended.
(b) The date of the election.
(c) The names of all candidates  for offices to be filled at the election whose nominations have
been made and accepted and who have not died,  withdrawn or become disqualified. The ballot may
not contain the name of any other person.
(d) The number, ballot  title and financial estimates under ORS 250.125 of any measure to be
voted on at the election.
(2) The names of candidates for President and  Vice President of the United States shall be
printed in  groups together, with their political party designations. The names of the electors may
not be printed on the general election ballot. A vote for  the candidates for President and Vice
President is a vote for the group of  presidential electors supporting those candidates and selected
as provided by law. The general election ballot shall state that electors  of President and Vice
President are being elected and that a  vote for the candidates for President and Vice President shall
be a vote for the electors supporting those candidates.
(3)(a) The name of each candidate nominated shall be printed on the ballot  in but one place,
without regard to how many times the candidate may have been nominated, except  in circumstances
where a candidate may hold  more than one office or nomination without violating ORS 249.013. The
name of a political party, or names of  political parties, shall be printed with the name of a candidate
for other than nonpartisan office according to the following rules:
(A) For a candidate not  affiliated with a political party who is nominated by a minor political
party, the name of the minor political party shall be printed with the name of the candidate;
(B) For a candidate not affiliated with a political party who  is nominated by more than one
minor political party,  the names of not more than three minor political parties selected by the can-
didate shall be printed with the name of the candidate;
(C) For a candidate who is a member of a political party who is nominated by  a political party
of which the  candidate is not a member, the name of the political party that nominated the candi-
date shall be printed with the name of the candidate;
(D) For a candidate who is a member of a political  party who is nominated by more than one
political party of which the candidate is not a member, the names of not  more than three political
parties selected by the candidate shall be printed with the name of the candidate;
(E) For  a candidate who is nominated only by a political party of which the candidate is a
member, the name of the political party of  which the candidate is a member shall be printed with
the name of the candidate; and
(F) For a candidate who is nominated by a political party of which the candidate is a  member
and by any political  party or parties of which the candidate is not a member, the name of the poli-
tical party of which the candidate is a member and the names of not more than  two other political
parties selected by the candidate shall be printed with the name of the candidate.
(b) If a candidate is required to  select the name of a political party to be printed on the ballot
under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the candidate shall notify  the filing officer of the selection
not later than the 61st day before the day of the election.
[(c) The word “incumbent” shall  be printed with the name of each candidate for the Supreme Court,
Court of Appeals, Oregon  Tax Court or circuit court who is designated the incumbent by the Secretary
of State under ORS 254.085. ]
[2]
HB 4032
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
[(d)] (c) The word “nonaffiliated” shall be printed with the name of each candidate who is not
affiliated with a political party and who is nominated by an assembly of  electors or individual
electors.
[(e)] (d) If two or more candidates for the same  office have the same or similar surnames, the
location of their places of residence  shall be printed with their names to distinguish one from an-
other.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a)  of this section, the name of a candidate nominated for more
than one district office that is to be filled at the same election  shall be separately printed upon the
ballot for each district office for which the candidate is nominated.
[3]