Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Borrower” means an individual who executes  a mortgage loan with a lender to pur-
chase a dwelling.
(b) “Dwelling” means:
(A) A residence that is situated on and is part of real property and is intended for occu-
pation by a single family unit;
(B) A townhouse, as defined in ORS 197A.420; or
(C) A manufactured  home, as defined in ORS 446.003, that is situated on and is part of
real property that the manufactured home owner also owns.
(c) “First-time home buyer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 316.796.
(d) “Lender” means a credit union, as defined in ORS 723.008.
(e) “Mortgage loan” means a loan, extension of credit or retail sales  contract that a
lender provides to a first-time home buyer to purchase a dwelling that  is secured by a
mortgage, deed of trust or lien interest with the consent of the first-time home buyer.
(2) The  Department of Consumer and Business Services shall create a loan loss reserve
program to partially cover risks of loss for lenders that make mortgage  loans that meet the
criteria specified in subsection (3)(a) of this section. The department shall fund  the program
with moneys from the Welcome Home Assistance Program Fund established in section 2  of
this 2025 Act. The department may not pay a  claim for a loss from the fund unless the de-
partment determines that a  lender has demonstrated that the circumstances described in
subsection (4) of this section occurred and the lender provided the  documentation required
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3483
HB 3188
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under subsection (5) of this section.
(3) The department may pledge not more than 20 percent of the purchase price of a
dwelling as a guarantee against a lender’s claimed loss of a sum due as a repayment  of the
mortgage loan. A mortgage loan qualifies for the department’s guarantee only if:
(a) The mortgage loan:
(A) Finances 100 percent of a first-time home buyer’s  purchase of a dwelling without
requiring the first-time home buyer to provide a  down payment from the first-time home
buyer’s own funds and without requiring payment of mortgage insurance;
(B) Has a fixed interest rate and a repayment term of 30 years;
(C) Has an annual percentage rate that does not exceed one percentage point above the
annual percentage rate that applies to a mortgage  loan with similar terms that meets
guidelines set by the Federal National Mortgage Association;
(D) Meets underwriting requirements  that the lender applies in accordance with 12 C.F.R.
1026.43, as in effect on the effective date of this 2025 Act; and
(E) Includes an escrow account that  reserves the amount of funds necessary to pay
property taxes and insurance for a minimum of two months; and
(b) The first-time home buyer:
(A) Has  an income that does not exceed 130 percent of the median household income in
the county or region in which the dwelling is located, as measured by the United  States De-
partment of Housing and Urban Development; and
(B) Completes a home buyer education class the Department of  Consumer and Business
Services offers or approves by rule.
(4)(a) A lender may claim from the amount the department pledged as a guarantee  under
subsection (3) of this section a loss of an outstanding sum due as a repayment of  a mortgage
loan described in subsection (3)(a) of this section only if:
(A) The lender has lawfully foreclosed on the  mortgage loan that is subject to the
department’s guarantee not later than five years after the date on which the mortgage loan
originally closed;
(B) The dwelling that secured the mortgage loan was:
(i) Sold in a trustee’s sale under ORS 86.782, or  an execution sale under ORS 18.930, as
appropriate, and the sale proceeds paid to the lender  were less than the full outstanding
amount due to the lender as a repayment of the mortgage loan; or
(ii) Resold by the lender after the lender purchased the dwelling in a  sale described in
sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph and the proceeds of the lender’s resale did not
repay all of the outstanding amount due as a repayment of the mortgage loan; and
(C) The lender can document the loss in accordance with subsection (5) of this section.
(b) A  lender may make a claim under paragraph (a) of this subsection even if the lender
resells a dwelling the lender purchased in a sale described in paragraph (a)(B)(i) of  this sub-
section more than five years after the closing date of the mortgage loan.
(c) A lender may claim as a loss only the lesser of the  amount that the department
pledged as a guarantee  under paragraph (a) of this subsection or the actual amount of the
lender’s loss after applying the proceeds  from a sale described in paragraph (a)(B) of this
subsection toward repaying the outstanding sum due on the mortgage loan.
(5) A lender may show a loss of a sum due as a repayment of a mortgage loan  described
in subsection (3)(a) of this section by providing to the department:
[2]
HB 3188
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) A copy of the mortgage note and trust deed or mortgage document;
(b) The borrower’s repayment history for the mortgage loan;
(c) The outstanding balance on the mortgage loan;
(d) A copy of any agreement or  other document the department issued as a guarantee
for the mortgage loan;
(e) A certificate of compliance that a service provider, as defined in ORS 86.707,  issues
under ORS 86.736,  if the certificate of compliance is required in connection with the fore-
closure; and
(f) A receipt or other documentation that shows the  amount the lender received as pro-
ceeds from a sale of the  dwelling under subsection (4)(a)(B) of this section and the amount
of the mortgage loan that remains unpaid after applying the proceeds toward  repaying the
mortgage loan.
(6)(a) A lender shall release  the department in writing from the pledge described in sub-
section (3) of this section not later than five years after the  date on which the lender closed
the mortgage loan with the borrower or resold the  property under subsection (4)(a)(B)(ii) of
this section. The department may pledge the amount the  lender releases under this sub-
section as a guarantee for a different mortgage loan.
(b) The department may not pledge as guarantees  of mortgage loans under this section
more than the balance of the moneys in the Welcome Home Assistance Program Fund.
(7) If a lender recoups all or a portion of a loss the lender claimed under this section
from sources other than the proceeds of a  sale under subsection (4)(a)(B) of this section,
such as mortgage insurance or other loss mitigation, the department may seek a  re-
imbursement from the lender of the lesser  of the amount the lender received as a
recoupment of the loss  or the amount the department paid to the lender to satisfy the
lender’s claim under this section.
(8) The department  shall adopt rules necessary to implement the provisions of this sec-
tion. The rules, at a minimum, must specify:
(a) The forms, formats and contents for:
(A) The department’s pledge under subsection (3) of this section;
(B) A lender’s claim under this section; and
(C) The release the lender must execute under subsection (6) of this section;
(b) The contents of the home buyer education class required under subsection (3)(b)(B)
of this section or an approval of the provider and  contents of a class that another person
offers; and
(c) Criteria for verifying that a mortgage  loan for which the department issues a pledge
under subsection (3) of this section meets the qualifications required under  subsection (3)(a)
of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) There is established in the  State Treasury the Welcome Home Assistance
Program Fund, separate and distinct from the General Fund. The Department  of Consumer
and Business Services shall pay into the State Treasury to the credit of  the Welcome Home
Assistance Program Fund all moneys the department collects or  receives in connection with
the program described in section 1 of this  2025 Act, including appropriations to the depart-
ment, releases of amounts pledged as  mortgage loan guarantees, and reimbursements of
claims the department pays from the fund under section 1 of this 2025 Act. Moneys in the
fund may be invested  in the same manner as other state moneys and any interest earned
[3]
HB 3188
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
must be credited to the Welcome Home Assistance Program Fund.
(2) The department shall keep a record of all moneys deposited into the  Welcome Home
Assistance Program Fund, indicating in the record  by separate account the source of the
moneys, the interest earned and the activity against which the department charges  any
withdrawal.
(3) If moneys  credited to the Welcome Home Assistance Program Fund are withdrawn,
transferred or used for purposes other than the  purposes for which the fund was established,
interest accrues on the amount withdrawn from the date  of withdrawal until the date on
which the moneys are restored to the fund.
(4) Moneys  in the Welcome Home Assistance Program Fund are continuously appropri-
ated to the department for the department’s  administrative expenses and the department’s
duties under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(5) The department may self-insure or  obtain insurance or reinsurance against losses to
the fund from claims paid to lenders under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
There is appropriated to the Department of Consumer and Business Ser-
vices, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of
$2,500,000 for the purpose of  carrying out the department’s duties under sections 1 and 2 of
this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]