Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 4 of this 2024 Act:
(1) “Female” means the sex  that typically has the capacity to bear young or produce
eggs.
(2) “Male” means the sex that typically has the capacity to produce  relatively small,
usually motile, gametes that fertilize the eggs of a female individual.
[2]
HB 4037
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) “Medical health care professional” means the following individuals:
(a) A nurse licensed under ORS 678.010 to 678.410;
(b) A physician licensed under ORS chapter 677;
(c) A physician assistant licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525;
(d) A psychologist licensed under ORS 675.010 to 675.150;
(e) A pharmacist licensed under ORS chapter 689; or
(f) Other individual licensed to provide medical health care services.
(4) “Minor” means an individual who is under 18 years of age.
(5) “Sex” means the biological indication of male and female,  such as sex chromosomes,
naturally occurring sex hormones, gonads and nonambiguous internal and  external genitalia
present at birth, without  regard to an individual’s psychological, chosen or subjective expe-
rience.
(6)(a) “Sex alteration procedure”  means, when performed or used for the purpose of ap-
proximating the secondary sex characteristics of the opposite sex, a medical  or surgical
service, physician service, inpatient or outpatient hospital service  or prescription drug in-
tended to alter or remove physical or anatomical  characteristics or features that are typical
for the individual’s sex or to cosmetically create  physiological or anatomical characteristics
that resemble a sex different from the individual’s sex.
(b) “Sex alteration procedure” does not include:
(A) A service provided to an individual born  with a medically verifiable disorder of sex
development;
(B) A service provided to an individual diagnosed, through genetic  or biochemical testing,
with a disorder of sexual development resulting from  not having typical sex chromosome
structure, sex steroid hormone production or sex steroid hormone action; or
(C) The  treatment of an infection, injury, disease or disorder caused or exacerbated by
the performance of a sex alteration procedure.
SECTION 2.
(1) A medical health care professional may not, for  an individual who is a
minor:
(a) Perform a sex alteration procedure on the minor; or
(b) Refer the minor to another medical health care  professional for the purpose of ob-
taining a sex alteration procedure.
(2) A mental health professional may not  refer a minor to a medical health care profes-
sional for the purpose of obtaining a sex alteration procedure.
(3) An employee or contractor of a public or private school may not, for an  individual
who is a minor:
(a) Encourage or coerce the minor to withhold from the minor’s parent or legal  guardian
the fact that the minor’s self-perception is inconsistent with the minor’s sex; or
(b) Withhold from the minor’s  parent or legal guardian information related to the
minor’s self-perception being inconsistent with the minor’s sex.
SECTION 3.
(1) Public funds may not  be directly or indirectly used for or granted, paid
or distributed to an entity, organization or  individual that provides or performs a sex alter-
ation procedure to or for a minor.
(2) The health care services provided by or  in a health care facility owned or operated
by the state or a county or  local government, or by a physician or other individual employed
by the state or a county or local government, may not include  sex alteration procedures
[3]
HB 4037
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
provided to minors.
(3) Any amount paid by an individual or an entity for  the provision of sex alteration
procedures for minors, or as premiums for a  policy for health insurance that includes cov-
erage for sex alteration procedures for minors, is not tax deductible.
(4) Medical assistance may not include sex alteration procedures provided to minors.
(5) A policy for  health insurance may not provide payment or reimbursement for sex al-
teration procedures provided to minors.
SECTION 4.
The provision of a sex alteration procedure to a minor shall  be considered
unprofessional conduct by a  medical health care professional for which the medical health
care professional may be subject to disciplinary action by the appropriate health professional
licensing board.
SECTION 5.
(1) A person may bring a claim for a violation of  section 2 or 3 of this 2024
Act and recover economic and noneconomic damages, injunctive relief or declaratory relief.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, an action under this  section
must be commenced not later than two years after the action accrues.
(b) An individual subjected as  a minor to a violation of section 2 or 3 of this 2024 Act
may bring a claim under this section at any time before the individual reaches 38  years of
age.
(3) The court shall award reasonable attorney  fees to a prevailing plaintiff in a civil
action under this section.
(4) The Attorney General may bring an action  to enforce compliance with section 2 or 3
of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 6.  ORS 435.225 is amended to read:
435.225. (1) An officer, employee or agent of a public body  may refuse to accept the duty of of-
fering reproductive health care information and services to  the extent that such duty is contrary to
the personal or religious beliefs of the officer, employee or agent. However, such officer, employee
or agent shall notify  the immediate supervisor in writing of such refusal in order that arrangements
may be made for eligible  individuals to obtain such information and services from another officer,
employee or agent.
(2)(a) If an officer, employee or agent of a public body refuses to provide reproductive health
care information and services as provided in subsection (1) of this  section, the public body shall
immediately make arrangements for an individual to  receive reproductive health care information
and services from another officer, employee or agent of the public body.
(b) A public body is not required to make the arrangements described in paragraph  (a)
of this subsection if the  arrangements would constitute an impermissible referral of a minor
for a sex alteration procedure under section 2 of this 2024 Act.
(3) The refusal  of an officer, employee or agent of a public body to provide reproductive health
care information and services under subsection (1) of this section may not  be grounds for any dis-
ciplinary action, for dismissal, for any interdepartmental transfer, for any other  discrimination in
employment, or for suspension from employment, or for any loss in pay or other benefits.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 435.240 is amended to read:
435.240. (1) Except as provided in ORS  435.225 and sections 2 and 3 of this 2024 Act,  a
public body or[ , except as provided in ORS 435.225, ] an officer, employee or agent of a  public body
may not:
(a) Deprive  a consenting individual of the choice of exercising the individual’s reproductive
[4]
HB 4037
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
health rights under ORS 435.210;
(b) Interfere with  or restrict, in the regulation of benefits, facilities, services or information, the
choice of a consenting individual to exercise the  individual’s reproductive health rights under ORS
435.210;
(c) Prohibit a health care provider, who is acting within the scope  of the health care provider’s
license, from providing reproductive health care information and services  to a consenting individual;
(d) Interfere with  or restrict, in the regulation of benefits, facilities, services or information, the
choice of a  health care provider, who is acting within the scope of the health care provider’s license,
to provide reproductive health care information and services to a consenting individual;
(e) Subject an  individual to criminal or civil liability or penalty, or otherwise deprive the indi-
vidual of any rights, based on  the individual’s actions or omissions in exercising the individual’s
reproductive health rights under ORS 435.210, including any action or omission affecting an  actual,
potential or alleged pregnancy outcome; or
(f) Subject any person to criminal or civil liability or penalty, or  otherwise deprive any person
of the person’s rights, based solely on the person’s actions  in the provision of aid, assistance, re-
sources or support to an individual in the exercise of the individual’s reproductive health  rights,
provided that the person’s actions do not otherwise violate the laws of this state.
(2)(a) Nothing in this section is intended to prevent the application  of laws, rules, ordinances
or taxes that affect the method or manner of sales or distribution of contraceptive  devices or the
provision of reproductive health care, provided that the laws, rules, ordinances or taxes are designed
to promote public health and safety and do not unreasonably burden public access  to contraception
or other reproductive health care.
(b) Nothing in this section requires a public  body to provide or pay for reproductive health care.
SECTION 8.
This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[5]