Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 455.
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall develop  and
maintain statewide maps identifying categories of wildfire risk for the purpose of  applying
appropriate construction  standards to reduce and mitigate the risk of destructive fires in and
around residential structures.
(2) In developing and maintaining the maps required under  subsection (1) of this section,
the department shall engage the Oregon State University College of Forestry and  affected
local governments  and shall make the maps available in an appropriate electronic format
that is accessible at  little or no expense to the public. The department may enter into an
agreement with the university  or with a local government under ORS 190.110 for any services
required to develop and maintain the maps described in this section.
(3) The department shall update the state building code  to require appropriate fire pro-
tection standards for residential structures, based on the  fire risk identified in the maps the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3181
HB 3240
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
department develops and maintains under this section. The code must contain separate and
appropriate fire protection standards for at least three levels of risk.
SECTION 3.
Not later than September 15,  2021, the Department of Consumer and Busi-
ness Services and the Oregon State University  College of Forestry shall report to an appro-
priate interim committee of  the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided under ORS
192.245 concerning progress on developing and maintaining the maps and updates to the state
building code required under section 2 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]