Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “law enforcement unit” has the meaning given
that term in ORS 181A.355.
(2) The Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission shall adopt rules requiring law enforcement
units to report to  the commission, within 24 hours after the incident or complaint, the use
of deadly force by the law enforcement unit, deaths of persons  in custody of the law
enforcement unit and complaints of sexual assault, sexual harassment and domestic violence
against employees of the law enforcement unit.
(3) The commission shall publish  an annual report on the extent, distribution and demo-
graphics of the reports received under subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 2. The Department of Justice shall establish a division within the  department
to aid and support families of persons killed or seriously injured by police.
SECTION 3. (1) The Office of Law  Enforcement Oversight is established in the Division
of Audits of the office of the Secretary of State.
(2)(a) The Office of Law Enforcement Oversight shall be managed by  a director appointed
under section 4 of this 2023 Act.
(b) The director shall be paid a salary as provided by law or,  if not so provided, as pre-
scribed by the Advisory Board on Law Enforcement Oversight established in  section 4 of this
2023 Act.
(c) The director shall appoint the employees  of the office, prescribe their duties and fix
their compensation.
(3) The office shall study the  system of investigation, prosecution and victim support
related to the use of lethal force by law enforcement officers, deaths of  persons in the cus-
tody of law enforcement and serious criminal misconduct by law enforcement officers.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2909
SB 236
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
(4) The office shall report at least annually to  an appropriate committee or interim
committee of the Legislative Assembly on the topics described in subsection (3) of this  sec-
tion, and on the  efficacy, transparency, fiscal impact and justice of the system addressing
the issues described in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The Department of Justice and  the Department of State Police are directed to assist
the office in the performance of the  duties of the office and to provide data to the office as
required by the office.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Advisory Board  on Law Enforcement Oversight is created. The board
consists of nine members appointed by the Secretary of State.
(2) The term of a member of the board is four years.
(3) If there is a vacancy in one of  the positions of the board, the Secretary of State shall
appoint a new member from a list of candidates  submitted by the remaining members of the
board.
(4) The members of the board shall select from among themselves a chairperson and a
vice chairperson.
(5) The board shall meet at such times and places as determined by the chairperson.
(6) A majority of the members of the  board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business.
(7) Official action by the board requires the approval of a majority of the members of  the
board.
(8) Members of the board are not entitled  to compensation or reimbursement for ex-
penses and serve as volunteers on the board.
(9) The office of the Secretary of State shall provide staff support for the board.
(10) The board shall:
(a) Appoint the director of the Office of Law Enforcement Oversight.
(b) Study the operations of the Office of Law Enforcement Oversight.
(c) Make any recommendations to the  Legislative Assembly that the board deems nec-
essary to increase the effectiveness of the Office of Law Enforcement Oversight.
(d) Make any recommendations for additional legislation related to  the work of the Office
of Law Enforcement Oversight.
(e) Conduct such other studies as necessary  to accomplish the purposes of this sub-
section.
SECTION 5.
(1) Notwithstanding the term of office set forth in section 4 of this 2023 Act,
of the members first appointed to the Advisory Board on Law Enforcement Oversight:
(a) Three shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2025.
(b) Three shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2026.
(c) Three shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2027.
(2) Notwithstanding section 4 of this 2023 Act, the Secretary of  State shall appoint the
first members of the board under this section  without considering the recommendations of
the board.
[2]