Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS chapter 279B.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Common off-the-shelf software” means a  predeveloped software product or service
that is commercially available for  a broad user base, has a standardized set of features and
does not otherwise require  extensive customization for use on most common information
technology platforms or in most common information technology environments.
(b) “Information technology marketplace portal” means a  structured and curated digital
catalog from which a contracting agency can identify, select,  purchase and obtain or receive
delivery of common off-the-shelf software and other standardized  information technology
products and services at predetermined prices and discounts.
(2) A contracting agency shall purchase  common off-the-shelf software, or other infor-
mation technology products or services that do not require extensive customization to meet
the contracting agency’s specifications, from an  information technology marketplace portal
if:
(a) The State Chief Information Officer has preapproved  the information technology
marketplace portal for use under subsection (3) of this section;
(b) The contracting agency’s  specifications for the information technology do not require
extensive customization;
(c) The price, applicable discounts, time of delivery or other terms and conditions  related
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1268
SB 1089
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to the purchase are more  favorable to the contracting agency than other purchase methods
would be; and
(d) The total value of the purchase does not exceed a cap that the State  Chief Informa-
tion Officer specifies by rule.
(3) The State Chief Information Officer shall select by means of a  competitive process,
and preapprove for use by contracting agencies, one or  more information technology mar-
ketplace portals that the State Chief Information  Officer determines will provide the best
value to the state. An information technology marketplace portal that the State Chief In-
formation Officer selects and preapproves must, at a minimum, offer:
(a) Software, data and services that contracting  agencies require for common business
tasks;
(b) Products and services from both the person that provides  and maintains the infor-
mation technology marketplace portal and, on an  equal basis and without favor or discrimi-
nation, from third parties, including third parties that are headquartered in, have a  principal
place of business in or are otherwise based in this state;
(c) Competitive pricing  and a sufficiently large and wide range of products or services
necessary to meet the needs  of contracting agencies in this state, including software, soft-
ware as a service, professional services, large datasets, machine learning algorithms and
images;
(d) Extensive capability for searching and filtering by price, features, vendor or product
name, platform, feature set, compliance standard and other appropriate selection criteria;
(e) Transactional capability for  immediate purchases that allows for accepting purchase
orders, negotiated contracts and a variety of payment instruments;
(f) A high level of security and  confidentiality and an ability to view and verify the use
of security protocols that apply to searches and purchases; and
(g) Any other features the State Chief Information Officer specifies by rule.
(4) A contracting agency’s purchase by means of an information  technology marketplace
portal under subsection (2) of this  section is not subject to the provisions of ORS 279B.055,
279B.060, 279B.070 or 279B.075.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon  Department of Administrative Services shall create a pro-
gram to make loans and grants to state agencies for the following purposes:
(a) To improve, retire or replace existing  information technology systems for the purpose
of:
(A) Providing and enhancing adequate,  risk-based and cost-effective cybersecurity sol-
utions to respond to evolving threats to information security;
(B) Transitioning legacy  information technology systems to cloud computing and other
innovative commercial platforms and technologies; and
(C) Improving  the efficiency and effectiveness of information technology that state
agencies use to conduct public business;
(b) To improve service delivery to residents of this state; and
(c) To fund projects that develop or implement artificial intelligence or  that develop
otherwise innovative approaches to fulfilling the purposes identified in paragraph (a)  of this
subsection.
(2)(a) In implementing the program described in subsection (1) of  this section, the de-
partment shall consult with and obtain the approval of  an advisory board with respect to
[2]
SB 1089
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
decisions to award a grant or loan. The advisory board must have nine members who  must
be appointed as follows:
(A) The Governor shall appoint seven members who are:
(i) The State Chief Procurement Officer or an individual  whom the State Chief Procure-
ment Officer designates as a representative;
(ii) The State Chief Information Officer or an individual whom the State Chief Informa-
tion Officer designates as a representative;
(iii) The Director of  the Oregon Department of Emergency Management, or an individual
whom the director designates as a representative; and
(iv) Four high-level employees  of state agencies with extensive knowledge and experience
in information technology development,  financial management, cybersecurity and privacy
protection and technology acquisition.
(B) The Legislative Fiscal Officer shall appoint an employee of the office  who ordinarily
serves as staff support  for the Joint Committee on Information Management and Technol-
ogy.
(C) The State Court Administrator shall appoint a member  that represents the judicial
department.
(b) A  member of the advisory board described in paragraph (a) of this subsection is not
entitled to additional pay, allowances or benefits as compensation for  the member’s service
on the board.
(c) In  identifying and appointing the members described in paragraph (a)(A)(iv) of this
subsection, the Governor shall  consult with labor organizations that represent employees
with information technology backgrounds or expertise.
(3)(a) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services, in consultation  with, and with
the approval of, the  advisory board described in subsection (2) of this section, shall develop
a process for receiving applications for grants or loans that  the department makes from the
Technology Modernization Fund established under section 4 of this  2025 Act, criteria for
evaluating the applications and a process for awarding grants  or providing loans, as appro-
priate, to approved recipients. The department and board shall prioritize for grants  or loans
projects that will, or are likely to,  result in significant estimated cost savings for the recip-
ient of the grant or loan.
(b) A recipient of a grant or loan under paragraph (a) of this subsection  must conduct
any procurement with moneys from the grant  or loan in an open competitive process in ac-
cordance with the Public Contracting Code and other applicable law.
(4)(a) To the extent that a  project that the department funds as provided in subsection
(3) of this section results in cost savings to the grant or loan recipient that  are attributable
to information  technology improvements, upgrades, modernizations or replacements, the
recipient shall transfer to the department an amount that is equivalent to the savings  the
recipient realized. The department shall deposit any  amounts the department receives under
this subsection to the State Treasury and to the credit  of the Technology Modernization
Fund.
(b) The department and the advisory board, in  consultation with each recipient of a grant
or loan, shall collectively determine how to measure and account for the  cost savings de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection. The  department, board and recipient shall adopt
a method  of measurement and accounting that prioritizes maintaining the solvency of the
[3]
SB 1089
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Technology Management Fund.
(c) A state agency may make a transfer described in paragraph  (a) of this subsection
from funds appropriated to the state agency for information  technology activities, oper-
ations, maintenance or acquisitions.
(5) A grant or loan that a state agency receives under this section  does not supplant
funds that the state agency receives from appropriations for the  purpose of operating or
maintaining the state agency’s information technology.
(6) Not later than July 1  and December 31 of each year, the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services shall submit a report as provided in ORS 192.245  to the Joint Commit-
tee on Information Management and Technology. The report must:
(a) Assess the ongoing costs associated with  establishing the Technology Modernization
Fund and with overseeing and administering  the program described in subsection (1) of this
section and compare the costs with any savings  realized from funding state agency projects
with moneys from the fund;
(b) Evaluate the reliability of the cost  savings the department determines under sub-
section (3)(a) of this section in comparison with the  cost savings the department determines
under subsection (4)(a) of this section;
(c) Determine whether recipients of  loans and grants under subsection (3) of this section
used an open competitive process to procure goods or services using  moneys from the grant
or loan; and
(d) List the numbers of projects for which the department awarded  a grant or provided
a loan, the amount and recipient of each grant or  loan and the purpose and goals of each
grant or loan.
SECTION 4.
(1) There is created in the State Treasury the  Technology Modernization
Fund, separate and distinct from  the General Fund. The Oregon Department of Administra-
tive Services shall pay into the State Treasury, to the credit of the Technology Modernization
Fund, all moneys the department collects or receives as appropriations to  the department,
as grants or transfers  from federal agencies or other sources of federal funds, as repayments
and reimbursements from state agencies that receive loans from the fund and from all  other
sources that designate the Technology Modernization Fund as a recipient  of donations,
grants or contributions. Moneys in the  fund may be invested in the same manner as other
state moneys and any interest earned must be credited  to the Technology Modernization
Fund.
(2) The department shall keep a record of all moneys deposited into  the Technology
Modernization Fund, indicating in the record by separate account the source of the  moneys,
the interest earned and the activity against which the department charges any withdrawal.
(3) If moneys credited  to the Technology Modernization Fund are withdrawn, transferred
or used for purposes other than the purposes  for which the fund was established, interest
accrues on the amount withdrawn from the date of withdrawal until the date  on which the
moneys are restored to the fund.
(4) Moneys in the Technology Modernization Fund are continuously appropriated  to the
department for the department’s administrative  expenses and the department’s duties under
section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000
[4]
SB 1089
1
2
3
4
5
for the purpose of carrying out the department’s duties under section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[5]