Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Forestry Department shall establish by rule a pilot grant pro-
gram for the purpose of managing wildfire risk by promoting the use of air curtains  by per-
sons that make biochar.
(2) In administering the program, the department:
(a) Shall develop criteria for receiving a grant and a process for applying for  a grant; and
(b) May require a recipient  of a grant to report to the department on the use of the grant
funds.
SECTION 2.
There is appropriated to the State Forestry Department, for the biennium
beginning on July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $  for the purpose
of funding the grant program described in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on June 30, 2023.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3172