Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Policy and Research  Director shall study methods for legis-
lative oversight of administrative rules  and report to an appropriate committee or interim
committee of the Legislative Assembly no later than September 15, 2020.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1128