Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section and section 2 of this 2023 Act:
(a) “Federal firearms licensee” means  a person licensed as a dealer, manufacturer or
importer under 18 U.S.C. 923.
(b) “Firearm” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.210.
(c) “Firearm hold agreement” means  a private transaction between a federal firearms
licensee or other person  and an individual firearm owner in which the licensee or other
person takes physical possession of the owner’s lawfully possessed  firearm at the owner’s
request, holds the firearm  for an agreed-upon period of time and returns the firearm to the
owner according to the terms of the agreement.
(2) A federal firearms licensee  or any other person who may lawfully possess firearms
may enter into a firearm hold agreement with  a firearm owner. The firearm hold agreement
may not require the payment of a fee in exchange for holding or storing a firearm.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a federal  firearms licensee
or other person who takes physical possession of a  firearm pursuant to a firearm hold
agreement is immune  from civil liability arising from taking possession of the firearm,
storing the firearm or returning the firearm to the owner.
(b) The immunity described in paragraph (a) of this subsection does not  apply to a civil
action based upon the licensee’s or person’s unlawful conduct.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon  Health Authority shall by rule create a grant program to
fund the storage of firearms pursuant to firearm hold agreements.  The authority shall es-
tablish grant eligibility criteria and an application and selection process for the program.
(2) A federal firearms licensee or any other person who may  lawfully possess a firearm,
who intends to store or is storing a firearm pursuant to a firearm hold agreement, may apply
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3138
HB 3513
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to the authority for a grant to fund the storage of the firearm.
(3) Grant funds  awarded under this section may be used for any costs associated with
storing firearms pursuant to a firearm hold agreement.
(4) The authority shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $
, to fund the grant program  described section 2
of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4.  ORS 166.291, as amended by section 5, chapter 97, Oregon Laws 2022, is  amended
to read:
166.291. (1) The sheriff of a county, upon a person’s application  for an Oregon concealed
handgun license, upon receipt of the  appropriate fees and after compliance with the procedures set
out in this section, shall issue the person a concealed handgun license if the person:
(a)(A) Is a citizen of the United States; or
(B) Is a legal resident noncitizen who can document continuous residency in the county  for at
least six months and has declared in  writing to the United States Citizenship and Immigration Ser-
vices  the  intent to acquire citizenship status and can present proof of the written declaration to the
sheriff at the time of application for the license;
(b) Is at least 21 years of age;
(c) Is a resident of the county;
(d) Has no outstanding warrants for arrest;
(e) Is not free on any form of pretrial release;
(f) Demonstrates competence with a handgun by any one of the following:
(A) Completion of any  hunter education or hunter safety course approved by the State Depart-
ment of Fish and Wildlife or a  similar agency of another state if handgun safety [ was a component ]
and the use of firearm  hold agreements for firearm suicide prevention were components  of
the course;
(B) Completion of any National Rifle Association firearms safety or training course if  handgun
safety [was a component ] and the use of firearm hold agreements for firearm suicide prevention
were components of the course;
(C) Completion of any  firearms safety or training course or class available to the general public
offered  by  law enforcement, community college, or private or public institution or organization or
firearms training school utilizing  instructors certified by the National Rifle Association or a law
enforcement agency if handgun safety [ was a  component] and the use of firearm hold agreements
for firearm suicide prevention were components  of the course;
(D) Completion of any law enforcement firearms safety or training course or  class offered for
security guards, investigators, reserve law enforcement officers or  any other law enforcement offi-
cers if handgun safety [ was a component ] and the use of firearm hold  agreements for firearm
suicide prevention were components of the course;
(E) Presents evidence  of equivalent experience with a handgun through participation in organ-
ized shooting competition or military service;
(F) Is licensed or has been licensed to carry a firearm in this state, unless  the license has been
revoked;  or
(G) Completion of any firearms training or safety course or class conducted  by a firearms in-
structor certified by a law enforcement agency or the National Rifle  Association if handgun safety
[2]
HB 3513
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[was a component ] and the use of firearm hold agreements for firearm suicide  prevention were
components of the course;
(g) Has never been  convicted of a felony or found guilty, except for insanity under ORS 161.295,
of a felony;
(h) Has  not been convicted of a misdemeanor or found guilty, except for insanity under ORS
161.295, of a misdemeanor within the four years prior  to the application, including a misdemeanor
conviction for the possession of marijuana as described in paragraph (L) of this subsection;
(i) Has not been committed to the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 426.130;
(j) Has not been found to be  a person with mental illness and is not subject to an order under
ORS 426.130 that the person be prohibited from purchasing or possessing a firearm as a result of
that mental illness;
(k) Has been discharged from the jurisdiction of  the juvenile court for more than four years if,
while a minor, the person was found to be within  the jurisdiction of the juvenile court for having
committed an act that,  if committed by an adult, would constitute a felony or a misdemeanor in-
volving violence, as defined in ORS 166.470;
(L) Has not been convicted of an offense involving controlled  substances or participated in a
court-supervised drug diversion program, except  this disability does not operate to exclude a person
if:
(A) The person can demonstrate  that the person has been convicted only once of a marijuana
possession offense that constituted a misdemeanor or violation under the law of the jurisdiction of
the offense, and has not completed a drug diversion program for a marijuana possession offense  that
constituted a misdemeanor or violation under the law of the jurisdiction of the offense; or
(B) The person can demonstrate that the  person has only once completed a drug diversion pro-
gram for a marijuana possession offense that constituted a misdemeanor or violation  under the law
of the jurisdiction of the offense, and has not been convicted of a  marijuana possession offense that
constituted a misdemeanor or violation under the law of the jurisdiction of the offense;
(m) Is not subject to  a citation issued under ORS 163.735 or an order issued under ORS 30.866,
107.700 to 107.735 or 163.738;
(n) Has not received a dishonorable discharge from the Armed Forces of the United States;
(o) Is not required to register as a sex offender in any state; and
(p) Is not presently subject to an order under ORS 426.133 prohibiting the person from pur-
chasing or possessing a firearm.
(2) A person who has been granted relief under ORS 166.273, 166.274 or  166.293 or 18 U.S.C.
925(c) or has had the person’s  record expunged under the laws of this state or equivalent laws of
other jurisdictions is not subject to the disabilities in subsection (1)(g) to (L) of this section.
(3) Before the sheriff may issue a license:
(a) The application must  state the applicant’s legal name, current address and telephone number,
date and place of birth, hair and eye color and height and weight. The application must also list  the
applicant’s residence address or addresses for the previous three years. The application must contain
a statement by the applicant that the applicant meets the requirements of subsection (1)  of this
section. The application may include the  Social Security number of the applicant if the applicant
voluntarily provides this number. The application must be signed by the applicant.
(b) The applicant must  submit to fingerprinting and photographing by the sheriff. The sheriff
shall fingerprint and photograph  the applicant and shall conduct any investigation necessary to
corroborate the requirements listed under subsection  (1) of this section. If a nationwide criminal
[3]
HB 3513
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
records check is necessary, the sheriff shall request  the Department of State Police to conduct the
check, including fingerprint identification, through the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The Federal
Bureau of  Investigation shall return the fingerprint cards used to conduct the criminal records
check and may not keep any record  of the fingerprints. The Department of State Police shall report
the results of the fingerprint-based criminal records check  to the sheriff. The Department of State
Police shall also furnish the sheriff with any  information about the applicant that the Department
of State Police may have in its possession including, but  not limited to, manual or computerized
criminal offender information.
(4) Application forms for concealed  handgun licenses shall be supplied by the sheriff upon re-
quest. The forms shall be uniform throughout this state in substantially the following form:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
APPLICATION FOR LICENSE TO CARRY
CONCEALED HANDGUN
 Date
I hereby declare as follows:
I am a citizen of the United States or a legal  resident noncitizen who can document continuous
residency in the county for at least six months and have  declared in writing to the United States
Citizenship and Immigration Services my intention to become a citizen  and can present proof of the
written declaration to the sheriff at the time of  this application. I am at least 21 years of age. I have
been discharged from the jurisdiction of  the juvenile court for more than four years if, while a mi-
nor, I was found to be within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court  for having committed an act that,
if committed by an adult, would constitute a felony or  a misdemeanor involving violence, as defined
in ORS 166.470.  I have never been convicted of a felony or found guilty, except for insanity under
ORS 161.295, of a felony in the State of  Oregon or elsewhere. I have not, within the last four years,
been convicted  of a misdemeanor or found guilty, except for insanity under ORS 161.295, of a
misdemeanor. Except as provided in ORS 166.291  (1)(L), I have not been convicted of an offense in-
volving controlled substances or completed a court-supervised drug diversion  program. There are
no outstanding warrants for my arrest and I am not free  on any form of pretrial release. I have not
been committed to the Oregon Health Authority under  ORS 426.130, nor have I been found to be a
person with mental illness and presently subject to an order prohibiting  me from purchasing or
possessing a firearm  because of mental illness. I am not under a court order to participate in as-
sisted outpatient treatment that includes an  order prohibiting me from purchasing or possessing a
firearm. If any of the previous conditions do apply to  me, I have been granted relief or wish to pe-
tition for  relief from the disability under ORS 166.273, 166.274 or 166.293 or 18 U.S.C. 925(c) or have
had the records expunged. I am not subject to a citation issued under ORS 163.735 or an order is-
sued under ORS 30.866,  107.700 to 107.735 or 163.738. I have never received a dishonorable discharge
from the Armed  Forces of the United States. I am not required to register as a sex offender in any
state. I understand I will be fingerprinted and photographed.
Legal name 
Age  Date of birth 
Place of birth 
Social Security number 
(Disclosure of your Social Security account  number is voluntary.  Solicitation  of the number is au-
[4]
HB 3513
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
thorized under ORS 166.291. It will be used only as a means of identification.)
Proof of identification (Two pieces of current identification  are required, one of which must bear a
photograph of the applicant. The type of identification and the number on the identification are to
be filled in by the sheriff.):
1.
2.
Height  Weight 
Hair color  Eye color 
Current address 
 (List residence addresses for the
 past three years on the back.)
City  County  Zip 
Phone 
I have read the entire text of this application, and the statements  therein are correct and true.
(Making false statements on this application is a misdemeanor.)
 (Signature of Applicant)
Character references.
Name:  Address
Name:  Address
Approved  Disapproved  by 
Competence with handgun demonstrated by  (to be filled in by sheriff)
Date  Fee Paid 
License No. 
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(5)(a) Fees for concealed handgun licenses are:
(A) $15 to the Department of State Police for conducting the  fingerprint check of the applicant.
(B) $100 to the sheriff for the initial issuance of a concealed handgun license.
(C) $75 to the sheriff for the renewal of a concealed handgun license.
(D) $15 to the sheriff for the duplication of a license because of loss or change of address.
(b) The sheriff may enter into an agreement with  the Department of Transportation to produce
the concealed handgun license.
(6) No civil or criminal liability  shall attach to the sheriff or any authorized representative en-
gaged in the receipt and review of, or an investigation connected with,  any application for, or in the
[5]
HB 3513
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
issuance, denial or revocation of, any license under  ORS 166.291 to 166.295 as a result of the lawful
performance of duties under those sections.
(7) Immediately upon acceptance of an application for a concealed handgun license, the  sheriff
shall enter the applicant’s name into the Law Enforcement  Data System indicating that the person
is an applicant for a concealed handgun license or is a license holder.
(8) The county sheriff may waive the residency requirement in subsection  (1)(c) of this section
for a resident of a contiguous state who has a compelling business  interest or other legitimate
demonstrated need.
(9) For purposes of subsection (1)(c) of this section, a person is a resident of  a county if the
person:
(a) Has  a current Oregon driver license issued to the person showing a residence address in the
county;
(b) Is registered to vote in the county and has  a voter notification card issued to the person
under ORS 247.181 showing a residence address in the county;
(c) Has documentation showing that the  person currently leases or owns real property in the
county; or
(d) Has documentation showing that  the person filed an Oregon tax return for the most recent
tax year showing a residence address in the county.
(10) As used in this section, “drug diversion program” means a  program in which a defendant
charged with a marijuana possession offense completes a program  under court supervision and in
which the marijuana possession offense is  dismissed upon successful completion of the diversion
program.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 166.435, as amended by section 7, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended
to read:
166.435. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Transfer” means the delivery of a firearm from a transferor  to a transferee, including, but
not limited to, the sale,  gift, loan or lease of the firearm. “Transfer” does not include the temporary
provision of a firearm to a transferee if the transferor  has no reason to believe the transferee is
prohibited from possessing a firearm or intends to use the firearm in the commission of a  crime, and
the provision occurs:
(A) At a shooting range,  shooting gallery or other area designed for the purpose of target
shooting, for use during  target practice, a firearms safety or training course or class or a similar
lawful activity;
(B) For the  purpose of hunting, trapping or target shooting, during the time in which the
transferee is engaged in activities related to hunting, trapping or target shooting;
(C) Under circumstances in which the  transferee and the firearm are in the presence of the
transferor;
(D) To a transferee who is in the business of repairing firearms,  for the time during which the
firearm is being repaired;
(E) To a transferee who is  in the business of making or repairing custom accessories for
firearms, for the time during which the accessories are being made or repaired; or
(F) For the purpose of preventing imminent death or serious physical injury, and  the provision
lasts only as long as is necessary to prevent the death or serious physical injury.
(b) “Transferee” means a person who is not a  gun dealer or licensed as a manufacturer or
importer under 18 U.S.C. 923 and who intends to receive a firearm from a transferor.
[6]
HB 3513
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) “Transferor” means a person who is not a gun dealer  or licensed as a manufacturer or
importer under 18 U.S.C. 923 and who intends to deliver a firearm to a transferee.
(2) Except as provided in ORS  166.436 and 166.438 and subsection (4) of this section, a transferor
may not transfer a firearm to a transferee unless the transfer is completed through  a gun dealer as
described in subsection (3) of this section.
(3)(a) A transferor may transfer a firearm to a transferee only as provided in this section. Except
as provided in  paragraph (b) of this subsection, prior to the transfer both the transferor and the
transferee must appear in person  before a gun dealer, with the firearm and a valid permit-to-
purchase issued to  the transferee under section 4, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2023, and request that
the gun dealer perform a criminal background check on the transferee.
(b) If the transferor and the  transferee reside over 40 miles from each other, the transferor may
ship or deliver the  firearm to a gun dealer located near the transferee or a gun dealer designated
by the transferee, and the transferor need not appear before the gun dealer in person.
(c) A gun dealer who  agrees to complete a transfer of a firearm under this section shall request
a criminal history record check on the transferee as  described in ORS 166.412 and shall comply with
all requirements of federal law.
(d) If, upon completion of a criminal background check, the gun dealer:
(A) Receives a unique approval number from the Department of  State Police indicating that the
transferee is qualified to complete the transfer, the gun dealer shall notify the transferor,  enter the
firearm into the gun dealer’s inventory and transfer the firearm to the transferee.
(B) Receives notification  that the transferee is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing
or receiving the firearm or that the department is unable to determine if the transferee is qualified
or disqualified from completing the  transfer, the gun dealer shall notify the transferor and neither
the transferor nor the gun dealer shall transfer the firearm to the transferee. If the transferor
shipped or delivered the firearm to the gun dealer pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection, the
gun dealer shall comply with federal law when returning the firearm to the transferor.
(e) A gun dealer may  charge a reasonable fee for facilitating a firearm transfer pursuant to this
section.
(4) The requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of this section do not apply to:
(a) The transfer of a firearm by or to a law enforcement agency, or by or  to a law enforcement
officer, private security professional or member  of the Armed Forces of the United States, while that
person is acting within the scope of official duties.
(b) The transfer of a firearm as part of a firearm turn-in or buyback event, in which  a law
enforcement agency receives or purchases firearms from members of the public.
(c) The transfer of a firearm to:
(A) A transferor’s spouse or domestic partner;
(B) A transferor’s parent or stepparent;
(C) A transferor’s child or stepchild;
(D) A transferor’s sibling;
(E) A transferor’s grandparent;
(F) A transferor’s grandchild;
(G) A transferor’s aunt or uncle;
(H) A transferor’s first cousin;
(I) A transferor’s niece or nephew; or
(J) The spouse or domestic partner of a person specified in subparagraphs (B) to (I) of this par-
[7]
HB 3513
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
agraph.
(d) The transfer of a firearm that occurs because of the death of the firearm owner,  provided
that:
(A) The  transfer is conducted or facilitated by a personal representative, as defined in ORS
111.005, or a trustee of a trust created in a will; and
(B) The  transferee is related to the deceased firearm owner in a manner specified in paragraph
(c) of this subsection.
(e) The transfer of a firearm pursuant to a firearm  hold agreement under section 1 of
this 2023 Act.
(5)(a) A transferor who fails  to comply with the requirements of this section commits a Class
A misdemeanor.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection, a transferor who fails to comply with the
requirements of this section commits a Class  B felony if the transferor has a previous conviction
under this section at the time of the offense.
[8]