Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 443.705 to
443.825.
SECTION 2. (1) An adult foster home may not serve more than five  older adults unless
the home meets the following criteria as prescribed by the Department of  Human Services
by rule:
(a) The adult foster home provider received an initial  license to operate an adult foster
home at least 24 months prior to applying for a license to serve additional residents;
(b) The provider has been licensed to provide adult foster care to five residents  for at
least 12 months prior to applying for a license to serve additional residents;
(c) There  have been at least two full inspections of the home without any enforcement
actions by the department;
(d) The provider attests that  the increase in the number of residents will not adversely
affect the health, safety or quality of life of the home’s current residents;
(e) The home is  in compliance with all department rules regarding emergency evacu-
ations;
(f) The provider has filed a new evacuation plan to address how the provider will evacuate
the increased number of residents;
(g) The home has a residential sprinkler system in place and the home is in  compliance
with all fire and safety regulations adopted by the department by rule,  including any rules
adopted in accordance with subsection (2) of this section; and
(h) The provider has paid fees established by the department by rule.
(2) The department shall adopt rules necessary to ensure the  safety of residents in adult
foster homes licensed under this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 205
SB 1591
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 3.
 ORS 443.705 is amended to read:
443.705. As used in ORS 443.705 to 443.825:
(1) “Adult foster home” means any family home or facility in which residential  care is provided
in a homelike environment for [ five or fewer ] up to seven  adults  who are not related to the provider
by blood or marriage.
(2) “Licensed adult  foster home” means a home which has been investigated and approved by
the licensing agency. This includes an in-person site inspection of the facility.
(3) “Licensing agency” means:
(a) The Department of Human Services for adult foster homes licensed by the department.
(b) The Oregon Health Authority for adult foster homes licensed by the authority.
(4) “Provider” means any person operating an adult foster home and includes a resident man-
ager. “Provider” does not include the owner or lessor of the building in which the  adult foster home
is located or the owner or lessor of the land on which  the adult foster home is situated unless the
owner or lessor is also the operator of the adult foster home.
(5) “Residential care” means the  provision of room and board and services that assist the resi-
dent in activities of daily living, such as assistance with bathing, dressing, grooming,  eating,
medication management, money management or recreation.
(6) “Substitute  caregiver” means any person who provides care and services in an adult foster
home under the jurisdiction of the licensing agency in the absence  of the provider or resident
manager.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 443.734 is amended to read:
443.734. Consistent with the requirements of ORS 443.705 to 443.825:
(1) The Department of Human Services shall adopt:
(a) Rules for the licensing of adult foster homes that provide residential care to :
(A) Five or fewer  older adults ; and
(B) Six or seven older adults in accordance with section 2 of this 2024 Act ;
(b) Rules for the licensing of adult foster homes that provide residential care to  individuals with
physical disabilities; and
(c) Rules for the licensing of adult foster homes that provide residential care to individuals  with
intellectual or developmental disabilities.
(2) The Oregon Health  Authority shall adopt rules for the licensing of adult foster homes that
provide residential care to individuals with mental illness.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 443.400 is amended to read:
443.400. As used in ORS 443.400 to 443.455 and 443.991, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Behavioral health needs” means mental, emotional or behavioral disturbances.
(2) “Conversion facility” means a facility that has applied for, or been issued,  a conversion fa-
cility license as described in ORS 443.431.
(3) “Direct care staff” means the employees of a residential facility whose primary responsibil-
ities are to provide personal care services to residents, including but not limited to:
(a) Administering medications;
(b) Coordinating resident-focused activities;
(c) Supervising and supporting residents;
(d) Supporting activities of daily living,  including but not limited to bathing, dressing, eating and
transferring; and
(e) Serving but not preparing meals.
[2]
SB 1591
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) “Licensing agency” means:
(a) The Department of Human Services, if the residential  facility that is licensed, or that the
Director of Human Services determines should  be licensed, is a residential care facility, residential
training facility or residential training home; or
(b) The Oregon Health Authority, if  the residential facility that is licensed, or that the Director
of the Oregon Health Authority determines should be licensed, is a residential treatment facility  or
residential treatment home.
(5) “Resident”  means any individual residing in a facility who receives residential care, treat-
ment or training. For purposes of ORS 443.400 to 443.455, an individual is not considered to be  a
resident if the individual is related by blood or marriage within the fourth degree  as determined by
civil law to the person licensed to operate or maintain the facility.
(6) “Residential care” means services such as supervision;  protection; assistance while bathing,
dressing, grooming or eating; management of money; transportation;  recreation; and the providing
of room and board.
(7)(a) “Residential care facility” means a facility that provides residential care in one  or more
buildings on contiguous properties:
[(a)] (A)  For six or more socially dependent individuals or individuals  with physical disabilities;
or
[(b)] (B)  For fewer than six  socially dependent individuals or individuals with physical disabili-
ties if the purpose of the facility  is to serve individuals with co-occurring behavioral health needs
who are more appropriately served in smaller settings.
(b) “Residential care facility” does not include an adult foster  home licensed under sec-
tion 2 of this 2024 Act.
(8) “Residential facility” means a residential care facility,  residential training facility, residen-
tial treatment facility, residential training home, residential treatment home or conversion facility.
(9) “Residential training facility” means a facility that provides, for six or more individuals  with
intellectual or developmental disabilities, residential  care and training in one or more buildings on
contiguous  properties.
(10) “Residential training home”  means a facility that provides, for five or fewer individuals with
intellectual or developmental disabilities, residential care and training in one  or more buildings on
contiguous properties, when so certified and funded by the Department of Human Services.
(11) “Residential treatment facility” means a facility  that provides, for six or more individuals
with mental, emotional or behavioral disturbances or alcohol or  drug dependence, residential care
and treatment in one or more buildings on contiguous properties.
(12) “Residential treatment home” means a  facility that provides for five or fewer individuals
with mental, emotional or behavioral disturbances or alcohol or  drug dependence, residential care
and treatment in one or more buildings on contiguous properties.
(13) “Training” means the systematic, planned maintenance, development or enhancement  of
self-care skills, social skills or independent living skills, or  the planned sequence of systematic
interactions, activities or structured learning situations designed to meet each resident’s specified
needs in the areas of physical, social, emotional and intellectual growth.
(14) “Treatment” means  a planned, individualized program of medical, psychological or
rehabilitative procedures, experiences and activities designed to relieve or minimize mental,  emo-
tional, physical or other symptoms or social, educational or  vocational disabilities resulting from or
related to the mental or emotional disturbance, physical disability or alcohol or drug problem.
[3]
SB 1591
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
SECTION 6.
 ORS 197.660 is amended to read:
197.660. As used  in ORS 197.660 to 197.670, 215.213, 215.263, 215.283[,] and 215.284 [and
443.422:]
(1) “Residential facility” means a residential care,  residential training or residential treatment
facility, as those terms are defined in ORS 443.400,  that provides residential care alone or in con-
junction with treatment or training or a combination thereof for six to fifteen individuals  who need
not be  related[ .], excluding  staff persons required to meet licensing requirements [ shall not be
counted in the number of facility residents, and need not be related to each other or to any resident
of the residential facility ].
(2) “Residential home” means :
(a) A residential treatment or training home, as defined in ORS 443.400[ ,] or  a residential fa-
cility registered under ORS 443.480 to 443.500 [ or an adult foster home licensed under ORS 443.705
to 443.825] that provides residential care alone  or in conjunction with treatment or training or a
combination thereof for  five or fewer individuals who need not be related[ .], excluding staff persons
required to meet licensing requirements [ shall not be counted in the number of facility  residents, and
need not be related to each other or to any resident of the residential home. ]; or
(b) An adult foster home licensed under ORS 443.705 to 443.825.
(3) “Zoning requirement” means any standard, criteria,  condition, review procedure, permit re-
quirement or other requirement adopted by a city or county under the authority of  ORS chapter 215
or 227 that applies to the approval or siting of a residential facility or residential  home. A zoning
requirement does not include a  state or local health, safety, building, occupancy or fire code re-
quirement.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 443.422 is amended to read:
443.422. (1) To prevent the perpetuation of  segregated housing patterns, the Department of Hu-
man Services, in consultation with the Oregon Health Authority, shall determine  the location and
type of licensed residential facilities and the location of facilities subject to the provisions of  ORS
169.690.
(2) Before a license is issued for a residential facility [ as defined in ORS  443.400], the issuing
agency shall determine the number  and type of any other licensed residential facilities and the
number and type of facilities subject to the provisions of ORS 169.690 within a 1,200 foot radius.
(3) None of the data collected  under this section shall be used in a manner that violates the Fair
Housing Amendments Act of 1988.
SECTION 8. ORS 443.422 is added to and made a part of ORS 443.400 to 443.455.
SECTION 9. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]