Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission  shall work with Portland
State University and community colleges  operated under ORS chapter 341 to establish a
program that provides a full post-secondary educational experience for youth with  intellec-
tual and developmental disabilities.
(2) The program established under subsection (1) of this section shall:
(a) Establish and plan for the expansion  of an individualized model of support that pro-
vides the opportunity to  learn and succeed within a community college experience to youth
with intellectual and developmental disabilities who  enroll in a two-year program at partic-
ipating community colleges;
(b) Ensure that youth with intellectual and  developmental disabilities who complete a
two-year program at participating community colleges have  the option to complete their
studies in the nondegree  prebaccalaureate Career and Community Studies program at
Portland State University;
(c) Provide individualized support for youth with intellectual and  developmental disabili-
ties across inclusive academic,  employment and social engagement activities at the campus
of each participating community college and at Portland State University;
(d) Include, to  the degree possible, partnership with community stakeholders and
nonprofit organizations to provide needed employment and community living supports  to
youth with intellectual and developmental disabilities;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1298
SB 977
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) Prepare youth with  intellectual and developmental disabilities for post-graduation
outcomes, including pathways  to employment that are aligned with career goals and that
promote independent living and engagement within neighborhoods and communities;
(f) Support the commitment  of community college and public university faculty to es-
tablish instructional routines that serve a full range of  learners through a focused universal
design for learning; and
(g) Support equitable access  to an inclusive college experience for youth with intellectual
and developmental disabilities by encouraging undergraduate students and graduate students
to serve as academic coaches, peer navigators and career counselors for  youth with intel-
lectual and developmental disabilities.
(3) As used in this section,  “youth with intellectual and developmental disabilities” means
individuals between 16 and 26 years of age with an intellectual  or developmental disability
who:
(a) Require modifications  to the standard academic curriculum in order to successfully
engage in coursework, integrated supported employment and social activities; and
(b)(A) Enroll in the nondegree prebaccalaureate Career and  Community Studies program
at Portland State University; or
(B) Enroll at a community college in a two-year program that is developed  under this
section.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $600,000, to be allocated to Portland  State
University for the support of the Career and Community  Studies program, including the ac-
ademic support, job development and employment services components of the program.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $900,000, to be allocated to community colleges
that participate in establishing  the program for youth with intellectual and developmental
disabilities described in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) The Task Force on Ensuring Post-Secondary Educational Opportunities
for Individuals with Disabilities is established.
(2) The task force consists of 19 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the  Senate shall appoint two members from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives  shall appoint two members from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint:
(A) Five members who are:
(i) Current or former students at public universities listed  in ORS 352.002 and community
colleges operated under ORS chapter 341; and
(ii) Members of a diverse range of disability communities;
(B) Five members who are disability community advocates; and
(C) Five members who are staff from public universities and community colleges  who
have worked with students with disabilities.
(3) The task force shall investigate whether statutory changes, institutional  policy
[2]
SB 977
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
changes or  financial investments would improve the experience and outcomes of students
with disabilities.
(4) A  majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(5) Official action by  the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to higher education no later than September 15, 2026.
(11) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall provide staff  support to the
task force.
(12) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force  are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(13) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(14) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
(15) As used in this section:
(a) “Disability communities” includes individuals with intellectual  and developmental
disabilities, individuals with physical disabilities,  individuals who utilize mobility aids, indi-
viduals with mental illness, neurodivergent individuals, individuals with vision impairment,
individuals who are deaf or hard of hearing, individuals with acquired brain injuries and in-
dividuals with acquired spinal injuries.
(b) “Neurodivergent individuals” includes individuals who have autism,  attention-
deficit/hyperactivity disorder, dyslexia, dyscalculia or obsessive compulsive disorder.
SECTION 5.
Section 4 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2025.
[3]