Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
475C.005 to 475C.525.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission shall issue a  cannabis
health care technician certification to a person who:
(a) Has completed and is certified by a registered apprenticeship program in cannabis
health care technology that:
(A) Is approved by the commission;
(B) Is approved under ORS 660.002 to 660.210;
(C) Includes at least 2,000 hours of supervised work experience; and
(D) Includes at least 145 hours of technical instruction on cannabis science  and
pharmacology, health  care ethics and patient care, compliance and regulatory frameworks
and clinical applications and dosing;
(b) Demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commission competency in cannabis  safety
protocols, compliance and patient care; and
(c) Meets any other requirements established by the commission.
(2) The commission may establish requirements  for the renewal of a cannabis health care
technician certification, including but not limited to requirements  related to the completion
of continuing education.
(3) The commission may impose a fee for  the issuance and renewal of a cannabis health
care technician certification under this section. Fees adopted under this subsection:
(a) May not exceed, together with  other fees collected under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3997
HB 3790
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
the cost of administering ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525; and
(b) Shall be  deposited in the Marijuana Control and Regulation Fund established under
ORS 475C.297.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon  Liquor and Cannabis Commission shall establish a program
to provide financial incentives to qualified marijuana retailers licensed  under ORS 475C.097.
In order to qualify for financial incentives provided through the program, a  marijuana
retailer shall employ cannabis health care  technicians certified under section 2 of this 2025
Act and meet other requirements established by the commission by rule.
(2) In establishing the program described in  this section, the commission may consult
with the Oregon Health Authority,  the Office of Rural Health and other state agencies that
operate incentive programs.
SECTION 4. (1) Sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission may take any action  before the opera-
tive date specified in subsection (1) of this section necessary to enable the  commission to
exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section,  all of the
duties, functions and powers conferred on the  commission by sections 2 and 3 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 5. Section 6 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 475C.005  to
475C.525.
SECTION 6. In addition to the financial incentives provided under section 3 of this 2025
Act, the Oregon Liquor  and Cannabis Commission shall provide to a qualified marijuana
retailer, as described in section 3 of this 2025 Act:
(1) Notification of  any opportunities to engage in the interstate commerce of marijuana
items;
(2) Technical assistance in obtaining any licensing required for engaging in the  interstate
commerce of marijuana items; and
(3) Expedited review of a qualified marijuana retailer’s application for any  licensing re-
quired to engage in the interstate commerce of marijuana items.
SECTION 7. (1) Section 6 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on the earlier of the date
on which:
(a) Federal law is amended to  allow for the interstate commerce of marijuana items be-
tween authorized marijuana-related businesses; or
(b) The United  States Department of Justice issues an opinion or memorandum allowing
or tolerating the  interstate commerce of marijuana items between authorized marijuana-
related businesses.
(2) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission shall notify the interim committees of
the Legislative Assembly related  to the judiciary and the Legislative Counsel upon the oc-
currence of an event described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 8. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]