Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
TRANSFER
SECTION 1.
The duties, functions and powers of  the State Parks and Recreation De-
partment relating to the State  Capitol State Park are imposed upon, transferred to and
vested in the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
RECORDS, PROPERTY, EMPLOYEES
SECTION 2. (1) The State Parks and Recreation Director shall deliver  to the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services all records  and property within the jurisdiction of the
director that relate to the duties, functions and powers transferred by section 1 of  this 2021
Act.
(2) The Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services shall take pos-
session of the records and property, and shall  take charge of the employees and employ them
in the exercise of the duties, functions and powers transferred by section 1 of this 2021 Act,
without reduction of compensation but subject to change or termination of employment or
compensation as provided by law.
(3) The  Governor shall resolve any dispute between the State Parks and Recreation De-
partment and the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services relating to transfers of
records, property and employees under this section, and the Governor’s decision is final.
UNEXPENDED REVENUES
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 445
SB 29
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 3.
(1) The unexpended balances of amounts authorized to be expended by the
State Parks and Recreation Department for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from  re-
venues dedicated, continuously appropriated, appropriated or otherwise made available for
the purpose of administering and enforcing the duties, functions and powers  transferred by
section 1 of this 2021 Act are transferred to and are available  for expenditure by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for the pur-
pose of administering and enforcing the  duties, functions and powers transferred by section
1 of this 2021 Act.
(2) The expenditure classifications, if any, established by Acts authorizing or limiting
expenditures by the State Parks and Recreation Department  remain applicable to expen-
ditures by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services under this section.
ACTION, PROCEEDING, PROSECUTION
SECTION 4.
The transfer of duties, functions and powers  to the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services by section 1 of this 2021 Act does not affect any action, proceeding
or prosecution involving  or with respect to the duties, functions and powers begun before
and pending at the time of the transfer,  except that the Oregon Department of Administra-
tive Services is substituted  for the State Parks and Recreation Department in the action,
proceeding or prosecution.
LIABILITY, DUTY, OBLIGATION
SECTION 5.
(1) Nothing in sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act or  the amendments to ORS
276.003, 276.004, 276.053, 276.058 and 390.111 by sections 8 to 12 of this 2021 Act relieves  a
person of a liability, duty or obligation accruing under or with respect to the  duties, func-
tions and powers transferred by section 1 of this 2021 Act. The Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services may undertake the collection or enforcement  of any such liability, duty
or obligation.
(2) The rights and obligations of the State Parks and  Recreation Department legally in-
curred under contracts,  leases and business transactions executed, entered into or begun
before the operative date of section 1 of this 2021 Act accruing under or with respect to  the
duties, functions and powers transferred by section 1 of this 2021 Act are transferred to  the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services. For the purpose of succession to these rights
and obligations, the Oregon Department of Administrative Services is a continuation of the
State Parks and Recreation Department and not a new authority.
RULES
SECTION 6.
Notwithstanding the transfer of duties, functions and powers by section 1
of this 2021  Act, the rules of the State Parks and Recreation Department with respect to
such duties, functions or powers that are in effect on the operative date of  section 1 of this
2021 Act continue in effect until superseded or repealed by rules of the  Oregon Department
of Administrative Services. References in the  rules of the State Parks and Recreation De-
partment to  the State Parks and Recreation Department or an officer or employee of the
[2]
SB 29
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
State Parks and Recreation Department are considered to  be references to the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services or an officer or employee of the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services.
SECTION 7.
Whenever, in any uncodified law or resolution of the Legislative Assembly
or in any rule, document,  record or proceeding authorized by the Legislative Assembly, in
the context of the duties, functions and powers transferred  by section 1 of this 2021 Act,
reference is made to the State Parks and Recreation Department, or an  officer or employee
of the State Parks  and Recreation Department, whose duties, functions or powers are
transferred by section  1 of this 2021 Act, the reference is considered to be a reference to the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services  or an officer or employee of the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services who by this  2021 Act is charged with carrying out the
duties, functions and powers.
UPDATES TO STATUTES
SECTION 8.  ORS 276.053 is amended to read:
276.053. (1) The State Capitol State Park is created, consisting of:
(a) The grounds immediately  surrounding the State Capitol bordered by State Street on the
south, Court Street on the north, Cottage Street on the west and Waverly Street on the east; and
(b) The grounds surrounding the  Department of Transportation Building, the Public Service
Building, the Bureau of Labor and Industries Building  and the State Library, bordered by Court
Street on the south, Center Street on the north, Winter Street on  the west and Capitol Street on the
east.
(2) Except as provided in ORS 276.002  (4), [and subsection (3) of this section, the State Parks and
Recreation Department shall manage and control the utilization of the State Capitol State Park. ]
[(3) The ] the Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall manage  and control the
[utilization of ] State Capitol State Park, including  the underground  parking structures located
beneath the area described in subsection  (1)(b) of this section and all aboveground structures that
provide access to the underground parking structures.
[(4)] (3)  The  [ Oregon Department of Administrative Services ] department  shall construct and
maintain one or more permanent lavatories on the  grounds of the State Capitol State Park. [ Upon
completion of construction, the State Parks and Recreation Department shall maintain  and control the
utilization of the lavatories. ]
[(5)(a)] (4)(a) To commemorate and honor  Indian tribes, the [ State Parks and Recreation De-
partment] department  shall  plan, erect and maintain one or more monuments or other suitable
markers that are  sited within, and are compatible with, the Walk of the Flags on the grounds of the
State Capitol State Park.
(b) The department shall consult with the Oregon State Capitol Foundation, the Commission on
Indian Services and each of the federally recognized Indian tribes in  Oregon in carrying out its
duties under this section.
(c) The department shall  carry out its duties under [ subsection (5)(a) of this section ] paragraph
(a) of this subsection  only after obtaining funding from private sources.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 276.003 is amended to read:
276.003. (1)  There is created in the General Fund of the State Treasury a State Capitol Operat-
ing Account. Moneys credited to the account are appropriated continuously  to the Legislative Ad-
[3]
SB 29
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ministration Committee to pay the expenses of operating,  maintaining, protecting and insuring the
State Capitol and to reimburse the [ State Parks and Recreation  Department ] Oregon Department
of Administrative Services  for  a share of the expenses of ground maintenance, utilities and other
necessary expenses.
(2) The Legislative Administration Committee  may on behalf of the State of Oregon solicit and
accept gifts, grants and donations from public and private sources for  the purposes set out in ORS
276.002. Such gifts, grants and donations shall be deposited by the  committee in separate, appropri-
ate trust accounts until such time as required to meet the obligations for which  the gifts, grants or
donations were intended.
(3) A gift or donation to the Legislative Administration Committee is a gift or donation to the
State of Oregon.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 276.004 is amended to read:
276.004. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and  except for the Supreme Court
Building[,] and the State Capitol [ and the grounds included within the State Capitol State Park under
ORS 276.053 ], the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services shall manage and control the
utilization of:
(a) Buildings and properties in the capitol area, including those acquired under ORS 276.046;
(b) The grounds within the State Capitol State Park under ORS 276.053;
[(b)] (c)  Office buildings as defined in ORS 276.110;
[(c)] (d) Vacated state institution buildings and facilities as described in ORS 276.180;
[(d)] (e)  The state office building and parking structure in Portland;
[(e)] (f)  The state office building and parking structure in Eugene;
[(f)] (g)  Properties being acquired through  lease-purchase option or installment purchase agree-
ment under ORS 276.429; and
[(g)] (h)  Parking facilities as described in ORS 276.594.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Oregon Department  of Administrative Ser-
vices shall assign and reassign quarters in  buildings owned by this state and specified in this sec-
tion, for such periods and under such terms as the department considers appropriate.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 276.058 is amended to read:
276.058. The Capitol Planning Commission shall:
(1) Investigate the advisability of additions to, reductions of or other changes in  state buildings
and grounds in the areas described by ORS 276.054;
(2) Investigate, review and make recommendations on  all proposals of state agencies to add to,
reduce or otherwise change the use of a state building or grounds in  the areas described by ORS
276.054;
(3) Advise the [ State Parks and Recreation Department ] Oregon Department of Administrative
Services on matters related to the State Capitol State Park and on matters related to  development
that is located within the State Capitol State Park; and
(4) Advise the [ Oregon Department of Administrative Services ] department on:
(a) The planning and location of state buildings in the areas described by ORS 276.054;
(b) The development of the  areas described by ORS 276.054, including but not limited to general
design, landscaping, traffic management, monuments, statues and fountains; and
(c) All other matters connected with  a proposed construction or development to be undertaken
by the state within the areas described by ORS 276.054.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 390.111 is amended to read:
[4]
SB 29
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
390.111. (1) The State Parks and Recreation Department is  created. The department consists of
the State Parks and Recreation Commission, the State Parks and Recreation Director and all  other
officers and employees of the department.
(2) Except  as may be provided by an agreement to the contrary between the State Parks and
Recreation Commission and the county, city or political subdivision thereof which exercised juris-
diction and authority over the park, ground or place prior to acquisition  by the state, the depart-
ment has complete jurisdiction and authority over all state parks, waysides and scenic, historic  or
state recreation  areas, recreational grounds or places acquired by the state for scenic, historic, na-
tural, cultural or recreational purposes except as otherwise provided by law.
[(3) The department shall manage and control the utilization of the grounds  included within the
State Capitol State Park under ORS 276.053. ]
APPROPRIATION
SECTION 13.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,500,000, to perform the duties trans-
ferred to the department under sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act.
OPERATIVE DATES
SECTION 14.
(1) Sections 1 to 7 of this 2021 Act and the amendments to ORS 276.003,
276.004, 276.053, 276.058 and 390.111 by sections 8 to 12 of this 2021 Act become operative  on
January 1, 2022.
(2) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services and the State Parks and Recre-
ation Department may take any action before  January 1, 2022, that is necessary to enable
the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services to exercise, on and after January 1, 2022,
all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the department by sections 1 to 7 of  this
2021 Act and the amendments  to ORS 276.003, 276.004, 276.053, 276.058 and 390.111 by sections
8 to 12 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 15. The amendments to ORS 276.003 by section 9 of  this 2021 Act do not pro-
hibit the Legislative Administration Committee from using moneys in the State Capitol Op-
erating Account to reimburse qualifying  expenses of the State Parks and Recreation
Department made before January 1, 2022.
UNIT CAPTIONS
SECTION 16.
The unit captions used in this 2021 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 17. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[5]
SB 29
1
[6]