Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Assembly finds that it is valuable to  encourage firearms
safety by providing income tax incentives for criminal history record checks.
SECTION 2. Section 3 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 315.
SECTION 3. (1) A credit against taxes otherwise imposed under ORS chapter 316 shall
be allowed to a taxpayer for the cost of a criminal history record check, as described in ORS
166.412, that is required under the laws of  this state for a firearm transfer. The amount of
the credit allowed under this section shall equal the lesser of the cost  of the criminal history
record check or $50.
(2) A taxpayer  claiming the credit under this section must be either the transferor or
transferee of a firearm. Only one  taxpayer may claim the credit under this section for each
criminal history record check.
(3) The credit allowed under this  section for any one tax year may not exceed the tax
liability of the taxpayer.
(4) The credit shall be claimed  on a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue that
contains the information required by the department.
(5) In the case of a credit allowed under this section:
(a) A nonresident shall be allowed the credit in the proportion provided in ORS 316.117.
(b) If a change in the status of the taxpayer from resident to nonresident or from  non-
resident to resident occurs, the credit shall be determined in a manner consistent  with ORS
316.117.
(c) If a change in  the taxable year of the taxpayer occurs as described in ORS 314.085,
or if the department terminates  the taxpayer’s taxable year under ORS 314.440, the credit
shall be prorated or computed in a manner consistent with ORS 314.085.
SECTION 4.
Section 5 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 316.
SECTION 5. (1) In addition to the other modifications to federal taxable income contained
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1723
HB 2899
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
in this chapter,  a taxpayer is allowed a subtraction for travel that is undertaken in the
taxpayer’s motor vehicle to  comply with requirements for a criminal history record check
required by the laws of this state for a firearm transfer. A taxpayer who is  a transferee or
transferor of a firearm may subtract from federal taxable income an amount equal to  65.5
cents per mile multiplied by the number of miles driven in order to participate in the crimi-
nal history record check.
(2) The subtraction allowed under this section shall be substantiated by any proof  re-
quired by the Department of Revenue by rule.
SECTION 6.
Sections 3 and 5 of this 2025  Act apply to tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.
SECTION 7. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]