Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Human Services shall study the workloads  of case man-
agers in the  aging and disability services division of the department. The department shall
submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245,  and may include recommendations
for legislative changes to address workload challenges in the division, to  the interim com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related  to human services no later than September 15,
2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2532