Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 348.
SECTION 2. (1) In addition to any other form of student financial aid authorized by law,
the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission may award grants to culturally and linguis-
tically diverse school  administrator candidates to use at approved educator preparation pro-
grams, as defined in ORS 342.120, for the purpose of advancing the goal  described in ORS
342.437 (1)(a).
(2) Grants awarded to candidates under this section may not be for  more than two aca-
demic years.
(3) The commission shall adopt rules necessary for the implementation and adminis-
tration of this section in  consultation with the Educator Advancement Council and the De-
partment of Education.  Rules adopted under this subsection shall include the establishment
of grant amounts and parameters for awarding grants.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Diverse” has the meaning given that term in ORS 342.433.
(b) “School administrator candidate” means an individual who  is preparing to be an ad-
ministrator in a school.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 508