Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon  Business Development Department shall prepare a report on
how it may support the state’s transition to green energy by promoting  the production, dis-
tribution and end use of hydrogen fuels in this state.
(2) The department shall submit the report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245,  and
may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to energy no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2172