Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
EXPUNCTION OF JUVENILE RECORDS
SECTION 1.
(1) Sections 2 to 4 of this 2020 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 419A.
(2) ORS 419A.260 and 419A.262 are added to and made a part of sections  2 to 4 of this 2020
Act.
SECTION 2. Notice of statutory expunction.  (1) A juvenile department shall issue a notice
of statutory expunction of a subject person’s records if the subject person:
(a) Has had contact with the juvenile department and the contact could have resulted in
a juvenile court’s assumption of jurisdiction under ORS 419C.005;
(b) Has never been the subject of a petition filed in the juvenile court; and
(c) Has never been found to be within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.
(2) The juvenile department shall issue the notice described in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion no later than 90 days following:
(a) The date the subject person attains 18 years of age; or
(b) If the subject person was 18 years of age or older on the effective date of  this 2020
Act,  the  date the juvenile department receives a request for expunction from the subject
person.
(3) The juvenile department shall send the notice described  in subsection (1) of this sec-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 57
SB 1573
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tion to each agency that the  juvenile department determines, after a reasonable search of
the juvenile department’s files,  may be in possession of records relating to the subject per-
son. The notice must notify the recipient agency that  the agency has 60 days from the date
of receipt to expunge the subject person’s records.
(4)(a) Upon receipt of a notice of statutory expunction, an agency shall comply and,
within 60 days of the date of receipt, return a copy of the  notice to the juvenile department
with an indorsement indicating compliance.
(b) The juvenile department may, upon an agency’s written request, provide an extension
of time of no more than 30 days to comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) If an agency fails  to comply with the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection,
the juvenile department shall petition the juvenile court  for an order compelling the agency
to comply.
(5) When all agencies subject to the notice of statutory expunction  have indicated their
compliance or in any event no later than 90 days following the date the notice  was delivered
as required by subsection  (3) of this section, the juvenile department shall provide the sub-
ject person with a copy of the notice of statutory expunction, a list of complying and non-
complying agencies, and a written notice of  rights and effects of expunction. The juvenile
department then shall expunge forthwith all  records in its possession that are subject to the
notice of statutory expunction, except that the original notice  of statutory expunction and
the list of complying and noncomplying agencies which must be preserved under seal.
(6) The Oregon Youth Authority, in consultation with county juvenile  departments, shall
develop statewide model forms to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3.
Effect of expunction; confidentiality;  penalties. (1) Upon issuance of a notice
of statutory expunction under section 2 of this 2020 Act or entry of an expunction judgment
under ORS  419A.262, the contact that is the subject of the expunged record shall not be dis-
closed by any agency. An agency that is  subject to a notice of statutory expunction or an
expunction judgment shall respond to  any inquiry about the contact by indicating that no
record or reference concerning the contact exists.
(2) A person who is the  subject of a record that has been expunged under ORS 419A.262
or section 2 of this 2020 Act may assert that the record never existed and that the  contact
that was the subject of  the record never occurred without incurring a penalty for perjury
or false swearing under the laws of this state.
(3) Juvenile courts, by court rule or by order related to a  particular matter, may direct
that records concerning a subject person be destroyed. No records shall be destroyed until
at least three years have elapsed after the date of the subject’s most recent  termination. In
the event the record has been  expunged, the expunction judgment and list of complying and
noncomplying agencies may not be destroyed,  but shall be preserved under seal. The de-
struction of records under this subsection does not constitute expunction.
(4) A notice of statutory  expunction or an expunction judgment and the list of complying
and noncomplying agencies shall be released from confidentiality only on order  of the court
that would have had jurisdiction to compel compliance with  the notice of statutory
expunction or that originated the expunction  judgment, based on a finding that review of a
particular case furthers compliance with the expunction provisions of sections 2 to  4 of this
2020 Act.
(5) A person who, in the person’s official  capacity with a juvenile department, discloses
[2]
SB 1573
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
information in a notice required under ORS 419A.262  or section 2 of this 2020 Act has im-
munity from any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed  for
making the disclosure.
(6) A subject person has a right of  action against any person who intentionally violates
the confidentiality provisions of this section. In the proceeding, punitive damages up  to an
amount of $1,000 may be sought in addition to any actual  damages. The prevailing party shall
be entitled to costs and reasonable attorney fees.
(7) Intentional violation of the confidentiality provisions of this section by a public  em-
ployee is cause for dismissal.
(8) A person who intentionally releases all or  part of an expunged record commits a Class
C misdemeanor.
SECTION 4.
Appointment of counsel.  (1) If a person who is the subject of a record  that
is eligible for expunction under ORS 419A.262 (3) to (9) wishes to apply for expunction and  if
the person is without funds to employ suitable counsel possessing  skills and experience
commensurate with the nature and complexity of the expunction process, the person  may
request the juvenile court having jurisdiction over the expunction process  under ORS
419A.262 (1) to appoint counsel to represent the person in the expunction proceeding.
(2) The juvenile court shall inform a person requesting court-appointed counsel  under
this section of the  person’s right to be represented by suitable counsel possessing skills and
experience commensurate with the nature  and complexity of the expunction process, to
consult with counsel prior to the filing of  an application for expunction under ORS 419A.262
(3) to (9) and prior  to a hearing on the matter and, if financially eligible, to have suitable
counsel appointed at state expense. Upon request of the person, the  juvenile court shall ap-
point counsel in accordance with the provisions of ORS 419B.195 and 419B.198 to aid the
person in the expunction proceeding, including in the completion of an  application for
expunction and representation in any hearings on the application for expunction.
(3) When the juvenile court appoints counsel for a person under  this section and the
person is determined to be entitled to, and financially eligible for, appointment of counsel  at
state expense, the compensation for counsel  and reasonable fees and expenses of investi-
gation, preparation and presentation paid or incurred shall be determined  and paid as pro-
vided in ORS 135.055.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 419A.260 is amended to read:
419A.260. (1) As used in [ this section and ORS 419A.262 ] sections 2 to 4 of this 2020 Act :
(a) “Contact” means any instance  in which a person’s act or behavior, or alleged act or behav-
ior, which could result in a referral to a juvenile department or  a juvenile court’s assumption  of
jurisdiction under ORS  419B.100 (1)(a) to (c) and (f) or 419C.005 comes to the attention of an agency
specified in paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(b) “Expunction” means:
[(A) The removal and  destruction or sealing of a judgment or order related to a contact and all
records and references; and ]
(A) The removal and destruction of all records and references associated with a  subject
person;
(B) The sealing of a judgment, order or other record associated with a subject person;
(C) The redaction of a subject person’s  name and all references to the subject person
within a record; or
[3]
SB 1573
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(B)] (D) [Where] If a record is kept by the Department of Human Services [ or the  Oregon Youth
Authority,  either  the sealing of such record by the department or the Oregon Youth Authority or, in a
multiperson file, ] the department’s affixing to the front of the file[ , by the department or the youth
authority,] containing the record  a stamp or statement identifying the name  of the individual, the
date of expunction and instruction that no further reference shall be made to  the [ material] record
that is subject to the expunction order except upon an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
(c) “Person” includes a person under 18 years of age.
(d) “Record” includes a fingerprint or photograph file, report, exhibit or other material which
contains information relating  to a person’s contact with any law enforcement agency, juvenile court
or juvenile department,  the Psychiatric Security Review Board, the Department of Human
Services , the Oregon Youth Authority  or the Oregon Health Authority and  is kept manually,
through the use of electronic data processing equipment, or by any other means by a  law enforce-
ment or public investigative agency, a juvenile court or juvenile department or  an agency of the
State of Oregon. “Record” does not include:
(A) A transcript of a student’s Youth Corrections Education Program academic record;
(B) Material on file with a public  agency which is necessary for obtaining federal financial
participation regarding financial assistance or services on behalf of a person  who has had a contact;
(C) Records kept or  disseminated by the Department of Transportation, State Marine Board and
State Fish and Wildlife Commission pursuant to juvenile or adult order or recommendation;
(D) Police and court records related to an order of  waiver where the matter is still pending in
the adult court or on appeal therefrom, or to any disposition as an adult pursuant to such order;
(E) Records related to a support obligation;
(F) Medical records other than those related to a finding of responsible except for insanity under
ORS 419C.411;
(G) Records of a proposed or adjudicated termination of parental rights and adoptions;
(H) Any law enforcement record of a person  who currently does not qualify for expunction or
of current investigations or cases waived to the adult court;
(I) Records and case reports of the Oregon Supreme Court and the Oregon Court of Appeals;
(J) Any records in cases under  ORS 419C.005 in which a juvenile court found a person to be
within the jurisdiction of the court based upon the  person’s commission of an act which if done by
an adult would constitute one of the following offenses:
(i) Aggravated murder under ORS 163.095;
(ii) Murder in any degree under ORS 163.107 or 163.115;
(iii) Attempt, solicitation or conspiracy to commit murder in any degree or aggravated murder;
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree under ORS 163.118;
(v) Manslaughter in the second degree under ORS 163.125;
(vi) Criminally negligent homicide under ORS 163.145;
(vii) Assault in the first degree under ORS 163.185;
(viii) Criminal mistreatment in the first degree under ORS 163.205;
(ix) Kidnapping in the first degree under ORS 163.235;
(x) Rape in the third degree under ORS 163.355;
(xi) Rape in the second degree under ORS 163.365;
(xii) Rape in the first degree under ORS 163.375;
(xiii) Sodomy in the third degree under ORS 163.385;
(xiv) Sodomy in the second degree under ORS 163.395;
[4]
SB 1573
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(xv) Sodomy in the first degree under ORS 163.405;
(xvi) Unlawful sexual penetration in the second degree under ORS 163.408;
(xvii) Unlawful sexual penetration in the first degree under ORS 163.411;
(xviii) Sexual abuse in the third degree under ORS 163.415;
(xix) Sexual abuse in the second degree under ORS 163.425;
(xx) Sexual abuse in the first degree under ORS 163.427;
(xxi) Promoting prostitution under ORS 167.012;
(xxii) Compelling prostitution under ORS 167.017;
(xxiii) Aggravated driving while suspended or revoked under ORS 163.196;
(xxiv) Aggravated vehicular homicide under ORS 163.149; or
(xxv) An attempt to commit a crime listed in this subparagraph other than manslaughter in  the
second degree and criminally negligent homicide;
(K) Blood  samples, buccal samples and other physical evidence and identification information
obtained, stored or maintained by the Department  of State Police under authority of ORS 137.076,
181A.155 or 419C.473; [ or]
(L) Records maintained in the Law Enforcement Data System under ORS 163A.035[ .]; or
(M) Records of a law enforcement agency or  public investigative agency concerning an
open or otherwise unresolved investigation.
(e) “Seal” means to make a record not accessible  and to categorize the record as only
accessible upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
[(e)] (f)  “Termination” means:
(A) For a  person who is the subject of a record kept by a juvenile court or juvenile department,
the final disposition of a case by informal means, by a decision not to place the person on probation
or make  the person a ward of the court after the person has been found to be within the court’s
jurisdiction or by a  discontinuance of probation, of the court’s wardship or of the jurisdiction of the
Psychiatric Security Review Board, the Oregon Health Authority or the Department of Human Ser-
vices.
(B) For a person who is the subject of a record kept  by a law enforcement or public investi-
gative agency, a juvenile court or juvenile department or an  agency of the State of Oregon, the final
disposition of the person’s most recent contact with a law enforcement agency.
(2) The juvenile court or juvenile department shall make reasonable  effort to provide written
notice to a child who is within  the court’s jurisdiction under ORS 419B.100 (1)(a) to (c) and (f) or
to a youth who is within the court’s jurisdiction under  ORS 419C.005, and to the child’s or youth’s
parent, of the procedures for expunction of a  record, the right to and procedure to access  counsel
under this chapter, the legal effect  of an expunction order and the procedures for seeking relief from
the duty to report as a sex offender provided under ORS 163A.130, at the following times:
(a) At any  dispositional hearing or at the time of entering into a formal accountability agree-
ment;
(b) At the time of termination;
(c) Upon notice to the  subject of an expunction pending pursuant to application of a juvenile
department or motion on a juvenile court; and
(d) At the time of notice of execution of an expunction order.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 419A.262 is amended to read:
419A.262. (1) (a) An expunction proceeding  under subsection (2) of this section shall be
commenced in the county where the subject person resided at  the time of the most recent
[5]
SB 1573
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
contact.
(b) An expunction proceeding under subsections (3) to (9) of this  section shall be commenced
in the county where the subject person resided at the time of the most recent termination.
(2)(a) A juvenile department shall file with the juvenile  court an application for
expunction of the records of a person the  juvenile department determines meets the criteria
under paragraph (b) of this subsection no later than 90 days following:
(A) The date that the person attains 18 years of age; or
(B) If the person was 18 years of age or older  on the effective date of this 2020 Act, the
date that the juvenile department receives a request to file the application for expunction.
(b) Upon receipt of  an application for expunction under this subsection, the juvenile court
shall order expunction if it finds that:
(A) The subject person had contact with  the juvenile department and the contact could
have resulted in a juvenile court’s assumption of jurisdiction under ORS 419C.005;
(B) The subject person has never been found to be within the jurisdiction of the juvenile
court;
(C) There is no petition pending alleging that the subject person is subject to  the juvenile
court’s jurisdiction under ORS 419C.005; and
(D) The subject person has not been waived to criminal court pursuant  a hearing under
ORS 419C.349 or 419C.352.
(c) If the juvenile court denies the application for expunction under this subsection:
(A) The court must specify in the judgment denying the  application for expunction the
reason for the denial.
(B) The juvenile department shall make  reasonable efforts to send to the subject person
the following:
(i) Notice of the court’s decision  and a copy of the judgment denying the application for
expunction; and
(ii) Notice of the person’s right to an attorney, right to file a new application  for
expunction under this subsection and right to request expunction by  application under sub-
sections (3) to (9) of this section.
(C) The juvenile department or the subject person may file a new  application for
expunction under this subsection.
[(2)] (3)  Upon  application of either a person who is the subject of a record or a juvenile de-
partment, or upon  its own motion, the juvenile court shall order expunction if, after a hearing when
the matter is contested, it finds that:
(a) At least five years have elapsed since the date of the person’s most recent termination;
(b) Since the date of the most recent  termination, the person has not been convicted of a felony
or a Class A misdemeanor;
(c) No proceedings seeking a criminal conviction  or an adjudication in a juvenile court are
pending against the person;
(d) The person is not within the jurisdiction of any juvenile  court on the basis of a petition al-
leging an act or behavior as defined in ORS 419B.100 (1)(a) to (c) and (f) or 419C.005; and
(e) The juvenile department is not aware of any pending investigation of  the conduct of the
person by any law enforcement agency.
[(3)(a)] (4)(a) Notwithstanding  subsection [ (2)] (3) of this section, upon application of a person
who is the subject of a record kept  by a juvenile court or juvenile department, upon application of
[6]
SB 1573
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the juvenile department, or upon its own motion, the  juvenile court, after a hearing when the matter
is contested under subsection [ (13)] (14) of this section, shall order expunction if it finds that:
(A) The  application requests expunction of only that part of the person’s record that involves
a charge, allegation or adjudication based on conduct that if done by an adult would  constitute the
crime of prostitution under ORS 167.007; and
(B) The person was under 18 years of age at the time of the conduct.
(b) Except as provided in subsections  [(13) and] (14) and (15) of this section, there is no waiting
period required before the juvenile court orders expunction under this subsection.
[(4)] (5) In the case of an application by the juvenile  department or of the court acting upon its
own motion, expunction shall not  be ordered under subsections (3) or (4) of this section  if actual
notice of expunction has not been given  to the person in accordance with subsection [ (12)] (13) of
this section unless the person has reached 21 years of age.
[(5)] (6)  When a person who is the subject of a record kept by a juvenile court or juvenile de-
partment reaches 18 years of age,  the juvenile court, after a hearing when the matter is contested,
shall order expunction if:
(a) The person never has been found to be within the jurisdiction of the court; or
(b) The conditions of subsection [ (2) or ] (3) or (4) of this section have been met.
[(6)] (7)  Expunction shall not be ordered under subsections (3) to (9) of  this section if  actual
notice of expunction has not been given  to the person in accordance with subsection [ (12)] (13) of
this section unless the person has reached 21 years of age.
[(7)] (8)  Subsections [ (5) and] (6) and (7) of this section apply only to cases  resulting in termi-
nation after September 13, 1975.
[(8)] (9) Notwithstanding subsections [ (2),] (3) , (4) and [ (5) to (7)]  (6) to (8)  of this section,  upon
application of a person who  is the subject of a record kept by a juvenile court or juvenile depart-
ment, upon application of the juvenile department, or upon its own motion, the  juvenile court, after
a hearing  when the matter is contested, may order expunction of all or any part of the person’s
record if it finds that to do so would be in the  best interests of the person and the public. In the
case of an application by the juvenile department or of the court acting  upon its own motion,
expunction shall not be ordered if actual notice of expunction has not been given to the  person in
accordance with subsection [ (12)] (13) of this  section unless the person has reached 21 years of age.
[(9)] (10)  Notwithstanding  ORS 419A.260 (1)(d)(J)[ (x), (xiii), (xix) or (xviii) ], a person who has
been found to be within the jurisdiction of the juvenile  court based on an act that if committed by
an adult would constitute:
(a) Rape in the third degree under ORS 163.355, sodomy in the third  degree under ORS 163.385
or sexual abuse in the  third degree under ORS 163.415, or an attempt to commit those crimes, may
apply for an order of expunction under subsections (3) to (9) of  this section. The court shall order
expunction  of  the records in the case if, after a hearing when the matter is contested, the court finds
that the person:
(A) Meets the requirements of subsection [ (2)] (3) of this section;
(B) [ Has been relieved of the obligation to report as a sex offender pursuant to a  court order en-
tered under ORS 163A.145 or 163A.150 ] Is not required to report as a sex offender ; and
(C) Has not been convicted of, found guilty except for insanity of  or found to be within the ju-
risdiction of the juvenile court based on a crime listed in ORS 419A.260 (1)(d)(J), other  than the
adjudication that is the subject of the motion.
(b) A sex crime that  is a Class C felony may apply for an order of expunction under subsections
[7]
SB 1573
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) to (9) of  this section. The court shall order expunction of the records in the case if, after a
hearing when the matter is contested, the court finds that:
(A) The person meets the requirements of subsection [ (2)] (3) of this section;
(B) The person was under 16 years of age at the time of the offense;
(C) The person is:
(i) Less than two years and 180 days older than the victim; or
(ii) At least two years and  180 days older, but less than three years and 180 days older, than
the victim and the expunction is  in the interests of justice and of benefit to the person and the
community;
(D) The victim’s lack of consent was due solely  to incapacity to consent by reason of being less
than a specified age;
(E) The victim was at least 12 years of age at the time of the offense;
(F) Each finding described in this paragraph involved the same victim; and
(G) The person has not been convicted of, found guilty except for insanity of or found to  be
within the  jurisdiction of the juvenile court based on a crime listed in ORS 419A.260 (1)(d)(J) or an
offense the court is prohibited from  setting aside under ORS 137.225, other than the adjudication
that is the subject of the motion.
[(10)] (11)  When an expunction proceeding under subsections (3) to  (9) of this section  is
commenced by application of the person whose records are to be expunged, the person shall set forth
as part of the application the names of the juvenile courts,  juvenile departments, institutions and
law enforcement and other agencies that the person has reason to believe possess an expungible
record of the person.  The juvenile department shall provide the names and addresses of the juvenile
courts, juvenile departments, institutions and law  enforcement and other agencies that a reasonable
search of department files indicates have expungible records.
[(11)] (12)  When  an expunction proceeding is commenced by application of the juvenile depart-
ment or upon the court’s own motion, the  application or motion shall set forth the names and ad-
dresses of the juvenile courts, juvenile departments, institutions and  law enforcement and other
agencies that a reasonable search of department files indicates  have expungible records and those
provided by the subject person.
[(12)(a)] (13)(a)  Notice and a copy of an application for expunction under subsections [ (2) to
(8)] (3) to (9)  of this section shall be given to:
(A) The district attorney of the county in  which the expunction proceeding is commenced and
the district attorney of each county in which the record sought to be expunged is kept; and
(B) The person who is the  subject of the record if the person has not initiated the expunction
proceeding.
(b) A district attorney who receives notice under this subsection shall notify the  victim of the
acts that resulted in the  disposition that is the subject of the application for expunction and shall
mail a copy of the application for expunction to the victim’s last known address.
[(13)(a)] (14)(a) Within  30 days of receiving the notice of application for expunction under sub-
section [ (12)] (13) of this section, a district attorney shall give written notice of any objection and
the grounds therefor to the person whose records are to be expunged and to the juvenile court.
(b) Except as provided in subsection [ (14)(c)] (15)(c)  of this  section, if no objection is filed the
court may decide  the issue of expunction either without a hearing or after full hearing under sub-
sections [ (14) to (17) ] (15) to (18)  of this section.
[(14)] (15) When an expunction  is pending under subsections [ (2) to (8) ] (3) to (9)  of this section,
[8]
SB 1573
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the court may proceed with or without a hearing, except that:
(a) The court may not enter an expunction judgment without  a hearing if a timely objection to
expunction has been filed under subsection [ (13)] (14) of this section;
(b) The court may not deny an expunction without  a hearing if the proceeding is based on an
application of the subject; and
(c) The court shall proceed without a hearing if:
(A) No objection is filed under subsection [ (13)] (14) of this section;
(B) The application requests expunction of only that part of the person’s record that  involves
a charge, allegation or adjudication based on conduct that if done by an adult would  constitute the
crime of prostitution under ORS 167.007; and
(C) The person was under 18 years of age at the time of the conduct.
[(15)(a)] (16)(a) Notice of a hearing on a pending expunction shall be served on the subject  and
any district attorney filing a timely objection under subsection [ (13)] (14) of this section.
(b) When  a district attorney receives notice of a hearing for expunction of a record concerning
a youth or youth offender proceeding under  ORS chapter 419C, if the victim of the acts that resulted
in the  disposition that is the subject of the application for expunction requests, the district attorney
shall mail notice of the hearing to the victim’s last-known address.
[(16)] (17) The court shall conduct a hearing on [ a pending expunction ] an expunction pending
under subsections (3) to  (9) of this section  in accord with the provisions of ORS [ 419B.195,
419B.198, 419B.201,] 419B.205, 419B.208, 419B.310, 419B.812 to 419B.839 and 419B.908.  Rules of evi-
dence shall be  as in a hearing to establish juvenile court jurisdiction and as defined in ORS 419B.310
(3) and 419C.400 (2). The burden of proof shall be with the party contesting expunction.
[(17)] (18)(a) At the conclusion of a hearing on [ a pending expunction ] an expunction pending
under subsections (3) to (9)  of this section , the court shall issue judgment granting or denying
expunction.
(b) The  court’s denial of an application for expunction under this section does not pre-
clude the subject person from filing  an application for expunction under any other applicable
subsection of this section.
[(18)] (19)(a)  The juvenile court or juvenile department shall send a copy of  an expunction
judgment to each agency subject to the judgment. Attached to the expunction  judgment must
be information, to remain confidential, regarding  the record to be expunged and the date of
the record.
(b) Upon receipt of a copy of the  judgment granting an application for expunction under
subsection (2) of this section, the agency shall comply and, within  60 days of the date of re-
ceipt, return the copy to the  juvenile court or the juvenile department with an indorsement
indicating compliance.
(c) Upon receipt of a copy of  the judgment  granting an application for expunction under
subsections (3) to (9) of this section , the agency shall comply and, within 21  days of the date of
receipt, return the copy to the juvenile court or juvenile department with an indorsement indicating
compliance.
(d) The juvenile court may, upon an agency’s written request, grant an extension of time
of no more than 30 days to comply with paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection.
[(19)] (20) When all agencies subject to an expunction judgment have indicated their compliance
or in any event no later than [ six weeks ] 90 days  following the date the judgment was  delivered as
required by subsection [ (18)] (19) of this section, the juvenile court shall provide the person who is
[9]
SB 1573
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the subject of the  record with a copy of the expunction judgment, a list of complying and noncom-
plying agencies, and a written notice of rights and effects of expunction. The juvenile court and ju-
venile department then shall expunge forthwith all records which they possess and which are subject
to the judgment, except the  original expunction judgment and the list of complying and noncomply-
ing agencies which must be preserved under seal.
[(20)] (21)  In addition to those agencies identified in  ORS 419A.260 (1)(d), the juvenile, circuit,
municipal and justice courts, and the district  and city attorneys of this state, are bound by an
expunction judgment of any juvenile court of appropriate  jurisdiction in this state issuing an
expunction judgment.
(22)(a) Applications for expunction under this section shall be available from  the clerk
of the court in a form prescribed by the State Court Administrator.
(b) The State Court Administrator shall  prescribe the content and form of expunction
judgments under this section. The judgment forms must include a place  for the court to
specify the method of expunction under ORS 419A.260 (1)(b) that applies to  a given record
and, if the record is kept by an agency in a multiperson  file, whether the agency must redact
the subject person’s name from all records subject to the order or seal the entire file.
[(21) Upon entry of an expunction judgment, the contact that is the subject of the expunged  record
shall not be  disclosed by any agency. An agency that is subject to an expunction judgment shall re-
spond to any  inquiry about the contact by indicating that no record or reference concerning the contact
exists.]
[(22) A person who is the subject of a record that has been expunged under this section may  assert
that the record never existed and that the contact, which was the subject of the record, never occurred
without incurring a penalty for perjury or false swearing under the laws of this state. ]
[(23) Juvenile courts, by court rule or by order related to a particular matter, may direct that re-
cords concerning a subject person be destroyed. No records shall be destroyed until at  least three years
have elapsed after the date of the subject’s most recent termination.  In the event the record has been
expunged, the expunction judgment and list of complying and noncomplying agencies may not be de-
stroyed, but shall be preserved under seal. The destruction of records under  this subsection does not
constitute expunction. ]
[(24) An expunction judgment and list of complying and noncomplying  agencies shall be released
from confidentiality only on  order of the court originating the expunction judgment, based on a finding
that review of a particular case furthers compliance with the expunction provisions of this chapter. ]
[(25) A subject has a right of action against any  person who intentionally violates the
confidentiality provisions of this section.  In the proceeding, punitive damages up to an amount of $1,000
may be sought in addition to any actual damages. The prevailing party shall be entitled to costs and
reasonable attorney fees. ]
[(26) Intentional violation of the confidentiality provisions of this section by  a public employee is
cause for dismissal. ]
[(27) A  person who intentionally releases all or part of an expunged record commits a Class C
misdemeanor.]
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 7.
 ORS 419A.250 is amended to read:
419A.250. (1) A child, ward, youth or youth offender may be photographed or fingerprinted  by
[10]
SB 1573
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a law enforcement agency:
(a) Pursuant to a search warrant;
(b) According to laws concerning adults if the youth has been transferred  to criminal court for
prosecution;
(c) Upon  consent of both the child or youth and the child or youth’s parent after advice that
they are not required to give such consent;
(d) Upon request or consent of the child’s parent alone if the child is less than 10  years of age,
and if the law enforcement agency delivers the original photographs or fingerprints to the  parent
and does not make or retain any copies thereof; or
(e) By order of the juvenile court.
(2) When  a youth is taken into custody under ORS 419C.080, the law enforcement agency taking
the youth into custody shall photograph and fingerprint the  youth. When a youth is found within the
jurisdiction of the juvenile court for the commission of an  act that would constitute a crime if
committed by an adult, the court  shall ensure that the youth offender’s fingerprints have been taken.
The law enforcement  agency attending upon the court is the agency responsible for obtaining the
fingerprints. The law enforcement agency  attending upon the court may, by agreement, arrange for
another law enforcement agency to obtain the fingerprints on the attending agency’s behalf.
(3) Fingerprint and photograph files or records of children, wards, youths and  youth offenders
must be kept separate from those of adults, and fingerprints and photographs  known to be those of
a child may  be maintained on a local basis only and may not be sent to a central state or federal
depository.
(4) Fingerprint and photograph files or records of a child, ward, youth or youth offender are
open to inspection only by, or the contents disclosed only to, the following:
(a) Public agencies for use in investigation or prosecution of crimes  and of conduct by a child,
ward, youth or youth offender  that if committed by an adult would be an offense, provided that a
law enforcement agency  may provide information to another agency only when the information is
pertinent to a specific investigation by that agency;
(b) The juvenile department and  the juvenile court having the child, ward, youth or youth
offender before it in any proceeding;
(c) Caseworkers and counselors taking action or otherwise responsible for planning and  care of
the child, ward, youth or youth offender;
(d) The parties to the proceeding and their counsel; and
(e) The victim or a witness of an  act or behavior described under ORS 419C.005 (1) or the
victim’s parent,  guardian, personal representative or subrogee, when necessary to identify the youth
or youth offender committing the act or behavior and identifying the apparent extent of  the youth
or youth offender’s involvement in the act or behavior.
(5)(a) Fingerprint and photograph files or records  of youths and youth offenders must be sent to
a central state depository in the same manner as fingerprint and photograph files or records of
adults. The fingerprint and photograph files  or records of a youth or youth offender sent to a central
depository under this subsection are open to inspection in the same manner and under the  same
circumstances as fingerprint and photograph files or records of adults.
(b) A party filing a petition alleging  that a youth is within the jurisdiction of the court under
ORS 419C.005 shall notify the central state depository of the following:
(A) The filing of a petition alleging that a youth committed an act that if committed by an  adult
would constitute a crime; or
[11]
SB 1573
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) The dismissal of  a petition alleging that a youth committed an act that if committed by an
adult would constitute a crime.
(c) The juvenile court shall notify the central state depository  of the disposition of a case in
which jurisdiction is based on ORS 419C.005.
(d) The Department of  State Police shall delete the fingerprint and photograph files or records
of a youth or youth offender from the depository and destroy the files  or records relating to the
conduct that caused the files or records to be sent to the depository:
(A) One year after receiving the files, if the central state depository has not received  notice
under paragraph (b) of this subsection;
(B) No later than one year  following receipt of a notice of dismissal of a petition under para-
graph (b)(B) of this subsection; or
(C) In all other circumstances, no later than five years and  30 days after fingerprint and pho-
tograph files or records are sent to the central state depository.
(6) Fingerprint and photograph files and records of a child, ward, youth or youth  offender must
be expunged when the juvenile court orders expunction of a child, ward, youth or  youth offender’s
record pursuant to [ ORS 419A.260 and 419A.262 ] sections 2 to 4 of this 2020 Act .
(7) The parent or guardian of a  missing child may submit a fingerprint card and photograph of
the child to  a law enforcement agency at the time a missing person report is made. The law
enforcement agency may submit  the fingerprint file to the Department of State Police. The infor-
mation must be  entered into the Law Enforcement Data System and the Western Identification
Network Automated Fingerprint Identification System.
(8) When fingerprint files or records are submitted under  subsection (7) of this section, the De-
partment of State Police shall  enter in a special index in the computerized criminal history files the
name of the child and  the name of the county or agency that submitted the fingerprint file or record.
(9) Fingerprints and other  information entered in any data system pursuant to subsection (7) of
this section must be deleted when the child is located.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 419A.265 is amended to read:
419A.265. Notwithstanding ORS 419A.262  [ (2)(a)] (3)(a) , a person is eligible for an order of
expunction under ORS 419A.262  (3) to (9)  if the  person was adjudicated for committing an act that,
if committed by an adult, would constitute  a criminal offense in which possession, delivery or man-
ufacture of marijuana or a marijuana item as defined in ORS 475B.015 is an element and:
(1) The court finds that at least  one year has elapsed since the date of the person’s most recent
termination;
(2) The applicant has not been adjudicated or convicted for  any other act or offense, excluding
motor vehicle violations; and
(3) The applicant has complied with and performed all conditions of the adjudication.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 419C.370 is amended to read:
419C.370. (1) The juvenile court may enter an order directing that all cases involving:
(a) Violation of a law  or ordinance relating to the use or operation of a motor vehicle, boating
laws or game laws be waived to criminal or municipal court;
(b) An offense classified as a violation under the laws of  this state or a political subdivision of
this state be waived  to municipal court if the municipal court has agreed to accept jurisdiction; and
(c) A misdemeanor  that entails theft, destruction, tampering with or vandalism of property be
waived to municipal court if the municipal court has agreed to accept jurisdiction.
(2) Cases waived under subsection (1) of this section are subject to the following:
[12]
SB 1573
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) That the criminal or municipal court prior to hearing a  case, other than a case involving a
parking violation, in which the defendant is or appears to be under 18 years of age notify the juve-
nile court of that fact; and
(b) That the juvenile court may direct that any such case be waived to  the juvenile court for
further proceedings.
(3)(a) When a person  who has been waived under subsection (1)(c) of this section is convicted
of a property offense, the municipal court may  impose any sanction authorized for the offense except
for incarceration. The municipal court shall notify the juvenile court of the disposition of the case.
(b) When a person has been waived under  subsection (1) of this section and fails to appear as
summoned or is placed on probation and is alleged to have violated  a condition of the probation, the
juvenile court may recall the case to the juvenile court for further  proceedings. When a person has
been returned to juvenile court under this paragraph,  the juvenile court may proceed as though the
person had failed to  appear as summoned to the juvenile court or had violated a juvenile court
probation order under ORS 419C.446.
(4) Records of cases waived under subsection (1)(c) of this  section are juvenile records for pur-
poses of expunction under [ ORS 419A.260 ] sections 2 to 4 of this 2020 Act .
SECTION 10.
 ORS 659A.030 is amended to read:
659A.030. (1) It is an unlawful employment practice:
(a) For an employer, because of an individual’s race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation,  na-
tional origin, marital status or age if the individual is 18 years  of age or older, or because of the
race, color, religion, sex,  sexual orientation, national origin, marital status or age of any other
person with whom the individual associates,  or because of an individual’s juvenile record that has
been expunged pursuant to [ ORS 419A.260 and 419A.262 ] sections 2 to 4 of this 2020 Act , to refuse
to hire or employ the individual or to  bar or discharge the individual from employment. However,
discrimination is not an unlawful employment  practice if the discrimination results from a bona fide
occupational qualification reasonably necessary to the normal operation of the employer’s business.
(b) For  an employer, because of an individual’s race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, na-
tional origin, marital status or age if the individual  is 18 years of age or older, or because of the
race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, marital status or age  of any other
person with whom the individual associates, or because of an  individual’s juvenile record that has
been expunged pursuant to [ ORS 419A.260 and 419A.262 ] sections 2 to 4 of  this 2020 Act , to dis-
criminate against the  individual in compensation or in terms, conditions or privileges of employment.
(c) For a labor  organization, because of an individual’s race, color, religion, sex, sexual orien-
tation, national origin, marital status or  age if the individual is 18 years of age or older, or because
of an individual’s juvenile  record that has been expunged pursuant to [ ORS 419A.260 and
419A.262] sections 2 to 4 of this 2020 Act , to exclude or to expel from its  membership the indi-
vidual or to discriminate in any way against the individual or any other person.
(d) For any employer or employment  agency to print or circulate or cause to be printed or cir-
culated any statement, advertisement or publication, or to use  any form of application for employ-
ment or to make any inquiry in  connection with prospective employment that expresses directly or
indirectly any limitation, specification or discrimination as to an individual’s  race, color, religion,
sex, sexual orientation, national origin, marital  status or age if the individual is 18 years of age or
older, or on the basis of an expunged juvenile record, or any intent to make  any such limitation,
specification or discrimination, unless based upon a  bona fide occupational qualification. Identifica-
tion of  prospective employees according to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national
[13]
SB 1573
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
origin, marital status or age does  not violate this section unless the Commissioner of the Bureau
of Labor and Industries, after a hearing conducted pursuant to ORS 659A.805,  determines that the
designation expresses an intent to limit, specify or discriminate  on the basis of race, color, religion,
sex, sexual orientation, national origin, marital status or age.
(e) For an employment agency, because of an individual’s race,  color, religion, sex, sexual ori-
entation, national origin, marital status or age if the individual is  18 years of age or older, or be-
cause of the race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, marital status or age  of
any other person with whom the individual associates, or because of an individual’s  juvenile record
that has been expunged pursuant to [ ORS 419A.260  and 419A.262 ] sections 2 to  4 of this 2020
Act, to classify or refer for employment, or to fail or refuse to refer for employment, or  otherwise
to discriminate against the individual. However, it is not an unlawful employment practice  for an
employment agency to classify or refer for employment an individual when the  classification or re-
ferral results from a bona fide occupational qualification reasonably necessary to the normal oper-
ation of the employer’s business.
(f) For any person to discharge, expel or  otherwise discriminate against any other person be-
cause that other person has opposed any unlawful practice, or because that other person has  filed
a complaint, testified or assisted in any proceeding under this chapter or has attempted to do so.
(g) For any person, whether an employer or  an employee, to aid, abet, incite, compel or coerce
the doing of any of the acts forbidden under this chapter or to attempt to do so.
(2) The provisions of this section apply to  an apprentice under ORS 660.002 to 660.210, but the
selection of an apprentice on the  basis of the ability to complete the required apprenticeship train-
ing before attaining the age of 70 years is not an  unlawful employment practice. The commissioner
shall administer  this section with respect to apprentices under ORS 660.002 to 660.210 equally with
regard to all employees and labor organizations.
(3) The compulsory retirement of employees required  by law at any age is not an unlawful em-
ployment practice if lawful under federal law.
(4)(a) It is not an  unlawful employment practice for an employer or labor organization to provide
or make financial provision for child care  services of a custodial or other nature to its employees
or members who are responsible for a minor child.
(b) As used in this subsection, “responsible for a minor  child” means having custody or legal
guardianship of a minor child or acting in loco parentis to the child.
(5) This section does not prohibit an employer from enforcing  an otherwise valid dress code or
policy, as long as the employer provides, on a case-by-case basis, for reasonable accommodation  of
an individual based on the health and safety needs of the individual.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 670.290 is amended to read:
670.290. It  shall be unlawful for any state agency or licensing board, including the Oregon State
Bar, to:
(1) Require that an applicant for employment, licensing or  admission answer any questions re-
garding the existence or contents  of a juvenile record that has been expunged pursuant to [ ORS
419A.260 and 419A.262 ] sections 2 to 4 of this 2020 Act ;
(2) Bar or discharge from employment or refuse to hire or  employ such individual because of the
existence or contents of a juvenile record that has been expunged pursuant to [ ORS 419A.260 and
419A.262] sections 2 to 4 of this 2020 Act ; or
(3) Deny, revoke or suspend a license because of the existence or contents  of a juvenile record
that has been expunged pursuant  to [ ORS 419A.260  and 419A.262 ] sections 2 to 4 of this 2020
[14]
SB 1573
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Act.
REPORT
SECTION 12.
Report to Legislative Assembly. No later than September 15, 2021, the
Oregon Youth Authority, in collaboration with county juvenile departments  and the Judicial
Department, shall submit a report to the  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
relating to juveniles describing the  process by which records of contacts are expunged under
sections 2 to 4 of this 2020 Act, and include:
(1) The number of applications  for expunction submitted by juvenile departments under
section 2 of this 2020 Act and ORS 419A.262 (2).
(2) The number of applications for expunction submitted by persons who  are subjects of
records under section 2 of this 2020 Act and ORS 419A.262 (2).
(3) The number of applications for expunction described in subsections (1) and (2)  of this
section granted by the court, the number of applications denied by the  court and the number
of applications still pending.
(4) Recommendations for legislation to improve the expunction process.
(5) Recommendations  for legislation extending the expunction process under ORS
419A.262 (2) to  records of juveniles who have been found to be under the jurisdiction of the
juvenile court for certain misdemeanors and  felonies and recommendations regarding which
misdemeanor and felony records should be automatically expunged.
(6) A description of the types of access to court data information and  law enforcement
data information systems the Oregon Youth Authority and juvenile departments  have or
would require to certify the accuracy  of both juvenile and adult criminal records checks to
implement the legislation recommended under subsection (5) of this section.
(7) The estimated cost of the  legislation recommended under subsections (4) and (5) of
this section.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 13.
Sections 2 to 4 of this 2020 Act and the amendments to ORS 419A.250,
419A.260, 419A.262, 419A.265, 419C.370, 659A.030 and 670.290 by sections 5 to  11 of this 2020
Act apply to expunction of records related to  juvenile cases created before, on or after the
effective date of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 14. (1) Sections 2 to 4 of this 2020 Act, and the amendments to ORS 419A.250,
419A.260, 419A.262, 419A.265, 419C.370, 659A.030  and 670.290 by sections 5 to 11 of this 2020
Act become operative on January 1, 2021.
(2) The State Court Administrator and the Oregon  Youth Authority may take any action
before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this  section that is necessary for the
administrator or the authority to exercise, on and after the operative date  specified in sub-
section (1) of this section, all  of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the adminis-
trator or the authority by sections 2 to 4 of this 2020 Act and the amendments to  ORS
419A.250, 419A.260, 419A.262, 419A.265, 419C.370, 659A.030 and 670.290 by sections 5  to 11 of
this 2020 Act.
SECTION 15. The unit and section captions used in this 2020 Act are provided only for
[15]
SB 1573
1
2
3
4
5
6
the convenience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory  law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 16.
This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[16]