Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Desalination is established.
(2) The task force consists of 15 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the  Senate shall appoint two members from among members of the
Senate, each member being from a different political party.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives  shall appoint two members from among
members of the House of Representatives, each member being from a different  political
party.
(c) The Governor shall appoint 11 members as follows:
(A) One member representing the State Department of Agriculture;
(B) One member representing the State Department of Energy;
(C) One member representing the Department of Environmental Quality;
(D) One member representing the Water Resources Department;
(E) One member representing the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries;
(F) One member representing an association representing Oregon ports; and
(G) Five at-large members.
(3) The task force shall study  the creation of a statewide desalination program. In con-
ducting the study, the task force shall consider program viability and  development strategies
and may consider  other issues related to the creation of a statewide desalination program,
as determined by the task force.
(4) The task force may consult with experts, hear testimony  from affected persons and
collect data and information necessary to carry out the task force’s duties.
(5) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for  the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by  the task force requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the task force.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2760
HB 3300
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make  an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to an interim committee  of the Legislative
Assembly related to water no later than December 15, 2026.
(12) The Water Resources Department shall provide staff support to the task force.
(13) Members of  the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]