Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall  establish and administer a grant
program for community schools. For  the purpose of the program, the department may enter
into a contract with a nonprofit entity that has experience with community schools.
(2) Any eligible applicant may apply to participate in the grant  program under this sec-
tion. An applicant is an eligible applicant if the applicant:
(a) Is a consortium of:
(A) One or more school districts;
(B) One or more community-based organizations; and
(C) Any combination of education  service districts, federally recognized tribes, nonprofit
organizations and other public and private entities.
(b) Is able to provide matching funds.
(c) Has a plan for implementing a community school, as described in subsection (3) of this
section.
(3) An applicant that receives moneys under this section must use the moneys to create
and maintain a community school. A community school is an existing public school that:
(a) Participates in a  community-based effort to coordinate and integrate educational,
developmental, family, health and other comprehensive services  through community-based
organizations and public and private partnerships; and
(b) Provides access to the services  described in paragraph (a) of this subsection at a
school:
(A) To students, families and the community; and
(B) At times that may include during and after school hours, on weekends  and during
summer.
(4) For the purpose of administering the grant program, the department  or the entity
under contract with  the department shall establish a committee with members who have
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4721
HB 3941
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
experience in trauma-informed school systems,  culturally specific community engagement,
school health services, health or education equity practices, school or community  needs as-
sessments, after-school programs or community schools.
(5) The department, or the entity under contract with the department,  shall select no
more than five eligible  applicants to receive a grant of $170,000 for each year of participation
in the grant  program. The selection of the applicants and the terms of the grant agreement
shall take into consideration the recommendations of the committee established under sub-
section (4) of this section. Each eligible applicant shall identify one member of the consor-
tium to enter into a grant agreement on behalf of the consortium.
(6) The department shall submit reports concerning  the grant program to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education as follows:
(a) The first report  must be submitted no later than September 15, 2026, and must sum-
marize progress on the establishment and administration of the grant program.
(b) The second report must be submitted no later than September 15, 2028, and must
summarize progress on the administration of the grant program.
(c) The third report must be submitted no later  than September 15, 2029, and must pro-
vide a summary of the grant program.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2030.
SECTION 3. There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, from the  Admin-
istrative Services Economic Development Fund, to  the Department of Education, the amount
of $4,990,000 for the grant program established and administered  as provided by section 1 of
this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]