Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $24,500,000 for
the department to distribute according to the following schedule to be used by  each recipient
only for the respective industrial lands project there set forth:
Amount Recipient Project
$1,500,000 City of Depoe Bay Docks and pilings
improvements.
$1,000,000 City of La Pine Business Incubator located
at the La Pine Industrial
Park.
$1,300,000 City of Monroe Water infrastructure
improvements.
$2,200,000 City of Waldport Sewer connections for
industrial lands.
$2,000,000 Independence Water and sewer infra-
State Airport structure improvements.
$2,500,000 Harney County Infrastructure improvements on
industrial land within
the City of Burns.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2585
HB 3416
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
$2,500,000 Baker County Infrastructure improvements on
industrial land within
the county.
$2,000,000 North Unit Irri- Agricultural industrial infra-
gation District structure improvements.
$2,500,000 Port of Morrow Water and transportation
infrastructure improvements
in South Morrow County.
$1,500,000 Revino, Inc. Sustainable glass packaging
center.
$5,000,000 Umatilla Electric Utility expansion on indus-
Cooperative trial land in both Morrow
and Umatilla Counties.
$500,000 Wheeler County Rural broadband expansion.
SECTION 2. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]