Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, for deposit into the Manufactured
Home Preservation Fund under ORS 458.366, to be used for loans under ORS 458.356  to re-
place manufactured dwellings built before 1980 in Coos, Curry and Douglas Counties.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2091