Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Moneys appropriated from the General Fund for payment of the  expenses
of members of the Legislative Assembly that are unexpended and uncommitted on the  last
day of each biennium shall be transferred to the  Public Employees Retirement Fund to be
applied against the liabilities of the Public Employees Retirement System.
SECTION 2. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4171