Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon All Funds Crisis and Disaster Resourcing Task Force is  es-
tablished, consisting of seven members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint one  member from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint:
(A) One member representing the private business community;
(B) One member representing state or local public safety agencies; and
(C) Three at-large members who are residents of this state.
(2) The following serve as nonvoting ex officio members of the task force:
(a) The Adjutant General;
(b) The Superintendent of State Police;
(c) The Director of the Oregon Department of Emergency Management;
(d) The members  of the Oregon Homeland Security Council created under ORS 401.109;
and
(e) Any other individuals  with expertise in public safety issues designated by the Gover-
nor or the task force.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Review the sources and types of  public and private moneys and other resources that
are used to support public safety and security in this state;
(b) Assess the value of existing taxes, fees and other state and federal moneys and  eval-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1724
HB 2898
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
uate the outcomes resulting from these funding sources; and
(c) Make recommendations to the Legislative Assembly for the design and  implementa-
tion of a strategic resources structure and system necessary  to respond to future public
safety and security needs in this state.
(4) A  majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(5) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority  of the voting
members of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for  legislation, to an interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly related to public safety no later than December 15, 2026.
(11) The Oregon Department of  Emergency Management shall provide staff support to
the task force.
(12) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation, but may be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel and  other
expenses incurred by them in the  performance of their official duties in the manner and
amounts provided for in ORS 292.495. Claims for  expenses incurred in performing functions
of the task force shall be paid out of funds appropriated to the Legislative Policy  and Re-
search Director for purposes of the task force.
(13) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws  relating to confidentiality, to furnish such information and advice as the members
of the task force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]