Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 173.130 is amended to read:
173.130. (1)(a) The Legislative Counsel shall prepare  or assist in the preparation of legislative
measures when requested to do so by a member or committee of the Legislative Assembly.
(b)(A) A member of the Legislative Assembly  may not ask the Legislative Counsel to
prepare more than 25 legislative measures for a regular  session of the Legislative Assembly
that begins in an odd-numbered year.
(B) A committee of the Legislative Assembly may not ask the  Legislative Counsel to
prepare more than 15 legislative measures for a regular  session of the Legislative Assembly
that begins in an odd-numbered year.
(c) Notwithstanding the limits imposed by paragraph (b) of this subsection:
(A) The President of the Senate may authorize a member or committee of the Senate  to
ask the Legislative Counsel to prepare  additional legislative measures for the member or
committee.
(B) The Speaker of the House of Representatives may authorize a  member or committee
of the House of Representatives to ask the Legislative  Counsel to prepare additional legisla-
tive measures for the member or committee.
(C) The limitations  of paragraph (b) of this subsection do not apply to the Joint Com-
mittee on Ways and Means.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4833
HB 2006
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2)(a) Upon the written request of a state agency, the Legislative Counsel may prepare or  assist
in the preparation of legislative measures that have been approved for preparation in writing  by the
Governor or the Governor’s designated representative. The Legislative Counsel may  also prepare
or assist  in the preparation of legislative measures that are requested in writing by the Judicial
Department, the Governor, the Secretary of  State, the State Treasurer, the Attorney General or the
Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries.  In accordance with ORS 283.110, the Legisla-
tive Counsel may charge the agency or officer for the services performed.
(b)(A) The Governor and state  agencies may not ask the Legislative Counsel to prepare
more than a combined total of  400 legislative measures for a regular session of the Legisla-
tive Assembly that begins in an odd-numbered year.
(B) The limit imposed by this paragraph  does not include legislative measures requested
by the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services to implement the fiscal recommen-
dations of the Governor contained in the budget report of the Governor.
(C) As used in this paragraph and paragraph (e) of this subsection, “state agency”  means
a board, commission, department,  division, office or other entity of the executive depart-
ment, as that term is defined in ORS 174.112, but does not include a  state agency subject to
paragraph (c) or (d) of this subsection.
(c)(A) The Secretary  of State may not ask the Legislative Counsel to prepare more than
25 legislative measures for a regular session of the Legislative Assembly  that begins in an
odd-numbered year.
(B) The State Treasurer may not ask the Legislative Counsel  to prepare more than 25
legislative measures  for a regular session of the Legislative Assembly that begins in an
odd-numbered year.
(C) The  Attorney General may not ask the Legislative Counsel to prepare more than 25
legislative measures  for a regular session of the Legislative Assembly that begins in an
odd-numbered year.
(D) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor  and Industries may not ask the Legislative
Counsel to  prepare more than 25 legislative measures for a regular session of the Legislative
Assembly that begins in an odd-numbered year.
(d) The Judicial Department, as defined in ORS 174.113, may not ask  the Legislative
Counsel to prepare more than 100 legislative measures for a regular  session of the Legisla-
tive Assembly that begins in an odd-numbered year.
(e) Notwithstanding the  limit imposed by paragraph (b)(A) of this subsection, the Presi-
dent of the Senate or the Speaker of the House of  Representatives may authorize the Gov-
ernor and state agencies  to ask the Legislative Counsel to prepare additional legislative
measures for the Governor and state agencies.
(3) The Legislative Counsel shall  give such consideration to and service concerning any measure
or other  legislative matter before the Legislative Assembly as is requested by the House of Repre-
sentatives, the Senate or any  committee of the Legislative Assembly that has the measure or other
matter under consideration.
(4) The Legislative Counsel, pursuant to the  policies and directions of the Legislative Counsel
Committee and  in conformity with any applicable rules of the House of Representatives or Senate,
shall perform or cause to be performed  research service requested by any member or committee of
the Legislative Assembly in  connection with the performance of legislative functions. Research as-
signments made by joint or concurrent resolution of the Legislative  Assembly shall be given priority
[2]
HB 2006
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
over other research  requests received by the Legislative Counsel. The research service to be per-
formed includes the administrative services  incident to the accomplishment of the research requests
or assignments.
(5) The Legislative Counsel shall give an  opinion in writing upon any question of law in which
the Legislative Assembly or any member or committee of the  Legislative Assembly may have an
interest when the Legislative Assembly or any member or  committee of the Legislative Assembly
requests the opinion.  Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and ORS 173.135, the
Legislative  Counsel  shall not give opinions or provide other legal services to persons or agencies
other than the Legislative Assembly and members and committees of the Legislative Assembly.
(6) The Legislative Counsel  may enter into contracts to carry out the functions of the Legisla-
tive Counsel.
[3]