Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Forestry Department shall  implement and administer a pro-
gram to periodically review and modernize the structure and processes of  the department
as necessary to ensure department ability to adequately meet changing  demands for wildfire
prevention and  wildfire response in this state, and to reduce the diversion of department
resources from other  programs to wildfire prevention and response. The periodic review shall
include, but need not be limited  to, a comparison of department structure and processes with
the resource needs for adequate  wildfire prevention efforts, adequate response to actual or
potential wildfire incidents and adequately carrying  out other department programs concur-
rently with  department wildfire programs. The comparison must include, but need not be
limited to, the efficiency and effectiveness of  department structure and processes regarding
wildfire fighting personnel and equipment resources, reduction of the likelihood  or likely se-
verity of wildfires, anticipation and  addressing of actual or potential changes to resource
needs and carrying out other department programs concurrently with wildfire programs.
(2) Subject to ORS chapters 240 and 243, the department  shall periodically modernize the
department structure and  programs as the department deems appropriate to improve effi-
ciency and effectiveness with regard  to wildfires. Modernization of programs and structures
with regard to wildfires:
(a) May include, but not be limited to:
(A) Hiring, assigning, reassigning, classifying or reclassifying personnel who are  trained
to fight or prevent wildfires to create conditions that promote the recruitment, retention and
effective use of those personnel; and
(B) Hiring, assigning, reassigning, classifying or reclassifying personnel not described in
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph as the department deems appropriate to  provide support
services to personnel  engaged in fighting or preventing wildfires, support reductions in the
likelihood or likely severity of wildfires or enable  the carrying out of other department pro-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 267
SB 1516
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
grams concurrently with wildfire programs.
(b) Shall ensure that:
(A) Wildfire programs are supplied with modern equipment in amounts and types  that
the department deems appropriate for responding to  actual or potential threats of wildfire
in this state; and
(B) Equipment  assignments within this state are modernized as necessary to address
changing needs, conditions and equipment resources.
(c) Shall include efforts to develop or improve arrangements with insurers  and other
private parties to encourage  landowner cooperation in reducing the likelihood or likely se-
verity of wildfires.
(3) The department may retain the services of third party  evaluators to identify, analyze
or make recommendations regarding the modernization of all or part of department struc-
tures and programs regarding wildfire, including but not limited to identifying, analyzing  and
making recommendations regarding possible funding  sources for meeting wildfire personnel
or equipment resource needs, wildfire prevention needs and support personnel needs.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Forestry Department, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, out  of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended  under the modernization
program described in section 1 of this 2020 Act  for converting not more than 50 seasonal
positions for personnel who are trained to fight or prevent wildfires into  permanent full-time
positions that have duties including, but not  be limited to, the fighting or prevention of
wildfires.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the  State Forestry Department, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount  of $_______, which may be expended under the modernization
program described in section 1 of this 2020 Act to fill equipment resource needs related to
wildfires, including but not limited to aviation assets.
SECTION 4. This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]