Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 327.
SECTION 2. (1) Each school district, education service district and public charter  school
shall ensure that state moneys received by the district or school  are used to educate the
student for which the moneys are received, as provided by this section.
(2)(a) When a school district, an education service district or a public charter school re-
ceives additional moneys based on the characteristics of a student,  as described in ORS
327.013 (1)(c)(A)(i), (ii) or (v), the school district, education service district  or public charter
school shall ensure that  the additional moneys were used to improve the educational out-
comes of the students described in ORS 327.013 (1)(c)(A)(i), (ii) or (v).
(b) The requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection apply to:
(A) Distributions of the State School Fund to school districts under ORS 327.013;
(B) Distributions of the State School Fund to education  service districts under ORS
327.019;
(C) Distributions of the State School Fund to public  charter schools as provided by ORS
327.362, 338.155, 338.157 and 338.165;
(D) Distributions of the Student  Investment Account to school districts and public
charter schools as provided by ORS 327.195;
(E) Distributions of the Statewide Education  Initiatives Account to education service
districts as provided by ORS 327.254; and
(F) Any other distributions of state moneys  by the Department of Education to school
districts, education service districts and public charter schools, as identified by the  State
Board of Education by rule.
(3) In addition to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, each school district,
education service district and public charter school shall:
(a) Calculate the average amount of moneys received by the district or school that,  mi-
nus any administrative costs of the district or school, is attributable to  the direct education
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3254
SB 252
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
of a student; and
(b) Ensure that the amount calculated under paragraph (a) of  this subsection is used for
the benefit of each student, which may include ensuring  that the amount attributable to the
student is made available to the school in which the student is enrolled.
(4) The State  Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the administration
of this section, including prescribing any auditing requirements necessary  to ensure compli-
ance with the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act first applies to the 2024-2025 school year.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act takes effect on July 1, 2024.
[2]