Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 447.210 to
447.280.
SECTION 2. The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services shall
adopt rules to conform the structural code to the following requirements:
(1) At least 10 percent of the dwelling units or sleeping units in Group R-2 buildings,  or
at least one dwelling unit  or sleeping unit in a building with more than 10 dwelling units or
sleeping units, must be Type A dwelling units or sleeping units, as  described in the American
National Standards Institute standard A117.1, as amended and in effect on  the effective date
of this 2025 Act.
(2) In multifamily housing with three or more dwelling units or sleeping units  all of the
dwelling units  or sleeping units are subject to accessibility requirements under the Fair
Housing Act and must be Type B dwelling units, as  described in the American National
Standards Institute  standard A117.1, as amended and in effect on the effective date of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 3.  ORS 456.510 is amended to read:
456.510. (1) Except as provided in this section and ORS 456.513, the Housing  and Community
Services Department may not provide funding for the development of new rental  housing that is a
subsidized development unless:
(a) Each dwelling unit of the housing meets the following requirements:
(A) At least one visitable exterior route  leading to a dwelling unit entrance that is stepless and
has a minimum clearance of 32 inches.
(B) One or more visitable routes between  the visitable dwelling unit entrance and a visitable
common living space.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 733
SB 444
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
(C) At least one visitable common living space.
(D) One or more visitable routes between the dwelling unit entrance and a powder room.
(E) A powder room doorway that is stepless and has a minimum clearance of 32 inches.
(F) A powder room  with walls that are reinforced in a manner suitable for handrail installation.
(G) Light switches, electrical outlets  and environmental controls that are at a reachable height.
(b) For a development that has  a shared community room or that has 20 or more contiguous
units, there is at least one powder room available for all tenants and guests that is accessible.
(c) The subsidized development complies with the Uniform  Federal Accessibility Stan-
dards, as amended and in effect  on the effective date of this 2025 Act, except that a subsi-
dized development that falls within the  multifamily housing occupancy classification, as
defined in the Uniform Federal Accessibility Standards, must provide features  identified
within the standards that are appropriate for:
(A) Making visitable the greater of:
(i) The common areas of the subsidized development and  at least 10 percent of the total
number of dwelling units in the subsidized development; or
(ii) The common areas of the subsidized development and  at least two dwelling units, if
the subsidized development has 15 or more dwelling units; and
(B) Enabling communication for individuals who are blind or deaf in the greater of:
(i) The common areas of  the subsidized development and at least four percent of the total
number of dwelling units within the subsidized development; or
(ii) The common areas of the subsidized development and at least  one dwelling unit, if
the subsidized development has 15 or more dwelling units.
(2) For a multistory structure without an elevator,  this section applies only to dwelling units
on the ground floor of the structure.
(3) This section does not apply to agriculture workforce housing as  defined in ORS 315.163 that
is located on a farm.
SECTION 4.
(1) Section 2 of this  2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 456.510 by section
3 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services and the Housing
and Community Services Department may adopt rules and take any other  action before the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the di-
rector and the department, on and after the  operative date specified in subsection (1) of this
section, to undertake and exercise all of the duties, powers  and functions conferred on the
director and the department by section 2 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 456.510
by section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]