Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 167.315 to
167.333.
SECTION 2. (1) A person commits the crime of aggravated animal neglect in the first
degree if, except as otherwise authorized by law,  the person intentionally, knowingly,
recklessly or with criminal negligence fails to provide minimum care for an animal in  the
person’s custody or care and the failure to provide minimum care results in:
(a) The death of the animal; or
(b) Endangerment of the life of the animal.
(2) Aggravated animal neglect in the  first degree is a Class C felony and the Oregon
Criminal Justice Commission shall classify the offense:
(a) As crime category 6 if up to 40 animals were the subject of the neglect.
(b) As crime category 7 if more than 40 animals were the subject of the neglect.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this  2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 167.310 to
167.390.
SECTION 4. (1) A person commits the crime of interfering with  an investigation into an
offense against  an animal if the person intentionally or knowingly conceals an animal,
transports an animal or takes other action to prevent a peace officer, as defined in ORS
161.015, or  a licensed veterinarian from examining an animal suspected of being the subject
of a violation under ORS 167.310 to 167.390.
(2) Interfering with an investigation into  an offense against an animal is a Class A
misdemeanor.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4295
HB 3384
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 5.
 ORS 167.330 is amended to read:
167.330. (1)  A person commits the crime of animal neglect in the first degree if, except as oth-
erwise authorized by law, the person intentionally, knowingly, recklessly or  with criminal
negligence:
(a) Fails to provide minimum care for an animal in the person’s custody or control and the
failure to provide care results in serious physical injury [ or death ] to the animal; or
(b) Tethers a domestic animal  in the person’s custody or control and the tethering results in
serious physical injury [ or death ] to the domestic animal.
(2) Animal neglect in the first degree is a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2)  of this section, animal neglect in the first degree is a Class
C felony if:
(a) The person  committing the offense has previously been convicted of one or more offenses
under this section, ORS 167.325 or the equivalent laws of another jurisdiction;
(b) The offense was part of a criminal episode involving 10 or more animals; or
(c) The  person knowingly commits the offense in the immediate presence of a minor child. For
purposes of this paragraph, a minor child is in the immediate presence of  animal neglect if the
neglect is seen or directly perceived in any other manner by the minor child.
(4) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission  shall classify animal neglect in the first degree
under subsection (3) of this section:
(a) As crime category 6 if 10 to 40 animals were the subject of the neglect.
(b) As crime category 7 if more than 40 animals were the subject of the neglect or if the  offense
is a felony because of circumstances described in subsection (3)(a) or (c) of this section.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 167.332 is amended to read:
167.332. (1) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section:
(a) In addition  to any other penalty imposed by law, a person convicted of violating ORS 167.315,
167.340 or  167.355 or of a misdemeanor under ORS 167.320, 167.325 or 167.330 may not [ possess ] own,
exert control over or reside on  the same property as  any animal of the same genus against
which the crime was committed or any domestic animal for a period of five years  following entry
of the conviction.
(b) In addition  to any other penalty imposed by law, a person convicted of violating ORS 167.322,
167.333, 167.365 or 167.428 or of a felony under ORS 167.320, 167.325 or 167.330  or section 2 of this
2023 Act may not [ possess ] own, exert control over or reside on the same property as  any  ani-
mal of the same genus against which the crime was committed or any domestic animal for a period
of 15 years following entry of  the conviction. However, the sentencing court may reduce the prohi-
bition period if the person successfully completes mental health treatment approved by the court.
(2) A person who [ possesses an animal in violation  of ] violates  this section commits a Class C
misdemeanor. When a person is convicted of [ possessing  an animal in violation of ] violating this
section, as part of the sentence the court may order the removal  of that animal from the person’s
residence and as a condition  of the person’s probation may prohibit the person from [ possessing ]
owning, exerting control over or residing on the same property as  any animal of the same
genus that the person unlawfully [ possessed under ] owned, exerted control over or  resided on the
same property as in violation of  this section or against which  the underlying violation of ORS
167.315, 167.320, 167.322, 167.325, 167.330, 167.333, 167.340, 167.355, 167.365 or 167.428  or section  2
of this 2023 Act  was committed.
(3) The [ animal possession ] prohibition described in subsection (1) of this section  does not apply
[2]
HB 3384
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to a person’s first conviction  if the person is the owner of a commercial livestock operation and the
underlying violation  of ORS 167.315, 167.320, 167.322, 167.325, 167.330, 167.333, 167.340, 167.355,
167.365 or 167.428 or section 2 of this 2023 Act  was committed against livestock.
(4)(a) A person subject to  [an animal possession ] a prohibition described in subsection (1) of this
section may file a motion  with the sentencing court requesting a waiver of the prohibition. The
person must file a sworn affidavit in support of the motion stating that:
(A) The person’s conviction leading to the [ possession ] prohibition involved only livestock;
(B) During  the two years before the conviction triggering the prohibition, the person was the
owner of a commercial livestock operation;
(C) The person has not been convicted, in the previous five years, of a  crime involving animals
or domestic violence or a crime where the victim was under 18 years of age; and
(D) The person’s conviction was the result of:
(i) Criminal liability for the conduct of another person under ORS 161.155 (2)(c);
(ii) Criminal liability of a corporation as described in  ORS 161.170, and the person is a corpo-
ration; or
(iii) Animal neglect  as described in ORS 167.325 or 167.330 and the person’s criminal conduct
was not knowing or intentional.
(b) When a person files a motion and affidavit described in paragraph  (a) of this subsection, the
sentencing court shall hold a hearing. At the hearing, the sentencing court shall grant  the motion
if the person proves by clear and convincing evidence that:
(A) Continued enforcement of the prohibition against [ possessing ] owning, exerting control
over or residing on the same property as  livestock would result in substantial  economic hardship
that cannot otherwise be mitigated;
(B) The person no longer poses any risk to animals; and
(C) The person is capable of  providing and willing to provide necessary, adequate and appro-
priate levels of care for all  livestock that would come within the person’s custody or control if the
petition is granted.
(c) When deciding a motion filed under this subsection, the sentencing  court may consider the
person’s financial circumstances and mental health in determining whether the person is  capable of
adequately caring for livestock.
(d) If the sentencing court grants the motion described in this  subsection, the waiver of the
prohibition [ against possessing animals ] shall apply only to livestock. The sentencing  court shall
further order that for five years  the person must consent to reasonable inspections by law enforce-
ment and the United States Department of Agriculture to ensure the welfare of the  livestock under
the person’s custody or control. A refusal to consent to a  reasonable inspection described in this
paragraph is contempt of court and, if the  person is found in contempt, shall result in the sentencing
court revoking the waiver of the [ possession ] prohibition.
(e) As used in this  subsection, “commercial livestock operation” means a business engaged in
the raising, breeding or selling of livestock for profit.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 167.350 is amended to read:
167.350. (1)(a) In addition to and not in lieu of any other sentence it may impose, a  court may
require a defendant convicted under ORS 167.315 to  167.333, 167.340, 167.355 or 167.365 to forfeit
any rights of the defendant in the animal subjected to  the violation, and to repay the reasonable
costs incurred by a government agency,  a humane investigation agency or its agent or a person
prior to judgment in caring for each animal associated with the criminal proceeding.
[3]
HB 3384
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) If a government agency or a humane investigation agency or its agent provides care and
treatment for impounded or seized animals, a court that orders a defendant to  repay reasonable
costs of care under paragraph (a)  of this subsection may not reduce the incurred cost amount based
on the agency having received donations or other funding for the care.
(2)(a) When the court orders the defendant’s rights in the animal to be forfeited,  the court may
further order that those rights be given over to an appropriate  person or agency demonstrating a
willingness to accept and care for the animal or to the county  or an appropriate animal care agency
for further disposition in accordance with accepted practices for humane treatment of animals.  The
court may not transfer the defendant’s rights in the  animal to any person who resides with the de-
fendant.
(b) This subsection does not limit the right of the person or agency  to whom rights are granted
to resell or otherwise make disposition of  the animal. A transfer of rights under this subsection
constitutes a transfer of ownership. The court shall require a person  to whom rights are granted to
execute an agreement to provide minimum care to the animal. The agreement must  indicate that
allowing the defendant to [ possess ] own, exert control over or reside on  the same property as
the animal constitutes a crime.
(3) In addition to and not in lieu of any other sentence it may  impose, a court may order the
owner or person having custody of an animal to repay any reasonable costs incurred by a  govern-
ment agency, a humane investigation agency or its agent or a person  in providing minimum care to
the animal that are not included in a repayment order under subsection (1) of this section.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 161.625 and 161.635, in addition to and not  in lieu of any
amount fixed by the court as a sentence to pay a fine for a misdemeanor or felony, or of  any
sentence it may impose, a court shall require a person convicted under ORS 167.310 to 167.390
to pay a fine of $100 for each animal involved in the offense for  which the person was con-
victed.
(b) Moneys  paid under paragraph (a) of this subsection must be deposited in the Proper
Animal Husbandry Fund established under section 9 of this 2023 Act.
[(4)] (5)  A court may order a person  convicted under ORS 167.315 to 167.333, 167.340, 167.355,
167.365 or 167.428 to participate in available animal cruelty  prevention programs or education pro-
grams, or both, or to obtain psychological counseling for treatment of mental health disorders that,
in the court’s judgment, contributed to the commission of the crime. The  person shall bear any costs
incurred by the person for participation in counseling or treatment programs  under this subsection.
[(5)] (6)  ORS 131.550 to 131.600 do not apply to the forfeiture  of an animal subjected to a vio-
lation of ORS 167.315  to 167.333, 167.340, 167.355, 167.365 or 167.428. Any such animal is subject to
forfeiture as provided in subsections (1) to (3) of this section  or, if the animal is a fighting bird, as
provided in ORS 167.435.
SECTION 8.
(1) The Department of State Police shall establish a program  for awarding
grants to organizations that teach proper animal husbandry to youths.
(2) The department shall establish criteria for awarding  grants, keep records of grants
awarded and establish requirements for reporting on the use of grant moneys by grantees.
SECTION 9. The Proper Animal Husbandry  Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General  Fund.  The  Proper Animal Husbandry Fund consists
of moneys deposited in the fund  under ORS 167.350 (4), moneys appropriated or otherwise
transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly and other amounts deposited in  the fund
from any source. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Department of
[4]
HB 3384
1
2
State Police for purposes described in section 8 of this 2023 Act.
[5]