Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 15 of this 2024 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 742.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 2 to 15 of this 2024 Act:
(1)(a) “Car sharing program  operator” means a person that owns and engages in the
business of operating a peer-to-peer car sharing program for use by residents of this state.
(b) “Car sharing program operator” does not include  a rental company, as defined in ORS
646A.140 or 744.850, or a car rental company, as defined in ORS 803.219.
(2) “Delivery period” means the time  during which a shared vehicle is being delivered to
a location where the start time specified in the program agreement will commence.
(3)(a) “Peer-to-peer car sharing” means authorizing, for consideration, an  individual
other than the owner of a shared vehicle to use the shared vehicle.
(b) “Peer-to-peer car sharing” does not  include leasing a motor vehicle or renting a mo-
tor vehicle from a rental company, as defined in  ORS 646A.140 or 744.850, or from a car
rental company, as defined in ORS 803.219.
(4)(a) “Peer-to-peer car  sharing program” means software or another method by which,
for consideration, an owner of a shared vehicle can communicate with  and authorize another
person to use the shared vehicle.
(b) “Peer-to-peer car sharing program” does not include business  in which a rental
company, as defined in ORS 646A.140  or 744.850, or a car rental company, as defined in ORS
803.219, engages.
(5)(a) “Program agreement” means the terms and  conditions that set forth the duties
of a shared vehicle owner  and a shared vehicle driver with respect to use of a shared vehicle
by means of a peer-to-peer car sharing program.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 73
HB 4066
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) “Program agreement” does not include a rental  agreement, as defined in ORS
646A.140 or 744.850.
(6)(a) “Shared  vehicle” means a motor vehicle that a shared vehicle owner makes avail-
able for  peer-to-peer car sharing under the terms and conditions of a program agreement
and by means of a peer-to-peer car sharing program.
(b) “Shared vehicle” does not include a motor vehicle that a car rental company, as de-
fined in ORS 803.219, rents or makes available for rent.
(7)(a) “Shared vehicle driver” means  an individual who has authorization from a shared
vehicle owner to drive a shared vehicle under the terms and  conditions of a program agree-
ment.
(b) “Shared vehicle driver” does not include an  authorized driver or renter, both as de-
fined in ORS 646A.140.
(8)(a) “Shared  vehicle owner” means the registered owner of a shared vehicle who makes
the shared vehicle available for peer-to-peer car  sharing under the terms and conditions of
a program agreement and communicates the availability of the shared vehicle by  means of
a peer-to-peer car sharing program, or a  designee of the registered owner that the registered
owner authorizes to make the shared vehicle available for sharing as described  in this sub-
section.
(b) “Shared vehicle owner” does not  include a rental company, as defined in ORS 646A.140
or 744.850, or a car rental company, as defined in ORS 803.219.
(9) “Sharing period” means a period of time that:
(a) Begins when a  delivery period begins or, in the absence of a delivery period, at the
start time; and
(b) Ends at the termination time.
(10) “Start time” means the time at which  a shared vehicle becomes subject to the con-
trol of a  shared vehicle driver, either at the time specified for a reservation of the shared
vehicle in the records  of a car sharing program operator or after the time specified in the
reservation.
(11) “Termination time” means  the time at which the earliest of the following events
occurs:
(a) The period during which a shared vehicle driver is authorized to  use a shared vehicle
under the terms and conditions of a program  agreement expires, if the shared vehicle driver
delivers the shared vehicle to a location specified in a car sharing program agreement;
(b) A shared  vehicle driver delivers a shared vehicle to a location other than the location
originally specified in the program agreement if through the peer-to-peer car sharing pro-
gram the shared vehicle owner and the shared vehicle driver agree upon the alternative lo-
cation and incorporate the agreement into the program agreement; or
(c) The shared vehicle owner, or a designee of the shared  vehicle owner, takes possession
and control of the shared vehicle.
SECTION 3.
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a car sharing
program operator shall assume a shared vehicle owner’s liability  that arises during a sharing
period if the liability involves:
(A) Bodily injury to another person;
(B) Damage to the property of another person;
(C) Uninsured motorist coverage, as defined in ORS 742.500; or
[2]
HB 4066
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(D) Personal injury protection losses.
(b) A program agreement between a shared vehicle owner and a car  sharing program
operator governs the limits of liability that the  car sharing program operator assumes, ex-
cept that the limits of  liability may not be less than the minimum required payments set
forth in ORS 806.070.
(2) The duties of a car sharing program operator under subsection (1)(a)  of this section
do not apply if a shared vehicle owner:
(a) Makes an intentional or fraudulent misrepresentation or omission  with respect to a
material provision of a program agreement or to a  car sharing program operator before a
sharing period in which a loss occurs; or
(b) Acts in concert with a shared vehicle driver in failing to return  a shared vehicle in
accordance with the provisions of the program agreement.
(3)(a) A car sharing program operator shall ensure that a motor vehicle liability  insur-
ance policy covers the shared vehicle owner and shared vehicle driver during  each sharing
period and that during the sharing period the motor vehicle liability insurance policy:
(A) Provides the  coverages that the financial responsibility provisions of the Oregon Ve-
hicle Code require, including the minimum required payments set forth in ORS 806.070; and
(B) Recognizes that the motor vehicle that the motor vehicle liability insurance policy
covers is a shared vehicle that is  available to and used by persons other than the shared
vehicle owner by means of peer-to-peer car sharing or does  not exclude a shared vehicle
driver’s use of the shared vehicle.
(b) A car sharing program operator  meets the requirements set forth in paragraph (a)
of this subsection if:
(A) A shared vehicle owner or a shared vehicle driver maintains  a motor vehicle liability
insurance policy with the required coverage;
(B) The car sharing program operator maintains a motor vehicle liability insurance policy
with the required coverage; or
(C) The motor vehicle  liability insurance policies that two or more of the persons de-
scribed in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph maintain combine  to provide the re-
quired coverage.
(c) The insurance described in paragraph (b) of  this subsection that satisfies the re-
quirements specified in paragraph (a) of this  subsection is primary during each sharing pe-
riod. If a claim occurs in another state that has minimum  financial responsibility limits
higher than the limits specified in ORS 806.070, during each sharing period  the coverage in
the insurance described in paragraph (b) of  this subsection must satisfy the difference be-
tween the minimum coverage amount in the  state in which the claim occurs and the mini-
mum coverage amount specified in ORS 806.070, up to the applicable policy limits.
(4)(a) A car sharing  program operator that under subsection (3) of this section provides
coverage under a motor vehicle liability insurance policy, or an insurer  that issues a motor
vehicle liability insurance policy required under subsection (3) of this section, shall assume
primary liability for a claim if:
(A) A dispute exists as to  who controlled the shared vehicle at the time of a loss and the
car sharing program operator does not have available, did not retain or fails to provide the
information required under section 7 of this 2024 Act; or
(B) A dispute exists as to whether the shared vehicle was returned  to a location specified
[3]
HB 4066
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in the program agreement or to an alternative location upon which the shared vehicle owner
and the shared vehicle driver agreed through the peer-to-peer car sharing program.
(b) Except under the circumstances described  in subsection (2) of this section, the car
sharing program operator shall provide coverage  under the car sharing program operator’s
motor vehicle liability insurance policy beginning with the first dollar of a claim, and shall
defend against the claim, if the shared vehicle owner’s or the shared  vehicle driver’s motor
vehicle liability insurance policy has lapsed or does not  provide the coverage required under
subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Coverage under a  motor vehicle liability insurance policy that a car sharing program
operator provides may not  require as a condition of coverage that another insurer first deny
a claim.
SECTION 4.
Sections 2 to 15 of this 2024 Act do not:
(1) Limit a car sharing program operator’s  liability for the car sharing program
operator’s own act or omission with respect to the use of a  shared vehicle through a pro-
gram agreement if the act or omission results in an injury to another person; or
(2) Limit a car sharing program operator’s  ability to seek by contract indemnification
from a shared vehicle owner or shared vehicle driver for economic losses that the  car shar-
ing program operator suffers as a result of a shared vehicle owner’s  or shared vehicle
driver’s breach of a program agreement.
SECTION 5. At the time  a vehicle owner registers as a shared vehicle owner on a peer-
to-peer car sharing program  and before the owner makes the owner’s vehicle available for
use as a shared vehicle, the car sharing program operator shall  notify the owner that use
by means of peer-to-peer car sharing of  a shared vehicle against which another person has
a lien, including use without coverage for  physical damage to the shared vehicle, might vio-
late the terms of the shared vehicle owner’s contract with the lienholder.
SECTION 6. (1) An authorized  insurer that issues motor vehicle liability insurance in this
state may exclude any and all coverage under, and the duty to  defend or indemnify any claim
made under,  a shared vehicle owner’s motor vehicle liability insurance policy including, but
not limited to:
(a) Liability coverage for bodily injury and property damage;
(b) Personal injury protection coverage under ORS 742.518 to 742.542;
(c) Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage under ORS 742.500 to 742.506;
(d) Medical payments coverage;
(e) Comprehensive physical damage coverage; and
(f) Collision physical damage coverage.
(2) This section does not limit, invalidate or restrict:
(a) An exclusion, including an exclusion  of coverage for motor vehicles made available for
rent, sharing or hire or for a business use, in any  motor vehicle liability insurance policy,
including an existing motor vehicle liability insurance policy or a  motor vehicle liability in-
surance policy approved for use in this state; or
(b) An insurer’s ability to underwrite, cancel or decline to renew any insurance policy.
SECTION 7.
A car sharing program operator shall collect and verify records of each use
of a shared vehicle during a sharing period and shall  retain the records for at least two
years. The car sharing program operator shall  make the records available to the shared ve-
hicle owner and to insurers that issued motor vehicle  liability insurance policies to the
[4]
HB 4066
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
shared vehicle owner or the shared vehicle driver for the purposes of investigating, adjusting,
negotiating, settling or litigating a claim. The records must include, at a minimum:
(1) The times in which a shared vehicle driver used the shared vehicle;
(2) The locations at which the shared vehicle driver picked up and dropped off the shared
vehicle;
(3) The fees that the shared vehicle driver paid; and
(4) The revenue that the shared vehicle owner received from use of the shared vehicle.
SECTION 8.
A car sharing program operator and a shared vehicle driver are exempt from
vicarious liability under a law of this state or a local law that imposes liability solely on the
basis of vehicle ownership to the same  extent provided for owners and affiliates under 49
U.S.C. 30106.
SECTION 9. An insurer that defends against or indemnifies a claim against a shared ve-
hicle owner or shared vehicle driver under a motor vehicle liability  insurance policy that
excludes coverage for the claim may seek contribution against the insurer that issued a
motor vehicle liability insurance policy to a car sharing program operator if the  claim is
against the shared vehicle owner or the shared vehicle driver for a loss or  injury that occurs
during a sharing period.
SECTION 10.
(1) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a car sharing  program
operator has an insurable interest in a shared vehicle during a sharing period.
(2) A car sharing program  operator may have and maintain as a named insured one or
more motor vehicle liability insurance policies with coverage for:
(a) Liabilities that  the car sharing program operator assumes under a program agree-
ment;
(b) Any liability of a shared vehicle owner or shared vehicle driver; or
(c) Damage or loss with respect to a shared vehicle.
(3) This section does not create liability for a  car sharing program operator to maintain
the coverage described in section 3 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 11.
A program agreement must  disclose to a shared vehicle owner and a shared
vehicle driver:
(1) Whether a car sharing program operator has  any right to seek indemnification from
the shared  vehicle owner or shared vehicle driver for economic loss that the car sharing
program operator suffers as a result  of a breach of the terms and conditions of the program
agreement;
(2) That a motor vehicle liability insurance policy an insurer issues to a  shared vehicle
owner for the shared  vehicle or to a shared vehicle driver does not provide a defense against
or indemnify a claim the car sharing program operator may assert;
(3) That the insurance coverage a car  sharing program operator has for shared vehicles
is in effect only  during sharing periods and that the shared vehicle owner and shared vehicle
driver may not have insurance coverage for any use of the shared vehicle after the  termi-
nation time;
(4) The daily fees for use of the shared vehicle and, if  applicable, the costs of any insur-
ance or protection  package that the shared vehicle owner or shared vehicle driver has
elected to receive;
(5) That the shared vehicle owner’s motor vehicle liability insurance  policy might not
cover use of the shared vehicle by means of peer-to-peer car sharing;
[5]
HB 4066
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) An emergency telephone number the shared vehicle owner or  shared vehicle driver
can use for roadside assistance or customer service; and
(7) Any conditions under which a  shared vehicle driver must maintain a motor vehicle
liability insurance policy with specified primary coverage limits  in order to participate in
peer-to-peer car sharing.
SECTION 12.
(1) A car sharing program operator may not enter into a program  agree-
ment with an individual unless the individual is 18 years of age or older and:
(a) Has a driver license issued in this state  that authorizes the individual to operate ve-
hicles in the  same class as the shared vehicle the individual will operate as a shared vehicle
driver;
(b) Has a driver license issued in another state  or nation that authorizes the individual
to operate vehicles in the same class as the shared vehicle that the individual will operate
as a shared vehicle driver; or
(c) Has a specific authorization under ORS 807.020 to drive vehicles of the  same class as
the shared vehicle the individual will operate as a shared vehicle driver.
(2) A car sharing program operator shall keep a record  of the name, address, driver li-
cense number and jurisdiction that issued the driver  license of the shared vehicle driver and
of any other person who operates the shared vehicle.
SECTION 13.
A car sharing  program operator has sole responsibility for equipment the
car sharing program operator installed in a shared vehicle  and uses to facilitate or monitor
the peer-to-peer car sharing transaction and shall agree to indemnify and hold harmless  the
shared vehicle owner for damage to or theft of the equipment  that the shared vehicle owner
did not cause. A car sharing program operator may  require indemnity from a shared vehicle
driver for damage to or loss of the equipment that occurs during the sharing period.
SECTION 14. (1) At the time a vehicle owner agrees with  a car sharing program operator
to make the owner’s vehicle available for use as a shared  vehicle by means of a peer-to-peer
car sharing program and again before the vehicle owner makes the  vehicle available for use
as a shared vehicle, a car sharing program operator shall:
(a) Verify that the shared vehicle does not have any defects that were identified  in a
safety recall and not repaired; and
(b) Notify the shared vehicle owner of the requirements set forth  in subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) An owner that receives actual notice of  a safety recall for the owner’s motor vehicle:
(a) May not make the motor vehicle available for peer-to-peer car sharing until the defect
identified in the safety recall is repaired.
(b) Shall, as  soon as practicable, remove the motor vehicle from peer-to-peer car sharing
until the defect is repaired, if the motor vehicle is a shared vehicle.
(c) Shall notify the car sharing program operator of the recall as soon as practicable  af-
ter receiving notice of the safety recall so that  the shared vehicle owner may have the defect
repaired, if the motor vehicle is a shared vehicle that is in the possession of a shared vehicle
driver.
SECTION 15.
The Director  of the Department of Consumer and Business Services may
adopt rules necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 2 to 15 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 16. ORS 742.585, 742.590, 742.595 and 742.600 are repealed.
[6]