Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $30,000,000, to be  deposited to the Behavioral Health Incentive
Subaccount created in ORS 675.653.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $30,000,000, which shall be allocated to counties to  be used by
June 30, 2025, for the purposes specified in ORS 675.655 (2).
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, which shall be expended by June 30, 2025, to conduct
outreach to counties, behavioral health practitioners, educational institutions and  the public
about the programs described in ORS 675.655, 675.658 and 675.661.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund,  the amount of $20,000,000, which shall be allocated as follows and expended
by June 30, 2025, to provide grants for clinical supervision in accordance with ORS 675.658:
(1) $7,000,000 to county mental health programs;
(2) $7,000,000 for private practitioners; and
(3) $6,000,000 to the authority to expend as necessary to carry out  the purposes of ORS
675.658.
SECTION 5.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1786