Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon  Cybersecurity Advisory Council shall study the use of
cybersecurity insurance for public bodies, as defined in ORS 174.109. The  advisory council
shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245,  and may include recommen-
dations for legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to  in-
formation management and technology no later than December 31, 2025.
(2) The State Chief Information Officer and the Oregon  Cybersecurity Center of Excel-
lence shall provide staff and support services to the advisory council necessary for  the ad-
visory council to complete the study and report.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 3. (1) The Oregon Cybersecurity Resilience Fund is  established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon
Cybersecurity Resilience Fund must be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the  Legislative As-
sembly; and
(c) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission for distribution to the Oregon Cybersecurity Center of Excellence for the
purposes of assisting public bodies, as defined in ORS 174.109, with:
(a) Meeting cybersecurity insurance coverage requirements; and
(b) Preparing  and planning for, mitigating, responding to and recovering from a
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1367
HB 3228
1
2
3
4
5
cyberattack, information security incident or data breach.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]