Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The governing board of each public university listed in ORS 352.002 shall
establish a personnel policy that includes institutional standards for instructor qualifications.
The policy established under this subsection must  require that faculty of lower division
collegiate courses  have obtained at least a master’s degree in a subject area closely related
to any course the faculty will be teaching.
(2) The policy established under subsection (1) of this section may provide  for an excep-
tion to the master’s degree requirement for:
(a) Faculty who have a demonstrated competency in a professional  field closely related
to any course the faculty will be teaching.
(b) Graduate students who are enrolled at the public university and are employed by the
public university to teach.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3908