Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Cascadia High Speed Rail Task Force is established.
(2) The Governor shall  appoint to the task force members who represent each of the
following:
(a) Metro;
(b) Employers of large businesses;
(c) Community-based organizations;
(d) Housing development organizations;
(e) Higher education, including community colleges, universities or workforce entities;
(f) An environmental organization;
(g) A building trades organization;
(h) The Department of Transportation;
(i) A city within Metro;
(j) A county within Metro;
(k) A transit agency that operates within Metro; and
(L) A disadvantaged business enterprise.
(3) At the option of tribal governments, as defined in ORS 181A.940, the task force  may
include a tribal government representative.
(4) The task force shall:
(a) Explore the possibility of investing in high speed rail in the Portland Metro area;
(b) Develop goals, visions and outcomes to guide early scenario  planning study for high
speed rail in Oregon including concept-level investigation of potential corridors and station
areas;
(c) Identify actions necessary to procure funding;
(d) Engage community partners in  a process to understand the effects of new
infrastructure, address past harms and  future potential burdens and identify opportunities;
and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 963
SB 715
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
(e) Study and make recommendations on any other matters  pertaining to high speed rail
in Oregon.
(5) The task force may:
(a) Research actions necessary to develop high speed rail in Oregon;
(b) Research what current  and future land uses drive economic development and
ridership;
(c) Research the potential community benefits of high speed rail;
(d) Research potential economic benefits of high speed rail;
(e) Evaluate and analyze the  results of the research described in paragraphs (a) to (d)
of this subsection; and
(f) Include in a report  required under subsection (12) of this section a concept-level cost
estimation and planning for high speed rail.
(6) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(7) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the members
of the task force.
(8) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(9) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(10) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(11) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(12) The task force shall submit reports in the  manner provided in ORS 192.245, and may
include recommendations for legislation,  to an interim committee of the Legislative Assem-
bly related to rail transportation:
(a) On the progress of the task force,  no later than January 1, 2027, and January 1, 2028;
and
(b) A final report, no later January 1, 2029.
(13) Metro shall provide staff support to the task force.
(14) Members of the task  force are not entitled to compensation or reimbursement for
expenses and serve as volunteers on the task force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]