Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The office of the Governor, in consultation  with the Racial Justice
Council’s Economic Opportunity Committee, shall conduct a study of laws related to  eco-
nomic opportunity, with a  focus on policy changes that address racial equity in economic
opportunity.
(2) The office shall provide the results of the study to the appropriate interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly, in the manner provided under ORS 192.245,  not later than Sep-
tember 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 3. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 470