Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Department of Revenue, for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $125,000 for distribution to the
Curry County assessor for the purpose of a pilot program that will increase employment  in
the office of the assessor in order to achieve an assessment rotation of seven years for tax-
able property located in the county.
SECTION 2.
This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1936