Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Legislative Assembly  shall provide the translator and interpreter
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3469
HB 3264
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
services described in subsections (2) and (4) of this section to interested members  of the
public that request those services.
(2) Translator  and interpreter services that are provided under this section shall include:
(a) Language translation and interpretation to facilitate witness testimony in legislative
committee or subcommittee hearings;
(b) Language translation  and interpretation to facilitate dialogue in informal meetings
with one or more legislators;
(c) Sign language or other translator and interpreter services  to comply with the federal
Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. 12101 et seq.; or
(d) Language translation  and interpretation to initiate and enhance effectiveness in con-
stituent outreach activities.
(3) A member of the public or  a member of the Legislative Assembly seeking to have
translation and interpretation  services provided shall make a written or verbal request to
the Legislative Administrator:
(a) In interim periods when the Legislative Assembly is not in session, at least  three
business days before the scheduled time of the  hearing or other meeting at which translator
and interpreter services  are to be provided or the constituent outreach activities are to take
place;
(b) During a legislative session, at least one business  day before the scheduled time of
the hearing or other meeting  at which translator and interpreter services are to be provided
or the constituent outreach activities are to take place; and
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs  (a) and (b) of this subsection, if the translator and in-
terpreter services consist of sign language or other  translator and interpreter services
needed to comply with the Americans  with Disabilities Act, at least three business days be-
fore the scheduled time of the hearing or other meeting at which translator and interpreter
services are to be provided.
(4) In addition to the translator and interpreter services described in subsection  (2) of
this section, upon the request of a  member of the Legislative Assembly, the Legislative Ad-
ministrator shall cause public service posters, flyers,  letters, brochures and other publicity
materials describing public services, or official  communications from agencies, to be trans-
lated to languages accessible to communities within the member’s district.
(5) A translator or interpreter performing services under this section is  expected to be
true to the original  message being translated and shall strive to phrase the materials being
translated or interpreted in a way that is accessible to the community being served.
(6) The Legislative Administrator shall provide the translator and  interpreter services
described in this section free of charge.
SECTION 2.
(1) Each Senator  and each Representative shall develop a language access
plan that addresses how their respective offices shall communicate  critical legislative infor-
mation in a timely manner to limited English proficiency constituents.
(2) The language access plan shall  be a self-assessment that each member and their
personal staff shall develop to determine their need for the provision of language access
services, and that shall incorporate the following factors:
(a) Demographic factors based on the United  States Census Bureau American Commu-
nity Survey data that indicate the number or proportion of limited English proficiency con-
stituents that are present in the member’s district and the languages  spoken by these
[2]
HB 3264
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
constituents;
(b) The frequency  with which limited English proficiency individuals interact with the
member’s office;
(c) The nature and importance of the information and the impact of access  to the infor-
mation on day-to-day lives; and
(d) An assessment of  the appropriate balance the member’s office should strike between
achieving meaningful access for limited English proficiency constituents and  the financial
burden on the member’s legislative office operations in achieving this access.
(3) Upon developing a language access plan described in  subsection (2) of this section,
each member shall determine the most effective way to  implement the plan so as to ensure
that the member’s office  is delivering timely accessible communications to their limited
English proficiency constituents, including but not limited to:
(a) The member hiring bilingual or multilingual staff;
(b) Relying on translator and interpreter services provided by the  Legislative Adminis-
trator under section 1 of this 2021 Act; and
(c) Contracting with one or more third-party language service providers utilizing  existing
member office budget resources.
(4) The Legislative Administrator shall provide technical assistance to  each member to
develop and implement a language access plan, including but not limited to:
(a) American Community Survey data;
(b) Assistance in recruitment of bilingual or multilingual staff; and
(c) Assistance in acquiring third-party providers of language services.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Legislative Administration Committee, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,
out of  the General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended for the purpose of
providing the translator and interpreter services described  in sections 1 and 2 of this 2021
Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]