Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall establish a  pilot
program to assist pregnant persons and their immediate family members  who are members
of a low income household to attain  stable housing that begins as early as the person con-
ceives and continues at  least until the child is at least two years of age. The housing must
be safe, affordable, accessible, sized  to meet the needs of the family and located in proximity
to the places of employment and education of all members of the family and to  the health
care, child care and commercial services, and other community assets, beneficial  to the
well-being of all members of the family. The housing must be subject to an affordable housing
covenant as described in ORS 456.270 to 456.295 that maintains the housing as affordable to
low income households for a period of at least 10 years.
(2) In order  to carry out the pilot program established under this section, the depart-
ment:
(a) Shall allow an owner of  a rental housing project development financed by the de-
partment to set aside housing units for participants in the pilot program; and
(b) May accept, from any organization  or state or local government agency that offers
rental assistance, gifts, grants or other contributions of any portion of that rental assist-
ance.
(3) The department shall modify any existing  scoring criteria for rental housing project
development applicants in order to give priority to applicants that commit  to setting aside
housing units for participants in the pilot program established under this section.
(4) The department may adopt rules to carry out this section including rules to determine
pilot program participant eligibility.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $_____, for the  pilot program established
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1539
SB 1155
1
2
under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
[2]