Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 183.
SECTION 2. (1) Before an agency permanently amends a  rule that was adopted or last
amended less than five years earlier, the agency shall report to  an appropriate committee
or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly. The report must include:
(a) A summary of the proposed rule;
(b) A statement justifying the need for amending the rule less than five years after the
rule was adopted or last amended;
(c) An explanation  of how the amended rule will impact penalties, inspections,
recordkeeping requirements,  reporting, analyses and permitting requirements for regulated
entities; and
(d) All public comments submitted regarding the amended rule.
(2) The agency shall submit the report required under this section:
(a) No later than 30 days after the agency stops accepting public  comment on the
amended rule; and
(b) At least 30 days before the amended rule takes effect.
(3) This section does not apply to amendments to rules necessary to:
(a) Implement legislation;
(b) Comply or align with federal regulations or standards; or
(c) Respond to a state of emergency.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 879