Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Water Resources Department shall  study innovative water technologies.
The department shall submit a report on the study in the manner provided by ORS 192.245,
and may include recommendations for legislation, to the  interim committees of the Legisla-
tive Assembly related to natural resources no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $______, for the  purpose of undertaking the study described in
section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1967