Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000 for
the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall develop and imple-
ment a process for awarding grants from  the moneys appropriated under section 1 of this
2023 Act to small  business development centers established under ORS 285B.165 to 285B.171
for the purpose of driving economic development and expanding service to  small businesses
in the respective counties or regions that the centers serve.
(2) A small business development center may apply to the department for a grant to be
used for projects that include, but are not limited to:
(a) Business incubation for targeted industries.
(b) Acquisition of equipment for enhanced distance delivery to  ensure greater access to
advising services throughout rural Oregon, including,  but not limited to, access for under-
represented business owners.
(c) Outreach to businesses that need support during economic recovery.
(d) Regional economic development initiatives.
(3) Grants  may be awarded in amounts not to exceed $1,000,000 per small business de-
velopment center.
(4) The department shall review all complete and  timely applications and promptly notify
the applicant center whether the application has been approved or rejected. Rejection of an
application may not be appealed, but a center may reapply at any time.
(5) Each small business development center that is awarded  grant moneys under this
section shall submit a report  to the department within three months following receipt of the
moneys on the progress of the funded project and upon completion if it occurs later than
three months following receipt.
(6) Not later than September 15, 2024, the department shall submit  a report, in the
manner provided under ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1387
HB 2908
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
relating to economic development, that discusses in detail the  use of the grant moneys by
the recipient small business development centers.
(7) Any moneys appropriated under section 1 of this 2023 Act  that remain unobligated or
unexpended in accordance with this section on June 30, 2025, shall be  transferred to the
General Fund and made available for general governmental purposes.
SECTION 3.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]