Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the State Forestry Department, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2021, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000 for the purpose of
facilitating projects that:
(1) Are pursued in this state under the Good Neighbor  Authority Agreement described
in ORS 526.275; and
(2) Reduce wildfire risks.
SECTION 2.
This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1893