Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 323.455 is amended to read:
323.455. (1) All moneys received by the Department of Revenue from the tax imposed by  ORS
323.030 (1) shall be paid over to the State Treasurer to be  held in a suspense account established
under ORS 293.445. The department  may pay expenses for administration and enforcement of ORS
323.005 to 323.482 out  of moneys received from the tax imposed under ORS 323.030 (1). Amounts
necessary to pay administrative and enforcement expenses are continuously appropriated to  the de-
partment from the suspense account. After the  payment of administrative and enforcement expenses
and refunds, 89.65 percent shall be credited to the General Fund, 3.45 percent is appropriated to the
cities of this state, 3.45 percent is appropriated  to the counties of this state and 3.45 percent is
continuously appropriated to the Department of Transportation for the purpose of  financing and
improving transportation services  for elderly individuals and individuals with disabilities as provided
in ORS 391.800 to 391.830.
(2) The moneys appropriated to cities  and counties under subsection (1) of this section shall be
paid on a monthly basis within 35 days after the end of the  month for which a distribution is made.
Each city shall receive such share of the money appropriated to all cities as its population, as de-
termined under ORS 190.510 to 190.590 last preceding such apportionment, bears  to the total popu-
lation of the cities of the state, and each county shall receive such share of the money as its
population, determined under ORS 190.510 to 190.590 last preceding such apportionment, bears to the
total population of the state.
(3) The moneys appropriated to the Department of Transportation under subsection (1) of  this
section shall be distributed and transferred to the Elderly  and Disabled Special Transportation Fund
established by ORS 391.800 at  the same time as the cigarette tax moneys are distributed to cities
and counties under this section.
(4) Of the  moneys credited to the General Fund under subsection (1) of this section, 51.92 per-
cent shall be dedicated to funding the maintenance and expansion of the number  of persons eligible
for the medical assistance program under ORS chapter 414, or to  funding the maintenance of the
benefits available under the program, or both, and 5.77 percent shall be  credited to the Tobacco Use
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4178
HB 3390
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Reduction Account established under ORS 431A.153.
(5) All moneys received by the Department  of Revenue from the tax imposed by ORS 323.030 (4)
shall be paid over to  the State Treasurer to be held in a suspense account established under ORS
293.445. After the payment of  refunds, the balance shall be credited to the Oregon Health Authority
Fund established by ORS 413.101 and shall be used  to provide the services described in ORS 430.630.
(6) The Department of Revenue  shall report annually in writing to an appropriate com-
mittee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly on the amount of  moneys paid in
each county  under subsections (1) and (2) of this section and the number of persons served
in each county by the payments.
SECTION 2.  ORS 357.780 is amended to read:
357.780. (1) The State Library Board shall disburse moneys under this section based on the  es-
timated total population of  children, from birth to 14 years of age, in the state. For those areas of
the state not served by local public libraries, the moneys available shall be reallocated to  qualifying
public libraries. A public library that begins  providing library service to previously unserved popu-
lation shall be eligible for grants from the moneys appropriated for purposes  of this section. Upon
satisfactory application therefor, the State  Library Board shall cause the appropriate amount to be
paid to the public library.
(2) The State Library Board shall distribute 80  percent of the funds specifically appropriated by
the Legislative Assembly on a per child basis for public library services in the following  manner to
ensure the same population is not counted more than once:
(a) There shall be paid to  each consolidated county library that is the primary provider of public
library services to all persons in a county, or to each library district that is  the primary provider
of public library services in a county, a per capita amount for each child residing in the county.
(b) Where public library services are  provided by a public library for which the governing au-
thority has jurisdiction in more than one county, there  shall be paid to that library a per capita
amount for each child residing therein.
(c) Where public library services are not provided as described in paragraph (a) or  (b) of this
subsection, but by a library  of which the governing authority is the primary provider of public li-
brary services to a jurisdiction less than county wide, there shall be paid to the library a  per capita
amount for children residing  therein. In addition, a public library having a valid contract with a unit
of local government to provide  library services to a population beyond its governing authority’s ju-
risdiction shall be paid a per capita amount for the population of children served if specified  in the
contract. The number of children residing within a jurisdiction that  is less than a county shall be
estimated using the percentage of children in the total population of the county.
(d) Where public library services are  not provided as described in paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of this
subsection, but are provided by a county or district library that has a valid contract with  one or
more libraries to provide persons in their  jurisdiction with library services, there shall be paid to
the county or district  library a per capita amount for each child residing therein, exclusive of the
populations served by libraries eligible for grants under paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(3) The State Library Board shall distribute 20  percent of the funds specifically appropriated by
the Legislative Assembly for public library services on an area basis.
(4) The State Library Board may not make a grant that is less than $1,000  to a qualifying public
library for public library services for children.
(5) The State  Library Board shall report annually in writing to an appropriate committee
or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly on the amount of  moneys disbursed in
[2]
HB 3390
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
each county under this section and the  number of persons served in each county by the
disbursements.
SECTION 3.  ORS 406.454 is amended to read:
406.454. (1) The Director of Veterans’ Affairs shall  adopt by rule a formula to distribute to
county governing bodies funds appropriated to  the director to enhance and expand the services
provided by county veterans’ service officers appointed  under ORS 408.410. In developing the dis-
tribution formula, the director shall consider factors that include, but need not be limited to:
(a) The number of veterans residing in each county;
(b) A base amount to be distributed equally among counties;
(c) Retention by the Department of Veterans’ Affairs of the amount  that would otherwise be
distributed to a county governing body if the county governing body has not appointed a  county
veterans’ service officer;
(d) Criteria for withholding funds from a county governing body; and
(e) The purchase and coordination  of a statewide computer system or other technology, or both,
to facilitate efficient claims and appeals development and processing for veterans,  spouses, depen-
dents and survivors of veterans.
(2)(a) Funds retained under  subsection (1)(c) of this section must be used to provide veterans’
services in a county not providing a county veterans’ service officer in a manner deemed appropriate
by the director until such time as the county appoints or reinstates a county  veterans’ service offi-
cer.
(b) Funds retained under subsection (1)(c) and (d) of this section may be spent on:
(A) Training costs of veterans’  service officers and other individuals providing similar services;
and
(B) Providing veterans’ services to veterans, spouses, dependents and survivors of veterans as
deemed appropriate by the director.
(3) The director shall report annually in writing  to an appropriate committee or interim
committee of the Legislative Assembly on the amount of  moneys distributed in each county
under this section and the number of persons served in each county by the distributions.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 410.070 is amended to read:
410.070. (1) The Department of Human Services shall:
(a) Serve as the central state agency with primary responsibility  for the planning, coordination,
development and evaluation of policy, programs and services for elderly persons  and persons with
disabilities in Oregon.
(b) Function as the designated state unit on  aging, as defined in the Older Americans Act of
1965.
(c) With the advice of the Governor’s Commission on Senior Services and the Oregon Disabilities
Commission, develop long-range state plans for programs, services and activities  for elderly persons
and persons with disabilities. State plans should be revised biennially and  should be based on area
agency plans, statewide priorities and state and federal requirements.
(d) Have the authority to transfer state and federal funds, except Title III of the Older  Ameri-
cans Act funds, from  one area agency to another area agency or from one program or service to
another program or service after consultation with the area agencies involved in the  transfer.
However, no area  agency shall suffer a reduction in state or federal funds due to increased local
funds.
(e) Receive and disburse all federal and state funds allocated  to the department and solicit, ac-
[3]
HB 3390
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cept and administer grants, including federal grants or gifts made to the  department or to the state
and enter into contracts with private entities for the  purpose of providing or contracting for case
management services  for long term care insurance for the benefit of elderly persons and persons
with disabilities in this state.
(f) Provide technical, training and program assistance to area agencies and assist them to  pro-
vide such assistance to public and private agencies and organizations.
(g) Assist area agencies to stimulate more effective use of existing resources and services  for
elderly persons and  develop programs, opportunities and services which are not otherwise provided
for elderly persons, with the aim of developing a comprehensive and coordinated system for  the de-
livery of social services to elderly persons.
(h) Assist local department offices and area agencies which have assumed responsibility  for
disabled services to stimulate more effective use of existing resources and to develop programs,  op-
portunities and services which are not otherwise provided for persons with disabilities,  with the aim
of developing a comprehensive and coordinated system for  the delivery of social services to persons
with disabilities.
(i) Serve within government and in the state at large  as an advocate for elderly persons and
persons with disabilities by holding hearings and conducting studies  or investigations concerning
matters affecting the health, safety and welfare of elderly persons and persons with disabilities and
by assisting elderly persons and  persons with disabilities to assure their rights to apply for and re-
ceive services and to be given fair hearings when such services are denied.
(j) Process fiscal and client data for all area agencies.
(k) Conduct  regulatory functions with regard to program operation, by adopting rules for pro-
viding social services, including protective services, to elderly persons and persons  with disabilities
who need services that the department or area  agencies are authorized to provide and rules for
standard rate setting and quality assurance.
(L) Provide information and  technical assistance to the Governor’s Commission on Senior Ser-
vices, the Oregon Disabilities Commission and the Medicaid Long Term  Care Quality and Re-
imbursement Advisory Council and keep the commissions and the council continually informed of the
activities of the department.
(m) Make recommendations for legislative  action to the Governor and to the Legislative As-
sembly, after consultation with the Governor’s Commission on Senior Services,  the Oregon Disabil-
ities Commission and the Medicaid Long Term Care Quality and Reimbursement Advisory Council.
(n) Conduct research and other appropriate activities to determine the needs of elderly persons
and persons with disabilities in this  state, including, but not limited to, their needs for social and
health services, and to determine what existing services  and facilities, private and public, are
available to elderly persons and persons with disabilities to meet those needs.
(o) Maintain a clearinghouse for  information related to the needs and interests of elderly per-
sons and persons with disabilities.
(p) Provide area agencies with assistance in  applying for federal, state and private grants and
identifying new funding sources.
(2) In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the department shall:
(a) Determine type A and  type B area agencies annual budget levels for Oregon Project Inde-
pendence and Title III of the Older Americans Act expenditures.
(b) Determine annual budget levels for planning and administering programs relating to social,
health, independent living and protective  services for persons with disabilities for the local depart-
[4]
HB 3390
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ment office serving elderly persons and persons with disabilities and type B area agencies that have
assumed local responsibility for the programs and clients transferred under section  2 (2), chapter
787, Oregon Laws 1989. In determining the budget levels, the department shall:
(A) Apply the methodology required by ORS 410.072;
(B) Retain contingency reserves against overruns and transfers in use of Title XIX funds; and
(C) Provide  timely management information so the area agencies and the department’s disability
services units can manage Title XIX reimbursements within budgeted levels.
(c) Make payments for services within a central processing system for:
(A) A type A area agency, at the request of  the agency, for Oregon Project Independence or
Title III of the Older Americans Act expenditures, or both.
(B) A type B area agency, for Title XIX and Oregon Project Independence expenditures,  and at
the request of the agency, for Title III of the Older Americans Act expenditures.
(d) Assume program responsibility for  Title XIX programs in areas served by type A area
agencies and in areas where no area agency is designated.
(e) Assume planning and program responsibilities for persons with  disabilities in areas served
by type A area agencies, in areas served by type B agencies that serve only elderly persons and in
areas where no area agency exists.
(3) When developing programs affecting elderly persons,  the department shall consult with the
Governor’s Commission on Senior Services.
(4) When developing  programs affecting persons with disabilities, the department shall consult
with the Oregon Disabilities Commission.
(5) The department shall report annually in writing to an appropriate committee or in-
terim committee of the Legislative Assembly  on the amount of moneys disbursed in each
county under subsection (1)(e) of this section and the number of persons served by the  dis-
bursements.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 423.520 is amended to read:
423.520. (1)  The Department of Corrections shall make  grants to assist counties in the imple-
mentation and operation of  community corrections programs including, but not limited to, preventive
or diversionary correctional programs,  probation, parole, work release and local correctional facili-
ties and programs for offenders. The department shall require recipients of the grants  to cooperate,
to the extent of available information  systems resources, in the collection and sharing of data nec-
essary to evaluate the effect of community corrections programs on future criminal conduct.
(2) The department shall report annually in writing to an appropriate committee or in-
terim committee of the Legislative Assembly on the amount of moneys disbursed as grants
in each county under subsection (1) of this section and the number of persons  served in each
county by the grants.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 430.380 is amended to read:
430.380. (1) There is established in the General Fund of the  State Treasury an account to be
known as the  Mental Health Alcoholism and Drug Services Account. Moneys deposited in the ac-
count are continuously appropriated for the purposes of ORS 430.345 to 430.380 and to  provide
funding for sobering facilities registered under ORS 430.262. Moneys deposited in the account  may
be invested in the manner prescribed in ORS 293.701 to 293.857.
(2) Forty percent  of the moneys in the Mental Health Alcoholism and Drug Services Account
shall be continuously appropriated to the counties on the basis of population. The counties  must use
the moneys for the establishment, operation and maintenance of alcohol  and drug abuse prevention,
[5]
HB 3390
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
early intervention and treatment services and for local matching funds  under ORS 430.345 to
430.380. The  counties may use up to 10 percent of the moneys appropriated under this subsection
to provide funds for sobering facilities registered under ORS 430.262.
(3) Forty percent of the moneys shall be continuously appropriated to  the Oregon Health Au-
thority to be used for state matching  funds to counties for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early
intervention and treatment services pursuant to ORS 430.345 to 430.380. The authority  may use up
to 10 percent of the moneys appropriated under this subsection for matching  funds to counties for
sobering facilities registered under ORS 430.262.
(4) Twenty percent of the  moneys shall be continuously appropriated to the Oregon Health Au-
thority to be used for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment  services
for inmates of correctional and penal institutions and for parolees therefrom and for  probationers
as provided pursuant to rules  of the authority. However, prior to expenditure of moneys under this
subsection, the authority must present its program plans for approval to the  appropriate legislative
body which is either the Joint Ways and Means Committee during a session of the Legislative  As-
sembly or the Emergency Board during the interim between sessions.
(5) Counties and state agencies:
(a) May not use moneys appropriated  to counties and state agencies under subsections (1) to (4)
of this section for alcohol and drug prevention and treatment services that do  not meet or exceed
minimum standards established under ORS 430.357; and
(b) Shall include in all grants and contracts with  providers of alcohol and drug prevention and
treatment services a contract provision that  the grant or contract may be terminated by the county
or state agency  if the provider does not meet or exceed the minimum standards adopted by the
Oregon Health Authority pursuant to ORS 430.357. A  county or state agency may not be penalized
and is not liable for the termination of a contract under this section.
(6) The Oregon Health Authority shall report annually in writing to an appropriate  com-
mittee or interim committee of the Legislative  Assembly on the amount of moneys appro-
priated in each county  under this section and the number of persons served in each county
by the appropriations.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 430.634 is amended to read:
430.634. (1) In order to improve services to persons with mental or  emotional disturbances and
provide information for uniform analysis, each community mental  health program shall collect and
report data and evaluate programs in accordance with methods prescribed by the Oregon  Health
Authority after consultation with the program directors.
(2) Information collected by the authority under subsection (1) of this section  shall include, but
need not be limited to:
(a) Numbers of persons served;
(b) Ages of persons served;
(c) Types of services provided; and
(d) Cost of services.
(3) Within the limits  of available funds allocated for the administration of community mental
health programs, community mental health programs shall collect  data and evaluate programs with
moneys provided by the authority.  The authority shall distribute funds so that programs within the
same population grouping shall receive equal amounts of funds. The population groupings are:
(a) More than 400,000 population.
(b) Less than 400,000 but more than 100,000.
[6]
HB 3390
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Less than 100,000 but more than 50,000.
(d) Less than 50,000.
(4) During the first biennium that a new service  is funded by the authority, two percent of the
service funds shall be set aside for  use in data collection and evaluation of the service. Thereafter,
the service shall be evaluated as a part of the total community mental health program.
(5) The authority shall report annually in writing to an appropriate committee  or interim
committee of the Legislative Assembly on  the amount of moneys distributed in each county
under subsection  (3) of this section and ORS 430.648 and the number of persons served in
each county by the distributions.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 431.380 is amended to read:
431.380. (1) From state moneys that the Oregon Health Authority receives for  the purpose of
funding the  foundational capabilities established under ORS 431.131 and the foundational programs
established under ORS 431.141, the Oregon  Health Authority shall make payments to local public
health authorities under this section. The Oregon  Health Authority shall each biennium submit to
the Oregon Public Health Advisory Board and the Legislative Fiscal Office a formula that provides
for the equitable distribution of moneys. The Oregon Health Authority shall incorporate into the
formula:
(a) A method for distributing to local public health authorities a  base amount of state moneys
received  by  the Oregon Health Authority pursuant to this subsection, taking into consideration the
population of each local public health authority, the burden  of disease borne by communities located
within the jurisdiction of  each local public health authority, the overall health status of communities
located within the  jurisdiction of each local public health authority and the ability of each local
public health authority to invest in local public health activities and services;
(b) A method for awarding matching  funds to a local public health authority that invests in local
public health activities and  services above the base amount distributed in accordance with para-
graph (a) of this subsection; and
(c) A method for the use of incentives as described in subsection (3) of this section.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall submit the formula adopted under subsection (1) of this
section to the Oregon Public Health Advisory Board and the Legislative  Fiscal Office no later than
June 30 of each even-numbered year. At the same time  that the Oregon Health Authority submits
the formula, the Oregon  Health Authority shall submit to the Oregon Public Health Advisory Board
and the Legislative Fiscal Office an estimate of the amount of state  moneys necessary to fund in
part or in whole the foundational capabilities established under ORS 431.131  and the foundational
programs established under ORS 431.141.
(3) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt by rule incentives and  a process for identifying,
updating and applying accountability metrics, for the purpose of  encouraging the effective and eq-
uitable provision of public health services by local public health authorities.
(4) Nothing in this section prohibits  the Oregon Health Authority from distributing state moneys
that the Oregon Health Authority receives for the purpose of funding the foundational capabilities
established under ORS 431.131 and the foundational programs established under ORS 431.141 to local
public health authorities on an individual basis as opposed to a statewide  basis, or through a com-
petitive grant or contract process  or on the basis of need, if the state moneys received are insuffi-
cient to adequately fund local public health authorities on a statewide basis.
(5) The  Oregon Health Authority shall report annually in writing to an appropriate com-
mittee or interim committee  of the Legislative Assembly on the amount of moneys paid in
[7]
HB 3390
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
each county under this section and the  number of persons served in each county by the
payments.
SECTION 9.  ORS 458.505 is amended to read:
458.505. (1) The community action agency network,  established initially under the federal Eco-
nomic Opportunity Act of 1964, shall be the delivery system  for federal antipoverty programs in
Oregon, including the Community Services Block Grant, Low Income  Energy Assistance Program,
State Department of Energy Weatherization Program and such others as may become available.
(2) Funds for such  programs shall be distributed to the community action agencies by the
Housing and Community  Services Department with the advice of the Community Action Partnership
of Oregon.
(3) In areas not served by a community action agency, funds other than  federal community ser-
vices funds may be distributed to  and administered by organizations that are found by the Housing
and Community Services Department to serve the antipoverty purpose of  the community action
agency network.
(4) In addition to  complying with all applicable requirements of federal law, a community action
agency  shall:
(a) Be an  office, division or agency of the designating political subdivision or a not for profit
organization in compliance with ORS chapter 65.
(b) Have a community action board of at least nine but no more than 33  members, constituted
so that:
(A) One-third of the members of the board are elected public  officials currently serving or their
designees. If  the number of elected officials reasonably available and willing to serve is less than
one-third of the membership, membership  of appointed public officials may be counted as meeting the
one-third requirement;
(B) At  least one-third of the members are persons chosen through democratic selection proce-
dures adequate to assure that they are representatives of the poor in the area served; and
(C) The remainder  of the members are officials or members of business, industry, labor, religious,
welfare, education or other major groups and interests in the community.
(c) If the agency is a private not for profit organization, be governed by the Community Action
Board. The board shall have all duties, responsibilities and powers normally  associated with such
boards, including, but not limited to:
(A) Selection, appointment and dismissal of the executive director of the agency;
(B) Approval of all contracts, grant applications and budgets and operational policies of the
agency;
(C) Evaluation of programs; and
(D) Securing an annual audit of the agency.
(d) If the organization is an office, division or agency of a  political subdivision, be administered
by the board that shall provide for the  operation of the agency and be directly responsible to the
governing board of the political subdivision. The administering board at a minimum, shall:
(A) Review and approve program policy;
(B) Be involved in and consulted on the hiring and firing of the agency director;
(C) Monitor and evaluate program effectiveness;
(D) Ensure the effectiveness of community involvement in the planning process; and
(E) Assume all duties delegated to it by the governing board.
(e) Have a clearly defined,  specified service area. Community action service areas may not
[8]
HB 3390
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
overlap.
(f) Have an accounting system that meets  generally accepted accounting principles and be so
certified by an independent certified accountant.
(g) Provide assurances against the use of government funds for political activity by the com-
munity action agency.
(h) Provide assurances that no person shall, on the grounds of race, color, sex, sexual orien-
tation or national origin be  excluded from participation in, be denied the benefits of or be subjected
to discrimination under any program or activity funded in whole or in part with funds  made avail-
able through the community action program.
(i) Provide assurances the community action agency  shall comply with any prohibition against
discrimination on the basis of age under the Age Discrimination Act of 1975 or  with respect to an
otherwise qualified individual with disabilities as provided in section 504 of the Rehabilitation  Act
of 1973.
(5) For the purposes of this section, the Oregon Human  Development Corporation is eligible to
receive federal community service funds and low-income energy assistance funds.
(6) The Housing and Community Services Department shall:
(a) Administer federal and state antipoverty programs.
(b) Apply for  all available antipoverty funds on behalf of eligible entities as defined in this sec-
tion.
(c) In conjunction with the Community Action Partnership  of Oregon, develop a collaborative
role in advocating for, and addressing the needs of, all low income Oregonians.
(d) Biennially produce and make available to the public a status  report on efforts by it and state
agencies to reduce the  incidence of poverty in Oregon. This report shall contain figures regarding
the numbers and types of persons living in poverty in  Oregon. The report shall also describe the
status of efforts by the  department and the Department of Human Services to implement the state
policy regarding homelessness described in ORS 458.528.
(e) On a regular basis provide information to the Community Action Partnership of Oregon  on
the activities and expenditures of the Housing and Community Services Department.
(f) As resources are available, provide  resources for technical assistance, training and program
assistance to eligible entities.
(g) As resources are  available, provide resources pursuant to ORS 409.750 for the training and
technical assistance needs of the Community Action Partnership of Oregon.
(h) Conduct a planning process  to meet the needs of low income people in Oregon. That process
shall fully integrate the Oregon Human Development Corporation into the antipoverty delivery sys-
tem. The planning process shall include development of a  plan for minimum level of services and
funding for low income migrant and seasonal  farmworkers from the antipoverty programs adminis-
tered by the agency.
(i) Limit its administrative budget in an effort  to maximize the availability of antipoverty federal
and state funds for expenditures by local eligible entities.
(7) The Housing and Community Services Department shall report annually in  writing to
an appropriate committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly on  the amount
of moneys distributed in each county under subsections  (2) and (3) of this section and the
number of persons served in each county by the distributions.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 458.665 is amended to read:
458.665. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall administer  the General
[9]
HB 3390
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Housing Account.
(2) The department shall disburse moneys credited to the  account to accomplish the purposes
described in ORS 456.515 to 456.725, except that 25 percent of moneys deposited in the  account
pursuant to ORS 294.187 is dedicated for expenditure to  meet the critical housing needs of veterans
in this state.
(3) The department may  disburse moneys in the account by contract, grant, loan or otherwise
as the department determines necessary.
(4) The department may set interest rates on loans made with moneys in the account.
(5) The department shall establish guidelines for the types of  loans financed with moneys in the
account by rule.
(6) The department may use moneys in the account to pay allowable administrative expenses
incurred under ORS 456.515 to 456.725.
(7) The  department may, in the director’s discretion, return moneys received for deposit in the
account to the original source of the moneys.
(8) The department  may accept moneys for deposit in the account pursuant to ORS 458.620 (4)
and enter into agreements regarding the  use of moneys deposited with the original source of the
moneys.
(9) The department shall adopt rules that:
(a) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, govern the  allocation of moneys deposited in the
account to best meet critical  housing needs and build organizational capacity of partners throughout
this state; and
(b) Consistent with subsection (10) of this section,  require equitable distribution of resources
over  time based on objective measures of need, including the number and percentage of low and very
low income households in an area.
(10) The Oregon Housing Stability Council shall adopt a  policy that provides for distribution by
the department  of account moneys and account investment revenue statewide while concentrating
account moneys and  account investment revenue in those areas of this state with the greatest need,
as determined by the council, for housing for persons with a low or very low income.
(11) The department shall  report annually in writing to an appropriate committee or in-
terim committee of the Legislative Assembly on the amount  of moneys disbursed in each
county under subsection (2) of  this section and the number of persons served in each county
by the disbursements.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 471.810 is amended to read:
471.810. (1) At the end  of each month, the Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall certify the
amount of moneys  available for distribution in the Oregon Liquor Control Commission Account and,
after withholding such moneys as it may deem  necessary to pay its outstanding obligations, shall
within 35 days of the month for which a distribution is made direct  the State Treasurer to pay the
amounts due, upon warrants drawn by the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services, as fol-
lows:
(a) Fifty-six percent, or the amount remaining after the distribution under subsection (4) of  this
section, credited to the General Fund available for general  governmental purposes wherein it shall
be considered as revenue during the quarter immediately preceding receipt;
(b) Twenty percent to the cities of the state in  such shares as the population of each city bears
to the population of the cities of the state, as determined by Portland State University last preceding
such apportionment, under ORS 190.510 to 190.610;
[10]
HB 3390
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Ten percent to counties in such shares as their respective  populations bear to the total
population of the state, as estimated from time to time by Portland State University; and
(d) Fourteen percent  to the cities of the state to be distributed as provided in ORS 221.770 and
this section.
(2) The commission  shall direct the Oregon Department of Administrative Services to transfer
50 percent of the revenues from the taxes imposed by ORS 473.030 and  473.035 to the Mental Health
Alcoholism and Drug Services Account in the General Fund to be  paid monthly as provided in ORS
430.380.
(3) If the amount of revenues  received from the taxes imposed by ORS 473.030 for the preceding
month was reduced as a result of credits claimed under ORS 473.047,  the commission shall compute
the difference between the  amounts paid or transferred as described in subsections (1)(b), (c) and (d)
and (2) of this section and the amounts that would have been paid or transferred  under subsections
(1)(b), (c)  and (d) and (2) of this section if no credits had been claimed. The commission shall direct
the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services to pay or transfer amounts equal to the differ-
ences computed for subsections (1)(b), (c) and (d) and (2) of  this section from the General Fund to
the recipients or accounts described in subsections (1)(b), (c) and (d) and (2) of this section.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, no city or county  shall receive for any fiscal
year an amount less than the amount distributed to the city  or county in accordance with ORS
471.350 (1965 Replacement Part), 471.810, 473.190 and 473.210 (1965 Replacement Part) during the
1966-1967 fiscal year unless the city or county had a decline in population as  shown by its census.
If the population  declined, the per capita distribution to the city or county shall be not less than
the total per capita distribution during the 1966-1967 fiscal  year. Any additional funds required to
maintain the level of distribution under this  subsection shall be paid from funds credited under
subsection (1)(a) of this section.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, amounts to be distributed  from the Oregon
Liquor Control Commission Account that are attributable to a per bottle surcharge  imposed by the
Oregon Liquor Control Commission, shall be credited to the General Fund.
(6) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall  report annually in writing to an appro-
priate committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly on the amount of moneys
distributed in each  county under subsection (1) of this section and the number of persons
served in each county by the distributions.
SECTION 12.
 ORS  475B.759, as amended by section 1, chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2018, is
amended to read:
475B.759. (1) There is established the Oregon Marijuana Account, separate  and distinct from the
General Fund.
(2) The account shall consist of moneys transferred to the account under ORS 475B.760.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly the amount of moneys available  in the
Oregon Marijuana Account.
(b) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, the department shall transfer quarterly 20  percent
of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account as follows:
(A) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to the  cities of this state in
the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred  in shares that reflect the popu-
lation of each city of this state that is  not exempt from this paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)
of this section compared to the population of  all cities of this state that are not exempt from this
[11]
HB 3390
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
paragraph pursuant to subsection  (4)(a) of this section, as determined by Portland State University
under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately preceding the date of the transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five  percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business  day
of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located in each city compared
to the number of licenses  held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten  percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the following
shares:
(i) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the total  commer-
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant
to ORS 475B.070 on the last business day of  the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer
for all premises located in  each county compared to the total commercially available area of all
grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent of  the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number of li-
censes held pursuant to ORS  475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business day of the cal-
endar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located  in each county compared to
the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
(c) Eighty percent of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account must be used as follows:
(A) Forty  percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used;
(B) Twenty percent of the moneys in the  account must be used solely for mental health treat-
ment or for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment;
(C) Fifteen percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for  purposes for which
moneys in the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020 may be used; and
(D) Five percent of the  moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes related to al-
cohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
(4)(a) A city that has an ordinance  prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS  475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required is not eligible to
receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section.
(b) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which  issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.070  is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
subsection (3)(b)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 or  475B.105 is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B)(ii) of this section.
(5) In a form and manner prescribed by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission,  each city and
county in this state shall certify with  the commission whether the city or county has an ordinance
prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issuance  of a license under ORS 475B.070,
475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required. If a city fails to comply with this subsection, the city  is
not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section.  If a county fails
to comply with this subsection, the  county is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under sub-
section (3)(b)(B) of this section.
[12]
HB 3390
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) The department shall report annually in writing to an appropriate committee or in-
terim committee of the  Legislative Assembly on the amount of moneys transferred in each
county under subsection (3) of  this section and the number of persons served in each county
by the transfers.
SECTION 13.  ORS 475B.759, as amended by sections 1 and 2, chapter 81, Oregon Laws  2018,
is amended to read:
475B.759. (1) There is established the Oregon Marijuana Account, separate  and distinct from the
General Fund.
(2) The account shall consist of moneys transferred to the account under ORS 475B.760.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly the amount of moneys available  in the
Oregon Marijuana Account.
(b) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, the department shall transfer quarterly 20  percent
of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account as follows:
(A) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to the  cities of this state in
the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred  in shares that reflect the popu-
lation of each city of this state that is  not exempt from this paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)
of this section compared to the population of  all cities of this state that are not exempt from this
paragraph pursuant to subsection  (4)(a) of this section, as determined by Portland State University
under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately preceding the date of the transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five  percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business  day
of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located in each city compared
to the number of licenses  held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten  percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the following
shares:
(i) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the total  commer-
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant
to ORS 475B.070 on the last business day of  the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer
for all premises located in  each county compared to the total commercially available area of all
grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent of  the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number of li-
censes held pursuant to ORS  475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business day of the cal-
endar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located  in each county compared to
the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
(c) Eighty percent of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account must be used as follows:
(A) Forty  percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used;
(B) Twenty percent of the moneys in the account must  be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the  Mental Health Alcoholism and Drug Services Account established under ORS 430.380
may be used;
(C) Fifteen percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for  purposes for which
[13]
HB 3390
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
moneys in the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020 may be used; and
(D) Five percent of the  moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes related to al-
cohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
(4)(a) A city that has an ordinance  prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS  475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required is not eligible to
receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section.
(b) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which  issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.070  is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
subsection (3)(b)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 or  475B.105 is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B)(ii) of this section.
(5) In a form  and manner prescribed by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission, each city and
county in this state shall certify with the commission whether the  city or county has an ordinance
prohibiting the establishment of a premises for  which issuance of a license under ORS 475B.070,
475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required. If a city fails to comply with this subsection, the city  is
not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section.  If a county fails
to comply with this subsection, the county is not eligible to receive  transfers of moneys under sub-
section (3)(b)(B) of this section.
(6) The department shall report annually in writing to an appropriate committee or in-
terim committee of the Legislative Assembly on the amount of moneys  transferred in each
county under subsection (3) of  this section and the number of persons served in each county
by the transfers.
SECTION 14.  ORS 660.318 is amended to read:
660.318. (1) To implement and  oversee state implementation of the federal Workforce Innovation
and Opportunity Act, the Higher Education Coordinating Commission may:
(a) Receive federal youth activities funds allotted to this state by the Secretary  of Labor pur-
suant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act and allocate those funds that  are
not reserved according to  an allocation formula recommended by the State Workforce and Talent
Development Board and approved by the Governor.
(b) Receive federal adult employment and training activities funds allotted to this  state by the
Secretary of Labor pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act and allocate
those funds that are not reserved according to an allocation formula recommended by  the State
Workforce and Talent Development Board and approved by the Governor.
(c) Receive federal dislocated worker funds  allotted to this state by the Secretary of Labor
pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act  and allocate those funds that are
not reserved according to  an allocation formula recommended by the State Workforce and Talent
Development Board and approved by the Governor.
(d) Establish a procedure for use by local workforce  development boards to identify eligible
providers of training services according to section 3174 of the federal Act and to  maintain the list
of providers identified as eligible by the boards in all  local workforce development areas in this
state.
(e) Receive the comprehensive strategic plan developed and implemented by  each local
workforce development board and review  the plan, with input from representatives of state and local
workforce programs, to determine if the plan  meets the requirements of section 3123 of the federal
[14]
HB 3390
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
Act and state policy.
(f) Approve the plans, after review by the State Workforce  and Talent Development Board, that
are found to meet the requirements of the federal Workforce Innovation  and Opportunity Act and
review and approve any amendments to the plans.
(g) Carry out the required and allowable activities  described in section 3174 of the federal Act
with the advice of the Education and Workforce Policy Advisor.
(h) Pursuant to  ORS 660.339, establish procedures to maintain the confidentiality of the names
and records of participants  in workforce programs for which the commission is responsible, includ-
ing circumstances under which the names and records may be disclosed.
(i) Establish a  method to set performance standards for the Secretary of Labor as required under
section 3141 of the federal Act.
(j) Perform planning functions related to programs and performance reporting under  the federal
Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.
(2)(a) Subject to the availability of funds  from the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity
Act,  the  commission shall create and operate a summer youth employment program that reestab-
lishes meaningful summer work experience for  persons between the ages of 14 and 24 and that meets
the requirements for funding under the federal Act.
(b) Programs funded under this subsection:
(A) Must include representatives of the business community in  the planning, implementation and
evaluation of the program.
(B) May provide for private and public sector employment opportunities.
(C) Shall be managed by  local workforce development boards in a manner that coordinates re-
gional state-sponsored youth work experience programs.
(c) Local workforce development boards responsible for managing programs  created under this
subsection shall provide training  for business, labor and education leaders in use of best practices
that ensure positive summer work experiences for participants.
(3) The commission shall collaborate with the State  Workforce and Talent Development Board
and local workforce development boards to collect data  on summer work experience programs that
identify successful summer work experiences and allow for the identification and  dissemination of
promising practices.
(4) The commission,  in consultation with the State Workforce and Talent Development Board,
may adopt rules pursuant to ORS chapter 183 to implement this section.
(5) The commission shall  report annually in writing to an appropriate committee or in-
terim committee of the Legislative  Assembly on the amount of moneys allocated in each
county under this section and the  number of persons served in each county by the allo-
cations.
[15]