Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall  conduct a study
of workers’ compensation in Oregon. The department shall submit  a report of its findings to
the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to labor in the  manner provided
under ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1287