Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Attorney General shall study matters relating to state laws affecting
safety and health in places of employment. The Attorney  General shall submit a report in
the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to
the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to business  and labor no later
than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4050