Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Human Services shall  establish and administer a
program that distributes moneys for child care of a child who resides in a foster home.
(2) The department shall make  distributions under this section directly to a child care
provider who provides child care to a child who resides in a foster home.
(3) A person  maintaining a foster home may apply for moneys under this section by
submitting an application to the department in the form  established by the department by
rule.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Child” means a child under 13 years of age or a child under 18 years of  age who has
special needs or disabilities and requires a level of care that is above  normal for the child’s
age.
(b) “Child care” has the meaning given that term in ORS 329A.250.
(c) “Foster home” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.625.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1662