Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 634.705 is amended to read:
634.705. (1) The governing body responsible for a school shall adopt an integrated pest manage-
ment plan for use on the campuses of the school.  The governing body shall also adopt provisions for:
(a) Designating an integrated pest management plan coordinator;
(b) Identifying plan coordinator responsibilities;
(c) Giving notices under ORS 634.740;
(d) Retaining pesticide application records under ORS 634.750;
(e) Providing a process for responding to inquiries  and complaints about noncompliance with the
integrated pest management plan; and
(f) Conducting outreach to the school community about the school’s integrated  pest management
plan.
(2) If a governing body has control over  only part of a building, a structure or property where
a campus is located,  the governing body may limit an integrated pest management plan to those
parts of the building, structure or property  over which the governing body exerts substantial con-
trol.
(3) A governing  body is not required to adopt an integrated pest management plan for off-campus
buildings, structures or property, notwithstanding any incidental use for instruction.
(4) Unless a governing body expressly provides otherwise, the application of a germicide,
disinfectant, sanitizer, deodorizer, antimicrobial agent  or insecticidal soap at a campus is not subject
to the requirements for a pesticide application under an integrated pest management  plan. However,
this subsection does not permit the  application at a campus of a germicide, disinfectant, sanitizer,
deodorizer, antimicrobial agent or insecticidal soap that is a pesticide  in a manner that is incon-
sistent with the goal of the integrated pest management plan.
(5) A governing body shall adopt a list of low-impact pesticides for use  with the integrated pest
management plan. The governing body may include any product on the list except products that:
(a) Contain a pesticide product or active ingredient that has the signal words “warning”  or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4702
HB 3915
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
“danger” on the label;
(b) Contain a pesticide product classified as a human carcinogen  or probable human carcinogen
under the  United States Environmental Protection Agency 1986 Guidelines for Carcinogen Risk As-
sessment; or
(c) Contain a pesticide product classified as carcinogenic to humans or likely to  be carcinogenic
to humans under the United States Environmental Protection Agency 2003 Draft  Final Guidelines
for Carcinogen Risk Assessment.
(6)(a) The State Department of Agriculture shall develop and maintain  a model list of
low-impact pesticides. The purpose of the model list is to provide a resource to governing
bodies with examples of low-impact pesticides that governing bodies may  use to satisfy the
requirements of ORS 634.700 to 634.750.
(b) A governing body may consult the model list and, at the discretion of the governing
body, include some or all of the pesticides included on  the model list on the list of low-impact
pesticides adopted by the governing body under subsection (5) of this section.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]