Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in  this section, “collaborative center” means a facility operated
by a nonprofit organization that provides services  to encourage and develop collaborative
problem solving approaches that support  community-based decision-making and build overall
local community capacity.
(2) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall award a  grant to a nonprofit
organization for expenses related to establishing and staffing a collaborative center  in
Harney County to support place-based collaborative approaches to addressing  public issues.
Services provided by the collaborative center may include, but need not be limited to:
(a) Opportunities for individuals or organizations to experience and participate in ongoing
collaborative processes involving a variety of industries, including economic and ecological
endeavors, in southeastern Oregon;
(b) Third party facilitation contracting;
(c) Collaborative consultation;
(d) Collaborative process training;
(e) Collaborative mentoring;
(f) Third party monitoring; and
(g) Capacity building to support community-based collaborative efforts.
(3) The operator of the collaborative center shall  consult and coordinate with existing
state-sponsored collaborative programs to:
(a) Avoid duplication of efforts;
(b) Leverage existing resources; and
(c) Ensure that unmet needs for collaborative services in  southeastern Oregon are being
fulfilled.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $2,750,000, for the purpose of awarding a
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 927
HB 3832
1
2
3
4
grant to High Desert Partnership pursuant to section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]