Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 383.009 is amended to read:
383.009. (1) There  is hereby established the Toll Program Fund as a separate and distinct fund
from the State Highway Fund. The Toll Program Fund shall consist of:
(a) All moneys and revenues received by the Department of Transportation from or made avail-
able by the  federal government to the department for any tollway project or for the operation or
maintenance of any tollway;
(b) Any moneys received by the department from any other unit  of government or any private
entity for a tollway project or from the operation or maintenance of any tollway;
(c) All moneys and revenues received by the department from any  agreement entered into or
loan made by the department for a tollway project  pursuant to ORS 383.005, and from any lease,
agreement, franchise or license for the  right to the possession and use, operation or management
of a tollway project;
(d) All tolls and other revenues received by the  department or tollway operator from the users
of any tollway project;
(e) The proceeds of any bonds authorized to be issued for tollway projects;
(f) Any moneys that the  department has legally transferred from the State Highway Fund to the
Toll Program Fund for tollway projects;
(g) All moneys and revenues received by  the department from all other sources that by gift,
bequest, donation, grant,  contract or law from any public or private source are for deposit in the
Toll Program Fund;
(h) All interest earnings on investments made from any of the moneys held in  the Toll Program
Fund;
(i) All civil penalties and administrative fees paid to the  department from the enforcement of
tolls;
(j) Fees paid to the department for information provided under ORS 383.075;
(k) Moneys appropriated for deposit  in or otherwise transferred to the Toll Program Fund by the
Legislative Assembly; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4165
HB 3519
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(L) Moneys received from federal sources or other state or local sources, excluding  proceeds of
Highway User Tax Bonds issued under ORS 367.615 that finance projects other than toll projects.
(2) Moneys in the Toll Program Fund may be used by the  department for the following purposes:
(a) To finance preliminary studies and reports for any tollway project;
(b) To acquire land to be owned by the state for tollways and any related facilities therefor;
(c) To finance the construction, renovation,  operation, improvement, maintenance or repair of
any tollway project;
(d) To make grants or loans to a unit of government for tollway projects;
(e) To make loans to private entities for tollway projects;
(f) To pay the principal, interest and premium  due with respect to, and to pay the costs con-
nected with the issuance or ongoing administration  of, any bonds or other financial obligations au-
thorized to be issued by, or the proceeds of which are  received by, the department for any tollway
project, including capitalized interest and any rebates or penalties due to the United States  in con-
nection with the bonds;
(g) To provide a guaranty or other security for any bonds or other  financial obligations, in-
cluding but not limited to financial obligations with respect to any bond  insurance, surety or credit
enhancement device issued or incurred by the department,  a unit of government or a private entity,
for the purpose of financing a single tollway project or any related  group or system of tollway
projects or related facilities;
(h) To pay the costs incurred by the department  in connection with its oversight, operation and
administration of the Toll Program Fund, the proposals and  projects submitted under ORS 383.015
and the tollway projects financed under ORS 383.005;
(i) To develop, implement and administer the toll program established under ORS 383.150, in-
cluding the  cost of consultants, advisors, attorneys or other professional service providers appointed,
retained or approved by the department; [ and]
(j) To make improvements or fund efforts on the tollway and on adjacent, connected or  parallel
highways to the tollway to reduce traffic  congestion as a result of a tollway project, improve safety
as a result of a tollway project and reduce impacts of diversion as a result of a tollway project ;
(k) To fund efforts to improve public transportation reliability, efficiency  and mobility,
including but not limited to implementing transit signal priority optimization and transit lane
jumping; and
(L) To pay costs associated with planting  trees and other vegetation within the highway
right of way of a tollway .
(3) For purposes of paying or securing bonds or providing a guaranty, surety  or other security
authorized by this section, the department may:
(a) Irrevocably pledge all or any portion of the amounts that  are credited to, or are required to
be credited to, the Toll Program Fund;
(b) Establish subaccounts in the  Toll Program Fund, and make covenants regarding the credit
to and use of amounts in those subaccounts; and
(c) Establish separate trust funds or accounts and  make covenants to transfer to those separate
trust funds or accounts  all or any portion of the amounts that are required to be deposited in the
Toll Program Fund.
(4) Notwithstanding any other  provision of ORS 383.001 to 383.245, the department shall not
pledge any funds or amounts at  any time held in the Toll Program Fund as security for the obli-
gations of a unit of government or a private entity unless the department has entered  into a binding
[2]
HB 3519
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
and enforceable agreement that provides  the department reasonable assurance that the department
will be repaid, with appropriate interest, any amounts that the department is  required to advance
pursuant to that pledge.
(5) Moneys in the Toll Program Fund are  continuously appropriated to the department for pur-
poses authorized by this section.
(6) Notwithstanding subsection  (1) of this section, a city, county, district, port or other public
corporation organized and existing under statutory  law or under a voter-approved charter is not
required to deposit into the Toll Program Fund tolls, or other revenues  are received from the users
of any tollway, that are assessed by a city, county, district, port or other public corporation  organ-
ized and existing under statutory law or under a voter-approved charter.
(7) Subject to  any restrictions in an agreement with the Federal Highway Administration
or other federal law  and subject to ORS 383.205, for each fiscal year, the department shall
calculate the  amount described in subsection (1)(d) of this section and of that amount 40
percent shall  by used to award grants to cities for transportation projects pursuant to sec-
tion 3 of this 2023 Act.
[(7)] (8)  Moneys in the Toll Program Fund that are transferred from the State  Highway Fund
or are derived from any revenues under Article IX, section 3a,  of the Oregon Constitution, may be
used only for purposes permitted by Article IX, section 3a, of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 2.
Section 3 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 383.001 to
383.245.
SECTION 3. (1) In accordance with ORS 383.009 (7), the Department  of Transportation
shall provide grants to cities for transportation projects, from  moneys in the Toll Program
Fund established under ORS 383.009, as follows:
(a) 50  percent for projects that improve highways located in a city that are adjacent,
connected or parallel to a  tollway to reduce traffic congestion as a result of a tollway, im-
prove safety as a result of a tollway  or reduce impacts of diversion as a result of a tollway;
and
(b) 50 percent for projects  that improve public transportation reliability, efficiency and
mobility in cities impacted by the operation of a tollway,  including but not limited to imple-
menting transit signal priority optimization and transit lane jumping.
(2) The department shall adopt rules to administer the grant program. The rules must:
(a) Specify the application process and eligibility criteria for the grant program; and
(b) Establish a method for reviewing and approving grant applications and  distributing
grant funds.
[3]