Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of  this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 315.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in  this section, “qualified military veteran” means an individual
who:
(a) Is hired within seven years of receipt  of an honorable discharge from a branch of the
Armed Forces of the United States or of deactivation orders  under Title 10 of the United
States Code under honorable conditions;
(b) Is employed by a taxpayer for at least  1,000 hours during each tax year for which the
credit allowed under this section is claimed;
(c) Commences employment by  the taxpayer not more than two calendar years before the
close of the tax year for which the credit allowed under this section is initially claimed; and
(d) Was not previously employed by the taxpayer prior to the individual’s deployment.
(2) An employer shall be allowed a credit against the taxes that are  otherwise due under
ORS chapter 316 or, if the employer is a corporation, under ORS chapter 317 or 318 for the
employment of a qualified military veteran.
(3) An employer shall be allowed the credit described in  subsection (2) of this section if
the employer pays all qualified military veterans employed by the taxpayer a wage that is
at least $1 per hour more than the applicable rate under ORS 653.025.
(4)(a) For an employer with 100 or fewer employees at any  time during the first tax year
for which the credit is initially claimed, the credit  allowed under this section shall equal
$1,000 per qualified military veteran employed by the taxpayer, and shall increase by $100 for
each consecutive tax year that  the credit is allowed, but may not exceed $1,500 for any tax
year.
(b) For an  employer other than an employer described in paragraph (a) of this subsection,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1331
HB 2520
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
the credit allowed under this section  shall equal $750 per qualified military veteran employed
by the taxpayer, and shall increase by $100 for each consecutive tax  year that the credit is
allowed, but may not exceed $1,250 for any tax year.
(5) An employer that claims the credit allowed under this section  shall retain the United
States Department of Defense discharge form for a qualified military veteran  for whom the
employer claims the credit.
(6) The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the tax liability of the taxpayer.
(7) Any tax credit otherwise allowable under this section that is not  used by the taxpayer
in a particular tax year may be carried forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax  liability
for the next succeeding tax  year. Any credit remaining unused in the next succeeding tax
year may be carried forward and  used in the second succeeding tax year, and likewise, any
credit not used in that second succeeding tax year may be  carried forward and used in the
third succeeding tax year, but may not be carried forward for any tax year thereafter.
(8) A nonresident taxpayer  is allowed the credit under this section in the proportion
provided in ORS 316.117.
(9) If a change in the status of a taxpayer from resident to nonresident  or from nonres-
ident to resident occurs, the credit allowed by this section shall  be determined in a manner
consistent with ORS 316.117.
(10) If a change in the taxable year  of a taxpayer occurs as described in ORS 314.085, or
if the Department of Revenue  terminates the taxpayer’s taxable year under ORS 314.440, the
credit allowed under this section shall be prorated or computed in a  manner consistent with
ORS 314.085.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall  establish by rule standards
and procedures for determining the eligibility of taxpayers to claim the credit allowed under
section 2 of this 2025 Act. The department may establish standards for  determining whether
an individual is a qualified military veteran as defined in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The taxpayer shall maintain any documents received by the  taxpayer in connection
with the receipt of a tax credit under section 2  of this 2025 Act, including documents in
support of  an eligibility determination made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, in the
records of the taxpayer for the length of time prescribed  by the Department of Revenue and
shall provide a copy of the documents to the Department of Revenue if requested.
SECTION 4.
An employer  that claims the credit allowed under section 2 of this 2025 Act
may claim the credit for up to three tax years.
SECTION 5. Sections 2 to 4 of this 2025 Act apply to tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2027, and before January 1, 2033.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]