Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “public property” means property owned by  the
state or a county, city or other political subdivision of the state.
(2)(a) Camping is prohibited on all  public property that is not expressly designated as a
camping site in this state.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the prohibition does not apply to
school lands as defined in ORS 273.251 and state forests described in ORS 530.010.
(3) Public property on which camping is prohibited includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Recreational areas of all types and designations, including, but not limited to, public
parks, public playgrounds and sporting stadiums, facilities and grounds.
(b) Highways as defined in ORS 801.305, including bicycle lanes.
(c) Pedestrian paths and rights-of-way, including sidewalks as defined in ORS 801.485.
(d) Bicycle paths as defined in ORS 801.160 and bicycle lanes.
(e) Utility rights-of-way of all types and designations.
(f) Landscaped areas between highways and adjacent sidewalks.
(g) Riparian areas as defined in ORS 541.890.
(h) Public spaces, including, but not limited  to, public buildings, public transportation
facilities, public parking facilities as defined in ORS 98.805 and public open  spaces, including,
but not limited to, gardens, plazas, courtyards and atria.
(4) Violation of subsection (2) of this section is a Class E violation.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act applies to conduct occurring on  or after the ef-
fective date of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1958