Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Public Utility Commission shall conduct a study  to investigate the
status of renewable energy projects in Oregon, including any project failures such as:
(a) Maintenance issues;
(b) Management issues;
(c) Project delays;
(d) Project cost overruns; and
(e) Failures to generate expected amounts of energy from a project.
(2) The commission shall submit a report on its findings in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may  include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to energy no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1317