Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Business Development Department shall study the creation of
a task force to explore sports economic development in Oregon.  The focus of the study shall
be to make the City of Portland and  Oregon the sports hub of the Pacific Northwest. The
department shall submit a report of the findings  of the study, in the manner provided in ORS
192.245, to the interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to economic develop-
ment no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2540