Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 327.013 is amended to read:
327.013. The State School Fund distributions for school districts include the following grants:
(1) General Purpose Grant = Funding Percentage ×  Target Grant ×  District  extended ADMw.
For the purpose of the calculation made under this subsection:
(a) The funding percentage shall be calculated  by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to
distribute as nearly as practicable the total sum of money available for distribution.
(b) Target Grant =  Statewide Target per ADMw Grant + Teacher Experience Factor. For the
purpose of the calculation made under this paragraph:
(A) Statewide Target per ADMw Grant = $4,500.
(B) Teacher Experience Factor = $25 ×  {District average teacher experience − statewide av-
erage teacher experience}. As used in this  subparagraph, “average teacher experience” means the
average, in years, of teaching experience of licensed teachers as reported to the Department of  Ed-
ucation.
(c) District extended ADMw = ADMw or  ADMw of the prior year, whichever is greater. The
calculation of the district extended ADMw must  be made as provided by ORS 338.155 if a public
charter school is located in the school district. For the purpose of this paragraph:
(A) Weighted average daily membership or ADMw = average  daily membership + an additional
amount computed as follows:
(i) 1.0 for each  student in average daily membership eligible for special education as a child with
a disability under ORS 343.035[ , which may not exceed 11 percent of the district’s ADM without review
and approval by the Department of Education ]. Children with disabilities  eligible for special educa-
tion in adult local correctional facilities, as defined in ORS  169.005, or adult regional correctional
facilities, as defined in  ORS 169.620, may not be included in the calculation made under this sub-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 229
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
subparagraph.
(ii) 0.5 for each student  in average daily membership eligible for and enrolled in an English
language learner program under ORS 336.079.
(iii) 0.2  for each student in average daily membership enrolled in a union high school district
or in an area of  a unified school district where the district is only responsible for educating students
in grades 9 through 12 in that area.
(iv) −0.1 for each student in average daily membership enrolled in an elementary district  oper-
ating kindergarten through grade six  or kindergarten through grade eight or in an area of a unified
school district where the district is only responsible  for educating students in kindergarten through
grade eight.
(v) 0.25 times the sum of the following:
(I) The number of students who are in average  daily membership and who are also in poverty
families, as determined by the Department of Education based on rules  adopted by the State Board
of Education that incorporate poverty data published by the United States Census  Bureau, student
data provided by school districts and other data identified by the board;
(II) The number of children in foster homes in the district as determined by the  report of the
Department of Human Services to the United  States Department of Education, “Annual Statistical
Report on Children in Foster Homes and Children in Families Receiving AFDC  Payments in Excess
of the Poverty Income Level,” or its successor, for October 31 of the  year prior to the year of dis-
tribution; and
(III) The number of children in the district  in state-recognized facilities for neglected and de-
linquent children, based on information  from the Department of Human Services for October 31 of
the year prior to the year of distribution.
(vi) 1.0 for each student  in average daily membership who is homeless, as determined
based on rules adopted by the State Board of Education that identify homeless  students in
a manner that is consistent with the definition of “homeless children  and youths” under the
McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C. 11434a.
[(vi)] (vii) The amount determined under ORS 327.077 for each remote small elementary school
and for each small high school in the district.
(B) All numbers of children used  for the computation in this paragraph must reflect any district
consolidations that have occurred since the numbers were compiled.
(C) The total additional weight that shall be assigned to any student in  average daily member-
ship in a district, exclusive of students described in subparagraph (A)(v) [ and (vi) ] to (vii)  of this
paragraph, may not exceed 2.0.
(2) High cost disabilities grant = the total amount received by a  school district under ORS
327.348 for providing special education and related services to resident pupils with disabilities.
(3)(a) Transportation grant equals:
(A) 70 percent of approved transportation  costs for those school districts ranked below the 80th
percentile under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(B) 80 percent of approved transportation costs for those school districts ranked in or  above the
80th percentile but below the 90th percentile under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(C) 90 percent of approved transportation costs for those school districts ranked in or  above the
90th percentile under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) Each fiscal year, the Department of  Education shall rank school districts based on the ap-
proved transportation  costs per ADM of each school district, ranking the school district with the
[2]
HB 4079
1
2
3
4
5
highest approved transportation costs per ADM at the top of the order.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 327.013 by section 1 of this 2024 Act  apply to State
School Fund distributions commencing with the 2024-2025 distributions.
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act takes effect on July 1, 2024.
[3]