Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 197.746 is amended to read:
197.746. (1) Inside an urban growth boundary, a local  government may authorize the establish-
ment of transitional housing accommodations used as individual living  units by one or more indi-
viduals. Use of transitional housing accommodations is limited to  individuals who lack permanent
or safe shelter  and who cannot be placed in other low income housing. A local government may limit
the maximum amount of time that an individual or a family may use the accommodations.
(2) Transitional housing accommodations are intended to  be used by individuals or families on
a limited basis  for seasonal, emergency or transitional housing purposes and may include yurts, huts,
cabins, fabric structures, tents and similar accommodations, as well as areas in parking lots  or fa-
cilities for individuals or families to reside overnight in a motor vehicle,  without regard to whether
the motor vehicle was designed for use as temporary living quarters. The transitional  housing ac-
commodations may provide parking facilities, walkways and access to water, toilet, shower,  laundry,
cooking, telephone or other services either through separate or shared  facilities. The Oregon Health
Authority may develop public health best practices for shared health and sanitation facilities for
transitional housing accommodations.
(3) Transitional  housing accommodations may not be sited within 1000 feet of a school,
unless they are developed in response to a  natural disaster, as defined in ORS 197.488, for the
primary use of victims of the disaster.
[(3)] (4) Transitional housing accommodations are not subject to ORS chapter 90.
[(4)] (5) As used in this section[ ,]:
(a) “School” means an education facility, as defined in ORS 276A.424, or a private  school
providing instruction to  any grade from kindergarten through grade 12, that operates for at
least six months per year and provides in-person instruction to no fewer than 30 students.
(b) “Yurt” means  a round, domed tent of canvas or other weather resistant material, having a
rigid framework, wooden floor, one or more windows or skylights  and that may have plumbing,
electrical service or heat.
SECTION 2.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, public  moneys may not be
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2349
HB 2712
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
used to support the construction or  operation of transitional housing accommodations, as
described in ORS 197.746, or emergency shelters, as defined in ORS 197.782, if  the accommo-
dations or shelters are within 1000 feet of a school, as defined in ORS 197.746.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) Expenditures for  accommodations or shelters that are in operation before the school
first commences operations;
(b) Expenditures for the delivery of any emergency or public safety services or  for rou-
tine public services or operations that impose obligations upon  or provide incidental benefits
to persons within accommodations or shelters; or
(c) Accommodations or shelters developed  in response to a natural disaster, as defined
in ORS 197.488, for the primary use of victims of the disaster.
(3) A taxpayer prevailing on a claim against a public official under ORS 294.100  (2) based
on expenditures in violation of subsection (1) of this section is entitled to reasonable attorney
fees.
[2]