Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
HOME OWNERSHIP ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2020 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 458.600 to
458.665.
SECTION 2. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department, in consultation with
the Oregon Housing Stability Council, shall  provide grants and technical assistance to or-
ganizations to increase access for  persons of color to programs and services that assist with
homeownership, including counseling, financial literacy, foreclosure prevention counseling,
down payment assistance, down payment savings credits and individual development ac-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 242
HB 4003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
counts.
(2) Technical assistance and grants provided under this section should prioritize  organ-
izations that have an identified commitment and capacity to:
(a) Provide services to persons of color through services that incorporate the  cultural
values of the persons’ communities;
(b) Support or expand culturally specific homeownership counseling and  education pro-
grams for those with great disparities in homeownership;
(c) Leverage partnerships  with the private sector, credit unions or other financial insti-
tutions;
(d) Leverage funding from other nonprofit sources; and
(e) Identify  and use best practices in establishing course content guidelines and in ex-
ploring ways to systematically deliver certain services, including  language access, program
materials and counseling, to both increase service availability and reduce costs to individual
providers, especially in rural areas.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 458.610 is amended to read:
458.610. For purposes of ORS 458.600 to 458.665:
(1) “Area median income” means the median family income for the area, subject to adjustment
for areas with unusually high or low incomes or housing costs, all as determined by the  Oregon
Housing Stability Council based on information from  the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development.
(2) “Council” means the Oregon Housing Stability Council established in ORS 456.567.
(3) “Department” means the Housing and Community Services Department established in ORS
456.555.
(4) “Low income” means income that is more than 50 percent  and not more than 80 percent of
the area median income.
[(5) “Minority” means an individual: ]
[(a) Who has origins in one of the black racial groups of Africa but who is not Hispanic; ]
[(b) Who is of Hispanic culture or origin; ]
[(c) Who has origins in any of the original peoples  of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the Indian
subcontinent or the Pacific Islands; or ]
[(d) Who is an American Indian or Alaskan Native having origins in one of the original peoples
of North America. ]
[(6)] (5) “Moderate income” means income that is more than 80  percent and not more than 120
percent of the area median income.
[(7)] (6) “Organization” means a:
(a) Nonprofit corporation established under ORS chapter 65;
(b) Housing authority established under ORS 456.055 to 456.235; [ or]
(c) Local government as defined in ORS 197.015[ .]; or
(d) Federally recognized Indian  tribe that is located, to a significant degree, within the
boundaries of this state.
(7) “Persons of color” includes individuals:
(a) Who have origins in one of the black racial groups of Africa;
(b) Who are of Hispanic culture or origin;
(c) Who have origins in any  of the original people of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the
Indian subcontinent or the Pacific Islands; and
[2]
HB 4003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Who are an American Indian or Alaskan Native  having origins in one of the original
people of North America.
(8) “Persons with disabilities” means persons with handicaps described in 42 U.S.C. 3602(h).
(9) “Very low income” means income that is 50 percent or less of the area median income.
(10) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 458.655 is amended to read:
458.655. (1)  The Home Ownership Assistance Account is administered by the Housing and Com-
munity Services Department to expand this state’s  supply of homeownership housing for families and
individuals, including persons  over 65 years of age, persons of color, persons with disabilities,
[minorities,] veterans and farmworkers, with below area median income. An amount  equal to 25
percent of moneys deposited in the account pursuant to ORS 294.187  is dedicated for expenditure
to expand this state’s supply of homeownership  housing for veterans and families of veterans with
below area median income. The Oregon Housing Stability Council shall have a policy of distributing
funds statewide while concentrating funds in those areas of this state with the greatest need, as
determined by the council, for households with below area median  income. The council’s policy of
distributing funds may differ from the  distribution policy for the Housing Development and Guar-
antee Account.
(2) Funds in the Home Ownership Assistance Account must be [ granted] used for:
(a) Grants to organizations that both sponsor and manage homeownership programs for house-
holds with below area median income, including:
[(a)] (A)  Lease-to-own programs;
[(b)] (B)  Construction of new housing; or
[(c)] (C) Acquisition or rehabilitation of existing structures[ .]; or
(b) Grants and technical assistance to organizations that assist  persons of color in ob-
taining homeownership under section 2 of this 2020 Act.
(3) The council shall develop a policy  for disbursing grants  under subsection (2)(a) of this
section for any or all of the following purposes:
(a) To aid homeownership programs for households with below area  median income, including
program administration, in purchasing land, providing assistance with down payment costs, or pro-
viding homeownership training and qualification services or any combination thereof. Funds in the
Home Ownership Assistance Account may not be used  by an organization to pay for its general
operations.
(b) To match public and private moneys available  from other sources to provide homeownership
housing for households with below area median income.
(c) To administer the Home Ownership Assistance Account as provided  for in the legislatively
approved  budget,  as that term is defined in ORS 291.002, for the Housing and Community Services
Department.
(4) The council, in developing policy under subsection (3) of  this section, shall give preference
in making grants to those entities that propose to:
(a) Provide the  greatest number of homeownership housing units constructed, acquired or reha-
bilitated for households with below area median income for the amount of account  money expended
by matching account funds with other grant, loan or eligible in-kind contributions;
(b) Ensure the longest  use for the units as homeownership housing units for households with
below area median income, such as by including some form of equity recapture, land trust or shared
equity provisions, as determined by the council;
[3]
HB 4003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Include social services for occupants and  proposed occupants of the proposed housing in-
cluding programs that  address home health care, mental health care, alcohol and drug treatment and
post-treatment care, child  care, homeownership training, mortgage qualification service, credit re-
pair and case management; and
(d) Support a comprehensive strategy to reverse the decreasing rates  of homeownership among
[minorities] persons of color , giving priority to activities that support adopted comprehensive  com-
munity plans that incorporate recognized best practices , [ or] demonstrate proven success in in-
creasing  homeownership  for [ minorities] persons of color or receive grants or assistance under
section 2 of this 2020 Act .
INDIVIDUAL DEVELOPMENT ACCOUNTS
SECTION 5.
 ORS 458.690 is amended to read:
458.690. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 315.271, a fiduciary  organization selected under ORS 458.695
may qualify  as the recipient of account contributions that qualify the contributor for a tax credit
under ORS 315.271 only if the fiduciary organization structures the accounts to  have the following
features:
(a) The fiduciary organization matches amounts deposited by the account holder according to a
formula established by the fiduciary organization. The fiduciary  organization shall maintain on de-
posit in the account not less than $1 nor  more than $5 for each $1 deposited by the account holder.
(b) The matching deposits by the fiduciary  organization to the individual development account
are placed in:
(A) A savings account jointly held by the account  holder and the fiduciary organization and
requiring the signatures of both for withdrawals;
(B) A savings account that is controlled by  the fiduciary organization and is separate from the
savings account of the account holder; or
(C) In the case of an account established for the purpose described in ORS 458.685 (1)(c), a
savings network account  for higher education under ORS 178.300 to 178.360, in which the fiduciary
organization is the account owner as defined in ORS 178.300.
(2) Account holders may not accrue more than $3,000 of matching funds under subsection (1)  of
this section from state-directed  moneys in any [ 12-month] six-month  period. A fiduciary organization
may designate a lower amount as a limit on annual matching funds. A fiduciary organization shall
maintain on deposit sufficient  funds to cover the matching deposit agreements for all individual de-
velopment accounts managed by the organization.
(3) The Housing and Community Services Department shall adopt rules to establish a  maximum
total amount of state-directed moneys that may be deposited as matching funds into an individual
development account.
(4) The Housing and Community Services Department  shall provide information to the Depart-
ment of Revenue about all individual development  account contributors that are qualified for a tax
credit under ORS 315.271, if required by ORS 315.058.
(5) The Housing and Community Services  Department may provide grants to fiduciary
organizations to administer the individual development accounts and to supplement matching
funds to holders.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 315.271 is amended to read:
315.271. (1) A credit against taxes otherwise due under  ORS chapter 316, 317 or 318 shall be
[4]
HB 4003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
allowed for donations to a fiduciary organization for distribution  to individual development accounts
established under ORS 458.685. The credit shall equal a percentage of the  taxpayer’s donation
amount, as determined by the fiduciary organization, but not to exceed [ 90] 100 percent of any do-
nation amount. To qualify for a credit under this section, donations to a fiduciary organization must
be made prior to January 1, 2022.
(2) If a credit allowed under this section is claimed, the amount upon which the credit is based
that is allowed or allowable as a deduction from federal  taxable income under section 170 of the
Internal Revenue Code shall be added to federal taxable income in determining Oregon taxable in-
come. As used in this subsection, the amount upon which a credit is based is the allowed  credit di-
vided by the applicable percentage, as determined by the fiduciary organization.
(3) The allowable tax credit that  may be used in any one tax year [ shall] may  not exceed the
tax liability of the taxpayer.
(4) Any tax credit otherwise allowable under this section that is  not used by the taxpayer in a
particular year may be carried forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax liability  for the next
succeeding tax year. Any tax credit remaining unused in  the next succeeding tax year may be car-
ried forward and used in the second succeeding tax year. Any tax credit not used in the  second
succeeding  tax  year may be carried forward and used in the third succeeding tax year[ ,] but may
not be carried forward for any tax year thereafter.
(5) The total  credits allowed to all taxpayers in any [ tax] calendar year under this section and
ORS 458.690 may not exceed $7.5 million. The total credit allowed  to a taxpayer in any tax year
under this section and ORS 458.690 may not exceed $500,000.
SECTION 7.
If a taxpayer makes a donation eligible for a credit under ORS 315.271 prior
to April 15 in any calendar year, the taxpayer may use the credit for  the tax year ending in
the previous calendar year.
SECTION 8. Section 7 of this 2020 Act and the amendments to ORS 315.271 by  section 6
of this 2020 Act apply to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2021.
EDUCATION OF REAL ESTATE PROFESSIONALS
SECTION 9.  ORS 86A.215 is amended to read:
86A.215. (1) An applicant for a mortgage loan originator’s license shall:
(a) Complete, at a minimum, 20 hours of an approved course of prelicensing  education that, at
a minimum, must include:
(A) Three hours devoted to federal laws and regulations;
(B) Three hours devoted  to ethics, with instruction concerning fraud, consumer protection ,
[and] fair lending  and implicit bias, including racial bias ; [ and]
(C) Two hours devoted to lending standards applicable to nontraditional mortgages; and
(D) Additional requirements as the Director of the Department  of Consumer and Busi-
ness Services may establish by rule.
(b) Pass a qualified written test with a score of  75 percent correct or better. The test must
measure the applicant’s knowledge of:
(A) Ethics; and
(B) Federal and state laws,  regulations and rules that apply to residential mortgage loan origi-
nation, including laws, regulations and rules that concern fraud,  consumer protection, fair lending
and nontraditional mortgages.
[5]
HB 4003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) An approved course of prelicensing education is a course that the Nationwide  Mortgage Li-
censing System and Registry has reviewed and for which the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System
and Registry has approved the contents, provider, instructional standards and means and  methods
of delivery, using reasonable standards.
(b) A  qualified written test is a test that the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Reg-
istry develops and for which the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry  approves the
test provider and method of test administration, using reasonable standards.
(3) The director shall accept for the purposes  of the requirements set forth in subsection (1) of
this section an approved course of prelicensing education that  an applicant completed in another
state.
(4) This section does not preclude:
(a) An applicant’s employer or a subsidiary,  agent or affiliate of the employer from providing
an approved course of prelicensing education; or
(b) An approved test provider from administering a  qualified test at the business location of the
applicant’s employer or an  affiliate, subsidiary or agent of the employer or at the business location
of a person with which the employer has an exclusive  contractual arrangement related to mortgage
loan origination.
(5) An applicant may take a qualified test four consecutive times, provided  that each test ad-
ministration occurs 30 days after a previous  test administration. If the applicant fails the approved
test four consecutive times, the applicant must wait at least six months before retaking the test.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 86A.221 is amended to read:
86A.221. (1) A licensed mortgage loan originator each year shall complete at  least eight hours
of an approved course of continuing education that, at a minimum, must include:
(a) Three hours devoted to federal laws and regulations;
(b) Two hours devoted to ethics, with instruction concerning fraud, consumer protection , [ and]
fair lending  and implicit bias, including racial bias ; [ and]
(c) Two hours devoted to lending standards applicable to nontraditional mortgages[ .]; and
(d) Additional requirements as the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business
Services may establish by rule.
(2) For purposes of this section, an approved course of continuing education is a  course that the
Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and  Registry has reviewed and for which the Nationwide
Mortgage Licensing System and Registry has  approved the contents, provider, instructional stan-
dards and means and methods of delivery, using reasonable standards.
(3) This section does not  preclude a licensed mortgage loan originator’s employer or a subsid-
iary, agent or affiliate of the employer from providing an approved course of continuing education.
(4) [ The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business  Services shall accept ] For the
purposes of the requirement set forth in subsection (1) of this section , the director shall accept
an approved course of continuing  education that a licensed mortgage loan originator completed in
another state.
(5) A licensed mortgage loan originator:
(a) May receive credit for a continuing education course only in the year  in which the licensed
mortgage  loan  originator takes the course, unless the director under ORS 86A.218 permits or re-
quires the mortgage loan originator to make up a deficiency in continuing education; and
(b) May not for the purposes of meeting the requirement set  forth in subsection (1) of this sec-
[6]
HB 4003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tion take the same approved course of continuing education in  the same year or in any two suc-
cessive years.
(6) A licensed mortgage loan originator who is also approved as an instructor for  an approved
course of continuing education may  receive two hours of credit toward the licensed mortgage loan
originator’s own continuing education requirement for each hour of the approved course of  contin-
uing education that the licensed mortgage loan originator teaches.
SECTION 11.
On or before January 1, 2021,  the Real Estate Commissioner shall include
information relating  to implicit bias, including racial bias, and historical and current
discriminatory housing policies and practices in Oregon disadvantaging communities of color
within:
(1) The education and examination requirements for real estate  licensees under ORS
696.022 (7); and
(2) Course topics available for continuing education for  real estate licensees under ORS
696.182 (4).
TASK FORCE CONTINUATION
SECTION 12. (1) The Joint Task  Force on Addressing Racial Disparities in Home Own-
ership is established.
(2) The task force consists of 16 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint two members from  among members of the
Senate;
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives  shall appoint two members from among
members of the House of Representatives;
(c) The President of the Senate and the  Speaker of the House of Representatives shall
jointly appoint 11 members who represent the following interests:
(A) One member who represents real estate licensees in this state;
(B) One member who represents entities that originate, fund or service mortgage loans;
(C) Two members who each represent an organization with a  particular focus on serving
persons of color that provides individuals and families counseling, education  or the opportu-
nity to purchase affordable housing;
(D) Two members who represent  credit unions, banks or other financial institutions that
make mortgage loans;
(E) One member who represents developers of affordable housing;
(F) One member who  represents a fiduciary organization administering state moneys di-
rected to individual development accounts as defined in ORS 458.670;
(G) One member who represents nonprofit  organizations with experience in fair housing
issues; and
(H) Two members who represent residents of this state who have suffered historic  dis-
crimination or who currently lack opportunities  for homeownership because of discrimi-
nation or inadequate  financial resources. The President and the Speaker shall give
preferences to appointing members who represent diverse geographic regions of  this state;
and
(d) The Director of the Housing and Community  Services Department shall appoint one
nonvoting member to represent the department or the Oregon Housing Stability Council.
[7]
HB 4003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Review the work and reports of the Task Force on Addressing Racial Disparities in
Home Ownership;
(b) Continue, as necessary, any of the investigation or reporting tasks  initiated by the
Task Force on Addressing Racial Disparities  in Home Ownership under section 1, chapter
110, Oregon Laws 2018; and
(c) Recommend solutions, including legislation, to  eliminate discrimination and other
barriers identified by the Task  Force on Addressing Racial Disparities in Home Ownership
under section 1, chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2018, in order to  ameliorate conditions reducing
or preventing home ownership among people of color in this state.
(4) The task force may consult experts, form  subcommittees or advisory committees,
conduct field investigations, hearings and other meetings, receive testimony in any form or
format, request or require production of documents  and other evidence and otherwise take
any lawful action to carry out the purposes set forth in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the members
of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect a task force member to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for  legislation, to an interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly related to housing no later than December 1, 2020.
(12) The Legislative Policy and Research Director shall provide  staff support to the task
force.
(13) Members of the task force are entitled to compensation and may be  compensated for
actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred by the members in  the performance
of official duties in the manner and amount as provided in ORS 292.495.
(14) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of the task force’s duties and, to  the extent permitted by
laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice  the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 13.
Section 12 of this 2020 Act is repealed on February 1, 2021.
APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 14. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, out of the General Fund, there is appropriated:
(1) $1 to the Housing and Community Services Department for deposit into the  Home
Ownership Assistance Account established under  ORS 458.620 to fund technical assistance
and grants under section 2 of this 2020 Act;
[8]
HB 4003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
(2) $1 to the Housing and Community Services Department for deposit into the  Home
Ownership Assistance Account  established under ORS 458.620 to provide grants to entities
described in ORS 458.655 (4)(d);
(3) $1 to  the Housing and Community Services Department to provide grants under ORS
458.690 (5); and
(4) $1 to the Legislative  Policy and Research Committee for the administration of the
Task Force on Addressing Racial Disparities  in Home Ownership under section 11 of this 2020
Act.
UNIT CAPTIONS
SECTION 15.
The unit captions used in this 2020 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2020 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 16.  This 2020 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2020
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[9]