Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Bank of the State of Oregon is established.
(2) The purposes of the Bank of the State of Oregon are:
(a) To support the economic  development of this state by increasing access to capital for
businesses and farms within this state in partnership with local financial institutions.
(b) To provide stability to the local financial sector, and not in any way to compete  with
community banks, credit unions or other financial institutions.
(c) To reduce the costs this state pays for basic banking services.
(d) To fund governmental operations with a portion of the bank’s earnings.
SECTION 2.
(1) The  Bank of the State of Oregon Board is established. The board shall
operate, manage and control the Bank of the State of Oregon. The board shall  specify lo-
cations for and maintain  places of business in which the bank will operate and shall adopt
and enforce orders, rules and bylaws for the transaction of the bank’s business.
(2) The board consists of the Governor, the State Treasurer and  the Commissioner of the
Bureau of Labor and Industries. The board shall exercise  the board’s powers and direct and
oversee the functions of the bank by means of rules the board adopts under ORS chapter  183
and policies the board adopts in consultation with the advisory board of directors described
in section 3 of this 2021 Act.
(3) The Governor is the chairperson of the board. The  board shall hold regular meetings,
and by rule shall devise a method for giving notice of the meetings.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1133
SB 339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) Two members of the board constitute a quorum to transact business and exercise the
board’s rights, duties and powers.
(5) The Governor  or a majority of the members of the board may call a special meeting
of the board, provided the Governor or the majority gives notice of the special meeting.
(6) The board shall appoint a president of  the bank. The person appointed as president
must have extensive experience in banking. The board may appoint and employ subordinate
officers, employees and agents as the board considers necessary, and shall  define the duties,
designate the titles and fix the compensation for the persons the board appoints and employs.
The board may designate the  president or another officer or employee as an agent of the
board for the purpose of implementing the bank’s functions, subject to the  board’s super-
vision, limitation and control.
(7) The board may remove and discharge a person the board appoints or employs or  to
whom the board otherwise delegates a duty or power granted under sections 1 to 11 of this
2021 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Bank of the State of Oregon Board shall appoint an advisory board
of directors that consists of seven members.
(2) The members of the advisory board must include representatives of  this state’s fi-
nancial, business, agricultural and labor sectors. At least  two members must be officers of
banks, the majority of the stock of which is owned by residents of this state.
(3) The Bank of the State of Oregon  Board shall appoint a chairman, vice chairman and
secretary from the advisory board. The Bank  of the State of Oregon Board shall set the term
of office of the directors of the advisory board, but the  term of office for a director may not
exceed four years.
(4) The advisory board shall:
(a) Meet regularly with the  management of the Bank of the State of Oregon to review
the bank’s operations and finances and to determine whether the advisory board should re-
commend measures to the Bank of the State of Oregon Board to  improve the bank’s man-
agement performance, customer service and  internal methods, procedures and operating
policies;
(b) Meet regularly with the Bank of the State of Oregon Board to discuss the advisory
board’s recommendations and to provide  other advice, expertise or information at the re-
quest of the Bank of the State of Oregon Board;
(c) Recommend additional objectives for  the bank’s operations to the Bank of the State
of Oregon Board at the advisory board’s initiative;
(d) Advise and consult with the Bank of the State of Oregon Board concerning  the ap-
pointment of officers of the bank; and
(e) Participate on the bank’s loan committees.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Bank of the State of Oregon shall accept deposits of public funds as
defined in ORS 295.001 and may accept deposits of funds from any other source. Income that
the bank earns on  deposited funds must be credited to and become a part of the revenues
and income of the bank.
(2) A public official who has control of public funds and the sureties on the  public
official’s bond are exempt  from liability that arises for a loss of public funds deposited in the
bank.
(3) The bank shall pay interest on  public deposits at a rate comparable to rates that
[2]
SB 339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
private depositories in this state  or elsewhere pay on public funds and may offer other fi-
nancial products to the State Treasurer on a competitive basis.
(4) The State Treasurer shall  deposit moneys the State Treasurer receives under ORS
293.265 with the  bank in an amount the Bank of the State of Oregon Board determines is
necessary to allow the bank to fulfill the bank’s duties and functions  under sections 1 to 11
of this 2021 Act. To the extent necessary to ensure the security  of public funds, the Bank
of the State of Oregon Board shall authorize deposits of public  funds in accordance with ORS
chapter 295, but the board shall give preference to depositing public funds with the bank.
SECTION 5.
The Bank of the State of Oregon may:
(1) Make, purchase, guarantee or hold loans:
(a) To state-chartered or federally chartered lending agencies or institutions or other fi-
nancial institutions.
(b) That the United States  or any agency or instrumentality of the United States insures
or guarantees in whole or in part.
(c) That the bank obtains as security pledged for or originated by means  of restructuring
another loan that the bank properly originated or in which the bank participated.
(d) To instrumentalities of this state.
(2) Purchase participation interests in loans made or held by banks, bank holding  com-
panies, state-chartered or  federally chartered lending agencies or institutions, other financial
institutions or other entities that provide financial  services and that meet underwriting
standards that are generally accepted by state or federal financial regulatory agencies.
(3) Invest the bank’s  funds in accordance with policies that the Bank of the State of
Oregon Board and the State Treasurer adopt, and in accordance with  the investment stand-
ard set forth in ORS 293.726 (1).
(4) Buy and sell federal funds.
(5) Lease, assign, sell, exchange, transfer, convey, grant, pledge or mortgage real  and
personal property, title to which the bank has acquired in any manner.
(6) Authorize the bank’s president or an officer, agent  or employee or contract with an-
other person to perform an act or take an action that is  necessary, convenient, advisable or
desirable in order to carry out the powers  expressly granted or necessarily implied under
sections 1 to 11 of this 2021 Act.
(7) Purchase, guarantee or hold loans  originated by financial institutions that do business
in this state.
(8) Participate in a loan to a  qualified person that resides in or does business in this state
that a private financial institution originates.
(9) Act as a custodian bank for financial institutions  organized under the laws of this
state and accept deposits from the financial institutions in connection with this function.
(10) Issue bank stock  loans to financial institutions organized under the laws of this
state.
(11) Perform the functions and render the services of a clearinghouse for financial insti-
tutions that make the bank a reserve depository,  including providing facilities for domestic
and foreign  exchange and rediscounting paper on terms the Bank of the State of Oregon
Board prescribes.
SECTION 6.
(1) Except as  provided in ORS 293.148, as soon as possible after the end of
each calendar quarter, the Bank of the State of Oregon Board  shall determine the amount
[3]
SB 339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of revenue  that the Bank of the State of Oregon earned in the calendar quarter and the
amount that is necessary  to administer the activities of the bank and to ensure the bank’s
safe and sound operation in accordance with rules the board  adopts under section 7 of this
2021 Act.
(2) The Bank of the State of Oregon Board, in consultation  with the advisory board, after
making the determination described in subsection (1) of this section, shall reserve an amount
from the bank’s revenues that is necessary to continue the bank’s operations. The Bank of
the State of Oregon Board may also reserve from the  bank’s earnings an additional amount
that is necessary to fund operations, projects or other goals that the Bank of the  State of
Oregon Board identifies as necessary or expedient for the bank to undertake.
(3) The Bank of  the State of Oregon shall maintain an account and any subaccounts that
the State Treasurer determines are necessary to hold state funds for use by state  govern-
ment. The bank shall transfer to and apportion  among the various accounts established un-
der this subsection in accordance with the instructions of  the State Treasurer all unreserved
earnings of the bank. The State Treasurer shall manage and have the use of the  unreserved
earnings and other public funds deposited with the bank as provided  under ORS chapter 293.
SECTION 7.
(1) The Bank of the State of Oregon Board shall adopt rules to:
(a) Ensure the safety and  soundness of the Bank of the State of Oregon that, to the ex-
tent possible, reflect applicable standards for safety  and soundness set forth in 12 C.F.R. part
364.
(b) Specify the bank’s powers and permissible investments and activities.
(c) Authorize specific services that the bank may provide.
(d) Specify limits for loans and other obligations the bank makes or undertakes.
(e) Specify reserve requirements.
(f) Set other requirements  that the board considers necessary to administer the bank
under sections 1 to 11 of this 2021 Act.
(2) The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall examine the  bank at least
once each calendar quarter to  verify and ensure that the bank is complying with the rules
the board adopted under subsection (1)  of this section. The department shall report the re-
sults of the examination to the board and to the Secretary of State. The  department’s report
is a public record subject to disclosure.
(3) The Secretary of State shall audit the accounts and financial affairs of  the bank at
least once every two years.
SECTION 8.
(1) Deposits in the Bank of the  State of Oregon are guaranteed by the State
of Oregon.
(2) Deposits of public funds and income that the Bank of the State of  Oregon earns on
the deposits of public funds are not subject to state,  county, city or district taxes of any
kind.
SECTION 9. (1) A person may bring a civil action against the State of Oregon for a  claim
that arises out of a transaction that is  connected with the operation of the Bank of the State
of Oregon.
(2) In an action brought under this section, the  defendant must be designated as “The
State of Oregon, doing business as The Bank of the State of Oregon.”
(3) A person shall bring an action under this section  in the same manner as, and subject
to the same provisions of law that are applicable to, other civil actions.  The person must
[4]
SB 339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
bring the action in the Circuit Court of Marion County.
SECTION 10.
(1) The Bank of the State of Oregon shall  conduct business solely under the
name of “The Bank of the State of Oregon” and must obtain and  convey title to property
pertaining to the operation of the bank in the name of “The State  of Oregon, doing business
as The Bank of the State of Oregon.”
(2) The bank shall execute instruments in the name of the  State of Oregon. Within the
scope of  authority that the Bank of the State of Oregon Board grants, the president of the
bank may execute instruments on behalf of the bank, including any instrument  that grants,
conveys or otherwise affects an interest in or lien upon real or personal property.
(3) An officer or employee of, and legal counsel to,  the bank may execute instruments
on the bank’s behalf if the board authorizes the officer, employee or legal counsel to do so.
SECTION 11. (1) The following records of the  Bank of the State of Oregon are confiden-
tial and may not be disclosed:
(a) Commercial or financial information of a customer of the bank, whether obtained  di-
rectly or indirectly, other than routine  credit inquiries concerning information that is re-
quired to be disclosed in accordance with due legal process.
(b) Internal or interagency memoranda or letters that are not by law available to  a party
other than a party that is in litigation with the bank.
(c) Except as provided in section 7 of this  2021 Act, information that is contained in or
related to a report of an examination or operating or condition reports prepared by, on behalf
of or for the use of a  state or federal agency responsible for regulating or supervising ac-
tivities of the bank.
(2) As used in this  section, “customer” means a person that has transacted or is trans-
acting business with, or has used or is using the services of, the bank, or for which  the bank
has acted or is acting as a fiduciary with respect to trust property.
SECTION 12.  ORS 293.875 is amended to read:
293.875. (1) Except as  provided in sections 1 to 11 of this 2021 Act, The State Treasurer is
designated the sole banking and cash management officer for the  state and may review, establish
and modify procedures for the efficient handling of moneys under  the control of the State Treasury,
the Secretary of State, the  Judicial Department, the Legislative Assembly, the Public Defense Ser-
vices Commission and state agencies as defined in ORS 291.002. The State Treasurer  shall perform
all activities necessary or desirable to fulfill the duties  of the treasurer as the banking and cash
management officer. The activities may include, but are not  limited to, entering into contracts for
the provision of services related to the management, deposit  and transfer of, or payment from,
moneys deposited with the State  Treasurer through banks and other financial institutions. The de-
posit, transfer or payment may be through  physical presentation or drafting of an instrument or
document by electronic or other means.
(2) The State Treasurer shall continuously review the effectiveness of the cash management of
state agencies,  the Secretary of State, the Judicial Department and the Legislative Assembly, and
when the  State Treasurer considers it appropriate shall report in writing to the subject agency the
findings of this review, along with any recommendations. A copy  of the report shall be provided to
the Legislative Fiscal Officer and to the Secretary of State.
(3) This section controls over any other law  that gives another state agency general responsi-
bility for, or control  over, the accounting, fiscal or electronic commerce affairs of the State Treas-
ury, the Secretary of  State, the Judicial Department, the Legislative Assembly, the Public Defense
[5]
SB 339
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
Services Commission and state agencies as defined in ORS 291.002. State agencies  shall employ the
principles, standards and related requirements for cash management  prescribed by the State Treas-
urer, including:
(a) Practices related to the use of credit, debit or similar cards or devices;
(b) The use of secure disbursing and receiving instruments, documents and systems; and
(c) The use of secure  information resources, information technology and networks that meet the
requirements of the State Treasurer for the electronic  management, deposit or transfer of, or pay-
ment from, moneys deposited with the State Treasurer.
(4) As used in this section, “information resources” and “information  technology” have the
meanings given those terms in ORS 276A.206.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 295.002 is amended to read:
295.002. (1) A public official shall deposit, or require the  deposit of, all public funds in the public
official’s custody or control in the Bank of  the State of Oregon or in  one or more qualified de-
positories, except as follows:
(a) A public official may retain undeposited such reasonable cash working fund as is fixed  by
the public body for which the public official acts.
(b) A  public official may deposit public funds in a depository that is not a qualified depository
if the amount of public funds deposited is fully insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
or the National Credit  Union Administration and, for any amount deposited in excess of the insured
amount, the excess amount  is insured or guaranteed by private deposit insurance or a deposit
guaranty bond issued by an insurance company rated A- or better by a recognized insurance  rating
service.
(2) Compliance with ORS 295.001  to 295.108 relieves the public official of personal liability for
the loss of the public funds in the public official’s custody or control.
SECTION 14.
(1) Sections 1 to 11  of this 2021 Act and the amendments to ORS 293.875
and 295.002 by sections 12 and 13 of this 2021 Act become operative on January 1, 2023.
(2) A public official may take any action prior to January  1, 2023, that is necessary to
allow the public official to exercise, on  and after January 1, 2023, all the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the public official by sections 1 to 11 of this 2021 Act and the amend-
ments to ORS 293.875 and 295.002 by sections 12 and 13 of this 2021 Act.
[6]