Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 329.492 is amended to read:
329.492. (1) The Department of Education  shall develop academic content standards for Oregon
Studies and shall prepare materials to support teacher training and classroom instruction in Oregon
Studies.
(2) In the development of the academic content  standards in Oregon Studies and in the prepa-
ration of materials  to support teacher training and classroom instruction in Oregon Studies, the
department shall consult with:
(a) The Oregon Historical Society;
(b) The Commission on Black Affairs;
(c) The Commission on Hispanic Affairs;
(d) The Commission on Indian Services;
(e) The Commission on Asian and Pacific Islander Affairs; and
(f) Any other organization identified by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(3) The materials prepared as provided  by subsection (2) of this section shall include a balanced
presentation of the relevant contributions to society  by [ men and women ] people of African-
American, Hispanic, Native American, Asian-American and other racial groups in Oregon.
(4) The Oregon Historical Society or any commission identified in  subsection (2) of this section
may use any public funds allocated to the society or commission  for the purposes of this section. In
addition, the Oregon Historical Society or any commission identified in subsection (2) of  this section
may raise additional funds from private sources for the purposes of this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 337.260, as amended by section 3,  chapter 202, Oregon Laws 2019, and section
2, chapter 328, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
337.260. Every district school board,  the State Board of Education and every committee or offi-
cer responsible for the adoption of textbooks and other instructional materials for  use in the public
schools shall adopt textbooks and  other instructional materials on American history and government
that adequately stress the services rendered by  those who achieved our national independence, who
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1626
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
established our  form of constitutional government and who preserved our federal union. Textbooks
and other instructional materials shall adequately address the roles in  and contributions to the
economic, political and  social development of Oregon and the United States by [ men and women ]
people who:
(1) Are Native American;
(2) Are of European, African, Asian, Pacific Island, Chicano, Latino, Middle Eastern or  Jewish
descent;
(3) Have disabilities;
(4) Are immigrants or refugees; or
(5) Are lesbian, gay, bisexual or transgender.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 350.001 is amended to read:
350.001. The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(1) For its survival and political well-being, Oregon needs wise and effective  leadership and an
informed citizenry.
(2) For its survival and economic well-being, Oregon needs able  and imaginative [ men and
women] people for the direction and operation of all its institutions, for the production of goods  and
services and for the management of its fiscal affairs. Oregon also needs  alert and informed con-
sumers.
(3) For its cultural  advancement, Oregon needs creative talent as well as appreciative and dis-
criminating readers, viewers  and listeners. Oregon also needs people who understand the diverse
patterns of behavior, communication and belief that make  up the common cultures of the various
communities in which we all must function.
(4) For  its survival, Oregon needs citizens who understand the interdependence of human beings
and our shared dependence on the resources provided by our natural environment.
(5) Oregon  needs people who, in the roles of parents and teachers and in other capacities, are
able to transmit the state’s and the nation’s ideals and heritage to future generations.
(6) For their personal well-being, individual Oregonians need to cultivate  an advanced literacy
essential to leading productive and rewarding lives.  This includes the capacity to think logically and
critically; to internalize and exemplify humane values; to write, speak and figure clearly and  accu-
rately; to understand, in some depth, a variety of psychological, historical, cultural,  aesthetic and
scientific concepts and theories; and to master a range of  occupational, professional, avocational,
social and personal skills.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 352.835 is amended to read:
352.835. (1) Oregon State University shall execute the trust created by the last will  and
testament of John T. Apperson, deceased. The university shall  administer the trust fund provided for
and designated in the will as the J. T. Apperson Agricultural College Educational Fund.
(2) Oregon State University may accept, receive, own, hold, sell and dispose of any and all  real
and personal property given,  devised or bequeathed to the State Land Board by John T. Apperson
in trust for the purpose of creating the J. T. Apperson  Agricultural College Educational Fund. The
university shall manage and use it in accordance with the directions contained in the  will of John
T. Apperson, deceased, for the purpose of defraying the expenses and assisting in the education at
Oregon State University  of deserving young [ men and women ] people who are residents of Oregon
and are unable to bear the expense of a collegiate course at that institution.
(3) All necessary expenses incurred by Oregon State  University in connection with the admin-
istration of the trust fund shall be payable out of the fund. Oregon State University may adopt any
[2]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
necessary standards for the transaction of  business related to and the carrying out of this section
and ORS 352.842.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 646.740 is amended to read:
646.740. The provisions of ORS  136.617, 646.705 to 646.805 and 646.990 may not be construed to
make the following illegal:
(1) The activities of any labor organization or  individual [ working men and women ] workers
permitted by ORS chapters 661 to 663.
(2) The right of producers, as defined in ORS 646.515, and commercial fishermen to join, belong
to and act through cooperative bargaining associations under ORS 646.515 to 646.545. For the
purpose of this subsection, activities of cooperative bargaining associations and their members  that
are lawful under 15 U.S.C. 521 and 522  or 7 U.S.C. 291 and 292 are lawful under ORS 646.515 to
646.545.
(3) The activities of any person subject to  regulation by the Public Utility Commission under
ORS chapters 756 to 759 to the extent that such activities are so regulated and are lawful there-
under or the  activities of any person conducted or carried out in accordance with any agreement
or procedure approved as provided in 49 U.S.C. 5b or 5c.
(4) The activities of any person subject to regulation by the  Director of the Department of
Consumer and Business  Services under ORS chapters 731, 732, 733, 734, 735, 737, 742, 743, 743A,
743B, 744, 746, 748 and 750 to the extent  that such activities are so regulated and are lawful
thereunder.
(5) The  activities of any person subject to regulation by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS
chapter 741 to the extent that such activities are so regulated and are lawful thereunder.
(6) The activities of  any state or national banking institution or savings and loan association,
and of any other  lending institution, to the extent that such activities are regulated by the Director
of the Department of Consumer and Business  Services under ORS chapters 706 to 725 and are lawful
thereunder.
(7) Any other activity specifically authorized under state law or local ordinance.
(8) The activities of any metropolitan service district formed under ORS chapter  268 and the
activities of any person subject to regulation by a metropolitan service  district formed under ORS
chapter 268 to the extent that those activities are so regulated and are lawful thereunder.
(9) The  activities of any person conducted or carried out in accordance with the terms and
conditions of a certificate issued pursuant to 15 U.S.C. 4001 to 4021.
(10) The activities of a health care provider authorized by and in accordance with ORS  442.700
to 442.760 to the extent the activities are regulated and lawful under ORS 442.700 to 442.760.
(11) The negotiating activities of a dealer in agricultural commodities that  are carried out and
supervised under ORS 646.737 or 646.738.
(12) The negotiating activities of a dealer in  Oregon seafood commodities that are carried out
and supervised under ORS 646.739.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 657.695 is amended to read:
657.695. (1)  To assist the Director of the Employment Department in the effective development
of policies and programs with respect to unemployment insurance  and employment service and in
securing to this state the benefits of the  Wagner-Peyser Act, and particularly with respect to car-
rying out ORS 657.615, there hereby is created an advisory  council within the Employment Depart-
ment to be known as the Employment Department Advisory Council.
(2) The members of the  council shall be appointed by the Governor and shall be composed of
[3]
SB 575
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
[men and women representing ] representatives of  employers and employees in  equal numbers, and
representatives of the public who shall elect their chairperson. The director shall serve as an ex
officio member of the council.
(3) The members of the council shall be appointed for a term  of two years and are entitled to
compensation and expenses as provided in ORS 292.495. Members  of the council or other committees
appointed pursuant to this section and ORS  657.700 shall be reimbursed from the Unemployment
Compensation Administration Fund.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 661.010 is amended to read:
661.010. [Working men and  women ] Workers  may organize themselves into, or carry on labor
unions for the purpose of  lessening the hours of labor, increasing the wages, bettering the conditions
of the members of such organizations or carrying out their legitimate purposes as freely as  they
could do if acting singly.
SECTION 8.  ORS 661.030 is amended to read:
661.030. No person shall be indicted, prosecuted or tried  in any court of this state for entering
into or carrying on any arrangement, agreement or combination between themselves  made with a
view of lessening the  number of hours of labor or increasing wages, bettering the conditions of
[working men and women ] workers or for  any act done in pursuance thereof, unless such act is in
itself forbidden by law if done by a single individual.
SECTION 9.  ORS 174.129 is amended to read:
174.129. (1) It shall be the policy of the State of Oregon that all statutes, rules and orders  en-
acted, adopted or amended after October 3, 1979, be written in sex-neutral terms unless  it is neces-
sary for  the purpose of the statute, rule or order that it be expressed in terms of a particular gender.
(2) It shall be the policy of the State of Oregon  that all statutes, rules and orders en-
acted, adopted or amended after  the effective date of this 2025 Act shall use the term
“people” instead of “men and women” whenever possible.
[4]