Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $500,000, for  the
Oregon Institute of Marine Biology at the University of Oregon for the purpose of  leveraging
private investment and replacing a research vessel at the institute.
SECTION 2. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2019.
[2]