Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Department of Agriculture shall solicit proposals from third  party
vendors to create for producers of cannabis  efficiency standards for energy and water con-
sumption and certification protocols for meeting those standards.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $100,000 for the
purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3163