Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 196.205 is amended to read:
196.205. (1) The Willamette  Falls Locks Authority is established as a public corporation and
shall exercise and carry out all powers, rights and privileges that are expressly conferred upon the
authority, are implied by law or are incident to such powers, rights and privileges. The  authority
is an independent public corporation with a statewide mission  and purposes and without territorial
boundaries. The authority is a governmental entity performing  governmental functions and exercis-
ing governmental powers but, except as otherwise provided by law, is  not a unit of local or munic-
ipal government or a state agency for purposes of state statutes or constitutional provisions.
(2)(a) Unless otherwise provided by law, the authority is not subject to ORS 35.550 to 35.575,
180.060, 180.210 to 180.235, 183.710 to 183.730, 183.745, 183.750, 190.430, 190.480  to 190.490, 192.105,
200.035, 236.605 to 236.640, 243.105 to 243.585, 243.696, 243.853 to 243.855, 278.011 to 278.120, 283.085
to 283.092, 291.050 to 291.060, 294.305 to 294.565, 357.805 to 357.895 and  656.017 (2) and ORS chap-
ters 182, 183, 238, 238A, 240, 270, 273, 276, 282, 283, 291, 292, 293 and 297. [ The authority is  a con-
tracting agency  for the purposes of ORS chapters 279A, 279B and 279C and shall purchase equipment,
materials, supplies and services through the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services as provided
in ORS 279A.140 to 279A.161 and 279A.250 to 279A.290. ] The authority is a contracting agency
for the purposes of ORS chapters 279A, 279B and 279C.
(b) The authority shall conduct all  procurements in compliance with the policies set forth
in ORS 279A.015. Procurement of equipment, materials, supplies  and services through the
Oregon Department of  Administrative Services as provided in ORS 279A.140, 279A.157,
279A.159 and 279A.161:
(A) May  be made by the authority in a single public contract with an aggregated value
of $500,000 or less.
(B) Shall be made by the authority if the value of the public contract exceeds $500,000.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1309
HB 2574
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) The mission of the authority is to establish ownership, oversight and  management of the
Willamette Falls Locks project, for the purposes of:
(a) Enhancing the economic vitality of Oregon through facilitating the resiliency  and
navigability of the Willamette River; and
(b) Repairing, maintaining, upgrading and operating the Willamette Falls Locks  project and as-
sociated properties and  facilities for commercial, transportation, recreational, cultural, historic,
heritage and tourism purposes.
(4) The authority shall carry out the purposes  described in this section and the duties of the
authority under ORS 196.200 to 196.240 and 196.993 in the manner that, in the determination of  the
authority, best promotes and  implements the mission of the authority. Subject to any limitations
established under ORS 196.200 to 196.240 and 196.993,  the authority may take any necessary or ex-
pedient actions to:
(a) Enter into any agreements as necessary or expedient to  perform any authorized function of
the authority, including but not limited to any agreements with the Assistant Secretary of the  Army
(Civil Works) for the United States Army Corps of Engineers or other public or private entities to:
(A) Establish ownership by the authority of the Willamette Falls Locks project;
(B) Repair, maintain, upgrade and operate the Willamette  Falls Locks project and associated
property and facilities; and
(C) Provide for the training of personnel in operation of the navigation channel and locks;
(b) Ensure the financial viability of the authority;
(c) Promote the Willamette Falls Locks project to industries related  to or interested in the
authority’s business operations, properties or facilities; and
(d) Undertake improvements and maintenance activities, including  dredging and channelization
activities as the authority determines are necessary or expedient to ensure  the continued operation
and utility of the Willamette Falls Locks project as a navigation facility.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 196.240 is amended to read:
196.240. (1) (a) The Willamette Falls Locks  Authority shall submit to periodic audits by the
Secretary of State. The  authority shall, no less than annually, retain a public accounting firm to
examine and  attest to the financial operations of the authority. The authority shall include the re-
sults of any public accounting in the annual report submitted to  the Legislative Assembly under
subsection (2) of this section.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection, the authority is exempt from the
requirement to retain a public accounting firm to examine and attest to the financial  oper-
ations of the authority for any one fiscal year in  which the authority meets the conditions
for exemption applicable to a municipal corporation under ORS 297.435.
(2) The authority shall, not later  than April 15 of each year, file an annual report with the
Governor and a committee or interim committee of the Legislative  Assembly related to economic
development. The report shall describe the activities and operations of  the authority during the
preceding calendar year.
SECTION 3.  ORS 196.210 is amended to read:
196.210. (1) The Willamette Falls Locks  Authority shall consist of no fewer than seven and no
more than 11 individuals appointed by the Governor. An  authority member holds office for a term
of four years but may be removed at any time at the pleasure of  the Governor. Members are eligible
for reappointment. Prior  to the expiration of the term of a member, the Governor shall appoint a
successor. If a member position becomes vacant for  any reason, the Governor shall appoint a suc-
[2]
HB 2574
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cessor to fill the unexpired term.
(2) A member of the  authority must be a citizen of the United States and may not be an em-
ployee or independent contractor  of the authority. In appointing members to the authority, the
Governor shall consult with the employees of the authority, if any, and shall endeavor to appoint
members with experience or expertise in a variety of subjects related to  the mission and purposes
of the authority or with other experience or expertise that the  Governor determines are important
to the success of the authority. The Governor shall consider for appointment, but need not be limited
to appointing, representatives of:
(a) Federally recognized Oregon Indian Tribes  with treaty interests in the Willamette Falls area;
(b) Regional or municipal governments;
(c) The maritime industry;
(d) The tourism industry;
(e) Persons with experience in finance, marketing or economic development;
(f) Adjacent property owners; or
(g) Abutting energy facilities.
(3) The authority shall elect one member as chairperson  and one member as vice chairperson,
with terms, duties and powers as determined by the authority. The authority shall adopt bylaws es-
tablishing the required frequency of meetings , [ and] quorum requirements  and any  officers, in ad-
dition to chairperson and vice chairperson, necessary for the operation of the authority .
(4) A member of the authority is not entitled to compensation, but may  be reimbursed as pro-
vided by the policies and procedures of the authority for any  actual and necessary travel and other
expenses incurred by the member in the performance of the member’s official duties.
(5) Four members of the Legislative Assembly shall act as  a nonvoting observers and advisors
to the authority and shall be appointed as follows:
(a) One shall be appointed by the President of the Senate from among members of the Senate;
(b) One shall be appointed by the Senate Minority Leader from among members of the Senate;
(c) One shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives from among  members
of the House of Representatives; and
(d) One shall be appointed by the House Minority Leader from among members of the  House of
Representatives.
(6) The members of the Legislative  Assembly selected under subsection (5) of this section may
not exercise any power, right or privilege of a member of the authority.
SECTION 4.
(1) For  the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  Willamette
Falls Locks Authority, the  State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to
ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $11.431 million in net proceeds for  the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount  estimated by
the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds  of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS Economic  Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to the Willamette Falls Locks Authority  for restoration
of the Willamette Falls navigation canal and locks.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will create  jobs,
further economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding that
[3]
HB 2574
1
2
3
4
5
6
restoration of the Willamette Falls navigation canal and locks will enhance  the economic
viability of the region, increase opportunities for commercial transportation and offer  op-
portunities for recreation and transportation.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]