Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Land Conservation and Development shall study  the
supply of land to build homes and grow businesses. The department shall submit a report  in
the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to
the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to land  use no later than Sep-
tember 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4420