Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In its 2026 report to the interim legislative committees  required under ORS
417.799, the Department of Human Services shall update  the estimates that it provided in its
2022 report pursuant to section 5, chapter 42, Oregon Laws 2022, of  the additional funding
necessary to implement  or extend youth experiencing homelessness programs to reflect the
increase in costs since 2022 attributable to inflation and increased salary expenses.
SECTION 2. The Department  of Human Services and the Housing and Community Ser-
vices Department shall study  options for allocating 30 percent of their respective budgets
attributable to funding for housing  and homelessness services in the biennium beginning July
1, 2027, toward reducing the number of youth aging into adult homelessness,  including
through funding for youth programs and programs addressing the needs of families with
youth under 25 years of age. The  Department of Human Services, in collaboration with the
Housing and Community Services Department, shall submit a  report in the manner provided
by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to housing and human services no  later than September
15, 2026.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 458.650 is amended to read:
458.650. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department  shall administer the Emergency
Housing Account to assist homeless individuals and individuals who  are at risk of becoming
homeless, through means including the emergency housing assistance program and the state
homeless assistance program. Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a) of this section,  the state homeless
assistance program shall  serve individuals experiencing homelessness, especially unsheltered
homelessness, without respect to income.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3515
HB 3079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The Oregon Housing Stability Council shall develop a policy for the use of  program funds
with the advice of:
(a) Persons who have experienced housing instability;
(b) Tribes;
(c) The Community Action Partnership of Oregon;
(d) Continuums of care, as defined in 24 C.F.R. part 578;
(e) Local governments;
(f) Nonprofit organizations;
(g) Homeless services providers;
(h) Culturally specific organizations;
(i) Housing providers;
(j) Veterans’ services organizations; and
(k) Other entities identified by the department by rule.
(3) The policy under subsection (2) of this section shall  direct that program funds shall be used:
(a) To provide to low and very low income individuals, including but not  limited to individuals
more than 65 years of age, persons with disabilities, agricultural workers and Native Americans:
(A) Emergency shelters and attendant services;
(B) Transitional housing services designed to assist individuals to make  the transition from
homelessness to permanent housing and economic independence;
(C) Supportive housing  services to enable individuals to continue living in their own homes or
to provide in-home services for such individuals for whom suitable programs do not exist  in their
geographic area;
(D) Programs that provide emergency payment of home payments, rents or utilities;
(E) Support for individuals with companion animals, as defined in ORS 401.977, that includes:
(i) Food for both companion animals and their owners;
(ii) Crates or kennels on-site or off-site  that are easily accessible to the companion animal
owners;
(iii) Basic veterinary services, including behavioral services; and
(iv) Rules of conduct and responsibility regarding companion animals and their owners; or
(F) Some or all of the services or assistance described in subparagraphs (A) to (E) of this  para-
graph.
(b) To provide the services and assistance described in paragraph (a)  of this subsection to
[school-aged children enrolled in kindergarten through grade 12 ] the  following individuals , or to
their families, [ who] if the individuals  are homeless or at risk of becoming homeless[ .]:
(A) Individuals who are school-aged children enrolled in or of an age to  be eligible to be
enrolled in kindergarten through grade 12;
(B) Individuals who are pregnant; or
(C) Individuals between birth and an age eligible to be enrolled in kindergarten.
(c) To align with federal strategies and resources that are available  to prevent and end
homelessness, including the requirement of providing culturally responsive services and  using
evidence-based and emerging  practices effective in ending homelessness, including practices unique
to rural communities.
(4)(a) The council shall require as a condition of awarding a grant that  the organization dem-
onstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the organization:
(A) Has the capacity to deliver any service proposed by the organization;
[2]
HB 3079
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
(B) Is a  culturally responsive organization or is engaged in a process to become a culturally
responsive organization;
(C) Engages with culturally specific organizations; and
(D) Supports local homelessness system planning efforts.
(b) Any  funds granted under this section may not be used to replace existing funds. Funds
granted under this section may be used to supplement existing  funds. An organization may use funds
to support existing programs or to establish new programs.
(5) The department may expend funds from the account for:
(a) The administration of the account as provided for in  the legislatively approved budget, as
that term is defined in ORS 291.002, for the department in support  of directing a statewide policy
on homelessness that ensures use of  evidence-based and emerging practices, service equity in fund-
ing and local planning processes.
(b) The development of technical assistance and training resources for  organizations developing
and operating emergency shelters as defined in ORS 197.782 and transitional housing accommo-
dations as described in ORS 197.746.
(6) The department shall utilize outcome-oriented contracting processes  and evidence-based and
emerging practices for account program  funds, including evidence-based and emerging practices for
serving rural communities.
(7) Twenty-five percent  of moneys deposited in the account pursuant to ORS 294.187 are dedi-
cated to the emergency housing assistance program for assistance to veterans who are homeless or
at risk of becoming homeless.
SECTION 4.
Sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2027.
[3]