Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department of Agriculture, in partnership with Oregon  State
University, shall study the potential  for developing commercial seaweed production to
produce feed for livestock as a means to reduce methane emissions.
(2) The department shall present the study in a report to an appropriate committee  or
interim committee of the Legislative Assembly, in  the manner provided under ORS 192.245,
on or before September 15, 2027.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to Oregon State University, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $250,000, which may be expended for the purposes described in section
1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1244