Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $600,000, for distribution to the Oregon Coast  Visitors Associ-
ation for the purpose of promoting seafood in the public  schools of this state by making
expenditures as provided by section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2. Moneys distributed  to the Oregon Coast Visitors Association by the De-
partment of Education under section 1 of this 2025 Act shall be expended in the  following
amounts for the following purposes:
(1) $150,000 to provide educational programming  and marketing for seafood in public
schools and to provide for the procurement and promotion  of local seafood in public schools.
(2) $30,000 for a  seafood promotional campaign that includes the development of seafood
recipes for public schools,  targeted sales and procurement support to build local seafood
sales to public schools, and other events to promote seafood awareness and sales in  public
schools.
(3) $70,000 to improve seafood awareness and  proficiency in public schools, including
providing public school nutritional staff with education and training to use local seafood in
public school meals.
(4) $350,000 to offer support for seafood harvesters and processors to develop  products
for use in public schools.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out
of the General Fund, the amount of  $200,000, which may be expended for the implementation
of local food incentives and product development to provide seafood products  in public
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3707
HB 3568
1
2
3
4
5
schools.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]