Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Health  Authority shall study access to behavioral health treat-
ment in this state. The authority shall submit a report,  in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees  of the
Legislative Assembly related to health no later than September 15, 2025.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 119