Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 4, chapter 672, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  Sections 1 [ to 3 of this 2017 Act ] and 2, chapter 672, Oregon Laws 2017,  are repealed
on January 2, [ 2021] 2022.
SECTION 2. The governing bodies  of Marion and Polk Counties shall report on the
progress of CourtCare pilot programs implemented under section 2, chapter 672,  Oregon
Laws 2017, in the manner provided in  ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the Legis-
lative Assembly related to child welfare no later than September 15, 2020.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending June 20,
2021, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $200,000, for distribution to Marion and Polk
Counties to be used to implement CourtCare pilot programs as described in section 2, chapter
672, Oregon Laws 2017.
SECTION 4. Section 3, chapter 672, Oregon Laws 2017, is repealed.
SECTION 5. This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 152