Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Military  Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,600,000 for distribution to  counties in this state for the
purpose of acquiring analog encoders  that are suitable for transmitting information to
broadcasters in the event of emergency.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Military  Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $300,000 for distribution to Oregon Public Broadcasting  for the
purpose of upgrading, repairing or replacing elements of its signal distribution system.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2442