Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT PREFERENCE
SECTION 1.
 ORS 408.235 is amended to read:
408.235. (1) A veteran is eligible to use the preference provided for  in ORS 408.230 for a civil
service position for which application is  made at any time after discharge or release from service
in the Armed Forces.
(2) An individual is treated  as a veteran for purposes of the preference provided for in ORS
408.230 if the individual:
(a) Meets the definition of “veteran” under ORS 408.225 except  for the requirement that the
individual was discharged or released under honorable conditions; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 265
HB 4066
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Submits a certification to the public employer that the individual is expected to  be dis-
charged or released from active duty under honorable conditions not later than 120 days after  the
submission of the certification.
(3) An individual is treated as a disabled veteran for purposes of the preference provided  for in
ORS 408.230 if the individual:
(a) Meets the definition of “veteran”  under ORS 408.225 except for the requirement that the
individual was discharged or released under honorable conditions; and
(b) Submits a certification to the public employer that the individual is expected to be  medically
separated from active duty under honorable conditions not later than 120 days after  the submission
of the certification.
(4) A veteran must provide evidence of  eligibility for the preference at the time the vet-
eran makes application for the position. In addition to any certification that may  be required
under subsection (2) or (3) of this section, a veteran may include as evidence federal DD
Form 214 or 215  or any other documentation demonstrating preference eligibility. Failure to
provide evidence at the  time of application will disqualify the veteran from requesting use
of the preference in the public employer’s consideration of the veteran’s application for  the
position.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 408.237 is amended to read:
408.237. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Eligibility list” means  a list of ranked eligible candidates for a civil service position who
have become eligible for the position through a test or series of  tests and who will be considered
for the civil service position in ranked order.
(b) “Transferable skill” means a skill that a veteran  has obtained through military education or
experience that substantially relates, directly or indirectly, to the civil service  position for which
the veteran is applying.
(2) When an interview is a component of the  selection process for a civil service position or for
an eligibility list for a civil service position, a public employer shall interview each veteran:
(a) Whom  the public employer determines meets the minimum qualifications and special quali-
fications for the civil service position or eligibility list; and
(b) Who submits application materials that the public employer determines  show sufficient evi-
dence that  the veteran has the transferable skills required and requested by the public employer for
the civil service position or eligibility list.
[(3) A public employer is not required to comply with subsection (2) of this section if the employer
conducts interviews  only as part of the process of selecting a candidate for a civil service position from
an eligibility list. ]
(3) If  a public employer does not interview a veteran who applies for a civil service posi-
tion, the public employer shall, within 14 days of the  decision not to interview the veteran,
provide to the veteran a  written explanation of the employer’s reasons for the decision not
to interview the veteran.
(4) A public employer may consult with the Oregon  Military Department and the Department
of Veterans’ Affairs to determine  whether certain military education or experience produces a
transferable skill.
(5) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall provide training to veterans  on how to show evi-
dence of transferable skills in an application for a civil service position or eligibility list.
(6) Violation of subsection (2)  of this section is an unlawful employment practice under ORS
[2]
HB 4066
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
chapter 659A.
(7) A veteran claiming to be aggrieved by a violation of subsection (2) of this  section may file
a complaint under ORS 659A.820.
STATE PARK PASS
SECTION 3.
 ORS 390.124 is amended to read:
390.124. (1) In accordance  with any applicable provision of ORS chapter 183, the State Parks and
Recreation Commission may adopt rules necessary to carry  out the duties, functions and powers
imposed by law upon the commission  and the State Parks and Recreation Department. Rules adopted
pursuant to this section shall be duly entered in the minutes and records of the commission.
(2)(a) The commission may adopt by rule a schedule  setting forth the range of reasonable
charges that may be assessed for  the use of areas established and maintained by the department.
The range of user fees relating to recreational  vehicles must be 25 percent greater for nonresidents
than for residents of this state.
(b) With the approval of  the commission, the State Parks and Recreation Director may set, ad-
just and assess fees for the use of areas established and maintained by the department. Fees assessed
under this paragraph must be within the range of reasonable  charges adopted by the commission
under paragraph (a) of this subsection. The director may adjust a  fee under this paragraph no more
than four times per calendar year. The director may also adopt  rules establishing reductions in
waivers of or exemption from the charges.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection,  the commission shall authorize the
use of any state park, individual campsite or day use fee area without charge:
(A) Upon the showing of proper identification, by a person  maintaining a foster home, as defined
by ORS 418.625, and the person’s children, when accompanied by a  foster child residing in the home.
(B) Upon the showing of proper identification, by a person  maintaining a developmental disa-
bility child foster home, as defined by ORS 443.830,  and the person’s children, when accompanied
by a foster child residing in the home.
(C) If a deed to, lease of or contract to  use the property used as a state park, campsite or day
use fee area prohibits the charging of fees for use of the property.
(D) Upon the showing of proper identification, by [ either a disabled  veteran or ] a person on leave
from military active duty status on Memorial Day, Independence Day or Veterans Day.
(E) Upon the  showing of proper identification, by a disabled veteran or the surviving
spouse of a deceased disabled veteran.
(3) The commission  shall adopt any rules pursuant to ORS chapter 183 that the commission
considers necessary to carry out ORS 273.563 to 273.591.
WORKFORCE GRANT PROGRAMS
SECTION 4.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
(b) “Veteran” includes a disabled veteran as defined in ORS 408.225.
(2) The  Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall develop and implement one or more pro-
grams for the purpose of assisting veterans to successfully transition from military service
to the workforce or business community. The programs  shall award grants to entities that
[3]
HB 4066
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
provide veterans with:
(a) Private training programs;
(b) Apprenticeship or employment placement services;
(c) Apprenticeship or training programs;
(d) Employment opportunities; or
(e) Technical support, financial assistance or business creation assistance.
(3) The department shall:
(a) Develop criteria for awarding grants to entities under this section.
(b) Ensure that an entity awarded a grant  under this section that provides an appren-
ticeship or training program meets existing  standards of apprenticeship and training ap-
proved by the State Apprenticeship and Training Council.
(c) Establish processes and procedures under  which entities that are awarded grants
under this section may award assistance to veterans.
(4)(a) In developing a program  under this section, the department shall consult with the
Bureau of Labor and Industries to ensure program standards are  consistent with existing
standards of apprenticeship and training approved  by the State Apprenticeship and Training
Council.
(b) The department may develop a  program that focuses on a particular industry or
trade.
(5) The department may solicit and accept gifts, grants and donations from  public and
private sources to further the purpose of this section.
(6) The  department may use moneys in the Veterans’ Services Fund established under
ORS 406.140 to develop, implement and maintain the programs under this section.
(7) The department may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
HOUSING GRANT PROGRAMS
SECTION 5.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
(b) “Veteran” includes a disabled veteran as defined in ORS 408.225.
(2) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall develop and implement one or more  pro-
grams for the purpose of assisting veterans to successfully transition  into or maintain stable
housing. The programs shall award grants to entities that provide veterans with:
(a) Emergency, temporary or permanent housing placement or assistance;
(b) Housing construction, acquisition or rehabilitation assistance;
(c) Home payments, rents or utilities assistance; or
(d) Rental or homeownership training or education.
(3) The department shall:
(a) Develop criteria for awarding grants to entities under this section.
(b) Establish processes and procedures under which entities  that are awarded grants
under this section may award assistance to veterans.
(4) In developing a program under this section,  the department shall consult with the
Housing and Community Services Department.
(5) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs may solicit and accept gifts, grants  and do-
nations from public and private sources to further the purposes of this section.
[4]
HB 4066
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) The department may use moneys in the Veterans’ Services Fund established  under
ORS 406.140 to develop, implement and maintain the programs under this section.
(7) The department may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 6.
The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall prepare and submit a report to
the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to veterans’ services on or before
September 15, 2024,  regarding the status of programs developed and implemented under
sections 4 and 5 of this 2022 Act.
VETERAN EDUCATIONAL BRIDGE GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 7.
(1) Section 6, chapter 527, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by section 1,
chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2021, is repealed.
(2) Section 8, chapter 527, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by section 2, chapter  678,
Oregon Laws 2021, is repealed.
SECTION 8.  ORS 408.090, as amended by section 7, chapter 527, Oregon Laws 2019,  is amended
to read:
408.090. (1) The Director of Veterans’ Affairs, acting on behalf of the State  of Oregon, is au-
thorized to accept any  donation, gift, grant, bequest or devise made in furtherance of the purposes
of ORS 408.010 to 408.090  and section 1, chapter 527, Oregon Laws 2019 . A donation, gift, grant,
bequest or devise that is made in cash or  its equivalent or reduced thereto, shall be promptly paid
by the director to the State Treasurer, who shall credit  the amount so received to the Veterans’
Educational Aid Account in the General Fund. The director shall  make such disposition of do-
nations, gifts, grants, bequests or devises,  not made in cash or its equivalent, as is specified by the
donor thereof, and their earnings and proceeds shall inure to said account. All such  donations, gifts,
grants, bequests or devises accepted by the director are transfers exempt from taxes  imposed on
inheritances under the laws of this state.
(2) All moneys in the Veterans’ Educational Aid Account are continuously appropriated to the
director and may be  used by the director for the purposes authorized in ORS 408.010 to 408.090 and
section 1, chapter 527, Oregon Laws 2019 .
OREGON PROMISE PROGRAM
SECTION 9.  ORS 341.522 is amended to read:
341.522. (1) The Office of Student Access and Completion  shall administer the Oregon Promise
program as provided by this section.
(2) Subject to subsections (7) to  (10) of this section, the office shall provide a grant for commu-
nity college courses to a person who meets the criteria described in subsections  (3) to (6) of this
section. The grant shall be limited as provided by subsections (7) to (10) of this section.
(3) A grant shall be awarded under this section to a person who meets the following criteria:
(a) Is enrolled in courses that are:
(A) Offered at a community college in this state; and
(B) Determined  by the office, in accordance with rules adopted by the Higher Education Coor-
dinating Commission, to be required for completion of:
(i) A one-year curriculum for students who plan to  transfer to another post-secondary institution
of education;
[5]
HB 4066
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(ii) An associate degree; or
(iii) A program in career and technical education;
(b) Except as provided in subsection  (5) of this section, has been a resident of this state for at
least 12 months prior to enrolling in the courses described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(c) Attained the  person’s highest level of education, except as provided in subsection (5) of this
section, in this state prior to:
(A) Receiving a diploma under ORS 329.451;
(B) Receiving a certificate for passing an approved  high school equivalency test such as the
General Educational Development (GED) test as provided by ORS 350.175;
(C) Completing grade 12 in compliance with the requirements of ORS 339.035; or
(D) Completing grade 12 at a private or parochial school, as described in ORS 339.030 (1)(a);
(d) Except as provided in  subsections (4) and (5) of this section, attained the person’s highest
level of education as described in  paragraph (c) of this subsection within six months from the date
that the person first enrolls in courses described in  paragraph (a) of this subsection for the purpose
of receiving a grant under this section;
(e) Earned a cumulative grade point  average of 2.5 or better in high school or otherwise dem-
onstrated an equivalent academic ability, as determined by the office according to rules adopted  by
the commission;
(f) Except as provided in subsection (5)(a)  of this section,  completed and submitted the Free
Application for Federal Student Aid for each academic year and accepted all state and federal aid
grants available to the person, if eligible to file the application; and
(g) Has not completed either of the following:
(A) More than  a total of 90 credit hours, or the equivalent, at a post-secondary institution of
education; or
(B) A curriculum, degree or program, as described in paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection.
(4)(a) If a person otherwise meets the required criteria and has been awarded  a grant under
subsection (3) of this  section, but the person enters into service with a career and technical student
organization relating to agriculture or  farming that is approved by the Department of Education
under ORS 344.077 within six months  after the person attained the person’s highest level of educa-
tion as described in subsection (3)(c) of this section, the person will continue to be eligible to receive
the grant if the person first enrolls in courses  described in subsection (3)(a) of this section within
six months of finishing the person’s service with the career and technical student organization.
(b) In addition to the situation  described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the commission may
waive the requirement set forth in subsection (3)(d) of this section for a person who shows  that the
person was unable to timely enroll in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this section due to a
significant hardship. The commission may adopt rules to implement this paragraph.
(5)(a) A member of the  Oregon National Guard who has completed initial active duty training
is not required to comply  with the criteria set forth in subsection (3)(d) of this section  or to accept
federal aid grants available to the person as set forth in subsection (3)(f)  of this section  in
order  to  receive a grant, provided that the member first enrolls in courses described in subsection
(3)(a) of this section within six months after completing  initial active duty training, as evidenced by
an official form issued by the United States Department of Defense.
(b)(A) A person who completes the highest level of education as described in subsection  (3)(c)
of this section while  confined in a correctional facility, either serving a sentence of incarceration
or as a young person, youth or adjudicated youth, is not required to comply with the criteria set
[6]
HB 4066
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
forth in subsection (3)(d) of this section in order to receive a grant,  provided that the person first
enrolls in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this section within six months after  the date on
which the person is first released from a  correctional facility following completion of the highest
level of education described in subsection (3)(c) of this section.
(B) The eligibility requirements  described in subsection (6)(a)(C) of this section may be waived
by the office according to rules  adopted by the commission for a person who receives a grant under
this section in the manner described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) As used in this paragraph:
(i) “Adjudicated  youth,” “detention facility,” “young person” and “youth” have the meanings
given those terms in ORS 419A.004.
(ii) “Correctional facility” means any place used for  the confinement of young persons, youths
or adjudicated youths or persons charged with or convicted of a crime or otherwise confined  under
a court order, including a:
(I) Youth correction facility;
(II) Detention facility;
(III) Department of Corrections institution;
(IV) Local correctional facility; or
(V) State hospital or a secure intensive community inpatient facility, with respect to  persons
detained therein who are youths or  adjudicated youths, who are charged with or convicted of a
crime or who are detained therein after  having been found guilty except for insanity of a crime
under ORS 161.290 to 161.373 or having  been found responsible except for insanity under ORS
419C.411.
(iii) “Department of Corrections institution” has the meaning given that term in ORS 421.005.
(iv) “Local correctional facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 169.005.
(v) “Youth correction facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 420.005.
(c)(A) If a person was a foster child:
(i) The person shall be treated as meeting the residency criteria for eligibility  under subsection
(3)(b) of this  section if, but for the person’s placement in out-of-state foster care, the person other-
wise meets the requirements of subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(ii) The person shall be treated as attaining the person’s highest  level of education in this state
under subsection (3)(c) of this section if the person  attained the person’s highest level of education
while placed in out-of-state foster care and the person’s highest  level of education substantially
meets the requirements under subsection (3)(c) of this section.
(iii) The person is not required to comply with the  criteria set forth in subsection (3)(d) of this
section in order to receive a grant provided that the  person completes the highest level of education
as described in subparagraph (A)(ii) of this paragraph while in a treatment program and the  person
first enrolls in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this section within 12 months  after the date
on which the person is released from the treatment program.
(B) Upon request from the commission, the Department of Human Services  shall provide doc-
umentation of the placement status of a person described in paragraph (c)(A) of this subsection.
(C) As used in this paragraph:
(i) “Foster care” means substitute care for children placed  by the Department of Human Ser-
vices  or  a tribal child welfare agency away from the child’s parents and for whom the department
or agency  has placement and care responsibility, including placements in foster family homes, foster
homes of  relatives, group homes, emergency shelters, residential facilities, child care institutions and
[7]
HB 4066
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
preadoptive homes.
(ii) “Foster child” means a child over whom the Department of Human Services retained juris-
diction under ORS 417.200 for the duration of the child’s placement in foster care outside the  State
of Oregon.
(6)(a) A person continues to remain eligible  to receive a grant under this section if the person,
in addition to satisfying the criteria specified in subsection (3) of  this section, meets the following
criteria:
(A) Maintains at least the minimum cumulative grade point average prescribed by the  commis-
sion based on federal aid grant requirements;
(B) Makes satisfactory academic  progress toward a curriculum, degree or program, as described
in subsection (3)(a)(B) of this section, as prescribed by the commission based on federal  aid grant
requirements;
(C) Enrolls in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this section  for a sufficient number of
credit hours to be considered at least a half-time  student each term for at least three terms in each
consecutive academic year; and
(D) Completes a first-year experience, as identified by the community college  and reported by
the community college to the commission.
(b) A person who fails to meet an eligibility requirement  described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection becomes ineligible to receive a grant  under this section for the term after which the
person fails to meet the  eligibility requirement, unless the eligibility requirement is waived by the
office according to rules adopted by the commission.
(7)(a) The total amount of a grant awarded under this section shall be based on each term  that
a person is enrolled in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this section. Except as  provided in
subsections (9) and (10) of this section, after the amount of tuition for the  person for the term is
reduced  by  any amounts received by the person in state and federal aid grants, the person shall be
eligible for a grant under this section in an amount that equals:
(A) Except as provided by paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, not less than the greater
of:
(i) $1,000; and
(ii) The person’s actual cost for tuition.
(B) Not more than the lesser of:
(i) The average cost of tuition at a community  college in this state, as determined by the office;
and
(ii) The person’s actual cost for tuition.
(b) The amount of a grant, as calculated under paragraph (a)  of this subsection, shall be reduced
by $50 for each term that the person receives a grant under this section.
(c)(A)  If  the office determines both that the person’s actual cost for tuition exceeds the amount
set forth in paragraph (a)(A)(i) of this subsection and that the person’s actual  cost for tuition ex-
ceeds the average cost  of tuition at a community college in this state, the person shall be eligible
for a grant in an  amount that equals the average cost of tuition at a community college in this state.
(B) If the office determines that the person’s actual cost for tuition is less  than the amount set
forth in paragraph (a)(A)(i) of  this subsection, the person shall be eligible for a grant in an amount
that equals the amount set forth in paragraph (a)(A)(i) of this subsection.
(d) The minimum amount of a grant, as calculated under paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection,
may be prorated for a person who is enrolled in courses described  in subsection (3)(a) of this section
[8]
HB 4066
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
for a sufficient number of credit hours to be considered at least a half-time student but  not a full-
time student.
(e) The commission may prescribe by  rule whether to include fees, and any limitations related
to the inclusion of fees, when determining the actual cost of tuition or the average  cost of tuition
under this subsection.
(8) The  commission may adopt by rule the priority by which grants are awarded, which may
allow for preference to be given to persons enrolled in school districts or  high schools that meet
specified criteria.
(9) Prior to the start of the fall term of each academic year, the  commission shall determine
whether there are sufficient moneys to award a grant under this section to each  person who meets
the criteria described in subsections (3) to (6) of  this section. On the basis of this determination the
commission  may:
(a) Limit eligibility to receive a grant under this section to  a person whose family contribution,
as determined by the commission by rule, is at or  below the level the commission determines is
necessary to allow the commission to operate the Oregon Promise program with available moneys;
or
(b) Reduce or eliminate any limitation on eligibility previously  imposed by the commission under
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(10)(a) If at any time the commission determines that there are insufficient  moneys to provide
a grant to each person who has been awarded a grant under this section, the commission may:
(A) Decrease the total amount of the grant awarded; or
(B) Increase the  amount that a person must pay under subsection (7)(b) of this section for each
term that the person receives a grant under this section.
(b) If at any time the commission determines that the amount  of moneys available to operate the
Oregon Promise program exceeds the amount determined  under subsection (9) of this section, the
commission may reduce or eliminate any limitation on eligibility to receive a  grant under this sec-
tion that was previously imposed by the commission under subsection (9)(a) of this section.
(c) The commission shall promptly notify the interim  committees of the Legislative Assembly
responsible for higher education each time the commission takes any action under paragraph (a) or
(b) of this subsection.
(11) The commission shall adopt any rules necessary for the administration  of this section, in-
cluding any requirements related to:
(a) Specifying the form and timelines for submitting an application for a grant under this section;
(b) Determining whether a person  is eligible for a grant under this section, including whether
the person shall be given priority as allowed under subsection (8) of this section;
(c) Implementing programs or  policies that improve the academic success or completion rates for
persons who receive a grant under this section;
(d) Prescribing eligibility requirements and grant calculations for persons dually enrolled in a
community college and a public university; and
(e) Evaluating  the impact of the program established under this section, including any require-
ments for reporting data needed for evaluations.
(12) No later than December 31 of each even-numbered year, the commission shall submit  to an
interim legislative committee related to education a report  that summarizes the commission’s
findings on the impact of the program established under this section. The report shall include:
(a) Student completion rates of curricula, degrees and programs described in subsection (3)(a)(B)
[9]
HB 4066
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of this section;
(b) The amount of federal aid grants received by persons who received a grant under this  sec-
tion;
(c) The financial impact of the program on school districts  that had students receive a grant
under this section;
(d) The financial impact and the enrollment impact of the program on  community colleges and
public universities in this state; and
(e) The overall success rate of the program and financial impact of the program.
PROPERTY TAX FORGIVENESS
SECTION 10.
ORS 307.250, 307.260, 307.262, 307.270 and 307.280 are added to and made a
part of ORS 307.250 to 307.280.
SECTION 11.  ORS 307.250 is amended to read:
307.250. (1) As used in [ this section  and ORS 307.260, 307.262 and 307.270, ] ORS 307.250 to
307.280:
(a) “Surviving spouse of a veteran” means a veteran’s surviving  spouse who has not re-
married.
(b) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
(2) Upon compliance  with ORS 307.260, there shall be exempt from taxation not to exceed
$15,000 of the assessed value of the homestead or  personal property of any of the following residents
of this state other than those described in subsection (3) or (4) of this section:
(a) Any veteran who is officially certified  by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs
or any branch of the Armed Forces of the United  States as having disabilities of 40 percent or more.
(b) Any veteran  who:
(A) [ having] Has served with the United States Armed Forces ;
(B) [ who,] As certified by one  duly licensed physician or naturopathic physician, is rated as
having disabilities of 40 percent or more[ .]; and
(C) [However, a veteran shall be entitled to the exemption granted under this  paragraph only if the
veteran] During the calendar year immediately preceding the assessment year for  which the ex-
emption is claimed had total gross income, including pensions, disability compensation or  retirement
pay, or any combination of such payments from the United States Government  on account of such
service, of not more than 185 percent of federal poverty guidelines.
[(c) The surviving spouse remaining unmarried of a veteran, but the exemption  shall apply only to
the period preceding the date of the first remarriage of the surviving spouse. ]
(c) The surviving spouse of a veteran.
(3) Upon compliance with ORS 307.260, there shall be exempt from taxation not  to exceed
$18,000 of the assessed value of the homestead or  personal property of any of the following residents
of this state other than those described in subsection (4) of this section :
(a) Any veteran who is officially certified by the  United States Department of Veterans Affairs
or any branch of the Armed Forces of  the United States as having service-connected disabilities of
40 percent or more.
(b) The surviving spouse [ remaining unmarried] of a veteran, if the veteran :
(A) Died as a result of service-connected injury or illness ; or [ if the veteran ]
(B) Received at least one year  of the maximum exemption from taxation [ allowed] granted un-
[10]
HB 4066
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
der paragraph (a) of this subsection after 1981  [ for a veteran certified as having service-connected
disabilities of 40 percent or more ].
(4) There shall be exempt from taxation  the homestead or personal property of any of the
following residents of this state:
(a) Any veteran who is:
(A) At least 65 years of age; and
(B) Officially certified by the United States Department of  Veterans Affairs or any
branch of the Armed Forces  of the United States as having service-connected disabilities of
100 percent or more.
(b) The surviving spouse of a veteran, if the veteran:
(A) Died as a result of service-connected injury or illness; or
(B) Received at least one year of the exemption from taxation granted under paragraph
(a) of this subsection.
[(4)] (5) The amount of the exemption  [ allowed] granted under subsection (2) or (3) of this sec-
tion shall equal 103 percent of the amount of the exemption for the prior tax year.
(6) An exemption granted under this section to the property of a surviving spouse of  a
veteran applies solely to the period preceding the date of the first  remarriage of the surviv-
ing spouse of a veteran and ends on the date of remarriage.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 307.260 is amended to read:
307.260. (1)(a) Each veteran or  surviving spouse of a veteran  [ qualifying for ] seeking the ex-
emption under ORS 307.250 [ shall] must  file  with the county assessor, on forms supplied by the
assessor, a claim [ therefor] for exemption in writing on or before April 1 of the  assessment year for
which the exemption is claimed, except that when the property  designated is acquired after March
1 but prior to July 1 the claim [ shall] must be filed within 30 days after the date of acquisition.
(b) A claim [ need not be filed ] is not required  under  this section in order to be [ allowed]
granted the exemption described in ORS 307.250 if:
(A) The homestead or personal property of the veteran or surviving spouse of a  veteran  was
[allowed] granted the exemption under ORS 307.250 for the preceding tax year;
(B) The individual claiming the exemption is a  veteran described in ORS 307.250 (2)(a) , [or] (3)(a)
or (4)(a)  or a surviving spouse of a veteran  who meets  the requirements of ORS 307.250 (2)(c) ,
[or] (3)(b)  or (4)(b) ; and
(C) As of the filing date for the current tax year, the ownership and use of  the homestead or
personal property and all other [ qualifying] conditions of eligibility for the homestead or personal
property to be [ allowed] granted the exemption remain unchanged.
(c)(A) If the individual claiming the  exemption is a veteran described in ORS 307.250 (2)(b), the
claimant [ shall] must file a claim annually that satisfies the requirements of subsection (2)  of this
section on or before the date required in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(B) If the county assessor has not received a claim filed under this paragraph  on or before April
1 of the current year, not later  than April 10 of each year, the county assessor shall notify the
veteran in the county  who [ secured] was granted  an exemption under ORS 307.250 (2)(b) in the
preceding year but  who did not [ make application therefor ] file a claim for the exemption  on or
before April 1 of the current  year. The county assessor may provide the notification on an unsealed
postal card. A  veteran so notified may [ secure] be granted  the exemption, if still [ qualified]
eligible, by [ making application therefor to ] filing a claim for the exemption with  the county
assessor not later than May 1 of the current year, accompanied by a  late-filing fee of $10, which
[11]
HB 4066
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
shall be deposited in the general fund  of the county for general governmental expenses. If the claim
for any tax year is  not filed within the time specified, the exemption may not be [ allowed] granted
on the assessment roll for that year.
(2)(a) [ The claim shall ] A claim  filed under this section must  set out the basis of the claim
and designate the property to which the exemption may apply. Except as provided in subsection (3)
of this section, there must be affixed to  claims for [ exemptions] exemption under ORS 307.250
(2)(a), [ and] (3)(a) and (4)(a) [ shall have affixed thereto ] the certificate last issued by United States
Department of Veterans Affairs or the branch of the Armed Forces of the  United States, as [ the case
may be ] applicable, but dated within three years prior to the date of the claim for  exemption, cer-
tifying the rate of disability of the claimant.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, there must be affixed to  claims  for
exemption under ORS 307.250 (2)(b) [ shall, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, have
affixed thereto ], in  addition to the certificate last issued by a licensed physician or naturopathic
physician and dated within one year prior to the date of the claim for exemption, certifying the  rate
of disability of the  claimant, a statement by the claimant under oath or affirmation setting forth the
total gross income received by the claimant from all sources during the last calendar year.
(c) There must also [ shall] be  affixed to each claim the affidavit or affirmation of the claimant
that the statements contained [ therein] in the claim  are true.
(3) The provisions of subsection (2) of this section that require  a veteran to affix to the claim
certificates  of  the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, a branch of the Armed Forces of
the United States or a licensed physician or  naturopathic physician do not apply to a veteran who
has filed the required certificate after attaining the age of 65 years or to a veteran who has filed,
on or after September 27, 1987, a certificate certifying a disability rating that,  under federal law, is
permanent and cannot be changed.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this  section, a surviving spouse of a veteran  may file
a claim for the exemption under ORS 307.250 at any time during the tax year if:
(A) The veteran died during the previous tax year; or
(B) The property designated as the homestead  was acquired after March 1 but prior to July 1
of the assessment year and the veteran died within 30 days of the date the property was acquired.
(b) [ The claim shall  be allowed by ] The county assessor shall grant the claim  if the surviving
spouse of a veteran  meets  all [ of the qualifications ] the eligibility requirements for an exemption
under ORS 307.250 other than the timely filing of a claim under subsection (1) of this section.
(c) If  taxes on the exempt value have been paid, the taxes shall be refunded in the manner
prescribed in paragraph (d) of this subsection. If taxes on the exempt value have not  been paid, the
taxes and any interest [ thereon] on the taxes  shall be abated.
(d) The tax collector  shall notify the governing body of the county of any refund required under
this section and the governing body shall cause a refund of the taxes and  any interest paid to be
made from the unsegregated tax collections  account described in ORS 311.385. The refund under this
subsection shall be made without interest. The county assessor  and tax collector shall make the
necessary corrections in the records of their offices.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 307.270 is amended to read:
307.270. (1) The exemption under ORS 307.250 applies  to property [ a] that an eligible  veteran
or surviving spouse of a veteran  owns or has in possession under a  recorded contract of purchase.
(2) The exemption first applies to the homestead of the veteran or surviving spouse of a veteran
and then to the personal property of the veteran or surviving spouse of a veteran .
[12]
HB 4066
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) Property of the spouse of [ the] a veteran is deemed the homestead of the veteran if  the vet-
eran and the spouse of the veteran are living together and  occupying the property as their home-
stead.
(4) When a veteran or surviving spouse of a veteran  applies for exemption  on properties in two
or more counties, the total amount of the exemption allowed in all counties may  not exceed the
maximum amount of exemption under ORS 307.250.
[(2)] (5) For each [ qualified] eligible veteran or surviving  spouse of a veteran,  only one valid
and allowable claim for an exemption on a homestead [ shall] may be  permitted in any one assess-
ment year.
SECTION 14.
The amendments to ORS 307.250, 307.260 and 307.270 by sections 11  to 13
of this 2022 Act apply to property tax years beginning on or after July 1, 2022.
SECTION 15. ORS 307.283 is repealed.
SECTION 16.  ORS 307.380 is amended to read:
307.380. (1) Each corporation described in ORS 307.375, claiming the  personal property tax ex-
emption pursuant to ORS 307.370, shall file with the county assessor, on forms  supplied by the
assessor, a written claim  therefor in duplicate on or before April 1 of each year in which the ex-
emption is claimed, except  that when the property designated is acquired after March 1 and before
July 1, the claim for that year shall be filed within 30 days after the date  of acquisition. If the claim
for any year is not filed within the time  specified, the exemption shall not be allowed on the as-
sessment roll for that year. The claim shall  be signed by the taxpayer subject to the penalties for
false swearing.
(2)(a) Each corporation annually shall aid residents, who  could qualify for property tax ex-
emptions pursuant to  ORS 307.250 to 307.283, if the living unit of such elderly person were the
homestead of the person and owned in  fee simple, to prepare applications in duplicate for property
tax exemptions on behalf  of the corporation, for the benefit of the elderly person as provided by ORS
307.370 to 307.385 and 308.490.  The duplicate forms shall be completed and signed by the resident-
applicant and filed with the assessor on or before the date required by law.
(b) The  corporation shall determine the amount of assessed value that each resident of a
nonprofit home who would have qualified for  an exemption under ORS 307.250 to 307.283 would have
had exempted if the living unit of such elderly person was  the homestead of the person and owned
in fee simple. The amount of the  property tax exemption provided for in ORS 307.370 to 307.385 and
308.490 and attributable to the veteran or surviving spouse of the veteran shall be the lesser of:
(A) The maximum amount of exemption  that the veteran or surviving spouse of a veteran would
have qualified for under ORS 307.250 [ or 307.283, whichever is applicable ]; or
(B) The assessed value of the living unit of the veteran or the surviving spouse.
(c) The assessor shall process each such application in the manner otherwise  required under
ORS 307.250 to 307.283, except for the requirement of owning or purchasing a homestead.  The total
of such exempt amounts in each facility, together with the  exemption on personal property, shall
constitute the exemption allowed the corporation.
(3) The assessor  shall act upon the claim and shall approve it or reject it, noting the action upon
both the original and the duplicate copies. The duplicate copy thereupon shall be returned to the
claimant.
(4) The Department of Revenue shall furnish to a county assessor, upon  request, a statement
certifying the qualification or nonqualification of a corporation under ORS 307.375.
[13]
HB 4066
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
UNIT CAPTIONS
SECTION 17.
The unit captions used in this 2022 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2022 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 18. This 2022 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2022
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[14]