Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 21, chapter 86, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 21.  (1) The Residential Heat Pump Fund is established in  the State Treasury, separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Moneys in the Residential Heat Pump Fund consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred  to the fund by the Legislative Assembly; and
(c) Other amounts deposited into the fund from any public or private source.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously  appropriated to the State Department of Energy to be
used to provide grants and rebates under sections 19 and 20 , chapter  86, Oregon Laws 2022,  [ of
this 2022 Act ] and to pay the costs and expenses of  the department related to the administration and
implementation of sections 19 and 20 , chapter 86, Oregon Laws 2022  [ of this 2022 Act ].
(3) In each calendar year, of the moneys available for issuing grants and rebate from the fund:
(a) 25 percent must be reserved for affordable housing providers; and
(b) 25 percent must be reserved [ for loans for owners of units occupied by households whose in-
come is less than 80 percent of the area median  income ] to benefit low or moderate income
households.
SECTION 2.
 Section 23, chapter 86, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 23.  (1) Sections 19 to 21 , chapter 86, Oregon Laws 2022,  [ of this  2022 Act ] are repealed
on January 2, [ 2025] 2026.
(2) On the date of the repeal of sections 19 to 21 , chapter 86,  Oregon Laws 2022,  [of this 2022
Act] under subsection (1) of this section, any moneys in the  Residential Heat Pump Fund that are
unexpended, unobligated and not subject to  any conditions or reservations under section 19 (3)(a) ,
chapter 86, Oregon Laws 2022,  [ of this 2022 Act ] are transferred to the General Fund.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1, for  the program created under section 7, chapter 86, Oregon
Laws 2022.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1879
HB 3056
1
2
3
4
SECTION 4.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]