Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to ______, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $______ for ______.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $______
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses for ______ from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the ______.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $______
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses for ______ from federal funds collected or received by the ______.
SECTION 4.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Note: For budget, see 2023-2025 Biennial Budget
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 9549