Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 198.010 is amended to read:
198.010. As used in this chapter, except as otherwise  specifically provided, “district” means any
one of the following:
(1) A people’s utility district organized under ORS chapter 261.
(2) A domestic water supply district organized under ORS chapter 264.
(3) A cemetery maintenance district organized under ORS chapter 265.
(4) A park and recreation district organized under ORS chapter 266.
(5) A mass transit district organized under ORS 267.010 to 267.394.
(6) A metropolitan service district organized under ORS chapter 268.
(7) A special road district organized under ORS 371.305 to 371.360.
(8) A road assessment district organized under ORS 371.405 to 371.535.
(9) A highway lighting district organized under ORS chapter 372.
(10) A health district organized under ORS 440.305 to 440.410.
(11) A sanitary district organized under ORS 450.005 to 450.245.
(12) A sanitary authority, water authority or joint water and sanitary authority  organized under
ORS 450.600 to 450.989.
(13) A vector control district organized under ORS 452.020 to 452.170.
(14) A rural fire protection district organized under ORS chapter 478.
(15) An irrigation district organized under ORS chapter 545.
(16) A drainage district organized under ORS chapter 547.
(17) A water improvement district organized under ORS chapter 552.
(18) A water control district organized under ORS chapter 553.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2772
HB 3299
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(19) A weather modification district organized under ORS 558.200 to 558.440.
(20) A port organized under ORS 777.005 to 777.725 and 777.915 to 777.953.
(21) A geothermal heating district organized under ORS chapter 523.
(22) A transportation district organized under ORS 267.510 to 267.650.
(23) A library district organized under ORS 357.216 to 357.286.
(24) A 9-1-1 communications district organized under ORS 403.300 to 403.380.
(25) A heritage district organized under ORS 358.442 to 358.474.
(26) A radio and data district organized under ORS 403.500 to 403.542.
(27) A sand control district organized under ORS 555.500 to 555.535.
(28) The urban flood safety and water quality district created under ORS 550.150 to 550.410.
(29) A bridge district organized under sections 2 to 5 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) As used in sections 2 to 5 of this 2025 Act:
(a) “Bridge district” or “district” means a bridge district established pursuant to this
section.
(b) “Capital city region” means the area lying within the boundaries of Benton,  Marion,
Polk and Yamhill Counties.
(2) A bridge district may be formed within the boundaries of  the capital city region for
the purpose of planning, financing, constructing, operating and maintaining bridges  over the
Willamette River in the capital city region.
(3) A petition for  formation of a bridge district must include a permanent rate limit for
operating taxes for the  proposed district. A bridge district is a municipal corporation for
purposes of ORS 294.305 to 294.565.
(4) Except as otherwise expressly provided under  sections 2 to 5 of this 2025 Act, ORS
198.705 to 198.955 apply to bridge districts.
SECTION 3. (1) The governing body  of a bridge district shall be a board organized in ac-
cordance with this section and shall exercise all powers of the district.
(2)(a) The district board shall consist of five members serving four-year terms.
(b) The district board members must be electors residing within  the bridge district. One
member shall be elected from each of the four counties in the capital city region in which
the respective member resides, and one member shall be elected from the district at large.
(c) The district board members shall be  elected as provided in this section and ORS
198.815.
(3)(a) Each of  the initial district board members shall be elected at the election for dis-
trict formation by electors in the county in which the  member resides, or in the bridge dis-
trict at large, as applicable.
(b) The initial district board members shall serve for the following terms:
(A) If the effective date of the formation  of the district occurs in an odd-numbered year,
three district board members shall be elected for four-year terms and the other  two district
board members shall be elected for two-year terms.
(B) If the effective date of  the formation of the district occurs in an even-numbered year,
three district board members shall be elected for three-year  terms and the other two district
board members shall be elected for one-year terms.
(4) At the first meeting of the district board,  or as soon as practicable, the board shall
choose one of the members of the board as president.
(5) Each district board member shall hold office until election and qualification of a  suc-
[2]
HB 3299
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cessor.
SECTION 4.
A bridge district has the power:
(1) To have and use a common seal.
(2) To sue and be sued in the name of the district.
(3) To make and accept any and all contracts, deeds,  leases, releases and documents of
any kind that, in the judgment of  the district board, are necessary and proper to the exercise
of any power of the district, and to direct the payment of all lawful claims or demands.
(4) To assess, levy and collect taxes on all taxable property  within the boundaries of the
district in order to pay:
(a) The costs of  planning, financing, constructing, operating and maintaining bridges over
the Willamette River in the capital city region; and
(b) The administrative costs of the district and the district board.
(5) To employ all necessary agents and assistants.
(6) To plan, finance, construct,  operate and maintain bridges over the Willamette River
in the capital city region.
(7) To call elections for the district after the formation of the district.
(8) Generally to do and perform any and all acts necessary and proper to the complete
exercise and effect  of any of the powers of the district or the purposes for which the district
was formed.
SECTION 5.
(1) Each year, the  district board of a bridge district shall certify, as pre-
scribed under ORS 294.456, the amount or rate of ad valorem  property taxes to be assessed,
levied and collected by the district for the next property tax year.
(2) Ad valorem property taxes collected pursuant to this section shall be  deposited or
transferred for deposit in the general fund of one of the four counties in the capital city  re-
gion. Upon organization of the district board, the  members shall select the county in whose
general fund the revenues of  the district shall be deposited. The selection may not be
changed more often than once in five years.
(3) The district board may enter into an  intergovernmental agreement under ORS chap-
ter 190 with any county or city pursuant to which the road funds  of the county or city may
be deposited in the account of the bridge district for the purpose of contributing to the costs
of any purpose for which the district was formed that is  a use of revenue consistent with the
requirements of Article IX, section 3a, of the Oregon Constitution.
(4) The district board may accept appropriations,  grants, gifts, bequests or any other
funds from  any public or private source for deposit in the district fund. Such funds may be
used only for the payment of costs described in section 4 (4) of this 2025 Act.
(5) For any property tax year in which all bridge  projects of the district are open for
public use, the district board may not certify a rate of  ad valorem property taxes that is
reasonably estimated to exceed the amount of  revenue necessary to pay the administrative
costs of the district and the district board, including, but not  limited to, operating and
maintaining the bridges.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 198.115 is amended to read:
198.115. (1) As used in this section, “district” has the meaning given that term in ORS  198.010
(1) to (5), (7) to (24) [ and] (27) and (29).
(2) A district, by an  ordinance or resolution that takes effect at least one year prior to the date
of the regular district  election, may provide that any individual who is an employee of the district
[3]
HB 3299
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
is not eligible to serve as a member of the governing board of the district by  which the individual
is employed.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 198.180 is amended to read:
198.180. As used in  ORS 198.190, unless the context requires otherwise, “district” has the
meaning given that term by  ORS 198.010 (2) to (5), (7) to (23) , [ and] (25) and (29). In addition, “dis-
trict” means any one of the following:
(1) A county service district organized under ORS chapter 451.
(2) A diking district organized under ORS chapter 551.
(3) A corporation for irrigation, drainage, water supply or  flood control organized under ORS
chapter 554.
(4) A soil and water conservation district organized  under ORS 568.210 to 568.808 and 568.900
to 568.933.
(5) The Port of Portland created by ORS 778.010.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 198.210 is amended to read:
198.210. As used in ORS 198.220, in addition to the  meaning given the term by ORS 198.010 (1)
to (5), (7) to (24) , [ and] (27) and (29), “district” means any one of the following:
(1) A corporation for irrigation, drainage, water supply or  flood control organized under ORS
chapter 554.
(2) A soil and water conservation district organized  under ORS 568.210 to 568.808 and 568.900
to 568.933.
(3) A weed control district organized under ORS 569.350 to 569.445.
(4) A port district organized under ORS chapter 778.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 198.310 is amended to read:
198.310. As used in ORS 198.320, in addition to  the meaning given the term by ORS 198.010 (1)
to (5), (7) to (24) and (26) to [ (28)] (29) , “district” means a soil and water conservation district or-
ganized under ORS 568.210 to 568.808 and 568.900 to 568.933.
SECTION 10.  ORS 198.335 is amended to read:
198.335. As used in ORS 198.335 to 198.365, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “County board” means the board of county commissioners or the county court.
(2) “Special district”:
(a) Has the meaning given the term “district” in ORS 198.010 (1) to (5),  (7) to (24) , [ and] (27)
and (29); and
(b) Also means:
(A) A diking district organized under ORS chapter 551.
(B) A corporation for irrigation, drainage, water supply or flood control organized under  ORS
chapter  554.
(C) A soil and water conservation district organized under ORS 568.210 to 568.808 and  568.900
to 568.933.
(D) A weed control district organized under ORS 569.350 to 569.445.
(E) A port district organized under ORS chapter 778.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 198.510 is amended to read:
198.510. As used in ORS 198.510 to 198.600, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “County” means the county  in which the district, or the greater portion of the assessed value
of the district, is located.
(2) “County board”  means the board of county commissioners or the county court of the county.
[4]
HB 3299
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
(3) “County clerk” means the county clerk of the county.
(4) “District” has the meaning given that term in ORS 198.010 (2), (4), (5), (11),  (12), (14), (16),
(17), (19), (20) to (23)[ ,] and (25) to [ (28)] (29). In addition, “district” means any one of the following:
(a) A county service district organized under ORS chapter 451.
(b) The Port of Portland established by ORS 778.010.
(5) “District board” means the  governing body of a district and the term includes a county board
that is in the governing body of a district.
(6) “Presiding officer” means the chairperson,  president or other person performing the office
of presiding officer of the district board.
(7) “Principal Act” means the law, other than ORS 198.510 to 198.600, applicable to a district.
SECTION 12.
Sections 2 to 5 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2030, unless a
petition for formation of a bridge district within the capital city  region has been filed in ac-
cordance with section 2 of this 2025 Act before that date.
SECTION 13. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[5]