Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Health Authority shall study potential pathways for local gov-
ernments and nonprofit providers to receive Medicaid reimbursement directly  for crisis re-
sponse services. The authority shall submit a report in  the manner provided by ORS 192.245,
and may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legisla-
tive Assembly related to health no later than September 15, 2024.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1284