Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 456.515 to
456.725.
SECTION 2. (1) There is established the Office of  the Chief Real Estate Officer within the
Housing and Community Services Department.
(2) The Director of the Housing and Community Services Department shall appoint  the
Chief Real Estate Officer, who serves at  the pleasure of the director. The Chief Real Estate
Officer shall manage the office.
(3) The office shall:
(a) Identify appropriate  properties to purchase, acquire or hold for the development of
publicly supported or publicly assisted housing;
(b) Help demonstrate the state’s power to increase housing supply;
(c) Centralize and  coordinate public sector tools and resources to facilitate building, es-
pecially in weak economic periods; and
(d) Promote and advise the department on rules and polices that support:
(A) A social housing model including mixed-income public housing  and housing targeted
for middle-income individuals; and
(B) Meeting state goals and targets to reduce carbon emissions  through changes to
housing development and construction practices.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for  the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $1, to support the Office of the Chief Real
Estate Officer under section 2 of this 2023 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1794