Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
WATER RESOURCES REPORT AND BASIN WATER ASSESSMENTS
SECTION 1.
 ORS 536.300 is amended to read:
536.300. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Basin” means a  hydrologic area determined by the Water Resources Commission and
defined by rule.
(b) “Basin plan” means a document describing proposed actions to  be taken by the Water
Resources Department and other entities to understand and  meet in-stream and out-of-
stream needs in a basin.
(c) “Basin program” means a  set of department policies, activities, projects, programs,
investments, rules related to the basin program and other direction for  implementing state-
wide policies  and basin-level actions that, when implemented in an integrated and coordi-
nated way, enable the department and other entities to meet in-stream  and out-of-stream
needs.
(d) “Consumptive  use” means a use of water that withdraws water from a stream or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3286
HB 3368
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
aquifer and results in a loss of water due to evaporation or transpiration or  a transfer of the
water out of a basin.
[(1)] (2) The [ Water Resources Commission ] department shall [ proceed as rapidly  as possible to ]
continuously study[ : Existing ] water resources  of this state[ ; means and methods of conserving and
augmenting such  water resources; existing and contemplated needs and uses of water for domestic,
municipal, irrigation, power  development, industrial, mining, recreation, wildlife, and fish life uses and
for pollution abatement, all of which are declared to be  beneficial uses, and all other related subjects,
including drainage, reclamation, floodplains and reservoir sites. ] to:
(a) Ensure a water supply sufficient to meet  the needs of existing and future beneficial
uses of water; and
(b) Adequately manage the state’s available water resources.
(3) The department shall periodically produce a state of water resources report  that in-
cludes basin assessments for all basins of this state, which must characterize the
department’s understanding of basin water budgets, including the availability  of surface and
ground water to meet current and future in-stream and out-of-stream water needs.
(4) The state of water resources report and basin  assessments must describe, at mini-
mum:
(a) Water supply from all sources.
(b) The amount of water legally allocated and the estimated water  diverted and used, by
sector of use and source.
(c) Where and when water is fully or over appropriated  and evidence of any over appro-
priation.
(d) An overview of the  Oregon history of regulating surface and ground water sources
and the nature of complaints filed with the department.
(e) An estimate of  shortfalls during droughts on record for each basin, for in-stream and
out-of-stream  uses.
(f) Any gaps in  information that limit the department’s ability to provide a full account-
ing of current water supply or demand or the extent of appropriation  for in-stream and
out-of-stream uses, including:
(A) Known or potential unresolved claims to water.
(B) Tribal claims to water.
(C) The extent  to which in-stream flow studies performed by the Department of Envi-
ronmental Quality, the State Department of Fish and  Wildlife and the State Parks and Re-
creation Department identify in-stream needs.
(g) Drinking water supply needs, as well as drinking  water supply and demand-related
opportunities to meet the needs, based on consultation with drinking water  supply providers
and the Oregon Health Authority.
(h) Water supply needs to maintain the current level of agricultural production and an-
ticipated increases in agricultural production, as well  as water supply and demand-related
opportunities to meet the needs, based on consultation with Oregon State University and  the
State Department of Agriculture.
(i) Water supply needs to support fish  and wildlife, abate pollution, promote water quality
and support recreation, as well as water supply and demand-related opportunities to  meet
the needs, based on consultation with the Department of Environmental Quality,  the State
Department of Fish and Wildlife and the State Parks and Recreation Department.
[2]
HB 3368
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(j) Water supply needs for other  beneficial uses of water, including beneficial uses of
water by industry, by livestock, for navigation, for storage and for hydropower.
(k) Anticipated changes to water  use and availability resulting from climate change,
population change, land use change and other relevant factors.
(L) The data, methods and assumptions used to develop the report and basin assess-
ments.
(m) Any  other information determined by the Water Resources Department to be useful
in formulating basin plans or basin program rules.
(5) The department shall append to the report and basin assessments a  vulnerability and
resilience assessment that evaluates:
(a) Anticipated changes  in surface and ground water supply and demand under possible
future climate change and population growth scenarios in each basin.
(b) The vulnerability and resilience of various water use sectors under the scenarios.
(6) The department:
(a) Shall update the report and basin assessments at least every 10 years.
(b) Shall strive to avoid duplication of efforts and to integrate  and coordinate develop-
ment of the report and basin assessments with other complementary processes.
(c) Shall use the report and basin assessments to inform:
(A) Updates to the integrated state water resources strategy described in ORS 536.220.
(B) Basin plans, basin programs and basin program rules.
(C) Any basin-scale water planning efforts.
(D) The development of place-based integrated water resources strategies.
(d) Shall ensure that information used to develop the  report and basin assessments is
accessible to the public.
(e) Shall presume, when developing basin assessments, that  ground water is hydraulically
connected to surface water unless:
(A) The best available scientific information demonstrates no hydraulic connection; or
(B) Basin program rules include basin-specific policies  regarding hydraulic connectivity
of surface and ground water resources.
(f) Shall use available basin-specific information and policies.
(g) Shall use the best available scientific information to develop the report and basin  as-
sessments.
(h) Shall summarize additional information or studies that  are needed to adequately
characterize basin-specific issues, if the department identifies critical gaps in existing  water
resources information.
(i) May contract for production of the report or basin assessments.
(j) Shall develop a plan for prioritizing and sequencing the development  of, and updates
to, basin assessments.
[(2)] (7) Based upon [ said studies and after an opportunity to  be heard has been given to all other
state agencies which may be concerned ] the basin assessments and any other relevant informa-
tion or publications, in consultation with affected agencies and basin stakeholders , the [ com-
mission] department shall progressively formulate  [ an integrated, coordinated program for the use
and control  of all the water resources of this state and issue statements thereof. ] basin plans that
describe:
(a) Basin-specific water resources goals and priorities.
[3]
HB 3368
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) A summary of current and projected conditions.
(c) Potential methods to conserve and augment available water supplies to address known
or anticipated water supply shortfalls and meet the existing and contemplated needs and uses
of water for domestic, municipal, irrigation,  power development, industrial, mining, recre-
ation, navigation, conservation, above and below ground  water storage, fish and wildlife and
pollution abatement, which are all declared to be beneficial uses, including:
(A) Water conservation opportunities.
(B) Above and below ground water storage opportunities.
(C) Water reuse opportunities.
(D) Water sharing opportunities.
(E) Other opportunities to increase water supply or reduce water demand.
(d) Basin-specific considerations for a mitigation program or  for water rights trans-
actions such as transfers.
(e) Potential actions to conserve or curtail water use during water  shortages and the
triggers for implementing the conservation or curtailment.
(f) The processes by which potential actions described in this subsection were evaluated,
including a description of any criteria used.
(g) Actions the department proposes to take, under the  department’s existing authority,
to achieve basin-specific goals.
(h) Actions recommended by the department that others  may voluntarily undertake to
achieve basin-specific goals.
(i) Proposed changes to basin program rules.
(j) Needed water studies, water data or water monitoring.
(k) A strategy, including how to identify metrics or indicators, to monitor progress to-
ward basin goals and adapt basin plans as needed to ensure achievement of the goals.
(L) Any other information  determined by the department to be necessary or useful to
understanding or achieving basin-specific water resource goals.
(8) To assist with implementing the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, the de-
partment may convene a committee to advise on developing basin plans.
(9) Components of basin plans that are not enforceable under department authority will
be voluntary unless included or referenced in basin program rules or other rules.
(10) The commission:
(a) Shall adopt, and periodically review and update, basin  program rules to reflect the
findings of basin assessments and include implementable and enforceable provisions of basin
plans, consistent with the commission’s  authority and applicable provisions of ORS chapter
183.
(b) May establish requirements under basin program rules for  consideration by the de-
partment under ORS 540.510 (1)(a), 540.520 (7) or 540.530 (1)(a) or (b).
[(3)] (11) The commission  may adopt or amend a basin program  rule only after holding at least
one public hearing in the affected [ river] basin. After the commission  [ itself] conducts one public
hearing in [ the affected river ] a basin, the commission may delegate to the  Water Resources Director
the authority to conduct additional public hearings in the affected [ river] basin.
(12) A person may petition the commission to use  a collaborative problem solving process
when adopting or amending a basin program rule, consistent with the  provisions of ORS
183.502.
[4]
HB 3368
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(13) If a basin assessment indicates that water in a basin or portions  of a basin is over
appropriated, the commission shall:
(a) Instruct the department not to accept water right applications  that will contribute
to further  over appropriation of water in the basin or portions of the basin, unless a miti-
gation program is established by rule or a department-approved mitigation  agreement is in
effect.
(b) Update the basin program rules for the basin in accordance with the basin assess-
ments, subject to the requirements of subsection (11) of this section.
(c) Classify or reclassify sources  of water supply accordingly, as described in ORS 536.340.
(d) Notwithstanding ORS 536.031, instruct the department to process applications  re-
ceived using updated basin program rules for the basin.
(e) Declare by rule that the basin is an  active water management area and is subject to
the requirements described in ORS 540.435 (1) or  a voluntary agreement with water users,
as described in ORS 540.435 (2)(b).
(f) Develop basin-specific considerations for use  by the department when considering fu-
ture water rights transactions, including mitigation and transfers, and include the consider-
ations in basin program rules for the basin, consistent with the provisions  of ORS 540.505 to
540.585.
(g) Initiate or support planning efforts to  address problems associated with over appro-
priation and identify goals and actions for sustainably managing available water resources
under current and future climate conditions.
(14) If a basin assessment indicates that water in a basin or portions of  a basin is fully
appropriated, the commission shall:
(a) Instruct the department not to accept water right applications  that will contribute
to over appropriation  of water in the basin or portions of the basin, unless a mitigation
program is established by rule or a department-approved mitigation agreement is in effect.
(b) Update the basin program rules for the basin in accordance with the basin assess-
ments, subject to the requirements of subsection (11) of this section.
(c) Classify or reclassify sources  of water supply accordingly, as described in ORS 536.340.
(d) Notwithstanding ORS 536.031, instruct the department to process applications  re-
ceived using updated basin program rules for the basin.
(e) Develop basin-specific considerations for use by the department when considering fu-
ture water rights transactions, including mitigation and transfers, and include the consider-
ations in basin program rules for the basin, consistent with the provisions  of ORS 540.505 to
540.585.
(15) If a basin assessment indicates  that water in a basin or portions of a basin is not
over or fully appropriated and water may be available for new consumptive uses, the  com-
mission shall declare by rule  that the department will continue processing water rights ap-
plications for the basin or portions of the basin, after considering the following:
(a) Whether to withdraw a percentage of the total available water in the basin  or a por-
tion of the basin, consistent with the requirements of ORS 536.410, to  protect water rights
and the public interest and  to buffer against the potential impacts of climate change and
future droughts.
(b) Whether additional information, study  or action is needed to address uncertainties
regarding current and future water supply, water use and water availability  for in-stream
[5]
HB 3368
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and out-of-stream uses, including for resolution of outstanding claims for water.
(c) Whether continuing to appropriate  water for new consumptive uses is likely to injure
existing water users or exacerbate known water conflicts or shortages.
(d) Whether to develop a basin plan before  making additional decisions about allocating
water in the basin or portions of the basin, to ensure that the public interest is considered.
(e) Whether to classify or reclassify sources of water supply accordingly, as  described in
ORS 536.340.
(16) The commission shall establish an integrated,  coordinated statewide program and
basin program that consist  of statewide policies, basin program rules and other program di-
rection for implementing statewide policies and basin-level actions.
(17) In formulating the programs  described in subsection (16) of this section, the com-
mission shall consider the declarations of policy described in ORS 536.310.
(18) The  programs described in subsection (16) of this section must conform with state-
ments of water resources policy adopted by the commission.
(19) The commission shall coordinate updates to the state of water resources report and
basin assessments with  updates to the integrated state water resources strategy described
in ORS 536.220.
SECTION 2.
The Water Resources Commission shall:
(1) On or before December 31, 2024:
(a) Produce an initial basin assessment for each basin in this state that describes:
(A) The Water  Resources Department’s understanding of the information described in
ORS 536.300 (4)(a) to (g).
(B) The data, methods and assumptions used to develop the initial basin assessments.
(C) Any other  information determined by the department to be necessary or useful for
updating basin program rules as described in ORS 536.300.
(b) Report in the manner described in ORS 192.245 to a committee or interim committee
of the Legislative Assembly related to water on:
(A) Progress in implementing the amendments to ORS 536.300 by section 1 of  this 2023
Act.
(B) The initial basin assessments for each basin.
(C) How information collected by the water allocation  and accounting tool described in
section 7 of this 2023 Act  will be used in the state of water resources report and basin as-
sessments described in ORS 536.300.
(D) Progress  in implementing section 1, chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2021, and how infor-
mation resulting from implementation of the requirements of section 1, chapter 608,  Oregon
Laws 2021, will be used to inform the state of water resources report, basin assessments and
the water allocation and accounting tool described in section 7 of this 2023 Act.
(E) The commission’s plan for  prioritizing and sequencing updates to basin program
rules.
(F) Any  issues preventing the commission or department from implementing the re-
quirements of ORS 536.300 or section 6 or 7 of this 2023 Act.
(2) On or before December 31, 2027:
(a) Update basin program rules, as described in ORS 536.300, to reflect  the best available
information.
(b) Develop a plan for prioritizing and sequencing updates to basin program rules.
[6]
HB 3368
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) On or before _____,  produce the full state of water resources report and basin as-
sessments described in ORS 536.300.
REVIEW OF WATER POLICIES AND MANAGEMENT
SECTION 3.
(1) On or before June 30, 2024, the Legislative Policy and Research Office
shall report, in the manner described in ORS 192.245, to a committee or  interim committee
of the  Legislative Assembly related to water on how the state can improve water policies to
increase clarity and integration  among existing statutes, reduce duplication or address con-
flicting policies and better use the integrated state water resources strategy, basin  assess-
ments, basin plans, basin programs and basin program rules to:
(a) Achieve the policy objectives set forth in ORS  536.220, 536.231, 536.235, 536.238, 536.241,
536.300 and 536.310.
(b) Meet current and future in-stream and out-of-stream water needs.
(2) The report must include:
(a) A thorough review of relevant statutes and rules.
(b) A comparative analysis of relevant approaches in other states.
(c) An assessment of water policy in this state.
(d) Recommendations to improve integration and coordination of water management.
(e) Other policy and funding recommendations.
(3) To produce the report described in subsection (1) of this section, the Legislative Policy
and Research Office shall work with water law experts  at the University of Oregon Envi-
ronmental and Natural Resources Law Center.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Water Resources Commission shall arrange for an independent  audit
of the processes by which the commission and the Water Resources Department make deci-
sions, to be completed on or before June 30, 2024.
(2) The audit should follow up on findings and recommendations from the  2016 Secretary
of State’s audit of the Water Resources Department and the 2022  Secretary of State’s water
advisory report.
(3) Based on the results of the audit, on or before December 31, 2027, the  commission
shall develop and implement  an action plan to improve internal processes and update rules
as needed.
SECTION 5.
Sections 3 and 4 of this 2023 Act are repealed on January 2, 2029.
PROCESSING OF WATER RIGHTS APPLICATIONS
SECTION 6. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 536.031, until any updates to basin program  rules
for specific basins required by ORS 536.300 (10) have been completed, the Water Resources
Commission issues an order stating otherwise, or January 1, 2029, whichever occurs first:
(a) The Water Resources Department shall pause consideration of an application under
ORS 537.140 received after the effective date of this 2023 Act.
(b) The department shall pause  consideration of a request under ORS 537.336 received
after the effective date of this 2023 Act.
(c) The department shall pause consideration of a request under  ORS 537.356 received
after the effective date of this 2023 Act.
[7]
HB 3368
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) The department shall pause  consideration of an application under ORS 537.615 re-
ceived after the effective date of this 2023 Act.
(2) The department  shall annually notify an applicant or requester described in sub-
section (1) of this section of the status of the application or request.
(3) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law or rule:
(a) A request received under ORS 537.336 for which consideration  is paused under sub-
section (1)(b) of  this section shall receive a priority date based on the effective date of this
2023 Act.
(b) A request received under  ORS 537.356 for which consideration is paused under sub-
section (1)(c) of this section shall receive a priority date based on the date the request is
received.
(c) A holder of a water right with  an undeveloped portion of the water right may delay
development of the undeveloped portion  of the water right until the commission has
produced basin water assessments under ORS 536.300 (3) and made any updates described in
ORS 536.300 (13) or (14), without any legal or regulatory consequence for the delay.
(d) When the department resumes processing applications and requests  described in
subsection (1) of this section, the processing must be consistent with updated rules.
(4) This section does not apply  to existing water rights, water uses described in ORS
537.141 or water rights applications received before the effective date of this 2023 Act.
(5) The commission may establish exceptions to the provisions of subsection (1)  of this
section to protect public health or safety.
WATER ALLOCATION AND ACCOUNTING TOOL
SECTION 7.
(1) The Water Resources Department shall develop and maintain a publicly
available water allocation and accounting tool that uses up-to-date information to show:
(a) Estimated water supply and use.
(b) Where and when water may be available for appropriation.
(2) In implementing this section, the department:
(a) Shall include surface and ground water.
(b) Shall include in-stream and out-of-stream uses.
(c) Shall consider the hydraulic connectivity of surface and ground water.
(d) May incorporate anticipated future water availability and demand information.
(e) Shall update the tool no less than every 10 years  to reflect best available information
and current conditions.
(f) Shall coordinate updates of the tool with the completion of basin assessments.
(g) May contract for development, maintenance or updating of the tool.
(h) Shall make publicly available with the tool a report describing the data,  methods and
assumptions used to develop the tool.
(i) Shall develop and implement  a plan to ground truth the tool within water basins
across the state.
(j) Shall refine the tool as needed to reflect water  basin-specific hydrological and water
use information.
TRANSFER LIMITATIONS
[8]
HB 3368
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 8.
 ORS 540.510 is amended to read:
540.510. (1)(a) Except as provided in subsections (2) to (8) of this section, all  water used in this
state for any purpose shall remain appurtenant to the premises upon which it is used  and no change
in use  or place of use of any water for any purpose may be made without compliance with the pro-
visions of ORS  540.520 and 540.530. However, the holder of any water use subject to transfer may,
upon compliance with the provisions of ORS 540.520 and 540.530, change the use and place of use,
the point of diversion or the use of the water without  losing priority of the right , unless the Water
Resources Department determines that the change would  contravene a requirement estab-
lished under a  basin program rule, pursuant to ORS 536.300 (10) . A district may change the
place of use in the manner provided in  ORS 540.572 to 540.580 in lieu of the method provided in ORS
540.520 and 540.530. When an application for change of the use or place of use for a primary  water
right is submitted in accordance with this section, the applicant  also shall indicate whether the land
described in the application has  an appurtenant supplemental water right or permit. If the applicant
also intends to transfer the supplemental water right or permit, the applicant also  shall include the
information required under ORS 540.520 (2) for the supplemental water right or  permit. If the ap-
plicant does not include the supplemental water right  or permit in the transfer application, the
[Water Resources ] department shall notify the applicant  that the supplemental water right or permit
will be canceled  before the department issues the order approving the transfer of the primary water
right, unless within 30 days the applicant modifies the application  to include the supplemental water
right or permit or withdraws the application.  The department may approve the transfer of the sup-
plemental water  right or permit in accordance with the provisions of ORS 540.520 and 540.530. The
department shall not approve the transfer of a supplemental water right  or permit if the transfer
would result  in enlargement of the original water right or injury to an existing water right  or would
contravene a requirement established  under a basin program rule, pursuant to ORS 536.300
(10). If the department approves the transfer  of the primary water right but does not approve the
transfer of the supplemental water  right or permit, the department shall notify the applicant of the
department’s intent to cancel that  portion of the supplemental water right or permit described in the
transfer application before the department issues the primary water right transfer order,  unless the
applicant withdraws the transfer application within 90 days.
(b) A  holder of a water right certificate that authorizes the storage of water may change the
type of use identified in the water right certificate,  as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection,
without losing priority of the right.
(2) Subject to the limitations in ORS 537.490, any right to the use of conserved  water allocated
by the Water Resources Commission under  ORS 537.470 may be severed from the land and trans-
ferred or sold after notice to the commission as required under ORS 537.490.
(3)(a) Any water used under a permit or certificate issued to a  municipality, or under rights
conferred by ORS  538.410 to 538.450, or under the registration system set forth in ORS 537.132, may
be applied to beneficial use on lands to which the right is not appurtenant if:
(A) The water is  applied to lands which are acquired by annexation or through merger, consol-
idation or  formation of a water authority, so long as the rate and use of water allowed in the ori-
ginal certificate is not exceeded;
(B) The use  continues to be for municipal purposes and would not interfere with or impair prior
vested water rights; or
(C) The use is authorized under a permit granted  under ORS 468B.050 or 468B.053 and for which
a reclaimed water registration form has been filed under ORS 537.132.
[9]
HB 3368
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) As used in this subsection, “municipality” means a  city, a port formed under ORS 777.005 to
777.725, 777.915 to 777.953 and  778.010, a domestic water supply district formed under ORS chapter
264, a water supplier as defined in ORS 448.115 or a water authority  formed under ORS chapter 450.
(4) Pursuant to the provisions of ORS 540.570 or 540.585, any water  used under a permit or
certificate issued to a district may  be applied to beneficial use on lands within the district to which
the right is not appurtenant.
(5) The relocation of a point of diversion as necessary  to follow the movements of a naturally
changing stream channel  does not constitute a change in point of diversion for purposes of ORS
540.520 if:
(a) The diversion point stays within 500 feet of the point of diversion on record  with the Water
Resources  Department;
(b) The change does not move the diversion point upstream or downstream beyond the diversion
point of another appropriator; and
(c) The diversion is provided with a proper fish screen,  if requested by the State Department
of Fish and Wildlife.
(6) In the event that government action results in  or creates a reasonable expectation of a
change in the surface level of a surface water source that impairs or threatens  to impair access to
a point of diversion authorized by a water right  permit, certificate or decree, the owner of the water
right may change the point of diversion or add  an additional point of diversion in accordance with
the provisions of this section in lieu of complying with the requirements  of ORS 540.520 and 540.530.
Before changing the point of diversion, the water right  owner shall provide written notice of the
proposed change to the Water Resources Department. Within 15  days after receipt of such notice,
the department shall provide notice by publication  in the department’s public notice of water right
applications.  Within  60 days after the department receives notice from the owner, the Water Re-
sources Director, by  order, shall approve the change unless the director finds the changes will result
in injury to other existing water rights.  All other terms and conditions of the water right shall re-
main in effect.
(7) The sale or lease of the right to the use of conserved water under  ORS 537.490 does not
constitute a change of use or a change in the place of use of water for purposes of ORS 540.520.
(8) Ground water  applied to an exempt use as set forth in ORS 537.141 or 537.545 may be sub-
sequently applied to land for irrigation purposes under ORS  537.141 (1)(i) or 537.545 (1)(g) without
application for a change in use or place of use under this section.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 540.520 is amended to read:
540.520. (1)(a) Except when the application is made under ORS 541.327 or  when an application
for a temporary transfer is  made under ORS 540.523, if the holder of a water use subject to transfer
for irrigation, domestic use, manufacturing purposes, or other use, for any reason  desires to change
the place of use, the point of diversion, or the  use made of the water, an application to make such
change, as the case may be, shall be filed with the Water Resources Department.
(b) A holder of a water right certificate that authorizes the storage of water may change  the
type of use identified in the water right certificate, as described in this section.
(2) The application required under subsection (1) of this section shall include:
(a) The name of the owner;
(b) The previous use of the water;
(c) A description of the premises upon which the water is used;
(d) A description of the premises upon which it is proposed to use the water;
[10]
HB 3368
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) The use that is proposed to be made of the water;
(f) The reasons for making the proposed change; and
(g) Evidence that the water has been used over the past  five years according to the terms and
conditions of the owner’s water right certificate or that the water  right is not subject to forfeiture
under ORS 540.610.
(3) If the application required under subsection (1) of this section  is necessary to allow a change
in a water right pursuant to ORS  537.348, is necessary to complete a project funded under ORS
541.932, or is approved by the State Department of Fish and  Wildlife as a change that will result in
a net benefit to  fish and wildlife habitat, the department, at the discretion of the Water Resources
Director, may waive or assist the applicant in satisfying the requirements of subsection  (2)(c) and
(d) of this section. The assistance provided by the department may include,  but need not be limited
to, development of an application map.
(4) If  the application is to change the point of diversion, the transfer shall include a condition
that the holder of the water right provide a proper  fish screen at the new point of diversion, if re-
quested by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife.
(5) Upon the filing of the application the department shall give notice by publication  in a
newspaper having general circulation in the area in which the water rights are located,  for a period
of at least two weeks and not less than one publication  each week. The notice shall include the date
on which the last notice by publication will occur. The cost of the  publication shall be paid by the
applicant in advance to the department. In  applications for only a change in place of use or for a
change in the point of diversion of less than one-fourth mile, and where there  are no intervening
diversions between the  old diversion of the applicant and the proposed new diversion, no newspaper
notice need be published. The department shall include notice of such applications  in the weekly
notice published by the department.
(6) Within 30 days after the last publication of a newspaper notice of the proposed transfer  or
the mailing of the department’s weekly notice, whichever is later,  any person may file, jointly or
severally, with the department, a protest against approval of the application.
(7) The department may  deny an application under this section if the department deter-
mines that approving the application would contravene a requirement under  a basin program
rule, pursuant to ORS 536.300 (10).
[(7)] (8) If a timely protest is filed, or in the opinion  of the Water Resources Director a hearing
is necessary to determine  whether the proposed changes as described by the application would re-
sult in injury to existing water rights  or contravene a requirement under a basin program rule,
pursuant to ORS 536.300 (10) , the department shall hold a hearing on the matter. Notice and
conduct of the hearing shall be under  the provisions of ORS chapter 183, pertaining to contested
cases, and shall be held in the area  where the rights are located unless all parties and persons who
filed a protest under this subsection stipulate otherwise.
[(8)] (9)  An application for a change of use  under this section is not required if the beneficial
use authorized by the water use subject  to transfer is irrigation and the owner of the water right
uses the water for incidental agricultural, stock watering and other  uses related to irrigation use,
so long as there is no increase in the rate, duty, total acreage benefited or season of use.
[(9)] (10) A water right transfer under subsection (1) of this section is not required  for a general
industrial use that was not included in a water right  certificate issued for a specific industrial use
if:
(a) The quantity of water  used for the general industrial use is not greater than the rate allowed
[11]
HB 3368
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in the original water right and not greater than the quantity of  water diverted to satisfy the au-
thorized specific use under the original water right;
(b) The location where the water is to  be used for general industrial use was owned by the
holder of the original water right at the time the water right permit was issued; and
(c) The person who makes the change in  water use provides the following information to the
Water Resources Department:
(A) The name and mailing address of the person using water under the water right;
(B) The water right certificate number;
(C) A description of the location of the industrial facility owned by the holder of  the original
water right at the time the water right permit was issued; and
(D) A description of the general industrial use to be made of the water after the change.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 540.530 is amended to read:
540.530. (1)(a) If, after  hearing or examination, the Water Resources Commission finds that a
proposed change can be effected without injury to existing water rights  or contravention of a  re-
quirement under a basin program rule,  pursuant to ORS 536.300 (10) , the commission shall
make an order approving the transfer and fixing  a time limit within which the approved changes
may be completed.
(b) If,  after hearing or examination, the commission finds that a proposed change in point of
diversion cannot be effected without injury  to existing water rights  or contravention of a re-
quirement under a basin program  rule, pursuant to ORS 536.300 (10) , upon receipt by the
commission of an  affidavit consenting to the change from every holder of an affected water right,
the commission may  make an order approving the transfer and fixing a time limit within which the
approved changes may be completed.
(c) If, after hearing or examination, the commission finds that a proposed change in  point of
diversion cannot be effected without injury  to an in-stream water right granted pursuant to a re-
quest under ORS 537.336 or an in-stream water right created pursuant  to ORS 537.346 (1), the Water
Resources Department may consent  to the change only upon a recommendation that the department
do so from the agency that requested the in-stream water right. The agency that requested the in-
stream water right may recommend that the department consent  to the change only if the change
will result in a net benefit to the resource consistent with the purposes  of the in-stream water right.
(d)(A) If an  in-stream water right would be injured by a proposed change under paragraph (c)
of this subsection,  the department shall obtain a recommendation from the agency that requested the
in-stream water right. If the recommendation of the agency is to consent to the change, the depart-
ment shall provide  public notice of the recommendation and, consistent with state laws regarding
cooperation with Indian tribes in  the development and implementation of state agency programs that
affect tribes or rights  and privileges of tribes, the department shall consult with affected Indian
tribes.
(B) The recommendation of an agency under this paragraph must be in writing and, if  the rec-
ommendation is to consent to the change, must describe the extent of the  injury to the in-stream
water right, the effect on the resource  and the net benefit that will occur as a result of the proposed
change. The recommendation may include any proposed conditions that  are necessary to ensure that
the proposed change will be consistent with the recommendation.
(C) In determining whether a net benefit will result from  the proposed change, the recommen-
dation of an agency must include an analysis of the cumulative impact of any previous changes  un-
der paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection that allow injury to the  affected in-stream water right.
[12]
HB 3368
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(D) A person may comment on the recommendation  of an agency. The comment must be in
writing and must be received by the  department within 30 days after publication of notice under this
paragraph. If a  written comment received by the department requests a meeting on the proposed
change, the department and  the agency that requested the in-stream water right shall hold a joint
public meeting within 90 days of the receipt of the comment requesting a meeting.
(e)(A) If, after review  of public comments and consultation with the agency that requested the
in-stream water right, the  agency that requested the in-stream water right does not withdraw its
recommendation to consent to the change,  the department may approve the change consistent with
the requirements of paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(B) An order approving a change under paragraph (c) of  this subsection shall include written
findings on the extent of the injury to the in-stream water right, the effect on the resource and  the
net benefit that will occur as a result of the  change. The order shall include any conditions neces-
sary to ensure that the change will be consistent with the findings and ensure that the  change will
result in a continued net benefit to the resource consistent with the purposes of the  in-stream water
right.
(C) In determining whether  a net benefit will result from the change, the order of the depart-
ment must include an analysis of the cumulative impact of any previous  changes approved under
paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection that allow injury to the affected in-stream water right.
(f) The time allowed by the commission for completion of an authorized change under paragraphs
(a) to (e) of this subsection may not be used  when computing a five-year period of nonuse under the
provisions of ORS 540.610 (1).
(2)(a) If a certificate covering the water  right has been previously issued, the commission shall
cancel the previous certificate or,  if for an irrigation district, the commission may modify the pre-
vious certificate and, when proper proof of completion of the authorized changes has been filed  with
the commission, issue a new certificate or, if for an irrigation district, modify the previous  certif-
icate, preserving the previously established priority of rights and covering the authorized changes.
If only a portion of the water right covered by the previous certificate is affected by  the changes,
a separate new certificate may be issued to cover the unaffected portion of the water right.
(b) If the change authorized under  subsection (1) of this section is necessary to allow a change
in a water right pursuant to ORS 537.348, is necessary to  complete a project funded under ORS
541.932, or is approved by the State Department of Fish and  Wildlife as a change that will result in
a net benefit to fish and wildlife  habitat, the Water Resources Department, at the discretion of the
Water Resources Director, may waive or assist  the applicant in satisfying any of the proof of com-
pletion requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection. The assistance  provided by the department
may include, but need not be limited to,  development of a final proof survey map and claim of ben-
eficial use.
(3) Upon receiving notification of  the merger or consolidation of municipal water supply entities,
or the formation of a water authority under ORS chapter 450, the  commission shall cancel the pre-
vious certificates of the entities  replaced by the merger, consolidation or formation and issue a new
certificate to the newly formed municipality or water authority. The new certificate  shall preserve
the previously  established priority of rights of the replaced entities and shall allow beneficial use
of the water on any lands acquired in the merger, consolidation or formation.
APPROPRIATIONS
[13]
HB 3368
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 11.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended for  purposes described in
ORS 536.300 and section 7 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 12. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of  Fish and Wildlife, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended for  purposes de-
scribed in ORS 536.300.
SECTION 13. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Environmental  Quality, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended for  purposes de-
scribed in ORS 536.300.
SECTION 14. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended  for purposes described
in ORS 536.300.
SECTION 15. In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to Oregon State University, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the Gen-
eral Fund,  the amount of $_______, which may be expended for purposes described in ORS
536.300.
SECTION 16. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to Oregon State University, for distribution to the university’s Environmental  and
Natural Resources Law Center, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended for purposes described in section 3 of
this 2023 Act.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 17.
 ORS 536.310 is amended to read:
536.310. In formulating  the [ water resources program under ORS 536.300 (2) ] programs de-
scribed in ORS 536.300 (16) , the Water  Resources Commission shall take into consideration the
purposes and declarations  enumerated in ORS 536.220 and also the following additional declarations
of policy:
(1) Existing rights, established duties of water, and relative priorities concerning the use  of the
waters of this state  and the laws governing the same are to be protected and preserved subject to
the principle that all of the waters within this state belong to the public for use  by the people for
beneficial purposes without waste;
(2) It is in the public interest that integration and coordination of uses of water and augmenta-
tion of existing supplies for all beneficial purposes be achieved for the maximum  economic develop-
ment thereof for the benefit of the state as a whole;
(3) That adequate and safe supplies be preserved and protected for human  consumption, while
conserving maximum supplies for other beneficial uses;
(4) Multiple-purpose impoundment structures are to be preferred over single-purpose structures;
upstream impoundments are to be preferred over downstream impoundments. The fishery resource
of this state is an important economic and recreational asset. In  the planning and construction of
[14]
HB 3368
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
impoundment structures and milldams and other artificial  obstructions, due regard shall be given to
means and methods for its protection;
(5) Competitive exploitation of water resources of this state for single-purpose uses  is to be
discouraged when other feasible uses are in the general public interest;
(6) In  considering the benefits to be derived from drainage, consideration shall also be given to
possible harmful effects upon ground water supplies and protection of wildlife;
(7) The maintenance of minimum perennial streamflows sufficient to support aquatic life,  to
minimize pollution and to maintain recreation values shall be  fostered and encouraged if existing
rights and priorities under existing laws will permit;
(8) Watershed development policies shall be  favored, whenever possible, for the preservation of
balanced multiple uses, and project construction and planning with those ends in  view shall be en-
couraged;
(9) Due regard shall be given  in the planning and development of water recreation facilities to
safeguard against pollution;
(10) It is of paramount importance  in all cooperative programs that the principle of the sover-
eignty of this state over all the waters within the state be protected and preserved, and such coop-
eration by the commission shall be designed so as to reinforce and strengthen state control;
(11) Local development of watershed conservation, when consistent with sound engineering  and
economic principles, is to be promoted and encouraged;
(12) When proposed uses of  water are in mutually exclusive conflict or when available supplies
of water are insufficient for all who desire to  use them, preference shall be given to human con-
sumption purposes over  all other uses and for livestock consumption, over any other use, and
thereafter other beneficial purposes in such order as may be in the public interest consistent  with
the principles of chapter 707, Oregon Laws 1955, under the existing circumstances; and
(13) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, when available supplies  of water are
insufficient in the South Umpqua River to provide for both the  needs of human consumption pursu-
ant to a municipal water right  and the maintenance of previously established minimum streamflows,
preference shall be given to the municipal needs if the municipality adopts  and enforces an ordi-
nance restricting use of the water so obtained to direct human consumption uses.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 536.340 is amended to read:
536.340. (1) Subject at all times to existing rights and priorities  to use waters of this state, the
Water Resources Commission:
(a) May[ , by a water resources statement referred to  in ORS 536.300 (2), ] classify and reclassify
the lakes, streams,  underground reservoirs or other sources of water supply in this state as to the
highest and best use and quantities of  use thereof for the future in aid of an integrated and balanced
program for the benefit of the state as  a whole. The commission may so classify and reclassify
portions of any such sources of  water supply separately. Classification or reclassification of sources
of water supply as provided in this subsection has the effect of restricting the use  and quantities
of use thereof to the  uses and quantities of uses specified in the classification or reclassification,
and no other uses or  quantities of uses except as approved by the commission under ORS 536.370
to 536.390 or as accepted  by the commission under ORS 536.295. Restrictions on use and quantities
of use of a source of water supply resulting from a  classification or reclassification under this sub-
section shall apply to the  use of all waters of this state affected by the classification or reclassi-
fication, and shall apply to uses listed in ORS  537.545 that are initiated after the classification or
reclassification that imposes the restriction.
[15]
HB 3368
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Shall  diligently enforce laws concerning cancellation, release and discharge of excessive
unused claims to waters of this state to the end that such excessive and unused amounts may  be
made available for appropriation and beneficial use by the public.
(c) May, [ by a water resources statement referred to  in ORS 536.300 (2) and ] subject to the pref-
erential uses named in ORS 536.310 (12), prescribe preferences for the future for particular uses and
quantities of uses of the waters of any lake, stream or other source of water supply in  this state in
aid of  the highest and best beneficial use and quantities of use thereof. In prescribing such prefer-
ences the commission  shall give effect and due regard to the natural characteristics of such sources
of water supply, the adjacent topography, the economy  of such sources of water supply, the economy
of the affected area, seasonal requirements of various users of such waters, the  type of proposed use
as between consumptive and nonconsumptive uses and other pertinent data.
(2) In classifying or reclassifying a source of water supply or prescribing preferences for the
future uses of a source of water supply under subsection (1) of this section, the commission shall:
(a) Comply with the requirements set forth  in the Water Resources Department coordination
program developed pursuant to ORS 197.180; and
(b) Cause notice of the hearing held under ORS 536.300 [ (3)] (11) to be published in a  newspaper
of general circulation once each week for two successive weeks in each county:
(A) In which waters affected by the action of the  commission under subsection (1) of this section
are located; or
(B) That is located within the basin under consideration.
(3) Before beginning any action under subsection (2) of this section that would limit new ground
water uses that  are exempt under ORS 537.545 from the requirement to obtain a water right, the
commission shall:
(a) Review the proposed action to determine  whether the proposal is consistent with ORS
537.780;
(b) Provide an opportunity for review by:
(A) Any member of the Legislative  Assembly who represents a district where the proposed
action would apply; and
(B) Any interim committee of the Legislative Assembly responsible  for water-related issues; and
(c) Receive and  consider a recommendation on the proposal from the ground water advisory
committee appointed under ORS 536.090.
SECTION 19.
ORS 536.315 is repealed.
SECTION 20.  ORS 536.350 is amended to read:
536.350. The  Water Resources [ Commission] Department  shall deliver a copy of [ each water re-
sources statement referred to ] the state of water resources report described  in ORS 536.300 [ (2)]
to each state agency or public corporation of this state [ which] that  may be concerned with or
[which] that  may carry on activities likely to affect the use  or control of the water resources of this
state. Each state agency or public corporation  of this state [ which] that  receives a copy of [ a water
resources statement ] the state  of water resources report  shall give to the [ commission] depart-
ment a  receipt for the [ water resources statement ] state of water resources report . A copy of [ any
such statement ] the state  of water resources report  duly certified by the Water Resources Direc-
tor to be a full, true and correct copy shall be received in evidence in  any court in the state and
if the certificate recites that a copy of  the [ statement] state of water resources report  was deliv-
ered to a particular state agency or public corporation of this state, it shall be presumed  that the
same was actually delivered as stated in the certificate.
[16]
HB 3368
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 21.
 ORS 536.360 is amended to read:
536.360. In  the exercise of any power, duty or privilege affecting the water resources of this
state, every state agency or public corporation of this state  shall give due regard to the
[statements] state of water resources report  of the Water Resources [ Commission] Department
and shall conform thereto. No exercise of  any such power, duty or privilege by any such state
agency or public corporation which  would tend to derogate from or interfere with the [ state water
resources policy ] state of water resources report  shall be lawful.
SECTION 22.  ORS 536.370 is amended to read:
536.370. (1) No  exercise by any state agency or public corporation of this state [ which] that  has
received a copy of [ a state  water resources statement ] the state of water resources report  as pro-
vided in ORS 536.350, of any power, duty or  privilege, including the promulgating or undertaking
of any order, rule, regulation, plan, program, policy,  project or any other activity, which would in
any way conflict with the  [ state water resources policy as set forth in the statement ] state of water
resources report , shall be effective or enforceable until approved by the Water Resources Com-
mission as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The exercise of any power, duty or privilege referred to in  subsection (1) of this section shall
be deemed approved by the commission if:
(a) The commission grants its approval as provided in ORS 536.390; or
(b) The commission does not notify the state  agency or public corporation within 30 days after
the filing of the notification  as provided in ORS 536.380 (1) of the intention of the commission to
review the proposed exercise of the power, duty or privilege; or
(c) The commission grants its approval as provided in ORS 536.380 (4).
SECTION 23.
 ORS 536.380 is amended to read:
536.380. (1) Except as otherwise provided in ORS  536.390, whenever any state agency or public
corporation of this state  [ which] that  has received a copy of [ a state water resources statement ] the
state of water resources  report as provided in ORS 536.350, proposes to exercise any power, duty
or privilege referred to  in ORS 536.370 (1), it shall first file with the Water Resources Commission
a notification of the proposed exercise. The notification shall be in such form and  shall contain a
description of the proposed exercise and such other information as the commission  may require. The
notification shall be a public record in the office of the commission.
(2) Within 30 days after the filing of the  notification as provided in subsection (1) of this section,
the commission  shall notify the state agency or public corporation of the intention of the commission
to review the proposed exercise of the power, duty or privilege, if:
(a) The commission, in its discretion, determines that a review should be undertaken; or
(b) A protest against the proposed exercise is filed with the commission within 25 days after  the
filing of the notification as provided in subsection (1) of this section by  any person, state agency or
public corporation of this state or agency of the federal government.
(3) The commission, in its discretion, may hold a public  hearing on the proposed exercise of the
power, duty or privilege. The commission shall determine the time and place  of the public hearing,
and shall give written  notice thereof to the state agency or public corporation whose proposed ex-
ercise of a power,  duty or privilege is being reviewed and to each protestant under subsection (2)(b)
of this section, if any, at  least 10 days prior to the hearing. Notice of the hearing shall also be
published in at least one issue each week for at  least two consecutive weeks prior to the hearing
in a newspaper of general circulation published in each county in which the proposed exercise  of
the power, duty or privilege is to take place or be effective.
[17]
HB 3368
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) After the commission has notified the state agency or public  corporation of the intention of
the commission to review the proposed exercise of the  power, duty or privilege as provided in sub-
section (2) of this section, the commission shall undertake the review and proceed therewith with
reasonable diligence. At the conclusion of the review the commission  shall make a determination
approving the proposed exercise, approving the proposed exercise  subject to conditions specified in
the determination or disapproving the proposed exercise.  A copy of the determination by the com-
mission shall be delivered to  the state agency or public corporation whose proposed exercise of a
power, duty or privilege was reviewed and to each protestant under subsection (2)(b) of this section,
if any.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 536.390 is amended to read:
536.390. The Water Resources Commission may enter into agreements or provide by orders, rules
or regulations whereby it approves the exercise of any one or more of the powers, duties or privi-
leges referred to in ORS 536.370 (1) by a state agency  or public corporation of this state [ which]
that has received a copy of [ a state water resources  statement] the state of water resources report
as provided in ORS 536.350, without the filing of the notification as provided  in ORS 536.380 (1).
Each agreement, order, rule or regulation shall specifically provide for the modification or revoca-
tion thereof at the discretion of the commission and upon  reasonable notice to the state agency or
public corporation, and may contain such  other conditions, limitations or requirements as the com-
mission, in its discretion, may  require to insure the accomplishment of the purposes of the state
water resources policy.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 536.400 is amended to read:
536.400. (1) As used in subsection (2) of this section, “violation” means any  exercise or attempt
to exercise by any state agency  or public corporation of this state [ which] that  has received a copy
of [ a state water  resources statement ] the state of water resources report  as provided in ORS
536.350, of any power,  duty or privilege which would in any way conflict with the [ state water re-
sources statement ] state of water resources report , without the approval of the Water Resources
Commission as provided in ORS 536.370 (2).
(2) The commission[ ,] may apply to the  circuit court of the county in which a violation is alleged
to exist for the restraining by appropriate process of the commission or continuation  of a violation,
or for the enforcement by appropriate process of compliance with ORS 536.370 to 536.390.
SECTION 26.  ORS 540.524 is amended to read:
540.524. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 540.510 or 540.670, upon approval  of an application submitted
to the Water Resources Department, the holder of both  a primary water right originating from a
surface water source and a supplemental water right permit or certificate originating from  a ground
water source may substitute the use of the supplemental water right for the primary water  right.
A substitution may not be made under this subsection if the  use of the supplemental water right
results in an enlargement or expansion of the primary  water right. This subsection does not au-
thorize a change in place of use, type of use, point of diversion or point of appropriation.
(2) An application required under subsection (1) of this  section shall be submitted on forms
provided by the department. The department may request  additional information if necessary to
assist with the injury evaluation.  Each application shall be submitted with the fee described in ORS
536.050 (1)(s).
(3) Upon  receiving an application under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall
provide notice, accept protests and conduct hearings on protests in the manner  described in ORS
540.520 (5), (6) and [ (7)] (8).
[18]
HB 3368
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
(4) The Water Resources Director shall issue an order approving or denying the  substitution. If
the proposed substitution will result in injury to other water rights, the  director shall prohibit or
condition the use to  avoid or mitigate the injury. The director shall issue an order approving or
denying the substitution within 90 days  after the department receives an application under sub-
section (1) of this section.
(5) For the purpose of ORS  540.610, a substituted primary surface water right shall be treated
as a supplemental water right, and a substituted supplemental ground water  right shall be treated
as a primary water right.
(6) A  completed and approved substitution of a supplemental ground water right for a primary
surface water right under this section may be terminated upon a request by  the water right holder
or by  an order of the director if the director determines that the use of the ground water as the
primary water right causes injury to other water rights.  Upon termination, the substituted primary
and supplemental water rights shall revert back to their original status.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 27.
The unit captions used in this 2023 Act  are provided for the convenience
of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express  any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 28. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[19]