Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 18, chapter 906, Oregon Laws 2007, as amended  by section 33, chapter 913,
Oregon Laws 2009, section 33, chapter 750, Oregon Laws 2013, and section 23, chapter 579,  Oregon
Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 18.  [ Section 17, chapter 906, Oregon Laws 2007, ] ORS 316.090 applies to individuals whose
household ends tenancy at a manufactured dwelling park  during a tax year that begins on or after
January 1, 2007, and before January 1, [ 2026] 2032.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3533