Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall  provide grants to
nonprofit corporations to develop or operate affordable rental housing  targeted to individuals
who attend a public university listed in  ORS 352.002 and who are experiencing homelessness
or are at risk of homelessness.
SECTION 2. No later than September 15, 2023, the Higher Education Coordinating  Com-
mission shall provide a report to an appropriate  interim committee of the Legislative As-
sembly in the manner provided in ORS  192.245 on the grants provided under section 1 of this
2021 Act.
SECTION 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this 2021 Act are repealed on January 2, 2024.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning  July 1,
2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1, to provide grants under  section 1 of this
2021 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3673