Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The provisions of the PA Licensure Compact are as follows:
PA LICENSURE COMPACT
SECTION 1. Purpose. In order  to strengthen access to medical services, and in recogni-
tion of the advances  in the delivery of medical services, the participating states of the PA
Licensure Compact have allied in common purpose  to develop a comprehensive process that
complements the existing authority of  state licensing boards to license and discipline PAs
and seeks to enhance the portability of a license to  practice as a PA while safeguarding the
safety of patients. This Compact allows medical  services to be provided by PAs, via the mu-
tual recognition of the  licensee’s qualifying license by other Compact participating states.
This Compact also adopts the prevailing standard for PA licensure and  affirms that the
practice and delivery of medical services by the PA occurs  where the patient is located at
the time of the patient encounter, and therefore requires the PA to be under  the jurisdiction
of the state licensing board where the patient is located. State licensing  boards that partic-
ipate in this Compact retain the jurisdiction to impose adverse action  against a Compact
privilege in that state issued to a PA through the procedures of this Compact. The  PA
Licensure Compact will alleviate burdens for military families by allowing active duty mili-
tary personnel and their spouses to obtain a Compact privilege based on having an  unre-
stricted license in good standing from a participating state.
SECTION 2.
Definitions. In this Compact:
A. “Adverse action” means any administrative, civil, equitable or criminal  action per-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 668
HB 3060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mitted by  a state’s laws which is imposed by a licensing board or other authority against a
PA license, license application or Compact privilege, such as license denial, censure,  revoca-
tion, suspension, probation, monitoring of the licensee or restriction on the  licensee’s prac-
tice.
B. “Compact  privilege” means the authorization granted by a remote state to allow a
licensee from  another participating state to practice as a PA to provide medical services and
other licensed activity to a patient located in the remote state under the remote  state’s laws
and regulations.
C. “Conviction” means a finding by a court that an individual is guilty of a felony or
misdemeanor offense through  adjudication or entry of a plea of guilt or no contest to the
charge by the offender.
D. “Criminal background check” means the submission of fingerprints or  other
biometric-based information for a license applicant for  the purpose of obtaining that
applicant’s criminal history record information, as defined in 28 C.F.R. 20.3(d), from  the
state’s criminal history record repository as defined in 28 C.F.R. 20.3(f).
E. “Data system” means the repository of information about  licensees, including but not
limited to license status and adverse actions, which is created and  administered under the
terms of this Compact.
F. “Executive committee” means a group  of directors and ex officio individuals elected
or appointed pursuant to section 7.F.2 of this Compact.
G. “Impaired practitioner” means a PA  whose practice is adversely affected by health-
related conditions that impact their ability to practice.
H. “Investigative information” means information, records or documents  received or
generated by a licensing board pursuant to an investigation.
I. “Jurisprudence  requirement” means the assessment of an individual’s knowledge of the
laws and rules governing the practice of a PA in a state.
J. “License” means  current authorization by a state, other than authorization pursuant
to a Compact privilege, for a  PA to provide medical services, which would be unlawful with-
out current authorization.
K. “Licensee” means an individual who holds a license from a  state to provide medical
services as a PA.
L. “Licensing board” means any state entity authorized to license and  otherwise regulate
PAs.
M. “Medical services” means health care services provided for the diagnosis,  prevention,
treatment, cure or relief of a health  condition, injury or disease, as defined by a state’s laws
and regulations.
N. “Model  Compact” means the model for the PA Licensure Compact on file with The
Council of State Governments or another entity as designated by the Commission.
O. “Participating state” means a state that has enacted this Compact.
P. “PA” means  an individual who is licensed as a physician assistant in a state. For
purposes of this Compact, any other title or status adopted by a state to replace the  term
“physician assistant” shall be deemed synonymous with  “physician assistant” and shall con-
fer the same rights and responsibilities to the licensee under the provisions of this  Compact
at the time of its enactment.
Q. “PA Licensure Compact Commission,” “Compact Commission,” or  “Commission”
[2]
HB 3060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mean the national administrative body created pursuant to section 7.A of this Compact.
R. “Qualifying license” means an unrestricted license issued by a participating state to
provide medical services as a PA.
S. “Remote state” means a participating state where a  licensee who is not licensed as a
PA is exercising or seeking to exercise the Compact privilege.
T. “Rule” means a regulation promulgated by an entity that has the force  and effect of
law.
U. “Significant investigative information” means investigative information  that a licens-
ing board, after an inquiry or investigation that includes notification and an  opportunity for
the PA to respond if required by state  law, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if
proven true, would indicate more than a minor infraction.
V. “State” means any state, commonwealth, district or territory of the United States.
SECTION 3.
State Participation in this Compact.
A. To participate in this Compact, a participating state shall:
1. License PAs.
2. Participate in the Compact Commission’s data system.
3. Have a mechanism in place  for receiving and investigating complaints against licensees
and license applicants.
4. Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of this Compact and  Commission
rules, of any adverse action against a licensee or license applicant and the existence of  sig-
nificant investigative information regarding a licensee or license applicant.
5. Fully implement a criminal background check requirement, within a time  frame es-
tablished by Commission rule, by its licensing board receiving the  results of a criminal
background check and reporting to the Commission  whether the license applicant has been
granted a license.
6. Comply with the rules of the Compact Commission.
7. Utilize passage of a recognized  national exam such as the National Commission on
Certification of  Physician Assistants (NCCPA) Physician Assistant National Certifying Ex-
amination as a requirement for PA licensure.
8. Grant the Compact  privilege to a holder of a qualifying license in a participating state.
B. Nothing in this Compact prohibits a participating state from charging a fee for
granting the Compact privilege.
SECTION 4.
Compact Privilege.
A. To exercise the Compact privilege, a licensee must:
1. Have graduated from a PA program accredited by  the Accreditation Review Commis-
sion on Education for the Physician Assistant, Inc.,  or its successor organization, or other
programs authorized by Commission rule.
2. Hold current NCCPA certification.
3. Have no felony or misdemeanor conviction.
4. Have  never had a controlled substance license, permit or registration suspended or
revoked by a state  or by the Drug Enforcement Administration of the United States De-
partment of Justice.
5. Have a unique identifier as determined by Commission rule.
6. Hold a qualifying license.
7. Have had no revocation of a license or limitation or  restriction on any license cur-
[3]
HB 3060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
rently held due to an adverse action.
8. If a licensee has had a limitation or restriction on a  license or Compact privilege due
to an adverse action, two years must have elapsed from the date on which the  license or
Compact privilege is no longer limited or restricted due to the adverse action.
9. If a Compact privilege has been revoked or is limited or restricted  in a participating
state for conduct that would not be a basis for disciplinary action in a participating state  in
which the licensee is practicing  or applying to practice under a Compact privilege, that par-
ticipating state  shall have the discretion not to consider such action as an adverse action
requiring the denial or removal of a Compact privilege in that state.
10. Notify the Compact Commission that the licensee is seeking the  Compact privilege in
a remote state.
11. Meet any jurisprudence requirement of a remote state in which the licensee is seeking
to practice under the Compact privilege  and pay any fees applicable to satisfying the
jurisprudence requirement.
12. Report to  the Commission any adverse action taken by a nonparticipating state within
30 days after the action is taken.
B. The Compact privilege is valid  until the expiration or revocation of the qualifying li-
cense unless terminated pursuant to an adverse action.  The licensee must also comply with
all of the requirements of subsection A of  this section to maintain the Compact privilege in
a remote state. If the  participating state takes adverse action against a qualifying license,
the licensee shall lose the Compact  privilege in any remote state in which the licensee has
a Compact privilege until all of the following occur:
1. The license is no longer limited or restricted; and
2. Two years have  elapsed from the date on which the license is no longer limited or re-
stricted due to the adverse action.
C. Once a  restricted or limited license satisfies the requirements of subsection B.1 and
2 of this section, the licensee must meet the requirements of  subsection A of this section to
obtain a Compact privilege in any remote state.
D. For each remote state in which  a PA seeks authority to prescribe controlled sub-
stances, the PA shall  satisfy all requirements imposed by such state in granting or renewing
such authority.
SECTION 5.
Designation of the State from  Which Licensee is Applying for a Compact
Privilege.
A. Upon a licensee’s application for a Compact privilege, the licensee shall identify to the
Commission the participating state from which the licensee  is applying, in accordance with
applicable rules adopted by the Commission, and subject to the following requirements:
1. When applying for a Compact privilege, the licensee shall provide the  Commission with
the address of the licensee’s primary residence and thereafter shall immediately report to
the Commission any change in the address of the licensee’s primary residence.
2. When applying for a Compact privilege, the licensee is required to consent  to accept
service of process by mail at the licensee’s primary residence on file  with the Commission
with respect to any action brought against the licensee by the Commission or a participating
state, including a subpoena, with respect to  any action brought or investigation conducted
by the Commission or a participating state.
SECTION 6.
Adverse Actions.
[4]
HB 3060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
A. A participating state in which a licensee is licensed shall have exclusive power  to im-
pose adverse action against the qualifying license issued by that participating state.
B. In addition to the  other powers conferred by state law, a remote state shall have the
authority, in accordance with existing state due process law, to do all of the following:
1. Take adverse action against a PA’s Compact privilege within that  state to remove a
licensee’s Compact privilege or take other action necessary  under applicable law to protect
the health and safety of its residents.
2. Issue subpoenas for both  hearings and investigations that require the attendance and
testimony of witnesses as well as the production of evidence. Subpoenas  issued by a licensing
board in a participating state for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the  pro-
duction of evidence from another participating  state shall be enforced in the latter state by
any court of competent jurisdiction,  according to the practice and procedure of that court
applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it. The issuing authority shall
pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage and other fees required by the service statutes
of the state in which the witnesses or evidence are located.
3. Notwithstanding paragraph 2 of this subsection,  subpoenas may not be issued by a
participating state to gather evidence of conduct in another state that is lawful  in that other
state for the purpose of taking adverse action against a licensee’s Compact  privilege or ap-
plication for a Compact privilege in that participating state.
4. Nothing in this Compact authorizes a participating state to impose  discipline against
a PA’s Compact privilege or to deny  an application for a Compact privilege in that partic-
ipating state for the individual’s otherwise lawful practice in another state.
C. For purposes of taking adverse action, the participating  state which issued the quali-
fying license shall give the same priority and effect to reported conduct received from any
other participating state  as it would if the conduct had occurred within the participating
state which issued the qualifying license. In so doing, that participating  state shall apply its
own state laws to determine appropriate action.
D. A participating state, if otherwise permitted by state law, may recover from the  af-
fected PA the costs of investigations and disposition of  cases resulting from any adverse
action taken against that PA.
E. A participating  state may take adverse action based on the factual findings of a re-
mote state, provided that the participating state follows its  own procedures for taking the
adverse action.
F. Joint Investigations
1. In addition to the authority granted to a participating state  by its respective state PA
laws and regulations or other applicable state law, any participating state may  participate
with other participating states in joint investigations of licensees.
2. Participating states shall share any  investigative, litigation or compliance materials in
furtherance of any joint or individual investigation initiated under this Compact.
G. If an adverse action is taken against a PA’s qualifying license, the PA’s Compact
privilege in all remote states shall be deactivated until two years  have elapsed after all re-
strictions have been removed from the state license. All disciplinary orders by the partic-
ipating state which issued the qualifying license that impose adverse action against a PA’s
license shall include a statement that the PA’s Compact privilege is deactivated in all  par-
ticipating states during the pendency of the order.
[5]
HB 3060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
H. If any participating state takes adverse action, it promptly shall notify the  adminis-
trator of the data system.
SECTION 7.
Establishment of the PA Licensure Compact Commission.
A. The participating states hereby  create and establish a joint government agency and
national administrative body known as the PA Licensure  Compact Commission. The Com-
mission is an instrumentality  of the Compact states acting jointly and not an instrumentality
of any one state. The  Commission shall come into existence on or after the effective date
of this Compact as set forth in section 11.A of this Compact.
B. Membership, Voting and Meetings
1. Each participating state shall have and  be limited to one delegate selected by that
participating state’s  licensing board or, if the state has more than one licensing board, se-
lected collectively by the participating state’s licensing boards.
2. The delegate shall be either:
a. A current  PA, physician or public member of a licensing board or PA council or com-
mittee; or
b. An administrator of a licensing board.
3. Any delegate may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the laws of  the
state from which the delegate is appointed.
4. The participating state licensing board  shall fill any vacancy occurring in the Com-
mission within 60 days.
5. Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all  matters voted on by the Commission
and shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the  business and affairs of the
Commission. A delegate shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the  by-
laws. The bylaws may provide for delegates’ participation in meetings by telecommuni-
cations, video conference or other means of communication.
6. The Commission  shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional
meetings shall be held as set forth in this Compact and the bylaws.
7. The Commission shall establish by rule a term of office for delegates.
C. The Commission shall have the following powers and duties:
1. Establish a code of ethics for the Commission;
2. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
3. Establish fees;
4. Establish bylaws;
5. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
6. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this Compact and
the bylaws;
7. Promulgate rules to facilitate and coordinate  implementation and administration of
this Compact. Except as provided in section 9.C.2  of this Compact, the rules shall have the
force and effect of law and shall be binding in all participating states;
8. Bring and  prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the Commission,
provided that the standing of any state  licensing board to sue or be sued under applicable law
shall not be affected;
9. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
10. Borrow,  accept or contract for services of personnel, including, but not limited to,
employees of a participating state;
[6]
HB 3060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
11. Hire employees and engage  contractors, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation,
define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to  carry out the purposes of this
Compact and establish  the Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to con-
flicts of interest, qualifications of personnel and other related personnel matters;
12. Accept any and all appropriate donations and  grants of money, equipment, supplies
and materials and services, and receive, utilize and dispose of the same, provided that  at all
times the Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest;
13. Lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of,  or otherwise own, hold,
improve or use, any property, real, personal or mixed, provided that at all times the Com-
mission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety;
14. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon or otherwise dispose of  any
property real, personal or mixed;
15. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
16. Borrow money;
17. Appoint committees,  including standing committees composed of members, state
regulators, state legislators  or their representatives, consumer representatives and such
other interested persons as may be designated in this Compact and the bylaws;
18. Provide to and receive information from, and  cooperate with, law enforcement agen-
cies;
19. Elect a chair, vice chair, secretary and treasurer and such other officers of the
Commission as provided in the Commission’s bylaws;
20. Reserve for itself, in addition to  those reserved exclusively to the Commission under
this Compact, powers that the executive committee may not exercise;
21. Approve or disapprove a state’s participation  in this Compact based upon the
Commission’s determination as to whether the state’s Compact legislation departs in a ma-
terial manner from the model Compact language;
22. Prepare and provide to the participating states an annual report; and
23. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate  to achieve the
purposes of this Compact consistent with the state regulation of PA licensure and practice.
D. Meetings of the Commission
1. All  meetings of the Commission that are not closed pursuant to this subsection shall
be open to the public. Notice of public meetings  shall be posted on the Commission’s website
at least 30 days prior to the public meeting.
2. Notwithstanding subsection D.1 of this section, the Commission  may convene a public
meeting by  providing at least 24 hours prior notice on the Commission’s website, and any
other means as provided in the Commission’s rules, for any of  the reasons it may dispense
with notice of proposed rulemaking under section 9.L of this Compact.
3. The Commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting or nonpublic part  of a
public meeting to receive legal advice or to discuss:
a. Noncompliance of a participating state with its obligations under this Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or  other matters, practices or procedures
related to specific employees or other matters related to the  Commission’s internal person-
nel practices and procedures;
c. Current, threatened or reasonably anticipated litigation;
d. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease or sale of goods, services  or real es-
[7]
HB 3060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tate;
e. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
f. Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is  privileged
or confidential;
g. Disclosure  of information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a
clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
h. Disclosure of investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
i. Disclosure of information related to any investigative reports prepared  by or on behalf
of or for use of the Commission or another committee charged with responsibility of  inves-
tigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to this Compact;
j. Legal advice; or
k. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or  participating states’ stat-
utes.
4. If a meeting, or portion of  a meeting, is closed pursuant to this subsection, the chair
of the meeting or the chair’s designee shall certify that the meeting or portion of the meet-
ing may be closed and shall reference each relevant exempting provision.
5. The Commission shall keep minutes  that fully and clearly describe all matters dis-
cussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions  taken, includ-
ing a description of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection with  an
action shall be identified in  such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting
shall remain under seal, subject to release by a  majority vote of the Commission or order
of a court of competent jurisdiction.
E. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable  expenses of
its establishment, organization and ongoing activities.
2. The Commission may accept  any and all appropriate revenue sources, donations and
grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services.
3. Except as provided in subparagraph c  of this paragraph, the Commission may levy on
and collect an annual assessment from each participating state and  may impose Compact
privilege fees on licensees of participating states to whom a  Compact privilege is granted to
cover the  cost of the operations and activities of the Commission and its staff, which must
be in a total amount sufficient to  cover its annual budget as approved by the Commission
each year for  which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assess-
ment amount levied on participating  states shall be allocated based upon a formula to be
determined by Commission rule.
a. A Compact  privilege expires when the licensee’s qualifying license in the participating
state from which the licensee applied for the Compact privilege expires.
b. If the licensee  terminates the qualifying license through which the licensee applied for
the Compact privilege before its scheduled expiration, and the licensee has a qualifying  li-
cense in another participating state,  the licensee shall inform the Commission that it is
changing to that participating state  the participating state through which it applies for a
Compact privilege and pay to the Commission any Compact  privilege fee required by Com-
mission rule.
c. An  assessment levied, or any other financial obligation imposed, under this Compact
is effective against the State of Oregon only to the extent  that moneys necessary to pay the
[8]
HB 3060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
assessment or meet the financial obligation  have been deposited in the Oregon Medical Board
Account established under ORS 677.290.
4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of  any kind prior to securing the funds
adequate to meet the same, nor shall the Commission pledge  the credit of any of the par-
ticipating states, except by and with the authority of the participating state.
5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all  receipts and disbursements. The
receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall  be subject to the financial review and
accounting procedures established under its bylaws. All receipts and disbursements of funds
handled by the Commission shall be subject to an annual financial review by  a certified or
licensed public accountant,  and the report of the financial review shall be included in and
become part of the annual report of the Commission.
F. The Executive Committee
1. The  executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the Commission ac-
cording to the terms of this Compact and Commission rules.
2. The executive committee shall be composed of nine members:
a. Seven voting members who are elected by the Commission from the current  member-
ship of the Commission;
b. One ex officio, nonvoting  member from a recognized national PA professional associ-
ation; and
c. One ex officio, nonvoting member from  a recognized national PA certification organ-
ization.
3. The ex officio members will be selected by their respective organizations.
4. The Commission may remove  any member of the executive committee as provided in
its bylaws.
5. The executive committee shall meet at least annually.
6. The executive committee shall have the following duties and responsibilities:
a. Recommend to the Commission changes  to the Commission’s rules or bylaws, changes
to this Compact legislation, fees to  be paid by Compact participating states such as annual
dues and any Commission Compact fee charged to licensees for the Compact privilege;
b. Ensure Compact  administration services are appropriately provided, contractual or
otherwise;
c. Prepare and recommend the budget;
d. Maintain financial records on behalf of the Commission;
e. Monitor Compact  compliance of participating states and provide compliance reports
to the Commission;
f. Establish additional committees as necessary;
g. Exercise the powers and duties of the Commission during the interim between  Com-
mission meetings, except for issuing  proposed rulemaking, adopting Commission rules or
bylaws or exercising any other powers and duties exclusively reserved  to the Commission by
the Commission’s rules; and
h. Perform other duties as provided in the Commission’s rules or bylaws.
7. All meetings of the executive committee at which it votes  or plans to vote on matters
in exercising the powers and duties of the Commission shall  be open to the public and public
notice of such meetings shall be given as public meetings of the Commission are given.
8. The executive committee may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting  for the same
[9]
HB 3060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
reasons that the Commission may convene in a  nonpublic meeting as set forth in section
7.D.3 of this Compact and shall announce the closed  meeting as the Commission is required
to under section 7.D.4 of this Compact and keep  minutes of the closed meeting as the Com-
mission is required to under section 7.D.5 of this Compact.
G. Qualified Immunity, Defense and Indemnification
1. The members,  officers, executive director, employees and representatives of the Com-
mission shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally  and in their official capacity,
for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other  civil liability
caused by or arising  out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that
the person against whom the claim  is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties or  responsibilities, provided that nothing
in this paragraph shall  be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any
damage, loss, injury or  liability caused by the intentional, willful or wanton misconduct of
that person.  The procurement of insurance of any type by the Commission shall not in any
way compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director,  employee and
representative of  the Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out
of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties or responsibilities, or as determined by the Commission  that the person
against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing  occurred within the
scope of Commission  employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that nothing herein
shall be  construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own counsel at their own
expense and provided further that the actual or alleged act, error or omission  did not result
from that person’s intentional, willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer, executive  di-
rector, employee and representative of the Commission for the amount of  any settlement or
judgment obtained against  that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or
omission that occurred within the scope of Commission  employment, duties or responsibil-
ities, or that such person had a  reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act,
error or omission did not result from the intentional,  willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.
4. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the Commission shall be brought
solely and exclusively in  a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the
Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional  defenses in any
proceedings as authorized by Commission rules.
5. Nothing herein shall be construed  as a limitation on the liability of any licensee for
professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed  solely by any other appli-
cable state laws.
6. Nothing herein shall be construed to  designate the venue or jurisdiction to bring
actions for  alleged acts of malpractice, professional misconduct, negligence or other such
civil action pertaining to the practice of  a PA. All such matters shall be determined exclu-
sively by state law other than this Compact.
7. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted  to waive or otherwise abrogate a partic-
ipating state’s state action immunity or state action  affirmative defense with respect to
[10]
HB 3060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
antitrust claims under the Sherman Antitrust Act of  1890, the Clayton Antitrust Act of 1914
or any other state or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
8. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a  waiver of sovereign immunity by
the participating states or by the Commission.
SECTION 8.
Data System.
A. The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance,  operation and utili-
zation of  a coordinated data and reporting system containing licensure, adverse action and
the reporting of the existence of significant investigative information on all licensed  PAs and
applicants denied a license in participating states.
B. Notwithstanding any other state law to the contrary, a participating state shall submit
a uniform data set to the data system on all PAs to whom this Compact  is applicable, uti-
lizing a unique identifier, as required by the rules of the Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse actions against a license or Compact privilege;
4. Any denial of application for  licensure, and the reason for such denial, excluding the
reporting of any criminal history record information where prohibited by law;
5. The existence of significant investigative information; and
6. Other information that may  facilitate the administration of this Compact, as deter-
mined by the rules of the Commission.
C. Significant investigative information pertaining to a licensee in any participating state
shall only be available to other participating states.
D. The  Commission shall promptly notify all participating states of any adverse action
taken against a licensee or an individual applying for a license  that has been reported to it.
This adverse action information shall be available to any other participating state.
E. Participating states contributing information  to the data system may, in accordance
with state or federal law,  designate information that may not be shared with the public
without the express  permission of the contributing state. Notwithstanding any such desig-
nation, such information shall be reported to the Commission through the data system.
F. Any information submitted to  the data system that is subsequently expunged pursuant
to federal law or the laws of the  participating state contributing the information shall be
removed from the  data system upon reporting of such by the participating state to the
Commission.
G. The records and information provided  to a participating state pursuant to this Com-
pact or through the data system, when certified by the Commission or an agent thereof, shall
constitute the authenticated business records  of the Commission, and shall be entitled to any
associated hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial  or administrative pro-
ceedings in a participating state.
SECTION 9.
Rulemaking.
A. The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria  set
forth in this section and the rules  adopted thereunder. Commission rules shall become
binding as of the date specified by the Commission for each rule.
B. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable  rules in order to effectively and effi-
ciently implement and administer this Compact and achieve its purposes. A Commission rule
shall be invalid and have  not force or effect only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds
[11]
HB 3060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
that the rule is invalid because the Commission exercised its rulemaking authority  in a
manner that is beyond the scope of the  purposes of this Compact, or the powers granted
hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of review.
C.1. The rules of the Commission  shall have the force of law in each participating state,
provided however that where the rules of the Commission  conflict with the laws of the par-
ticipating state  that establish the medical services a PA may perform in the participating
state, as held by a court of competent  jurisdiction, the rules of the Commission shall be in-
effective in that state to the extent of the conflict.
2. Notwithstanding paragraph 1 of this subsection, the Oregon Medical Board shall review
the rules of the Commission. The board may approve and adopt  the rules of the Commission
as rules of the board. The State of Oregon is subject to a rule  of the Commission only if the
rule of the Commission is adopted by the board.
D. If a majority of the legislatures of the participating states rejects  a Commission rule,
by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt this  Compact
within four years of the date of adoption of the rule, then such rule shall have  no further
force and effect in any participating state or to any state applying  to participate in this
Compact.
E. Commission rules shall be adopted at a  regular or special meeting of the Commission.
F. Prior to promulgation  and adoption of a final rule or rules by the Commission, and
at least 30 days in advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered and voted
upon, the Commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible platform;
2. To persons who have requested notice  of the Commission’s notices of proposed
rulemaking; and
3. In such other ways as the Commission may by rule specify.
G. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
1. The time, date and location of the public hearing on the proposed rule and the proposed
time, date  and location of the meeting in which the proposed rule will be considered and
voted upon;
2. The text of the proposed rule and the reason for the proposed rule;
3. A request  for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person and the date
by which written comments must be received; and
4. The manner in which interested persons may submit  notice to the Commission of their
intention to attend the public hearing or provide any written comments.
H. Prior to adoption of  a proposed rule, the Commission shall allow persons to submit
written data, facts, opinions and arguments, which shall be made available to the public.
I. If the hearing is to be held via electronic means, the  Commission shall publish the
mechanism for access to the electronic hearing.
1. All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing shall  as directed in the notice of pro-
posed rulemaking, not less than five business days before the scheduled date of the hearing,
notify the Commission of their desire to appear and testify at the hearing.
2. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing  each person who wishes to com-
ment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing.
3. All hearings  shall be recorded. A copy of the recording and the written comments,
data, facts, opinions and arguments received in response  to the proposed rulemaking shall
[12]
HB 3060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
be made available to a person upon request.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a  separate hearing on each
proposed rule. Proposed rules may be grouped for the  convenience of the Commission at
hearings required by this section.
J. Following the public hearing the Commission shall consider all written and oral com-
ments timely received.
K. The Commission shall, by majority vote of  all delegates, take final action on the pro-
posed rule and shall determine the effective  date of the rule, if adopted, based on the
rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.
1. If adopted, the rule shall be posted on the Commission’s website.
2. The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed rule provided the changes  do not
enlarge the original purpose of the proposed rule.
3. The Commission shall provide  on its website an explanation of the reasons for sub-
stantive changes made to the proposed rule as  well as reasons for substantive changes not
made that were recommended by commenters.
4. The Commission shall determine a reasonable  effective date for the rule. Except for
an emergency as provided in subsection L of this section, the effective date of  the rule shall
be no sooner than 30 days after the Commission issued the notice that it adopted the rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency  exists, the Commission may consider and
adopt an emergency rule with 24  hours prior notice, without the opportunity for comment
or hearing, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in this  Compact and in
this section shall be retroactively applied to  the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no
event later than 90 days after the effective date of the  rule. For the purposes of this pro-
vision, an  emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately by the Commission in
order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or participating state funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Commission  rule that is established by fed-
eral law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may direct  revisions
to a previously adopted Commission rule for purposes of  correcting typographical errors,
errors in format, errors  in consistency or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions
shall be posted on the website of the  Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge
by any person for  a period of 30 days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on
grounds that  the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made
as set forth in the notice of revisions and delivered to the Commission prior to the end of
the notice period. If no challenge  is made, the revision will take effect without further
action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without  the approval
of the Commission.
N. No participating state’s rulemaking requirements shall apply under this Compact.
SECTION 10.
Oversight, Dispute Resolution and Enforcement.
A. Oversight
1. The executive and judicial branches  of state government in each participating state
shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate  to implement this
[13]
HB 3060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Compact.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the Commission shall be brought
solely and exclusively in  a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the
Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the
extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute  resolution proceedings.
Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in any action against
a licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct or any such similar matter.
3. The Commission shall  be entitled to receive service of process in any proceeding re-
garding the enforcement or interpretation of this Compact or the Commission’s  rules and
shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding  for all purposes. Failure to provide the
Commission with service of process shall render a judgment or order  in such proceeding void
as to the Commission, this Compact or Commission rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance and Termination
1. If  the Commission determines that a participating state has defaulted in the perform-
ance of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or the Commission rules, the
Commission shall provide written notice to the defaulting state  and other participating
states.  The  notice shall describe the default, the proposed means of curing the default and
any other action that the Commission may  take and shall offer remedial training and specific
technical assistance regarding the default.
2. If a state in default fails to cure  the default, the defaulting state may be terminated
from this Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the delegates of  the participat-
ing states, and all rights, privileges  and benefits conferred by this Compact upon such state
may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve
the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
3. Termination of participation in this Compact shall be  imposed only after all other
means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend  or terminate
shall be given by the Commission  to the Governor, the majority and minority leaders of the
defaulting state’s legislature and to the licensing boards of each of the participating states.
4. A state  that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations and
liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination,  including obligations that ex-
tend beyond the effective date of termination.
5. The Commission  shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in de-
fault or that has been terminated  from this Compact, unless agreed upon in writing between
the Commission and the defaulting state.
6. The defaulting state may appeal its termination from this Compact by the Commission
by petitioning the U.S. District Court for  the District of Columbia or the federal district
where the Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing  party shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
7. Upon the termination of  a state’s participation in this Compact, the state shall im-
mediately provide notice to all licensees within that state of such termination.
a. Licensees who have been granted a Compact privilege in that state  shall retain the
Compact privilege for 180 days following the effective date of such termination.
b. Licensees who are licensed in that state who have been granted a  Compact privilege
in a  participating state shall retain the Compact privilege for 180 days unless the licensee
also has a qualifying license in a participating state or obtains  a qualifying license in a par-
[14]
HB 3060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ticipating state before the 180-day period ends, in which case  the Compact privilege shall
continue.
C. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by  a participating state, the Commission shall attempt to resolve dis-
putes related to this Compact  that arise among participating states and between participat-
ing and nonparticipating states.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for  both mediation and binding
dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
D. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable  exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the pro-
visions of this Compact and rules of the Commission.
2. If  compliance is not secured after all means to secure compliance have been exhausted,
by majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal action  in the U.S. District Court for the
District of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has  its principal offices
against a participating state in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of  this
Compact and the Commission’s rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include  both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event  judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing
party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
3. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the  Commission. The
Commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law.
E. Legal Action Against the Commission
1. A participating state may initiate legal action against  the Commission in the U.S.
District Court for the District of Columbia or  the federal district where the Commission has
its principal offices to  enforce compliance with the provisions of this Compact and its rules.
The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the  event judicial
enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall  be awarded all costs of such litigation,
including reasonable attorney’s fees.
2. No person other than a participating state shall enforce  this Compact against the
Commission.
SECTION 11.
Date of Implementation of the PA Licensure Compact Commission.
A. This Compact shall come into effect on the date on which  this Compact statute is
enacted into law in the seventh participating state.
1. On or after the  effective date of this Compact, the Commission shall convene and re-
view the enactment of each of the states that enacted this Compact prior to the  Commission
convening (“charter participating states”)  to determine if the statute enacted by each such
charter participating state is materially different than the model Compact.
a. A charter participating state whose enactment is found to  be materially different from
the model Compact shall be entitled  to the default process set forth in section 10.B of this
Compact.
b. If any participating state later withdraws from this Compact or its  participation is
terminated, the Commission shall remain in existence and this Compact shall  remain in ef-
fect even if the  number of participating states should be less than seven. Participating states
enacting this Compact subsequent to the  Commission convening shall be subject to the pro-
cess set forth in section 7.C.21 of this Compact to determine if their  enactments are mate-
rially different from the model Compact and whether they qualify for participation in this
[15]
HB 3060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Compact.
2. Participating states enacting  this Compact subsequent to the seven initial charter
participating states shall be subject to the process set forth in section  7.C.21 of this Compact
to determine if their enactments are materially  different from the model Compact and
whether they qualify for participation in this Compact.
3. All actions taken for the  benefit of the Commission or in furtherance of the purposes
of the administration of this  Compact prior to the effective date of this Compact or the
Commission coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of the Commission unless
specifically repudiated by the Commission.
B. Any state that joins this Compact shall be subject  to the Commission’s rules and by-
laws as they  exist on the date on which this Compact becomes law in that state. Any rule
that has been previously adopted by the Commission shall have the full force and effect  of
law on the day this Compact becomes law in that state.
C. Any participating state may withdraw from this  Compact by enacting a statute re-
pealing the same.
1. A participating state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until 180 days after enactment
of the repealing statute.  During this 180 day-period, all Compact privileges that were in effect
in the withdrawing  state and were granted to licensees licensed in the withdrawing state
shall remain in  effect. If any licensee licensed in the withdrawing state is also licensed in
another participating state or obtains  a license in another participating state within the 180
days, the licensee’s Compact  privileges in other participating states shall not be affected by
the passage of the 180 days.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect  the continuing requirement of the state licensing board
of the withdrawing state to comply with the investigative and adverse  action reporting re-
quirements of this Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
3. Upon the enactment of a statute  withdrawing a state from this Compact, the state
shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all licensees within  that state. Such
withdrawing state shall continue to recognize all licenses  granted pursuant to this Compact
for a minimum of 180 days after the date of such notice of withdrawal.
D. Nothing contained in this Compact shall  be construed to invalidate or prevent any PA
licensure agreement  or other cooperative arrangement between participating states and be-
tween a participating state and nonparticipating state that does not conflict with  the pro-
visions of this Compact.
E. This Compact may be amended by the participating  states. No amendment to this
Compact shall become effective and binding upon any participating state  until it is enacted
materially in the same manner into the laws of all participating states as  determined by the
Commission.
SECTION 12.
Construction and Severability.
A. This Compact and the Commission’s rulemaking  authority shall be liberally construed
so as to effectuate the purposes and the implementation and administration of  this Compact.
Provisions of this Compact expressly authorizing or requiring the  promulgation of rules shall
not be construed to limit the Commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
B. The provisions of this Compact shall be  severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence
or provision of this Compact is held by a court of competent  jurisdiction to be contrary to
the constitution of any participating state, a state seeking participation in  this Compact or
[16]
HB 3060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the United States, or the applicability thereof to any government,  agency, person or cir-
cumstance is held to be  unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity
of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability  thereof to any other government,
agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding subsection B of this  section, the Commission may deny a state’s
participation in this Compact or, in  accordance with the requirements of section 10.B of this
Compact, terminate a participating state’s participation in this  Compact, if it determines
that a  constitutional requirement of a participating state is, or would be with respect to a
state seeking to participate  in this Compact, a material departure from this Compact. Oth-
erwise, if this Compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any  participating
state,  this  Compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining participating
states and in full force and effect as  to the participating state affected as to all severable
matters.
SECTION 13.
Binding Effect of Compact.
A. Nothing herein prevents  the enforcement of any other law of a participating state that
is not inconsistent with this Compact.
B. Any laws in a participating state in conflict with this  Compact are superseded to the
extent of the conflict.
C. All agreements between the Commission and the participating states are binding  in
accordance with their terms.
SECTION 2. The Legislative Assembly  of the State of Oregon hereby ratifies the PA
Licensure Compact set forth in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.  ORS 676.177 is amended to read:
676.177. (1) Notwithstanding any  other provision of ORS 676.165 to 676.180 and except as pro-
vided in subsection (5) of this section, a health professional regulatory board, upon a determination
by the board that it possesses otherwise confidential information that reasonably  relates to the
regulatory or enforcement function  of another public entity, may disclose that information to the
other public entity.
(2) Any public entity that receives information pursuant to subsection (1) of this  section shall
agree to take  all reasonable steps to maintain the confidentiality of the information, except that the
public entity may use or disclose  the information to the extent necessary to carry out the regulatory
or enforcement functions of the public entity.
(3) For purposes of this section, “public entity” means:
(a) A board or agency  of this state, or a board or agency of another state with regulatory or
enforcement functions similar to the  functions of a health professional regulatory board of this state;
(b) A district attorney;
(c) The Department of Justice;
(d) A state or  local public body of this state that licenses, franchises or provides emergency
medical services; or
(e) A law enforcement agency of this state, another state or the federal government.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (3) of this section[ ,]:
(a) The Oregon Board of Physical Therapy may disclose information described in  subsection (1)
of this section to the Physical Therapy Compact Commission [ established] described in ORS 688.240.
[17]
HB 3060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The Oregon Medical Board may disclose information described in subsection (1) of this
section to the PA Licensure Compact Commission described in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(5) A health professional  regulatory board may not disclose the information described in sub-
section (1) of this section to  another public entity if the information relates to the provision of or
referral for reproductive or gender-affirming health care services.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 677.060 is amended to read:
677.060. This chapter does not affect or prevent the following:
(1) The practice of medicine or podiatry in this state by any commissioned medical or  podiatric
officer  serving  in the Armed Forces of the United States or Public Health Service, or any medical
or podiatric officer on duty with the United States Department of Veterans Affairs,  while any such
medical or podiatric officer is engaged in the performance of the actual duties prescribed  by the
laws and regulations of the United States.
(2) The meeting in this state of any licensed  practitioner of medicine of any other state or
country with a licensed practitioner of medicine in this state, for consultation.
(3) Supervised clinical training by an acupuncture student who is enrolled  in a school approved
to offer credit for post-secondary  clinical education in Oregon or clinical practice of acupuncture
by a practitioner licensed to practice acupuncture in another state  or foreign country who is en-
rolled in clinical training approved by the Oregon Medical Board.
(4) The practice  of medicine or podiatry by an individual licensed to practice medicine or
podiatry  in another state or country who is providing health care services for an out-of-state athletic
team provided that:
(a) The individual is practicing pursuant to a  written agreement with the team under which the
individual provides health care services:
(A) Only for team  members, team staff members or family members traveling with the team; and
(B) For a specific athletic event taking place in this state;
(b) The individual practices medicine  or podiatry for no more than 10 consecutive days for each
athletic event or,  upon written order by the executive director of the Oregon Medical Board, an
additional amount of time not to exceed 21 consecutive days for each athletic event;
(c) The  individual does not provide health care services or perform consultations for a resident
of this state unless the resident is a  team member, team staff member or family member traveling
with the team; and
(d) The individual does not provide health care services at a health care facility,  as defined in
ORS 442.015, unless the health  care facility is located in an arena or stadium or on a college campus
or is a temporary facility established for an athletic event.
(5) The furnishing  of medical or surgical assistance in cases of emergency requiring immediate
attention.
(6) The domestic administration of family remedies.
(7) The  practice of dentistry, pharmacy, nursing, optometry, psychology, regulated social work,
chiropractic, naturopathic medicine or cosmetic therapy, by any person authorized by this state.
(8) The practice of the religion of persons who endeavor to  prevent or cure disease or suffering
by prayer  or other spiritual means in accordance with the tenets of any church. Nothing in this
chapter interferes in any manner with  the individual’s right to select the practitioner or mode of
treatment of an individual’s choice, or interferes with  the right of the person so employed to give
the treatment so chosen if public health laws and rules are complied with.
(9) The sale  of lenses, artificial eyes, limbs or surgical instruments or other apparatus or appli-
[18]
HB 3060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ances of a similar character.
(10) The sale, rent or use for hire of any device or appliance, the sale of which is not  prohibited
by the laws of Oregon or the United States.
(11) The practice of physiotherapy, electrotherapy or hydrotherapy  carried on by a duly licensed
practitioner of medicine, naturopathic medicine or chiropractic,  or by ancillary personnel certified
by the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, pursuant to  ORS 684.155 (1)(c)(A), to provide
physiotherapy, electrotherapy or hydrotherapy and working under  the direction of a chiropractic
physician.
(12) The practice or use of massage, Swedish movement, physical culture, or  other natural
methods requiring use of the hands.
(13) The use of the title “doctor,” “chiropractic physician,”  “naturopathic physician,” “doctor
of optometry,” “optometric physician” or “podiatric physician” in  accordance with ORS 676.110 and
676.120.
(14) The provision of medical  services, as defined in section 1 of this 2025 Act, by a person
authorized by compact privilege, as defined in section 1 of this 2025 Act, to provide medical
services under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 677.080 is amended to read:
677.080. A person may not:
(1) Knowingly make any false statement or representation on a matter, or willfully conceal  any
fact material to the  right of the person to practice medicine or to obtain a license under this
chapter.
(2) Sell or fraudulently obtain or furnish any medical and surgical diploma,  license, record or
registration, or aid or abet in the same.
(3) Impersonate anyone to whom a license has been granted by the Oregon Medical Board.
(4) Except as provided in ORS 676.347,  677.060 and 677.137  and section 1 of this 2025 Act ,
practice medicine in this state without a license required by this chapter.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 677.290 is amended to read:
677.290. (1) All moneys received by the Oregon Medical Board under this chapter and the PA
Licensure Compact  set forth in section 1 of this 2025 Act  shall be paid into the General Fund
in the State Treasury and placed to the credit of the Oregon  Medical Board Account which is es-
tablished. Such moneys are appropriated continuously to the board  and [ shall] may be used  only
for:
(a) The administration and enforcement of this chapter and ORS 676.850 and 676.860 ; and
(b) The purpose of meeting financial obligations of the State of Oregon as a result of this
state’s participation in the PA Licensure Compact set forth in section 1 of this 2025 Act .
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the board may maintain a revolving account
in a sum not to exceed $50,000 for the purpose of  receiving and paying pass-through moneys relating
to peer review pursuant to its duties under ORS 441.055 (4) and (5) and in administering  programs
pursuant to its duties under this chapter relating to  the education and rehabilitation of licensees in
the areas of chemical substance abuse, inappropriate prescribing  and medical competence. The cre-
ation of and disbursement of moneys from  the revolving account shall not require an allotment or
allocation of moneys pursuant to ORS 291.234 to 291.260. All moneys in the account are continuously
appropriated to the board  for purposes set forth in this subsection.
(3) Each year $10 shall be paid to the Oregon Health and Science University  for each in-state
physician licensed under this chapter, which amount is continuously appropriated to the  Oregon
[19]
HB 3060
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
Health and Science University to be used in maintaining a circulating library of medical and surgi-
cal books and publications for the use of practitioners of medicine in  this state, and when not so in
use to be kept at the library  of the School of Medicine and accessible to its students. The balance
of the money received by the  board is appropriated continuously and shall be used only for the ad-
ministration and enforcement of this chapter, but any part of the  balance may, upon the order of the
board, be paid into the circulating library fund.
SECTION 7.
(1) The amendments to ORS 676.177 by  section 3 of this 2025 Act apply to
information disclosed on or after the operative date specified in section 8 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS  677.060 and 677.080 by sections 4 and 5 of this 2025 Act apply
to individuals authorized to provide  medical services by compact privilege on or after the
operative date specified in section 8 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The amendments to ORS 677.290 by section 6 of this 2025 Act apply to moneys received
by the  Oregon Medical Board on or after the operative date specified in section 8 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 8. (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this  2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 676.177,
677.060, 677.080 and 677.290 by sections 3 to 6 of this 2025  Act become operative on January
1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Medical Board may take any action before the  operative date specified in
subsection (1) of this section that  is necessary to enable the board to exercise, on and after
the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the  board by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to
ORS 676.177, 677.060, 677.080 and 677.290 by sections 3 to 6 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 9. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[20]