Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 343.534 is amended to read:
343.534. (1) The funds specially appropriated to early childhood special education  and early
intervention services shall be contracted to providers that have been approved  by the Superinten-
dent of Public Instruction.
(2) State funds shall be allocated as monthly installments and  on an approved  program basis,
the amount of which shall be established pursuant to rules of the State Board of Education.
(3) The provider shall account for the grant funds  as expended on a form acceptable to the su-
perintendent pursuant to rules of the state board.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4537