Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) For the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023, at the request of the Depart-
ment of Education, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $10 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated  by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred  to the
department for distribution as grants  to 20 school districts or education service districts to
increase access to school-based resources for  mental, behavioral and physical health of
youth.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will create  jobs,
further economic development, finance public  education or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding that
improving access  to school-based health resources will improve educational outcomes and
create jobs.
SECTION 2.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3608