Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Law Enforcement Interdiction  against Financial
Scams on the Elderly is established, consisting of 20 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint:
(A) One member who is a member of the  Senate and a member of the majority party;
and
(B) One member who is a member of the Senate and a member of the minority party.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint:
(A) One member who is a member of the House of Representatives and  a member of the
majority party; and
(B) One member who is a member of the House of Representatives and a  member of the
minority party.
(c)(A) The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall
jointly appoint seven members with expertise in one or more of the following areas:
(i) Computer science;
(ii) Cybercrime;
(iii) Elder abuse;
(iv) Financial crimes;
(v) Data privacy;
(vi) Law enforcement; and
(vii) Criminal law.
(B) The members appointed under this paragraph shall include:
(i) One member who represents an urban county sheriff’s office.
(ii) One member who represents a rural county sheriff’s office.
(iii) Two members who represent elderly interest groups.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1170
HB 2330
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(iv) One member who has expertise in ethics and technology.
(v) One member who represents the  Oregon District Attorneys Association and is an
expert in elder abuse or cybercrime prosecution.
(vi) One member who represents the Oregon Criminal Defense Lawyers Association  and
is an expert in elder abuse or cybercrime defense.
(d) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall appoint  one member who represents the
Judicial Department.
(e) The Governor shall appoint:
(A) The State Chief Information Officer or the officer’s designee.
(B) Two members with expertise in cybercrime investigation and interdiction.
(C) Two members with expertise in elder abuse investigations and interdiction.
(D) One member who represents the  banking community and has experience with elder
abuse investigations.
(E) The Attorney General or Attorney General’s designee.
(F) The Superintendent of State Police or the superintendent’s designee.
(2) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed  to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(3)(a) The task force shall develop a list of  standard terms and definitions for use in
legislation relating to  cybercrimes, elder abuse fraud and the prevention, investigation and
prosecution of cybercrimes and elder abuse fraud. The task force shall base its list of  terms
and definitions on the terms and  definitions used by the federal government and relevant
enforcement techniques.  The list of terms and definitions developed under this paragraph
must align as closely as possible with terms and definitions used by the  federal government.
(b) The task force shall  recommend legislation to enable law enforcement agencies in this
state to effectively interdict in fraudulent  schemes that target the elderly and are committed
through telephone or online solicitations, including, but not limited to:
(A) Imposter schemes or enterprises, including threatening telephone  calls from individ-
uals impersonating the Internal Revenue Service or other government agencies and  tele-
phone calls of an individual representing the individual as a family member in peril;
(B) Fake technical support calls;
(C) Fake charity appeals;
(D) Lottery schemes;
(E) Bank fraud calls;
(F) Insurance, health care and debt schemes; and
(G) Use of artificial intelligence in promoting fraudulent schemes.
(c) In carrying out its duties under this  subsection, the task force shall solicit input from
a broad range of stakeholders, including individuals from communities impacted  by elder
abuse through fraudulent schemes, law enforcement agencies and others  who may be im-
pacted by policies developed by the task force.
(4) The task force may:
(a) Make recommendations for legislation;
(b) Make recommendations for administrative rules interpreting existing legislation;
(c) Create and distribute public guidance, warnings and education to reduce harm;
(d) Create resource guides to law enforcement and agencies  charged with protecting the
elderly;
[2]
HB 2330
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
(e) Make recommendations for improvements to law enforcement  techniques designed to
apprehend offenders; and
(f) Make recommendations  for interstate compacts and federal-state enforcement agree-
ments designed to enhance efforts to apprehend offenders.
(5) A  majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority  of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
shall include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the  Legislative
Assembly related to information management and technology no  later than September 15,
2026.
(12) The Legislative Policy  and Research Director and Legislative Fiscal Officer may
employ persons necessary for the performance of the functions  of the task force. The Leg-
islative Policy and Research Director  and the Legislative Fiscal Officer shall fix the duties
and amounts of compensation of the employees. The task force shall use the services of
continuing legislative staff, without employing additional  persons, to the greatest extent
practicable.
(13) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(14) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]