Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall study  options for
implementing a method by which the  department may review wages earned over the course
of a defined period of  time to detect paycheck errors. The department shall submit a report
in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations  for legislation,
to the interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to business and labor no later
than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2521