Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Transportation shall conduct a study of the creation of
a road usage charge, administered by a private sector partner, to ensure  that electric and
hybrid motor  vehicles pay their equitable share for the wear they cause to the highways in
Oregon. The  department shall submit a report of its findings to the interim committees of
the Legislative Assembly related to  transportation in the manner provided under ORS 192.245
no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2501