Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Legislative Policy and Research Office shall study, as a supplement
to and in conjunction with  the Wildlife Corridor Action Plan described in ORS 496.272, issues
related to funding wildlife corridor road crossings  and on or before September 15, 2022,
present the results of the study in a report to an appropriate committee or  interim com-
mittee of the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245.
(2) The study described in subsection (1) of this section must, at a minimum, examine:
(a) The potential logistics and benefits of  imposing a fee or surcharge on motor vehicle
liability insurance policies to fund construction of wildlife corridor road crossings;
(b) An  estimate of the numbers and types of wildlife corridor road crossings that would
be necessary to significantly reduce collisions between motor vehicles and wildlife;
(c) An estimate of the moneys that a fee or surcharge of  differing amounts could yield
for a wildlife corridor road crossing construction program and the number of wildlife corri-
dor road crossing construction projects that the program could potentially  fund each year
with different fees or surcharges; and
(d) An  estimate of the reductions in property damage, health care costs, insurance pre-
miums and other impacts that constructing an adequate number of wildlife corridor road
crossings in appropriate locations could produce, along with an analysis of  the benefits
compared with the impact of the costs to motor vehicle liability insurance policy holders.
(3) The Department of Transportation, the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife and the
Department of Consumer and Business Services shall support and cooperate with the  office
in researching and preparing the report described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1651