Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 As used in sections 1 to 9 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Charge” means the amount billed to  a patient or to a third party payer that is re-
sponsible for the hospital expense of the patient for  a hospital service or supply provided to
the patient.
(2) “Hospital” has the meaning given that term in ORS 442.015, excluding a:
(a) Hospital operated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs;
(b) Special inpatient care facility, as defined by the Oregon Health Authority by rule;
(c) Pediatric specialty hospital that provides care to children at no charge;
(d) State hospital; and
(e) Hospital that receives more than 50 percent of its gross revenue from  associated
comprehensive group-practice prepayment health care service plans.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Hospital Rate Commission is established in the Oregon Health Au-
thority for the purpose of:
(a) Constraining the growth of the cost of hospitalization;
(b) Ensuring that hospitals have the financial ability  to provide efficient, high quality
services for residents in this state; and
(c) Increasing the equity and fairness of hospital financing  across all hospitals in this
state.
(2) The commission consists of seven members appointed by the Governor  who have di-
verse health care experience including, but not limited to, hospital  administrators and health
care consumers, payers and providers.
(3) The term of office of each member is four years, but  a member serves at the pleasure
of the Governor. Before the expiration of the term of a member, the Governor shall  appoint
a successor whose term begins  on January 1 next following the expiration of the term of the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1487
HB 2679
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
member. A member is eligible for reappointment. If there is a vacancy  for any cause, the
Governor shall make an appointment to become immediately effective  for the unexpired
term.
(4) The Governor shall designate the  chairperson, who shall serve at the pleasure of the
Governor.
(5) The Governor may at any time remove a member for any cause deemed sufficient by
the Governor. Before  the removal the Governor shall give the member notice of the
allegations, and an opportunity for a hearing within 10 days thereafter. The hearing shall  be
open to the public. If  the member is removed, the Governor shall file in the office of the
Secretary of State a complete statement of all  allegations made against the member and the
findings with a record of the proceedings. Such power of removal  is absolute, and there is
no right of review of the same in any court.
(6) A member of the commission is entitled  to compensation and expenses as provided in
ORS 292.495.
(7) A majority of the members of the commission constitutes a quorum  for the trans-
action of business, for the performance of any duty or for the exercise of any power of the
commission.
(8) The commission shall meet at least once every six months at a  place, day and time
determined by the commission. The commission may  also meet at other times and places
specified by the call of the chairperson or of a majority of the members of the commission.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Hospital Rate Commission shall be responsible for reviewing hospital
charges and recommending to the Oregon Health Authority whether to approve each  charge.
The authority shall consider the  commission’s recommendations and shall approve or disap-
prove all charges. A hospital may not bill a charge for a service if the charge has not been
approved by the authority, unless the charge is equal to or less than two times the Medicare
payment rate.
(2) The authority shall prescribe by rule the  form, content, manner and frequency of the
reporting of charges by hospitals.
(3) The authority may not approve  a hospital charge that is unreasonable as prescribed
by the authority. A charge is unreasonable if it is  based on inefficient or inappropriate use
of existing capacity, duplicated services  and failure to use less costly alternatives in meeting
the needs of patients. Any charge that is equal  to or less than two times the Medicare pay-
ment rate shall be considered reasonable.
(4) If the commission recommends  disapproval of a hospital charge, the hospital may
request a hearing. Except  as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the hearing shall be
conducted in accordance with ORS 183.413 to 183.470.
(5) A hearing conducted under subsection (4) of this section shall be open to the public.
At least  30 days before the date of the hearing, the authority shall provide notice of the
hearing to all  interested parties and to individuals who have requested to receive notice of
the hearing and shall post the notice to the authority’s website.
(6) Upon the request of the commission, the authority shall  compel the attendance of
witnesses before the commission or compel the production of records or  other documents
necessary for the commission to perform its duties under subsection (1) of this section.
(7) The authority shall implement a process to ensure equitable costs for all patients.
SECTION 4.
Any hospital that fails to comply with an order or subpoena issued by the
[2]
HB 2679
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Oregon Health Authority under section 3 of this 2017 Act or that bills a charge, other than
a charge that is equal to or less than two  times the Medicare payment rate, that has not
been approved by the authority under section 3 of this 2017 Act is subject to a civil penalty
imposed as provided in ORS 183.745.
SECTION 5. (1) Any person may file  a complaint with the Hospital Rate Commission to
assert that a charge billed to the person  is unreasonable under section 3 of this 2017 Act.
The commission shall investigate  any complaint and, if the commission finds that there is a
reasonable basis for the complaint, may institute a review of the charge  under section 3 of
this 2017 Act. Any review proceedings under this section  are subject to all laws governing
the disclosure of protected health information.
(2) The commission shall report the results of its review to  the Oregon Health Authority,
including a recommendation as to whether the commission finds the charge to be  unrea-
sonable. The authority shall act on the recommendation no later  than 45 days after the date
of the recommendation.
(3) If the authority finds that the charge is unreasonable the hospital:
(a) Shall reduce the charge to an amount that the authority finds to be reasonable; and
(b) Shall be liable for the reasonable attorney fees and costs of the complainant.
SECTION 6.
 (1) A member of the Hospital Rate Commission may not:
(a) Hold any  pecuniary interest in any business entity conducting operations with a hos-
pital if the hospital’s charges are subject to review by the commission; or
(b) Hold any pecuniary interest in, have any contract  of employment with or have any
substantial voluntary transactions with any hospital if the hospital’s charges are subject to
the commission’s review.
(2) The prohibitions of subsection (1)  of this section apply to the immediate family
members of each commissioner.
(3) If the Governor determines that any  commissioner or immediate family member of
a commissioner holds or has acquired a pecuniary interest described  in subsection (1) or (2)
of this  section, the Governor shall remove the commissioner in the manner provided in sec-
tion 2 of this 2017 Act.
(4) Subsection (3) of this section does not apply to a commissioner if the commissioner,
or the commissioner’s immediate family  member, holds or acquires any pecuniary interest
described in subsection  (1) or (2) of this section, advises the Governor of the interest and
causes divestiture of the interest within a time specified by the Governor.
(5) Each commissioner shall file with the Governor a statement  regarding holdings of the
commissioner, and  the holdings of the commissioner’s immediate family members, of any
pecuniary interest described in subsection (1) or (2) of this section. A commissioner shall  file
a supplementary statement as such a pecuniary interest is acquired or  divested. The state-
ment must be in a form prescribed by the Oregon Health Authority.
(6) The Governor shall dismiss a commissioner:
(a) Who fails to file the statement required by subsection (5) of this section  before the
11th day after the date of employment.
(b) Who fails to file the supplementary  statement required by subsection (5) of this sec-
tion before the 11th day after the acquisition of a pecuniary interest.
(c) Who fails  to cause divestiture of a pecuniary interest within the time specified by the
Governor pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.
[3]
HB 2679
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(7) A commissioner may appeal a dismissal under subsection (6) of  this section in ac-
cordance with contested case procedures in ORS chapter 183.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding the term of  office specified by section 2 of this 2017 Act,
of the members first appointed to the Hospital Rate Commission:
(1) Two shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2019.
(2) Two shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2020.
(3) Three shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2021.
SECTION 8.
 (1) The Hospital Rate Commission Fund is established in the  State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund,  consisting of all fees and fines collected by the
Hospital Rate Commission under sections 4 and 9  of this 2017 Act. Moneys in the Hospital
Rate Commission Fund are continuously appropriated to the Hospital Rate Commission for
carrying out the provisions of sections 1 to 9 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The Hospital Rate Commission shall keep a record of all moneys  deposited in the
Hospital Rate Commission Fund. The record  must indicate by separate cumulative accounts
the source from which the moneys are derived and  the individual activity or program against
which each withdrawal is charged.
SECTION 9.
(1) Subject to the provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this section, each
hospital shall pay a fee to the Hospital Rate Commission in each calendar year. The amount
of the fee shall equal  the amount that the commission finds and determines to be necessary,
together with the amount of all other fees paid or payable  to the commission by hospitals in
the current calendar year, to defray the costs of performing the  duties imposed by law upon
the commission under sections 1 to 9 of this 2017 Act.
(2) On or after March  1 of each year, the commission shall determine the percentage rate
of the fee required to be paid  to the commission by hospitals and shall notify each hospital.
A hospital shall pay to the commission the fee or portion of the  fee so computed upon the
date specified in the notice. The date of payment must be at least 15 days after the date of
mailing of the notice.
(3) The fee payable under subsection (1) of  this section by each hospital may not be less
than $10 or more than 0.25 percent of the hospital’s  gross revenue, as defined in ORS 442.015,
derived within this state in the preceding calendar year.
(4) The commission may use any  of its investigatory and enforcement powers provided
under section 3 of this  2017 Act for the purpose of administering and enforcing the provisions
of this section.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 413.011, as amended by section 6,  chapter 389, Oregon Laws 2015, is
amended to read:
413.011. (1) The duties of the Oregon Health Policy Board are to:
(a) Be the policy-making and  oversight body for the Oregon Health Authority established in ORS
413.032 and all of the authority’s departmental divisions.
(b) Develop and submit a plan to the Legislative Assembly by December 31,  2010, to provide and
fund access to affordable, quality health care for all Oregonians by 2015.
(c) Develop a program to provide health insurance premium assistance to all low  and moderate
income individuals who are legal residents of Oregon.
(d) Publish health outcome  and quality measure data collected by the Oregon Health Authority
at aggregate levels that do not disclose information otherwise protected by law. The  information
published must report, for  each coordinated care organization and each health benefit plan sold
[4]
HB 2679
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
through the health insurance  exchange or offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board or the
Public Employees’ Benefit Board:
(A) Quality measures;
(B) Costs;
(C) Health outcomes; and
(D) Other information that is necessary for members of the public to evaluate the value of health
services delivered by each coordinated care organization and by each health benefit plan.
(e) Establish evidence-based clinical standards and practice  guidelines that may be used by
providers.
(f) Approve and monitor community-centered health initiatives described in  ORS 413.032 (1)(h)
that are consistent  with public health goals, strategies, programs and performance standards
adopted by the Oregon Health Policy Board to improve the health of all Oregonians,  and shall reg-
ularly report to the Legislative Assembly on the accomplishments and needed changes to the  initi-
atives.
(g) Establish cost containment mechanisms to reduce health care costs.
(h) Ensure that Oregon’s health care workforce is sufficient  in numbers and training to meet the
demand that will be created by the expansion  in health coverage, health care system transforma-
tions, an increasingly diverse population and an aging workforce.
(i) Work with the Oregon  congressional delegation to advance the adoption of changes in federal
law or policy to promote Oregon’s comprehensive health reform plan.
(j) Establish a health benefit package in accordance with ORS  741.340 to be used as the baseline
for all health benefit plans offered through the health insurance exchange.
(k) Investigate and  report annually to the Legislative Assembly on the feasibility and advis-
ability of future changes to the health insurance market in Oregon,  including but not limited to the
following:
(A) A requirement for every resident to have health insurance coverage.
(B) A payroll tax as a means to encourage employers to continue providing  health insurance to
their employees.
(L) Meet cost-containment goals by structuring reimbursement  rates to reward comprehensive
management of diseases, quality outcomes and the efficient use of resources by  promoting cost-
effective procedures, services and programs including, without limitation, preventive  health, dental
and primary care services, web-based office  visits, telephone consultations and telemedicine consul-
tations.
(m) Oversee the expenditure of moneys from the Health Care Workforce Strategic  Fund to sup-
port grants to primary care providers and rural health practitioners, to increase the number of pri-
mary care educators and to support efforts to create and develop career ladder opportunities.
(n) Work  with the Public Health Benefit Purchasers Committee, administrators of the medical
assistance program and  the Department of Corrections to identify uniform contracting standards for
health benefit plans that achieve maximum quality and cost outcomes and  align the contracting
standards for all state programs to the greatest extent practicable.
(o) Work with the  Health Information Technology Oversight Council to foster health information
technology systems and practices that promote the  Oregon Integrated and Coordinated Health Care
Delivery System established by ORS 414.620 and  align health information technology systems and
practices across this state.
(p) Oversee the review of hospital charges by the Hospital Rate Commission under
[5]
HB 2679
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
sections 1 to 9 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The Oregon Health Policy Board is authorized to:
(a) Subject to the approval of the Governor, organize and  reorganize the authority as the board
considers necessary to properly conduct the work of the authority.
(b) Submit directly to the Legislative Counsel,  no later than October 1 of each even-numbered
year, requests for measures necessary to provide statutory authorization to carry out  any of the
board’s duties or to implement any of the board’s recommendations. The  measures may be filed prior
to the beginning of the legislative session in accordance with the  rules of the House of Represen-
tatives and the Senate.
(3) If the board or  the authority is unable to perform, in whole or in part, any of the duties
described  in ORS 413.006 to 413.042 and 741.340 without federal approval, the authority is authorized
to request,  in accordance with ORS 413.072, waivers or other approval necessary to perform those
duties. The authority shall implement any portions of  those duties not requiring legislative authority
or federal approval, to the extent practicable.
(4) The enumeration of duties, functions and powers in this section is not  intended to be exclu-
sive nor to limit the duties, functions and powers imposed on the board by ORS 413.006  to 413.042
and 741.340 and by other statutes.
(5) The board shall consult  with the Department of Consumer and Business Services in com-
pleting the tasks set forth in subsection (1)(j) and (k)(A) of this section.
SECTION 11.
Sections 3 to 5 of this 2017 Act become operative on July 1, 2019.
SECTION 12.  For hospital charges and fees that are  based upon a contract in effect on
the operative date of section 3 of this 2017 Act, sections 3  to 5 of this 2017 Act apply to the
renewal or extension of such contracts that occurs on or after the operative date of section
3 of this 2017 Act.
[6]