Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 94.779 is amended to read:
94.779. (1) A provision of a planned community’s governing document or landscaping or  archi-
tectural guidelines that imposes irrigation requirements on an owner or the association is void  and
unenforceable while any of the following is in effect:
(a) A declaration by the Governor that a severe, continuing drought exists or is  likely to occur
in a political subdivision within which the planned community is located;
(b) A finding by the Water Resources Commission that a  severe, continuing drought exists or is
likely to occur in a political subdivision within which the planned community is located;
(c) An ordinance adopted by the governing body  of a political subdivision within which the
planned community is located that requires conservation or curtailment of water use; or
(d) A rule adopted by the association under subsection  (2) of this section to reduce or eliminate
irrigation water use.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of a planned community’s governing documents or landscaping
or architectural guidelines imposing irrigation requirements on  an owner or the association, an as-
sociation may adopt rules that:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3020
SB 59
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
(a) Require the reduction or elimination of irrigation on any portion of the planned community.
(b) Permit or require the replacement of turf or other landscape vegetation with  xeriscape on
any portion of the planned community.
(c) Require prior review and approval by the association or its designee  of any plans by an
owner or the association to replace turf or other landscape vegetation with xeriscape.
(d) Require the use of best  practices and industry standards to reduce the landscaped areas and
minimize irrigation of existing  landscaped areas of common property where turf is necessary for the
function of the landscaped area.
(3) Except as provided in subsections (4)  and (5) of this section, if adopted on or after January
1, 2018, the following provisions  of a planned community’s governing document are void and
unenforceable:
(a) A provision that prohibits  or restricts the use of the owner’s unit or lot as the premises of
an exempt family child care provider participating in the subsidy program under ORS 329A.500; or
(b) If the unit does not  share a wall, floor or ceiling surface in common with another unit, a
provision that prohibits  or restricts the use of the owner’s unit or lot as a certified or registered
family child care home pursuant to ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(4) Subsection (3) of this section does  not prohibit a homeowners association from adopting or
enforcing a provision of the planned  community’s governing document that regulates parking, noise,
odors, nuisance, use of common property or activities that impact the cost  of insurance policies held
by the planned community, provided the provision:
(a) Is reasonable; and
(b) Does not have  the effect of prohibiting or restricting the use of a unit or lot as the premises
of an exempt family child  care provider participating in the subsidy program under ORS 329A.500
or as a certified or registered family child care home pursuant to ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(5)(a) Subsection (3) of this section does not apply to planned communities that  provide housing
for older persons.
(b) As used in this subsection, “housing for older persons” has the meaning given  that term in
ORS 659A.421.
(6) A provision in a planned community’s governing document that restricts or prohibits the in-
stallation  or  use of a portable cooling device, as defined in ORS 90.335 (1), is void and unenforceable,
unless:
(a) The installation or use of the device would:
(A) Violate building codes or state or federal law; or
(B) Violate the device manufacture’s written safety guidelines for the device; or
(b) The restrictions are  only to require that the device be removed from October 1 through April
30.
(7) A provision in a planned community’s governing document that prohibits  or restricts
the use of a lot for gardening, hen-keeping  or beekeeping is void and unenforceable, except
for restrictions that require the food production be performed in a  competent and proficient
manner or consistent with applicable laws and ordinances.
[2]