Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of State Police, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended to increase the capability  of
forensic laboratories established by the department under ORS 181A.150 to conduct  analyses
of blood for controlled substances in addition to alcohol content.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1299