Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In order to support essential agricultural research, for every private
donation of $10,000 or more that is made directly  to the Oregon State University Foundation
for the express purpose of supporting agricultural research  with an emphasis on cereal
grains, the State of Oregon shall, to the extent moneys are available,  separately contribute
50 percent  of the amount of the private donation to the foundation. The total amount of
moneys contributed by the State of Oregon under this section may not exceed $3,000,000  per
biennium.
(2) An individual or entity may make a direct donation of $10,000 or more  to the Oregon
State University Foundation for the purposes of this  section through a series of donations.
The State of Oregon may not make a 50 percent matching contribution under subsection  (1)
of this section until the total amount of moneys donated by a specific individual  or entity to
the foundation is $10,000 or more.
(3)(a) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall enter  into an agreement with
the Oregon State University Foundation to establish:
(A) The method and timing by which the foundation shall inform the  commission of the
total number and amount of  donations that qualify for a state match under this section; and
(B) Methods for the commission to ensure  the accuracy of information reported under
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(b) The commission may adopt rules to implement this subsection.
SECTION 2.
No later than October 1 of each  year, the Oregon State University Founda-
tion shall submit a report, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245,  to the State Treasurer
and the Oregon Wheat Commission. The report required under this  section shall detail the
use of moneys received by the foundation from donations and state moneys described in
section 1 of this 2023 Act during the preceding fiscal year and must include a financial
summary and review of the results of expenditures made by the  foundation using moneys
described in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3302
SB 958
1
2
3
4
5
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,000,000, for allocation to  the Oregon State
University Foundation for the purpose of making contributions in the manner  described in
section 1 of this 2023 Act.
[2]