Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 284.781 is amended to read:
284.781. The Eastern  Oregon Border Economic Development Board, in collaboration with and
with the assistance of the Oregon Business Development Department, has the following  duties,
functions and powers:
(1) To identify policies and strategies that will:
(a) Promote workforce  development, including development of residential housing necessary to
attract and keep employees in the region, and economic development;
(b) Facilitate the development , [ or] and prevent the decline , of regionally significant industrial
sites;
(c) Create [ or] and maintain jobs in the region; and
(d) Improve access to career and technical  education, workforce training programs and higher
education to enhance the availability of a qualified workforce for employers in the region.
(2) To make recommendations  to the Legislative Assembly for policies and strategies intended
to improve the availability of career and  technical education, workforce training programs and
higher education for the purpose of improving the availability  of a qualified workforce for employers
in the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Region.
(3) To identify specific laws that place specific workforce development [ or] and economic  de-
velopment efforts in the  Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Region, including the de-
velopment of residential housing necessary to attract and keep employees in the region, at  a
competitive disadvantage with respect  to  the same type of efforts in the areas across the Oregon
border as described in ORS 284.786.
(4) To establish programs through which grants and loans may be made  under ORS
284.791.
[(4)] (5) Subject to the availability  of funds in the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Develop-
ment Board Fund established under ORS  284.801, to make grants [ or] and loans [ to qualified ap-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 280
HB 4028
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
plicants pursuant to ORS 284.791, not to exceed a total of 10 active  grants at any one time ] under
ORS 284.791 through programs established pursuant to subsection (4) of this section .
[(5)] (6) To establish a  means to evaluate grants [ or] and loans made [ by the board and the de-
partment] under ORS 284.791 , including, but not limited to, determining the number  of businesses
or regionally significant industrial sites assisted,  the types and amount of resources leveraged, re-
turn on investment criteria, performance and outcome measures and methods to evaluate the  impact
on jobs and wages in any area of the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Region  [to] in
which grant or loan moneys [ were applied or in which they ] were utilized.
[(6)] (7)  To facilitate collaboration among employers, local governments, state  agencies and
stakeholders for the purpose of enhancing and expanding workforce development and economic de-
velopment in the region.
[(7)] (8) To consult with affected school districts, community colleges  and universities and the
Employment Department  in identifying policies and strategies that will enhance and promote
workforce  development  to improve the availability of a qualified workforce for employers in the
Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Region.
[(8)] (9) To report annually on or before December 31 of each year to standing and interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to economic development regarding [ implementation
and] the administration of the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development  Board and [ grants or
loans made  by the board and the Oregon Business Development Department pursuant to ] the imple-
mentation and administration of grant and loan programs under  ORS 284.791.  The report may
include recommendations [ regarding proposed ] for legislation and  strategies to improve workforce
development and economic development in the region.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 284.791 is amended to read:
284.791. (1)(a) Subject to the availability of funds in the Eastern Oregon Border  Economic De-
velopment Board Fund established under ORS 284.801, the Eastern Oregon Border Economic De-
velopment Board may award grants [ or] and loans to eligible applicants to enhance and expand
workforce development [ or] and economic development in the Eastern Oregon Border  Economic
Development Region. [ Repayment of loans made under this section is subject to subsection (8) of this
section. The board shall make the  decision to approve and award grants or loans under this section,
but the Oregon Business Development Department shall be responsible for the actual payment of the
grants or loans from the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Board Fund. ]
(b) Grants and loans  shall be made through programs established by the board pursuant
to ORS 284.781 (4).
(c) No more than 10 grant and loan programs may be active  at any time. A program is
active as long as any loan made through the program remains  outstanding or any work or
project funded or financed by a grant made through the program has not  been completed in
accordance with the grant agreement.
(2) Eligible applicants for grants and loans  include, but are not limited to:
(a) Local governments;
(b) Institutions of higher education as defined in ORS 348.582;
(c) Private or  nonprofit businesses whose principal place of business, or the majority of whose
workforce, is located in the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Development Region;
(d) Small business development centers established under ORS 285B.165 to 285B.171;
(e) Economic development organizations;
(f) School districts; and
[2]
HB 4028
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(g) Other entities as defined by the board by rule.
(3)(a) An eligible applicant may apply for a grant or loan by  submitting an application and
paying the required application fee, if any .[, in accordance with rules adopted by the board  in con-
sultation with the department. The rules must, at a minimum: ]
[(a)] (b) [ Establish criteria for the award of grants or loans under this section that provide that
the] An applicant must demonstrate that the grant or loan moneys will be used for:
(A) Economic development that  will lead to private investment, job creation or retention and the
establishment or expansion of viable businesses in the region;
(B) Expansion of [ a] transportation infrastructure  [ sufficient] to facilitate moving traded sector
goods or services in the region to market;
(C) Enhancement and expansion of workforce development in the region, including development
of residential housing necessary to attract and keep employees in the region, that is responsive to
the needs of the region’s businesses and industries;
(D) Certification of regionally significant industrial sites within the region;
(E) Extension of private utilities, including, but not limited to, gas and electrical  connections,
to regionally significant industrial sites within the region;
(F) A due diligence assessment pursuant to the  Oregon Industrial Site Readiness Assessment
Program under ORS 285B.635 to 285B.640 or other assessments or evaluations that prepare a site
for development; or
(G) Provision  of support services and technical assistance to entrepreneurs and business owners
in the region, including,  but not limited to, small business development centers established under
ORS 285B.165 to 285B.171 .[; and ]
[(b) Establish  criteria for repayment of loans, collection of moneys owed and repayment of grant
proceeds in the event of default. ]
[(4)] (c) Applications for loans must contain:
[(a)] (A) A plan for repayment [ by the  applicant to the Eastern Oregon Border Economic Devel-
opment Board Fund ] of moneys borrowed from the fund [ plus] with interest; and
[(b)] (B) If required by the Oregon Business Development Department and the board, evidence
of debt assurance of, or security for, repayment by the applicant.
(d) The board, in consultation with  the department, shall adopt rules that, at a minimum,
establish criteria for awarding grants and making loans under this section, in addition  to the
criteria set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
[(5)] (4) Loans made under this section[ :]
[(a)] may not  be for a [ loan] term that exceeds the [ usable] useful life of the work or project for
which the loan funds  will be used or  a specified number of years from completion, whichever  is
less.[; and]
[(b) Are subject to subsection (8) of this section regarding repayment of loans made by  the depart-
ment.]
[(6)(a)] (5)(a) Grants  [or] and loans made under this section are payable solely from the Eastern
Oregon Border Economic Development Board  Fund [ established under ORS 284.801 ]. Amounts paid
as grants [ or] and loans  shall not constitute a debt of the state or a lending of the credit of the state
within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation.
(b) [ Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, ] Nothing in this section is intended to im-
pair the exercise of rights granted against the security for a loan, if any.
[(7)] (6) The department shall assist the board in evaluating  applications for grants [ or] and
[3]
HB 4028
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
loans under this section by:
(a) Evaluating timelines for completion of work and projects for which grant [ or] and loan
moneys requested in the application will be used;
(b) Investigating whether necessary permits for development, if needed, have  been or can be
secured in a timely manner;
(c) Recommending how to maximize use of grant or loan  moneys to ensure successful completion
of the work or project for which the grant or loan moneys will be used;
(d) Assessing the ability of the applicant to repay the grant or loan;
(e) Documenting the strengths, weaknesses and risks of the applicant and the work or  project;
and
(f) Making recommendations regarding terms and conditions for approval of a grant or loan.
[(8)] (7)(a) The department shall adopt rules governing the repayment of loans made  under this
section , the repayment of grant proceeds in the event of default by the grantee under the
grant agreement  and the collection of  moneys owed to the Eastern Oregon Border Economic De-
velopment Board Fund.
(b) The department may seek appropriate legal remedies to secure repayment of  any loans made
under this section [ that are due to the fund ].
[(9)] (8) The department may assess and charge fees, including, but not limited to,  application
fees, for loans [ or] and grants made under this section.
SECTION 3.
This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]