Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 458.581 is amended to read:
458.581. (1) The Oregon Volunteers Commission for Voluntary Action and Service shall:
(a) Contract with all CASA Volunteer Programs in this state to  recruit, train and supervise
court appointed special advocates.
(b) Disburse and expend moneys in the Court Appointed Special  Advocate Fund established un-
der ORS 458.584 for the purposes set forth in this section and ORS 419B.112.
(c) Oversee the provision of court appointed special advocate services throughout this state in
a uniform, consistent and cost-efficient manner by ensuring that CASA Volunteer Programs:
(A) Adopt policies, procedures, standards  and guidelines regarding the provision of court ap-
pointed special advocate services as directed by the commission; [ and]
(B) Develop and provide training and education for  court appointed special advocates and em-
ployees and other volunteers in CASA Volunteer Programs as directed by the commission ; and
(C) Maintain a volunteer staff of court appointed special advocates that:
(i) Is sufficient to meet  the requirement of ORS 419B.112 that courts shall appoint a
court appointed special advocate in every case under ORS chapter 419B; and
(ii) Meets the standards of the National  CASA Association, which provide that each
supervisor in a program  shall supervise no more than 30 court appointed special advocates
with responsibility for no more than 45 individual cases at any one time .
(d) Identify statewide outcome or performance measures for CASA Volunteer Programs.
(e) Collect, evaluate and summarize data regarding CASA Volunteer  Programs and court ap-
pointed special advocate services in this state.
(f) Adopt rules for carrying out the commission’s  responsibilities, duties and functions under this
section and ORS 419B.112.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2039
HB 2171
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
(2) The commission may:
(a) Delegate to public agencies or private nonprofit organizations the responsibility to, or  con-
tract with public agencies or private nonprofit organizations to:
(A) Create, supervise and operate CASA Volunteer Programs throughout this state; and
(B) Develop and provide training for court appointed special advocates and  employees and vol-
unteers of CASA Volunteer Programs.
(b) Consult  with public agencies or private nonprofit organizations for the purpose of developing:
(A) An allocation formula for the disbursement of moneys to CASA Volunteer  Programs in this
state; and
(B) Policies, procedures, standards and guidelines regarding the provision of court appointed
special advocate services in this state.
(c) Apply for and receive funds from state, federal and private sources  for CASA Volunteer
Programs and the provision of court appointed special advocate services in this state.
(3) Public agencies or  private nonprofit organizations to whom the commission has delegated
responsibilities, or with whom the commission has contracted,  under this section shall provide
biannual reports to the commission regarding:
(a) The fulfillment of responsibilities that have been delegated or contracted for; and
(b) When applicable to responsibilities delegated or contracted for, the  achievement of the ob-
jectives in subsection (1)(c) to (f) of this section.
(4) The commission shall report annually to committees or interim committees of the  Legislative
Assembly related to  the provision of court appointed special advocate services regarding the dis-
bursement of moneys  in the Court Appointed Special Advocate Fund established under ORS 458.584,
the extent to which statewide outcome or performance measures identified under subsection (1)(d)
of this section are being met and  the current status of court appointed special advocate services
provided in this state.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Volunteers Commission for Voluntary Action and Service,  for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $  for the
CASA Volunteer Programs in this state for the purpose of complying with the  requirements
of ORS 419B.112 and meeting National CASA Association supervisory  levels as set forth in
ORS 458.581 (1)(c)(C).
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
[2]