Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 471.753 is amended to read:
471.753. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Nonurban county” has the meaning given that term in ORS 653.026.
(b) “Portland metropolitan area county” means a  county within the urban growth boundary of
a metropolitan service district organized under ORS chapter 268.
(c) “Standard county” means  a county that is not a Portland metropolitan area county or a
nonurban county.
(2) The  Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission shall compensate an agent appointed under
ORS 471.750 in an amount equal to the sum of  the following according to the store class, as deter-
mined under subsection (3) of this section, operated by the agent:
(a) The monthly base compensation established in subsection (4) of this section;
(b) The wage escalator amount described in subsection (5) of this section;
(c) The retail escalator amount described in subsection (6) of this section; and
(d) The sales commission according to the rates provided in subsection (7) of this section.
(3) A store shall be classed based on the store’s amount of  annual sales of alcoholic beverages
rounded to the nearest whole dollar[ , adjusted annually by a percentage equal to  any percentage in-
crease in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers,  West Region (All Items), as published
by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor, ] as follows:
(a) Class 1: up to $120,000;
(b) Class 2: at least $120,001 and not more than $450,000;
(c) Class 3: at least $450,001 and not more than $750,000;
(d) Class 4: at least $750,001 and not more than $1,650,000;
(e) Class 5: at least $1,650,001 and not more than $2,500,000;
(f) Class 6: at least $2,500,001 and not more than $3,700,000;
(g) Class 7: at least $3,700,001 and not more than $5,500,000;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1082
HB 2120
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
(h) Class 8: at least $5,500,001 and not more than $8,300,000;
(i) Class 9: at least $8,300,001 and not more than $12,500,000; and
(j) Class 10: at least $12,500,001 and not more than $18,750,000.
(4) The monthly base compensation for an agent,  adjusted annually by a percentage equal to any
percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for  All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items),
as published by the Bureau  of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor, is deter-
mined as follows according to the class of store operated by the agent:
(a) Class 1 store: 14.5 percent of the first $10,000 in monthly sales of alcoholic beverages;
(b) Class 2 store: $1,660;
(c) Class 3 store: $1,920;
(d) Class 4 store: $2,440;
(e) Class 5 store: $2,700;
(f) Class 6 store: $3,100;
(g) Class 7 store: $3,600;
(h) Class 8 store: $4,150;
(i) Class 9 store: $4,800; and
(j) Class 10 store: $5,500.
(5) The wage escalator amount is as follows:
(a) For an agent in a standard county, eight percent of the monthly base compensation; or
(b) For an agent in a Portland metropolitan  area county, 18 percent of the monthly base com-
pensation.
(6) The monthly retail escalator amount is as follows:
(a) For a store located in a standard county, 50 percent of the monthly base compensation; or
(b) For a store located in a Portland  metropolitan area county, 75 percent of the monthly base
compensation.
(7) The sales commission rates are as follows:
(a) For sales of alcoholic beverages to licensees, 6.54 percent of the amount of sales.
(b) For sales of alcoholic beverages to persons other than licensees, 8.38 percent of the amount
of sales.
SECTION 2.
The amendments  to ORS 471.753 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to com-
pensation paid to an agent on or after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]