Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Subject to the appropriation of sufficient moneys by the  Legislative As-
sembly, by July 1, 2028, Portland State  University shall enhance the state’s capacity to edu-
cate public mental health and addiction treatment providers in a self-sustaining manner by:
(a) Materially  increasing the number of individuals who graduate from the university
each year with a bachelor’s degree in social work;
(b) Materially increasing the number of individuals who graduate from the  university
each year with a master’s degree in social work; and
(c) Materially increasing the number of individuals who graduate from the university
each year who are prepared to  provide mental health and addiction treatment and become
certified alcohol and drug counselors.
(2) Portland State University shall  accomplish the increase of graduates described in
subsection (1) of this section by:
(a) Increasing the  number of student scholarships in order to reduce or eliminate student
debt for students who graduate with social work degrees;
(b) Increasing the number of faculty, university  staff and field staff supporting students
who are seeking social work degrees;
(c) Awarding stipends to  students who are seeking social work degrees and who are
working with community organizations; and
(d) Any other method determined by Portland  State University to be necessary to en-
hance the state’s capacity to educate public mental health and addiction  treatment providers
in the manner described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on July 2, 2029.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning  July 1,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,783,000, to be allocated  to Portland State
University for the purposes set forth in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 893
HB 2485
1
2
3
4
SECTION 4.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2023.
[2]