Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) Notwithstanding any other law governing dispositions of firearms that
an agency, board, commission or other instrumentality of the  state seizes or obtains by
forfeiture, an agency, board, commission or other instrumentality of  the state that lawfully
seizes, or obtains by forfeiture, a firearm under circumstances  in which the original owner
of the firearm may not lawfully demand the return of the firearm  shall transfer the firearm
as soon as is practicable to the Department of  State Lands for disposition in accordance with
ORS 98.382. For  the purpose of the disposition, a firearm lawfully seized as described in this
subsection is unclaimed property.
(2) Notwithstanding the requirements in ORS 98.386 for disposing  of the proceeds of a
sale of unclaimed property  under ORS 98.382, the department shall deposit the proceeds of
a sale of a firearm seized as described in subsection (1) of this section into  the State Treas-
ury to the  credit of the Emergency Housing Account created under ORS 458.620. The Housing
and Community Services  Department shall disburse moneys deposited into the Emergency
Housing Account in accordance with this section for the purposes set forth in ORS 458.650.
SECTION 2.  ORS 131.597 is amended to read:
131.597. (1) After the seizing agency distributes property under  ORS 131.588, and when the
seizing agency is the state or  when the state is the recipient of property forfeited under ORS 131.550
to 131.600, the seizing agency shall dispose of and distribute property as follows:
(a) The seizing agency shall pay costs first from the property or its proceeds. As  used in this
subsection, “costs” includes the expenses of publication, service of notices,  towing, storage and
servicing or maintaining the seized property under ORS 131.564.
(b) After costs have been paid, the seizing agency shall distribute to the victim  any amount the
seizing agency was ordered to distribute under ORS 131.588 (4).
(c) Of  the property remaining after costs have been paid under paragraph (a) of this subsection
and distributions have been made under paragraph (b) of this subsection, the seizing agency  shall
distribute:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1847
SB 342
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Three percent to the Asset Forfeiture Oversight Account established in ORS 131A.460;
(B) Seven percent  to the Illegal Drug Cleanup Fund established in ORS 475.495 for the purposes
specified in ORS 475.495 (5) and (6);
(C) Ten percent to the state General Fund;
(D) Subject  to subsection (5) of this section, 40 percent to the Department of State Police or the
Department of Justice for official law enforcement use; and
(E) Forty percent to the Drug Prevention and Education Fund established in ORS 430.422.
(2)(a) Any amount paid to or retained by the Department of Justice under subsection (1) of  this
section must be deposited in the Criminal Justice Revolving Account in the State Treasury.
(b) Any amount paid to or retained by the Department of State Police  under subsection (1) of
this section must be deposited in the State Police Account.
(3) The state may:
(a) With written authorization from the district attorney for the  jurisdiction in which the prop-
erty was seized, destroy any [ firearms or ] controlled substances.
(b) Sell the forfeited property by public  or other commercially reasonable sale and pay from the
proceeds the expenses of keeping and selling the property.
(c) Retain any vehicles[ , firearms ] or other equipment usable for law  enforcement purposes, for
official law enforcement use directly by the state.
(d) Lend or transfer  any vehicles[ , firearms ] or other equipment usable for law enforcement
purposes to  any federal, state or local law enforcement agency or district attorney for official law
enforcement use directly by the transferee entity.
(4) When the state has entered into an intergovernmental agreement with one or  more political
subdivisions  under  ORS 131.591, or when a law enforcement agency of this state has entered into
an agreement with another law enforcement agency of this  state, an equitable portion of the for-
feited property distributed under subsection (1)(c)(D) of  this section must be distributed to each
agency participating in the seizure or criminal forfeiture as provided by the agreement.
(5) The property distributed under subsection (1)(c)(D) of this section, including any proceeds
received  by  the state under an intergovernmental agreement or under an agreement between state
law enforcement agencies, must be divided as follows:
(a) When no  law enforcement agency other than the Department of Justice participated in the
seizure or forfeiture, or  when the Department of Justice has entered into an agreement under sub-
section (4) of this section, the property must be deposited in the Criminal Justice Revolving Account.
(b) When  no law enforcement agency other than the Department of State Police participated in
the seizure or forfeiture, or when the Department of State Police has entered into an agreement
under subsection (4) of this section, the property must be deposited in the State Police Account.
(6) The seizing agency may sell as much  property as may be needed to make the distributions
required by subsection (1) of  this section. The seizing agency shall make distributions to the Asset
Forfeiture Oversight Account and the Illegal Drug Cleanup Fund that are required by  subsection (1)
of this section  once every three months. The distributions are due within 20 days of the end of each
quarter. Interest does not accrue on amounts that are paid within the  period specified by this sub-
section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 131A.350 is amended to read:
131A.350. Except as otherwise provided by intergovernmental agreement , [and] this chapter  and
section 1 of this 2019 Act , a forfeiting agency may:
(1) Sell, lease, lend or transfer forfeited property to any federal, state or  local law enforcement
[2]
SB 342
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
agency or district attorney.
(2) Sell forfeited property by public or other commercially reasonable  sale and pay from the
proceeds the expenses of keeping and selling the property.
(3) Retain forfeited property.
(4) With written authorization from the  district attorney for the county in which the property
was seized, destroy any forfeited [ firearms or ] controlled substances.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 166.279 is amended to read:
166.279. (1) Except  as provided in subsection (4) of this section, ORS 131.550 to 131.600 do not
apply to the forfeiture of a firearm or other deadly weapon that was possessed,  used or available for
use to facilitate a criminal offense.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, at the time of sentencing for any criminal
offense in which a firearm or other  deadly weapon was possessed, used or available for use to fa-
cilitate the offense, the court shall declare the weapon  to be contraband and order that the weapon
be forfeited.
(3) If a firearm or other  deadly weapon that was possessed, used or available for use to facilitate
a criminal offense was stolen from its lawful owner and was recovered from a person other than  the
lawful owner, the court may not order  that the weapon be forfeited but shall order that the weapon
be restored to the lawful owner as soon as the weapon is no longer  needed for evidentiary purposes.
(4) The  court shall release a firearm or other deadly weapon forfeited under subsection (2) of
this section to the law enforcement agency that seized the weapon. The law enforcement agency
[may destroy or sell the weapon, use the weapon as a service weapon  or use the weapon for training,
identification or demonstration purposes. When a weapon is sold pursuant to this subsection,  the law
enforcement agency shall pay the proceeds from  the sale, less the costs of the sale, as provided in ORS
131.594 and 131.597] shall transfer the weapon to the Department of State  Lands as provided
in section 1 of this 2019 Act .
(5) As used in this section, “deadly weapon” has the meaning given that term in ORS 161.015.
SECTION 5.
Section 1 of this 2019 Act applies to firearms that  an agency, board, com-
mission or other instrumentality of the state lawfully seizes  on or after the effective date
of this 2019 Act.
[3]