Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 431A.175 is amended to read:
431A.175. (1) As used in this section and ORS 431A.183:
(a)(A) “Inhalant delivery system” means:
(i) A device that can be used  to deliver [ nicotine or ] cannabinoids  or nicotine derived from any
source in the form of a vapor or aerosol to a person inhaling from the device; or
(ii) A component of a device described in this subparagraph  or a substance in any form sold for
the purpose of being vaporized or aerosolized by a device described in  this subparagraph, whether
or not  the component or substance is sold separately [ or is not sold separately ].
(B) “Inhalant delivery system” does not include:
(i) Any product that has been approved by the United States Food  and Drug Administration for
sale as a  tobacco cessation product or for any other therapeutic purpose, if the product is marketed
and sold solely for the approved purpose; and
(ii) Tobacco products.
(b) “Tobacco products” means:
(A) Any product that contains, is made from or is derived from  tobacco or nicotine de-
rived from any source that is  intended or likely to be used for human consumption by any
means, including but not limited to  [ Bidis] bidis, cigars, cheroots, stogies, periques, granulated,
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 446
HB 2528
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
plug cut, crimp cut, ready rubbed and other smoking tobacco, snuff,  snuff flour, cavendish, plug and
twist tobacco, fine-cut and other chewing tobaccos, shorts, refuse scraps,  clippings, cuttings and
sweepings of tobacco and other forms of tobacco[ ,] and oral nicotine pouches, nicotine  lozenges
and other  products containing nicotine derived from any source  [ prepared in a manner that
makes the tobacco suitable for chewing or  smoking in a pipe or otherwise, or for both chewing and
smoking];
(B) Cigarettes as defined in ORS 323.010 (1); or
(C) A device that:
(i) Can be used to deliver tobacco products to a person using the device; and
(ii) Has not been approved by the United States Food and Drug  Administration for sale as a
tobacco cessation product or for any other therapeutic purpose, if  the product is marketed and sold
solely for the approved purpose.
(2) It is unlawful:
[(a) To violate ORS 167.755. ]
(a) To distribute, sell or offer for sale in this state tobacco products  or inhalant delivery
systems to a person under 21 years of age. A business entity or person who is an  owner of
a business entity that is engaged in  the retail sale of tobacco products or inhalant delivery
systems violates this paragraph if the owner or an employee, agent or other representative
of the business entity distributes, sells  or offers for sale tobacco products or inhalant deliv-
ery systems to a person under 21 years of age.
(b) To fail as a retailer of  tobacco products to post a notice substantially similar to the notice
described in subsection (3) of this section in a location that is clearly visible to the seller and  the
purchaser of the tobacco products.
(c) To fail as a retailer of inhalant delivery systems to post a notice in a location that  is clearly
visible to the seller and the purchaser of the inhalant delivery systems that it is  unlawful to sell
inhalant delivery systems to persons under 21  years of age. The Oregon Health Authority shall
adopt by rule the content of the notice required under this paragraph.
(d) To distribute, sell or [ allow to be sold ] offer for sale in this state  an inhalant delivery
system if the inhalant  delivery system is not labeled in accordance with rules adopted by the au-
thority.
(e) To distribute, sell or [ allow to be  sold ] offer for sale in this state  an inhalant delivery
system if the inhalant delivery system is not  packaged in child-resistant safety packaging, as re-
quired by the authority by rule.
(f) To distribute, sell or [ allow to be sold ] offer for sale in this state  an inhalant delivery  sys-
tem if  the inhalant delivery system is packaged in a manner that is attractive to minors, as deter-
mined by the authority by rule.
(g) To distribute, sell or [ allow to be  sold ] offer for sale in this state  cigarettes in any form
other than a sealed package that contains at least 20 cigarettes.
(h) To distribute, offer or otherwise  provide, without compensation, tobacco products or
inhalant delivery systems.
(3) The notice required by subsection (2)(b) of this section must be substantially as follows:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
NOTICE
The sale of tobacco in any form to persons under 21 years of age is prohibited by  law. Any
[2]
HB 2528
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
person who sells, or allows to be sold, tobacco to a person  under 21 years of age is in violation of
Oregon law.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(4) The authority may adopt rules to regulate the wholesale or  retail sale of tobacco
products or inhalant delivery systems in  this state to protect the public health and safety
of the residents of this state.
[(4)] (5) Rules adopted under subsection (2)(d), (e) and  (f) of this section must be consistent with
any regulation adopted by the United States Food and Drug Administration related to  labeling or
packaging requirements for inhalant delivery systems.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 180.441 is amended to read:
180.441. (1)(a) A person  engaged in the business of selling cigarettes, inhalant delivery systems
or smokeless tobacco products for profit may  not ship or transport, or cause to be shipped or
transported, cigarettes, inhalant delivery systems or smokeless  tobacco products ordered or pur-
chased by mail or telephone or through a computer or other electronic network to any person in this
state other than a distributor or retailer.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not  apply to a freight forwarder or motor carrier, as
those terms are defined in 49 U.S.C. 13102,  as in effect on August 8, 2017, or an air carrier, as de-
fined in 49 U.S.C. 40102, as in effect on August 8, 2017.
(2) A retailer may not sell cigarettes, inhalant delivery systems or smokeless tobacco products
unless the retailer or an employee of the retailer makes the  sale to the purchaser in person as part
of a face-to-face exchange  that occurs on premises, as defined in  ORS 431A.190, that are li-
censed under ORS 431A.198 or an ordinance, rule or resolution adopted by a local government
as defined in ORS 174.116 .
(3) A person may  not knowingly provide substantial assistance to a person that is violating
subsection (1) or (2) of this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 323.500 is amended to read:
323.500. As used in ORS 323.500 to 323.645, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Business” means any trade, occupation, activity or enterprise engaged  in for the purpose
of selling or distributing tobacco products in this state.
(2) “Cigar” means a roll for smoking that is of any size or shape and that is made wholly or in
part of tobacco, irrespective of whether the tobacco is pure or flavored,  adulterated or mixed with
any other ingredient, if the roll  has a wrapper made wholly or in greater part of tobacco and if 1,000
of these  rolls collectively weigh more than three pounds. “Cigar” does not include a cigarette, as
defined in ORS 323.010.
(3) “Consumer” means any person  who purchases tobacco products in this state for the person’s
use or consumption or for any purpose other than for reselling  the tobacco products to another
person.
(4) “Contraband tobacco products” means tobacco products or packages containing  tobacco
products:
(a) That do not comply with the requirements of ORS 323.500 to 323.645;
(b) That do not comply with the requirements of the tobacco products tax laws of  the federal
government or of other states;
(c) That bear trademarks that  are counterfeit under ORS 647.135 or other state or federal
trademark laws; or
[3]
HB 2528
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) That have been sold, offered for sale or possessed for sale in this state  in violation of ORS
180.486.
(5) “Department” means the Department of Revenue.
(6) “Distribute” means:
(a) Bringing, or causing to be brought,  into this state from without this state tobacco products
for sale, storage, use or consumption;
(b) Making, manufacturing or fabricating tobacco products in this  state for sale, storage, use or
consumption in this state;
(c) Shipping or  transporting tobacco products to retail dealers in this state, to be sold, stored,
used or consumed by those retail dealers;
(d) Storing untaxed  tobacco products in this state that are intended to be for sale, use or con-
sumption in this state;
(e) Selling untaxed tobacco products in this state; or
(f) As a consumer, being in possession of untaxed tobacco products in this state.
(7) “Distributor” means:
(a) Any person engaged in the business of  selling tobacco products in this state who brings, or
causes to be brought, into this state from without the state any tobacco products for sale;
(b) Any person who makes, manufactures or  fabricates tobacco products in this state for sale in
this state;
(c) Any person engaged in the business of selling tobacco  products without this state who ships
or transports tobacco products to retail dealers in this state, to be sold by those retail dealers;
(d) Any person, including a retail dealer, who sells untaxed tobacco products in this state; or
(e) A consumer in possession of untaxed tobacco products in this state.
(8)(a) “Inhalant delivery system” means:
(A) A device  that can be used to deliver nicotine in the form of a vapor or aerosol to a person
inhaling from the device; or
(B) A component of a device described in this paragraph or a substance in any form sold  for the
purpose of being vaporized or  aerosolized by a device described in this paragraph, whether the
component or substance is sold separately or is not sold separately.
(b) “Inhalant delivery system” does not include:
(A) Any product that has been approved by the United States Food and  Drug Administration for
sale as a  tobacco cessation product or for any other therapeutic purpose, if the product is marketed
and sold solely for the approved purpose;
(B) If sold separately, battery chargers, straps or lanyards; or
(C) Marijuana items as defined in ORS 475C.009.
(9) “Manufacturer” means a person who manufactures tobacco products for sale.
(10) “Moist snuff” means:
(a) Any finely cut, ground or powdered tobacco that is not intended  to be smoked or placed in
a nasal cavity; or
(b) Any other product containing  tobacco that is intended or expected to be consumed without
being combusted.
(11) “Place of business” means any place  where tobacco products are sold or where tobacco
products are manufactured, stored or kept for the purpose of sale or  consumption, including any
vessel, vehicle, airplane, train or vending machine.
(12) “Retail dealer” means any person who  is engaged in the business of selling or otherwise
[4]
HB 2528
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
dispensing tobacco products to consumers.  The term also includes the operators of or recipients of
revenue from all places such as  smoke shops, cigar stores and vending machines, where tobacco
products are made or stored for ultimate sale to consumers.
(13) “Sale” means any transfer, exchange or barter, in any manner or by  any means, for a con-
sideration, and includes and means all sales made by any  person. It includes a gift by a person en-
gaged in the business of selling tobacco products, for advertising, as a means of evading the
provisions of ORS 323.500 to 323.645, or for any other purpose.
(14) “Taxpayer” includes a distributor or other person required to pay a tax  imposed under ORS
323.500 to 323.645.
(15) “Tobacco products” means cigars, cheroots, stogies, periques,  granulated, plug cut, crimp
cut, ready rubbed and other smoking tobacco,  snuff, snuff flour, moist snuff, cavendish, plug and
twist tobacco, fine-cut and  other chewing tobaccos, shorts, refuse scraps, clippings, cuttings and
sweepings of tobacco and other kinds and forms of tobacco, prepared in such manner  as to be suit-
able for chewing or smoking in a pipe or otherwise, or both  for chewing and smoking, [ and] inhalant
delivery systems, oral nicotine pouches, nicotine lozenges and other  products containing
nicotine derived from any  source,  but does not include cigarettes as defined in ORS 323.010  or
products that have been approved by the United States Food and  Drug Administration for
sale as a tobacco cessation product or for any other therapeutic purpose, if the product is
marketed and sold solely for the approved purpose .
(16) “Untaxed tobacco products” means tobacco products  for which the tax required under ORS
323.500 to 323.645 has not been paid.
(17) “Wholesale sales price”  means the price paid for untaxed tobacco products to or on behalf
of a seller by a purchaser of the untaxed tobacco products.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 431A.183 is amended to read:
431A.183. (1)(a) The Oregon Health Authority may enter into an agreement with federal agencies
to assist the authority in  monitoring and enforcing federal laws and regulations related to tobacco
products or inhalant delivery systems.
(b) The authority may commission employees of  the authority as federal officers for the purpose
of carrying out the duties prescribed  under an agreement entered into under paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(c) The authority may adopt rules and take any action necessary to carry out  the authority’s
duties as established under an agreement entered into under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2)(a) The authority may enter into an agreement with federal, state  and local government
agencies,  including  federal, state and local law enforcement agencies, to assist the authority in
carrying out the authority’s duties under ORS 431A.175 and to conduct random, unannounced  in-
spections of wholesalers and  retailers of tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems to ensure
compliance  with  the laws of this state designed to discourage the use of tobacco products and
inhalant delivery  systems by persons under 21 years of age, including ORS [ 167.755,] 167.760, 167.765,
167.770, 167.775, 167.780 and 431A.175.
(b) The authority shall ensure that a retailer  is inspected as described in this subsection at least
once each year. A  retailer that is found to be out of compliance with the laws described in para-
graph (a) of this subsection may be reinspected as the authority determines necessary.
(c) The authority may adopt rules to carry out paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(3)(a) If the authority enters  into an agreement with the Department of State Police under sub-
section (2) of this section,  the department may employ retired state police officers who are active
[5]
HB 2528
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
reserve officers. Service by a retired state  police officer under this paragraph is subject to ORS
238.082.
(b) The department may not use the  services of a retired state police officer to displace an ac-
tive state police member.
(4)(a) The authority may apply for and accept moneys from the federal government  or other
public or private sources and, in accordance with  any federal restrictions or other funding source
restrictions, use those moneys to carry out the duties and functions related  to preventing the use
of tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems by persons who are not of the minimum age to
purchase tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems.
(b) Moneys received by the authority under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be  deposited
in the Oregon Health Authority  Fund established under ORS 413.101. Moneys subject to a federal
restriction or other funding source restriction must be accounted for  separately from other fund
moneys.
(5)(a) The authority shall submit a written report each biennium to the Governor and to  the
appropriate committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly to which matters of  public
health are assigned.
(b) The report submitted under this subsection must contain information describing:
(A) The activities carried out to enforce the laws  listed in subsection (2) of this section during
the previous biennium;
(B) The extent  of success achieved in reducing the availability of tobacco products and inhalant
delivery systems to persons under 21 years of age; and
(C) The strategies to be utilized for enforcing the laws listed in  subsection (2) of this section
during the biennium following the report.
(6) The authority shall adopt rules for conducting random inspections of establishments that
distribute or sell tobacco  products or inhalant delivery systems. The rules shall provide that in-
spections may take place:
(a) Only in areas open to the public;
(b) Only during the hours that tobacco products or inhalant delivery systems are distributed or
sold; and
(c) No more frequently than once a month in any single establishment unless  a compliance
problem exists or is suspected.
SECTION 5.
ORS 167.750 and 167.755 are repealed.
SECTION 6. (1) The amendments to  ORS 431A.175 by section 1 of this 2025 Act become
operative on October 1, 2025.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take any  action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the authority to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on  the authority by the amendments to ORS 431A.175 by section 1 of
this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[6]