Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 238.005 is amended to read:
238.005. For purposes of this chapter:
(1) “Active  member” means a member who is presently employed by a participating public em-
ployer in a qualifying position and who has completed  the six-month period of service required by
ORS 238.015.
(2) “Annuity” means payments for life derived from  contributions made by a member as provided
in this chapter.
(3) “Board” means the Public Employees Retirement Board.
(4) “Calendar year” means 12  calendar months commencing on January 1 and ending on De-
cember 31 following.
(5) “Continuous service” means service not interrupted for more than five  years, except that
such continuous service shall be computed without regard to interruptions in the case of:
(a) An employee who had returned to the service of  the employer as of January 1, 1945, and
who remained in that employment until  having established membership in the Public Employees
Retirement System.
(b) An employee who was in  the armed services on January 1, 1945, and returned to the service
of the employer within  one year of the date of being otherwise than dishonorably discharged and
remained in that employment until having established membership in  the Public Employees Retire-
ment System.
(6) “Creditable  service” means any period of time during which an active member is being paid
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 88
HB 4157
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a salary by a participating public employer and for  which benefits under this chapter are funded by
employer contributions and  earnings on the fund. For purposes of computing years of “creditable
service,” full months and major fractions of a month shall be considered to  be one-twelfth of a year
and shall be added to all full years. “Creditable service” includes all retirement credit  received by
a member.
(7) “Earliest service retirement  age” means the age attained by a member when the member
could first make application for retirement under the provisions of ORS 238.280.
(8) “Employee” means a person who performs services for a participating public  employer, in-
cluding persons considered  employees of a participating public employer under 26 U.S.C. 3121(d)(2),
as in effect on December 31, 2019, and public officers. “Employee” does not include:
(a) Persons engaged as independent contractors.
(b) Seasonal, emergency  or casual workers whose periods of employment with any public em-
ployer or public employers do not total 600 hours in any calendar year.
(c) Persons provided sheltered  employment or made-work by a public employer in an employment
or industries program maintained for the benefit of such persons.
(d) Persons employed and paid  from federal funds received under a federal program intended
primarily to alleviate  unemployment. However, any such person shall be considered an “employee”
if not otherwise excluded by  paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection and the public employer elects
to have the person so considered by an irrevocable written notice to the board.
(e) Persons who are employees of a railroad, as defined in  ORS 824.020, and who, as such em-
ployees, are included in a retirement plan under  federal railroad retirement statutes. This paragraph
shall be deemed to have been in effect since the inception of the system.
(f) Persons employed in positions classified as post-doctoral scholar positions  by a public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002, or by the Oregon Health and Science University, under ORS 350.370.
(9) “Final average salary” means whichever of the following is greater:
(a) The average salary per calendar year paid by one or  more participating public employers to
an employee who is an active member of the system in three of the  calendar years of membership
before the effective date of retirement of the employee,  in which three years the employee was paid
the highest salary. The three calendar years in which the  employee was paid the largest total salary
may include calendar years in which the employee was employed for less than a full calendar  year.
If the number of calendar years  of active membership before the effective date of retirement of the
employee is three or fewer, the final average salary for the employee is the average salary per cal-
endar year paid by one or more participating public employers to the employee in  all of those years,
without regard to whether the employee was employed for the full calendar year.
(b) One-third of the total salary paid by a  participating public employer to an employee who is
an active member of the system in the  last 36 calendar months of active membership before the ef-
fective date of retirement of the employee.
(10) “Firefighter” does not include a volunteer firefighter, but does include:
(a) The State Fire Marshal, the chief deputy fire marshal and deputy state fire marshals;
(b) An employee of the State Fire Marshal whose  primary duties include fire investigation, fire
prevention, fire safety, fire control or fire suppression;
(c) An employee of the State Forestry Department who is certified by  the State Forester as a
professional wildland firefighter and whose  primary duties include the abatement of uncontrolled
fires as described in ORS 477.064; and
(d) An employee  of the Oregon Military Department whose primary duties include fighting
[2]
HB 4157
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
structural, aircraft, wildland or other fires.
(11) “Fiscal year” means 12 calendar months commencing on July 1  and ending on June 30 fol-
lowing.
(12) “Fund” means the Public Employees Retirement Fund.
(13) “Inactive member” means a member who is not employed  in a qualifying position, whose
membership has not been terminated in the manner described by ORS  238.095 and who is not retired
for service or disability.
(14) “Institution of higher education” means a public university  listed in ORS 352.002, the
Oregon Health and Science University and a community college, as defined in ORS 341.005.
(15) “Member” means a person who  has established membership in the system and whose mem-
bership has not been terminated as described in  ORS 238.095. “Member” includes active, inactive
and retired members.
(16) “Member account” means the regular account and the variable account.
(17) “Normal retirement age” means:
(a) For a person who establishes membership  in the system before January 1, 1996, as described
in ORS 238.430, 55  years of age if the employee retires at that age as a police officer or firefighter
or 58 years of age if the employee retires at that age as other than a police officer or firefighter.
(b) For  a person who establishes membership in the system on or after January 1, 1996, as de-
scribed in ORS 238.430, 55 years of age if  the employee retires at that age as a police officer or
firefighter or 60 years of  age if the employee retires at that age as other than a police officer or
firefighter.
(18) “Pension” means  annual payments for life derived from contributions by one or more public
employers.
(19) “Police officer” includes:
(a) Employees of institutions defined in  ORS 421.005 as Department of Corrections institutions
whose duties, as assigned by the Director of the Department  of Corrections, include the custody of
persons committed to the  custody of or transferred to the Department of Corrections and employees
of the Department of Corrections who were classified as police officers on or before July  27, 1989,
whether or not such classification was authorized by law.
(b) Employees of the Department of  State Police who are classified as police officers by the
Superintendent of State Police.
(c) Employees of the Oregon Liquor  and Cannabis Commission who are classified as regulatory
specialists by the administrator of the commission.
(d) Sheriffs and those deputy sheriffs or other employees of a  sheriff whose duties, as classified
by the sheriff, are the regular duties of police officers or corrections officers.
(e) Police chiefs  and police personnel of a city who are classified as police officers by the
council or other governing body of the city.
(f) Police officers who are commissioned by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125 and who
are classified as police officers by the university.
(g) Parole and probation officers employed by the  Department of Corrections, parole and pro-
bation officers who are transferred to county employment under ORS 423.549 and adult  parole and
probation officers, as defined in ORS  181A.355, who are classified as police officers for the purposes
of this chapter by the county governing body. If a county classifies adult  parole and probation offi-
cers as police  officers for the purposes of this chapter, and the employees so classified are repres-
ented by a labor organization, any proposal by the county to change  that classification or to cease
[3]
HB 4157
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to classify adult parole  and probation officers as police officers for the purposes of this chapter is
a mandatory subject of bargaining.
(h) Police officers appointed under ORS 276.021 or 276.023.
(i) Employees of the Port of Portland who are classified as airport police by the  Board of Com-
missioners of the Port of Portland.
(j) Employees of the  State Department of Agriculture who are classified as livestock police of-
ficers by the Director of Agriculture.
(k) Employees of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training who are classified  by
the department as other than secretarial or clerical personnel.
(L) Investigators of the Criminal Justice Division of the Department of Justice.
(m) Corrections officers as defined in ORS 181A.355.
(n) Employees of the Oregon State Lottery Commission who are classified by the  Director of the
Oregon State Lottery as enforcement agents pursuant to ORS 461.110.
(o) The Director of the Department of Corrections.
(p) An employee who for seven consecutive years has been classified as  a police officer as de-
fined by this section, and who is  employed or transferred by the Department of Corrections to fill
a position designated  by the Director of the Department of Corrections as being eligible for police
officer  status.
(q) An employee of the Department of Corrections classified as a police officer on or  prior to
July 27,  1989, whether or not that classification was authorized by law, as long as the employee
remains in the position held  on July 27, 1989. The initial classification of an employee under a sys-
tem implemented pursuant to ORS 240.190 does not affect police officer status.
(r) Employees of a school district who  are appointed and duly sworn members of a law
enforcement agency of the district as provided in ORS 332.531 or  otherwise employed full-time as
police officers commissioned by the district.
(s) Employees at youth  correction facilities and juvenile detention facilities under ORS 419A.050,
419A.052 and 420.005 to 420.915 who are required to  hold valid Oregon teaching licenses and who
have supervisory, control or teaching responsibilities over juveniles committed to the custody of the
Department of Corrections or the Oregon Youth Authority.
(t) Employees at youth correction facilities as defined in ORS  420.005 whose primary job de-
scription involves the custody, control, treatment, investigation or supervision  of juveniles placed
in such facilities.
(u) Employees of the Oregon Youth  Authority who are classified as juvenile parole and pro-
bation officers.
(v) Employees of the Department of Human Services who are prohibited from striking under ORS
243.726 and whose duties include the care of residents of residential  facilities, as defined in ORS
443.400, that house individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities.
(w) Employees  appointed as judicial marshals under ORS 1.177 who are certified under ORS
181A.540.
(x) Certified parole and probation officers employed by the  State Board of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision.
(y) District attorneys and  deputy district attorneys.
(20) “Prior service credit” means credit provided  under ORS 238.442 or under ORS 238.225 (2)
to (6) (1999 Edition).
(21) “Public employer” means the state, one of its agencies or any  city, county, municipal or
[4]
HB 4157
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
public corporation, political subdivision of the state or  instrumentality thereof, or an agency created
by one or more such governmental organizations to provide governmental services. For purposes  of
this chapter, such agency created by one or  more governmental organizations is a governmental
instrumentality and a legal entity with power to enter into contracts, hold property  and sue and be
sued.
(22) “Qualifying position” means one or more jobs with one or more participating  public em-
ployers in which an employee performs 600 or more hours of  service in a full calendar year, or
would perform 600  or more hours of service if the employee were employed for the full calendar
year, excluding any service in a job for which a participating public employer does not provide
benefits under this chapter pursuant to an application made under ORS 238.035.
(23) “Regular account” means the account established  for each active and inactive member un-
der ORS 238.250.
(24) “Retired member” means a member who is retired for service or disability.
(25) “Retirement credit” means a period of time that is  treated as creditable service for the
purposes of this chapter.
(26)(a) “Salary” means the remuneration paid an employee in cash out of the funds of a  public
employer in return for services to the employer, plus the monetary value, as determined by  the
Public Employees Retirement Board, of whatever living quarters, board, lodging,  fuel, laundry and
other advantages the employer furnishes the employee in return for services.
(b) “Salary” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Payments of employee  and employer money into a deferred compensation plan, which are
deemed salary paid in each month of deferral;
(B) The amount of participation in a tax-sheltered or deferred annuity, which is deemed  salary
paid in each month of participation;
(C) Retroactive payments described in ORS 238.008;
(D) Wages of a deceased member paid to a surviving spouse or  dependent children under ORS
652.190; and
(E) The full amount of required  employee contributions under ORS 238A.330 that are paid by the
employer on behalf  of its employees under ORS 238A.335 (2)(b), solely for the purpose of computing
a member’s final average salary, and not for any other purpose.
(c) “Salary” or “other advantages” does not include:
(A) Travel or  any other expenses incidental to employer’s business which is reimbursed by the
employer;
(B) Payments  for insurance coverage by an employer on behalf of employee or employee and
dependents, for which the employee has no cash option;
(C) Payments made on account of an employee’s death;
(D) Any lump sum payment for accumulated unused sick leave;
(E) Any accelerated payment of an employment contract for a future period or an advance
against future wages;
(F) Any retirement incentive, retirement severance pay, retirement bonus or retirement
gratuitous payment;
(G) Payments for  periods of leave of absence after the date the employer and employee have
agreed that no future services qualifying pursuant to ORS  238.015 (3) will be performed, except for
sick leave and vacation;
(H) Payments for instructional services rendered to public universities listed in  ORS 352.002 or
[5]
HB 4157
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the Oregon  Health and Science University when such services are in excess of full-time employment
subject to this chapter. A person employed under a contract  for less than 12 months is subject to
this subparagraph only for the months to which the contract pertains;
(I) Payments made by an employer for insurance coverage provided to a domestic partner  of an
employee;
(J) Compensation described and authorized  under ORS 341.556 that is not paid by the community
college employing the faculty member;
(K) Compensation described and authorized under ORS 352.232 that is not  paid by the public
university employing the officer or employee;
(L) Compensation described and authorized under ORS 353.270 that is not paid by Oregon Health
and Science University; or
(M) For years beginning on or after  January 1, 2020, any amount in excess of $195,000 for a
calendar  year.  If any period over which salary is determined is less than 12 months, the $195,000
limitation for that period shall be multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number
of months  in the determination period and the denominator of which is 12. On January 1 of each
year, the  board shall adjust the dollar limit provided by this subparagraph to reflect any percentage
changes in the Consumer Price Index for  All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as pub-
lished by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(27) “School year” means the period beginning July 1 and ending June 30 next following.
(28) “System” means the Public Employees Retirement System.
(29) “Variable account”  means the account established for a member who participates in the
Variable Annuity Account under ORS 238.260.
(30) “Vested” means being an active member of the system in each of five calendar years.
(31) “Volunteer firefighter” means a firefighter whose position normally  requires less than 600
hours of service per year.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 238A.005 is amended to read:
238A.005. For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) “Active member” means a member of the pension program or  the individual account program
of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan who is actively employed in a qualifying position.
(2) “Actuarial equivalent” means a payment or  series of payments having the same value as the
payment or series of payments replaced, computed on the basis of  interest rate and mortality as-
sumptions adopted by the board.
(3) “Board” means the Public Employees Retirement Board.
(4) “Eligible employee” means  a person who performs services for a participating public em-
ployer, including persons considered employees of a participating public employer under 26  U.S.C.
3121(d)(2), as in effect on January  1, 2023, and elected officials other than judges. “Eligible
employee” does not include:
(a) Persons engaged as independent contractors;
(b) Aliens working under a training or educational visa;
(c) Persons provided sheltered employment or make-work by a public employer;
(d) Persons categorized by a participating public employer as student employees;
(e) Any person who is in custody in a state institution;
(f) Employees of foreign trade offices of  the Oregon Business Development Department who live
and perform services in foreign countries under the provisions of ORS 285A.075 (1)(g);
(g) An employee actively participating in an alternative retirement program established under
[6]
HB 4157
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ORS 353.250 or an optional retirement plan established under ORS 341.551;
(h) Employees of a public university listed  in ORS 352.002 who are actively participating in an
optional retirement plan offered under ORS 243.815;
(i) Persons employed in positions classified as post-doctoral scholar positions  by a public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002, or by the Oregon Health and Science University, under ORS 350.370;
(j) Any employee who belongs to a class of employees that was not eligible on August 28,  2003,
for membership in the system under the provisions of ORS chapter 238 or other law;
(k) Any person who belongs to a class of employees who are  not eligible to become members
of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan under the provisions of ORS 238A.070 (2);
(L) Any person who is retired under  ORS 238A.100 to 238A.250 or ORS chapter 238 and who
continues to receive retirement benefits while employed; and
(m) Judges.
(5) “Firefighter” means:
(a) A person employed by a local government, as defined in ORS 174.116,  whose primary job
duties include the fighting of fires;
(b) The State Fire Marshal, chief deputy state fire marshals and deputy state fire marshals;
(c) An employee of the State Fire Marshal  whose primary duties include fire investigation, fire
prevention, fire safety, fire control or fire suppression;
(d) An employee of the State Forestry  Department who is certified by the State Forester as a
professional wildland firefighter and whose primary duties include  the abatement of uncontrolled
fires as described in ORS 477.064; and
(e) An employee of the Oregon Military Department whose primary  duties include fighting
structural, aircraft, wildland or other fires.
(6) “Fund” means the Public Employees Retirement Fund.
(7)(a) “Hazardous position” means a position that does not meet the definition of  a
qualified public safety employee under section 72(t)(10)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code,  but
that:
(A) Requires the  person holding the position to work with or manage emergency or
traumatic events in the regular course of work; or
(B) Carries a high risk of physical harm.
(b) “Hazardous position” includes and is limited to:
(A) Employees of the Oregon State Hospital who have direct contact with patients; and
(B) Telecommunicators, as defined in ORS 181A.355.
[(7)(a)] (8)(a) “Hour of service” means:
(A) An hour for which an eligible employee is directly or indirectly paid  or entitled to payment
by a participating public employer for performance of duties in a qualifying position; and
(B) An hour of vacation, holiday, illness, incapacity, jury duty, military duty or authorized leave
during which an employee does  not perform duties but for which the employee is directly or indi-
rectly paid or entitled to payment by a participating public employer for  services in a qualifying
position, as long as the hour is within the  number of hours regularly scheduled for the performance
of duties during the period of  vacation, holiday, illness, incapacity, jury duty, military duty or au-
thorized leave.
(b) “Hour of service” does  not include any hour for which payment is made or due under a plan
maintained solely for the purpose of complying with applicable unemployment compensation laws.
[(8)] (9) “Inactive member” means a member  of the pension program or the individual account
[7]
HB 4157
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
program of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan whose membership has not  been terminated,
who is not a retired member and who is not employed in a qualifying position.
[(9)] (10) “Individual account  program” means the defined contribution individual account pro-
gram of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan established under ORS 238A.025.
[(10)] (11) “Institution of higher education” means a public  university listed in ORS 352.002, the
Oregon Health and Science University or a community college, as defined in ORS 341.005.
[(11)] (12) “Member” means an eligible employee who has established  membership in the pension
program or the individual account program  of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan and whose
membership has not been terminated under ORS 238A.110 or 238A.310.
[(12)] (13) “Participating public employer” means a public employer as defined  in ORS 238.005
that provides retirement benefits for employees of the public employer under the system.
[(13)] (14) “Pension program” means the defined benefit pension program  of the Oregon Public
Service Retirement Plan established under ORS 238A.025.
[(14)] (15) “Police officer” means a police officer as described in ORS 238.005.
[(15)] (16) “Qualifying position”  means one or more jobs with one or more participating public
employers in which  an eligible employee performs 600 or more hours of service in a full calendar
year, or would perform 600  or more hours of service if the employee were employed for the full
calendar year, excluding any service in a job for which benefits are not provided under  the Oregon
Public Service Retirement Plan pursuant to ORS 238A.070 (2).
[(16)] (17) “Retired member” means a pension program member who is  receiving a pension as
provided in ORS 238A.180 to 238A.195.
[(17)(a)] (18)(a) “Salary” means the remuneration paid to an  active member in return for ser-
vices to the participating public employer, including remuneration in the form of living  quarters,
board or other items of value, to the extent the remuneration  is, or would be if the member were
an Oregon resident, includable  in the employee’s taxable income under Oregon law. “Salary” in-
cludes the additional amounts specified in paragraph (b) of  this subsection, but does not include the
amounts specified in paragraph (c) of this subsection,  regardless of whether those amounts are
includable in taxable income.
(b) “Salary” includes the following amounts:
(A) Payments of employee and employer money into a deferred compensation plan  that are made
at the election of the employee.
(B) Contributions to a tax-sheltered or deferred annuity that are made at the election of  the
employee.
(C) Any amount that is contributed to a cafeteria plan  or qualified transportation fringe benefit
plan by the employer at the election of the employee and  that is not includable in the taxable in-
come of the employee by reason of 26 U.S.C. 125 or 132(f)(4), as in effect on December 31, 2022.
(D) Any amount that is contributed to a cash or deferred arrangement by the  employer at the
election of the employee and that is not included in the taxable income of the  employee by reason
of 26 U.S.C. 402(e)(3), as in effect on December 31, 2022.
(E) Retroactive payments described in ORS 238.008.
(F) The amount of an employee contribution to the individual account program that is paid  by
the employer and deducted from the compensation of the employee, as provided under  ORS 238A.335
(1) and (2)(a).
(G) The amount of an employee contribution to the individual account program that is not  paid
by the employer under ORS 238A.335.
[8]
HB 4157
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(H) Wages of a  deceased member paid to a surviving spouse or dependent children under ORS
652.190.
(c) “Salary” does not include the following amounts:
(A) Travel or  any other expenses incidental to employer’s business which is reimbursed by the
employer.
(B) Payments made on account of an employee’s death.
(C) Any lump sum payment for accumulated unused sick leave, vacation leave  or other paid
leave.
(D) Any severance payment, accelerated  payment of an employment contract for a future period
or advance against future wages.
(E) Any retirement incentive, retirement bonus or retirement gratuitous payment.
(F) Payment for a leave of absence after the date  the employer and employee have agreed that
no future services in a qualifying position will be performed.
(G) Payments for instructional services  rendered to public universities listed in ORS 352.002 or
the Oregon Health and Science  University when those services are in excess of full-time employment
subject to this chapter. A person employed under a  contract for less than 12 months is subject to
this subparagraph only for the months covered by the contract.
(H) The amount of an employee contribution to the individual account program  that is paid by
the employer and  is not deducted from the compensation of the employee, as provided under ORS
238A.335 (1) and (2)(b).
(I) Compensation described and authorized under ORS 341.556 that is  not paid by the community
college employing the faculty member.
(J) Compensation described and authorized  under ORS 352.232 that is not paid by the public
university employing the officer or employee.
(K) Compensation described and authorized under ORS 353.270 that is not paid by  Oregon
Health and Science University.
(L) For years before  2020, any amount in excess of $200,000 for a calendar year. If any period
over which salary is determined is less than 12 months, the  $200,000 limitation for that period shall
be multiplied by a fraction, the numerator  of which is the number of months in the determination
period and the denominator of which is 12. The board shall adopt rules  adjusting this dollar limit
to incorporate cost-of-living adjustments authorized by the Internal Revenue Service.
(M) For years beginning on or after  January 1, 2020, any amount in excess of $195,000 for a
calendar  year.  If any period over which salary is determined is less than 12 months, the $195,000
limitation for that period shall be multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number
of months  in the determination period and the denominator of which is 12. On January 1 of each
year, the  board shall adjust the dollar limit provided by this subparagraph to reflect any percentage
changes in the Consumer Price Index for  All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as pub-
lished by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
[(18)] (19) “System” means the Public Employees Retirement System.
[(19)] (20) “Workers’ compensation benefits” means:
(a) Payments made under ORS chapter 656; or
(b) Payments provided in lieu of workers’ compensation benefits under ORS 656.027 (6).
SECTION 3.
 ORS 238A.125 is amended to read:
238A.125. (1) Upon  retiring at normal retirement age, a vested pension program member shall
be paid an annual pension for the life of the member as follows:
[9]
HB 4157
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) For service as a police officer or firefighter, 1.8 percent of final average  salary multiplied
by the number of years of retirement credit attributable to service as a police  officer or firefighter.
(b) For  service in a hazardous position, 1.8 percent of final average salary multiplied by
the number of years of retirement credit attributable to service in a hazardous position.
[(b)] (c) For service  as other than a police officer or firefighter  or in a hazardous position , 1.5
percent of final average salary multiplied by the number of  years of retirement credit attributable
to service as other than a police officer or firefighter  or in a hazardous position .
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of ORS 238A.100 to 238A.250,  the annual benefit payable to
a member under the pension program and  under any other tax-qualified defined benefit plan main-
tained by the participating public employer may not exceed the applicable limitations set forth in
26 U.S.C. 415(b), as in effect on  December 31, 2022. The Public Employees Retirement Board shall
adopt rules  for the administration of this limitation, including adjustments in the annual dollar lim-
itation to reflect cost-of-living adjustments authorized by the Internal Revenue Service.
(3) The board shall make no  actuarial adjustment in a member’s pension calculated under this
section by reason of the member’s retirement after normal retirement age.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 238A.160 is amended to read:
238A.160. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, normal  retirement age
for a member of the pension program is the earlier of:
(a) 65 years of age; or
(b) 58 years of age if the member has 30 years or more of retirement credit.
(2)(a) Normal retirement age for  a member of the pension program who retires from service as
a police officer or firefighter, and whose last 60 months of retirement credit preceding  retirement
eligibility  under  this section is classified as retirement credit for service as a police officer or a
firefighter, is the earlier of:
(A) [ 60] 55 years of age; or
(B) 53 years of age if the member has 25 years or more of retirement credit.
(b) A member who establishes  retirement eligibility under this subsection retains retirement el-
igibility as a police officer or firefighter, even if the member performs service thereafter only as
other than a police officer or firefighter.
(c) A period of leave from a position as a police officer or  firefighter for which a member is
entitled to retirement credit for service as a police officer or firefighter and which is  part of the
member’s last 60 months of retirement credit  preceding retirement eligibility under this section shall
be counted  as part of the last 60 months of retirement credit required for retirement eligibility under
this section.
(d) Retirement credit for a month in which a member performs service as both a police officer
or firefighter and as other than a  police officer or firefighter shall be classified as retirement credit
for service as a police officer or firefighter for purposes of this section.
(e) A member employed as a police officer or firefighter is not required to restart the last 60
months of retirement credit required for retirement eligibility under this section when the member:
(A) Is on unpaid leave from the  member’s position as a police officer or firefighter and is re-
ceiving insurance payments for short-term or long-term disability for which retirement credit is  not
available under ORS 238A.155; and
(B) Is concurrently employed and performing service as other than  a police officer or firefighter.
(3) Normal retirement  age for a member of the pension program who retires from service as a
school employee as defined by ORS 238A.140 is the earlier of:
[10]
HB 4157
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) 65 years of age; or
(b) 58 years of age if the member has been an active member in 30 or more calendar years.
(4) The normal retirement date of a member is the first day of the month beginning on  or after
the date the member reaches normal retirement age.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 238A.160, as amended by section 4 of this 2024 Act, is amended to read:
238A.160. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) [ and (3) ] to  (4)  of this section, normal re-
tirement age for a member of the pension program is the earlier of:
(a) 65 years of age; or
(b) 58 years of age if the member has 30 years or more of retirement credit.
(2)(a) Normal retirement age for  a member of the pension program who retires from service as
a police officer or firefighter, and whose last 60 months of retirement credit preceding  retirement
eligibility  under  this section is classified as retirement credit for service as a police officer or a
firefighter, is the earlier of:
(A) 55 years of age; or
(B) 53 years of age if the member has 25 years or more of retirement credit.
(b) A member who establishes  retirement eligibility under this subsection retains retirement el-
igibility as a police officer or firefighter, even if the member performs service thereafter only as
other than a police officer or firefighter.
(c) A period of leave from a position as a police officer or  firefighter for which a member is
entitled to retirement credit for service as a police officer or firefighter and which is  part of the
member’s last 60 months of retirement credit  preceding retirement eligibility under this section shall
be counted  as part of the last 60 months of retirement credit required for retirement eligibility under
this section.
(d) Retirement credit for a month in which a member performs service as both a police officer
or firefighter and as other than a  police officer or firefighter shall be classified as retirement credit
for service as a police officer or firefighter for purposes of this section.
(e) A member employed as a police officer or firefighter is not required to restart the last 60
months of retirement credit required for retirement eligibility under this section when the member:
(A) Is on unpaid leave from the  member’s position as a police officer or firefighter and is re-
ceiving insurance payments for short-term or long-term disability for which retirement credit is  not
available under ORS 238A.155; and
(B) Is concurrently employed and performing service as other than  a police officer or firefighter.
(3)(a) Normal retirement age for a  member of the pension program who retires from
service as a person in a hazardous position, and  whose last 60 months of retirement credit
preceding retirement eligibility under this section is classified as  retirement credit for ser-
vice in a hazardous position, is the earlier of:
(A) 60 years of age; or
(B) 58 years of age if the member has 25 or more years of retirement credit.
(b) A member who establishes retirement eligibility under this subsection retains  retire-
ment eligibility as a person serving in a hazardous position, even if the member performs
service thereafter only in other than a hazardous position.
(c) A period of leave from a hazardous position for which  a member is entitled to re-
tirement credit for service  in a hazardous position and which is part of the member’s last
60 months of retirement credit preceding retirement  eligibility under this section shall be
counted as part of the last 60 months of retirement credit required for  retirement eligibility
[11]
HB 4157
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under this section.
(d) Retirement credit for a month in which a member performs  service both in a haz-
ardous position and in other than a hazardous position shall be classified as retirement credit
for service in a hazardous position for purposes of this section.
(e) A  member employed in a hazardous position is not required to restart the last 60
months of retirement credit required for retirement eligibility under this section when  the
member:
(A) Is on unpaid leave from the member’s  hazardous position and is receiving insurance
payments for short-term or long-term disability for which  retirement credit is not available
under ORS 238A.155; and
(B) Is concurrently employed and performing service in other  than a hazardous position.
[(3)] (4) Normal retirement age  for a member of the pension program who retires from service
as a school employee as defined by ORS 238A.140 is the earlier of:
(a) 65 years of age; or
(b) 58 years of age if the member has been an active member in 30 or more calendar years.
[(4)] (5) The normal retirement date of a  member is the first day of the month beginning on or
after the date the member reaches normal retirement age.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 238A.220 is amended to read:
238A.220. (1)  A participating public employer shall make employer contributions to the Public
Employees Retirement  Board at intervals designated by the board in the amounts determined by the
board under ORS 238.225. All participating public  employers shall be considered to be a single em-
ployer for the purposes of the  employer contributions under ORS 238.225 that are required for
funding the pension program established under ORS 238A.025.
(2) For the purpose of the actuarial computation required under ORS 238.225,  the board shall
separately establish the liability of  participating public employers for police officers and firefighters
under the pension program and shall require that public employers that employ police officers  and
firefighters who are members of the pension program make contributions for  those employees based
on the liability established under this subsection.
(3) For the purpose of the actuarial computation required under ORS 238.225,  the board
shall separately establish the liability of participating public employers for members  in haz-
ardous positions under the pension program and  shall require that public employers that
employ members in  hazardous positions who are members of the pension program make
contributions for those employees based on the liability established under this subsection.
SECTION 7.  ORS 238A.240 is amended to read:
238A.240. (1) A participating public employer  shall contribute to the pension program, at inter-
vals designated by the Public Employees Retirement Board, all amounts  determined by the board to
be actuarially necessary to adequately fund the disability benefits to be provided  under ORS
238A.235 and the reasonable costs of administering the provision of  those benefits. The board shall
periodically determine the liabilities attributable to the disability benefits and  shall set the amount
of contributions to be made by participating public employers,  and by other public employers who
are required to make contributions on behalf of members, to ensure that  those liabilities will be
funded no more than 40 years after the date on which  the determination is made. All participating
public employers shall be considered to be a single employer for the purposes  of the contributions
required under this section.
(2) For the purpose of the actuarial computation required under subsection  (1) of this section,
[12]
HB 4157
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the board shall separately establish the liability of participating  public employers for police officers
and firefighters, and shall require that public employers that employ  police officers and firefighters
make contributions for those employees based on the liability established under this section.
(3) For the purpose of  the actuarial computation required under subsection (1) of this
section, the  board shall separately establish the liability of participating public employers for
members in hazardous positions, and shall require that public employers that employ mem-
bers in hazardous positions make contributions for those employees based  on the liability
established under this section.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 238A.134 is amended to read:
238A.134. For purposes of determining the salary, as defined in ORS 238A.005 [ (17)] (18), of an
active member of the Public Employees Retirement System, a housing allowance paid to a member
in return for services as a prison chaplain shall be treated as if it were includable in the member’s
taxable income under Oregon law.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 338.135 is amended to read:
338.135. (1) Employee assignment to a public charter school shall be voluntary.
(2)(a) A public charter school or the  sponsor of the public charter school is considered the em-
ployer of any employees of the public charter  school. If a school district board is not the sponsor
of the  public charter school, the school district board may not be the employer of the employees of
the public charter school and the school district board may not collectively bargain  with the em-
ployees of the public charter school. The public charter  school governing body shall control the
selection of employees at the public charter school.
(b) If a virtual public charter school or the sponsor of a virtual public charter  school contracts
with a for-profit entity to provide educational services through the virtual  public charter school, the
for-profit entity may not be  the employer of any employees of the virtual public charter school un-
less:
(A) The employee is an administrator who does not have any teaching responsibilities; and
(B) Both the executive officer of the sponsor and the public charter school governing body  ap-
prove  employment  by the for-profit entity. The executive officer or governing body may choose to
grant approval under this subparagraph:
(i) For all employees of the for-profit  entity who meet the description in subparagraph (A) of this
paragraph;
(ii) Based on the job categories of the employees who meet the description in subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph; or
(iii) On a case-by-case basis for each employee  who meets the description in subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph.
(3) The school district board of the school district within which the public charter school  is lo-
cated shall grant a leave of absence to any employee  who chooses to work in the public charter
school. The length and terms of the leave  of absence shall be set by negotiated agreement or by
board policy. However, the length of the leave of absence may not be less than two years unless:
(a) The charter of  the public charter school is terminated or the public charter school is dis-
solved or closed during the leave of absence; or
(b) The employee  and the school district board have mutually agreed to a different length of
time.
(4) An employee of a public charter school operating within a school district who is  granted a
leave of absence from the school district and  returns to employment with the school district shall
[13]
HB 4157
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
retain seniority and benefits  as an employee pursuant to the terms of the leave of absence.
Notwithstanding ORS 243.650 to 243.809, a school district that was  the employer of an employee of
a public charter school not operating within the school district may make provisions for the  return
of the employee to employment with the school district.
(5)(a) For purposes of  ORS chapters 238 and 238A, a public charter school shall be considered
a public employer and as such shall participate in the Public Employees Retirement System.
(b) For purposes of determining the salary paid to an active member of the Public  Employees
Retirement System  under ORS 238A.005 [ (17)] (18) during the period between August 29, 2003, and
January 1, 2020, remuneration paid to a member in return for services to  a public charter school is
deemed includable in the member’s taxable income under Oregon law during a period  of continuous
employment with any public charter school if:
(A) The member was hired in a  qualifying position by any public charter school on or after
August 29, 2003;
(B) The member was  informed in writing by the public charter school during the period of con-
tinuous employment that the member was eligible to participate in the Public  Employees Retirement
System and the public charter school made contributions to the system on the member’s behalf;
(C) The remuneration was, or would have been if the member  were an Oregon resident,
includable in the member’s taxable income under Oregon law during the period of continuous  em-
ployment; and
(D) The member resided and performed services in the United States during the period of  con-
tinuous employment.
(c) As used  in this subsection, “continuous employment” means employment with a public char-
ter school that is not interrupted by a period of more than 30 consecutive calendar days.
(6) For teacher licensing, employment experience in public charter  schools shall be considered
equivalent to experience in public schools.
(7)(a) Any person  employed as an administrator in a public charter school shall be licensed or
registered to administer by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission.
(b) Any person employed as a teacher in a public charter school shall be licensed or registered
to teach by the commission.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, at least one-half of  the total full-time
equivalent (FTE) teaching and administrative staff at the public charter school shall be licensed  by
the commission pursuant to ORS 342.125.
(8) Notwithstanding ORS 243.650, a public charter school shall be considered  a school district
for purposes of ORS 243.650 to 243.809. An employee  of a public charter school may be a member
of a labor organization or organize with other employees to  bargain collectively. Bargaining units
at the public charter school may be separate from other bargaining  units of the sponsor or of the
school district in which the  public charter school is located. Employees of a public charter school
may be part of the bargaining units of the sponsor or of  the school district in which the public
charter school is located.
(9) An entity described in ORS 338.005 (4) may  not waive the right to sponsor a public charter
school in a collective bargaining agreement.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 352.138 is amended to read:
352.138. (1) The following entities are not subject  to any provision of law enacted after January
1, 2013, that is unique to governmental entities unless the following entities are expressly named:
(a) A public university listed in ORS 352.002; and
[14]
HB 4157
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Any not-for-profit organization or other entity if the equity of  the entity is owned or con-
trolled exclusively by  a public university and if the organization or entity is created by the univer-
sity to advance any of the university’s statutory missions.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection  (1) of this section and ORS 352.033, the provisions of ORS 30.260
to 30.460, 33.710, 33.720, 200.005 to 200.025,  200.045 to 200.090, 236.605 to 236.640, 279.835, 279.840,
279.850 and 297.040 and ORS chapters 35, 190, 192 and  244 apply to a public university listed in ORS
352.002 under the same terms as they apply to public bodies other than the state.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, the provisions of ORS 35.550 to 35.575, 180.060, 180.210
to 180.235, 184.305 to 184.345, 190.480, 190.490, 200.035,  243.696, 357.805 to 357.895 and 656.017 (2)
and ORS chapters 182, 183, 240, 270, 273, 276, 278, 279A, 279B, 279C, 282, 283, 291, 292, 293, 294, 295
and 297 do not apply to a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (3) of this  section and ORS 352.033, ORS 240.167,
279C.600 to 279C.625, 279C.800, 279C.810, 279C.825, 279C.827, 279C.830, 279C.835, 279C.836, 279C.838,
279C.840, 279C.845, 279C.850, 279C.855, 279C.860, 279C.865, 279C.870 and 292.043 apply to  a public
university listed in ORS 352.002 under  the same terms as they apply to public bodies other than the
state.
(b) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (3) of this section, ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870  apply to
an agreement under the terms  of which a private entity constructs, reconstructs, renovates or paints
an improvement on  real property owned by a public university listed in ORS 352.002 or by a not-
for-profit organization or other entity that a public university owns or controls exclusively.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, ORS 190.430 and  192.105 do not apply to a
public university listed in ORS 352.002 or any organization or other entity described in  subsection
(1) of this section.
(6)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 352.033, except as set forth in subsection (3)  of this section, ORS
243.650 to 243.809 and 276.073 to 276.090 and ORS chapters  238 and 238A apply to a public univer-
sity listed in ORS 352.002 under the same terms as they apply to the state.
(b) For purposes of  determining the salary of an active member of the Public Employees Re-
tirement System under ORS 238A.005 [ (17)] (18), remuneration paid to  a member in return for ser-
vices to a  public university listed in ORS 352.002 is deemed includable in the member’s taxable
income under Oregon law during a period  of continuous employment with any public university
listed in ORS 352.002 if:
(A) The member was hired in a  qualifying position by a public university listed in ORS 352.002
on or after August 29, 2003, and on or before December 31, 2016; and
(B) The member resided and performed services in the United States during the  period of con-
tinuous employment.
(7) ORS 350.285, 350.290, 352.198, 352.226, 352.232, 352.293, 352.296,  352.303, 352.309 and 352.313
apply to a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(8) Notwithstanding ORS 352.033,  a public university listed in ORS 352.002 and its agents and
employees remain subject to all statutes and administrative rules of this  state that create rights,
benefits or protections in favor of military veterans, service members and families of  service mem-
bers to the same extent as an agency  of this state would be subject to such statutes and adminis-
trative rules.
(9) Notwithstanding ORS 352.033, ORS 350.540, 350.545 and 350.550 apply  to a public university
listed in ORS 352.002. A public university may not issue a tax credit certificate  under ORS 350.540,
350.545 and 350.550 that will cause the General Fund to be owed more than $8.4 million  at any one
[15]
HB 4157
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
time under ORS 350.540, 350.545 and 350.550.
(10) If state bonds are issued for the benefit of a public university listed  in ORS 352.002 under
Article XI-Q of the Oregon Constitution:
(a) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission  shall have the powers and duties of a
project agency, as defined in ORS 286A.816, to the extent necessary for the  issuance of the state
bonds and the administration of the proceeds of the state bonds; and
(b) The university and the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall enter into grant
contracts or loan agreements that comply with  rules adopted by the Oregon Department of Admin-
istrative Services relating to:
(A) Disbursement of project funds by a project agency through grant contracts or loan  agree-
ments;
(B) Submission of a request for project funds to the commission under ORS 350.095; and
(C) Any other matters determined by the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services to be
necessary for the administration of the Article XI-Q bond program.
(11) Nothing in this  section may be construed so that statutory provisions that are not set forth
in this section apply to a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 353.100 is amended to read:
353.100. (1) The provisions of  ORS chapters 35, 190, 192, 244 and 295 and ORS 30.260 to 30.460,
200.005 to 200.025, 200.045 to 200.090, 236.605  to 236.640, 243.650 to 243.809, 297.040, 307.090 and
307.112 apply to Oregon  Health and Science University under the same terms as they apply to public
bodies other than the state.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, the provisions of ORS chapters 182, 183,  240, 270, 273,
276, 279A, 279B, 279C, 283, 291, 292, 293, 294  and 297 and ORS 35.550 to 35.575, 180.060, 180.210 to
180.235, 183.710 to 183.730, 183.745, 183.750, 184.305 to 184.345, 190.430, 190.480,  190.490, 192.105,
200.035, 243.105 to 243.585, 243.696, 243.853 to 243.855, 278.011 to 278.120, 278.315 to 278.415, 279.835
to 279.855, 282.010 to 282.150, 283.085 to 283.092, 357.805 to 357.895 and  656.017 (2) do not apply to
the university or any not-for-profit organization or other  entity if the equity of the entity is owned
exclusively by the university and if the organization or entity  is created by the university to ad-
vance any of the university’s statutory missions.
(3) The university, as a distinct governmental entity, or any organization or entity described  in
subsection (2) of this section is not subject to  any provision of law enacted after January 1, 1995,
with respect to any governmental entity, unless  the provision specifically provides that it applies to
the university or to the organization or entity.
(4) For purposes of determining the salary, as defined in ORS 238A.005 [ (17)] (18), paid between
August 29, 2003, and January  1, 2020, to a member of the Public Employees Retirement System,
remuneration paid to a member of the system in  return for services to the university is deemed
includable in the member’s taxable income under Oregon law during a period of continuous em-
ployment with the Oregon Health and Science University if:
(a) The member was hired in a qualifying position,  as defined in ORS 238A.005, by the university
on or after August 29, 2003; and
(b) The remuneration was, or would have been if the  member were an Oregon resident,
includable  in  the member’s taxable income under Oregon law during the period of continuous em-
ployment.
SECTION 12.
(1) The amendments to ORS  238.005 by section 1 of this 2024 Act apply only
to a person who:
[16]
HB 4157
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
(a) Is employed as a district attorney on the effective date of this 2024 Act; or
(b) Becomes employed as a district attorney after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
(2) A  person who is employed as a district attorney on or after the effective date of this
2024 Act is entitled to service under the Public Employees Retirement  System as a police
officer only for service performed as a district attorney  on or after the effective date of this
2024 Act.
SECTION 13.
The amendments to ORS 238A.160 by  section 4 of this 2024 Act apply to
members of the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan whose effective date  of retirement
is on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 14. (1) The amendments to ORS 238A.005, 238A.125, 238A.134, 238A.160, 238A.220,
238A.240, 338.135, 352.138 and 353.100 by sections 2, 3 and 5 to 11 of this 2024 Act become op-
erative on January 1, 2030.
(2) The amendments to ORS 238A.125 by section 3 of this 2024 Act apply only to service
in a hazardous position performed on or  after the operative date specified in subsection (1)
of this section.
(3) A member is of normal retirement  age for purposes of ORS 238A.160 (3) if the mem-
ber, on or after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Meets the age or age and retirement credit requirements of ORS 238A.160 (3); and
(b) For the last 60 months of service preceding  retirement eligibility under ORS 238A.160
(3), held one or more positions that would qualify  as hazardous positions, as defined in ORS
238A.005.
(4) The Public Employees Retirement  Board may take any action before the operative
date specified in subsection (1)  of this section to enable the board to exercise, on and after
the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the  board by the amendments to ORS 238A.005, 238A.125, 238A.134,
238A.160, 238A.220, 238A.240, 338.135, 352.138 and 353.100 by sections 2, 3 and 5 to 11 of  this
2024 Act.
[17]