Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 3 of this 2021 Act:
(1) “Acquire” means to purchase, lease or accept by donation or gift.
(2) “Executive department” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.112.
(3) “Face recognition” means the automated searching for a reference image in an image
repository by comparing the facial features of a probe image with the  features of images
contained in an image repository, and that typically results in either:
(a) One or more likely match candidates or candidate images, ranked by  computer-
evaluated similarity; or
(b) A negative result.
(4) “Face recognition technology” means an automated or semi-automated process using
face recognition that assists in identifying, verifying,  detecting or characterizing facial fea-
tures of an individual or capturing information about an  individual based on an individual’s
face.
(5) “State agency” means a board, commission, department, division, office or other  en-
tity within the executive department, except:
(a) The Secretary of State;
(b) The State Treasurer;
(c) The Oregon State Lottery; and
(d) A public university that is listed in ORS 352.002.
SECTION 2.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a state agency may
not:
(a) Acquire, evaluate or use face recognition technology;
(b) Knowingly acquire, request,  use, access or retain any information derived from face
recognition technology or intentionally  collect information to be used for face recognition
technology;
(c) Direct an entity  that is not a state agency to acquire or use face recognition tech-
nology on  behalf of the state agency unless the acquisition or use is otherwise authorized
under this section; or
(d) Knowingly allow an  entity that is not a state agency to use face recognition technol-
ogy on real property that is owned or leased  by the state unless the use by a state agency
would otherwise be allowed under this section.
(2)(a) A state agency may use face recognition technology:
(A) For  verification purposes to allow officers or employees of the state agency to access
their own personal or state agency-issued personal communication and electronic devices;
(B) As part of automatic face detection services in social media applications; or
(C) In  detecting faces for the sole purpose of redacting a recording for release or disclo-
sure in order to protect the privacy of a subject depicted in the recording.
(b) A  state agency may acquire, request, use, access or retain information that was de-
[2]
SB 309
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
rived from face recognition  technology prior to the effective date of this 2021 Act to the ex-
tent that such acquisition, request, use, access or retention is required by the public  records
law, ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(3)(a) As soon as a state agency learns  that it has inadvertently or unintentionally re-
ceived, accessed or used information obtained from face recognition technology,  the state
agency shall:
(A) Immediately cease use of the information;
(B) Document the receipt, access or use of the information in an impact report; and
(C) Submit the impact report to the office of the State Chief Information Officer in  the
manner provided for by the State Chief Information Officer by rule.
(b) An impact report required by this section must include:
(A) The  date the information obtained from face recognition technology was received,
accessed or used;
(B) The source of the information;
(C) A description or summary of the incident;
(D) Whether the state agency accessed or used  the information in the course of the state
agency’s operations; and
(E) The corrective measures taken by the state agency to prevent further  transmission
or use of any information inadvertently or unintentionally obtained through the use of  face
recognition technology.
(c) The State Chief Information Officer shall include information contained  in impact
reports received under this  section in the biennial assessment required under ORS 276A.203
(4)(a)(G).
(4) The office of the  State Chief Information Officer shall provide public education re-
garding the scope and limitations of the prohibitions set forth in this section.
(5) The State Chief Information Officer may adopt  rules to implement the provisions of
sections 1 to 3 of this 2021  Act. Rules adopted under this subsection must align with and
support the Enterprise Information Resources Management Strategy described in ORS
276A.203.
SECTION 3.
(1) A person injured by a material violation by a state agency of section  2
of this 2021 Act may bring an action against the state  in circuit court for injunctive relief,
declaratory relief or writ of mandamus to require the  agency to comply with section 2 of this
2021 Act.
(2) At least  30 days before initiating an action under subsection (1) of this section, the
person bringing the action must provide  written notice to the Attorney General. If the
agency has not corrected the  violation of section 2 of this 2021 Act at the end of the thirty-
day notice period, the person may initiate the action under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) If an agency corrects  a violation after receiving notice under subsection (2) of this
section, the agency shall post a notice that describes  the corrective measures taken to ad-
dress the violation in a conspicuous space on  the agency’s website and on the Oregon
transparency website described in ORS 276A.253.
SECTION 4. No later than 90 days after the effective date  of this 2021 Act, each state
agency, as that  term is defined in section 1 of this 2021 Act, shall provide to the office of the
State Chief Information Officer the results of an assessment  of whether face recognition
technology is in use at the state agency and detailing  the scope of any such use. The results
[3]
SB 309
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
of the assessment shall be made publicly available.
SECTION 5.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Face recognition technology” has the meaning given that term in section 1 of this
2021 Act.
(b) “State agency” has the meaning given that term in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
(c) “Surveillance technology” includes any software, electronic  device or system utilizing
an electronic device, which is designed or primarily intended to collect,  retain, analyze, pro-
cess or share information that:
(A) Is geographic data as defined in ORS 276A.203,  information in an audio, electronic,
visual, thermal, olfactory or biometric  format, or other information of a similar type or in
a similar format; and
(B) Is specifically associated with, or capable of being associated with, any individual or
group.
(2) The State Chief Information Officer, in consultation with  state agencies, shall study
the adoption of a comprehensive framework  for addressing the appropriate use or prohibition
of surveillance technology, including face recognition technology and the information  derived
from face recognition technology.
(3) The study required by this section shall include:
(a) A review of the assessments provided to the office  by state agencies under section 4
of this 2021 Act; and
(b) An assessment of state agency staff and budget resources necessary to:
(A) Establish statewide privacy policies and procedures;
(B) Develop effective privacy assessment tools;
(C) Create guidelines for acquiring,  using or sharing information derived from surveil-
lance technologies;
(D) Design and implement public engagement processes, with a focus on  underserved
communities; and
(E) Create decision-making structures for managing  data derived from surveillance
technologies.
(4) The office shall provide the results  of the study in a report that may include recom-
mendations for  legislation, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the interim Joint Leg-
islative Committee on Information Management and  Technology no later than September 15,
2023.
SECTION 6.
Sections 4 and 5 of this 2021 Act are repealed on January 2, 2024.
[4]