Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning  July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000 for  distribution to the Carlson Col-
lege of Veterinary  Medicine at Oregon State University to be used to support veterinary ed-
ucation programs and the college’s Lois Bates Acheson Veterinary Teaching Hospital.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning  July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $3,500,000 for  distribution to the Oregon
Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory at Oregon State University to  be used to support faculty
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2503
HB 2167
1
2
3
4
5
and personnel working on zoonotic diseases and chronic wasting disease.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2025.
[2]