Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) There is established in the State  Parks and Recreation Department the
Outdoor Therapy Grant Program, to be administered by the Office of  Outdoor Recreation,
for the purpose of providing grants on an annual, competitive basis  from the Outdoor Ther-
apy Grant Program Fund established under  section 2 of this 2019 Act to be used to enhance
outdoor environmental, ecological, agricultural and  other natural resource-based therapy
programs in this state.
(2) The Office of Outdoor  Recreation shall develop an application form that eligible ap-
plicants must complete and submit to be considered for receipt of a  grant under this section.
(4)(a) The office shall develop criteria to determine eligibility of grant  applicants and
proposed projects, taking into consideration the following:
(A) Utilization of public-private partnerships;
(B) Innovation in increasing the availability and use of outdoor recreation facilities;
(C) Consideration for  the economics of installation or implementation to provide the
greatest cost-benefit ratio;
(D) Commitment of matching and in-kind resources;
(E) Utilization of state parks and other natural  resource venues and personnel as a re-
source;
(F) Contributions to healthy lifestyles through outdoor recreation and sound nutrition;
(G) Contributions to the statewide network of facilities or programs;
(H) Encouragement of community involvement;
(I) Encouragement of sound environmental practices;
(J) Maximization of the number of participants who can be served;
(K) Increased opportunities  to experience the out-of-doors directly and to understand
nature and the natural world;
(L) Ongoing program evaluations, assessments and reporting of effectiveness;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2107
SB 588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(M) Utilization of research-based, effective environmental, ecological, agricultural  or
other natural resource-based therapy; and
(N) Demonstration of innovative approaches to outdoor-based therapy.
(b) The criteria may prioritize programs that:
(A) Utilize veterans for at least 50 percent of program implementation or  administration;
(B) Will commit matching and in-kind resources;
(C) Create public-private partnerships;
(D) Maximize the number of participants  who can be served, particularly participants
who are veterans or who are recovering from substance abuse or  physical or mental trauma;
(E) Make use of research-based, effective environmental, ecological,  agricultural or other
natural resource-based therapy;
(F) Provide residents of this state with  opportunities to directly experience and under-
stand nature and the natural world; and
(G) Include ongoing program evaluation,  assessment and reporting of program’s effec-
tiveness.
(c) Activities eligible for funding under this section include, but are  not limited to, those
that assist veterans, people recovering from substance abuse and  people recovering from
physical or mental trauma, and that  incorporate outdoor recreation, outdoor environmental
studies, agriculture, conservation, ecology,  stewardship or restoration or other natural
resource-based activities.
(d) The following activities are ineligible for funding under this section:
(A) Activities that may be perceived to lobby or advocate for political purposes;
(B) Activities that are not in compliance with local, state and federal laws; and
(C) Organized youth sports such as a community league or school team.
(5) The office shall provide technical assistance and project  overview and monitoring for
successful grant recipients.
(6) The office may, as a condition to receiving grant funding, require matching funds in
an amount to be determined by the office.
(7) All  amounts awarded as grants must be used by recipients, for the approved purposes
set forth in successful grant applications, within  three years of receipt of the funds. Any
funds not expended within that time period must be returned to the office for deposit  in the
Outdoor Therapy Grant Program Fund.
(8) The department, in consultation with  the office, shall adopt rules to implement the
grant program and the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Outdoor Therapy Grant Program Fund is established in  the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) Moneys in the Outdoor Therapy Grant Program Fund consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts appropriated  or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative As-
sembly;
(c) Amounts deposited in the fund;
(d) Investment earnings received on moneys in the fund;
(e) Unused grant moneys returned pursuant to section 1 (7) of this 2019 Act; and
(f) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
SECTION 3.
(1) Sections 1 and 2 of this 2019 Act become operative on January 2, 2020.
[2]
SB 588
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
(2) The State Parks and  Recreation Department and the Office of Outdoor Recreation
may take any action before the operative date specified in subsection (1)  of this section that
is necessary for the department or office to exercise, on and  after the operative date speci-
fied in subsection (1) of this section, all of the functions and powers conferred on the de-
partment and office by sections 1 and 2 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]