Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS chapter 657B.
SECTION 2. (1) A worker leasing company may amend a combined quarterly report filed
with the  Department of Revenue under ORS 657B.150 detailing any employer contribution
amounts paid by the worker leasing company on behalf of a client employer on or  after
January 1, 2023.
(2)(a) If the department determines pursuant to  an amended combined quarterly report
submitted under subsection (1) of this section that a refund is due to a worker leasing com-
pany for employer contribution amounts required under ORS 657B.150 and paid on behalf of
a client employer on or  after January 1, 2023, the Director of the Employment Department
shall issue a refund to the worker leasing company.
(b) The Employment Department  may not allow or make a refund to a worker leasing
company after three years from  the date on which the worker leasing company paid an em-
ployer contribution amount due under ORS 657B.150 on behalf of a client employer.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 657B.010, as amended by sections 3 and 4, chapter 20,  Oregon Laws 2024, and
section 29, chapter 75, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
657B.010. As used in this chapter:
(1) “Alternate base  year” means the last four completed calendar quarters preceding the benefit
year.
(2) “Average  weekly wage” means the amount calculated by the Employment Department as the
state average weekly covered wage under ORS 657.150 (4)(e) as determined not more than once  per
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1853
SB 1052
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
year.
(3) “Base year” means the first  four of the last five completed calendar quarters preceding the
benefit year.
(4) “Benefits” means family and medical leave insurance benefits.
(5)(a) “Benefit year” means, except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a period of
52 consecutive weeks beginning on the  Sunday immediately preceding the date on which family
leave, medical leave or safe leave commences.
(b) “Benefit year” means, in the event that the 52-week period described in paragraph (a) of  this
subsection would result in an overlap of any quarter of the base year of a previously filed  valid
claim, a period of 53 consecutive weeks  beginning on the Sunday immediately preceding the date
on which family leave, medical leave or safe leave commences.
(6) “Child” means:
(a) A biological child,  adopted child, stepchild or foster child of a covered individual or of the
covered individual’s spouse or domestic partner;
(b) A  person who is or was a legal ward of a covered individual or of the covered individual’s
spouse or domestic partner; or
(c) A person who is or  was in a relationship of in loco parentis with a covered individual or
with the covered individual’s spouse or domestic partner.
(7) “Claimant” means an individual who has submitted an application or established  a claim for
benefits.
(8) “Client employer” means an employer that  enters into a contractual agreement with
a worker leasing company.
[(8)] (9) “Contribution” or “contributions” means the money payments made by any  of the fol-
lowing under ORS 657B.150:
(a) An employer;
(b) An employee;
(c) A self-employed individual;
(d) A tribal government; or
(e) An employee of a tribal government.
[(9)] (10) “Covered individual” means any one  of the following who qualifies under ORS 657B.015
to receive family and medical leave insurance benefits:
(a) An eligible employee;
(b) A self-employed individual; or
(c) An employee of a tribal government.
[(10)] (11) “Domestic partner” means an individual joined in a domestic partnership.
[(11)] (12) “Domestic partnership” has the meaning given that term in ORS 106.310.
[(12)] (13) “Eligible employee” means:
(a)(A) An employee who has earned at least $1,000 in wages during the base year; or
(B) If an employee has not earned at least $1,000  in wages during the base year, an employee
who has earned at least $1,000 in wages during the alternate base year; and
(b) An employee to whom  paid family and medical leave insurance benefits may be available
under ORS 657B.015.
[(13)] (14) “Eligible employee’s average weekly wage” means an  amount calculated by the Di-
rector of the Employment Department by dividing the total wages earned by an eligible  employee
during the base year by the number of weeks in the base year.
[2]
SB 1052
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(14)(a)] (15)(a) “Employee” means:
(A) An individual performing services for an employer for remuneration or under any  contract
of hire, written or oral, express or implied.
(B) A home care worker as defined in ORS 410.600.
(b) “Employee” does not include:
(A) An independent contractor as defined in ORS 670.600.
(B) A participant in a work training program  administered under a state or federal assistance
program.
(C) A participant in a work-study program that provides students in secondary or postsecondary
educational institutions with employment opportunities for financial assistance or  vocational train-
ing.
(D) A railroad worker exempted under the federal Railroad Unemployment Insurance Act.
(E) A volunteer.
(F) A judge as defined in ORS 260.005.
(G) A member of the Legislative Assembly.
(H) A holder of public office as defined in ORS 260.005.
[(15)(a)] (16)(a) “Employer” means any person that  employs one or more employees working
anywhere in this state or any agent or employee of such person to whom the duties  of the person
under this chapter have been delegated.
(b) “Employer” includes:
(A) A  political subdivision of this state or any county, city, district, authority or public corpo-
ration, or  any instrumentality of a county, city, district, authority or public corporation, organized
and existing under law or charter;
(B) An individual;
(C) Any  type of organization, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, association,
trust, estate, joint stock company or insurance company;
(D) Any successor in interest to an entity described in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph;
(E) A trustee, trustee in bankruptcy or receiver; or
(F) A trustee or legal representative of a deceased person.
(c) “Employer” does not include the federal government or a tribal government.
[(16)] (17) “Employment agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 658.005.
[(17)] (18) “Family and medical leave insurance benefits” means the wage replacement benefits
that are available to a covered individual under ORS  657B.050 or under the terms of an employer
plan approved under ORS 657B.210, for family leave, medical leave or safe leave.
[(18)(a)] (19)(a) “Family leave” means leave from work taken by a covered individual:
(A) To care for and bond with a child during the first year after the child’s birth or during the
first year after the placement of the child through foster care or adoption;
(B) To effectuate the legal  process required for placement of a foster child or the adoption of
a child; or
(C) To care for a family member with a serious health condition.
(b) “Family leave” does not mean:
(A) Leave described in ORS 659A.159 (1)(a) except for leave  to care for a child who requires
home care due to an illness, injury or condition that is a serious health condition;
(B) Leave described in ORS 659A.159 (1)(b); or
(C) Leave authorized under ORS 659A.093.
[3]
SB 1052
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(19)] (20) “Family member” means:
(a) The spouse of a covered individual;
(b) A child or the child’s spouse or domestic partner;
(c) A parent or the parent’s spouse or domestic partner;
(d) A sibling or stepsibling of a covered individual or  the sibling’s or stepsibling’s spouse or
domestic partner;
(e) A grandparent of a covered individual or the grandparent’s spouse or domestic partner;
(f) A grandchild of a covered individual or the grandchild’s spouse or domestic partner;
(g) The domestic partner of a covered individual; or
(h) Any individual related by blood or affinity whose close association with a covered individual
is the equivalent of a family relationship.
[(20)] (21) “Medical leave” means leave from  work taken by a covered individual that is made
necessary by the individual’s own serious health condition.
[(21)] (22) “Parent” means:
(a) A biological parent, adoptive parent, stepparent or foster parent of a covered individual;
(b) A person who was a foster parent of a covered individual when  the covered individual was
a minor;
(c) A person designated  as the legal guardian of a covered individual at the time the covered
individual was a minor or required a legal guardian;
(d) A person with whom a covered individual was or is in a relationship of in loco parentis; or
(e) A parent of a covered individual’s spouse or domestic partner who meets a  description under
paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection.
[(22)] (23) “Safe leave” means leave taken for any purpose described in ORS 659A.272.
[(23)] (24) “Self-employed individual” means:
(a) An individual who  has self-employment income as defined in section 1402(b) of the Internal
Revenue Code as amended and in effect on December 31, 2023; or
(b) An independent contractor as defined in ORS 670.600.
[(24)] (25) “Serious health condition” means:
(a) An illness, injury, impairment or physical or mental condition that requires  inpatient care
in a hospital, hospice or residential medical care facility;
(b) An illness, disease or condition that in the medical judgment of  the treating health care
provider poses an imminent danger of death, is terminal in prognosis  with a reasonable possibility
of death in the near future, or requires constant care;
(c) Any period of disability due to pregnancy, or period of absence for prenatal care; or
(d) Any period of absence for the donation of a body part, organ or tissue, including preoperative
or diagnostic services, surgery, post-operative treatment and recovery.
[(25)] (26) “Third party administrator” means a third party that enters into an agreement  with
the Director of the Employment Department  to implement and administer the paid family and med-
ical leave program established under this chapter.
[(26)] (27) “Tribal government” means:
(a) A tribal government as defined in ORS 181A.940; or
(b) A federally recognized Indian tribe.
[(27)(a)] (28) “Wages” has the meaning given that term in ORS 657.105.
(b) “Wages” does not mean contribution amounts  paid to the Paid Family and Medical Leave
Insurance Fund by an employer on behalf of an employee under ORS 657B.150 [ (5)] (6).
[4]
SB 1052
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(29) “Worker  leasing company” means a worker leasing company licensed under ORS
656.855 that:
(a) Pursuant to a contractual agreement and  for a fee, furnishes workers to a client
employer; and
(b) Reports wages and pays contributions due under ORS 657B.150 on behalf of a client
employer.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 657B.150 is amended to read:
657B.150. (1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3) [ and (4) ], (4) and (5)  of this
section and ORS 657B.210 (4), all employers and employees shall contribute to  the Paid Family and
Medical Leave Insurance Fund established under ORS 657B.430.
(b) Contributions shall be paid by employers and employees as a percentage of a total  rate de-
termined by the Director of the Employment Department.
(c) The total rate may not exceed one percent of employee  wages, up to a maximum amount in
wages that is equivalent to the Social Security  contribution and benefit base limit established by the
United States Social Security Administration for purposes of the federal Old-Age,  Survivors, and
Disability Insurance program limits pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 430.
(2)(a) Employer contributions shall be paid in an  amount that is equal to 40 percent of the total
rate determined by the director.
(b) An employer shall deduct employee contributions from the wages of each employee  in an
amount that is equal to 60 percent of the total rate determined by the director.
(3) When an employment agency is acting as an employer, the employer  contributions required
under this section shall be the responsibility of the employment agency.
(4) A  worker leasing company is not responsible for paying the employer contribution
amounts required under  this section on behalf of a client employer that employs fewer than
25 employees.
[(4)(a)] (5)(a) Employers that employ fewer than 25 employees are  not required to pay the em-
ployer contributions under subsection (1) of this section.
(b) If an employer that employs fewer than 25 employees elects to pay  the employer contribu-
tions under  subsection (1) of this section, the employer may apply to receive a grant under ORS
657B.200.
[(5)] (6) Notwithstanding subsection  (1) of this section, an employer may elect to pay the re-
quired employee contributions, in whole or in part, as an employer-offered benefit.
[(6)] (7) Subject to ORS 657B.130 (2)  and (3), a self-employed individual who has elected coverage
under ORS  657B.130 (1) shall contribute to the fund, at a rate that may not exceed one percent of
the individual’s taxable income, up to a maximum amount that is equivalent to the Social  Security
contribution and benefit base limit  established by the United States Social Security Administration
for purposes of the federal  Old-Age, Survivors, and Disability Insurance program limits pursuant to
42 U.S.C. 430, as determined by the director by rule, for a period of  not less than three years from
the date that the election becomes effective.
[(7)] (8) A tribal government that elects coverage  under ORS 657B.130 and employees of the
tribal government  shall contribute to the fund in contribution amounts and at a rate that may not
exceed one percent of employee wages, up to a maximum amount in  wages that is equivalent to the
Social Security contribution and benefit  base limit established by the United States Social Security
Administration for purposes of the federal  Old-Age, Survivors, and Disability Insurance program
limits pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 430, as determined  by the director by rule, for a period of not less than
[5]
SB 1052
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
three years from the date that the election becomes effective.
[(8)] (9) The director shall set rates for the collection of payroll  contributions consistent with
subsection (1) of this section and in a manner such that:
(a) At the end of the period  for which the rates are effective, the balance of moneys in the fund
is an amount not less than six months’ worth of projected expenditures from the fund  for perform-
ance of the functions and duties of the director under this chapter; and
(b) The volatility of the contribution rates is minimized.
[(9)] (10) No later  than December 15 of each year, for  purposes of subsections  (1)(c), [ (6) and
(7)] (7) and (8)  of this section, the director shall annually adjust the maximum  amount of employee
wages for the calendar year immediately following to  align with the contributions and benefit base
limit established by the United  States Social Security Administration for purposes of the federal
Old-Age, Survivors, and Disability Insurance program limits pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 430.
[(10)] (11) The director  shall determine on an annual basis the amount of payroll contributions,
timing of payroll contributions and maximum  employee contributions sufficient to finance the costs
related to the provisions of this chapter.
[(11)] (12) An employer shall hold any  moneys collected under this section in trust for the State
of Oregon and for the payment thereof to the Department of Revenue in the manner described in
subsection [ (12)] (13) of this section.
[(12)(a)] (13)(a) An employer shall make and file a combined  quarterly report of wages earned
and contributions paid under this section on a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue.
(b) The report shall be filed with the  Department of Revenue on or before the last day of the
month following the quarter  to which the report relates and shall be deemed received on the date
of mailing.
(c) The report shall be accompanied by  payment of any contributions due under this section in
a manner determined by the Department of Revenue by rule.
[(13)] (14) Moneys  collected under this section shall be deposited in the Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance Fund established under ORS 657B.430.
[(14)(a)] (15)(a) If an employer ceases or discontinues  operations or business, or sells out, ex-
changes or otherwise disposes of the business or stock of goods, any payroll contribution payable
under this section is immediately due and payable, and the employer  shall, within 10 calendar days,
pay the payroll contribution due. Any person  who becomes a successor in interest to the business
is liable for the full amount of the unpaid payroll contribution.
(b) The director shall adopt rules for compliance with this chapter with  regard to contributions
from an employer’s successor in interest.
[(15)] (16) Benefits may not be denied to a covered individual solely because an  employer failed
to collect or remit the contributions required under this section.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 657B.360 is amended to read:
657B.360. (1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, for purposes of  ORS 657B.060 and
657B.150, the Director  of the Employment Department shall establish by rule a method to determine
on an annual basis the number of employees employed  by an employer. The method shall require
that the determination be based  on the average number of employees employed by the employer in
the 12-month period immediately preceding the date on which the determination is made.
(2) A replacement worker who is hired to temporarily  replace an eligible employee during a
period of family leave,  medical leave or safe leave shall not be counted as an employee for purposes
of determining the number of employees employed by an employer.
[6]
SB 1052
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) For purposes of determining liability for employer  contributions described under ORS
657B.150, with respect to a worker leasing company, the Employment  Department shall apply
the method for making such a determination under  subsection (1) of this section, based on
the number of employees employed  separately by each respective client employer with which
the worker leasing company contracts.
SECTION 6.
 Section 2, chapter 19, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Family leave for parental bonding” means the  family leave described under ORS 657B.010
[(18)(a)(A)] (19)(a)(A).
(b) “Grant” means a grant described under ORS 657B.200.
(c) “Projected expenses” means benefits anticipated to be claimed  by covered individuals under
ORS 657B.090, anticipated  grant awards, any anticipated costs and expenses associated with pro-
cessing payments of the benefits  and grant awards and any other expenses anticipated to be in-
curred by the Employment Department in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.
(d) “Solvency of the fund” and “solvent” mean that the cumulative  amount of contributions
collected under the provisions of this chapter and any other moneys deposited in the fund are suf-
ficient to pay, in full and in a timely manner, not less than six months of projected expenses.
(2) The Director of the Employment Department shall periodically assess the Paid  Family and
Medical Leave Insurance Fund established under ORS 657B.430 to make determinations  regarding
the solvency of  the fund. The director shall use actuarial calculations in making such determinations
and may consider any relevant information including, but not limited to:
(a) The total cost of administrative expenses incurred by the  department during the six-month
period immediately preceding a periodic assessment of the fund.
(b) The number of grant applications received by the department in the  calendar year imme-
diately preceding a periodic assessment of the fund.
(c) The total grants awarded in  the calendar year immediately preceding a periodic assessment
of the fund.
(d) The  average amount of weekly benefits paid in the calendar year immediately preceding a
periodic assessment of the fund.
(e) Annual predictable birth rate data.
(3) Notwithstanding any other  provision under this chapter, if, pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section, the director determines that the fund is or may be  insolvent, the director may take any of
the following actions to maintain or restore the solvency of the fund:
(a) Adjust the maximum weekly benefit  amount provided under ORS 657B.050 (2)(a) so that the
maximum weekly benefit amount is less than 120 percent but not less than 100 percent of the aver-
age weekly wage.
(b) Adjust the weekly benefit amount available  to eligible employees under ORS 657B.050 (1)(b)
such that the employee’s weekly benefit amount is the sum of:
(A) 65 percent of the average weekly wage; and
(B) Not less than 40 percent of the employee’s average weekly wage that  is greater than 65
percent of the average weekly wage.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision under this chapter:
(a) Except as provided  in paragraph (b) of this subsection, if, after taking both of the actions
authorized under  subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section, it is apparent to the director that the fund
is or  may be insolvent, the director may reduce the number of weeks that would otherwise be
[7]
SB 1052
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
available to a covered individual under ORS 657B.020 (1) to reflect that a  covered individual may
qualify for 10 weeks of family and medical leave insurance benefits per  benefit year for family leave,
medical leave and safe leave taken individually or in any combination.
(b) Nothing in this subsection authorizes the director to reduce the number of weeks that would
otherwise be available to a covered individual under ORS 657B.020 (1) for family leave for parental
bonding taken individually or in combination with:
(A) Other family leave, medical leave or safe leave; and
(B) The leave for which a covered individual may qualify under ORS 657B.020 (3).
(5)(a) Whenever  an adjustment to benefits occurs as a result of any action taken by the director
pursuant to subsections (3) and (4) of this section,  the adjustment shall remain effective for not more
than five calendar years from the date on which the action was taken.
(b) The director shall  discontinue the use of this section to determine appropriate benefits and
shall resume determining benefits in accordance with ORS 657B.020 and  657B.050 not later than
whichever of the following first occurs:
(A) Upon the director’s determination that resuming  determinations in accordance with the
provisions of those sections will not cause  volatility in the fund or with respect to the adminis-
tration of the family and medical leave insurance program.
(B) The date described under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(6) Any action taken by the director under  this section shall apply to benefits to be claimed in
benefit years beginning on or after the first day of the  first calendar quarter following the date on
which the action was taken.
(7) The  director shall provide at least 30 days’ advance notice to the public of any changes to
benefits resulting from any action taken by the director  under this section, including the effective
date of such changes. The director shall give notice to the public  by posting the information on the
website maintained by the department.
SECTION 7.
 Section 2, chapter 66, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Grant” means a grant awarded under ORS 657B.200.
(b) “Solvency of the fund” and “solvent” mean that the cumulative  amount of contributions
collected under the provisions of this chapter and deposited  in the fund are sufficient to pay, in full
and in a timely manner, the benefits anticipated to be  claimed by covered individuals under ORS
657B.090, grants awarded under  ORS 657B.200 and any costs and expenses associated with process-
ing payments of the benefits and grant awards.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision under this chapter:
(a) No later than August 11, 2023, the Director of  the Employment Department shall determine
whether the fund is solvent with respect to the benefits anticipated to  be claimed and any grant
moneys anticipated to be awarded on or after September 3, 2023.
(b) If, pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection, the director determines that the fund is:
(A) Solvent, the director shall commence paying benefits and  any grant awards on September
3, 2023.
(B) Insolvent, the director shall delay the start  of benefit payments and grant awards until De-
cember 3, 2023, and make further quarterly determinations of the solvency of the fund under sub-
section (3) of this section.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter:
(a)(A) If, pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the director determines that the fund is in-
[8]
SB 1052
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
solvent, the director shall, on a quarterly basis, determine whether the fund is solvent with  respect
to the benefits anticipated to be claimed and any grants anticipated to be awarded beginning with
the first week of the last month of the current calendar quarter.
(B) Each quarterly determination shall  be made no later than two weeks immediately following
the date on which the combined quarterly reports are due under ORS 657B.150 [ (12)] (13).
(b) If, pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection, the director determines that the fund is:
(A) Solvent,  the director shall commence paying benefits and any grant awards in accordance
with paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(B) Insolvent, the director shall continue making quarterly determinations of the  solvency of the
fund, as provided under paragraph (a) of this subsection, until the fund is determined to be solvent.
(c) The director  shall commence benefit payments and grant awards under this subsection be-
ginning with  the first week of the last month of the current calendar quarter or 30 days following
the notice provided to employers and  covered individuals under subsection (4) of this section re-
garding the commencement of benefits or grants, whichever is later.
(4) The director shall provide at least 30 days’ advance notice to employers and  covered indi-
viduals before commencing benefit payments or grants under subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 8.
The amendments to ORS 657B.010, 657B.150 and 657B.360 by sections  3, 4,
and 5 of this 2025 Act apply to employer contribution amounts paid by a worker leasing
company on behalf of a client employer on or after January 1, 2023.
SECTION 9.
(1) Section 2 of this 2025  Act, the amendments to ORS 657B.010, 657B.150 and
657B.360 by sections 3, 4 and 5 of  this 2025 Act and the amendments to section 2, chapter 66,
Oregon Laws 2023, and section 2, chapter 19, Oregon Laws 2024, by  sections 6 and 7 of this
2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2026.
(2) The Employment Department may  take any action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the department  to exercise, on
and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all the duties, func-
tions and powers conferred on the department by section 2 of  this 2025 Act and the amend-
ments to ORS 657B.010, 657B.150 and 657B.360 by sections 3, 4 and 5 of this 2025  Act and the
amendments to  section 2, chapter 66, Oregon Laws 2023, and section 2, chapter 19, Oregon
Laws 2024, by sections 6 and 7 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 10.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[9]