Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 350.285 is amended to read:
350.285. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Child” means  a child, adopted child or stepchild of either a service member or a Purple
Heart recipient.
(b) “Eligible post-secondary institution” means:
(A) A public university listed in ORS 352.002 ;
(B) A community college operated under ORS chapter 341;
(C) An apprenticeship program that is registered with the State Apprenticeship and
Training Council and  is partnered with a community college operated under ORS chapter
341; and
[(B)] (D) The Oregon Health and Science University.
(c) “Purple Heart recipient” means a person, alive or deceased[ , who ]:
(A) Who was relieved or discharged from service in the Armed  Forces of the United States with
either an honorable discharge or a general discharge under honorable conditions; [ and]
(B) Who was awarded the Purple Heart in 2001 or thereafter for wounds received in combat[ .];
and
(C) Whose  home of record at the time of entry into active duty with the Armed Forces
of the United States was Oregon, as indicated on a federal DD Form 214 or 215.
(d) “Qualified student” means a child, a spouse or an unremarried  surviving spouse of a service
member or a child of a Purple Heart recipient.
(e) “Service member” means a person who:
(A) As a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, died on active duty;
(B) As a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, died as  a result of a military service
connected disability; or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4001
HB 3534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Is [ 100] at least 80  percent disabled as the result of a military service connected  disability,
as certified by the United States Department of Veterans  Affairs or any branch of the Armed Forces
of the United States.
(2) Subject to subsections (3) to (7) of this section, an  eligible post-secondary institution shall
waive tuition , fees and the  cost of textbooks  for a qualified student for courses that may lead to
an apprenticeship certificate, an associate degree,  a baccalaureate degree or a  master’s degree.
A qualified student who received a tuition waiver  for an apprenticeship certificate or an as-
sociate degree may also qualify for a tuition waiver for  a baccalaureate degree.  A qualified
student who received a tuition waiver for a baccalaureate degree may also qualify  for a tuition
waiver for a master’s degree.
(3)(a) The maximum waiver granted under this section shall be as follows:
(A) For apprenticeship courses and certificates and associate degrees,  the total number
of credit hours that equals two years of full-time attendance at an eligible  post-secondary
institution if the qualified student has opted not to accept a grant  from the Oregon Promise
program described in ORS 341.522, if the qualified student is eligible for the grant.
[(A)] (B)  For a baccalaureate  degree, the total number of credit hours that equals four years
of full-time attendance at an eligible post-secondary institution  if  the baccalaureate degree is
completed within 10 semesters or 15 terms after initiation of the waiver .
[(B)] (C) For a master’s degree, the total number of credit hours that equals two years of full-
time attendance at an  eligible post-secondary institution  if the master’s degree is completed
within six semesters or nine terms after initiation of the waiver .
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a  waiver may not exceed the total number
of credit hours  the qualified student needs to graduate with an apprenticeship certificate, an as-
sociate degree, a baccalaureate degree or a master’s degree.
(4) A waiver may be granted under this  section only for credit hours for courses that are offered
by an eligible post-secondary institution and are available for enrollment.
(5) A qualified student may receive a waiver under this section if the student:
(a) At the time of application  for a waiver, is considered a resident of this state for the purpose
of determining tuition to be paid at an eligible post-secondary institution; and
(b) Has been admitted to an eligible post-secondary institution for an apprenticeship program
registered with the State Apprenticeship  and Training Council, an associate degree program,
a baccalaureate degree program or [ has been admitted to ] a  master’s degree program [ at an eligible
post-secondary institution ].
(6)(a) A child who applies for a waiver under this section must be [ 23] 25 years of age or
younger at the time the child applies for a waiver.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a child who  is older than [ 23] 25 years of
age is eligible for a waiver for a master’s degree if the child:
(A) Applied for and received a waiver for a baccalaureate degree  when the child was [ 23] 25
years of age or younger; and
(B) Applied for a  waiver for a master’s degree within 12 months of receiving a baccalaureate
degree.
(7)(a) The amount of tuition waived under this section may  not be reduced by the amount of any
federal aid scholarships or grants, awards from  the Oregon Opportunity Grant program established
under ORS 348.205, or any other aid from the eligible post-secondary institution, received by the
qualified student.
[2]
HB 3534
1
2
3
4
5
6
(b) The  amount of tuition waived under this section may not be reduced by the amount of any
Survivors’ and Dependents’ Educational  Assistance under 38 U.S.C. chapter 35 paid to a qualified
student.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]