Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall develop a  plan for
enabling community colleges to offer an associate’s degree that is  completed in coordination
with credits earned in an apprenticeship or training program that is:
(a) Four years or greater in length; and
(b) Registered with the State Apprenticeship  and Training Council in conformity with
ORS 660.002 to 660.210.
(2) The plan developed under subsection (1) of this section shall:
(a) Ensure that participation in an apprenticeship or training program will satisfy any
mathematics requirement necessary to obtain an associate’s degree;
(b) Set forth the additional general education requirements that are  necessary to qualify
for an associate’s degree;
(c) Ensure that accelerated college credit programs count toward  satisfying any addi-
tional general education requirements identified in paragraph (b) of this subsection; and
(d) Ensure that participation in the program  is made available to individuals who have
completed an applicable apprenticeship or training program in previous years.
(3) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission  shall submit a report containing the
plan, along with proposed legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
related to higher education no later than September 15, 2026. The report shall also include:
(a) An analysis  of whether any additional accreditation for apprenticeship or training
programs is necessary to implement the program;
(b) The resources required to implement the program;
(c) The timeline necessary to implement the program; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2476
HB 2539
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
(d) The number of  additional associate’s degrees that are expected to be earned under the
program during each biennium.
SECTION 2.
 Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3.  This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]