Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any authorization to issue general obli-
gation bonds under ORS 286A.035, in the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of
the Oregon Department of Emergency  Management, the State Treasurer may issue Article
XI-Q bonds under ORS 286A.816 to 286A.826 in an amount that produces  $15,000,000 of net
proceeds for the purpose specified in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an amount estimated
by the State Treasurer to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of bonds issued under this section must  be transferred to the Oregon
Department of Emergency Management for deposit in  the Resiliency Grant Fund established
under ORS 401.552.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2618