Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Digital network” means a method for requesting a prearranged  ride from a partic-
ipating driver using a software application, a website or  another Internet-based electronic
technology that a transportation network company provides.
(b) “Participating driver” means an individual who:
(A) Receives a request through a digital network from  a rider for a prearranged ride; and
(B) Offers or provides a prearranged ride to a rider in exchange  for a fee that the rider
pays.
(c) “Participating vehicle” means a vehicle that a participating driver:
(A) Owns, leases or otherwise has authorization to use; and
(B) Actually uses to offer or provide prearranged rides to riders.
(d) “Prearranged ride” means transportation that a rider requests from a  participating
driver by means of a digital network that:
(A) Begins at the time a participating driver accepts a rider’s request for transportation;
(B) Continues at any time during which the participating driver  transports the rider and
any other individual for whom the rider also requests transportation; and
(C) Ends at a destination chosen by the rider or any other individual for which  the rider
also requests transportation and at the time that the rider, or the  last individual for whom
the rider requests transportation, exits the participating driver’s participating vehicle.
(e) “Rider” means  an individual who uses a digital network to request a prearranged ride
from a participating driver.
(f) “Transportation network company” means a corporation, association,  partnership,
limited liability company, limited liability partnership or other legal entity that operates  a
digital network in this state by  means of which a participating driver receives a request from
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4346
HB 3445
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a rider for a prearranged ride.
(2)(a) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries shall appoint a  Trans-
portation Network Company Oversight Board  with the duties set forth in subsection (3) of
this section and with the following members:
(A) Four members who represent the public,  of which one member must represent resi-
dents of this state who  are 60 years of age or older and one member must represent persons
who have a disability;
(B) Three members who represent transportation network companies;
(C) Three members who represent participating drivers; and
(D) One member who represents the Bureau of Labor and Industries.
(b) A member of the board is  entitled to compensation and expenses as provided in ORS
292.495.
(c) The bureau shall provide staff support to the board.
(3) The Transportation Network Company Oversight Board shall:
(a) Survey participating drivers  and transportation network companies that operate in
this state each calendar quarter to determine  the average rate of wage, percentage of fare
for a prearranged ride  or other measurement of compensation that transportation network
companies pay participating drivers for each prearranged  ride or on an hourly or other basis.
(b) Recommend to the commissioner changes to the rate of wage,  the percentage of fare
of each prearranged ride or  other method of compensation, or to the model or method that
transportation network companies  use to calculate compensation for participating drivers,
on the basis of:
(A) The cost of living, and  changes to the cost of living, in the region of this state where
the transportation network companies operate; and
(B) Adherence to the requirements of ORS chapters 652 and 653.
(c) Recommend to the commissioner rules for  ensuring that participating drivers can
submit complaints to the bureau concerning discrepancies in compensation  and breaches or
unilateral changes to agreements concerning the amount  or rate of compensation due to
participating drivers.
(d) Compile and examine at least once each year transportation network company policies
and practices  with respect to creating and maintaining personnel files and other documen-
tation concerning participating drivers and recommend  to the commissioner standard poli-
cies and practices that enable each participating driver, at a minimum, to:
(A) Inspect and review personnel files and documents that a transportation network
company creates and maintains for the participating driver; and
(B) Dispute or otherwise respond to any item in the personnel files or documents.
(e) Compile and examine at least once each year the terms of  any loan or leasing pro-
gram that a transportation network  company establishes and maintains by means of which
a participating driver can buy or lease a participating  vehicle and recommend to the com-
missioner standard loan or lease terms that:
(A) Do not disadvantage or otherwise discriminate against  any participating driver in
intent, practice or effect, in a way that is contrary to law;
(B) Are clearly disclosed to the participating driver in a manner that enables the partic-
ipating driver to:
(i) Determine the risks and advantages of the loan or lease terms as compared  with
[2]
HB 3445
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
competing loan or lease terms; and
(ii) Take into account the possibility, and the financial consequences, of the transporta-
tion network company’s decision to suspend  or end the participating driver’s connection to
the transportation network company’s digital network on a date that precedes the date on
which the participating driver has paid off the loan or terminated the lease;
(C) Enable a participating driver to make required payments on the  participating vehicle
from a reasonable portion of the compensation the  participating driver earns from providing
prearranged rides; and
(D) Permit a participating driver to terminate  a lease for a participating vehicle at any
time that:
(i) The transportation network company no longer permits  the participating driver to
connect to the transportation network company’s digital network; or
(ii) The participating driver cannot make required lease payments  from a reasonable
portion of the  compensation the participating driver earns from providing prearranged rides.
(f) Compile and examine at least once  each year transportation network company policies
and practices for conducting background checks on and responding to complaints concerning
participating drivers and recommend to the  commissioner rules that govern how a trans-
portation network company conducts background checks and responds to complaints con-
cerning participating drivers.
(g) Compile and examine at least once each year transportation network company policies
and practices  for requiring or providing automobile liability insurance coverage for partic-
ipating drivers and recommend rules for providing and  allocating responsibility for providing
automobile liability insurance coverage.
(h) Survey transportation network  companies and participating drivers at least once each
year concerning demand for and  policies and practices for delivering enhanced access to
participating vehicles to people with disabilities, along with requirements for providing facil-
ities to enable people with disabilities to have access to participating vehicles  and provisions
for sharing costs for the facilities between transportation  network companies and partic-
ipating drivers.
(i) Recommend to the commissioner rules that enable access for people with disabilities
to participating vehicles and equitable cost sharing between transportation network compa-
nies and participating drivers for providing suitable access facilities.
(j) Compile and examine at least once each year  transportation network company policies
for required disclosures to riders concerning pricing, service levels, complaints,  dispute re-
solution and related matters and recommend to the commissioner a required set of standard
disclosures to riders that all transportation  network companies and participating drivers
must make.
(k) Monitor on the commissioner’s  behalf transportation network company compliance
with the labor and employment laws of this state.
(4)(a) The commissioner  may adopt rules to implement a recommendation of the Trans-
portation Network Company Oversight Board under subsection (3) of  this section and, in
response to a complaint or at the commissioner’s own initiative, may enforce the  rules the
commissioner adopts by means of:
(A) An order and administrative proceeding under ORS chapter 183; or
(B) An action in a court of this state.
[3]
HB 3445
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
(b) An action to enforce a rule of the commissioner may include:
(A) Ordering a  person to cease and desist from a violation of a rule of the commissioner;
(B) Imposing a civil penalty for a violation under  ORS 183.745 in an amount the com-
missioner determines by rule; or
(C) Seeking damages against a transportation network  company on behalf of an injured
participating driver or  member of the public for a violation of a rule the commissioner
adopted to protect participating drivers or members of the  public or seeking an injunction
or other equitable remedy to prevent, mitigate or reverse the effects of a violation of a rule
of the commissioner.
(c) The commissioner shall deposit any  moneys the commissioner recovers as a civil
penalty under this subsection in the Bureau of Labor and Industries Account  as provided in
ORS 651.160.
(d) The  commissioner shall deposit any moneys the commissioner obtains as a result of
an action on behalf of a participating driver in the State Treasury to the credit  of the Wage
Collection Account described in ORS 652.400.
(e) The commissioner may, with respect to any moneys the commissioner  obtains as
damages as a result of an action on behalf of a member of the public:
(A) Remit the amount of the damages to the member of  the public on behalf of whom the
commissioner brought the action; or
(B) Deposit the amount of the  damages in the Bureau of Labor and Industries Account
and hold the moneys in trust for a period of not more than  one year pending a claim from
the member of the  public on behalf of whom the commissioner brought the action. If the
commissioner does not receive a claim for the moneys within the  one-year period, the mon-
eys become part of the Bureau of Labor and Industries Account as provided in ORS 651.160.
SECTION 2.
(1) Section 1 of this 2017 Act becomes operative January 1, 2018.
(2) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries may adopt  rules and take
any other action before the operative date specified in subsection (1)  of this section that is
necessary to enable the commissioner, on  and after the operative date specified in subsection
(1) of this section, to exercise all  of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the com-
missioner by section 1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]