Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 659A.150,  as amended by section 15, chapter 20, Oregon Laws 2024, and sec-
tion 114, chapter 73, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
659A.150. As used in ORS 659A.150 to 659A.186:
(1) “Covered employer” means an employer described in ORS 659A.153.
(2) “Eligible employee” means any employee of a covered  employer other than those employees
exempted under the provisions of ORS 659A.156.
(3) “Family leave” means a leave of absence described in ORS 659A.150 to 659A.186,  except that
“family leave” does not include leave taken by an eligible employee who is unable to  work because
of a disabling compensable injury, as defined in ORS 656.005, under ORS chapter 656.
(4) “Family member” means:
(a) The spouse of an eligible employee;
(b) A child of an eligible employee or the child’s spouse or domestic partner;
(c) A parent of an eligible employee or the parent’s spouse or domestic partner;
(d) A sibling or stepsibling of  an eligible employee or the sibling’s or stepsibling’s spouse or
domestic partner;
(e) A grandparent of an eligible employee or the grandparent’s spouse or domestic partner;
(f) A grandchild of an eligible employee or the grandchild’s spouse or domestic partner;
(g) The domestic partner of an eligible employee; or
(h) Any individual related by blood or affinity whose close association with an eligible  employee
is the equivalent of a family relationship.
(5) “Health care provider” means:
(a) A person who is primarily responsible for providing health  care to an eligible employee or
a family member of an eligible  employee, who is performing within the scope of the person’s pro-
fessional license or certificate and who is:
(A) A physician licensed under ORS chapter 677;
(B) A physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 642
SB 727
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
(C) A dentist licensed under ORS 679.090;
(D) A psychologist licensed under ORS 675.030;
(E) An optometrist licensed under ORS 683.070;
(F) A naturopath licensed under ORS 685.080;
(G) A registered nurse licensed under ORS 678.050;
(H) A nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375;
(I) A direct entry midwife licensed under ORS 687.420;
(J) A licensed registered nurse licensed by the Oregon State Board of Nursing as a nurse prac-
titioner specializing in nurse midwifery;
(K) A regulated social worker authorized to practice regulated social work under ORS 675.510
to 675.600; or
(L) A chiropractic physician licensed under ORS 684.054[ , but only to the extent the chiropractic
physician provides treatment consisting of manual manipulation of the spine to  correct a subluxation
demonstrated to exist by X-rays ].
(b) A person who is primarily responsible for the treatment  of an eligible employee or a family
member of an eligible employee solely through spiritual  means, including but not limited to a
Christian Science practitioner.
(6) “Public health emergency” means:
(a) A public health emergency declared under ORS 433.441.
(b) An emergency declared under ORS 401.165 if related to a  public health emergency as defined
in ORS 433.442.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]