Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
For the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, and  each biennium thereafter, the
Department of Corrections may allocate $  from the  Department of Corrections
Account for the purpose  of funding facilitated dialogue program services necessary to comply
with victims’ rights.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1573