Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In collaboration with the Department of Consumer and Business  Ser-
vices, the Department of the State Fire Marshal shall establish and  implement a grant pro-
gram called the Wildfire Prepared Structure Program to facilitate the  retrofitting of existing
dwellings and accessory structures, as well as dwellings  and accessory structures con-
structed following wildfire damage, to be resistant and resilient to wildfire.
(2) To implement the program, the department shall:
(a) Publish a list of eligible  retrofits and materials that reduce the vulnerability of
structures to wildfire and flying embers, as identified in section R327  of the Oregon Resi-
dential Specialty Code or other relevant industry best practices and standards.
(b) Determine the relative cost-effectiveness of the retrofits and materials.
(c) Determine which entities are  eligible to apply for and administer moneys awarded
under the program.
(d) Establish ranking and criteria  for awarding grants that include a preference for
projects that:
(A) Benefit persons who live in high  wildfire exposure areas identified pursuant to ORS
477.490.
(B) Benefit persons in socially vulnerable communities.
(C) Benefit low-income persons who have demonstrated financial need.
(D) Benefit persons whose homes  have been destroyed or significantly damaged by a
wildfire for which authority has been exercised under the Emergency Conflagration Act set
out in ORS 476.510 to 476.610.
(E) Are cost-effective and have a demonstrated positive ratio of benefits to costs.
(F) Have the potential to leverage federal or private funds.
(e) Establish a format by which grant recipients and persons  administering the grant
must report to the State Fire Marshal.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1110
HB 3172
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
(3) A grant recipient or person administering a grant shall:
(a) Complete a grant project funded under the  program not more than one year after
receiving the grant moneys.
(b) Report to the State Fire Marshal in a format designated pursuant to subsection (2)(e)
of this section.
(4) The department may adopt rules as  needed to implement this section, in consultation
with other agencies, local governments,  nongovernmental organizations and the Wildfire
Programs Advisory Council established by ORS 476.690.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of the State Fire Marshal, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the General  Fund, the amount of $______, for carrying out the provisions of section 1
of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]