Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Indigenous Language Justice Fund is established  in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the Indigenous Language
Justice Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated
to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services for the purpose  of disbursement to the
fiscal agent described in section 2 of this 2023 Act for supporting  Indigenous languages in-
terpretation in this state.
SECTION 2.
(1) A nonprofit organization registered in this state that addresses and exe-
cutes worker relief as the organization’s  primary purpose shall serve as the fiscal agent to
the Indigenous Language Justice Fund established under section 1 of this 2023 Act.  Moneys
must be allocated for purposes including, but not limited to:
(a) The development  of evaluation mechanisms, standards and guidelines for Indigenous
languages interpretation; and
(b) Compensation for Indigenous languages interpreters.
(2) Not later than August 31 of each year,  the fiscal agent described in subsection (1) of
this section shall  submit, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to an interim committee
of the Legislative  Assembly related to language interpretation services, a report on the use
of moneys allocated under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 3.
The fiscal agent described in section 2 of this 2023 Act  shall make the first
report described in section 2 of this 2023 Act no later than August 31, 2024.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for deposit in the Indigenous
Language Justice  Fund established under section 1 of this 2023 Act and disbursement to the
fiscal agent described in section 2 of this 2023 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3264