Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department  of Education shall develop and implement a standardized
method to be used by school districts and the department  to electronically create, collect,
use, maintain, disclose, transfer and access student data.
(2) The method developed and implemented under this section must:
(a) Facilitate easy and fast electronic transfers of student records;
(b) Facilitate the ability of school districts to effectively maximize Medicaid billing;
(c) Minimize the reporting burdens of school districts;
(d) Minimize the likelihood that records will be  duplicated at the state level when a stu-
dent transfers to, or is placed in, a different educational setting; and
(e) Facilitate access by the department to student data for research purposes.
(3) The method developed and implemented under this section must allow  for the col-
lection of at least the following types of data:
(a) Student name and state identification number;
(b) Student demographic information;
(c) Student statewide assessment data;
(d) Student course completion data;
(e) Student education records; and
(f) Student individualized education program records.
(4) The department shall provide to school  districts training on the method developed and
implemented under this section in the manner prescribed by the State  Board of Education
by rule.
(5) The State Board of Education shall adopt  any rules necessary for the administration
of this section.
SECTION 2.
For the purpose of developing the method for  electronically creating, col-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 231
HB 4078
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
lecting, using, maintaining, disclosing, transferring and accessing student data  as required
under section 1 of this 2024 Act, the Department of Education:
(1) May contract with a public or private entity for the development of the method.
(2) Shall ensure that  the method reduces or eliminates redundancies related to student
data and that the method replaces local  methods related to student data that are in place
prior to the full implementation of the method.
(3) Shall establish a schedule to:
(a) Test and implement the method;
(b) Adequately train school district staff in the use of the method; and
(c) Ensure that the method is fully implemented in all school districts no later than
September 1, 2034.
(4) Shall establish a technical advisory committee to assist in the development and im-
plementation of the new method. The committee shall:
(a) Include the following members:
(A) A representative of a statewide organization that represents school administrators;
(B) A representative of a statewide organization that primarily  represents licensed
teachers;
(C) A representative of a  statewide organization that primarily represents classified ed-
ucators and educator staff;
(D) A representative of a statewide  organization of school business officials in this state;
(E) A representative  of a statewide organization that represents education service dis-
tricts;
(F) A representative of a statewide organization that represents school boards;
(G) A representative of the Oregon Youth Authority;
(H) An expert on the statewide longitudinal data system;
(I) A representative of the office of Enterprise Information  Services established in the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services; and
(J) A member recommended by the Governor.
(b) Have the following responsibilities:
(A) Study the Juvenile Justice Information System.
(B) Provide oversight and technical guidance  to staff within the Department of Education
regarding the implementation of the method.
(C) Make recommendations for legislation to the Legislative Assembly.
(D) Coordinate efforts with any state-level committees or  organizations that address
Medicaid billing by school districts.
(E) Oversee the implementation of the method  and regularly submit reports on the im-
plementation of the method to the State Board of Education and, in the manner provided  in
ORS 192.245, to the committees  or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related
to education.
(F) Consider alignment with grant applications and intersecting programs.
(G) Recommend attainable schedules for testing, training and implementation in school
districts of varying sizes across the state.
(H) Analyze and address cybersecurity issues that may affect student data.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2024 Act is repealed on September 1, 2036.
SECTION 4.  ORS 326.565 is amended to read:
[2]
HB 4078
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
326.565. (1) The State  Board of Education shall adopt by rule standards for the [ creation, use,
custody and disclosure, including access, ] creation, collection, use, maintenance,  disclosure,
transfer and access  of student education records held by a school district or another public or
private educational entity that provides educational services to  students in any grade from
kindergarten through grade 12. Consistent with the  requirements of applicable state and federal law,
the standards:
(a) Shall incorporate  the method used to electronically create, collect, use, maintain,
disclose, transfer and access student data,  as developed and implemented pursuant to section
1 of this 2024 Act.
[(a)] (b) Shall include requirements under which a school district or other educational  entity
will transfer student education records pursuant to ORS 326.575.
[(b)] (c) May be applied differently to persons 18 years of age or older.
(2) The board shall distribute the rules that are adopted  under subsection (1) of this section to
all school districts and shall make the rules available on the website of the  Department of Educa-
tion.
(3) School districts  shall make the rules received under subsection (2) of this section available
to the public schools in the district and to the public.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 192.842 is amended to read:
192.842. (1) A county clerk  or other elections official shall use the actual address of a program
participant for voter registration purposes. Except as provided  in ORS 192.820 to 192.868, a county
clerk or other elections official may not disclose the actual address.
(2) A county  clerk or other elections official shall use the substitute address of the program
participant for purposes of mailing a ballot to an elector under ORS 254.470.
(3) A school district shall use the actual address  of a program participant for any purpose re-
lated to admission or assignment. The school district shall take such measures as necessary to pro-
tect the confidentiality of the actual address of the program participant. Student records  created
under ORS 326.565 and [ 326.580] section 1 of this 2024 Act  shall  use the substitute address of the
program participant.
(4) A county clerk shall accept the substitute  address of the program participant as the address
of the  applicant for the purpose of issuing a marriage license under ORS 106.041 or registering a
Declaration of Domestic Partnership under ORS 106.325.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 338.115 is amended to read:
338.115. (1) Statutes and rules that apply only to school district boards, school districts or other
public schools do not  apply to public charter schools. However, the following laws do apply to public
charter schools:
(a) Federal law;
(b) ORS 30.260 to 30.300 (tort claims);
(c) ORS 192.311 to 192.478 (public records law);
(d) ORS 192.610 to 192.705 (public meetings law);
(e) ORS chapters 279A, 279B and 279C (Public Contracting Code);
(f) ORS 297.405 to 297.555 and 297.990 (Municipal Audit Law);
(g) ORS 326.565[ ,] and 326.575 [ and 326.580] and section 1 of this 2024 Act  (student records);
(h) ORS 181A.195, 326.603, 326.607 and 342.223 (criminal records checks);
(i) ORS 329.045 (academic content standards and instruction);
(j) ORS 329.451 (high school diploma, modified diploma, extended diploma  and certificate of at-
[3]
HB 4078
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tendance);
(k) ORS 329.496 (physical education);
(L) The  statewide assessment system developed by the Department of Education for mathemat-
ics, science and language arts under ORS 329.485 (2);
(m) ORS 336.840 (use of personal electronic devices);
(n) ORS 337.150 (textbooks);
(o) ORS 339.119 (consideration for educational services);
(p) ORS 339.141, 339.147 and 339.155 (tuition and fees);
(q) ORS 339.250 (9) (prohibition on infliction of corporal punishment);
(r) ORS 339.326 (notice concerning students subject to juvenile court petitions);
(s) ORS 339.370 to 339.400 (reporting of suspected abuse and suspected sexual conduct);
(t) ORS 342.856 (core teaching standards);
(u) ORS chapter 657 (Employment Department Law);
(v) ORS 332.505 (2), 659.850, 659.855 and 659.860 (discrimination);
(w) Any statute or rule that establishes requirements for  instructional time provided by a school
during each day or during a year;
(x) Statutes and rules that expressly apply to public charter schools;
(y) Statutes and rules  that apply to a special government body, as defined in ORS 174.117, or a
public body, as defined in ORS 174.109;
(z) Health and safety statutes and rules;
(aa) Any statute or rule that is listed in the charter; and
(bb) This chapter.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a charter may specify that statutes and rules
that apply only to school district boards,  school districts and other public schools may apply to a
public charter school.
(3) If a statute  or rule applies to a public charter school, then the terms “school district” and
“public school” include public charter school as those terms are used in that statute or rule.
(4) A public charter school  may not violate the Establishment Clause of the First Amendment
to the United States Constitution or Article I,  section 5, of the Oregon Constitution, or be religion
based.
(5)(a) A public charter school shall maintain an active enrollment of at least 25 students.
(b) For a public  charter school that provides educational services under a cooperative agree-
ment described in ORS 338.080, the public charter school is in compliance with the requirements  of
this subsection if the public charter school provides educational services under the cooperative
agreement to at least  25 students, without regard to the school districts in which the students are
residents.
(6) A public charter school may sue or be sued as a separate legal entity.
(7) The sponsor,  members of the governing board of the sponsor acting in their official capacities
and employees of  a sponsor acting in their official capacities are immune from civil liability with
respect to all activities related to a public charter school within the scope of their  duties or em-
ployment.
(8) A public charter school may enter  into contracts and may lease facilities and services from
a school district, education service district, public university listed  in ORS 352.002, other govern-
mental unit or any person or legal entity.
(9) A public charter  school may not levy taxes or issue bonds under which the public incurs li-
[4]
HB 4078
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ability.
(10) A public charter school may receive and accept gifts, grants and donations from any  source
for expenditure to carry out the lawful functions of the school.
(11) The school district in which the public charter school is  located shall offer high school di-
plomas, modified diplomas,  extended diplomas and certificates of attendance to any public charter
school students who  meet the district’s and state’s standards for a high school diploma, a modified
diploma, an extended diploma or a certificate of attendance.
(12) A high school diploma, a modified diploma or an extended  diploma issued by a public
charter school grants to  the holder the same rights and privileges as a high school diploma, a
modified diploma or an extended diploma issued  by a nonchartered public school. A certificate of
attendance issued by a public charter school shall have the same restrictions as a  certificate of at-
tendance issued by a nonchartered public school.
(13) Prior to beginning operation,  the public charter school shall show proof of insurance to the
sponsor as specified in the charter.
(14) A public charter school may receive services from an education service district in the same
manner as  a nonchartered public school in the school district in which the public charter school is
located.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 343.173 is amended to read:
343.173. (1) Notwithstanding the limitation on access to records  under ORS 192.311 to 192.478,
326.565, 326.575 and 336.187 and section 1 of  this 2024 Act , the parent is entitled at any reasonable
time to examine all of the records of the school  district pertaining to the identification, evaluation
and educational placement of the child and the provision of a free appropriate public education  to
the child. Records must  be provided without undue delay, which may not exceed 10 business days,
as defined in ORS 192.311,  from the date of the request for the records. Records may be redacted
only to  the extent necessary to protect personally identifiable information of other children unless
disclosure is authorized by law or court order.
(2) Any parent is entitled to obtain an independent evaluation at the expense of  the school dis-
trict if the parent disagrees with an evaluation obtained by the district.
(3) If the school district disagrees with the parent’s request for an  independent educational
evaluation, the district may  initiate a hearing under ORS 343.165 to show that the district’s evalu-
ation is appropriate. If the final decision is that the district’s evaluation is  appropriate, the parent
has the right to an independent educational evaluation, but not at the district’s expense.
(4) If the parent requests an independent educational evaluation  of the child, the school district
shall provide information about where an independent educational evaluation may be obtained.
(5) If a hearing officer appointed under ORS 343.165 requests an independent educational  eval-
uation as part of a hearing, the school district shall pay the cost of the evaluation.
(6) For  purposes of this section, “independent educational evaluation” means an evaluation
conducted by a qualified examiner who is not employed  by the school district responsible for the
child in question.
SECTION 8.  ORS 346.169 is amended to read:
346.169. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS 346.165 and 346.167, whenever a  person who
is blind or blind and deaf requests any public  or private agency to exchange with another agency
the records of the agency concerning  the person making the request, the agency shall furnish the
records to the designated agency.
(2) The  request made under subsection (1) of this section may be made by a guardian of the
[5]
HB 4078
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
person who is blind or blind and deaf.
(3) As used in this  section, “record” includes name and address of the person who is blind or
blind and deaf, medical and  psychological records, and other information designated by the person
requesting the exchange of records.
(4) Where appropriate, a request for an exchange of records made under the provisions of  this
section shall be subject to the confidentiality and access provisions of ORS 179.495, 326.565,  326.575,
336.187, 341.290, 344.600, 411.320, 419B.035 and 419B.045 and section 1 of this 2024 Act .
SECTION 9.
 ORS 433.280 is amended to read:
433.280. Nothing in ORS 179.505,  192.553 to 192.581, 326.565, 326.575 or 336.187 or section 1 of
this 2024 Act  prevents:
(1) Inspection  by or release to administrators by local health departments of information relating
to the status of a person’s immunization against restrictable  diseases without the consent of the
person, if the person  has been emancipated or has reached the age of majority, or the parent of a
child.
(2) Local health departments from releasing information concerning the status of a person’s  im-
munization against restrictable diseases by telephone  to the parent, administrators and public health
officials.
SECTION 10. ORS 326.580 is repealed.
SECTION 11. The amendments to ORS 192.842, 338.115, 343.173, 346.169 and  433.280 by
sections 5 to 9 of this 2024 Act and the repeal of ORS 326.580 by section 10 of this 2024 Act
become operative July 1, 2034.
SECTION 12.
This 2024 Act takes effect on July 1, 2024.
[6]