Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 247.555 is amended to read:
247.555. (1) A county clerk [ may] shall, in accordance  with the requirements of the admin-
istration of voter registration  provisions of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (P.L.
103-31), cancel the registration of an elector:
(a) At the request of the elector;
(b) Upon the death of the elector;
(c) If the county clerk receives written  evidence that the elector has registered to vote in an-
other state; or
(d) If the elector has not responded  to a notice described in ORS 247.563 and has not voted or
updated a registration during the period beginning on the date the notice  is sent and ending on the
day after the date of the second regular general election that  occurs after the date the notice was
sent.
(2) If  the registration of an elector is canceled, the elector, in order to vote in an election, must
register as provided in this chapter.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3906