Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Justice  shall study how to improve crime victim rights
notification procedures within this state. The  department shall submit a report in the man-
ner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim
committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to the judiciary no later than September 15,
2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1895