Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 315.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Dismantler” has the meaning given that term in ORS 801.236.
(b) “Motor home” has the meaning given that term in ORS 801.350.
(c) “Recreational vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.101.
(2) A resident or nonresident  individual shall be allowed a credit against taxes that are
otherwise due under ORS chapter  316 for the surrender, to a dismantler, of a motor vehicle
that is either a motor home or a recreational vehicle. The credit shall be  in the amount of
$5,000 for each motor vehicle  that is surrendered by the taxpayer during the tax year. In
order for a credit to be allowed under this section, at the time of surrender:
(a) The surrendered motor vehicle must have a model year that  predates by at least 15
years the tax year in which the motor vehicle is surrendered;
(b) The taxpayer must be shown as the owner of  the vehicle on the title to the motor
vehicle and must have physical possession of the title;
(c) The dismantler must hold a valid dismantler certificate issued under  ORS 822.110; and
(d) The dismantler must provide written proof of the surrender to the taxpayer.
(3) The written proof of surrender required under this section must include:
(a) The date on which the motor vehicle is surrendered;
(b) The year, make and model of the motor vehicle;
(c) The registration plate number assigned  by the Department of Transportation to the
motor vehicle, if any;
(d) The name of the vehicle owner;
(e) The vehicle description and vehicle identification number; and
(f) The certificate number of the dismantler certificate issued to the dismantler by  the
Department of Transportation.
(4) The taxpayer shall maintain the written proof of surrender described in subsection
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4
HB 4039
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
(3) of this section for at least three years following  the tax year for which the credit is
claimed for the corresponding motor vehicle and shall provide to the Department of Revenue
the proof of surrender if requested by the department.
(5) The Department of Revenue, after  consultation with the Department of Transporta-
tion, shall adopt rules relating to the administration and enforcement of this section.
(6) The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the tax  liability of the taxpayer
and may not be carried forward to another tax year.
(7) A nonresident shall be  allowed the credit under this section in the proportion provided
in ORS 316.117. If a change in the status of a taxpayer  from resident to nonresident or from
nonresident to resident occurs, the credit allowed by this section  shall be determined in a
manner consistent with ORS 316.117.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2024  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2025, and before January 1, 2031.
SECTION 4. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]