Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, out of the General
Fund, the amount  of $40,000,000 for the purposes for which the Emergency Board lawfully
may allocate funds.
SECTION 2. (1) In addition  to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $200,000,000, to be allocated to state  agencies for state employee com-
pensation changes for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019.
(2) If any  of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency  Board prior to December 1, 2020, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate funds.
SECTION 3. (1) In addition  to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $12,000,000, to be  allocated to state agencies for compensation changes
driven by collective bargaining for workers who are not state employees.
(2) If any  of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency  Board prior to December 1, 2020, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate funds.
SECTION 4. (1) In addition  to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $10,000,000,  to be allocated to the Judicial Department for judicial
compensation and family treatment courts.
(2) If any  of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency  Board prior to December 1, 2020, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate funds.
SECTION 5. (1) In addition  to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, out of the General
Note: For budget, see 2019-2021 Biennial Budget
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 9507
SB 5507
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
Fund, the amount of $2,000,000,  to be allocated to the Judicial Department for immigration
defense services.
(2) If any  of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency  Board prior to December 1, 2020, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate funds.
SECTION 6. (1) In addition  to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $25,000,000, to be allocated to the Public Defense Services  Commission
for trial level sustainability and employee compensation.
(2) If any  of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency  Board prior to December 1, 2020, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate funds.
SECTION 7. (1) In addition  to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $12,800,000, to be allocated to the Public Defense Services  Commission
for the Parent Child Representation Program.
(2) If any  of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency  Board prior to December 1, 2020, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate funds.
SECTION 8. (1) In addition  to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $2,700,000, to be allocated to  the Secretary of State for paid return
postage on ballots.
(2) If any  of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency  Board prior to December 1, 2020, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate funds.
SECTION 9. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $15,000,000, to be allocated  to state agencies for state employee com-
pensation changes related to pay equity.
SECTION 10. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
[2]