Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 336.455 is amended to read:
336.455. (1) Each school district shall provide age-appropriate human sexuality education courses
in all public elementary and  secondary schools as an integral part of the health education curric-
ulum.
(2) Course material and instruction  for all human sexuality education courses shall enhance
students’ understanding of sexuality as a  normal and healthy aspect of human development. Course
instruction  shall:
(a) Be medically accurate.
(b) Be comprehensive.
(c) Include information  about responsible sexual behaviors and hygienic practices that eliminate
or reduce the risks of pregnancy and the risks of exposure  to human immunodeficiency virus,
hepatitis B, hepatitis  C and other sexually transmitted infections. Information about those risks shall
be presented in a manner designed  to allay fears concerning risks that are scientifically groundless.
(d) Promote abstinence for school-age youth and mutually monogamous relationships  with an
uninfected partner for adults as the most effective way to prevent pregnancy and the transmission
of sexually transmitted infections. However, abstinence may not be taught to the  exclusion of other
material and instruction on contraceptive and infection reduction measures. Human  sexuality edu-
cation courses shall acknowledge the value of abstinence  while not devaluing or ignoring those
students who have had or are having sexual intercourse.
(e) Include information about human development from conception to birth.
[(e)] (f) Include a discussion about the characteristics of the emotional, physical and psycholog-
ical aspects of a healthy relationship and a discussion about the benefits  of delaying pregnancy be-
yond the adolescent years as a means to better ensure a healthy future  for parents and their
children.  Students shall be provided with statistics based on the latest medical information regarding
both the health benefits and the possible side effects of  all forms of contraceptives, including the
success and failure rates for prevention of pregnancy.
[(f)] (g) Stress that sexually transmitted infections are  serious possible outcomes of sexual con-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3249
SB 882
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
tact. Students shall be provided with statistics  based on the latest medical information regarding the
efficacy of all methods  of sexual protection in preventing sexually transmitted infections, including
human immunodeficiency virus, hepatitis B and hepatitis C.
[(g)] (h) Provide students with information  about Oregon laws that address young people’s rights
and responsibilities related to childbearing and parenting.
[(h)] (i) Advise  students of the circumstances in which it is unlawful under ORS 163.435 and
163.445 for persons 18 years of age or older to have  sexual relations with persons younger than 18
years of age to whom they are not married.
[(i)] (j) Teach students that  no form of sexual expression is acceptable when the expression
physically or emotionally harms oneself or others  and teach students not to make unwanted physical
and verbal  sexual advances, how to decline unwanted sexual advances or accept the refusal of un-
wanted sexual advances. Students shall  be taught that it is wrong to take advantage of or to exploit
another person. Materials and information shall be presented in a manner sensitive to the  fact that
there are students who have experienced sexual abuse.
[(j)] (k) Validate through course material and instruction  the importance of honesty with oneself
and others, respect for each person’s dignity and well-being, and responsibility for one’s actions.
[(k)] (L) Assist  students in the development and practice of effective communication skills, the
development of self-esteem and the ability to resist peer pressure.
[(L)] (m) Encourage family communication and involvement to help students  learn to make re-
sponsible decisions.
(3) Any course in any public elementary and secondary school, the main purpose of which is to
address human  sexuality education or sexually transmitted infections, including human
immunodeficiency virus, or both, must emphasize that abstinence from sexual contact is  the only
method that is 100 percent effective against unintended pregnancy,  sexually transmitted infections
and human immunodeficiency virus when  transmitted sexually. Abstinence must be stressed, but not
to the exclusion of other material  and instruction on contraceptive and infection reduction meas-
ures. Courses described  in this subsection must acknowledge the value of abstinence while not de-
valuing or ignoring those students who have had or are having sexual intercourse.
(4) Nothing in this  section prohibits instruction in sanitation, hygiene or traditional courses in
biology.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 336.455 by section  1 of this 2025 Act apply to course
instruction provided beginning with the 2026-2027 school year.
[2]