Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall study issues re-
lated to workers’ rights of first refusal in sale of businesses in  this state and present the
results of the study in a report to an appropriate committee or interim committee of the
Legislative Assembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 on or before  September 15,
2022.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2270