Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Each district school board shall adopt a policy to  provide for the Internet
safety for students of the school district.
(2) A policy adopted under this section must apply to:
(a) All situations in which a  student accesses the Internet through school district re-
sources, including school libraries, online subscriptions, online academic activities  and cur-
ricula that use technology; and
(b) All technology purchased, used or made available to the students  of the school dis-
trict.
(3) A policy adopted under this section must:
(a) Require the school district to comply with  the federal Children’s Internet Protection
Act, 47 U.S.C. 254;
(b) Establish  a process by which a member of the public may submit a report of any
concerns about the Internet safety for students of the school district and a  process by which
the school district may investigate and respond to a report; and
(c) Require the school district annually to submit  to the district school board and to
make available on the school district’s website a summary of any  reports received under
paragraph (b) of this subsection and the outcomes of the reports.
(4)(a) A  school district that does not comply with the provisions of this section is con-
sidered to be nonstandard under ORS 327.103.
(b) A school district that does not comply with  the provisions of this section is not eli-
gible to receive matching funds under ORS 357.790.
SECTION 2.
Section 3 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 357.400 to
357.621.
SECTION 3. (1) Each public library board shall adopt a policy to  provide for the Internet
safety for minors at a public library.
(2) A policy adopted under this section must apply to:
(a) All situations in which  a minor accesses the Internet through public library re-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1894
HB 3456
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
sources; and
(b) All technology purchased, used or made available to minors at the public library.
(3) A policy adopted under this section must:
(a) Require the public library to comply with the federal Children’s  Internet Protection
Act, 47 U.S.C. 254;
(b) Establish  a process by which a member of the public may submit a report of any
concerns about the Internet safety for  minors at the public library and a process by which
the public library may investigate and respond to a report; and
(c) Require the public library annually to submit to the public  library board and to make
available on the public library’s website a summary of  any reports received under paragraph
(b) of this subsection and the outcomes of the reports.
(4)(a) A governing body  may withdraw support for a public library that does not comply
with the provisions of this section as provided by ORS 357.621.
(b) A public library that does not comply with the provisions  of this section is not eligible
to receive matching funds under ORS 357.790.
[2]