Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this  section, “long-term solitary confinement” means the
housing of an incarcerated person  for more than 15 consecutive days during which, for at
least 22 hours of each day, the person has no meaningful contact with other human beings.
(2) The Department of Corrections may not subject an incarcerated person within any
department institution to long-term solitary confinement.
SECTION 2.  ORS 423.020 is amended to read:
423.020. (1) The Department of Corrections is created. The department shall:
(a) Supervise the management and administration of the  Department of Corrections institutions,
parole and probation services, community corrections and other functions  related to state programs
for corrections;
(b) Carry out legally mandated sanctions for the punishment of  persons committed to its juris-
diction by the courts of this state;
(c) Exercise custody  over those persons sentenced to a period of incarceration until such time
as a lawful release authority authorizes their release;
(d) Provide  adequate food, clothing, health and medical care, sanitation and security for persons
confined;
(e) Provide all confined persons [ who are motivated, capable and  cooperative ] with opportunities
for self-improvement , vocational training  and work;
(f) Provide access for all confined persons to mental health treatment, including but  not
limited to individual and group therapy, anger management classes and medications;
(g) Prepare confined persons to obtain employment upon release;
[(f)] (h)  Conduct investigations and prepare reports for release authorities; and
[(g)] (i)  Supervise persons sentenced or placed  in the community for the period of time specified
and in accordance with conditions of supervision ordered by the release authority.
(2) The Department of Corrections may provide consultation services related  to the criminal
justice system to local or statewide  public or private agencies, groups, and individuals, or initiate
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3782
HB 3186
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
such consultation services. Consultation services shall include, but not be limited to,  conducting
studies and surveys,  sponsoring or participating in educational programs, and advising and assisting
these agencies, groups or individuals. Nothing in chapter 320, Oregon  Laws 1987, is intended to di-
minish the state’s efforts to plan, evaluate  and deliver effective human services programs to
offenders, either in  an institution or on probation or parole. Therefore, the Department of Cor-
rections and the Department of Human Services shall  continue to jointly develop and implement
needed social and rehabilitative services, including services for inmates housed  in regional minimum
security facilities.
(3) The Department of Corrections shall be the recipient of all  federal funds paid or to be paid
to the state to  enable the state to provide corrections programs and services assigned to the De-
partment of Human Services before June 15, 1987.
(4) Notwithstanding any other  provision of law, the department may charge a person confined
in a Department of Corrections institution a reasonable health care fee  for any health care services,
medications and equipment provided the person during the person’s confinement if the department:
(a) Provides necessary medical care regardless of the person’s ability to pay;
(b) Provides equal treatment to all  persons confined in a department institution regardless of a
person’s ability to pay;
(c) Establishes a system that notifies the person of the fees and what services are covered; and
(d) Establishes  a grievance system that allows a person to challenge the deduction of a fee from
the person’s account.
(5) The department may provide ordinary medical, dental, psychiatric,  psychological, hygienic
or other remedial  care and treatment for a person under 18 years of age who is confined in a De-
partment of Corrections institution and, in an emergency in which the safety of the person  appears
urgently to require it, may authorize surgery or other extraordinary care.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 169.005 is amended to read:
169.005. As used in ORS 169.005 to  169.677 and 169.730 to 169.800, unless the context requires
otherwise:
(1) “Detainee” means a person held with no criminal charges.
(2) “Forced release” means  temporary freedom of an inmate from lawful custody before judgment
of conviction due to a county jail population emergency under ORS 169.046.
(3) “Juvenile detention facility” means a facility as described in ORS 419A.050 and 419A.052.
(4) “Local correctional facility” means a jail or prison for the reception and confinement  of
prisoners that is provided, maintained and operated by a county or city and holds persons  for more
than 36 hours.
(5) “Lockup” means a facility for the temporary detention of arrested  persons held up to 36
hours, excluding  holidays, Saturdays and Sundays, but the period in lockup shall not exceed 96 hours
after booking.
(6) “Long-term solitary confinement” has the meaning given that term  in section 1 of
this 2019 Act.
[(6)] (7) “Month” means a period of 30 days.
[(7)] (8) “Prisoner” means a person held with criminal charges or sentenced to the facility.
[(8)] (9)  “Temporary hold” means a facility, the principal purpose of which  is the temporary
detention of a prisoner for four or less hours while awaiting  court appearance or transportation to
a local correctional facility.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 169.076 is amended to read:
[2]
HB 3186
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
169.076. Each local correctional facility shall:
(1) Provide sufficient staff to perform all audio  and visual functions involving security, control,
custody and supervision of all confined  detainees and prisoners, with personal inspection at least
once each hour. The supervision may include the use of electronic monitoring equipment when ap-
proved by the Department of Corrections and the governing body of the jurisdiction in which the
facility is located.
(2) Have a comprehensive written policy with respect to:
(a) Legal confinement authority.
(b) Denial of admission.
(c) Telephone calls.
(d) Admission and release medical procedures.
(e) Medication and prescriptions.
(f) Personal property accountability which complies with ORS 133.455.
(g) Vermin and communicable disease control.
(h) Release process to include authority, identification and return of personal property.
(i) Rules of the facility governing correspondence and visitations.
(3) Formulate and publish plans to meet emergencies involving escape, riots, assaults,  fires, re-
bellions and other types of emergencies; and regulations for the operation of the facility.
(4) Not administer any physical punishment to any prisoner at any time.
(5) Provide for emergency medical and dental health, having written policies providing for:
(a) Review of the facility’s medical and dental plans by a licensed physician,  physician assistant,
naturopathic physician or nurse practitioner.
(b) The security of medication and medical supplies.
(c) A medical  and dental record system to include request for medical and dental attention,
treatment prescribed, prescriptions, special diets and other services provided.
(d) First aid supplies and staff first aid training.
(6) Prohibit firearms from the security area of the facility except in times of emergency as  de-
termined by the administrator of the facility.
(7) Ensure that confined detainees and prisoners:
(a) Will be fed daily at  least three meals served at regular times, with no more than 14 hours
between meals except when routinely absent from the facility for work or other purposes.
(b) Will be fed nutritionally adequate meals in accordance with a  plan reviewed by a registered
dietitian or the Oregon Health Authority.
(c) Be provided special diets  as prescribed by the facility’s designated physician, physician as-
sistant, naturopathic physician or nurse practitioner.
(d) Shall have food procured,  stored, prepared, distributed and served under sanitary conditions,
as defined by the authority under ORS 624.041.
(8) Ensure that the facility be clean, and provide each confined detainee or prisoner:
(a) Materials to maintain personal hygiene.
(b) Clean clothing twice weekly.
(c) Mattresses and blankets that are clean and fire-retardant.
(9) Require each prisoner to shower at least twice weekly.
(10) Forward, without examination or censorship, each prisoner’s outgoing  written communi-
cations to the  Governor, jail administrator, Attorney General, judge, Department of Corrections or
the attorney of the prisoner.
[3]
HB 3186
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
(11) Keep the facility safe and secure in accordance with the State of Oregon Structural Spe-
cialty Code and Fire and Life Safety Code.
(12) Have and provide each prisoner  with written rules for inmate conduct and disciplinary
procedures. If a prisoner cannot read or is unable to understand  the written rules, the information
shall be conveyed to the prisoner orally.
(13) Not restrict the free exercise of religion unless failure to impose  the restriction will cause
a threat to facility or order.
(14) Safeguard and ensure that the  prisoner’s legal rights to access to legal materials are pro-
tected.
(15) Ensure that no prisoner is subjected to long-term solitary confinement.
SECTION 5.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Corrections, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the  amount of $
 to be expended on inmate vocational training
and programs to prepare inmates for employment upon release.
[4]