Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Business Development Department shall  study needed invest-
ments in shipyards in this state. The department shall  submit a report in the manner pro-
vided by ORS 192.245, and  may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim
committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to economic development no later than Sep-
tember 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3562