Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The universal  representation program is established in the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services. The department shall  contract with a nonprofit or-
ganization registered in this  state for at least the preceding six months that addresses and
executes worker relief as the organization’s  primary purpose to serve as the fiscal agent to
award grants to organizations to provide services related to  immigration matters, including
but not limited to:
(a) Legal services;
(b) Community-embedded navigators to guide  persons who are at risk of deportation into
accessing universal representation;
(c) Assistance with case costs for  immigration legal services in affirmative applications
and removal defense, including bond proceedings and merit proceedings for detained persons;
(d) Development  of capacity and training to support immigration legal service providers
and community navigation;
(e) Capacity grants;
(f) A client service fund to assist with fees associated with filings, interpretation  and
related costs in immigration matters;
(g) A statewide universal navigation and support  system, including a call center, to pro-
vide direct contacts  and streamlined access for those seeking assistance with immigration
matters;
(h) A clearinghouse to provide logistical support, navigation review, case  placement co-
ordination, mentoring or supervision of attorneys and technical assistance; and
(i) Coalition management.
(2) The fiscal agent shall submit an annual report to the  department on the grants
awarded under subsection (1) of this section. The report must specify:
(a) The percentage of funds allocated to each  allowable use under subsection (1) of this
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2786
HB 3230
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
section;
(b) How many cases were taken by each legal service provider awarded a grant;
(c) How many people have been assisted through the program; and
(d) How many people the wraparound services have been able to help.
(3) The department shall report on the program to a committee or interim committee
of the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary no later than June 1 of each year.
(4) The department shall consult with  the fiscal agent in adopting rules to implement this
section.
SECTION 2.
The Oregon Department  of Administrative Services shall make the first re-
port under section 1 (3) of this 2021 Act no later than June 1, 2023.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $10,000,000, for purposes of implementing
section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]