Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Forestry Department, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount  of $______, for deposit in the Rangeland Protection Association
Fund established by section 4, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 3349).
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4020