Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 4 of this 2019 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
348.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in sections 2 to 4 of this 2019 Act:
(a) “Eligible student” means an individual who:
(A) Is enrolled in sufficient credit hours to be considered at least a half-time student,
and is in good standing, in  a baccalaureate or graduate degree program at a public univer-
sity;
(B) Is making satisfactory academic progress, as defined by the  Higher Education Coor-
dinating Commission by rule, at the public university;
(C) Is exempted from paying nonresident tuition under ORS 352.287;
(D) Has completed and submitted to the commission the Free  Application for Federal
Student Aid, or an equivalent Oregon application established by  the commission by rule; and
(E) Is not incarcerated.
(b) “Loan recipient” means an eligible student who has received a loan under the
Dreamers Access Program.
(c) “Public university” means a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(2) The Dreamers Access Program is established within  the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission, to be administered pursuant to rules adopted by the commission.
(3) An eligible student who wishes to  participate in the program shall submit an appli-
cation to the commission in  accordance with rules adopted by the commission. The applica-
tion shall require  each applicant to submit sufficient documentation to enable the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2285
HB 3204
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
commission to determine the financial need of the applicant.
(4) Upon receipt of an application to receive a loan  under the program, the commission
shall determine:
(a) Whether the applicant is an eligible student;
(b) Whether the applicant’s financial need for the academic  year is such that, in the
opinion of the commission, a loan is warranted. In making this determination, the commis-
sion shall consider the availability of an Oregon Opportunity Grant for the applicant; and
(c) Subject to subsection (7) of this section, the dollar amount of the loan.
(5) If the  commission determines under subsection (4) of this section that an applicant
is an eligible student and that a loan  is warranted, the commission shall award a loan to the
eligible student under the program.
(6) A loan recipient may apply for  an additional loan under this section each academic
year. The commission shall by rule  establish academic standards and benchmarks that a loan
recipient must meet to qualify for additional loans.
(7) A loan recipient may not receive Dreamers Access Program loans that exceed:
(a) $10,000 in any academic year;
(b) An aggregate total of $50,000; or
(c) The financial  need of the loan recipient for an academic year, as determined in sub-
section (4)(b) of this section.
(8) Each public university shall provide loan recipients with entrance and  exit loan
counseling that is comparable to the counseling the public university is  required to provide
to recipients of federal student loans.
(9)(a) The commission shall establish the interest rate or  rates for loans awarded under
this section in the manner described in section 3 of this 2019 Act.
(b) The standard repayment  term for a loan awarded under this section is 10 years. Re-
payment by a loan recipient shall begin following a six-month grace period that begins when
a loan recipient graduates or is  no longer enrolled in sufficient credit hours to be considered
at least a  half-time student in a baccalaureate or graduate degree program at a public uni-
versity.
(c) Interest may not accrue on a loan awarded under this section during:
(A) Periods when  the loan recipient is enrolled in sufficient credit hours to be considered
at least a half-time student in a baccalaureate or graduate degree program at a  public uni-
versity; or
(B) The six-month grace period described in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(10) All  moneys from repayment of loans awarded under this section shall be deposited
in the Dreamers Access Program Fund established in section 4 of this 2019 Act.
(11) Eligibility for deferment or forbearance  of a loan awarded under this section shall
be determined by the commission in a manner that is consistent with the standards used to
determine deferment or forbearance of federal student loans.
(12) If a loan recipient defaults on the repayment of  a loan awarded under this section,
the commission may:
(a) Direct one or more public universities  to refuse to administer future student loans
awarded to the loan recipient while the loan remains in default; and
(b) Recommend that one  or more public universities withhold transcripts, grades and
diplomas while the loan is in default.
[2]
HB 3204
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 3. The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall:
(1) Adopt rules to administer the Dreamers Access Program established in section  2 of
this 2019 Act, including procedures  to be followed when the commission contracts with a loan
servicer or other third parties.
(2) Develop a master promissory note, approved by the State Treasurer, to be used for
loans awarded under the program.
(3) Subject to subsection (1)  of this section, for each loan awarded under the program,
service the loan, collect all loan payments and perform all due diligence required by the
federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. 1681 et seq.) and any other applicable laws.
(4) Establish the interest rate to be  used for loans awarded under the program. In de-
termining the interest rate to be used, the commission must consider:
(a) The risk that loan recipients will default on the repayment of the loans; and
(b) The  effect the interest rate will have on the cost for loan recipients to repay the
loans.
(5) Track and record the dollar amount of loans awarded to  each loan recipient under the
program:
(a) For each academic year; and
(b) As an aggregate total amount.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Dreamers Access Program Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the  Dreamers Access Pro-
gram Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated
to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  for the purpose of awarding loans and
administering the Dreamers Access Program under sections 2 and 3 of this 2019 Act.
(2) The fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys received as repayment of loans awarded under the Dreamers Access Program;
(b) Moneys  appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assem-
bly;
(c) Moneys received from federal, state or local sources;
(d) Amounts donated to the fund;
(e) Investment earnings received on moneys in the fund; and
(f) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source, public or private.
SECTION 5.
The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall file with the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to higher education, in the manner provided
in ORS 192.245, an annual report that states:
(1) The dollar amount of each loan awarded  under the Dreamers Access Program estab-
lished in section 2 of this 2019 Act during the previous academic year; and
(2) The total number  of students who received a loan under the program during the
previous academic year.
SECTION 6.
The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall file with the  interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to higher education, in the manner provided
in ORS 192.245, an annual report that states:
(1) The total amount of moneys  within the Dreamers Access Program Fund established
in section 4 of this 2019 Act at the end of the most recent academic year.
(2) The total amount of moneys  appropriated or otherwise provided to the fund by the
Legislative Assembly during the current biennium.
[3]
HB 3204
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
(3) The commission’s annual administrative costs for administering  the Dreamers Access
Program established in section 2 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 7. Sections 2 and 3 of this 2019  Act first apply to loans for the 2020-2021 aca-
demic year.
SECTION 8. The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall submit the first  an-
nual reports required under sections 5 and 6 of this 2019 Act no later than December 1, 2022.
SECTION 9. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]