Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 468.040 is amended to read:
468.040. (1) [The Environmental Quality Commission shall appoint a director who shall hold office
at the pleasure of the commission. ] The Governor shall appoint the Director of  the Department
of Environmental Quality, who holds the office at the pleasure of the Governor.  The salary
of the Director of the Department  of Environmental Quality shall be fixed by the [ commission]
Governor unless otherwise provided by law.
(2) The appointment of the Director of  the Department of Environmental Quality is
subject to confirmation by the Senate as provided by ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
SECTION 2. (1) Notwithstanding the amendments to ORS 468.040 by section 1 of  this 2025
Act, the Director of the  Department of Environmental Quality on the effective date of this
2025 Act may continue to serve as the director until the question of  confirmation of the Di-
rector of the Department of Environmental Quality is acted upon by the  Senate pursuant to
ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
(2) The Governor shall expeditiously submit the name of an individual to  be appointed or
reappointed as the  Director of the Department of Environmental Quality so that the Senate
may take up the question of confirmation at the regular session next following  the effective
date of this 2025 Act or the time at which the Senate convenes  to carry out its duties under
section 4, Article III of the Oregon Constitution, next following  the effective date of this 2025
Act, whichever is earlier.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3898