Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 12 of this 2020 Act:
(1) “High viability crop” means a crop having a sustainable market  demand that is
greater than the  market demand that existed for the crop produced by a repositioning
farmer on the date in 2019 that an agricultural cooperative described in  subsection (3) of this
section initiated bankruptcy proceedings.
(2) “Lending  institution” means a bank, mortgage banking company, trust company,
savings bank, credit union, national banking association, federal savings and loan associ-
ation, federal credit union maintaining an office in this  state, nonprofit community develop-
ment financial institution or nonprofit public benefit corporation.
(3) “Repositioning farmer” means a person that was a member  of an agricultural coop-
erative doing business in Oregon on the date in 2019 that  the cooperative initiated bank-
ruptcy proceedings.
SECTION 2.
The Legislative Assembly declares that the purpose of sections 1 to 12 of this
2020 Act is to  make low-interest loans available to help repositioning farmers in this state
transition to the production of a high viability crop.
SECTION 3. (1) The Agricultural Cooperative Member Low-Interest Loan Fund is estab-
lished in the State Treasury, separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Interest earned
by the  Agricultural Cooperative Member Low-Interest Loan Fund shall be credited to the
fund. Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the State Department of Agri-
culture for carrying out sections 1 to 12 of this 2020 Act.
(2) Moneys in the fund may, with  the approval of the State Treasurer, be invested as
provided by ORS 293.701 to 293.857, and the earnings from such investment shall be credited
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 66
SB 1502
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to the fund.
SECTION 4.
There is appropriated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2021, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $  for
deposit in the Agricultural Cooperative Member Low-Interest Loan Fund.
SECTION 5. (1) The State Department of Agriculture may, in the name and on behalf of
the state, make a loan from the Agricultural  Cooperative Member Low-Interest Loan Fund
to a repositioning farmer for the  purpose of helping the repositioning farmer to transition
to the production of a high viability crop. The department may issue loans from  the fund
directly or through a lending institution.
(2) The total amount of loans  to a single repositioning farmer from the fund may not
exceed $ . The maximum term allowed for a  loan issued from the fund is
years.
(3) Except as provided in this subsection, a loan from the fund must be  secured by assets
of the borrower that have a security value of at least 100 percent of  the loan amount. If the
assets of the borrower do not provide adequate security, the department may accept:
(a) A pledge of security from a third party; or
(b) Intangible property interests of the borrower, such as leases  that provide a
mortgageable value, water rights, easements, mineral rights or royalties.
(4) The department may  not make or approve a loan from the fund after December 31,
2025.
SECTION 6.
(1) The  State Department of Agriculture may enter into an agreement with
a lending institution under which the lending institution:
(a) Receives and reviews applications for loans from the Agricultural  Cooperative Mem-
ber Low-Interest Loan Fund; or
(b) Processes or services loans from the fund.
(2) Contracts entered into under this section are exempt from the  requirements of ORS
279.835 to 279.855 and ORS chapters  279A, 279B and 279C regarding personal services con-
tracts.
(3) An agreement under this section must:
(a) Require the lending  institution to disburse to an approved borrower moneys for-
warded by the department for a borrower’s loan;
(b) Require that the  lending institution pay to the department any moneys collected by
the lending institution as payments on principal and interest for the loan; and
(c) State the compensation to be paid to the lending institution for  services under the
agreement.
SECTION 7.
(1) If a  lending institution described in section 6 of this 2020 Act receives
and reviews a loan application, the lending  institution shall provide the State Department
of Agriculture with a recommendation  regarding whether the loan application should be ap-
proved or disapproved. The department shall retain authority to approve or disapprove a loan
application. If the department disapproves a loan application, the department shall:
(a) Notify the lending institution and the loan applicant; and
(b) State one or more reasons for the disapproval.
(2) If a lending institution recommends disapproval of a  loan application, the department
may decide to make the loan under section 8 of this 2020 Act.
(3) If the department  approves a loan application, the department shall transfer an
[2]
SB 1502
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
amount equal to the approved loan from the  Agricultural Cooperative Member Low-Interest
Loan Fund to the lending institution.
(4) The department shall cause moneys that a lending institution collects and pays to  the
department under section 6 (3) of this 2020 Act, or  that the department receives or recovers
under section 9 (3) of this 2020 Act, to be deposited to the credit of the General Fund.
SECTION 8.
(1) If the State Department  of Agriculture receives a loan application and
decides not to make the loan, the department shall:
(a) Notify the loan applicant; and
(b) State one or more reasons for deciding not to make the loan.
(2) If the department receives a loan application and decides to make the loan,  the de-
partment shall transfer an amount equal to the approved  loan from the Agricultural Coop-
erative Member Low-Interest Loan Fund to the borrower.
(3) The department shall cause moneys collected by the department as payments on
principal and interest for a loan, or that the  department receives or recovers under section
9 (3) of this 2020 Act, to be deposited to the credit of the General Fund.
SECTION 9.
(1) The borrower of a loan funded by moneys from the Agricultural  Cooper-
ative Member Low-Interest Loan Fund shall  use the loan proceeds only for the purpose of
transitioning to the production of a  high viability crop on the repositioning farmer’s existing
farm.
(2) Receipt of a loan from the fund does not disqualify the borrower from participating
in any other loan program funded with state moneys.
(3) If the State  Department of Agriculture determines that a borrower has violated sub-
section (1) of this section, the department may:
(a) Declare that  the borrower is in default and immediately require repayment to the
department of the unpaid balance of the loan; and
(b) Commence any action or proceeding necessary  to recover for the state the unpaid
balance of the loan or any property obtained with the loan moneys.
SECTION 10. The State Department  of Agriculture may adopt rules to periodically pre-
scribe the interest  rate for loans from the Agricultural Cooperative Member Low-Interest
Loan Fund, taking into consideration the solvency  of the loan program and the interest rates
in effect for farm-related loans made  or guaranteed by the federal government. The depart-
ment may, in  its discretion, limit the application of a new interest rate to loans made on or
after the date on which the new interest rate is adopted.
SECTION 11. A right, payment or proceed  of a loan from the Agricultural Cooperative
Member Low-Interest Loan Fund:
(1) Is not subject to  garnishment, attachment or execution or the claim of any creditor;
and
(2) May be assigned only as provided by State Department of Agriculture rules.
SECTION 12.
(1) The Legislative Assembly declares that it is the policy of the State  of
Oregon to make a reasonable attempt not to foreclose  on a loan from the Agricultural Co-
operative Member Low-Interest Loan Fund if the borrower  is unable to make loan payments
due to  illness, injury, death or involuntary job loss, or due to economic stress resulting from
factors beyond the borrower’s control.
(2) The State Department  of Agriculture may adopt rules to implement the policy de-
clared in subsection (1) of this  section. After considering effects on the solvency of the loan
[3]
SB 1502
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
program, the department may authorize:
(a) A temporary reduction of loan payments; or
(b) Another solution agreed to by the borrower and the department.
SECTION 13.
 (1) Sections 1 to 12 of this 2020 Act become operative on January 1, 2021.
(2) The State  Department of Agriculture may adopt rules or take any actions before the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that are necessary to enable to  de-
partment, on and after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, to carry
out the provisions of sections 1 to 12 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 14. (1) Sections 1 to 12 of this 2020 Act are repealed on January 2, 2040.
(2) Any moneys in the  Agricultural Cooperative Member Low-Interest Loan Fund that
are unexpended and unobligated on January 2, 2040, revert to the General Fund.
SECTION 15. This 2020 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2020
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]