Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 12 of this 2024 Act:
(1) “Assessor,” “tax collector”  and “treasurer” mean the individual filling that county
office so named or any county officer performing the  functions of the office under another
name.
(2) “County tax  officers” and “tax officers” mean the assessor, tax collector and treas-
urer of a county.
(3) “Eligible costs” means the following costs associated with an  eligible housing project:
(a) System development charges;
(b) Predevelopment costs;
(c) Construction costs; and
(d) Land write-downs.
(4) “Eligible  housing project” means a project to construct housing, or to convert a
building from a nonresidential use to housing, that is:
(a) If for-sale property,  a single-family dwelling, middle housing as defined in ORS
197A.420 or a multifamily  dwelling affordable at initial sale to households with an annual in-
come not greater than 120 percent of the area median income; or
(b) If rental property:
(A)(i) Middle housing as defined in ORS 197A.420;
(ii) A multifamily dwelling;
(iii) An accessory dwelling unit as defined in ORS 215.501; or
(iv) Any other form of affordable housing or moderate income housing; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 197
HB 4065
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Rented at a monthly rate that  is affordable to households with an annual income not
greater than 120 percent of the area median income.
(5) “Eligible housing project property” means the taxable real  and personal property
constituting the improvements of an eligible housing project.
(6) “Fee payer” means, for any property tax year, the person responsible for paying ad
valorem property taxes on eligible housing project property to which a grant  awarded under
section 6 of this 2024 Act relates.
(7) “Fire district taxes”  means property taxes levied by fire districts within whose terri-
tory all or a portion of eligible housing project property is located.
(8) “Nonexempt property” means property other than  eligible housing project property
in the tax account that includes eligible housing project property.
(9) “Nonexempt taxes” means the ad valorem property taxes assessed on nonexempt
property.
(10) “Sponsoring jurisdiction” means:
(a)(A) A city with respect to eligible housing projects located within the city boundaries;
or
(B) A county with respect to eligible housing projects located in urban unincorporated
areas of the county; or
(b) The governing body of a city or county described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 2.
(1) A  sponsoring jurisdiction may adopt by ordinance or resolution a pro-
gram under which the sponsoring jurisdiction awards grants to developers for eligible costs.
(2) The ordinance or resolution shall set forth:
(a) The kinds of eligible housing projects for which a developer may seek a grant  under
the program; and
(b) Any eligibility requirements to be imposed on projects and developers  in addition to
those required under sections 1 to 12 of this 2024 Act.
(3) A grant award:
(a) Shall be in the amount determined under section 3 (3) of this 2024 Act; and
(b) May include reimbursement for eligible costs incurred for up to 12  months preceding
the date on which the eligible housing project received local site approval.
(4) Eligible housing project property for which a developer  receives a grant for eligible
costs may not  be granted any exemption, partial exemption or special assessment of ad
valorem property taxes other than the exemption granted under section 7 of this 2024 Act.
(5) A  sponsoring jurisdiction may amend an ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to
this section at any time.  The amendments shall apply only to applications submitted under
section 3 of this 2024 Act on or after the effective date of the ordinance or resolution.
SECTION 3.
(1)(a) A sponsoring jurisdiction that adopts a grant program pursuant to
section 2 of this 2024 Act shall prescribe an application process, including forms  and dead-
lines, by which a developer may apply  for a grant with respect to an eligible housing project.
(b) An application for a grant must include, at a minimum:
(A) A description of the eligible housing project;
(B) An itemized description of the eligible costs for which the grant is sought;
(C) The proposed schedule for completion of the eligible housing project;
(D) A project pro forma demonstrating that the project is  economically feasible only with
the grant moneys; and
[2]
HB 4065
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(E) Any  other information, documentation or attestation that the sponsoring jurisdiction
considers necessary or convenient for the application review process.
(c)(A) The project pro forma under paragraph (b)(D) of this subsection shall  be on a form
provided to the sponsoring jurisdiction by the Housing and Community Services Department
and made available to grant applicants.
(B) The department may enter into an agreement with a third party to develop the
project pro forma template.
(2)(a) The review of an application  under this section shall be completed within 90 days
following the receipt of the application by the sponsoring jurisdiction.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) The sponsoring jurisdiction may in  its sole discretion extend the review process be-
yond 90 days if the  volume of applications would make timely completion of the review pro-
cess unlikely.
(B) The sponsoring jurisdiction may consult  with a developer about the developer’s ap-
plication, and the developer, after the consultation, may  amend the application on or before
a deadline set by the sponsoring jurisdiction.
(3) The sponsoring jurisdiction shall:
(a) Review each application;
(b) Request that the county tax officers provide  to the sponsoring jurisdiction the de-
terminations made under section 4 of this 2024 Act;
(c) Set the term of the loan that will fund the grant award, for a period not to  exceed
10 years;
(d) Set  the amount of the grant that may be awarded to the developer under section 6
(2) of this 2024  Act by multiplying the increment determined under section 4 (1)(c) of this
2024 Act by the term of the loan; and
(e)(A) Provisionally approve the application as submitted;
(B) Provisionally approve the application on terms other than those requested in the
application; or
(C) Reject the application.
(4)(a) The sponsoring  jurisdiction shall forward provisionally approved applications to the
Housing and Community Services Department.
(b) The department shall review the  provisionally approved applications for completeness,
including but not limited  to, the completeness of the project pro forma submitted with the
application under subsection (1)(b)(D)  of this section and the amounts computed under sec-
tion 4 (1) of this 2024 Act, and notify the sponsoring jurisdiction of its determination.
(5)(a) If the department has determined that a provisionally  approved application is in-
complete, the sponsoring jurisdiction may:
(A) Consult with  the applicant developer and reconsider the provisionally approved ap-
plication after the applicant revises it; or
(B) Reject the provisionally approved application.
(b) If the department  has determined that a provisionally approved application is com-
plete, the approval shall be final.
(c) The sponsoring jurisdiction shall notify each applicant  and the department of the final
approval or rejection of an application and the amount of the grant award.
(d) The rejection of an application and the amount of a grant award  may not be appealed,
[3]
HB 4065
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
but a developer  may reapply for a grant at any time within the applicable deadlines of the
grant program for the same or another eligible housing project.
(6) Upon request by a sponsoring jurisdiction, the department may assist  the sponsoring
jurisdiction with, or perform on behalf of the sponsoring jurisdiction,  any duty required un-
der this section.
SECTION 4.
(1) Upon request of the sponsoring jurisdiction under section 3 (3)(b) of this
2024 Act, the assessor of the county in which is  located the eligible housing project to which
an application being reviewed under section 3 of this 2024 Act relates shall:
(a) Using the last certified assessment roll for the property tax  year in which the appli-
cation is received under section 3 of this 2024 Act:
(A) Determine the amount of property taxes  assessed against all tax accounts that in-
clude the eligible housing project property; and
(B) Subtract the amount of fire  district taxes from the amount determined under sub-
paragraph (A) of this paragraph.
(b) For  the first property tax year for which the completed eligible housing project
property is estimated to be taken into account:
(A) Determine the estimated amount of property taxes that  will be assessed against all
tax accounts that include the eligible housing project property; and
(B) Subtract  the estimated amount of fire district taxes from the amount determined
under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(c) Determine the amount of the  increment that results from subtracting the amount
determined under subsection (1)(a) of this section from the amount determined under  sub-
section (1)(b) of this section.
(2) As soon as practicable  after determining amounts under this subsection, the county
tax officers shall provide written notice to  the sponsoring jurisdiction and the Housing and
Community Services Department certifying the amounts.
SECTION 5. (1)(a) The Housing and Community Services Department shall develop  a
program to make loans to sponsoring  jurisdictions to fund grants awarded under the spon-
soring jurisdiction’s grant program adopted pursuant to section 2 of this 2024 Act.
(b) The loans shall be interest free for the term set by the sponsoring jurisdiction  under
section 3 (3)(c) of this 2024 Act.
(2) For each application approved under  section 3 (5)(b) of this 2024 Act, the Housing and
Community Services Department shall:
(a) Enter into a loan agreement with the sponsoring jurisdiction in the amount of  the
grant award for the application set under section 3 (3)(d) of this 2024 Act; and
(b) Pay to the  sponsoring jurisdiction the loan proceeds out of the Housing Project Re-
volving Loan Fund established under section 12 of this 2024 Act.
(3) In addition to the payment made under subsection  (2)(b) of this section, the depart-
ment shall pay out of the fund, with respect to each loan:
(a) An amount  equal to one percent of the loan proceeds to the sponsoring jurisdiction
to reimburse the  sponsoring jurisdiction for the costs of administering the grant program,
other than the costs of tax administration;
(b) An amount  equal to one percent of the loan proceeds to the sponsoring jurisdiction
to pay  the county in which the sponsoring jurisdiction is situated to reimburse the county
for the costs of the tax administration of the grant program by the county tax officers; and
[4]
HB 4065
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) A  reimbursement to the department for its actual costs incurred in administering
sections 1 to 12 of this 2024 Act.
(4) The Housing and Community  Services Department may assign any and all loan
amounts made under this section to the Department of Revenue  for collection as provided
in ORS 293.250.
(5) The Housing and Community Services Department may:
(a) Consult  with the Oregon Business Development Department about any of the powers
and duties conferred on  the Housing and Community Services Department by sections 1 to
12 of this 2024 Act; and
(b) Adopt any rule it  considers necessary or convenient for the administration of sections
1 to 12 of this 2024 Act by the Housing and Community Services Department.
SECTION 6.
(1) Upon entering into a loan agreement with  the Housing and Community
Services Department under section 5 of this 2024 Act, a  sponsoring jurisdiction shall offer a
grant agreement to each developer whose application was  approved under section 3 (5)(b) of
this 2024 Act.
(2) The grant agreement shall:
(a) Include a grant award in the amount set under section 3 (3)(d) of this 2024 Act; and
(b) Contain terms that:
(A) Are required under sections 1 to 12 of this 2024 Act or the ordinance or resolution
adopted by the sponsoring jurisdiction pursuant to section 2 of this 2024 Act.
(B) Do not  conflict with sections 1 to 12 of this 2024 Act or the ordinance or resolution
adopted by the sponsoring jurisdiction pursuant to section 2 of this 2024 Act.
(3) Upon entering into a  grant agreement with a developer, a sponsoring jurisdiction shall
adopt an ordinance or resolution setting forth the details of  the eligible housing project that
is the subject of the agreement, including but not limited to:
(a) A description of the eligible housing project;
(b) An itemized description of the eligible costs;
(c) The amount and terms of the grant award;
(d) Written notice that the  eligible housing project property is exempt from property
taxation in accordance with section 7 of this 2024 Act; and
(e) A statement declaring that the grant has been  awarded in response to the housing
needs of communities within the sponsoring jurisdiction.
(4) As soon as practicable after the ordinance or resolution required under subsection (3)
of this section becomes effective, the sponsoring jurisdiction shall distribute the loan  pro-
ceeds received from the department under section 5 (2) of this 2024 Act to  the developer as
the grant moneys awarded under this section.
(5) The sponsoring jurisdiction shall forward to the tax officers of  the county in which
the eligible housing project is located a copy  of the grant agreement, the ordinance or re-
solution and any other material the sponsoring  jurisdiction considers necessary for the tax
officers to perform their duties under sections 1 to 12 of this  2024 Act or the ordinance or
resolution.
(6) Upon request, the department may assist the sponsoring jurisdiction with,  or perform
on behalf of the sponsoring jurisdiction, any duty required under this section.
SECTION 7.
(1) Upon receipt of the copy of a grant agreement and ordinance or  resol-
ution from the sponsoring jurisdiction  under section 6 (5) of this 2024 Act, the assessor of
[5]
HB 4065
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the county in which eligible housing project property is located shall:
(a) Exempt the eligible housing project property in accordance with this section;
(b) Assess and tax the nonexempt property in  the tax account as other similar property
is assessed and taxed; and
(c) Submit a written report to the sponsoring jurisdiction setting forth the  assessor’s
estimate of the amount of:
(A) The real market value of the exempt eligible housing project property; and
(B) The property taxes on the exempt eligible housing project property  that would have
been collected if the property were not exempt.
(2)(a) The exemption shall first  apply to the property tax year that immediately succeeds
the effective date of the ordinance or resolution adopted by  the sponsoring jurisdiction under
section 6 (3) of this 2024 Act.
(b) The eligible housing project property shall be disqualified from  the exemption on the
earliest of:
(A) July 1 of the property tax year immediately  succeeding the date on which the fee
payment obligation under section 9 of this 2024  Act that relates to the eligible housing
project is repaid in full;
(B) The date on which the annual fee imposed on the fee payer under section 9 of this
2024 Act becomes delinquent;
(C) The date  on which foreclosure proceedings are commenced as provided by law for
delinquent nonexempt taxes assessed with respect to the tax account that  includes the eli-
gible housing project; or
(D) The date on which a condition specified in section 10 (1) of this 2024 Act occurs.
(c) After the eligible housing project  property has been disqualified from the exemption
under this subsection, the property shall be assessed and taxed as other  similar property is
assessed and taxed.
(3) For each tax year that the eligible housing project property is exempt from  taxation,
the assessor shall enter a notation on the assessment roll stating:
(a) That the property is exempt under this section; and
(b) The  presumptive number of property tax years for which the exemption is granted,
which shall be the term of the loan agreement relating to the eligible housing  project set
under section 3 (3)(c) of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 8.
(1) Repayment of loans made under section 5 of this 2024 Act  shall begin, in
accordance with section 9 of this  2024 Act, after completion of the eligible housing project
funded by the grant to which the loan relates.
(2)(a) The sponsoring jurisdiction shall determine  the date of completion of an eligible
housing project.
(b)(A) If an eligible housing project is completed before  July 1 of the assessment year,
repayment shall begin with the property  tax year that begins on July 1 of the assessment
year.
(B) If an  eligible housing project is completed on or after July 1 of the assessment year,
repayment shall begin with the property tax year that begins on  July 1 of the succeeding
assessment year.
(c) After determining the date of completion  under paragraph (b) of this subsection, the
sponsoring jurisdiction shall notify the Housing and Community Services Department and the
[6]
HB 4065
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
county tax officers of the determination.
(3) A loan shall remain outstanding until repaid in full.
SECTION 9.
(1) The fee payer for  eligible housing project property that has been granted
exemption under section 7 of this 2024 Act shall pay an annual fee for the term  that shall
be the presumptive number of years for  which the property is granted exemption under
section 7 (3)(b) of this 2024 Act.
(2)(a) The amount of the fee for  the first property tax year that the loan is outstanding
shall be the portion  of the increment determined under section 4 (1)(c) of this 2024 Act that
is attributable to the eligible housing project property to which the fee relates.
(b) For each subsequent property  tax year, the amount of the fee shall be 103 percent
of the amount of the fee for the preceding property tax year.
(3)(a) Not later than July 15 of each property tax year during the term of the fee obli-
gation, the  sponsoring jurisdiction shall certify to the assessor each fee amount that became
due under this section on or after July 16 of the previous property tax year from fee  payers
with respect to eligible housing projects located in the sponsoring jurisdiction.
(b) The assessor shall place each fee amount on the assessment and tax rolls  of the
county and notify:
(A) The sponsoring jurisdiction of each fee amount and the aggregate of all  fee amounts
imposed with respect to eligible housing project property located in the sponsoring jurisdic-
tion.
(B) The Housing and Community Services Department of each fee amount  and the ag-
gregate of all fee amounts with respect to all  eligible housing project property located in the
county.
(4)(a) The assessor shall include on  the tax statement of each tax account that includes
exempt eligible housing project property the amount of the  fee imposed on the fee payer with
respect to the eligible housing project property.
(b) The fee shall be collected and enforced in the same  manner as ad valorem property
taxes, including nonexempt taxes, are collected and enforced.
(5)(a) For each property tax year in which a fee is payable under this section,  the treas-
urer shall:
(A) Estimate the amount of  fire district taxes that would have been collected on eligible
housing project property if the property were not exempt;
(B) Distribute out of the fee moneys the amounts determined under paragraph (a) of  this
subsection to the respective fire districts when other ad valorem property  taxes are distrib-
uted under ORS 311.395; and
(C) Transfer the net fee moneys to the Housing and Community Services Department for
deposit in the Housing Project Revolving  Loan Fund established under section 12 of this 2024
Act in repayment of the loans to which the fees relate.
(b) Nonexempt taxes shall be distributed in the same manner  as other ad valorem prop-
erty taxes are distributed.
(6) Any person with an interest in the eligible housing project property  on the date on
which any fee amount  becomes due shall be jointly and severally liable for payment of the
fee amount.
(7) Any loan amounts that have not been repaid when the fee payer has  discharged its
obligations in full under this section remain the obligation of the  sponsoring jurisdiction that
[7]
HB 4065
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
obtained the loan from the department under section 5 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 10.
(1)(a) A developer that received a  grant award under section 6 of this 2024
Act shall become liable for  immediate payment of any outstanding annual fee payments im-
posed under section 9 of this 2024 Act for the entire term of the fee if:
(A) The developer has  not completed the eligible housing project within three years fol-
lowing the date on which the grant moneys were distributed to the developer;
(B) The eligible housing project changes substantially from the project for which  the
developer’s application was approved such that the project would  not have been eligible for
the grant; or
(C) The developer has not complied  with a requirement specified in the grant agreement.
(b) The sponsoring  jurisdiction may, in its sole discretion, extend the date on which the
eligible housing project must be completed.
(2) If the sponsoring  jurisdiction discovers that a developer willfully made a false state-
ment or misrepresentation or willfully failed to report a  material fact to obtain a grant with
respect to an eligible housing project, the sponsoring jurisdiction  may impose on the devel-
oper a penalty  not to exceed 20 percent of the amount of the grant so obtained, plus any
applicable interest and fees associated with the costs of collection.
(3) Any amounts imposed under  subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be a lien on the
eligible housing project property and the nonexempt property in the tax account.
(4) The sponsoring jurisdiction shall provide written notice of any amounts  that become
due under subsections (1) and (2) of this section to the county tax officers and the Housing
and Community Services Department.
(5)(a) Any  and all amounts required to be paid under this section shall be considered to
be liquidated and delinquent, and the Housing and Community Services Department shall
assign such amounts to the Department  of Revenue for collection as provided in ORS 293.250.
(b) Amounts collected under this subsection shall be deposited, net of any  collection
charges, in the Housing Project Revolving  Loan Fund established under section 12 of this
2024 Act.
SECTION 11. (1) Not later than June 30 of each year in which a grant agreement entered
into under section 6 of this 2024 Act  is in effect, a developer that is party to the agreement
shall submit a  report to the sponsoring jurisdiction in which the eligible housing project is
located that contains:
(a) The status of the construction or conversion of the eligible housing project  property,
including an estimate of the date of completion;
(b) An itemized description of the uses of the grant moneys; and
(c) Any information the sponsoring  jurisdiction considers important for evaluating the
eligible housing project and the developer’s performance under the terms  of the grant
agreement.
(2) Not later than August 15  of each year, each sponsoring jurisdiction shall submit to
the Housing and Community Services Department a report  containing such information re-
lating to eligible housing projects within the sponsoring jurisdiction as  the department re-
quires.
(3)(a) Not later than November 15 of each year, the department  shall submit, in the
manner required under ORS 192.245, a  report to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to housing.
[8]
HB 4065
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The report shall set forth in detail:
(A) The information received from sponsoring jurisdictions under subsection  (2) of this
section;
(B) The status of the repayment of all outstanding loans made under section 5  of this
2024 Act and of the payment of all fees imposed under section 9 of this 2024 Act  and all
amounts imposed under section 10 of this 2024 Act; and
(C) The cumulative experience of the program developed and implemented under sections
1 to 12 of this 2024 Act.
(c) The report may include recommendations for legislation.
SECTION 12.
(1) The  Housing Project Revolving Loan Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by  the Housing
Project Revolving Loan Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund may be  invested as provided by ORS 293.701 to 293.857, and the
earnings from the investments shall be credited to the fund.
(3) Moneys in the Housing Project Revolving Loan Fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred or credited to the  fund by the Legis-
lative Assembly;
(b) Net fee moneys transferred under section 9 of this 2024 Act;
(c) Amounts deposited in the fund under section 10 of this 2024 Act;
(d) Interest and other earnings received on moneys in the fund; and
(e) Other moneys or  proceeds of property from any public or private source that are
transferred, donated or otherwise credited to the fund.
(4) Moneys in the Housing Project Revolving Loan Fund are continuously  appropriated
to the Housing and Community Services Department for the following purposes:
(a) Making loans to sponsoring jurisdictions under section 5 of this 2024 Act; and
(b) Reimbursing the actual costs incurred by the department  under sections 1 to 12 of
this 2024 Act.
(5) Moneys in  the Housing Project Revolving Loan Fund at the end of a biennium shall
be retained in the fund and used for the purposes set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
SECTION 13.
The Housing and Community Services Department  shall have developed and
begun operating the loan program that the department is required to  develop under section
5 of this 2024 Act, including regional trainings and  outreach for jurisdictional partners, no
later than June 30, 2025.
SECTION 14. There is appropriated to the Housing and Community Services  Department,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $50,000,000,
for deposit in the Housing Project  Revolving Loan Fund established under section 12 of this
2024 Act, to be used for the purpose of carrying out  the provisions of sections 1 to 12 of this
2024 Act.
SECTION 15. Section 16 of this 2024 Act is added  to and made a part of ORS 456.255 to
456.267.
SECTION 16. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall provide grants
to nonprofit organizations that provide resources  and education to tenants to allow the or-
ganization to:
(a) Engage with tenants of  a specific publicly supported housing development that have
received notices of withdrawal under ORS 456.259; or
[9]
HB 4065
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
(b) Develop the organization’s capacity to engage with tenants as  described in paragraph
(a) of this subsection.
(2) As used in  this section, “engage with tenants” includes in-person outreach with indi-
vidual tenants or hosting meetings or training with groups of tenants for the purposes  of
assisting tenants to:
(a) Understand their legal rights under ORS chapter 90 and ORS 456.255 to 456.267;
(b) Find and apply for housing or private or public housing programs or assistance; or
(c) Take other steps to obtain, retain or afford housing or to relocate.
(3) In providing grants under this section, the department shall consider the service  area
of the organization and the amount of tenants within  the service area that may be impacted
by anticipated withdrawals.
SECTION 17.
Section 16 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 18. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the  biennium ending June
30, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, to provide  grants under section
17 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 19. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[10]