Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 4 of this 2017 Act:
(1)(a) “Claim of right” means  a certificate, decree, determination, exemption, permit,
statute or other legal authorization to divert or appropriate waters of this state for benefi-
cial use.
(b) “Claim of right” does not  mean an authorization under ORS 537.545 to use ground
water for a purpose that is exempt.
(2)(a) “Water appropriator”  means an entity that diverts or appropriates water for ben-
eficial use under a claim of right.
(b) “Water appropriator” does not mean:
(A) The holder of an in-stream water right; or
(B) A customer, district  member or other secondary user of water that another entity
has diverted or appropriated under a claim of right.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that:
(a) Water use data is a fundamental tool to ensure efficient  management, ensure effec-
tive water distribution and help plan for future water needs; and
(b) The measurement and reporting of water use benefits all water appropriators  and is
critical to the effective management of the water resources of this state.
(2) It is the policy of this state to:
(a) Actively promote measurement and reporting of water use by water  appropriators;
and
(b) Encourage federal, state and local government coordination and cooperation in pro-
viding financial support to water appropriators for water use measurement and reporting.
SECTION 3.
(1) A water appropriator shall install, operate and maintain a device to
measure the amount, and allow determination of  the rate and duty, of water used by the
water appropriator under a claim of right. A device must measure the amount,  and allow
determination of  the rate and duty, of water for each point of diversion or point of appro-
priation utilized for water use under the claim of right.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2139
HB 2705
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
(2) A water  appropriator shall maintain a device required under subsection (1) of this
section in good working order for the  period of water use. A device must be capable of con-
tinuously measuring the amount, and allow the continuous determination of rate, of water
diversion or appropriation using the best practicable technologies and practices available, as
determined by the Water Resources Commission,  at the time the device is installed. The
commission shall adopt rules establishing accuracy requirements and other requirements  for
devices required under this section.
(3) A water appropriator shall provide evidence satisfactory to  the Water Resources De-
partment that a device required under subsection (1) of this section has been  properly in-
stalled and is properly functioning. The evidence must accompany the  first report submitted
under section 4 of this 2017 Act following installation  of the device. Evidence demonstrating
to the satisfaction of  the department that the device continues to function properly must
accompany each subsequent report under section 4 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 4.
(1) A water appropriator shall report water amount, rate and duty informa-
tion collected by a device under section 3 of this 2017 Act to the  Water Resources Depart-
ment. The information must include, but need not be limited to, daily maximum rates  of
diversion or appropriation. A report concerning ground  water must also include any infor-
mation required by the department concerning ground water levels. A  report concerning a
diversion or appropriation for in-channel storage must report  both inflow and outflow for the
reservoir.
(2) A water appropriator shall submit reports  under this section in accordance with a
schedule approved by the Water Resources Commission. The schedule shall require at least
annual reporting, but may require more frequent reporting.
SECTION 5.
The Water Resources Department may assess a civil  penalty for violation
of section 3 or 4 of this 2017 Act, not to exceed $500. For a continuing violation, each  day the
violation continues is a separate violation.
SECTION 6. (1) Except as provided in subsection  (2) of this section, sections 3 and 4 of
this 2017 Act apply to:
(a) Water  use that utilizes a point of diversion or point of appropriation placed in service
on or after the effective date of this 2017 Act; and
(b) Water use after December 31, 2020, that utilizes a point  of diversion or point of ap-
propriation placed in service prior to the effective date of this 2017 Act.
(2) The Water Resources Commission may, by  order, require a water appropriator or
group of water appropriators that utilize points of diversion or points  of appropriation de-
scribed in paragraph (1)(b) of this section to comply with sections 3 and 4 of this 2017  Act
by a date earlier than December 31, 2020.
[2]