Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the  State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $1,500,000, for de-
posit into the Oregon  Conservation and Recreation Fund established by ORS 496.252 for ac-
tivities described in ORS 496.252 (2) that relate to water.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1460