Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Community College Adult Reconnect is established.
(2) The task force consists of  17 members appointed by the executive director of the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission as follows:
(a) Two members from community college instructional administration;
(b) Two members who are student services administrators at a community college;
(c) Two members who are registrars at a community college;
(d) Two members who are advisors at a community college;
(e) Two members  who are staff of a community college working in admissions, enroll-
ment and recruiting;
(f) Two members who are career pathways administrators at a community college;
(g) One member who is a student at a community college;
(h) Two members from the Oregon Community College Association; and
(i) Two members from the Office of Community Colleges and  Workforce Development in
the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(3) The task force shall study and provide recommendations on the following:
(a) Defining “student  eligibility” for a program designed to assist adult learners to over-
come barriers to earning a degree or credential; and
(b) Developing components of the program, including:
(A) Tuition assistance;
(B) Non-tuition financial assistance, which may  include child care and transportation
assistance;
(C) Specialized benefits navigators who help students to access any available resources;
(D) Solutions for how to address any past-due institutional balance;
(E) Institutional incentives designed to grant credit for prior learning; and
(F) Identifying any potential vendor for services to reconnect  adult learners to a com-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4555
HB 3892
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
munity college.
(4) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(5) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the members
of the task force.
(6) The  executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall select
one member of the task force to serve as chairperson and another  member to serve as vice
chairperson.
(7) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a comprehensive report  in the manner provided in ORS
192.245, and may include recommendations  for legislation, regarding implementation of the
program described in subsection (3) of this  section to the interim committees of the Legis-
lative Assembly related to higher education no later than December 15, 2026.
(11) The Higher Education  Coordinating Commission shall provide staff support to the
task force.
(12) Members of the task force serve as volunteers on the task  force and, unless they
are qualified members, as defined in ORS 292.495,  are not entitled to compensation or re-
imbursement for expenses.
(13) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
(14) All appointments to the task force made under subsection (2) of  this section must
be completed by the later of 90 days after adjournment sine die of  the 2025 session of the
Eighty-third Legislative Assembly or October 1, 2025.
(15) The task force shall have its first meeting on or before the later of 100 days after
adjournment sine die of  the 2025 session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly or October
15, 2025.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]