Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 244.260 is amended to read:
244.260. (1)(a) Any person may file with the Oregon Government Ethics  Commission a signed or
electronically signed written complaint alleging that there has been a violation of either:
(A) Any provision  of this chapter or of any rule adopted by the commission under this chapter.
The complaint shall state the person’s  reason for believing that a violation occurred and include any
evidence relating to the alleged violation.
(B) ORS 192.610 to 192.705.  The complaint shall state the particulars of meetings of a governing
body that were not in compliance with ORS 192.610 to 192.705 and  shall state the person’s reason
for believing that a violation occurred. The person shall  include any evidence relating to the alleged
violation with the complaint.
(b) If  at any time the commission has reason to believe that there has been a violation of a
provision of this chapter or  ORS 192.660 or a rule adopted by the commission under this chapter,
the commission may proceed under this section on its own motion as if the commission  had received
a complaint.
(2)(a) Not later than  two business days after receiving a complaint under this section, the com-
mission shall notify the person who is the subject of the complaint.
(b) Before approving  a motion to proceed under this section without a complaint, the commission
shall provide  notice to the person believed to have committed the violation of the time and place
of the hearing at which the motion will be discussed. If the commission decides to proceed  on its
own motion, the commission shall give notice to the person not later than two business days after
the motion is approved.
(c) The commission shall give notice of the complaint or motion under paragraph (a)  or (b) of
this subsection. The notice must describe the nature of the  alleged violation. The notice must in-
clude copies of all materials submitted with  a complaint. If the commission will consider a motion
to proceed without a complaint, the notice must provide  copies of all materials that the commission
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 433
HB 2927
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
will consider at the hearing on the motion.
(d) Information that the commission considers before approving a motion to proceed on  its own
motion under this section and any correspondence  regarding the motion or potential violation is
confidential. The executive director of the commission and  the commission members and staff may
not make any public comment or publicly disclose any materials relating to the motion pending  the
commission’s approval to proceed. A person who intentionally violates this paragraph is subject  to
a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed $1,000. Any person aggrieved as a result of a  violation
of this paragraph by the executive director or a member of the commission or  its staff may file a
petition  in  a court of competent jurisdiction in the county in which the petitioner resides in order
to enforce the civil penalty provided in this paragraph.
(3) After  the commission receives a complaint or decides to proceed on its own motion, the
executive director of the  commission shall undertake action in the Preliminary Review Phase to
determine whether there is cause to undertake an investigation. If the  person who is the subject
of the action is a member of the Legislative  Assembly, the executive director shall determine
whether the alleged violation involves conduct  protected by Article IV, section 9, of the Oregon
Constitution.
(4)(a) The Preliminary Review Phase begins on the date the complaint is filed  or the date the
commission decides to proceed on its own motion and ends on the date the  executive director com-
pletes the statement of the facts determined during the  phase under paragraph (d) of this subsection.
The Preliminary Review Phase may not exceed 60 days unless a complaint  is filed under this section
with respect to a person who is a candidate for elective public office,  the complaint is filed within
61 days before the date of  an election at which the person is a candidate for nomination or election
and a delay is requested in  writing by the candidate. If the candidate makes a request under this
paragraph, the Preliminary Review Phase  must be completed not later than 60 days after the date
of the election.
(b) During the Preliminary Review Phase, the executive director of the commission  may seek,
solicit or otherwise obtain  any books, papers, records, memoranda or other additional information,
administer oaths and take depositions necessary to determine whether there is cause to  undertake
an investigation or whether the alleged violation involves conduct protected  by Article IV, section
9, of the Oregon Constitution.
(c) The Preliminary Review Phase is confidential. The executive director  of the commission and
any commission members and  staff may acknowledge receipt of a complaint but may not make any
public comment or publicly disclose any materials relating to a  case during the Preliminary Review
Phase. A person who  intentionally violates this paragraph is subject to a civil penalty in an amount
not to exceed $1,000. Any person aggrieved as a result of a violation  of this paragraph by the
executive director or a member of the commission or its staff may file a petition in a court of com-
petent jurisdiction in the county in which the petitioner resides in order to enforce the  civil penalty
provided in this paragraph.
(d)(A) At the end of the Preliminary Review Phase, the executive director of the  commission
shall prepare a statement of the facts  determined during the phase, including appropriate legal ci-
tations and relevant authorities.  Before presentation to the commission, the executive director’s
statement shall be reviewed by legal counsel to the commission.
(B) Following the conclusion of the Preliminary Review Phase, the executive director of  the
commission  shall  attend an executive session of the commission where the executive director shall
present the statement of the facts and summarize the results  of the Preliminary Review Phase to the
[2]
HB 2927
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
commission and recommend to the  commission whether there is cause to undertake an investigation
or whether the commission should instead dismiss the complaint or rescind its motion.
(C) At the executive session, the commission  shall consider the recommendation of the executive
director  and make the final determination as to whether there is cause to undertake an investigation
or whether the commission should instead dismiss the complaint or rescind its motion.
(D) All case related materials and proceedings shall be open to the public after the  commission
makes a finding of cause to undertake an investigation, dismisses a complaint or  rescinds a motion.
(e) The time limit  imposed in this subsection and the commission’s inquiry are suspended if a
court has enjoined the executive director or the commission from continuing the inquiry.
(5)(a) If the commission determines that there is not cause to undertake an investigation or that
the alleged violation of this chapter involves conduct  protected by Article IV, section 9, of the
Oregon Constitution, the commission shall dismiss the complaint or rescind its motion and  formally
enter the dismissal or rescission in its records. If the commission  considers the recommendation of
the executive director in an executive session but the  commission does not affirmatively vote to
undertake an investigation, dismiss the complaint or rescind its motion, the nonaction taken by the
commission shall be considered a  dismissal of the complaint or a rescission of its motion. The com-
mission shall notify  the person who is the subject of action under this section of the dismissal or
rescission. After dismissal or rescission, the  commission may not take further action involving the
person unless a new and different complaint is filed or action on the commission’s  own motion is
undertaken based on different conduct.
(b) If the commission makes a finding  of cause to undertake an investigation, the commission
shall undertake action in the Investigatory  Phase. The commission shall notify the person who is the
subject of the investigation, identify the issues  to be examined and confine the investigation to those
issues. If the commission finds reason to expand the investigation, the commission shall move to do
so, record in its minutes the issues to be examined before expanding the scope of  its investigation
and formally notify  the complainant, if any, and the person who is the subject of the investigation
of the expansion and the scope of the investigation.
(6)(a) The Investigatory  Phase begins on the date the commission makes a finding of cause to
undertake an investigation and ends on the date the  commission dismisses the complaint, rescinds
its own motion, issues a settlement order, moves  to commence a contested case proceeding or takes
other action justified by the  findings. Except as provided in this subsection, the Investigatory Phase
may not  exceed 180 days unless a delay is stipulated to by both the person who is the subject of
action under this section and the commission with  the commission reserving a portion of the delay
period to complete its actions.
(b) During the Investigatory Phase,  the commission may seek any additional information, ad-
minister oaths, take depositions and issue  subpoenas to compel attendance of witnesses and the
production of books, papers, records, memoranda  or other information necessary to complete the
investigation. If any person fails to comply with any subpoena issued under this paragraph or refuses
to testify on any matters on which the person may be lawfully interrogated, the  commission shall
follow the procedure described in ORS 183.440 to compel compliance.
(c) The time limit imposed in this subsection and the commission’s investigation:
(A) May be suspended if there is a pending criminal investigation that relates to the issues
arising out of the underlying facts or conduct at issue in the matter before the commission and  the
commission  determines  that it cannot adequately complete its investigation until the pending crimi-
nal investigation is complete;
[3]
HB 2927
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) May be suspended if a suit is commenced under ORS 192.680 concerning the same  meetings
of a governing body that are the subject of the investigation by the commission,  until a final adju-
dication of the suit has been made; [ or]
(C) Are suspended if a court has enjoined the commission from continuing its investigation ; or
(D) May be extended for  a period not to exceed 60 days, upon issuance of an order by the
commission to continue the investigation .
(d) At the end of the Investigatory Phase, the commission shall take action by order. The action
may include:
(A) Dismissal, with or without comment;
[(B) Continuation of the investigation for a period not to exceed 30 days for  the purpose of addi-
tional fact-finding;]
[(C)] (B) Moving to a contested case proceeding;
[(D)] (C) Entering into a negotiated settlement; or
[(E)] (D) Taking other appropriate action if justified by the findings.
(e) The commission may move to a contested  case proceeding if the commission determines that
the information presented to the commission is sufficient to make a preliminary finding of:
(A) A violation of any provision of  this chapter or of any rule adopted by the commission under
this chapter; or
(B) A violation of any provision of ORS 192.610 to 192.705.
(7) A person conducting any inquiry or investigation under this section shall:
(a) Conduct the inquiry or investigation in an impartial and objective manner; and
(b) Provide to the executive  director or the commission all favorable and unfavorable informa-
tion the person collects.
(8) The commission shall report the  findings of any inquiry or investigation in an impartial
manner. The commission shall report both favorable and unfavorable findings and  shall make the
findings available to:
(a) The person who is the subject of the inquiry or investigation;
(b) The appointing authority, if any;
(c) The Attorney General, if the findings relate to a state public official;
(d) The appropriate district attorney, if the findings relate to a local public official;
(e) The Commission on Judicial Fitness and Disability, if the findings relate to a judge; and
(f) The governing body of a public body, if the inquiry or investigation concerns an alleged vi-
olation of ORS 192.610 to 192.705 and the person  who is the subject of the inquiry or investigation
is a member of that governing body.
(9) Hearings conducted  under this chapter must be held before an administrative law judge as-
signed from the Office of  Administrative Hearings established under ORS 183.605. The procedure
shall be that for a contested case under ORS chapter 183.
(10) The  Oregon Government Ethics Commission may not inquire into or investigate any conduct
that occurred more than four years before a complaint is filed or a motion is approved  under sub-
section (1) of this section.
(11) This section does not prevent the commission and the person alleged to  have violated any
provision of this chapter or ORS 192.660 or any rule adopted by the commission under this  chapter
from stipulating to a  finding of fact concerning the violation and consenting to an appropriate pen-
alty. The commission shall enter an order based on the stipulation and consent.
(12) At any time during proceedings conducted under this section, the commission may  enter
[4]
HB 2927
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
into a negotiated settlement with the person who is the subject of action under this section.
(13) As used in this section:
(a) “Cause” means that there is  a substantial, objective basis for believing that an offense or
violation may have been committed and the person who is the subject of an inquiry may  have com-
mitted the offense or violation.
(b) “Governing body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 192.610.
(c) “Pending” means that a  prosecuting attorney is either actively investigating the factual basis
of the alleged criminal conduct, is preparing to seek or  is seeking an accusatory instrument, has
obtained an accusatory instrument and is proceeding to trial or is in trial or in the process of ne-
gotiating a plea.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 171.778 is amended to read:
171.778. (1)(a)  Any person may file with the Oregon Government Ethics Commission a signed
written complaint alleging that there  has been a violation of any provision of ORS 171.725 to 171.785
or of any rule adopted by the commission under ORS 171.725 to 171.785. The complaint shall state
the person’s reason for believing that a violation occurred and include any evidence  relating to the
alleged violation.
(b) If  at any time the commission has reason to believe that there has been a violation of a
provision of ORS 171.725 to 171.785 or of a rule  adopted by the commission under ORS 171.725 to
171.785, the commission may proceed under this section on  its own motion as if the commission had
received a complaint.
(2)(a) Not later than  two business days after receiving a complaint under this section, the com-
mission shall notify the person who is the subject of the complaint.
(b) Before approving  a motion to proceed under this section without a complaint, the commission
shall provide  notice to the person believed to have committed the violation of the time and place
of the meeting at which the motion will be discussed. If the  commission decides to proceed on its
own motion, the commission shall give notice to the person not later than two business days after
the motion is approved.
(c) The commission shall give notice of the complaint or motion under paragraph (a)  or (b) of
this subsection by mail and by telephone if the person can  be reached by telephone. The notice must
describe the nature of the alleged  violation. The mailed notice must include copies of all materials
submitted with a complaint. If the commission  will consider a motion to proceed without a com-
plaint, the notice must provide copies  of all materials that the commission will consider at the
hearing on the motion.
(d) Information that  the commission considers before approving a motion to proceed on its own
motion under this section and any correspondence regarding  the motion or potential violation is
confidential. Commission members and staff may not make  any public comment or publicly disclose
any materials relating to the motion pending the  commission’s approval to proceed. A person who
intentionally violates this paragraph is subject  to a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed $1,000.
Any person aggrieved as a result of a violation of this  paragraph by a member of the commission
or its staff may file  a petition in a court of competent jurisdiction in the county in which the
petitioner resides in order to enforce the civil penalty provided in this paragraph.
(3) After receiving a complaint or deciding to proceed  on its own motion, the commission shall
undertake action in the Preliminary Review Phase to determine  whether there is cause to undertake
an investigation.
(4)(a) The Preliminary Review Phase  begins on the date the complaint is filed or the date the
[5]
HB 2927
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
commission decides to proceed on its own motion and ends on the date  the commission determines
there is cause to undertake an  investigation, dismisses the complaint or rescinds its own motion.
The Preliminary Review  Phase may not exceed 135 days unless a delay is stipulated to by both the
subject person and the commission, with  the commission reserving a portion of the delay period to
complete its actions.
(b) During the Preliminary  Review Phase, the commission may seek, solicit or otherwise obtain
any books, papers, records,  memoranda or other additional information, administer oaths and take
depositions necessary to determine whether there is cause to undertake an investigation.
(c) The Preliminary Review Phase is confidential. Commission members  and staff may acknowl-
edge receipt of a complaint but may  not make any public comment or publicly disclose any materials
relating to a case during the Preliminary Review  Phase. A person who intentionally violates this
paragraph is  subject to a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed $1,000. Any person aggrieved as
a result of a violation of this paragraph by a member of the commission or its staff may file a peti-
tion in a court of competent jurisdiction  in the county in which the petitioner resides in order to
enforce the civil penalty provided in this paragraph.
(d) At the conclusion of the Preliminary Review Phase, the commission shall conduct its delib-
erations in executive session. All case related materials and  proceedings shall be open to the public
after the commission makes a finding of cause to undertake an investigation,  dismisses a complaint
or rescinds a motion. Prior to the end of the Preliminary Review Phase, the executive  director of
the commission shall prepare a  statement of the facts determined during the phase, including ap-
propriate legal citations and relevant authorities. Before presentation to the commission, the exec-
utive director’s statement shall be reviewed by legal counsel to the commission.
(e) The time limit imposed in this subsection and the commission’s inquiry are suspended if:
(A) There is a pending criminal investigation that relates to the  issues arising out of the
underlying facts or conduct  at issue in the matter before the commission, unless the parties stipulate
otherwise; or
(B) A court has enjoined the commission from continuing its inquiry.
(5)(a) If the commission determines that there  is not cause to undertake an investigation, the
commission shall dismiss the complaint or rescind its motion and formally enter the  dismissal or
rescission in its records. The commission shall notify the  person who is the subject of the inquiry
of the dismissal  or rescission. After dismissal or rescission, the commission may not take further
action involving the person unless a new and different complaint is filed or action  on the
commission’s own motion is undertaken based on different conduct.
(b) If the commission makes a finding of cause  to undertake an investigation, the commission
shall undertake action in the Investigatory  Phase. The commission shall notify the person who is the
subject of the investigation, identify the issues  to be examined and confine the investigation to those
issues. If the commission finds reason to expand the investigation, the commission shall move to do
so, record in  its minutes the issues to be examined before expanding the scope of its investigation
and formally notify the complainant, if any, and the person who is the subject of  the investigation
of the expansion and the scope of the investigation.
(6)(a) The Investigatory Phase begins on the date the commission makes a finding of  cause to
undertake an investigation and ends on  the date the commission dismisses the complaint, rescinds
its own motion, issues a settlement order, moves  to commence a contested case proceeding or takes
other action justified by the findings. The Investigatory Phase may not exceed 180  days unless a
delay is stipulated to by both the subject person and the commission, with the commission reserving
[6]
HB 2927
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a portion of the delay period to complete its actions.
(b) During the Investigatory Phase,  the commission may seek any additional information, ad-
minister oaths, take depositions and issue  subpoenas to compel attendance of witnesses and the
production of books, papers, records, memoranda  or other information necessary to complete the
investigation. If any person fails to comply with any subpoena issued under this paragraph or refuses
to testify on any matters on which the person may be lawfully interrogated, the  commission shall
follow the procedure described in ORS 183.440 to compel compliance.
(c) The  time limit imposed in this subsection and the commission’s investigation are suspended
if:
(A) There is a pending criminal  investigation that relates to the issues arising out of the
underlying facts or conduct  at issue in the matter before the commission, unless the parties stipulate
otherwise; or
(B) A court has enjoined the commission from continuing its investigation.
(d) At the end of the Investigatory Phase, the commission shall take action by order. The action
may include:
(A) Dismissal, with or without comment;
(B) Continuation of the investigation for a period not  to exceed [ 30] 60 days for the purpose of
additional fact-finding;
(C) Moving to a contested case proceeding;
(D) Entering into a negotiated settlement; or
(E) Taking other appropriate action if justified by the findings.
(e) The commission may move to a contested  case proceeding if the commission determines that
the information presented to the commission is sufficient to make a preliminary finding of a violation
of any provision of ORS 171.725 to 171.785  or of any rule adopted by the commission under ORS
171.725 to 171.785.
(7) A person conducting any inquiry or investigation under this section shall:
(a) Conduct the inquiry or investigation in an impartial and objective manner; and
(b) Provide to the commission all favorable and unfavorable information the person collects.
(8) The commission shall report the findings of any inquiry  or investigation in an impartial
manner. The commission shall  report both favorable and unfavorable findings and shall make the
findings available to:
(a) The person who is the subject of the inquiry or investigation; and
(b) Any employer of the person.
(9) Hearings conducted under ORS 171.725 to  171.785 must be held before an administrative law
judge assigned from the Office of Administrative Hearings  established under ORS 183.605. The pro-
cedure shall be that for a contested case under ORS chapter 183.
(10) The commission may not inquire into or investigate any  conduct that occurred more than
four years before a complaint is filed or a motion is approved under subsection (1) of this section.
(11) This section does not prevent the commission and the person alleged to  have violated any
provision of ORS  171.725 to 171.785 or any rule adopted by the commission under ORS 171.725 to
171.785 from stipulating to a finding of  fact concerning the violation and consenting to an appro-
priate penalty. The commission shall enter an order based on the stipulation and consent.
(12) At any time during proceedings conducted under this section, the commission may  enter
into a negotiated settlement with the person who is the subject of action under this section.
(13) As used in this section, “cause” and “pending” have  the meanings given those terms in ORS
[7]
HB 2927
1
2
3
4
5
6
244.260.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 171.778 and 244.260 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025
Act apply to investigations that:
(1) Are in the Investigatory Phase on the effective date of this 2025 Act; or
(2) Begin on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[8]