Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Affordable housing” means multifamily residential housing units that may  be pur-
chased or rented, with or without government assistance, by persons whose individual  or
household income is at or below 60 percent of the area median income based  on household
size.
(b) “Rural government” means the government of  a community outside the Portland
metropolitan area urban growth boundary:
(A) With a population  equal to or less than 15,000 located inside a county considered a
metropolitan statistical area as designated by the United States Office of Management and
Budget;
(B) With a population equal to or less than 40,000 located outside a  county considered a
metropolitan statistical area as designated by the United States Office of Management and
Budget; or
(C) That, within the three years before receiving an application for a payment, had a
population that satisfied subparagraph (A)  or (B) of this paragraph and, upon the receipt of
the application, has  a population within five percent of satisfying subparagraph (A) or (B)
of this paragraph.
(c) “System development charge” has the meaning given that term in ORS 223.299.
(2) The Housing and Community Services Department shall, with the advice and consent
of the Oregon Housing Stability Council, develop, establish and implement the  Rural System
Development Charges Program to increase the supply of rural  affordable multifamily hous-
ing.
(3) The department may not use moneys appropriated for the program to pay  system
development charges assessed by a rural government unless:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1622
HB 2701
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
(a) The system development charges are triggered by a building permit for the con-
struction of multifamily housing or  for the addition of dwelling units to multifamily housing;
and
(b) The person assessed the system development charges has  taken actions, including
entering into an affordable housing covenant  held by the department as described in ORS
456.280, to ensure that the assessed dwelling units remain  affordable housing for no less than
10 years.
(4) The department, with the advice and consent of the council,  may adopt criteria for
giving preferences for awards under the program for the development of affordable housing:
(a) That reduces  burdens on public infrastructure or results in lower system development
charges;
(b) That offers the greatest number of affordable housing  units for the funding provided;
(c) That provides the longest duration of use for  qualified properties as affordable hous-
ing units; or
(d) That reserves a percentage of affordable housing units for veterans.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Rural System Development Charges Fund is  established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) Moneys in  the fund consist of amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the
fund by the Legislative Assembly or received from any state, federal or private source.
(3) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the Housing and Community
Services Department to  administer the fund and to develop and implement the Rural System
Development Charges Program established under section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3. No later  than September 15 of each even-numbered year, the Housing and
Community Services Department shall report to an interim committee of  the Legislative
Assembly related to  housing, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, on the implementation
and administration of the program established under section 1 of this 2021 Act and  the
manner in which moneys  were expended from, and the outstanding balance of, the Rural
System Development Charges Fund established under section 2 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) Sections 1 to 3 of this 2021 Act are repealed on June 30, 2027.
(2) Any balance in  the Rural System Development Charges Fund established under sec-
tion 2 of this 2021 Act that is  unexpended and unobligated on the date of the repeal of section
2 of this 2021 Act, and all moneys  that would have been deposited in the Rural System De-
velopment Charges Fund had  section 2 of this 2021 Act remained in effect, shall be trans-
ferred to and deposited in  the General Fund and made available for general governmental
purposes.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for  the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $750,000 for deposit into the Rural System
Development Charges Fund.
SECTION 6. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]