Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act:
(1) “Curriculum” means a complete course of study for a particular content area or grade
level, including without limitation any required supplemental  materials or associated online
instruction.
(2) “Education savings account”  or “ESA” means an account to which funds are allocated
by the  State Treasurer to the parent of an eligible student in order to pay for qualified edu-
cation expenses pursuant to the requirements and conditions of sections 1  to 7 of this 2019
Act.
(3) “Education service provider”  means a person or organization that receives payments
from an education savings account in exchange for authorized expenditures. Education  ser-
vice providers include:
(a) Private schools;
(b) Non-public online learning programs or courses;
(c) State institutions of higher education, including:
(A) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(B) A community college established under ORS chapter 341; or
(C) Any other post-secondary institution of education that was originally established in
this state, is tax  exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and is ac-
credited by a regional or national accrediting agency recognized by the United  State De-
partment of Education.
(d) Public schools, including public charter, online and magnet schools;
(e) Private tutors and tutoring facilities;
(f) Companies that provide educational materials or curriculum;
(g) Individuals or businesses that provide education-related therapies or services; or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 748
SB 668
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(h) Any other provider of educational services approved by the State Treasurer.
(4) “Eligible student” means a resident of this state who  is eligible to enroll in a public
elementary or secondary school or with any other education service provider.
(5) “Parent”  means the parent, legal guardian or other person who has the legal duty to
ensure a child receives an education as provided by ORS 339.020.
(6) “Private tutoring” means:
(a) Tutoring services provided by a tutor or  tutoring facility that is accredited by a re-
gional or national accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Educa-
tion; or
(b) A person who:
(A) Is eligible to work as a teacher in this state;
(B) Has taught at an institution of higher education;
(C) Is a subject matter expert; or
(D) Is otherwise approved by the State Treasurer.
(7) “Student” means an eligible student who is participating  in the ESA program under
sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) A parent may establish  an ESA for an eligible student by entering into
a written agreement as provided in this section. A written agreement is valid  for one year
and must be renewed for each subsequent school year  for which the parent of an eligible
student chooses to receive a grant under section 3 of this 2019 Act.
(2)(a) The State Treasurer shall create a  standard written agreement that parents can
submit to establish an ESA for their eligible student. The State  Treasurer shall ensure that
written agreement forms are available online and may be submitted online.
(b) The State Treasurer must approve the establishment of an ESA for an eligible student
if a written agreement is entered into pursuant to this section.
(c) A parent must  enter into a separate written agreement for each eligible student of
the parent. No more than one ESA may be established for each eligible student.
(3) A  written agreement entered into by the parent of an eligible student must provide
that:
(a) The student will receive instruction for the school  year for which the written agree-
ment applies in at least the subjects of reading,  language, mathematics, science, and social
studies;
(b) The student will not  enroll as a full-time student in a public school for the school year
for which the written agreement applies;
(c) The parent will use the funds in the ESA only for qualifying expenses as  described in
section 4 of this 2019 Act;
(d) The parent and the  student will comply with the rules and requirements of sections
1 to 7 of this 2019 Act and any rules, regulations or policies adopted by the  State Treasurer;
(e) The student  will receive a grant, in the form of moneys deposited pursuant to section
3 of this 2019 Act, in the ESA established for the student; and
(f) If the student qualifies as a child with a  disability, as defined in ORS 343.035, the State
Treasurer shall  ensure that the parent who signs the agreement receives notice that par-
ticipation in the ESA program is a parental placement of the eligible student under 20 U.S.C.
1412 along with an explanation of the rights that  parentally placed students possess under
the federal Individuals with Disabilities Act and any applicable state laws and regulations.
[2]
SB 668
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) Upon entering into or renewing a written agreement,  the State Treasurer shall pro-
vide parents with a written explanation of the allowable uses of ESA  funds, the responsibil-
ities of parents, and the duties of the State Treasurer and  the role of any private financial
management firms or other private organizations that the  State Treasurer may contract
with to administer sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act pursuant to section 5 of this 2019 Act.
(5) The written agreement shall satisfy  the compulsory school attendance requirements
of ORS 339.010. Students participating in the  ESA program described in sections 1 to 7 of this
2019 Act who are not enrolled as a full-time student in a  private or online school shall be
exempt from the requirements of ORS 339.035.
(6) The State Treasurer shall annually  renew an eligible student’s ESA unless notified
by a parent that they wish to terminate the ESA. Students  with disabilities shall remain el-
igible for renewal as long as they remain eligible to be enrolled in a public school.
(7) Upon notice to the State Treasurer, a student may enroll  full-time in a public school.
(a) Enrolling as a  full-time student in a public school suspends the written agreement
between the parent and the State Treasurer, and no further funds shall be  deposited into the
student’s ESA until the student again qualifies for education  expenses pursuant to the re-
quirements and conditions of sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act.
(b) The written agreement between the parent and the  State Treasurer shall terminate
upon the request of the parent, or upon the student turning 25 years of age,  whichever oc-
curs first. Any  remaining ESA funds in the student’s account upon termination shall revert
to the General Fund.
(c) The State  Treasurer may adopt rules and policies to allow ESA students to enroll
full-time in a public school at any time in order to provide the least disruptive process.
(8) Nothing in sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act shall  be construed to require that a student
with an ESA be enrolled, full-time or part-time, in  either a private school or nonpublic online
school.
(9) The written agreement terminates automatically if a student no longer resides in  this
state. Upon termination, any moneys remaining in the  ESA shall revert to the General Fund.
SECTION 3. (1) If the parent of an eligible student enters into a written agreement pur-
suant to section 2 of this 2019 Act, a grant of  moneys must be transferred from the Educa-
tion Savings Program Fund  established in section 11 of this 2019 Act into the ESA of the
eligible student.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this  section, the grant
required by subsection (1) of this section must, for  the school year for which the grant is
made, be in an amount equal to one of the following:
(A) For an eligible student who is  a child with a disability, as defined in ORS 343.035,
$6,500.
(B) For an eligible student with a household income that is less than 185 percent  of the
federal poverty level, $6,500.
(C) For an eligible student not described in  subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph,
$4,900.
(b) For each biennium, the amounts  identified in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall
be adjusted by the  same percentage by which the amount appropriated to the State School
Fund for  the biennium is increased or decreased compared with the preceding biennium, as
determined by the Department of  Education after consultation with the Legislative Fiscal
[3]
SB 668
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Officer.
(3) The State Treasurer may deduct  no more than three percent from each grant for the
administrative costs incurred by  the State Treasurer in implementing the provisions of
sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act.
(4) Any moneys remaining in an ESA at the end of a school year shall roll over  to the
next school year.
(5) A written agreement is automatically renewed year to year until:
(a) The student is no longer a resident of this state;
(c) The student graduates from college with a bachelor’s degree;
(d) The student turns 25 years of age; or
(e) The ESA is revoked by the State Treasurer for substantial misuse of funds.
(6) After four consecutive years after high  school graduation, if the student has not en-
rolled in a postsecondary institution,  or if the student turns 25 years of age, whichever oc-
curs first, the ESA shall be closed and any unused funds shall revert to the General Fund.
(7) If a written  agreement is terminated for any reason, any moneys remaining in the
ESA shall revert to the General Fund.
(8) Notwithstanding subsection (2)(b) of this section, the amounts identified in  subsection
(2)(a) of this section shall first be adjusted beginning in the 2021-2023 biennium.
SECTION 4.
(1) Moneys deposited in an ESA pursuant to section 3 of this 2019  Act may
be expended only for:
(a) Tuition and fees at a private school;
(b) Tuition and fees for nonpublic online learning programs;
(c) Private tutoring;
(d) Services contracted for and provided by a  public school, public charter school, magnet
school or online public school, including individual classes, extracurricular  activities and
programs in these schools;
(e) Textbooks, curriculum or other instructional materials, including any supplemental
materials required by a curriculum, private school,  private online learning program, state
institution of higher education or public school;
(f) Computer hardware or other technological devices that  are primarily used to help
meet a student’s educational needs;
(g) Educational software and applications;
(h) Uniforms purchased from or through a private school;
(i) Fees  for nationally standardized assessments, advanced placement examinations,
state-recognized industry certification exams, examinations related to college,  university,
career or technical school admission, and tuition and fees for exam preparatory courses;
(j) Fees for summer education  programs and specialized after-school education programs,
but not for after-school childcare;
(k) Educational services and  therapies, including but not limited to occupational, behav-
ioral, physical, speech-language and audiology therapies;
(L) Tuition and fees at a state institution of higher education;
(m) Fees  for transportation paid to a fee-for-service transportation provider for the stu-
dent to travel to and from a participating education service provider;
(n) Fees for the management of the ESA; and
(o) Any other educational expense approved by the State Treasurer.
[4]
SB 668
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) ESA funds  may not be refunded, rebated or shared with a parent or student in any
manner.
(3) Any refund or rebate for goods or services purchased with ESA funds shall be credited
directly to the ESA of the student.
(4) Parents may make payments for the costs of educational goods  and services not
covered by the funds in the ESA of the student.
(5) Personal deposits into an ESA are not permitted.
(6) Funds deposited in the student’s ESA do not constitute taxable income to  the parent
or the student.
SECTION 5.
(1) The State Treasurer may contract with private organizations to carry
out sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act as  long as the private organizations charge only reason-
able fees, based on market rates, for their services, including, but  not limited to, contracting
with private financial management firms to manage ESAs.
(2) The  State Treasurer shall implement a system for payment for services from ESAs
to education service providers by electronic funds transfer, including but not limited to debit
cards, electronic payment systems, or  any other means of electronic payment that the State
Treasurer determines to be  commercially viable, cost-effective, and parent-friendly. The
State Treasurer may not adopt  a system that relies exclusively on requiring parents to be
reimbursed for out-of-pocket expenses. The State  Treasurer shall provide maximum flexibil-
ity to parents by facilitating direct payments to education service providers  as well as re-
quests for preapproval and reimbursement for qualifying expenses.
(3) The State Treasurer shall implement a commercially  viable, cost-effective and
parent-friendly system for publicly rating, reviewing and sharing information about  educa-
tion service providers.
(4) If an education service provider requires partial payment of tuition or fees prior  to
the start of the academic year to reserve space for  a student admitted to the education
service provider, the partial payment  may be paid by the State Treasurer prior to the start
of the school year in which the ESA is awarded, up to a maximum of $3,500, and  deducted
in an equitable manner from subsequent account deposits to ensure  adequate funds remain
available throughout the school year. If a student  decides not to attend the education service
provider, the partial reservation payment must be returned to the State  Treasurer by the
education service provider. Only one reservation payment  per student may be made per year.
(5) The State Treasurer shall have the authority to conduct or contract  for the auditing
of individual ESAs, and shall at a minimum conduct random audits of  ESAs on an annual
basis.
(6)(a) The State Treasurer shall  have the authority to terminate a written agreement and
to make any parent of an eligible student ineligible to enter into a new a written agreement
in the event of substantial misuse of ESA funds.
(b) The State Treasurer shall create procedures to ensure that a fair  process exists to
determine whether a substantial misuse of ESA funds has occurred.
(c) The State Treasurer shall have the authority to refer suspected cases of substantial
misuse of  ESA funds to the Attorney General or the district attorney of the county in which
the parent resides for investigation if evidence of fraudulent use of ESA funds is obtained.
(d) A parent may appeal the State Treasurer’s  decision to make a parent ineligible for
the program as a contested case under ORS chapter 183.
[5]
SB 668
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(7) The State Treasurer may bar an education service provider from the program if the
State Treasurer determines that the education service provider has:
(a) Intentionally  and substantially misrepresented information or failed to refund any
overpayments in a timely manner;
(b) Routinely failed to provide students with promised educational services;
(c) Regularly failed to comply with the provisions of sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act  or
any rules adopted by the State Treasurer.
(8)(a) The State Treasurer shall by rule create procedures to ensure that a fair  process
exists to determine whether an education service provider may be barred from participating
in the program.
(b) If an education service provider is barred from the program, the State Treasurer shall
immediately notify parents who have made payments from their student’s ESA to  the barred
education service provider of the decision.
(c) Education service providers may appeal the State Treasurer’s  decision to bar them
from the program as a contested case under ORS chapter 183.
(9) The State Treasurer may accept gifts and grants from any source to cover  adminis-
trative costs, to inform the public about ESAs, or to fund additional ESAs.
(10) The State Treasurer may adopt rules and policies that are  not inconsistent with
sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act and that are necessary for the administration of this act,
including:
(a) Establishing  or contracting for the establishment of an online anonymous fraud re-
porting service.
(b) Establishing an anonymous telephone hotline for fraud reporting.
(c) Policies that require either a surety bond for education service providers  receiving
more than $100,000 in program funds or insurance for account holders.
(d) Procedures for refunding payments  from a participating education service provider
back to an ESA.
(e) Procedures for entering into reciprocal agreements with other state  ESA agencies or
entities to recognize  and allow education service providers approved in other states to re-
ceive payments from ESAs under sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act.
(11) Rules  or policies adopted by the State Treasurer shall focus on easing parental in-
volvement and encouraging educational service providers to provide  parents with a broad
array of educational options.
(12) The  State Treasurer shall maintain an updated list of participating education service
providers and shall ensure that the list is readily available online.
(13) The State Treasurer shall administer an annual survey of parents who enter  into or
renew written agreements pursuant to section 2 of this 2019 Act. The survey must ask  each
parent to indicate the number of years the  parent has entered into or renewed a written
agreement, and to express:
(a) The relative satisfaction of the parent with the program established  pursuant to
sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act; and
(b) The opinions of the parent regarding any topics, items or issues that the  State
Treasurer determines may aid the State Treasurer  in evaluating and improving the effec-
tiveness of the program established pursuant to sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 6.
(1) To be eligible to accept payments from an ESA, an education service
[6]
SB 668
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
provider shall:
(a) Submit notice to the State Treasurer of the intent to participate;
(b) Provide parents with a receipt for all qualifying educational expenses;
(c) Agree not to refund, rebate, or share ESA funds with  parents or students in any
manner, except that ESA funds may be remitted or refunded  to an ESA in accordance with
procedures established by the State Treasurer;
(d) Certify that the education service provider will  not discriminate based on race, color,
ethnicity, or national origin;
(e) Agree  to submit any employee who will have contact with students to a criminal
background check; and
(f) Provide the State Treasurer with any additional information  that may be requested
to ensure the services provided to parents  are qualifying educational expenses. If the edu-
cation service provider is unable  to provide the additional information, the State Treasurer
may bar the education service provider from participating in the program.
(2) If it is reasonably expected that an education service provider will receive  payments
from ESAs in an amount that exceeds $100,000 during any school year, the State  Treasurer
may require the education service provider to:
(a) Post a surety bond in an amount equal to the amount reasonably expected  to be paid
to the education service provider from ESAs during the school year; or
(b) Provide evidence satisfactory to the State Treasurer that the education service pro-
vider otherwise has sufficient assets to  pay the State Treasurer an amount equal to the
amount described in this section.
(3) Nothing in sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act  shall be deemed to limit the independence
or autonomy of  an education service provider or to make the actions of an education service
provider the actions of this state.
(4) The State Treasurer or any other state agency  may not regulate the educational
program of an education service provider that accepts funds from an ESA.
(5) An education  service provider shall be given the maximum freedom to provide for the
educational needs of ESA students without governmental control.
(6) Nothing in sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act shall be construed to  expand the regulatory
authority of the state, its officers, or any school district to  impose any additional regulation
of education service providers beyond those necessary to enforce  the requirements of
sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 7.
(1) At a parent’s request, an eligible student’s local school district shall
permit a student who is  being educated pursuant to an ESA to participate in the statewide
assessment system described in ORS  329.485. The school district may not charge a fee to
parents who elect to have their eligible student participate in the statewide assessment.
(2) The results  of the statewide assessments for students being educated pursuant to an
ESA shall be reported to  the Department of Education separate from the results of students
enrolled in district schools.
(3) A school district  that previously enrolled an eligible student shall provide an educa-
tion service provider that  has enrolled an eligible student with a complete copy of the
student’s school records, while complying with 20 U.S.C. 1232g.
SECTION 8. (1) In any legal proceeding challenging  the application of sections 1 to 7 of
this 2019 Act to an education service provider,  the respondent bears the burden of estab-
[7]
SB 668
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
lishing that the law is  necessary and does not impose any undue burden on an education
service provider.
(2) No liability shall arise on the part of the State Treasurer or this state or of any school
district based on the award or use of an ESA pursuant to sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act.
(3) If any part of sections 1  to 7 of this 2019 Act is challenged as violating either the
United States Constitution or the Oregon Constitution, parents of eligible students may  be
permitted to intervene to defend the constitutionality of sections 1  to 7 of this 2019 Act. For
the purposes of judicial administration, a  court may limit the number of parents permitted
to intervene or require that all parents file a joint brief, so long as parents  are not required
to join any brief filed on behalf of any respondent.
(4) If any provision of sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act, or the application thereof  to any
person or circumstances, is  held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications of sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act that can be given effect without  the invalid
provision or application, and any provisions of  sections 1 to 7 and 11 of this 2019 Act are
severable.
SECTION 9. (1) Sections 1 to 7 and 11 of this 2019 Act become  operative January 1, 2020.
(2) The State  Board of Education, Department of Education, and State Treasurer may
take any action before the operative  date specified in subsection (1) of this section to ensure
that students first be allowed to participate in the program  established by sections 1 to 7 and
11 of this 2019 Act during the 2020-2021 school year.
SECTION 10. Section 11 of this  2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 327.
SECTION 11. (1) The Education Savings Program Fund  is established within the State
School Fund.
(2) The Education Savings Program Fund shall consist of moneys transferred as  provided
by ORS 327.008 and any other state  or federal moneys available for the purposes of the pro-
gram established by sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the  State Treasurer for the
purpose of making deposits under section 3 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 12.  ORS 327.008, as amended by section 7, chapter 735, Oregon Laws 2013,  section
7, chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2014, section 2, chapter 68, Oregon Laws 2015,  section 38, chapter 245,
Oregon Laws 2015, section 2, chapter 555, Oregon Laws  2015, section 11, chapter 604, Oregon Laws
2015, section 2,  chapter 644, Oregon Laws 2015, section 8, chapter 783, Oregon Laws 2015, sections
22 and 23, chapter 639, Oregon Laws 2017, sections 5 and 6, chapter 700, Oregon Laws 2017, and
section 34, chapter 725, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
(b) The Department of Education, on behalf  of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from public and private sources  for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State School Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by  the Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred from the Education Stability Fund and the Oregon Marijuana Account and
moneys received as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(d) The State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for  the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to 327.077,  327.095, 327.099, 327.101, 327.125, 327.137, 327.348, 336.575,
336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961 and sections 1 to 7 of this 2019 Act .
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each school  district a State School
[8]
SB 668
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Fund grant, consisting of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a  facility grant
and a transportation grant and a high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue, computed as pro-
vided in ORS 327.011 and 327.013.
(3) For the first school year after a public charter school ceases to  operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of  termination or nonrenewal of a charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund to  each school district that had sponsored a public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount equal to the school district’s  general purpose grant per extended
ADMw multiplied by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year.
(4) There shall be  apportioned from the State School Fund to each education service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All figures used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund shall  be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in average daily membership used in  the distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) A school district may  not use the portion of the State School Fund grant that is attributable
to the facility grant for capital construction costs.
(8) The total amount of  the State School Fund that is distributed as facility grants may not ex-
ceed $7 million in any biennium. If  the total amount to be distributed as facility grants exceeds this
limitation, the  Department of Education shall prorate the amount of funds available for facility
grants among  those school districts that qualified for a facility grant. If the total amount to be dis-
tributed as facility grants does not  exceed this limitation, any remaining amounts shall be expended
for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities as provided in ORS 326.125 (1).
(9) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend from  the State School Fund no
more than $6 million for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities under ORS 326.125 (2)
to (6).
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education  shall transfer to the Pediatric Nursing Fa-
cility Account established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs of educational
services provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(11) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer the amount of  $35 million from
the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
(12)(a) Each biennium,  the Department of Education shall transfer $39.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Educator Advancement Fund established under ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The total  amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by $6 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school districts  from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by $16.75 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education service  districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by $16.75 million.
(c) For each biennium, the amounts identified in this subsection shall be  adjusted by the same
percentage  by  which the instructions furnished to state agencies by the Governor under ORS 291.204
direct the state agencies to adjust their agency budget requests for special payments under ORS
291.216 (6)(a)(C).
(13) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the State
[9]
SB 668
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
School Fund to the Statewide English Language Learner  Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
(14) Each  fiscal year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from the State
School  Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this section and  ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide administration of and support for the development  of talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration  of a program to increase the number of speech-language
pathologists and speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.394 to 348.406.
(17) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer  to the Education
Savings Program Fund established by  section 11 of this 2019 Act the amount necessary to
make the deposits required by section 3 of this 2019 Act.
[(17)] (18) Each biennium,  the Department of Education shall transfer $2 million from the State
School Fund for deposit to the Healthy School  Facilities Fund established under ORS 332.337.
Notwithstanding ORS 332.337, the department may expend moneys received in the Healthy  School
Facilities  Fund  under this subsection only as grants for costs associated with testing for elevated
levels of lead in water used for drinking or food preparation.
SECTION 13. (1) The  amendments to ORS 327.008 by section 12 of this 2019 Act become
operative July 1, 2020.
(2) The amendments to ORS 327.008 by section 12 of this 2019 Act apply to State School
Fund distributions commencing with the 2020-2021 school year distributions.
SECTION 14. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[10]