Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall establish a pilot
program at a public university listed in ORS 352.002 to provide  stipends to student teachers
and educators who mentor student teachers for licensure.
(2) Under the pilot program:
(a) The public university shall partner with  one or more school districts in this state to
provide stipends to student teachers and educators who mentor student  teachers for
licensure.
(b) Priority must be given to student teachers:
(A) From underrepresented backgrounds;
(B) Who work in a school district located in a rural area of this state; and
(C)(i) Who work in special education; or
(ii) Who work in science, technology, engineering and mathematics.
SECTION 2.
(1) Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
(2) Section 1 of this 2025 Act applies to the 2026-2027 school year.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1748