Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 328.542 is amended to read:
328.542. (1) Subject to the Local Budget Law (ORS 294.305 to 294.565) , [ and] to sections 11  and
11b, Article XI, Oregon Constitution, and to subsection (2) of this section,  each school district
board shall prepare annually or biennially the budget of the school district and shall certify  ad
valorem property taxes to the assessor as provided by law.
(2)(a) A school district board shall ensure that at least 50 percent of the expenditures of
the school district are paid as compensation to teachers  who spend 75 percent or more of the
school day teaching core academic subjects or manual skills.
(b) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Compensation” includes salary, health care and retirement benefits.
(B) “Core academic subjects” includes mathematics, science,  English, history, geography,
economics, civics, the arts and world language.
(C) “Expenditures” means amounts paid from the general purpose grant distributed from
the State School Fund.
(D) “Manual skills” includes welding, woodworking and other related practical skills.
SECTION 2.
This 2021 Act takes effect July 1, 2022.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3578