Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A  person commits the crime of unlawful disclosure of private information
if:
(a) The person, with the intent to stalk,  harass or injure another person, knowingly
causes the other person’s personal information to be disclosed;
(b) The person knows or reasonably should have known that  the other person did not
consent to the disclosure; and
(c)(A) The other person is stalked or injured as a result of the disclosure; or
(B) The other person is harassed by  the disclosure, and a reasonable person would be
harassed by the disclosure.
(2) Unlawful disclosure of private information is a Class B misdemeanor.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Disclose” includes, but is not limited to, transfer, publish, distribute, exhibit, adver-
tise and offer.
(b) “Harass”  means to subject another to severe emotional distress such that the other
person experiences anxiety,  fear, torment or apprehension that may or may not result in a
physical manifestation of severe emotional distress  or a mental health diagnosis and is pro-
tracted rather than merely trivial or transitory.
(c) “Injure” means to subject another to bodily injury or death.
(d) “Personal information” means:
(A) A person’s home  address, personal electronic mail address, personal phone number
or Social Security number;
(B) Contact information for a person’s employer;
(C) Contact information for a family member of a person;
(D) Photographs of a person’s child; or
(E) Identification of the school that a person’s child attends.
(e) “Stalk” means conduct constituting the crime of stalking under ORS 163.732 or  con-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3650
HB 2646
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
duct that would give rise to  an action for issuance or violation of a stalking protective order
under ORS 30.866.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 161.005 is amended to read:
161.005. ORS 161.005 to 161.055,  161.065, 161.085 to 161.125, 161.150 to 161.175, 161.190 to
161.275, 161.290 to 161.373, 161.405 to 161.485, 161.505 to 161.585, 161.605, 161.615 to 161.685, 161.705
to 161.737, 162.005, 162.015 to 162.035,  162.055 to 162.115, 162.135 to 162.205, 162.225 to 162.375,
162.405 to 162.425, 162.465,  163.005, 163.095, 163.107, 163.115, 163.125 to 163.145, 163.149, 163.160 to
163.208, 163.191, 163.196, 163.215 to  163.257, 163.261, 163.263, 163.264, 163.266, 163.275, 163.285,
163.305 to 163.467, 163.429,  163.432, 163.433, 163.472, 163.505 to 163.575, 163.665 to 163.693, 163.700,
163.701, 163.715, 164.005, 164.015 to 164.135, 164.138, 164.140, 164.205 to 164.270,  164.305 to 164.377,
164.395 to 164.415,  164.805, 164.857, 164.886, 165.002 to 165.102, 165.109, 165.118, 165.805, 165.815,
166.005 to 166.095, 166.119, 166.125, 166.128, 166.350, 166.382, 166.384, 166.660, 167.002  to 167.027,
167.057, 167.060 to 167.100, 167.117, 167.122 to 167.162, 167.203 to 167.252,  167.310 to 167.340, 167.350,
167.810 and 167.820  and section 1 of this  2025 Act  shall be known and may be cited as Oregon
Criminal Code of 1971.
[2]