Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The provisions of the Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact are as  fol-
lows:
OCCUPATIONAL THERAPY LICENSURE COMPACT
SECTION 1. PURPOSE
The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate interstate practice of occupational  therapy
with the goal  of improving public access to occupational therapy services. The practice of
occupational therapy occurs in the state where the patient or client is located at the  time
of the  patient or client encounter. The Compact preserves the regulatory authority of states
to protect public health and safety through the current system of state licensure.
This Compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
A. Increase public access to occupational therapy services  by providing for the mutual
recognition of other member state licenses;
B. Enhance the states’ ability to protect the public’s health and safety;
C. Encourage the cooperation of member states in regulating multistate occupational
therapy practice;
D. Support spouses of relocating military members;
E. Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative and disciplinary information between
member states;
F. Allow a remote state to hold a provider of services with a compact privilege  in that
state accountable to that state’s practice standards; and
G. Facilitate the use of telehealth technology in order to  increase access to occupational
therapy services.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 686
HB 2736
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, the  following definitions shall
apply:
A. “Active duty military” means full-time duty status in the  active uniformed service of
the United States, including members of the National  Guard and Reserve on active duty or-
ders pursuant to 10 U.S.C. Chapter 1209 and 10 U.S.C. Chapter 1211.
B. “Adverse action” means any administrative, civil, equitable or  criminal action per-
mitted by a state’s laws which is imposed by a licensing board or other  authority against an
occupational therapist  or occupational therapy assistant, including actions against an
individual’s license or compact privilege such as censure, revocation, suspension, probation
or monitoring of the licensee or restriction on the licensee’s practice.
C. “Alternative program” means a nondisciplinary monitoring  process approved by an
occupational therapy licensing board.
D. “Compact privilege” means the authorization, which  is equivalent to a license, granted
by a remote state to allow a licensee from another member state to practice as an occupa-
tional therapist or practice as an occupational therapy assistant  in the remote state under
its laws and rules. The practice of  occupational therapy occurs in the member state where
the patient or client is located at the time of the patient or client encounter.
E. “Continuing competence or education” means a requirement,  as a condition of license
renewal, to  provide evidence of participation in, and/or completion of, educational and pro-
fessional activities relevant to practice or area of work.
F. “Current significant investigative  information” means investigative information that
a licensing board, after an inquiry or investigation that includes notification and  an oppor-
tunity for the occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant to respond, if required
by state law, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate  more
than a minor infraction.
G. “Data system” means a repository of information about  licensees, including but not
limited to license status, investigative information, compact privileges and adverse actions.
H. “Encumbered license” means a license in which  an adverse action restricts the prac-
tice of occupational therapy by  the licensee or said adverse action has been reported to the
National Practitioner Data Bank.
I. “Executive committee”  means a group of directors elected or appointed to act on be-
half of, and within the powers granted to them by, the Commission.
J. “Home state” means the member state that  is the licensee’s primary state of resi-
dence.
K. “Investigative information” means information, records and/or documents received
or generated by an occupational therapy licensing board pursuant to an investigation.
L. “Jurisprudence requirement” means the assessment  of an individual’s knowledge of
the laws and rules governing the practice of occupational therapy in a state.
M. “Licensee” means  an individual who currently holds an authorization from the state
to practice as an occupational therapist or as an occupational therapy assistant.
N. “Member state” means a state that has enacted the Compact.
O. “Occupational therapist”  means an individual who is licensed by a state to practice
occupational therapy.
P. “Occupational therapy,” “occupational therapy practice” and the  “practice of occupa-
[2]
HB 2736
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tional therapy” mean the care and services provided by an occupational therapist or  an oc-
cupational therapy assistant as  set forth in the member state’s statutes and regulations.
“Occupational therapy” also has the meaning given the term in ORS 675.210.
Q. “Occupational therapy assistant” means an individual who is  licensed by a state to
assist in the practice of occupational therapy.
R. “Occupational Therapy Compact Commission” or “Commission” means the national
administrative body whose membership consists of all states that have enacted the  Compact.
S. “Occupational therapy  licensing board” or “licensing board” means the agency of a
state that is authorized to license and regulate occupational  therapists and occupational
therapy assistants.
T. “Primary state of residence” means the state (also known as the  home state) in which
an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant who  is not active duty military
declares a primary residence for legal purposes as verified by: driver’s license, federal in-
come tax return, lease, deed,  mortgage or voter registration or other verifying documenta-
tion as further defined by Commission rules.
U. “Remote state” means a member state other than the home state  where a licensee is
exercising or seeking to exercise the compact privilege.
V. “Rule” means a regulation promulgated by the Commission that has the force of law.
W. “Single-state license” means an occupational therapist or occupational therapy as-
sistant license issued  by a member state that authorizes practice only within the issuing
state and does not include a compact privilege in any other member state.
X. “State” means any state, commonwealth, district or territory of  the United States of
America that regulates the practice of occupational therapy.
Y. “Telehealth” means  the application of telecommunication technology to deliver occu-
pational therapy services for assessment, intervention and/or consultation.
SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
A. To participate in the Compact, a member state shall:
1. License occupational therapists and occupational therapy assistants;
2. Participate fully in  the Commission’s data system, including but not limited to using
the Commission’s unique identifier as defined in rules of the Commission;
3. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating  complaints about licensees;
4. Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of the Compact and rules, of  any
adverse action or the availability of investigative information regarding a licensee;
5. Implement or utilize procedures for considering the criminal history records  of appli-
cants for an initial compact privilege. These procedures shall include the submission of  fin-
gerprints or other biometric-based information by applicants for the  purpose of obtaining an
applicant’s criminal history record information from the  Federal Bureau of Investigation and
the agency responsible for retaining that state’s criminal records;
a. A member state shall, within a  time frame established by the Commission, require a
criminal background check for  a licensee seeking or applying for a compact privilege whose
primary state of residence is that member state by receiving  the results of the Federal Bu-
reau of Investigation criminal record search  and shall use the results in making licensure
decisions.
b. Communication between a member state and the Commission and  among member
states regarding the verification of eligibility  for licensure through the Compact shall not
[3]
HB 2736
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
include any information received from the Federal Bureau of Investigation relating  to a
federal criminal records check performed by a member state under Public Law 92-544.
6. Comply with the rules of the Commission;
7. Utilize only a recognized national examination as a requirement for  licensure pursuant
to the rules of the Commission; and
8. Have continuing competence or education requirements as a  condition for license re-
newal.
B. A member state shall grant the compact privilege to a licensee holding a  valid unen-
cumbered license in another member state in accordance with the terms of the Compact  and
rules.
C. Member states may charge a fee for granting a compact privilege.
D. A member state  shall provide for the state’s delegate to attend all Occupational
Therapy Compact Commission meetings.
E. Individuals not residing in a member state shall  continue to be able to apply for a
member state’s  single-state license as provided under the laws of each member state. How-
ever, the single-state license granted to  these individuals shall not be recognized as granting
the compact privilege in any other member state.
F. Nothing in this Compact shall affect  the requirements established by a member state
for the issuance of a single-state license.
SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE
A. To exercise  the compact privilege under the terms and provisions of the Compact, the
licensee shall:
1. Hold a license in the home state;
2. Have a valid United States Social Security Number or National Provider Identification
number;
3. Have no encumbrance on any state license;
4. Be eligible for a compact privilege in any member state in accordance with  Section 4D,
F, G, and H of this Compact;
5. Have paid all fines and completed all requirements resulting from  any adverse action
against any  license or compact privilege, and two years have elapsed from the date of such
completion;
6. Notify the Commission that  the licensee is seeking the compact privilege within a re-
mote state;
7. Pay any applicable fees, including any state fee, for the compact privilege;
8. Complete a criminal background check in accordance with Section 3A(5) of this  Com-
pact. The licensee shall be responsible for the payment of any fee associated with  the com-
pletion of a criminal background check.
9. Meet any jurisprudence requirements established  by the remote state in which the
licensee is seeking a compact privilege; and
10. Report to the Commission  adverse action taken by any nonmember state within 30
days from the date the adverse action is taken.
B. The compact privilege is valid until the expiration date  of the home state license. The
licensee must  comply with the requirements of Section 4A of this Compact to maintain the
compact privilege in the remote state.
C. A licensee providing occupational therapy  in a remote state under the compact privi-
[4]
HB 2736
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
lege shall function within the laws and regulations of the remote state.
D. Occupational  therapy assistants practicing in a remote state shall be supervised by
an occupational therapist licensed or holding a compact privilege in that remote state.
E. A licensee providing occupational  therapy in a remote state is subject to that state’s
regulatory authority. A remote state may, in accordance with  due process and that state’s
laws, remove a licensee’s compact privilege in the remote state for  a specific period of time,
impose fines and/or take any other necessary actions to protect the health  and safety of its
citizens. The licensee may be ineligible for a compact privilege  in any state until the specific
time for removal has passed and all fines are paid.
F. If a home state license is encumbered, the licensee shall  lose the compact privilege in
any remote state until the following occur:
1. The home state license is no longer encumbered; and
2. Two years have elapsed from the date on  which the home state license is no longer
encumbered in accordance with Section 4F(1) of this Compact.
G. Once an encumbered license in the home state is restored to  good standing, the
licensee must meet the requirements  of Section 4A of this Compact to obtain a compact
privilege in any remote state.
H. If  a licensee’s compact privilege in any remote state is removed, the individual may
lose the compact privilege in any other remote state until the following occur:
1. The specific period of time for which the compact privilege was removed has ended;
2. All fines have been paid and all conditions have been met;
3. Two years have elapsed from the date of completing  requirements set forth in Section
4H(1) and (2) of this Compact; and
4. The compact privileges are  reinstated by the Commission, and the compact data sys-
tem is updated to reflect reinstatement.
I. If a licensee’s compact privilege in any remote state  is removed due to an erroneous
charge, privileges shall be restored through the compact data system.
J. Once the requirements of Section 4H of this Compact have been met, the licensee must
meet the requirements in Section 4A of this Compact to obtain a  compact privilege in a re-
mote state.
SECTION 5: OBTAINING A NEW HOME STATE  LICENSE BY VIRTUE OF COMPACT
PRIVILEGE
A. An occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant may hold a  home state
license which allows for compact privileges in member states in only one member state at a
time.
B. If an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant changes primary  state
of residence by moving between two member states:
1. The occupational  therapist or occupational therapy assistant shall file an application
for obtaining a new home  state license by virtue of a compact privilege, pay all applicable
fees and notify the current and new  home state in accordance with applicable rules adopted
by the Commission.
2. Upon receipt of an application for obtaining a new  home state license by virtue of
compact privilege, the new home  state shall verify that the occupational therapist or occu-
pational therapy assistant meets the pertinent criteria outlined in Section 4  of this Compact
via the data system without need for primary source verification except for:
[5]
HB 2736
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a. An FBI fingerprint based criminal background check if not previously performed  or
updated pursuant to applicable rules adopted by the Commission in accordance with Public
Law 92-544;
b. Other criminal background check as required by the new home state; and
c. Submission of any requisite jurisprudence requirements of the new home state.
3. The  former home state shall convert the former home state license into a compact
privilege once  the new home state has activated the new home state license in accordance
with applicable rules adopted by the Commission.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Compact, if  the occupational therapist or
occupational therapy assistant cannot meet the criteria  in Section 4 of this Compact, the
new home state shall apply its requirements for issuing a new single-state license.
5. The occupational therapist or the  occupational therapy assistant shall pay all applica-
ble fees to the new home state in order to be issued a new home state license.
C. If an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant  changes primary state
of residence by  moving from a member state to a nonmember state, or from a nonmember
state to a member state, the state criteria shall apply for issuance of  a single-state license
in the new state.
D. Nothing in this Compact shall  interfere with a licensee’s ability to hold a single-state
license in multiple states. However, for the purposes of this  Compact, a licensee shall have
only one home state license.
E. Nothing in this Compact  shall affect the requirements established by a member state
for the issuance of a single-state license.
SECTION 6. ACTIVE DUTY MILITARY PERSONNEL OR THEIR SPOUSES
A. Active duty military personnel, or their spouses, shall designate a  home state where
the individual has a current license in good standing. The individual may retain the home
state designation during  the period the service member is on active duty. Subsequent to
designating a home state, the individual shall only change  their home state through appli-
cation for licensure in the new state or through the process described in  Section 5 of this
Compact.
SECTION 7. ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. A home state shall have exclusive power to impose adverse action against an occupa-
tional therapist’s or occupational therapy assistant’s license issued by the home state.
B. In addition to the  other powers conferred by state law, a remote state shall have the
authority, in accordance with existing state due process law, to:
1. Take adverse  action against an occupational therapist’s or occupational therapy
assistant’s compact privilege within that member state.
2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that  require the attendance and
testimony of witnesses as well as the production of evidence. Subpoenas  issued by a licensing
board in a member state for  the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production
of evidence from  another member state shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of
competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of  that court applicable to
subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it. The issuing authority shall  pay any wit-
ness fees, travel expenses, mileage  and other fees required by the service statutes of the
state in which the witnesses or evidence are located.
C. For purposes of taking adverse action, the home state shall give  the same priority and
[6]
HB 2736
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
effect to reported conduct received from a member state as it would if the  conduct had oc-
curred within the home state. In so doing, the home state shall apply its own state laws to
determine appropriate action.
D. The home state shall complete any pending investigations of an  occupational therapist
or occupational therapy assistant who changes primary state of residence during the course
of the investigations. The home  state, where the investigations were initiated, shall also have
the authority to take appropriate action and shall promptly report  the conclusions of the
investigations to the Occupational Therapy Compact Commission data system. The  data
system administrator shall promptly notify the new home state of any adverse actions.
E. A member state, if  otherwise permitted by state law, may recover from the affected
occupational therapist or occupational  therapy assistant the costs of investigations and dis-
position of cases resulting from any adverse action taken against that  occupational therapist
or occupational therapy assistant.
F. A member state may take adverse action  based on the factual findings of the remote
state, provided that  the member state follows its own procedures for taking the adverse
action.
G. Joint Investigations
1. In  addition to the authority granted to a member state by its respective state occu-
pational therapy laws and regulations or other applicable state  law, any member state may
participate with other member states in joint investigations of licensees.
2. Member states shall share any  investigative, litigation or compliance materials in
furtherance of any joint or individual investigation initiated under the Compact.
H. If an adverse action is  taken by the home state against an occupational therapist’s
or occupational therapy assistant’s  license, the occupational therapist’s or occupational
therapy assistant’s compact privilege in all  other member states shall be deactivated until
all encumbrances have been removed from the state license. All  home state disciplinary or-
ders that impose adverse action against  an occupational therapist’s or occupational therapy
assistant’s license shall include a  statement that the occupational therapist’s or occupational
therapy assistant’s  compact privilege is deactivated in all member states during the
pendency of the order.
I. If a member state takes adverse action, it  shall promptly notify the administrator of
the data system. The administrator of the data system shall promptly notify the  home state
of any adverse actions by remote states.
J. Nothing in this Compact shall override  a member state’s decision that participation in
an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse action.
SECTION 8. ESTABLISHMENT  OF THE OCCUPATIONAL THERAPY COMPACT COM-
MISSION.
A. The compact member states hereby  create and establish a joint public agency known
as the Occupational Therapy Compact Commission:
1. The Commission is an instrumentality of the compact states.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the Commission shall be brought
solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal  office of the
Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the
extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings.
3. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity.
[7]
HB 2736
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
B. Membership, Voting and Meetings
1. Each member state shall have and be limited to  one delegate selected by that member
state’s licensing board.
2. The delegate shall be either:
a. A current member of the licensing  board who is an occupational therapist, occupa-
tional therapy assistant or public member; or
b. An administrator of the licensing board.
3. Any  delegate may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the law of the
state from which the delegate is appointed.
4. The member state board shall fill  any vacancy occurring in the Commission within 90
days.
5. Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote with regard to  the promulgation of rules
and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate  in the business
and affairs of the Commission. A delegate shall vote  in person or by such other means as
provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates’ participation in meetings  by
telephone or other means of communication.
6. The Commission  shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional
meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws.
7. The Commission shall establish by rule a term of office for delegates.
C. The Commission shall have the following powers and duties:
1. Establish a code of ethics for the Commission;
2. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
3. Establish bylaws;
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this Compact and
the bylaws;
6. Promulgate uniform rules to  facilitate and coordinate implementation and adminis-
tration of this Compact. The rules shall  have the force and effect of law and shall be binding
in all member states;
7. Bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of  the Commission,
provided that the standing of any state  occupational therapy licensing board to sue or be
sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
9. Borrow, accept or contract  for services of personnel, including, but not limited to,
employees of a member state;
10. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers,  fix compensation, define duties, grant such
individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact and establish the
Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to  conflicts of interest, qualifications
of personnel and other related personnel matters;
11. Accept any and all appropriate donations and grants of  money, equipment, supplies,
materials and services, and receive, utilize and dispose of the same; provided that at all times
the Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety and/or conflict of interest;
12. Lease, purchase, accept appropriate  gifts or donations of, or otherwise own, hold,
improve or use, any property, real, personal or mixed; provided that at all times the Com-
mission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety;
[8]
HB 2736
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
13. Sell,  convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon or otherwise dispose of any
property real, personal or mixed;
14. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
15. Borrow money;
16. Appoint committees, including standing committees composed of  members, state
regulators, state legislators or their representatives, consumer representatives  and such
other interested persons as may be designated in this Compact and the bylaws;
17. Provide information to and receive information from,  and cooperate with, law
enforcement agencies;
18. Establish and elect an executive committee; and
19. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate  to achieve the
purposes of  this Compact consistent with the state regulation of occupational therapy
licensure and practice.
D. The Executive Committee
The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the Commission ac-
cording to the terms of this Compact.
1. The Executive Committee shall be composed of nine members:
a. Seven voting members who are elected by the Commission from the current member-
ship of the Commission;
b. One ex-officio, nonvoting member from a  recognized national occupational therapy
professional association; and
c. One ex-officio, nonvoting member from  a recognized national occupational therapy
certification organization.
2. The ex-officio members will be selected by their respective organizations.
3. The Commission may remove any member of the  Executive Committee as provided in
bylaws.
4. The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually.
5. The Executive Committee shall have the following duties and responsibilities:
a. Recommend to the entire Commission changes to the rules or bylaws,  changes to this
Compact legislation, fees  paid by compact member states such as annual dues, and any
compact fee charged to licensees for the compact privilege;
b. Ensure compact  administration services are appropriately provided, contractual or
otherwise;
c. Prepare and recommend the budget;
d. Maintain financial records on behalf of the Commission;
e. Monitor compact compliance of member states and  provide compliance reports to the
Commission;
f. Establish additional committees as necessary; and
g. Perform other duties as provided in rules or bylaws.
E. Meetings of the Commission
1. All meetings shall be open to the public, and public  notice of meetings shall be given
in the same manner as required  under the rulemaking provisions in Section 10 of this Com-
pact.
2. The Commission or the Executive Committee or other  committees of the Commission
may convene in a  closed, nonpublic meeting if the Commission or Executive Committee or
[9]
HB 2736
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
other committees of the Commission must discuss:
a. Noncompliance of a member state with its obligations under the Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or  other matters, practices or procedures
related to specific employees or other matters related to the  Commission’s internal person-
nel practices and procedures;
c. Current, threatened or reasonably anticipated litigation;
d. Negotiation of contracts  for the purchase, lease or sale of goods, services or real es-
tate;
e. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
f. Disclosure  of trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged
or confidential;
g. Disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute  a
clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
h. Disclosure of investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
i. Disclosure of information related to any investigative reports prepared  by or on behalf
of or  for use of the Commission or other committee charged with responsibility of investi-
gation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact; or
j. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or member state statute.
3. If a meeting, or portion of  a meeting, is closed pursuant to this provision, the
Commission’s legal counsel or designee  shall certify that the meeting may be closed and shall
reference each relevant exempting provision.
4. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and  clearly describe all matters dis-
cussed in a meeting and shall  provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the
reasons therefore,  including a description of the views expressed. All documents considered
in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents
of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority vote of the
Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
F. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission  shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of
its establishment, organization and ongoing activities.
2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate  revenue sources, donations and
grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services.
3.a. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual  assessment from each member
state or impose fees on other parties to cover the cost of the operations and activities of  the
Commission and its staff, which  must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual
budget as approved by the Commission each year  for which revenue is not provided by other
sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated based  upon a formula
to be determined by the Commission, which shall promulgate a rule binding upon all  member
states.
b. An assessment  levied, or any other financial obligation imposed, under this Compact
is effective against the State of Oregon only to the extent  that moneys necessary to pay the
assessment or meet the financial obligation have been deposited in the  Occupational Therapy
Licensing Board Account established under ORS 675.330.
4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of  any kind prior to securing the funds
adequate to meet the same; nor shall the  Commission pledge the credit of any of the member
[10]
HB 2736
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
states, except by and with the authority of the member state.
5. The Commission shall keep  accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The
receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall  be subject to the audit and accounting
procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements  of funds
handled by the Commission shall be audited  yearly by a certified or licensed public account-
ant, and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the  annual report
of the Commission.
G. Qualified Immunity, Defense and Indemnification
1. The members,  officers, executive director, employees and representatives of the Com-
mission shall be immune from suit and liability,  either personally or in their official capacity,
for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other  civil liability
caused by or arising  out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that
the person against whom the claim  is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties or  responsibilities; provided that nothing
in this paragraph shall  be construed to protect any such person from suit and/or liability for
any damage, loss, injury or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct
of that person.
2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director,  employee or
representative of  the Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out
of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is made
had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission  employment,
duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing  herein shall be construed to prohibit that
person from retaining his or her  own counsel; and provided further, that the actual or al-
leged act, error or omission did not  result from that person’s intentional or willful or wanton
misconduct.
3. The  Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer, executive di-
rector, employee or representative of the Commission for  the amount of any settlement or
judgment obtained against  that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or
omission that occurred within the scope of Commission  employment, duties or responsibil-
ities, or that such person had a  reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act,
error or omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.
SECTION 9. DATA SYSTEM
A. The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance and utilization  of a
coordinated database and reporting system containing licensure, adverse action and investi-
gative information on all licensed individuals in member states.
B. A member state shall submit a uniform data set to the data system on all  individuals
to whom this  Compact is applicable (utilizing a unique identifier) as required by the rules of
the Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse actions against a license or compact privilege;
4. Nonconfidential information related to alternative program participation;
[11]
HB 2736
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
5. Any denial of application for licensure and the reasons for such denial;
6. Other information that may facilitate the administration of  this Compact, as deter-
mined by the rules of the Commission; and
7. Current significant investigative information.
C. Current significant investigative information and  other investigative information per-
taining to a licensee in any member state will only be available to other member states.
D. The Commission shall promptly notify all member  states of any adverse action taken
against a Licensee or an individual applying for a license.  Adverse action information per-
taining to a licensee in any member state will be available to any other member state.
E. Member states contributing information to the  data system may designate informa-
tion that may not be  shared with the public without the express permission of the contrib-
uting state.
F. Any information submitted to the data system that is  subsequently required to be
expunged by the laws of the member state  contributing the information shall be removed
from the data system.
SECTION 10. RULEMAKING
A.1. The Commission shall  exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set
forth in this section  and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become
binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment.
2. Notwithstanding Section 10A(1) of this Compact, the Occupational Therapy  Licensing
Board shall review the rules of the Commission. The licensing board may approve and adopt
the rules of the Commission as rules of the licensing board. The State of Oregon is  subject
to a rule of the Commission only if the rule of the Commission is  adopted by the licensing
board.
B. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in  order to effectively and effi-
ciently achieve the purposes of the Compact. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in  the event the
Commission exercises its rulemaking authority in a manner that is  beyond the scope of the
purposes of the Compact, or the powers  granted hereunder, then such an action by the
Commission shall be invalid and have no force and effect.
C. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule by  enactment of
a statute or resolution in the same manner used  to adopt the Compact within four years of
the date of adoption of the rule, then such rule shall  have no further force and effect in any
member state.
D. Rules or amendments  to the rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of
the Commission.
E. Prior to promulgation and adoption  of a final rule or rules by the Commission, and
at least 30 days in advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered and voted
upon, the Commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible platform; and
2. On the website of each member state occupational therapy licensing board or other
publicly accessible platform or the publication in which each state would otherwise publish
proposed rules.
F. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
1. The proposed time, date and location of the meeting in which the rule will be consid-
ered and voted upon;
[12]
HB 2736
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
2. The text of the proposed rule or amendment and the reason for the proposed rule;
3. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and
4. The manner in which interested persons may submit  notice to the Commission of their
intention to attend the public hearing and any written comments.
G. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission shall  allow persons to submit
written data, facts, opinions and arguments, which shall be made available to the public.
H. The Commission shall grant an opportunity for a  public hearing before it adopts a rule
or amendment if a hearing is requested by:
1. At least 25 persons;
2. A state or federal governmental subdivision or agency; or
3. An association or organization having at least 25 members.
I. If  a hearing is held on the proposed rule or amendment, the Commission shall publish
the place, time and date of the scheduled public  hearing. If the hearing is held via electronic
means, the Commission shall publish the mechanism for access to the electronic hearing.
1. All persons wishing to be heard at the hearing shall  notify the executive director of
the Commission or other designated member in  writing of their desire to appear and testify
at the hearing not less than five business days before the scheduled date of the hearing.
2. Hearings shall be conducted in a  manner providing each person who wishes to com-
ment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing.
3. All  hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording will be made available on re-
quest.
4. Nothing in this section  shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule.
Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Commission at hearings  required by this
section.
J. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of business on the  scheduled
hearing date if the hearing was not held, the Commission shall consider all written  and oral
comments received.
K. If no written notice of  intent to attend the public hearing by interested parties is re-
ceived, the Commission may proceed with promulgation of the  proposed rule without a public
hearing.
L. The Commission shall,  by majority vote of all members, take final action on the pro-
posed rule and shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking
record and the full text of the rule.
M. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may  consider and
adopt an emergency  rule without prior notice, opportunity for comment or hearing, provided
that the  usual rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact and in this section shall be
retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than 90 days
after the effective  date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is
one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or member state funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative  rule that is established by
federal law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
N. The Commission or an  authorized committee of the Commission may direct revisions
[13]
HB 2736
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors,
errors in format, errors  in consistency or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions
shall be posted on the  website of the Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge
by any person for  a period of 30 days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on
grounds that  the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made
in writing and delivered to the chair of the Commission prior to the end of the notice period.
If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect  without further action. If the revision
is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the Commission.
SECTION 11. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight
1. The  executive, legislative and judicial branches of state government in each member
state shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to  effectuate
the Compact’s purposes  and intent. The provisions of this Compact and the rules
promulgated hereunder shall have standing as statutory law.
2. All courts shall  take judicial notice of the Compact and the rules in any judicial or
administrative proceeding in a member state  pertaining to the subject matter of this Com-
pact which may affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the Commission.
3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive  service of process in any such proceeding,
and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to  provide
service of process to the Commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the  Com-
mission, this Compact or promulgated rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance and Termination
1. If the Commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the  performance
of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or the  promulgated rules, the Com-
mission shall:
a. Provide written notice to  the defaulting state and other member states of the nature
of the default, the proposed means of curing the default and/or  any other action to be taken
by the Commission; and
b. Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.
2. If a state in default fails to cure  the default, the defaulting state may be terminated
from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the member states, and all
rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this Compact may  be terminated on the effective
date of termination. A cure of  the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations
or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
3. Termination of  membership in the Compact shall be imposed only after all other means
of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall
be given by the Commission to the governor, the majority  and minority leaders of the de-
faulting state’s legislature, and each of the member states.
4. A state  that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations and
liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination,  including obligations that ex-
tend beyond the effective date of termination.
5. The Commission  shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in de-
fault or that has been terminated from the Compact, unless agreed upon in writing between
the Commission and the defaulting state.
6. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Commission by petitioning  the U.S.
[14]
HB 2736
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
District Court for the District of Columbia or  the federal district where the Commission has
its principal offices.  The prevailing member shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, in-
cluding reasonable attorney’s fees.
C. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by  a member state, the Commission shall attempt to resolve disputes
related to the Compact that arise  among member states and between member and non-
member states.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for  both mediation and binding
dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
D. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable  exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the pro-
visions and rules of this Compact.
2. By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal  action in the United States Dis-
trict Court for the District of Columbia  or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices against a  member state in default to enforce compliance with the provisions
of the Compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event  judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing
member shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees.
3. The remedies  herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission. The
Commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law.
SECTION 12. DATE OF IMPLEMENTATION OF THE  INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR
OCCUPATIONAL THERAPY  PRACTICE AND ASSOCIATED RULES, WITHDRAWAL AND
AMENDMENT
A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the  Compact statute is en-
acted into law in the tenth member state. The provisions, which  become effective at that
time, shall be limited to the powers granted to the  Commission relating to assembly and the
promulgation of rules. Thereafter, the Commission shall meet and exercise rulemaking pow-
ers necessary to the implementation and administration of the Compact.
B. Any state that  joins the Compact subsequent to the Commission’s initial adoption of
the rules shall  be subject to the rules as they exist on the date on which the Compact be-
comes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the  Commission shall
have the full force and effect of law on the day the Compact becomes law in that state.
C. Any member state may withdraw from  this Compact by enacting a statute repealing
the same.
1. A member state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until six  months after enactment
of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect  the continuing requirement of the withdrawing state’s
occupational therapy licensing board to comply with the investigative and adverse  action
reporting requirements of this Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
D. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any
occupational therapy licensure agreement or other cooperative  arrangement between a
member state and a nonmember state that does  not conflict with the provisions of this
Compact.
E. This Compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to  this Compact
shall become effective and binding upon any  member state until it is enacted into the laws
[15]
HB 2736
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of all member states.
SECTION 13. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the  purposes thereof. The
provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any phrase,  clause, sentence or provision
of this Compact is declared to be  contrary to the constitution of any member state or of the
United States or  the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance
is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability thereof  to
any government, agency, person or  circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this Com-
pact shall be held contrary to the constitution  of any member state, the Compact shall re-
main in full force and effect as to the remaining member states and  in full force and effect
as to the member state affected as to all severable matters.
SECTION 14. BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS
A. A licensee providing occupational therapy in a remote  state under the compact privi-
lege shall function within the laws and regulations of the remote state.
B. Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of  a member state that is
not inconsistent with the Compact.
C. Any laws in a member state in conflict with the Compact are superseded  to the extent
of the conflict.
D. Any lawful actions of the Commission, including all rules and  bylaws promulgated by
the Commission, are binding upon the member states.
E. All agreements between the  Commission and the member states are binding in ac-
cordance with their terms.
F. In the event any provision of the Compact exceeds the  constitutional limits imposed
on the legislature of any member state, the provision shall be ineffective to the extent  of the
conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that member state.
SECTION 2.
The Legislative Assembly of the State of Oregon hereby ratifies the Occu-
pational Therapy Licensure Compact set forth in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3.  ORS 675.220 is amended to read:
675.220. (1) [ No] A person [ shall] may not  practice occupational therapy or purport to be an
occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant, or as being able to  practice occupational
therapy, or to render occupational therapy services, or use the abbreviations designated by the Oc-
cupational Therapy Licensing Board under ORS 675.320 unless the person  is licensed in accordance
with ORS 675.210 to 675.340.
(2) ORS 675.210 to 675.340 do not apply to:
(a) Employment as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant in  an institution
or an agency of the federal government.
(b) Persons licensed under any other law of this state  to do any acts included in the definition
of occupational therapy in ORS 675.210 or persons working under the direction of any such  person.
(c) The practice of occupational therapy which is incidental to the planned program of study  for
students enrolled in an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant program  approved
by the board.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of  this section do not apply to a person who is authorized to
practice as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant by compact privilege
as defined in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 675.222 is amended to read:
[16]
HB 2736
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
675.222. (1) [ No] A person [ shall] may not  hire or employ a person to practice as an occupa-
tional therapist or as an occupational therapy assistant unless the person  hired or employed is li-
censed in accordance with ORS 675.210 to 675.340.
(2) Subsection (1) of  this section does not apply to a person who is authorized to practice
as an occupational therapist or as an  occupational therapy assistant by compact privilege
as defined in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 675.330 is amended to read:
675.330. (1) The Occupational Therapy Licensing Board Account  is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from  the General Fund. All moneys received by the Occupational
Therapy Licensing Board under ORS 675.210 to 675.340 shall be deposited into the account and are
continuously appropriated to the board to be used only for the administration and enforcement  of
ORS 675.210 to 675.340, 675.990 (2), 676.850 and 676.860 and for the purpose of meeting the fi-
nancial obligations imposed on  the State of Oregon as a result of this state’s participation
in the Occupational  Therapy Licensure Compact established under section 1 of this 2023
Act. Any interest or other income from moneys in the account shall be credited to the account.
(2) All civil penalties collected or received for violations of or in prosecutions under  ORS
675.210 to 675.340 shall be deposited  into the Occupational Therapy Licensing Board Account and
shall be used only for the administration and enforcement of ORS 675.210 to 675.340.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 676.177 is amended to read:
676.177. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS  676.165 to 676.180, a health professional
regulatory board, upon a determination by the board that it possesses otherwise confidential  infor-
mation that reasonably relates to  the regulatory or enforcement function of another public entity,
may disclose that information to the other public entity.
(2) Any public entity that receives information pursuant to subsection (1) of this  section shall
agree to take  all reasonable steps to maintain the confidentiality of the information, except that the
public entity may use or disclose  the information to the extent necessary to carry out the regulatory
or enforcement functions of the public entity.
(3) For purposes of this section, “public entity” means:
(a) A board or agency  of this state, or a board or agency of another state with regulatory or
enforcement functions similar to the  functions of a health professional regulatory board of this state;
(b) A district attorney;
(c) The Department of Justice;
(d) A state or  local public body of this state that licenses, franchises or provides emergency
medical services; or
(e) A law enforcement agency of this state, another state or the federal government.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (3) of this section[ ,]:
(a) The Oregon Board of Physical Therapy may disclose information described in  subsection (1)
of this section to the Physical Therapy Compact Commission established in ORS 688.240.
(b) The Occupational Therapy Licensing Board may disclose information described in
subsection (1) of this section to the Occupational Therapy Compact Commission established
in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 7.
(1) The amendments to ORS 675.220 and  675.222 by sections 3 and 4 of this
2023 Act apply to individuals authorized to work as occupational  therapists or occupational
therapy assistants by compact privilege on and after the  operative date specified in section
8 of this 2023 Act.
[17]
HB 2736
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
(2) The amendments to ORS 675.330 by section 5 of this 2023 Act apply to moneys received
by the Occupational Therapy Licensing Board on and  after the operative date specified in
section 8 of this 2023 Act.
(3) The amendments to ORS 676.177 by section 6 of this 2023 Act apply to information
disclosed on and after the operative date specified in section 8 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 8.
(1) Sections 1 and 2 of this  2023 Act and the amendments to ORS 675.220,
675.222, 675.330 and 676.177 by sections 3 to 6 of this 2023  Act become operative on January
1, 2024.
(2) The Occupational Therapy Licensing  Board may take any action before the operative
date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the board  to exer-
cise, on and  after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the du-
ties, functions  and powers conferred on the board by sections 1 and 2 of this 2023 Act and
the amendments to ORS 675.220, 675.222, 675.330  and 676.177 by sections 3 to 6 of this 2023
Act.
SECTION 9. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[18]