Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 184.620 is amended to read:
184.620. (1)  The Department of Transportation shall be under the supervision of a Director of
Transportation. The Oregon Transportation Commission shall appoint the director  for a term  of
four years , after consultation with the Governor. The director serves at  the pleasure of the com-
mission.
(2) The appointment of the  director shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate [ in the manner
provided in ORS 184.623 ] as provided by ORS 171.562 and 171.565 .
(3) Before the expiration of any term of the director, the Governor may  appoint the
current director to another term of four years, subject to confirmation by the Senate  as
provided by ORS 171.562 and 171.565. If the Senate fails  to confirm the current director to
another term  during the regular or special session or convening of the Senate to carry out
its duties under Article III, section 4, of the Oregon Constitution, after the current director’s
name is submitted, then no later than three months after the end of the  session or conven-
ing, the Governor shall appoint  a new director and submit the name of the new director for
confirmation by the Senate as provided by ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
[(3)] (4) The director may appoint:
(a) Deputy  directors with full authority to act for the director, but subject to the director’s
control. The appointment of a deputy director shall be by  written order filed with the Secretary of
State. A deputy  director shall be in the unclassified services for purposes of the State Personnel
Relations Law.
(b) All subordinate officers and employees of the  department and may prescribe their duties,
assignments and reassignments  and fix their compensation, subject to any applicable provisions of
the State Personnel Relations Law.
[(4)] (5) Subject to the approval of the commission, the  director may organize and reorganize the
department as the director considers necessary to properly conduct the work  of the department. As
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3461
SB 732
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
directed by the chairperson of  the commission, the director shall assign employees of the department
to staff the commission.
[(5)] (6) When service of summons or other process is  required by statute to be served on the
Director of Transportation, the Department of Transportation or  the Oregon Transportation Com-
mission, such service shall be made upon the office of the director.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 326.300 is amended to read:
326.300. (1) As  provided by section 1, Article VIII of the Oregon Constitution, the Governor is
the Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(2)(a) The Governor, acting as Superintendent  of Public Instruction, shall appoint a Deputy Su-
perintendent of Public Instruction  for a term of four years . The deputy superintendent must have
at least five years of  experience in the administration of an elementary school or a secondary
school. The appointment of the deputy superintendent shall be subject to confirmation  by the Senate
as provided by ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
(b) The deputy superintendent shall perform any act or duty of  the office of Superintendent of
Public Instruction that is designated by the Governor, and the Governor is responsible  for any acts
of the deputy superintendent.
(3) Before the expiration of any term of the deputy superintendent,  the Governor may
appoint the current deputy  superintendent to another term of four years, subject to confir-
mation by the  Senate as provided by ORS 171.562 and 171.565. If the Senate fails to confirm
the current deputy  superintendent to another term during the regular or special session or
convening of the Senate to carry out  its duties under Article III, section 4, of the Oregon
Constitution, after the  current deputy superintendent’s name is submitted, then no later
than three months after the end of the session or convening,  the Governor shall appoint a
new deputy superintendent and submit  the name of the new deputy superintendent for con-
firmation by the Senate as provided by ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
[(3)] (4) The deputy superintendent may be  removed from office by the Governor following con-
sultation with the State Board of Education.
[(4)] (5) The deputy superintendent shall receive a  salary set by the Governor, and shall be re-
imbursed for  all expenses actually and necessarily incurred by the deputy superintendent in the
performance of official duties.
SECTION 3.  ORS 409.100 is amended to read:
409.100. (1) The Department of Human  Services shall be under the supervision and control of the
Director of Human Services, who is responsible  for providing for programs for the delivery to the
public of the services assigned to the department by ORS 409.010  or otherwise, and for undertaking
long-range planning necessary for the effective and efficient delivery of these services.
(2) The  Governor shall appoint the director  for a term of four years . The director may be re-
moved at any time at the  pleasure of the Governor. The appointment of the director is subject to
confirmation by the Senate in the manner provided in ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
(3) Before the  expiration of any term of the director, the Governor may appoint the
current director  to another term of four years, subject to confirmation by the Senate as
provided by ORS 171.562 and 171.565. If  the Senate fails to confirm the current director to
another term during the regular or special session or convening of the Senate to carry  out
its duties under Article III, section 4, of the Oregon Constitution, after the current director’s
name is submitted, then  no later than three months after the end of the session or conven-
ing, the Governor shall appoint a new director and submit the name of  the new director for
[2]
SB 732
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
confirmation by the Senate as provided by ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
[(3)] (4) The director shall receive  such salary as may be provided by law or, if not so provided,
as may be  fixed by the Governor, and shall be reimbursed for all expenses actually and necessarily
incurred by the director in the performance of official duties.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 413.033 is amended to read:
413.033. (1) The Oregon Health Authority  is under the supervision and control of a director, who
is responsible for performing the duties, functions and powers of the authority.
(2) The Governor shall appoint the Director of the Oregon  Health Authority[ , who holds office ]
for a term of four years,  but the director serves at the pleasure of the Governor. The appoint-
ment of the director is subject to confirmation  by the Senate in the manner provided by ORS 171.562
and 171.565.
(3) Before the  expiration of any term of the director, the Governor may appoint the
current director  to another term of four years, subject to confirmation by the Senate as
provided by ORS 171.562 and 171.565. If  the Senate fails to confirm the current director to
another term during the regular or special session or convening of the Senate to carry  out
its duties under Article III, section 4, of the Oregon Constitution, after the current director’s
name is submitted, then  no later than three months after the end of the session or conven-
ing, the Governor shall appoint a new director and submit the name of  the new director for
confirmation by the Senate as provided by ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
[(3)] (4) In addition to the procurement authority granted by ORS 279A.050 (6)(b) and except as
provided in ORS 279A.050 (7), the director has all powers  necessary to effectively and expeditiously
carry out the duties, functions and powers vested in the authority by ORS 413.032.
[(4)] (5) The director shall have the power to obtain such other services as the director  consid-
ers necessary or desirable, including participation in organizations of  state insurance supervisory
officials and appointment of advisory committees. A member of an advisory committee  so appointed
may not receive compensation for services as  a member, but, subject to any other applicable law
regulating travel and other expenses of state officers, shall receive actual and  necessary travel and
other expenses incurred in performing official duties.
[(5)] (6) The  director may apply for, receive and accept grants, gifts or other payments, including
property or services from any governmental or other  public or private person, and may make ar-
rangement to use the receipts, including for  undertaking special studies and other projects that re-
late to the costs of health care, access to health care, public health and health care reform.
SECTION 5.
ORS 184.623 is repealed.
[3]