Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning  July 1,
2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $30,000,000,  which may be expended for Oregon
State University programs as follows:
(1) For the agricultural experiment station and branch stations, $16,000,000.
(2) For the Oregon State University Extension Service, $11,500,000.
(3) For the Forest Research Laboratory, $2,500,000.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2019