Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) A school district shall develop and adopt a plan for the testing of all
school facilities owned or leased by the school district where students or  staff are present
on a regular basis. A public charter school shall develop and adopt a plan  for the testing of
all school facilities owned or leased by the public charter school where students or  staff are
present on a  regular basis. The Department of Education, in consultation with the Oregon
Health Authority, the Department of Environmental Quality  and other interested
stakeholders, shall develop and adopt a model plan to provide guidance to school districts and
public charter schools in developing and adopting plans under this section.
(2) A school district or public charter school  shall submit a plan developed and adopted
under this section to the Department of  Education for review and approval under this sec-
tion. The school district or public charter school shall annually  review the plan. If the in-
formation contained in a school district or public charter school  plan has changed since the
preceding annual review due  to the acquisition or remodeling of a facility, the termination
of regular use of the facility by students and staff or a  modification in the method, location,
scope, frequency or other aspects of testing, the school  district or public charter school shall
submit a revised plan to the department for review and approval.
(3) A plan developed and adopted under this section shall, at a  minimum, include the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4405
SB 1047
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
following:
(a) The  identification of, and contact information for, a position within the adminis-
tration of the school district or public charter school having responsibility  for maintaining
and overseeing performance of the plan.
(b) A list of all  facilities of the school district or public charter school subject to the plan.
(c) Provisions regarding testing for elevated levels of radon.
(d) Provisions regarding testing for elevated levels of carbon monoxide.
(e) Provisions regarding testing  for, and mitigation of, elevated levels of lead in water
used for drinking or food preparation as provided by Oregon Health Authority rules.
(f) Provisions regarding testing for, and mitigation  of, asbestos as provided by authority
rules.
(g) Procedures for identifying the presence of mold.
(h) Provisions for carrying out integrated  pest management as provided under ORS
634.700 to 634.750.
(4)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules in consultation with the Department
of Education, representatives of  school districts and public charter schools and other inter-
ested stakeholders for carrying out this  section. The rules adopted by the authority under
this subsection shall include, but need not be limited to, rules regarding:
(A) Testing for elevated levels of radon;
(B) Testing for elevated levels of carbon monoxide;
(C) Testing for, and mitigation of,  elevated levels of lead in water used for drinking or
food preparation; and
(D) Testing for, and the mitigation of, asbestos.
(b) In adopting rules under paragraph (a)(D) of this  subsection, the authority shall give
consideration to any requirements under federal law or  the laws of this state. The rules shall
include, but need not be limited  to, requirements for the school district or public charter
school to:
(A) Ensure that all custodial and maintenance personnel  are properly trained regarding
the rules;
(B) Ensure  that any inspection, monitoring or mitigation activities are performed in
compliance with the rules;
(C) Annually inform facility occupants, and the parents of minor students, of ongoing or
planned inspections, response actions and reinspection, surveillance and other post-response
actions regarding asbestos;
(D) Provide repairers, utility workers, pest control workers or  other temporary workers
appropriate notice regarding areas where asbestos is present or suspected to be  present and
the form of the asbestos or suspected asbestos;
(E) Post warning  labels immediately adjacent to asbestos-containing building materials,
suspected asbestos-containing building materials and  suspected asbestos-containing materi-
als that are located in boiler rooms or other routine maintenance areas;
(F) Make information regarding the testing and mitigation of asbestos under the  plan
available and provide notice of that availability; and
(G) Include  provisions for avoiding conflicts of interest among personnel engaged in
testing and remediation of asbestos.
(5) A school district or public charter school shall  ensure that the person having re-
[2]
SB 1047
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sponsibility for maintaining and overseeing performance of the plan and  adopted under this
section, or a designee of the person, receives appropriate training regarding:
(a) The health effects of asbestos;
(b) Appropriate methods for detecting, identifying and assessing asbestos-containing
materials;
(c) Options for the control of asbestos-containing building material;
(d) Asbestos management; and
(e) Requirements regarding asbestos imposed by the  United States Department of Labor,
including but  not limited to the Occupational Safety and Health Administration, or by the
United States Department  of Transportation, the United States Environmental Protection
Agency, federal or state law or Oregon Health Authority rules.
(6) In addition to adoption of rules required under subsection (4) of this section,  the
Oregon Health Authority, in consultation with the Department of Education, representatives
of school districts and public charter schools and other  interested stakeholders, may adopt
rules to assist school districts and public charter schools in:
(a) Following  appropriate procedures when testing for or mitigating the presence of
lead-based paint. In adopting the rules, the authority shall  give consideration to any re-
quirements under federal law or the laws of this state.
(b) Limiting  or reducing exposure to high levels of diesel engine exhaust gases at facili-
ties where diesel engine exhaust may be present.
(c) Effectively disseminating information regarding the identification  of mold, including
but not limited to advice regarding how to recognize the presence of mold.
(7) The Oregon Health Authority shall develop information sheets for use by school dis-
tricts and public charter schools to inform staff, students, parents  of minor students and
other interested stakeholders about  substances that may present health concerns if present
in school facilities, including but not limited to elevated levels of lead in water  used for
drinking or food preparation, lead-based paint and mold.
(8) The Department of Education, in consultation with  the Oregon Health Authority,
representatives of school districts and public charter  schools and other interested
stakeholders, shall make opportunities for professional development  available to school dis-
trict and public charter school staff regarding  plan and information requirements under this
section and the annual statement required by section 2 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) A school district or public charter school shall make the results  of tests
conducted under a plan described in section 1 of this 2017 Act available to the public no later
than five days business days after receiving  the test results. The test result information
must include, but need not be  limited to a detailed explanation of the significance of the test
results. The school district or public charter school shall make the test results available  by:
(a) Posting the test results on a website maintained by the school  district or public
charter school;
(b) Sending electronic mail to  staff, students and parents of minor students for whom the
school district or public charter school has electronic mail addresses on file; and
(c) Making the  test results available in printed form at the administrative headquarters
for the school district or public charter school.
(2) A school district or public charter school shall provide an  annual statement regarding
the plan developed and adopted by  the school district or public charter school under section
[3]
SB 1047
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
1 of this 2017 Act. The school district or public school shall provide the statement to:
(a) The governing body for the school district or public charter school;
(b) The parents of minor students; and
(c) Any students 18 years of age or older.
(3) The annual  statement under subsection (2) of this section shall include, but need not
be limited to the following  information regarding the plan developed and adopted by the
school district or public charter school under section 1 of this 2017 Act:
(a) Identification of, and contact information for, the position within the  administration
of the school district or  public charter school having responsibility for maintaining and
overseeing performance of the plan;
(b) Information regarding the  number and general type of inquiries received from staff,
students or their parents, or other stakeholders;
(c) Information regarding where copies of the plan are available;
(d) A certification that the school district or public charter school is  in compliance with
testing requirements under the plan;
(e) Information about how to obtain the results of tests conducted under the plan; and
(f) A  summary of major mitigation activities conducted under the plan since the preced-
ing annual statement.
(4) A school  district or public charter school shall post the annual statement described
in subsection (3) of this section on a website maintained by the  school district or public
charter school and make the annual statement available in printed form at  the administra-
tive headquarters of the school district or public charter school.
(5) The Department of Education shall adopt,  in consultation with the Oregon Health
Authority, representatives of school districts and public charter schools  and other interested
stakeholders, rules for carrying out this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Healthy School  Facilities Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the  General Fund. Interest earned by the Healthy School Facili-
ties Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the  Department of Education for
the purpose of providing  financial assistance to school districts and public charter schools
in carrying out the  adoption, administration and enforcement of plans described in section
1 of this 2017 Act, including but not limited to the conducting  of testing and mitigation ac-
tivities.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding ORS 327.008, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, the
Department of Education may transfer up to $2 million of the  moneys available to the de-
partment from the State School Fund for facility grants  as provided by ORS 327.008 (7) to
the Healthy School Facilities Fund for  use by the department as provided in section 3 of this
2017 Act.
SECTION 5.  ORS 326.125 is amended to read:
326.125. For the purpose  of assisting school districts with capital costs, the Office of School
Facilities is established within the Department of Education. The office shall be responsible for:
(1) Distributing hardship grants to school districts with facility needs. Grants awarded under
this section may not exceed $500,000 and shall be  provided to school districts based on the order in
which the Department of Education receives the completed  applications for the grants. A school
district may be eligible for a grant  under this subsection if the school district meets requirements
[4]
SB 1047
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
established by the State  Board of Education by rule, including any requirements to provide matching
funds.
(2) Providing technical assistance and establishing and maintaining  standards for facilities as-
sessments and long-range facilities plans for school districts.
(3) Administering a certification program for qualified providers of technical assistance  for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Providing grants to school districts for the  cost of technical assistance for the purposes de-
scribed in subsection (2) of  this section. The State Board of Education may establish by rule re-
quirements for a school district to receive a grant under  this subsection. Grants for a school district
under this subsection may not exceed:
(a) $20,000 for a facilities assessment;
(b) $25,000 for a long-range facilities plan; [ and]
(c) $25,000 for an  assessment of school facilities for potential environmental hazards un-
der section 1 of this 2017 Act; and
[(c)] (d) $25,000 for a seismic assessment or other specialized assessment.
(5) Maintaining the Oregon School Facilities Database. The  database must include information
that:
(a) Assists with analyzing, planning and prioritizing school  capital improvement needs for school
districts by providing district-to-district and school-to-school comparisons; and
(b) Is required by the State Board of Education by rule.
(6) Administering the grant program described in ORS 286A.801.
SECTION 6.
ORS 332.166 and 332.167 and section 3, chapter 729, Oregon Laws 2015, are
repealed.
SECTION 7.  (1) The Department of Education shall develop and adopt a  model plan under
section 1 of this 2017 Act and  make the plan available to school districts and public charter
schools no later than January 1, 2019.
(2) Each school district and public charter school shall submit  a plan meeting the re-
quirements of sections 1 and 2 of this 2017 Act to the Department of  Education no later than
180 days after the department  completes the adoption of a model plan under subsection (1)
of this section. A plan must include a schedule for the implementation of  testing. However,
except for the  purpose of evaluating mitigation efforts, the department may not require a
school district or public charter school to conduct testing for elevated levels of radon at  a
facility within 10 years of any testing for elevated levels of radon at the facility  conducted
under ORS 332.167 (2015 Edition).
[5]