Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Department of  Fish and Wildlife shall establish and operate a fish
incubation box program for the rearing of salmonids  on salmon-bearing or potentially
salmon-bearing waterways located in the Counties of Coos, Curry  or Douglas and within 100
miles of the Pacific Ocean.
SECTION 2. The State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall report on  the establishment
and operation of  the fish incubation box program required under section 1 of this 2021 Act,
including but not limited to any findings or  recommendations of the department regarding
the program, to an interim committee of  the Legislative Assembly relating to natural re-
sources in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2022.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Department  of Fish and Wildlife, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $470,000, which may be  expended for establishing and
operating the fish incubation box program required under section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2577