Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Administrator shall develop  refinements and updates to the
Oregon Legislative Information  System to permit amendments and informational material
to be posted and associated online with the legislative measure to which the amendments and
informational material relate without regard to whether the measure is scheduled for a
hearing.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2030.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2304