Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other provision of  law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs by  section 1 (1), chapter 570, Oregon Laws 2019,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for services provided by the  department, is decreased
by $___.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Long Term  Care Ombudsman, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount  of $___ to create, fill and utilize three positions in support of the
Oregon Public Guardian and Conservator to  provide public guardian and conservator services
exclusively to veterans.
SECTION 3. This 2020 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2020
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 114