Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section  16, chapter 82, Oregon Laws 2022, as amended by section 5, chapter 52,
Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 16.  (1) The amendments to ORS 284.368 by section 1, chapter 82, Oregon  Laws 2022, apply
to fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2022.
(2) The amendments to sections 3 and 5, chapter 589, Oregon Laws 2021,  by sections 3 and 4,
chapter 82, Oregon Laws 2022, apply to tax years beginning  on or after January 1, 2022, and before
January 1, 2026, and to estimated payments due on and after June 15, 2022.
(3) The amendments to section 2, chapter  527, Oregon Laws 2021, by section 8, chapter 82,
Oregon  Laws  2022, apply to applications for precertification under section 4, chapter 527, Oregon
Laws 2021, and applications for exemption under section  5, chapter 527, Oregon Laws 2021, without
precertification, filed on or after June 3, 2022.
(4) [ Section 10, chapter 82, Oregon Laws 2022, ] Notwithstanding ORS  315.037, ORS 317A.123
applies to all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2022[ , and before January 1, 2026 ].
(5) [ Sections 13 and 15, chapter 82, Oregon Laws 2022, ] ORS 316.031 and 317.346  apply to  tax
years beginning on or after  January 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2029, and to any tax year to
which a net operating loss arising in those tax years is carried back.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 828