Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 65.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109.
(b) “Public funds” means funds that an officer or employee of this  state or of a political
subdivision or public or municipal corporation of this state has custody of or controls by law
or by virtue of the officer’s or employee’s office.
(2) A corporation that engages in business in this  state is subject to the requirements
of subsection (3) of this section if the corporation:
(a) Has gross annual revenues of more  than $100,000 or has 25 or more full-time or
part-time employees;
(b) Receives public funds in any amount or receives a public benefit in the form of a tax
credit or tax deduction that is available only to a corporation  organized under this chapter;
and
(c)(A) Performs a governmental function by means of a contract or another written del-
egation of a governmental function; or
(B) Sets or implements  a policy that controls or influences an expenditure, disbursement
or distribution of public funds or that designates a recipient of public funds.
(3)(a) A corporation described in subsection (2) of this section shall:
(A) Hold meetings  of the corporation’s board of directors in accordance with ORS 192.610
to 192.690.
(B) Post a copy of the corporation’s proposed annual budget on the corporation’s public
website at least 30 days before the corporation takes action to adopt the  budget. The budget
must identify the source of any public funds  in the budget and the expenditures the corpo-
ration proposes to make from the public funds.
(C) Submit to and cooperate with  audits of the corporation’s finances conducted by the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3011
HB 3321
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Secretary of State or  the public body that provided the corporation with public funds or by
designees of the Secretary of State or the public body.
(D) Make records that the corporation  keeps under ORS 65.771 available in accordance
with ORS 192.410 to 192.505, except that the  corporation may redact from a record informa-
tion that personally identifies a member or employee of the  corporation, other than by first
and last name, before disclosing the record.
(b) A member of the  board of directors of a corporation described in subsection (2) of this
section, or an officer or employee of the corporation, in addition to and not in lieu of  pro-
visions in this chapter that  govern the board member’s, officer’s or employee’s conduct with
respect to the  corporation, including but not limited to ORS 65.357, 65.361, 65.364, 65.367,
65.369 and 65.377, is subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 244. To the  extent that a con-
flict exists between a provision of  ORS chapter 65 described in this paragraph and a provision
of ORS chapter 244, the provisions of ORS chapter 65 described in this paragraph control.
(4) A public body that provides public funds or a public benefit of  the type described in
subsection (2)(b) of this section to a  corporation shall monitor the corporation’s compliance
with subsection (3) of this section.  The public body may designate or enter into an agreement
with another public body to carry out  the public body’s responsibilities under this subsection.
(5)(a) A corporation described in subsection (2) of this section that  does not comply with
the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, at the discretion of the public body that
provided the corporation with public funds or a public  benefit described in subsection (2)(b)
of this section, is subject to:
(A) A demand for repayment of public funds or the equivalent value of a  public benefit
described in subsection (2)(b) of this section that the corporation received from a public body;
and
(B) A denial of public funds or a public benefit  described in subsection (2)(b) of this sec-
tion for a period of 10 years.
(b) A public body that provides public  funds or a public benefit described in subsection
(2)(b) of this section to a corporation may enter into an assurance of  voluntary compliance
with the corporation before imposing a sanction described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) The Secretary of State shall, under ORS 65.647, administratively  dissolve a corpo-
ration that shows a pattern of repeated violations  of subsection (3) of this section or that
fails to  comply with the terms of an assurance of voluntary compliance that a public body
negotiates with the corporation.
(d) A member of the board of directors or an officer of a corporation that the  Secretary
of State administratively dissolves under paragraph  (c) of this subsection may not serve as
a member of the board of directors or an officer of another corporation for a period  of not
less than 10 years.  The Secretary of State by rule shall specify procedures for enforcing the
provision described in this paragraph.
SECTION 3.
(1) Section 2 of this 2017 Act becomes operative January 1, 2018.
(2) The Secretary of State and a public body that provides public  funds or a public benefit
described in section 2 (2)(b) of this 2017 Act may adopt, as appropriate,  rules, resolutions or
ordinances before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this  section that are nec-
essary to enable the Secretary of State or the public body to exercise, on and after  the op-
erative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers
conferred on the Secretary of State or the public body by section 2 of this 2017 Act.
[2]
HB 3321
1
2
3
4
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]