Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Federal firearms licensee” or “licensee” means a  person licensed as a dealer, man-
ufacturer or importer under 18 U.S.C. 923.
(b) “Firearm” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.210.
(c) “Firearm hold agreement” means a private transaction  between a federal firearms
licensee and an individual firearm  owner in which the licensee takes physical possession of
the owner’s lawfully possessed firearm at the owner’s request,  stores the firearm for an
agreed-upon period of time and returns the firearm to the owner according to the terms of
the agreement.
(2)(a) A federal firearms licensee  may enter into a firearm hold agreement with a firearm
owner.
(b) A firearm hold agreement may contain a requirement that  a firearm owner provide
up to three days’ notice to the licensee prior to requesting the return of a stored firearm.
(c) A firearm hold agreement may require the payment of a fee to the licensee  in ex-
change for holding or storing a firearm.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a person may not bring  a
cause of action against a federal firearms licensee for any act or omission arising from en-
tering into a firearm hold agreement, including  taking physical possession of a firearm pur-
suant to a firearm hold agreement, storing  the firearm or returning the firearm to the
owner.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply:
(A) If  the licensee returns the firearm to a person the licensee knows, or reasonably
should know, is a danger to self or others.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 129
HB 4096
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
(B) To a civil action based upon the licensee’s negligence or unlawful conduct.
(4) The  existence of an individual firearm hold agreement may not be disclosed by the
licensee except pursuant to a warrant or subpoena.
SECTION 2.
(1) The  Oregon Health Authority shall develop, publish and distribute a
pamphlet on firearm suicide prevention and the use of firearm hold  agreements as defined
in section 1 of this 2024 Act as a means of reducing firearm suicide risk.
(2) In developing the pamphlet, the  authority shall consider input from suicide prevention
groups and firearm safety organizations, and the pamphlet must be based on evidence-based
suicide prevention practices.
(3) The authority may  contract with an outside entity for the development or publication
of the pamphlet, or may develop and publish the pamphlet internally.
(4) The authority shall:
(a) Publish the pamphlet in an electronic format on the authority’s website.
(b) Provide copies of the pamphlet, upon request and free of charge, to federal firearms
licensees, law enforcement agencies, gun ranges, community-based organizations and medical
providers, including behavioral health providers.
(5)(a) A federal  firearms licensee may make available to firearm purchasers, in the
licensee’s place of business, the firearm  suicide prevention pamphlet described in this sec-
tion.
(b) Law enforcement agencies, gun ranges, community-based organizations and medical
providers, including behavioral health providers, may distribute or  otherwise make available
to members of the public the firearm suicide prevention pamphlet described in this section.
SECTION 3.
This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]