Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “governing board” has  the meaning given that
term in ORS 352.029.
(2) The Legislative Policy and Research Director shall conduct a  study to determine the
impact of the implementation of  chapter 637, Oregon Laws 2011 (Enrolled Senate Bill 242),
on higher education in this state. The study must:
(a) Include a comparative analysis between the stated goals of the bill and  actual out-
comes realized since the bill was enacted; and
(b) Identify any trends since  the enactment of the bill under independent governing
boards, including the following:
(A) Trends in tuition costs and student debt, as adjusted  for inflation, for each academic
year from 2011 to 2023, including:
(i) Undergraduate tuition;
(ii) Graduate tuition;
(iii) Online tuition;
(iv) Certificate program tuition; and
(v) Resident and nonresident tuition rates;
(B) Trends in enrollment and graduation  for each academic year from 2011 to 2023, in-
cluding:
(i) Types of degrees awarded;
(ii) Programs offered or eliminated;
(iii) Graduation attained by  individuals who are Black, Indigenous or other people of
color; and
(iv) Cost barriers to higher education, including:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 156
HB 4125
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(I) On-campus housing;
(II) Off-campus housing;
(III) On-campus food programs;
(IV) Cost-of-living and rent burden statistics for those regions surrounding each  campus;
and
(V) Other necessary living expenses;
(C) Trends in the workforce at public universities in this state, including:
(i) Percentage of undergraduate, graduate, online and certificate program classes taught
by full-time tenured faculty for each quarter of each year from 2011 to 2023;
(ii) Percentage of undergraduate, graduate, online and certificate program classes taught
by adjunct part-time non-tenure-track faculty for each quarter of each year  from 2011 to
2023;
(iii) Percentage of undergraduate, graduate, online and certificate program classes taught
by full-time non-tenure-track  instructional faculty for each quarter of each year from 2011
to 2023;
(iv) Percentage increase, if any, in unclassified  administrative costs, salaries and em-
ployment numbers in each year from 2011 to 2023;
(v) Year-by-year actual numbers of employed part-time  adjunct faculty, full-time non-
tenure-track faculty, full-time tenured or  tenure-track faculty, undergraduate employees,
graduate employees and classified staff; and
(vi) Average take-home salary, as adjusted for inflation, for each group of  employees
identified in sub-subparagraph (iv) of this subparagraph;
(D) Trends in institutional finance, including:
(i) Institutional debt, bonds, endowments and overall  financial health of each public uni-
versity in this state; and
(ii) Trends in state funding to each public university in this state,  including state funding
as a percentage of total operating costs, as adjusted for inflation; and
(E) Perceptions of students, faculty and community members in light  of any events re-
garding public universities in this state.
(3) The director shall include in the study conducted under subsection (2) of  this section
a consideration of governance models for public universities in this  state in light of the data
identified under subsection (2) of this  section, and in consideration of governance models
used in other states, examine the potential positive and negative impacts of the following:
(a) No change to the current governance model for public universities in this state;
(b) Abolishing independent governing boards and returning to oversight of public univer-
sities by a state board of higher education;
(c) A hybrid model of governance for public universities retaining aspects of the current
governance model and including oversight by a centralized state agency  with limitations on
the authority of governing boards;
(d) A governance model of public universities that consolidates governing boards  among
public universities or creates a consortium of governing boards; and
(e) Providing for elections of members of governing boards.
(4) The director may enter into a contract  or a partnership with any public or private
entity for the purposes of this section.
(5) The  director shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the in-
[2]
HB 4125
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
terim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to higher education no later  than
September 15, 2024.
(6) Each public university shall provide the director with  any assistance required by the
director that  the director determines is necessary to complete the study and report in the
manner described in this section.
SECTION 2.
This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]