Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on High School Diploma Modernization is established.
(2) The task force consists of 24 members appointed by the Governor. The task  force
must include at least two members from each of the following categories:
(a) Students;
(b) Parents;
(c) Teachers;
(d) Classified school employees;
(e) High school counselors;
(f) School administrators;
(g) School board members;
(h) Representatives of higher education;
(i) Representatives of local workforce development boards;
(j) Representatives of businesses; and
(k) Representatives of community-based organizations.
(3)(a) The  task force shall review the current high school diploma requirements and
propose updated and comprehensive changes to the requirements for a high school diploma.
(b) The goal of  the changes proposed by the task force shall be to establish requirements
for an updated, student-focused high school diploma that prepares  all students for any
pathway a student may choose after high school graduation.
(c) As part of the review required under this subsection, the task force shall consider
relevant research and recommendations,  including the report produced as a result of the
enactment of section 1, chapter 495, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled Senate Bill 744 (2021)).
(4) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(5) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the members
of the task force.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 657
HB 2674
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there is a  vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make an appointment to be-
come immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10)(a) The task force shall submit a  report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for  legislation, to an interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly related to education no later than:
(A) March 1, 2026, for a preliminary report on the progress of the task force; and
(B) September 15, 2026, for the final report of the task force.
(b) The task force shall submit to the Governor the reports required under paragraph  (a)
of this subsection based on the timelines prescribed by paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(11) The Department of Education shall provide staff support to the task force.
(12) Members of the task force are entitled  to compensation and expenses in the manner
and amounts provided for in ORS 292.495. Claims for compensation and expenses  incurred in
performing functions of the task  force shall be paid out of funds appropriated to the de-
partment for purposes of the task force.
(13) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]