Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) An official or agency of state government,  as defined in ORS 174.111, may
not discriminate or grant  preferential treatment to any individual on the basis of gender
identity, race, sex, color,  ethnicity or national origin in the application, selection or ap-
pointment of individuals to boards and commissions.
(2) Nothing in this  section shall be interpreted as prohibiting bona fide qualifications
based on sex that are reasonably necessary for the normal operation of boards and commis-
sions.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as invalidating any court order or  consent
decree that is in force as of the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act applies to appointments to boards and commissions
made on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 622