Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Imagination  Library Project is established for the purpose
of improving third-grade reading proficiency  and high school graduation rates by providing
free books to young children in this state.
(2)(a) The Department of Early Learning and  Care shall develop, implement and admin-
ister the project. The department shall ensure that, under  the project, every enrolled child
has the opportunity to receive an age-appropriate book each month.
(b) A child is eligible to be enrolled if  the child is at least four years of age and has not
started kindergarten.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection,  the department may determine that
children younger than four years  of age may be eligible to be enrolled if resources are
available to enroll younger children.
(3) For the purpose of administering the project, the  department may enter into a con-
tract with:
(a) A national book gifting foundation  that works in collaboration with local nonprofit
organizations and government agencies to provide free books to children from  birth until the
children begin school.
(b) One or more school districts, nonprofit  organizations or other entities that are ex-
empt from  taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code to collaborate with
the department to:
(A) Provide outreach to local communities about the project;
(B) Recruit volunteers to assist in the  implementation and administration of the project;
(C) Solicit donations, gifts and other funding to financially support the project;
(D) Develop a process for enrolling children in the project; or
(E) Enroll children in the project.
(4) The department may require  that any nonprofit organization or other entity that is
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2130
HB 2872
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of  the Internal Revenue Code and that enters
into a contract with  the department provide a matching amount of at least 50 percent of the
funds required to carry out the project as described in the contract.
(5) The department may create an advisory committee to advise  the department and
make recommendations on how best to develop, implement and administer the project.
(6) The Early Learning Council, in consultation with the department, may adopt  rules to
implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Imagination Library Account is established within  the Early
Learning Division Fund. Separate records shall be maintained for moneys in  the account.
Interest earned by the account shall be credited to the account.
(2) Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the Department of  Early
Learning and Care for the Oregon Imagination Library Project described in section 1 of this
2023 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[2]