Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 418.041 is amended to read:
418.041. (1) The  Governor’s Child Foster Care Advisory Commission is established, consisting
of 11 members appointed by the Governor.
(2) The term of office of each member of  the commission is four years, but a member serves at
the pleasure of the Governor. Before the expiration of the  term of a member, the Governor shall
appoint a  successor whose term begins on July 1 next following. A member is eligible for reap-
pointment. If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make an appointment to become
immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(3) The appointment of each member of the  commission is subject to confirmation by the Senate
in the manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
(4) A member of  the commission is entitled to compensation and expenses [ as provided in ORS
292.495.] in the manner and amounts provided for  in ORS 292.495. Claims for compensation
and expenses incurred in performing the functions of the commission shall be  paid out of
funds appropriated to the commission for that purpose.
(5) The Governor shall provide the commission with the necessary clerical and adminis-
trative staff support.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated to the Governor’s Child Foster Care Advisory Com-
mission, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of
$_______ for the  purpose of compensating members of the commission and reimbursing
members of the commission for expenses incurred performing functions of the commission.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2577