Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Coordinated care organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(b) “Drug outlet” has the meaning given that term in ORS 689.005.
(c) “Veteran with a disability” means a veteran who has a United  States Department of
Veterans Affairs disability rating of at least 50 percent.
(2) A drug outlet, registered in this state,  that contracts with or is part of a coordinated
care organization shall dispense to  a veteran with a disability a seven-day supply, at no cost,
of a prescription drug prescribed by  a provider associated with a hospital or clinic of the
United States Department  of Veterans Affairs if the veteran is unable to obtain the pre-
scription drug from the hospital or clinic.
(3) A drug outlet may not require a veteran  to provide documentation that the veteran
is unable to obtain  the prescription drug from the hospital or clinic but shall accept as true
the veteran’s attestation.
(4) A drug outlet may limit  the number of dispensings under subsection (2) of this section
to no more than one per calendar quarter for each veteran.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2312