Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Reparations is established.
(2) The task force consists of 13 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint two members from  among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives  shall appoint two members from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint nine members as follows:
(A) One member of a  group that advocates for reparations for Oregonians of African-
American descent;
(B) Two members from groups that advocate for civil rights and human rights;
(C) One member from a labor organization;
(D) One member from a faith community;
(E) One member from an institution of higher education;
(F) One member from an historical research institution; and
(G) Two members from Oregon civic and fraternal organizations.
(3)(a) The task force shall:
(A) Study and develop proposals for  financial and nonfinancial reparations for Oregonians
of African-American descent;
(B) Develop appropriate methods for educating the public about the task force’s findings;
and
(C) Recommend appropriate remedies based on the task force’s findings.
(b) In carrying out the functions described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the  task
force shall develop an interim report on the  task force’s findings for public review. In the
report, the task force shall identify governmental actions that have resulted  in harm to
Oregonians of African-American descent in the following categories of systemic discrimi-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2551
SB 776
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
nation:
(A) Enslavement;
(B) Racial terror;
(C) Political disenfranchisement;
(D) Housing segregation;
(E) Separate and unequal education;
(F) Racism related to the environment and infrastructure;
(G) Pathologizing the Black family;
(H) Control over creative cultural and intellectual life;
(I) Stolen labor and hindered opportunity;
(J) An unjust legal system;
(K) Mental and physical harm and neglect; and
(L) The wealth gap.
(4) The task force may:
(a) Identify methods for  eliminating racial bias in employment and advancement, espe-
cially for Oregonians of  African-American descent that seek public employment or promotion
to higher paying positions in government;
(b) Identify methods for eliminating anti-Black discrimination policies in artistic,  cul-
tural, creative, athletic and intellectual life; and
(c) Identify individuals who should be compensated financially and with services, at no
charge to the individual, that seek to remedy damage to the individual’s mental or  physical
health from anti-Black healthcare systems and treatments, such as  forced sterilization,
medical experimentation, racist  sentencing disparities, police violence, environmental racism
and race-related stress that causes psychological harm.
(5) A  majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority  of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for  legislation, to an interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly related to human rights no later than September 15, 2024.
(12) The Legislative Policy and Research Office shall  provide staff support to the task
force.
(13) Members of  the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
[2]
SB 776
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on December 31, 2024.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]