Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 279A.803 is amended to read:
279A.803. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Apprentice” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(b) “Apprenticeable occupation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(c) “Apprenticeship training program” means  the total system of apprenticeship that a
particular local joint committee, as defined in ORS 660.010, operates, including the local joint
committee’s  registered standards and all other terms and conditions for qualifying, recruit-
ing, selecting, employing and training apprentices in an apprenticeable occupation.
(d) “Minority individual” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
(e) “Prevailing rate of wage” has the meaning given that term in ORS 279C.800.
(f) “Qualified project” means a public improvement project that:
(A) Has an estimated project cost of at least $1 million; and
(B) Uses at least $750,000 of  funds of a public agency, as defined in ORS 279C.810, or
moneys made available to the state under the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (P.L.  117-2).
(g) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
(h) “Woman” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
[(1)] (2)  A public body that is carrying out a qualified project shall require each contractor  in
a contract with an estimated cost of $200,000 or greater to:
(a) Enter into a project labor agreement that, at a minimum,  provides for payment of wages at
or above the prevailing rate of wage;
(b) Employ apprentices to perform at least  15 percent of the work hours that  workers in
apprenticeable occupations perform under the contract, in  a manner consistent with the apprentices’
respective apprenticeship training programs;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2034
SB 850
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Establish and execute a plan for outreach, recruitment and  retention of women, minority
individuals and veterans to perform work under the contract, with  the aspirational target of having
at least 15 percent of total work hours performed by individuals in one or  more of those groups; and
(d) Require any subcontractor engaged by the contractor to  abide by the requirements set forth
in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of  this subsection, if the work to be performed under the subcontract
has an estimated cost of $200,000 or greater.
[(2)] (3)  The requirements of subsection [ (1)] (2) of this section do not apply to a contract for a
qualified project if the public body carrying out the qualified  project demonstrates to the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services that[ :]
[(a) The qualified project is primarily located in a county that  is characterized as nonmetropolitan
by the United States Office of Management and Budget; and ]
[(b)] compliance with the requirements would, with respect to the contract:
[(A)] (a)  Cause significant expense or delay; or
[(B)] (b) Limit the pool of bidders to fewer than three.
[(3) As used in this section: ]
[(a) “Apprentice” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010. ]
[(b) “Apprenticeable occupation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010. ]
[(c) “Apprenticeship training program”  means the total system of apprenticeship that a particular
local joint committee,  as defined in ORS 660.010, operates, including the local joint committee’s regis-
tered standards and  all other terms and conditions for qualifying, recruiting, selecting, employing and
training apprentices in an apprenticeable occupation. ]
[(d) “Minority individual” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005. ]
[(e) “Prevailing rate of wage” has the meaning given that term in ORS 279C.800. ]
[(f) “Public body” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.109. ]
[(g) “Qualified project” means a project: ]
[(A) For capital improvements to water, sewer, broadband or transportation infrastructure; ]
[(B) That has an estimated project cost of at least $10 million; and ]
[(C) That utilizes at least $750,000 of moneys made  available to the state under the American
Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (P.L. 117-2).]
[(h) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225. ]
[(i) “Woman” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005. ]
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 279A.803 by section  1 of this 2023 Act apply to
procurements that a public body advertises or otherwise  solicits or, if the public body does
not advertise or solicit the public contract, to a public contract  into which the public body
enters, on or after the operative date specified in section 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) The amendments to  ORS 279A.803 by section 1 of this 2023 Act become
operative on January 1, 2024.
(2) The Attorney General,  the Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services, the Director of Transportation and a contracting  agency that adopts rules under
ORS 279A.065 or  279A.070 may adopt rules and take any other action before the operative
date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable  the Attorney
General, the directors or  the contracting agency to undertake and exercise, on and after the
operative date specified in subsection (1)  of this section, all of the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the Attorney General, the directors or  the contracting agency by the
amendments to ORS 279A.803 by section 1 of this 2023 Act.
[2]
SB 850
1
2
3
SECTION 4.
This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]