Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 651.205 is amended to read:
651.205. (1) The operator of a live entertainment facility shall display  the poster developed by
the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries under subsection (2) of  this section in a
conspicuous manner in a sufficient number  of places in the establishment to be read by all persons
working in the establishment.
(2)(a) The Commissioner of the  Bureau of Labor and Industries shall develop a poster that in-
cludes:
(A) A summary of the  rights of independent contractors and employees who perform live enter-
tainment;
(B) A description of the services offered  through and the toll-free telephone number of the live
entertainer hotline established under subsection (3) of this section; and
(C) Any additional information determined to be necessary by the commissioner.
(b) The Bureau of  Labor and Industries shall publish the poster developed by the commissioner
under this  subsection on the bureau’s website and shall make the poster available to the public at
no cost.
(3)(a) The bureau shall implement and maintain a  toll-free telephone hotline to receive inquiries
and complaints related to employment in the performance of live entertainment.
(b) A caller to the  hotline may remain anonymous and may request that the inquiry or complaint
remain confidential.
[(c) The bureau shall staff the hotline on a half-time basis  with a person or persons who have a
background in providing live entertainment  as an independent contractor or a background in the op-
eration of a crisis line. ]
[(d)] (c) The bureau may share information that has not been  designated confidential by a
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 322
SB 24
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
hotline caller with agencies participating  in the Interagency Compliance Network established under
ORS 670.700, law enforcement agencies or any other agency designated by the commissioner.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 653.256 is amended to read:
653.256. (1) In addition to any  other penalty provided by law, the Commissioner of the Bureau
of Labor and Industries may assess a civil penalty not to exceed  $1,000 against any person that
willfully violates ORS 653.025, 653.030, 653.045, 653.050, 653.060, 653.261, 653.265, 653.606, 653.611,
653.616, 653.621, 653.626, 653.631 or 653.636 or section 5, chapter 537,  Oregon Laws 2015, or any rule
adopted thereunder.
(2) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, the commissioner may assess a civil penalty
not to exceed $1,000 against any person  that intentionally violates ORS 653.077 or any rule adopted
thereunder.
(3) Civil  penalties authorized by this section shall be imposed in the manner provided in ORS
183.745.
(4)(a) All sums collected as penalties under this section shall be first applied toward reimburse-
ment of costs incurred in determining the  violations, conducting hearings under this section and
addressing and collecting the penalties.
(b) The remainder, if any, of the sums collected as penalties under  subsection (1) of this section
shall be paid over by the commissioner  to the Department of State Lands for the benefit of the
Common School Fund of this state. The department  shall issue a receipt for the money to the com-
missioner.
(c) The remainder, if any, of the sums collected as penalties under subsection  (2) of this section
shall be paid over by the commissioner to the [ Department of Human Services for the benefit  of the
Breastfeeding Mother Friendly Employer Project ] State Treasury to the credit  of the General
Fund. The department shall issue a receipt for the moneys to the commissioner.
SECTION 3.
ORS 653.079 is repealed.
[2]