Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As soon as practicable after the effective date of this 2025 Act,  TriMet
shall adopt an  ordinance to modify its district boundaries to exclude from the district the
territory described in section 2 of this 2025 Act. Notwithstanding ORS  267.170, the ordinance
adopted under this section may not be referred to or by electors.
(2) Persons located in the  areas described in section 2 of this 2025 Act shall assess
whether the mass transit district boundary change required under  this section results in any
new liability for taxes imposed by a local government and, if so,  shall commence paying any
such taxes.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Local government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.116.
(b) “TriMet” means the Tri-County Metropolitan Transportation  District of Oregon, a
mass transit district created under ORS chapter 267.
SECTION 2.
The boundaries of the territory to be  excluded under section 1 of this 2025
Act are as follows:
(1) A 1,652 acre tract of land, more or less, situated  in the Southerly Half of Sections 34,
35, and 36 of Township 2 South, Range 1 West; the Southwesterly One-Quarter of Section 31
of Township 2 South, Range  1 East; Section 6, Township 3 South, Range 1 East; and Section
1, the North Half of Section 2, Section 3, the Northeast One-Quarter of Section  4, and the
Northeast One-Quarter of Section 10, of Township  2 South, Range 1 West, all of the
Willamette Meridian, Washington and Clackamas  Counties, State of Oregon, being more
particularly described as follows: beginning at the section corner common to Sections 34 and
35, T2S, R1W, and Sections 2 and 3, T3S, R1W, W.M., being  at the intersection of SW
Grahams Ferry Road (County Road (C.R.) 844) and  SW Basalt Creek Road; thence, in an
easterly direction along the common line of Section 35, T2S, R1W and Section 2, T3S,  R1W,
W.M., for a distance of  2,495 feet, more or less, to the westerly right-of-way line of SW
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1344
SB 418
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Boones Ferry Road (Market Road 24); thence, in a northerly direction along the westerly
right-of-way line of SW Boones Ferry Road, for a  distance of 231 feet, more or less, to the
apparent intersection of said right-of-way and the northerly right-of-way line of SW Greenhill
Lane; thence, in an easterly direction along the northerly right-of-way line of SW  Greenhill
Lane, for a distance of 1,840 feet, more or less,  to the westerly right-of-way line of Interstate
5; thence, in a northeasterly direction along the said westerly right-of-way  of Interstate 5,
for a distance of 436 feet, more or  less, to the northerly line of the plat “Tualatin Orchard
Tract,” a duly recorded subdivision in Washington County; thence, in an  easterly direction
along the north line  of the plat “Tualatin Orchard Tract,” for a distance of 838 feet, more
or less,  to the common line of Sections 35 and 36, T2S, R1W, W.M.; thence, in a northerly
direction along said common line for  a distance of 137 feet, more or less, to the
northwesterly corner of Lot 24 of the plat “Comte &  Kohlman’s Little Homes No. 1,” a duly
recorded subdivision in Washington  County; thence, in an easterly direction along the
northerly line of  said Lot 24, for a distance of 773 feet, more or less, to the apparent
northerly return of the  northerly right-of-way line of Frobase Road (C.R. 932); thence, con-
tinuing in an easterly direction along the northerly right-of-way line  of Fromase Road, for
a distance of  4,536 feet, more or less, to the easterly line of Section 36, T2S, R1W, W.M.,
being the westerly line of Section 31, T2S, R1E, W.M., the centerline of SW 65th Avenue (C.R.
131), and a county line between Washington and Clackamas Counties; thence,  in a southerly
direction along said common line, for a distance of 58 feet to  the projection of the
southwesterly corner of Parcel 5, Partition Plat  No. 1994-19, Clackamas County; thence, in
an easterly direction along the southerly lines of Parcel 5  and 6, of PP No. 1994-19, Parcel 3
of PP No. 1992-130, and Document Number 1993-002364, for a distance of 2,813 feet, more  or
less, to the center section line of  Section 31, T2S, R1E, W.M.; thence, in a southerly direction
along the center section line of Section 31, T2S, R1E, W.M.,  continuing along the center
section line of Section 6, T3S, R1E,  W.M., passing at a distance of 3,379 feet, more or less,
the southerly right-of-way  line of Eastgate Drive, and continuing for a total distance of 3,418
feet, more or less, to  a northwesterly corner of Lot 13 of the plat “Quarry at Stafford,” a
duly recorded subdivision in Clackamas County; thence, in an easterly  direction along a
northwesterly line of said Lot 13,  for a distance of 72 feet, more or less, to a point for corner;
thence, in a southerly direction along a westerly line of said Lot 13,  for a distance of 1,199
feet, more or less, to the southwesterly corner of said Lot 13, being on the southerly line  of
the northerly one-half of the southwesterly  one-quarter of Section 6, T3S, R1E, W.M.;
thence, in a westerly direction along said line, for  a distance of 2,853 feet, more or less, to
the east line of Section 1, T3S, R1W, W.M., being the westerly line of  Section 6, T3S, R1E,
W.M., the centerline of aforementioned SW 65th Avenue,  and aforementioned county line;
thence, in  a northerly direction along said common line, for a distance of 261 feet, more or
less, to the centerline intersection of said SW 65th Avenue and  SW Elligsen Road (C.R. 2649);
thence, in a westerly direction along the centerline of SW Elligsen  Road, for a distance of
1.0 mile,  more or less, to the common line of Sections 1 and 2, T3S, R1W, W.M.; thence, in
a northerly direction along said common line, for a distance of 1,783 feet, more  or less, to
the northeasterly corner of  the plat of “Stafford Park No. 2,” a duly recorded subdivision in
Washington County; thence, in a westerly direction along the northerly line of said “Stafford
Park No. 2,” for a distance of 1,018  feet, more or less, to the easterly right-of-way of afore-
mentioned Interstate 5; thence, continuing in a westerly direction, for a distance  of 1,348
[2]
SB 418
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
feet, more or less, to the centerline intersection of  aforementioned SW Boones Ferry Road
and SW Day Road (C.R. 470); thence,  continuing in a westerly direction with the centerline
of SW DAY Road, for a  distance of 2,917 feet, more or less, to the common line of Sections
2 and 3, T3S, R1W, W.M., and intersection of SW Day Road and SW Grahams  Ferry Road;
thence, in a southwesterly direction along the easterly right-of-way line of  SW Grahams
Ferry Road, for a distance of 4,270 feet, more  or less to the centerline of a ditch (Coffee Lake
Creek); thence, in a northwesterly direction along  the centerline of a ditch per PS4745 filled
in Clackamas County  Survey Records, Survey Number 9081 filled in Washington County
Survey Records, and Partition Plat No. 1999-101 Washington  County Survey Records, for a
distance of 3,210 feet, more or less, to the westerly interior et al corner of Parcel 2  of said
PP No. 1999-001; thence, in a northwesterly direction along the northerly line of the North
Coffee Lake Creek Wetlands (Book 527,  Page 226), for a distance of 1,290 feet, more or less,
to the one-quarter line of Section 3,  T3S, R1W, W.M.; thence, in a westerly direction along
said one-quarter line, passing at 745 feet, more or less, the  common section line of Sections
3 and 4, T3S, R1W, W.M., same being a county line between  Washington and Clackamas
Counties, continuing for a total distance of 893 feet, more or less, to the centerline of  SW
Morgan Road (C.R. 699);  thence, in a northerly direction along the centerline of SW Morgan
Road, for a distance of 2,460 feet, more or  less, to the centerline intersection of said SW
Morgan Road and SW  Tonquin Road; thence, in a northeasterly direction along the centerline
of SW Tonquin Road, for a distance  of 2,120 feet, more or less, to the centerline intersection
of said SW  Tonquin Road and aforementioned SW Basalt Creek Road; thence, in an easterly
direction along the centerline of SW Basalt  Creek Road, for a distance of 3,612 feet, more
or less, to the point of beginning.
(2) A 313 acre tract of land, more  or less, situated in the Southwesterly Quarter of Sec-
tion 7 and Northwesterly Quarter of Section 18, Township 3 South, Range 1  East of the
Willamette Meridian, Clackamas County,  State of Oregon, being more particularly described
as follows: beginning at the section corner at the Southeast corner  of Section 12 and the said
Northeast corner of Section 13 in Range 1 West of the Willamette Meridian which is also  the
Southwest corner of said Section 7 and Northwest corner  of said Section 18, said point being
the intersection of  Boeckman Road (County Road 80), SW Stafford Road (Market Road 12),
SW Advance Road (County Road 140(X-24)), and SW Wilsonville Road; thence, in  a northerly
direction along the common line of said Section 12 and  said Section 7 with the centerline of
SW Stafford Road a distance of 2,681 feet, more or less, to the  intersection of the northerly
right-of-way line of SW Kahle Rd (County Road 2393); thence, in an  easterly direction along
the northerly right-of-way line of SW Kahle Rd for  a distance of 2,600 feet, more or less, to
the westerly line of Lot 14 of  the plat of “TURNER LITTLE FARMS,” a duly recorded sub-
division in Clackamas County; thence, in a southerly direction along the westerly line of said
Lot 14 a distance  of 33 feet, more or less, to the southwesterly corner of said Lot 14; thence,
in an easterly direction along  the southerly line of said Lot 14, same being the northerly line
of a tract of land described in deed recorded  under Document Number (Doc. No.) 2022-008589
of the Clackamas County Deed Records (CCDR), for a distance of  585 feet, more or less, to
a point for corner; thence, in a southwesterly  direction over and across said Doc. No.
2022-008589 for a distance of 1381 feet, more or less, to  the southerly line of said Doc. No.
2022-008589 and the northerly line of a tract of land described in deed recorded under Doc.
No. 2011-074240 CCDR; thence, in a westerly direction along said common  line for a distance
[3]
SB 418
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
of 139 feet, more  or less, to the northwesterly corner of said Doc. No. 2011-074240; thence,
in a southerly direction  along the westerly line of said Doc. No. 2011-074240 for a distance
of 1,325 feet, more or less, to the southerly right of  way line of aforementioned SW Advance
Road; thence, in a westerly  direction along the southerly right of way line of SW Advance
Road, a distance of 440 feet, more or less, to a point being 440.2  feet west of the quarter
section corner of aforementioned Sections 7 and 18;  thence, in a southerly direction along a
line called to be 440.2 feet west of, and parallel to, the quarter section line  of said Section
18, for a distance of 2,300 feet, more or less, to  the southerly right- of-way line of SW Kruse
Road (County Road 2359); thence, in a westerly direction along the southerly right-of-way line
of SW Kruse Road, for a distance of 873 feet, more or less,  to the center line of SW 60th
Avenue (County  Road 2359); thence, in a southerly direction along the centerline of SW
Kruse Road, for  a distance of 304 feet, more or less, to the northeasterly corner of the Heirs
of D.S. Minkler, Dec’d, DLC  No. 48; thence, in a westerly direction along the northerly line
of said DLC  No. 48, for a distance of 1,435 feet, more or less, to the easterly line of afore-
mentioned Section 13; thence, in a northerly direction along the easterly line of  said Section
13, same being  the westerly line of aforementioned Section 18, for a distance of 2633 feet,
more or less, to the point of beginning.
[4]