Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Environmental Quality, for the  biennium ending July 1, 2021, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000 for the purposes of:
(1) Not later than September 1, 2020, awarding a grant under ORS 454.779 in  an amount
of not less than $1,950,000; and
(2) Covering administrative costs necessary to implement ORS 454.779.
SECTION 2.
This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 34