Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
QUALIFIED MENTAL HEALTH ASSOCIATES
(Student Loan Forgiveness)
SECTION 1.
(1) There is created in the Oregon Health Authority a qualified mental health
associate incentive program for the purpose of providing loan repayment subsidies to quali-
fied mental health associates  who commit to serving children in child-caring agencies in this
state. The authority shall prescribe by rule:
(a) Participant eligibility criteria,  including the types of qualified mental health associ-
ates who may participate in the program;
(b) The terms and conditions of participation in the program, including the duration of
the term of any service agreement, which must be at least 24 months;
(c) If the funds  allocated to the program from the Health Care Provider Incentive Fund
established under ORS 676.450 are insufficient to provide assistance to all applicants who are
eligible to participate in the program, the priority for the distribution of funds; and
(d) The financial penalties imposed on an individual who  fails to comply with the terms
and conditions of participation.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 43
HB 4011
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Eligibility criteria adopted for the program:
(a) Must allow qualified mental health associates to qualify for  an incentive for multiyear
periods.
(b) Must give preference to applicants:
(A) Who have been recruited through the Child  Welfare Cultural Equity Program estab-
lished under section  6 of this 2022 Act, or who are participants or graduates of the qualified
mental health associate apprenticeship program described in section 3 of this 2022 Act;
(B) Who commit to serving for a minimum of four years with a  child-caring agency that
provides care to children receiving child welfare services from the Department  of Human
Services or  children who have been referred by state or local agencies or coordinated care
organizations; or
(C) Who meet specific needs identified by a child-caring agency.
(3) The authority may enter into contracts  with one or more public or private entities
to administer the qualified  mental health associate incentive program or parts of the pro-
gram.
(4) The  authority may receive gifts, grants or contributions from any source, whether
public or private, to carry out the provisions of this section. Moneys received  under this
subsection shall be deposited in the Health  Care Provider Incentive Fund established under
ORS 676.450.
(5) As used in this section, “child-caring agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS
418.205.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 676.450 is amended to read:
676.450. The  Health Care Provider Incentive Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund.  Interest earned by the Health Care Provider Incentive Fund
shall be credited to the fund. The fund consists of moneys  appropriated to the fund by the Legisla-
tive Assembly and gifts, grants or other moneys contributed to  the fund by any source, whether
public or private. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated  to the Oregon Health Authority
to carry out ORS 676.454 and 676.467  and section 1 of this 2022 Act .
(Apprenticeship Program)
SECTION 3. (1)(a) The Department of Human Services, in collaboration with  the State
Apprenticeship and Training Council and the Oregon Health Authority,  shall develop and
administer a qualified mental  health associate apprenticeship program in conformity with
ORS 660.002 to 660.210 to provide occupational skill training for, at a  minimum, 24 qualified
mental health associates each biennium.
(b) In adopting any rules for carrying out  the qualified mental health associate appren-
ticeship program, the department shall consult with representatives of child-caring agencies.
(c) Child-caring agencies shall cooperate with the department  and the State Director of
Apprenticeship and Training through the applicable apprenticeship committee to  develop
training guidelines consistent with standards for qualified mental health associates.
(2) A child-caring agency may allow a person to  serve as a qualified mental health asso-
ciate designated to assist the child-caring agency if the person:
(a) Provides the child-caring agency with  documentation showing that the person has
completed an educational program for qualified mental health associates  that is accredited
[2]
HB 4011
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
by a national accreditation organization approved  by the Oregon Health Authority or the
Department of Human Services by rule;
(b) Is actively enrolled in,  or has completed, the apprenticeship program described in
subsection (1) of this section or a comparable apprenticeship program identified by the  au-
thority by rule;
(c) Provides the child-caring agency with documentation  showing that the person has
completed a training program identified by the authority by rule; and
(d) Every two years completes 16 hours of continuing education approved by the author-
ity.
(3) As used in this section, “child-caring agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS
418.205.
SECTION 4.
 The Department  of Human Services and the Bureau of Labor and Industries
may apply for and obtain gifts and grants of money from any public or  private source for the
use and benefit of the qualified mental health associate apprenticeship program described  in
section 3 of this 2022 Act and shall expend funds received in accordance with the terms  of
such gifts and grants.
SECTION 5. The Department of Human Services,  in collaboration with the Bureau of
Labor and Industries and the Oregon Health Authority, shall study issues related to  the
implementation of the qualified mental health associate apprenticeship program  described in
section 3 of this 2022 Act, including necessary  funding requirements, and shall report, in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, the results of the study to the  interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to human services, no later than September 15, 2022.
WORKFORCE DIVERSITY
SECTION 6. (1) The Child Welfare Cultural Equity Program is established within the
Department of Human Services.  The purpose of the program is to ensure access to a diverse
set of child welfare service providers  consistent with the cultural diversity needs of the
population being served.
(2) Under the program, the department may develop, or contract with nonprofit  organ-
izations to assist in the development of:
(a) Methods for determining the cultural diversity needs of the children receiving  child
welfare services from the department;
(b) Methods for incentivizing the recruitment and retention of a  diverse set of child
welfare service providers; and
(c) Best practices for connecting a child served by the  department with child welfare
service providers who meet the child’s cultural diversity needs.
(3) The department may adopt rules to  implement and carry out the provisions of this
section.
CHILD WELFARE SERVICE PROVIDER COMPENSATION
SECTION 7. (1) The Department of Human Services  shall conduct a comprehensive re-
view of child welfare service provider rate structures.
(2) The department shall submit a report to the interim committees of  the Legislative
[3]
HB 4011
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Assembly related to  human services, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, no later than
September 15, 2022. The report must include  the department’s findings from the review
conducted under subsection (1) of this section and recommendations for updates  to the rate
structures that the department determines are necessary to  promote long-term workforce
sustainability.
SECTION 8.
(1) At least once each biennium, the Oregon Health Authority  shall conduct
a nursing market study  for the purpose of determining the appropriate Medicaid reimburse-
ment rates for providers of children’s intensive in-home services.
(2) No later than July 1 of each year, the authority shall adjust the  Medicaid reimburse-
ment rates for providers of children’s intensive in-home  services, taking into consideration
the results of the most recent study conducted under subsection (1) of this section  and ap-
plying a cost-of-living adjustment, as determined on an  annual basis by the authority by rule.
(3) As used in this section, “intensive in-home services”  has the meaning given that term
in ORS 418.575.
SECTION 9.  The Oregon Health Authority shall first adjust the Medicaid  reimbursement
rates described in section  8 of this 2022 Act no later than July 1, 2023, and every July 1
thereafter.
APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 10. (1) In addition to and not in  lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the  Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount  of $250,000, for deposit in the Health Care Provider Incentive Fund
established in ORS 676.450, and which may be expended for the purpose of providing  loan
repayment subsidies to qualified mental health associates participating in the qualified  men-
tal health associate incentive program under section 1 of this 2022 Act.
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  the following amounts are
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the General Fund, for the  purpose
of establishing and administering the qualified mental health associate apprenticeship  pro-
gram as provided in sections 3 to 5 of this 2022 Act:
(a) $90,000 to the Bureau of Labor and Industries.
(b) $60,000 to the Oregon Health Authority.
(c) $90,000 to the Department of Human Services.
(3) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to the
Department of Human Services, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $250,000 for the purpose  of carrying out the provisions of section 6 of
this 2022 Act.
REPEALS
SECTION 11.
Sections 5 and 7 of this 2022 Act are repealed on January 2, 2023.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 12. The unit captions used in this 2022 Act are provided only  for the conven-
[4]
HB 4011
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2022 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 13.
This 2022 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2022
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[5]