Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Environmental Quality, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the  amount of $175,000 for the purpose of inspecting vessels and
verifying compliance with ORS 783.625 to 783.640 to minimize the risk of introducing aquatic
invasive species into the waters of this state.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4252