Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall  establish and administer a pilot pro-
gram to assist school districts in providing age-appropriate instruction on natural disasters.
(2) Instruction provided under the pilot program established by this section must:
(a) Enable students to prepare  for a natural disaster and for survival in the days and
weeks after a natural disaster; and
(b) Be specific to the natural disasters that may occur in the areas served by  the schools
participating in the pilot program, which may  include earthquakes, tsunamis, water short-
ages, floods and heavy snow.
(3) Any school district in this state may apply to  participate in the pilot program estab-
lished by this section. The department shall select no more than five  school districts to
participate in the pilot program. When selecting school  districts to participate in the pilot
program, the department shall give priority to school districts that  represent geographic and
demographic diversity.
(4) For school districts participating in the pilot program established  by this section, the
department shall:
(a) Develop curriculum that may be used by the school districts; and
(b) Provide any necessary technical assistance to the school districts.
(5) The department  shall submit a report to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to education no later than:
(a) September 15, 2024, for a preliminary report; and
(b) September 15, 2026, for a final report.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may  be expended for developing curriculum and
providing technical assistance as described in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 960
HB 2608
1
2
3
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
[2]