Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Corrections, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, which  may be expended to provide culturally specific
housing and employment reentry services to  Black adults in custody at a correctional facil-
ity, as defined in ORS 30.642.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2553