Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 320.305 is amended to read:
320.305. (1)(a) A tax  of [ 1.5] 1.8 percent is imposed on any consideration charged for the sale,
service or furnishing of transient lodging.
(b)(A) The tax must be  computed on the total retail price, including all charges other than taxes,
paid by a person for occupancy of the transient lodging.
(B) The total retail price paid by a person for occupancy of transient lodging that is part of  a
travel package may be determined by reasonable and verifiable standards from books and records
kept in the ordinary course of the transient lodging tax collector’s business.
(2) The tax imposed under this section  becomes due when the occupancy of the transient lodging
with respect to which the tax is imposed ends.
(3)(a) The tax shall be collected by  the transient lodging provider or transient lodging interme-
diary that collects the consideration charged for occupancy of  the transient lodging, or a transient
lodging intermediary described in ORS 320.300 (12)(c), as applicable.
(b) The transient lodging tax collector may withhold a collection reimbursement charge  of five
percent of the amount collected under this subsection.
(4) The tax imposed  under this section is in addition to and not in lieu of any local transient
lodging tax.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 320.305 by section 1 of this 2021 Act  apply to con-
sideration charged on or after July 1,  2022, for the sale, service or furnishing of transient
lodging.
SECTION 3.  ORS 320.335 is amended to read:
320.335. All moneys received by the Department of Revenue pursuant to ORS 320.305 to 320.340,
and interest [ thereon] on the moneys , shall be paid  to the State Treasurer to be held in a suspense
account established under ORS 293.445. After the payment of refunds:
(1) Moneys  necessary to reimburse the Department of Revenue for the actual costs incurred by
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3013
HB 2579
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the department in administering the state transient lodging tax,  not to exceed two percent of state
transient lodging tax collections, are continuously appropriated to the department . [ ; and ]
(2) Moneys received from the state transient lodging tax imposed under ORS  320.305 at
a rate in excess of 1.5 percent shall be transferred to the tax  collector of each county in
which the state transient lodging taxes were collected, in proportion  to the percentage of the
total state transient lodging tax revenues collected in  the county for the reporting period.
The tax collector shall deposit  the transferred moneys in the county general fund. The
moneys shall be used exclusively for purposes of addressing  affordable housing in the county.
[(2)] (3) The balance of the moneys received shall be transferred to the account of the Oregon
Tourism Commission established under ORS 284.131. The moneys transferred under  this subsection
are continuously appropriated to the  Oregon Tourism Commission for the purposes set forth in ORS
284.131.
SECTION 4.
The amendments  to ORS 320.335 by section 3 of this 2021 Act apply to
amounts of state transient lodging taxes imposed under ORS 320.305 that are received by the
Department of Revenue on or after July 1, 2022.
SECTION 5.
 Section 3, chapter 600, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) Notwithstanding ORS 320.335, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, in order to
fund the actual start-up costs incurred  by the Department of Revenue in collecting local transient
lodging taxes in the manner described in section 2 of this 2019 Act [320.365], the department shall
withhold state transient lodging tax moneys that would otherwise be transferred  to the Oregon
Tourism Commission under ORS 320.335 [ (2)] (3) in an amount not to exceed $900,000.
(2)(a) In order to  reimburse the commission for the moneys withheld under subsection (1) of this
section, plus two percent interest per annum, the department shall transfer  to the commission, in
addition to  the transfers required under ORS 320.335 [ (2)] (3), the amount of state and local transient
lodging tax moneys received by the department that would have been withheld  by transient lodging
intermediaries as a collection reimbursement charge  under ORS 320.305 (3)(b) and 320.345 but for
the disallowance of such charges under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) Notwithstanding  ORS 320.305 (3)(b) and 320.345, a transient lodging intermediary may not
withhold any amount of state or local transient lodging taxes reported to the department as  a col-
lection reimbursement charge until the date specified in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Beginning on the day immediately following the date on which the  department has withheld
the lesser of the actual  start-up costs described in subsection (1) of this section or $900,000, the
department shall cease withholding moneys in the manner described in  subsection (1) of this section.
(4) Beginning on the day immediately following the date on which the  department has trans-
ferred to the commission the  total amount of the reimbursement required under subsection (2)(a) of
this section,  transient lodging intermediaries may resume withholding collection reimbursement
charges from state and local transient lodging  taxes reported to the department as provided in ORS
320.305 (3)(b) and 320.345.
(5)(a) The department shall refund, without interest, any amounts  of state and local transient
lodging taxes received from  transient lodging intermediaries pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this
section that exceed the total  amount of the reimbursement required under subsection (2)(a) of this
section.
(b) The refunds required by paragraph  (a) of this subsection shall be made in fair and propor-
tionate amounts to transient lodging  intermediaries that would have withheld amounts of state and
local transient lodging taxes as a collection reimbursement charge but for the disallowance of  such
[2]
HB 2579
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
charges under subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(c) The department may prescribe the method  for making any determination required under this
subsection.
(6) As used in this section, “collection reimbursement charge,”  “local transient lodging tax,”
“state transient lodging tax” and “transient lodging intermediary” have the  meanings given those
terms in ORS 320.300.
SECTION 6.
This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]