Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 247.016 is amended to read:
247.016. (1) Subject  to this section, an otherwise qualified person who is at least 17 years of age
may register to vote.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,  a person who  registers to vote under
subsection (1) of  this section may not vote in an election until the person attains the age of 18 years.
(3) A person who registers to vote  under subsection (1) of this section not later than 21
days before the date of the primary election and who will attain the age of 18 years after the
primary election but on or before the date of the general election may:
(a) Adopt a major political party affiliation; and
(b) Vote at the primary election for candidates  of the major political party with which
the person is affiliated.
[(3)] (4)  If a person who registers to vote under subsection (1) of this section will  be under 18
years of age on the date of the next election held  on a date listed in ORS 171.185 or the next special
election, the person’s voter registration  information, including but not limited to the person’s name
and any identifying information, may not  be disclosed as a public record under ORS 192.410 to
192.505.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 254.115 is amended to read:
254.115. (1) The official primary  election ballot shall be styled “Official Primary Nominating
Ballot for the  Party.” and shall state:
(a) The name of the county for which it is intended.
(b) The date of the primary election.
(c) The names  of all candidates for nomination at the primary election whose nominating pe-
titions or declarations of candidacy have been made and filed, and who have not died, withdrawn
or become disqualified.
(d) The names of candidates for election as precinct committeeperson.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3244
HB 2928
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) The names of candidates for  the party nomination for President of the United States who
qualified for the ballot under ORS 249.078.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,  the primary election ballot  may in-
clude any city, county or nonpartisan office or the number, ballot  title and financial estimates under
ORS 250.125 of any measure.
(3) The primary  election ballot provided pursuant to ORS 247.016 to a person who is under
18 years old shall be limited  to stating the information set forth in subsection (1) of this
section.
[(3)] (4) The ballot may not contain the name of any  person other than those referred to in
subsections (1) [ and (2) ] to (3)  of this section. The name of each candidate for whom a nominating
petition or declaration of candidacy  has been filed shall be printed on the ballot in but one place.
In the event that two or more candidates for the same  nomination or office have the same or similar
surnames, the location of their places  of residence shall be printed with their names to distinguish
one from another.
SECTION 3.  ORS 253.540 is amended to read:
253.540. (1) Any military or overseas elector may secure a  ballot by submitting an application
as specified in subsection (2) of this section to the clerk of  the county of the military or overseas
elector’s residence, or to the Secretary of State. If the application is  addressed to the Secretary of
State, the secretary shall forward it to the appropriate county clerk.
(2) An application for a ballot by a military or overseas  elector shall be made in the form of a
written request. The application shall be valid for every  subsequent election until the elector oth-
erwise notifies the clerk  or is no longer an elector of the county. The application shall be signed
by the applicant and contain:
(a) The name and current mailing address of the applicant;
(b) A statement that the applicant is a citizen of the United States;
(c) A statement  that the applicant will be 18 years of age or older on the date of the general
election;
(d) A  statement that for more than 20 days preceding the election the applicant’s home residence
has been in this state, and giving the address of the last home residence;
(e) A statement of the facts that qualify the applicant as a military  or overseas elector or as the
spouse or a dependent of a military or overseas elector;
(f) A statement that the applicant is not requesting a ballot from any other state and is  not
voting in any other manner in the election except by the requested ballot; and
(g) If the applicant desires to vote in a primary election, a designation of the applicant’s political
party affiliation or a statement that  the applicant is not affiliated with any political party. An ap-
plicant not affiliated with any political party may request a ballot for a major political  party. The
applicant shall be sent  the ballot for the political party that the applicant requested if that political
party has provided  under ORS 254.365 for a primary election that admits electors not affiliated with
any political party.
(3) The  primary election ballot provided to a military or overseas elector under this sec-
tion who is under 18 years of age shall be limited to stating the information set forth in  ORS
254.115 (1).
SECTION 4.
 ORS 253.565 is amended to read:
253.565. (1) Any military or overseas elector may secure a  special ballot for a primary election
or general election by making an application under this section if the elector believes that:
[2]
HB 2928
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The elector will be residing, stationed  or working outside the territorial limits of the United
States and the District of Columbia; and
(b) The elector will be unable to vote and return a  regular ballot by normal mail delivery within
the period provided for regular absent electors.
(2) A military or overseas elector shall make  the application for a special ballot in the form of
a written  request. The elector shall submit the application before the date of the applicable election
to the clerk  of the county of the military or overseas elector’s residence or to the Secretary of State.
If the application is addressed to the Secretary of State, the secretary shall forward it to  the ap-
propriate county clerk. The application shall be signed by the applicant and contain:
(a) The name and current mailing address of the applicant;
(b) A designation of the election for which the applicant requests a special ballot;
(c) A statement that the applicant is a citizen of the United States;
(d) A  statement that the applicant will be 18 years of age or older on the date of the general
election;
(e) A statement  that for more than 20 days preceding the election the applicant’s home residence
has been in this state, and giving the address of the last home residence;
(f) A statement of the facts that qualify the applicant as a military or overseas elector or as the
spouse or a dependent of a military or overseas elector;
(g) A statement of the facts that qualify the applicant to vote by means of a special ballot;
(h) A statement that the applicant is not  requesting a ballot from any other state and is not
voting in any other manner in the election except by the requested special ballot; and
(i) If the applicant requests a ballot for a primary election, a designation of the applicant’s pol-
itical party affiliation or a statement that the applicant is not affiliated with any  political party.
An applicant not affiliated with any political party may request a ballot for a  major political party.
The applicant shall be sent the ballot for the political party that the applicant  requested if that
political party has provided under ORS 254.365 for a primary election that  admits electors not af-
filiated with any political party.
(3) An application for a special ballot shall be valid only for the election specified  in the appli-
cation.
(4) The county clerk shall list on the special  ballot the offices and measures scheduled to appear
on the regular ballot, if known when the ballot is prepared, and provide space in which the elector
may write in the elector’s preference.
(5) The  primary election ballot provided to a military or overseas elector under this sec-
tion who is under 18 years of age shall be limited to stating the information set forth in  ORS
254.115 (1).
[(5)] (6) The elector may write in the name of any eligible candidate for each office to  be filled
or for which nominations will be made at the election, and , except as  provided in subsection (5)
of this section, may vote on any measure submitted at the election.
SECTION 5.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Secretary of State, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the  General
Fund, the amount of $_____, to be allocated to county clerks for the purpose of  carrying out
the amendments to ORS 247.016 and 254.115 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 6. The amendments to ORS 247.016,  253.540, 253.565 and 254.115 by sections 1
to 4 of this 2017 Act apply to primary elections held on or after the  effective date of this 2017
Act.
[3]
HB 2928
1
2
3
4
SECTION 7. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]