Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission shall, in  collaboration with the
Oregon Health Authority, develop statewide polices and practices to support:
(a) Appropriate screening for substance  use disorders in physical health care settings,
including emergency departments, community behavioral health settings and primary  care
settings;
(b) Increased and consistent availability of medications for opioid  use disorder in physical
health care settings, including emergency departments, community  behavioral health set-
tings and primary care settings; and
(c) A transition to care in  the community for individuals with substance use disorders
who are discharging from an acute care setting.
(2) The statewide policies  and practices developed under this section must include stan-
dards of care for individuals with substance use disorders  that are similar to standards of
care for individuals with other health conditions, including standards for:
(a) Providing referrals to follow-up care, including the time frames within which an ini-
tial referral must be made and the availability of follow-up  services to which an individual
is referred;
(b) Screening and appropriate referrals for the treatment of substance  use disorders in
emergency departments;
(c) Providing access to medications for opioid use disorder including opioid  overdose re-
versal medications and  medications for substance use disorder management, if medically in-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3392
HB 2506
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
dicated; and
(d) Treating individuals under 18 years of age who have  substance use disorders with
medications for opioid use disorder.
(3) The commission shall offer training  and technical assistance to each hospital system
in this state to ensure that each hospital system is fully integrated  into the treatment
continuum for substance use disorders. The training and technical assistance must  include,
but is not limited to, the following topics:
(a) Knowledge and availability of referrals to substance use disorder treatment;
(b) Prescribing practices and policies regarding medications for opioid use disorder; and
(c) Provider attitudes toward  medications for opioid use disorder and substance use dis-
order treatment.
(4) No later than September 30, 2026, the commission shall report to  the interim com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related to health, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245,
on the development of statewide policies and practices under this section and shall identify:
(a) Regional needs related to substance use disorder treatment;
(b) Any barriers to accessing medications for opioid use disorder; and
(c) Recommendations for supporting access to medications for opioid use disorder.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Alcohol and Drug  Policy Commission shall assess current programs
and funding that may support patient referrals from emergency departments to low-barrier
community substance use disorder clinics.
(2) No later than September 30, 2026, the commission shall report to  the interim com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related to health, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245,
regarding recommendations to align current programs and funding to support  patient refer-
rals from emergency departments to low-barrier community substance use disorder clinics.
SECTION 3.
(1) As used in this section,  “medical assistance” has the meaning given that
term in ORS 414.025.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall:
(a)(A) Develop an enhanced  funding model to allow low-barrier community substance use
disorder clinics to accept referrals from emergency departments and emergency medical
services providers and to treat referred individuals with medications for opioid use  disorder.
(B) The enhanced funding model developed under this section  must promote short-term
and long-term prescribing of medications for opioid use disorder by  increasing reimburse-
ment rates in the medical assistance program and creating other incentives for  low-barrier
community substance use disorder clinics  that prescribe medications for opioid use disorder.
(b) Adopt rules to  prescribe the functions of low-barrier community substance use dis-
order clinics.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 413.022 is amended to read:
413.022. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Downstream health outcome and quality measures” means:
(A) The sets of core quality measures for the Medicaid program that are  published by the Cen-
ters for Medicare and Medicaid Services in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1320b-9a and 1320b-9b; and
(B) If the  sets of core quality measures for adults published by the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services do not include quality measures for oral health care for adults,  quality measures
of oral health care for adults adopted by the metrics and scoring subcommittee.
(b) “Upstream health outcome and quality measures” means quality measures that  focus on the
[2]
HB 2506
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
social determinants of health.
(2) There is created in the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee a nine-member metrics and
scoring subcommittee appointed by the Director of the Oregon Health Authority. The members  of
the subcommittee serve two-year terms and must include:
(a) Three members at large;
(b) Three individuals with expertise in health outcomes measures; and
(c) Three representatives of coordinated care organizations.
(3) The subcommittee shall use a  public process in accordance with ORS 192.610 to 192.705 that
includes an opportunity for public comment to  select the downstream health outcome and quality
measures and a minimum of four upstream health outcome and quality  measures applicable to ser-
vices provided by coordinated care organizations , including health outcome and quality meas-
ures related to:
(a) Treatment provided following an opioid overdose;
(b) Timely and accurate referrals to follow-up care for opioid use disorder; and
(c) The utilization of medications for opioid use disorder when medically indicated .
(4) The Oregon  Health Authority shall incorporate these measures into coordinated care or-
ganization contracts to hold the organizations accountable for performance and customer satisfac-
tion requirements. The authority shall notify each coordinated care  organization of any changes in
the measures at least three months before the  beginning of the contract period during which the
new measures will be in place.
(5) The subcommittee shall update the health outcome and quality measures  annually, if neces-
sary, to conform to  the latest sets of core quality measures published by the Centers for Medicare
and Medicaid Services.
(6) All health outcome and quality measures must be consistent with the:
(a) Terms and conditions of the demonstration project approved for this state by the Centers  for
Medicare and Medicaid Services under 42 U.S.C. 1315; and
(b) Written quality strategies approved by the Centers for  Medicare and Medicaid Services un-
der 42 C.F.R. 438.340 and 457.1240.
(7) The authority and the Oregon Health Policy Board shall evaluate on  a regular and ongoing
basis the outcome and quality measures selected by the  subcommittee under this section for mem-
bers in each coordinated care organization and for members statewide.
(8) Members of the subcommittee who are not members  of the Oregon Health Policy Board may
receive compensation and the reimbursement of actual and  necessary travel and other expenses in-
curred by them in the performance of their official  duties in accordance with criteria adopted by the
authority by rule and shall be reimbursed from funds available to the authority  in the manner and
amount provided in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 430.223 is amended to read:
430.223. (1) For purposes of this section, “program” means a state, local or tribal alcohol and
drug abuse prevention and treatment program.
(2) The Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission established under ORS 430.221 shall :
(a) Develop a comprehensive addiction, prevention, treatment and recovery plan for this state.
The plan must include, but is not limited to, recommendations regarding:
[(a)] (A) Capacity, type and utilization of programs;
[(b)] (B) Methods to assess the effectiveness and performance of programs;
[(c)] (C) The best use of existing programs;
[3]
HB 2506
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
[(d)] (D) Budget policy priorities for participating state agencies;
[(e)] (E) Standards for licensing programs;
[(f)] (F) Minimum standards for contracting for, providing and  coordinating alcohol and drug
abuse prevention and treatment services among programs that use federal, private or  state funds
administered by the state; and
[(g)] (G) The most effective and efficient use of participating  state agency resources to support
programs.
(b) Conduct outreach to increase prevailing knowledge  of evidence-based substance use
disorder treatment practices and the availability of training supports.
(3) All participating state agencies shall:
(a) Meet with the commission on a quarterly basis to review and  report on each agency’s
progress on implementing the plan; and
(b) Report to the commission, in the manner  prescribed by the commission, each agency’s pro-
cess and outcome measures established under the plan.
(4) The commission shall review and update the  plan no later than July 1 of each even-numbered
year and shall produce and publish  a report on the metrics and other indicators of progress in
achieving the goals of the plan.
(5) The commission may:
(a) Conduct studies related to the duties of the commission in collaboration  with other state
agencies;
(b) Apply for and receive gifts and grants for public and private sources; and
(c) Use funds received by the commission to carry out the purposes of ORS 430.220  and 430.221
and this section.
(6) All participating state agencies and local agencies shall assist the commission  in developing
the comprehensive addiction, prevention, treatment and recovery plan.  Any state agency  that
conducts or commissions  a study related to the prevention of substance use or the treatment
of substance use disorders shall provide the commission with the proposed study  and study
findings in a timely manner or as requested by the commission.
(7) The commission may adopt rules to carry out its duties under this section.
SECTION 6.
ORS 430.590 is repealed.
SECTION 7.  ORS 90.113 is amended to read:
90.113. Residence in a licensed program, facility or home described  in ORS 430.306 to 430.375,
430.380, 430.381, 430.397 to 430.401, 430.405 to 430.565, 430.570, [ 430.590,] 430.709, 443.400 to 443.455,
443.705 to 443.825 or 443.835 is not governed by this chapter.
SECTION 8. The repeal of ORS 430.590 by section  6 of this 2025 Act does not relieve a
person of any obligation accruing under ORS 430.590 prior to the effective date of the  repeal
of ORS 430.590 by section 6 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 9. Sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 10. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]