Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the  State Parks and Recreation Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, to continue to  develop the Oregon Coast
Trail.
SECTION 2. Each biennium, the State  Parks and Recreation Department shall allocate,
for bicycle and  pedestrian transportation projects to meet recreation and transportation
needs, up to $1,000,000 of lottery revenues  designated for outdoor recreation improvement
projects, to develop, maintain or work toward completion of the Oregon Coast Trail.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1871