Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $286,888 for the Senior Farm
Direct Nutrition Program.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $1,227,421 for the Women, In-
fants and Children Farm Direct Nutrition Program.
SECTION 3. In each biennium, the Oregon Health Authority  shall, in its agency request
budget filed under ORS 291.208, request  appropriations to fund the Senior Farm Direct Nu-
trition Program and the Women, Infants and Children Farm Direct Nutrition Program in at
least the amounts of the appropriations made by sections 1 and 2 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 4.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3795