Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A  county is exempt from the applicability of the provisions of ORS 498.164
related to cougars if a county measure is approved that exempts  the county from the appli-
cability of  the provisions of ORS 498.164 related to cougars. The measure may be proposed
by initiative petition, or referred to the people by the governing  body of the county, at an
election held on a date specified in ORS 203.085 (1).
(2) A county that is exempt  from the applicability of the provisions of ORS 498.164 related
to cougars pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall notify the State Department of
Fish and Wildlife.
(3) The exemption of a county under this section does not  otherwise affect the authority
of the State Fish and Wildlife  Commission to manage cougars in the county under the
wildlife laws.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1230