Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Housing and Community Services Department, in consultation with the
Criminal Justice Division of the Department of Justice, shall study issues related  to tenants
who are victims of  crimes, including issues involving tenants facing domestic violence, sexual
assault or stalking and ORS 90.445,  90.449, 90.453, 90.456, 90.459 and 105.128, and shall present
the results of the study, including any recommendations  for legislation, in a report to an
appropriate committee or  interim committee of the Legislative Assembly in the manner
provided under ORS 192.245 on or before September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on December 31, 2022.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1312