Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to  the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $7,000,000, for purposes of eliminating
the backlog of sex offenders who have not yet been assessed and placed into a risk level using
the risk assessment methodology described in ORS 163A.100.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4817