Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 250.137 to
250.149.
SECTION 2. (1) The Citizens’ Initiative Review Commission Endowment Fund is  estab-
lished in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. The Operating
Subaccount is created as a subaccount of the Citizens’ Initiative Review  Commission
Endowment Fund. Interest earned by either the fund or  the subaccount shall be credited to
the subaccount.
(2) Moneys  in the subaccount are continuously appropriated to the Citizens’ Initiative
Review Commission for carrying  out the duties, functions and powers of the commission
pursuant to ORS 250.137 to 250.149. The commission may not expend moneys in  the fund that
are not in the subaccount.
(3) The commission may accept contributions of moneys and assistance to the fund and
the subaccount from the United States Government or its agencies or from any other source,
public or private, and may agree to conditions placed on the moneys not  inconsistent with
the duties of the commission.
(4) The fund and the subaccount may not receive contributions of moneys  or assistance
from any entity described in ORS 250.147 (2).
(5) If a  person contributes to the commission an aggregate total of more than $100 in a
calendar year, not later than 14 calendar days after the commission receives the contribu-
tion, the commission shall make available to the public on the Internet:
(a) The name and address of the person who made the contribution; and
(b) The amount of the contribution.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 250.149 is amended to read:
250.149. (1) Not  later than the date that is four months before the date of the general election
in an even-numbered year, the Citizens’ Initiative Review Commission  shall determine whether
moneys in sufficient amount are available  in the Operating Subaccount established in section 2
of this 2019  Act and the account established under ORS 182.470 to carry out all the duties, func-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3419
SB 755
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
tions and powers of the  commission, implement ORS 250.139 to 250.143 and pay for any statements
to be printed in the voters’ pamphlet under ORS 251.185.
(2)(a) If the commission determines that the subaccount and the  account [ has] have sufficient
moneys under subsection (1) of this section, the commission shall carry out all the  duties, functions
and powers of the commission, implement ORS  250.139 to 250.143 and may submit statements to be
printed in the voters’ pamphlet under ORS 251.185.
(b) If  the commission determines that the subaccount and the  account [ has] have  insufficient
moneys under subsection (1) of this section, for the general election in that even-numbered year,  the
commission may not  carry out all the duties, functions and powers of the commission, implement
ORS 250.139 to 250.143 or submit statements to be printed  in the voters’ pamphlet under ORS
251.185.
[2]