Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 4 of this 2019 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
342.
SECTION 2. (1) The Department of Education shall use the moneys  in the Next Gener-
ation Educator Recruitment and Development Account  established under section 4 of this
2019 Act for the purpose of developing and diversifying the education workforce  for
prekindergarten through grade 12.
(2) The department shall use moneys in the account as follows:
(a) To distribute  grants to school districts, education service districts or any combination
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3472
HB 2742
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of school districts and education service districts  as provided by section 3 of this 2019 Act.
Grants distributed under section 3 of this  2019 Act shall be based on the number of partic-
ipants in a program that is funded as provided by section 3 of this 2019 Act and  may not
exceed $5,000 per participant.
(b) To distribute planning grants to potential applicants for a grant described  in section
3 of this  2019 Act. Planning grants distributed under this paragraph may not exceed $25,000
per recipient. If more requests  for a planning grant are submitted than moneys are available,
priority shall be given to requests that will be used to  establish a new partnership with an
early childhood education program, a public or private post-secondary institution of  educa-
tion, a  community-based organization or a nonprofit organization for the purpose of a grant
distributed under section 3 of this 2019 Act.
(c) To distribute grants for programs in middle  or high schools that encourage students
who are interested in a career  in education. Grants distributed under this section may not
exceed $500 per participating student  per biennium and may not be used for any college
credit courses.
(d) To pay for administrative expenses incurred  by the Department of Education, the
Teacher Standards and Practices Commission and the Educator Advancement Council.  Pay-
ments for administrative expenses shall comply with rules adopted by the State Board of
Education.
(3) For the purpose of distributing grants under subsection (2)(a) to  (c) of this section
and coordinating implementation of the grants programs with the Educator Advancement
Council, the  department shall convene an advisory group that meets at least once each
quarter. The advisory group shall consist of 13 members who represent the following:
(a) The Educator Advancement Council;
(b) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission;
(c) A public post-secondary institution of education;
(d) The State Advisory Council for Special Education;
(e) The Department of Education;
(f) A community-based, culturally specific African-American organization;
(g) A community-based, culturally specific Latino organization;
(h) A community-based, culturally specific Asian and Pacific Islander organization;
(i) A federally recognized tribe in this state;
(j) Public education employees, including teachers;
(k) School administrators;
(L) School districts or education service districts that sponsor a program to recruit po-
tential educators from the  community to join the profession and be an educator in the
community; and
(m) Students enrolled in a program to recruit potential educators from the community
to join the profession and be an educator in the community.
(4) The State Board of Education shall adopt  any rules necessary for the administration
of this section and section 3 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) For  the purpose of developing and diversifying the education workforce
for prekindergarten through grade 12, the Department of Education shall distribute grants
from the Next Generation Educator Recruitment and Development  Account established un-
der section 4 of this 2019  Act to school districts, education service districts or any combi-
[2]
HB 2742
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
nation of school districts and education service districts.
(2) A school district, education service district  or combination of school districts and
education service districts must use moneys  received under this section to fund a program
that recruits potential educators to  join the profession and be an educator in the community.
(3) A recipient of a grant distributed under  this section is encouraged to form and build
partnerships with early childhood education  programs, public and private post-secondary in-
stitutions of education, community-based organizations and nonprofit organizations.
(4) To  receive a distribution under this section, the school district, education service
district or combination of school districts and education service districts must  submit an
application on the form and within the timelines prescribed by  the department. An applica-
tion must demonstrate that:
(a) The applicant is able to match every $3 of the grant amount with  $1 of local matching
funding, which may  include moneys or the cost of staff salary and benefits, management
services, tuition, scholarships, fellowships, books, academic  supplies, travel stipends, tech-
nology stipends, paid internships, loan forgiveness, paid practicums,  paid residencies, men-
toring programs or professional development; and
(b) The program to be funded with the grant moneys has the following elements:
(A) Intentionally recruits racially and linguistically diverse candidates to be educators;
(B) Ensures that all participants in the program receive at  least two years of culturally
responsive mentoring;
(C) Provides all participants in the program with  cultural competency training and
training to prepare the participants to meet the social and emotional  learning needs of stu-
dents;
(D) Ensures that all academic credits earned through the program at  a post-secondary
institution of education are  transferable between all post-secondary institutions of education
participating in the program;
(E) Ensures that the hiring  practices in each participating consortium focus on training
to recruit a diverse workforce, including training to overcome biases; and
(F) Requires participants in  the program to agree to work in a sponsoring school district
for at least two years.
(5) If more applicants apply for a grant under this section than moneys are available  for
the grant, priority shall be given  to applicants that will use grant moneys to fund a program
that has the following elements:
(a) Develops recruitment and retention partnerships with community  organizations or
federally recognized tribes and provides a comprehensive retention plan that includes  com-
munity outreach;
(b) Creates a plan to develop and engage mentors for all participants in the program  be-
yond the first two years;
(c) Exposes all participants  in the program to training that is culturally relevant for this
state and that specifically includes Oregon’s  ethnic studies requirements, including plans for
students who are black or African-American, English language learner or  American Indian
or Alaskan Native;
(d) Provides expanded or universal transferability of all academic credit  earned through
the program at a post-secondary institution  of education to other post-secondary institutions
of education in this state;
[3]
HB 2742
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) Demonstrates progress toward the development of a workforce that  is reflective of
the students that the workforce serves; and
(f) Requires participants in the program to agree to work in a sponsoring school  district
for at least four years.
(6) A school district, education service district  or combination of school districts and
education service districts that receives distributions  of moneys under this section may use
the moneys for:
(a) Expenses incurred in providing a program described in  this section, including staff
salary and benefits, management services, tuition, scholarships, fellowships, books,  academic
supplies, travel  stipends, technology stipends, paid internships, loan forgiveness, paid
practicums, paid residencies, mentoring programs and professional development.
(b) Stipends for participants in a  program described in this section for a maximum of
$5,000 from the account per participant per  school year or academic year and a maximum
of four school or academic years.  Participants must be enrolled at a public high school,
community college, undergraduate program or  graduate program and must be pursuing or
intending to pursue a career as a prekindergarten  educator or as a licensed kindergarten
through grade 12 educator in a field identified by the Teacher Standards and  Practices
Commission by rule.  If the participant is enrolled in a post-secondary institution of educa-
tion, the participant must demonstrate that the participant has used all available  financial
aid sources before receiving any moneys under  this paragraph. Nothing in this paragraph
limits the amount of local matching funding that may be used for a stipend.
(7) A school district, education service district  or combination of school districts and
education service districts that receives a distribution  of moneys under this section must
provide annual reports to the department regarding:
(a) The demographics of the participants in the program;
(b) The retention rates of participants in the program as compared  to other school dis-
trict or education service district educators;
(c) The average length of employment  in a sponsoring school district or education service
district for a person who participated in a program described in this section; and
(d) Progress  toward diversification of the education workforce as a result of the program.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Next Generation Educator Recruitment and Development  Account
is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the Department of Education
for the purpose of section 2 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 5. For the 2019-2021 biennium only, moneys in the Next Generation Educator
Recruitment and Development Account established under section 4 of this  2019 Act shall be
used as follows:
(1) No more than $15,000,000 of the account shall be used  for grants to school districts,
education service districts or any combination of school districts and education service dis-
tricts as provided by section 3 of this 2019 Act;
(2) No more than $500,000 of the account shall be used for  planning grants as described
in section 2 (2)(b) of this 2019 Act;
(3) No more than $250,000 of the  account shall be used for programs in middle or high
schools as described in section 2 (2)(c) of this 2019 Act;
(4) No more than  $350,000 of the account shall be used for administrative expenses in-
[4]
HB 2742
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
curred by the Department of Education as described in section 2 (2)(d) of this 2019 Act;
(5) No more than $300,000 of the account shall be used for  administrative expenses in-
curred by the  Teacher Standards and Practices Commission to support local efforts and re-
duce licensing barriers as described in section 2 (2)(d) of this 2019 Act; and
(6) No more than $300,000 of the account shall be used for  administrative expenses in-
curred by the Educator Advancement Council to support  local efforts and coordinate related
work as described in section 2 (2)(d) of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 6. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund,  the amount of $16,700,000, which shall be deposited into the Next Generation
Educator Recruitment and Development Account established under section 4 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 7. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
[5]