Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of  this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 183.
SECTION 2. The Secretary of State shall maintain an online  Oregon Rulemaking Infor-
mation System. The system must allow the public to search for and view:
(1) All current rules, and all rules proposed for adoption,  amendment or repeal, cataloged
separately;
(2) Previous versions of all rules that were in effect in the previous year;
(3) Information about meetings  and hearings related to rules, including hearings held
under ORS 183.335 (3);
(4) Minutes of advisory committees appointed under ORS 183.333;
(5) Statements of fiscal impact and economic impact required under ORS 183.335 (2)(b)(E);
(6) Summaries of rules and proposed rules prepared by an agency; and
(7) Frequently asked questions documents about rules prepared by an agency.
SECTION 3.
(1) An  agency shall make all statutes, rules, internal interpretations of
statutes and rules, internal management guidance, tips, explanations and  other resources
relevant to the regulatory authority  of the agency easily accessible online to persons subject
to the rules of the agency.
(2) If an agency  makes accessible documents that reference or link to other documents
under subsection (1) of this section, the agency must make  the referenced or linked docu-
ments accessible online.
(3) An agency shall make accessible  online frequently asked questions documents about
the regulatory activities of the agency and update the documents regularly.
(4) For each regulatory program implemented by an agency, the agency  shall post online
contact information for agency staff who can assist persons subject to the rules of the
agency with compliance with the regulatory program.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1512
HB 3382
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 4.
 ORS 183.341 is amended to read:
183.341. (1) The Attorney General shall prepare model rules of procedure appropriate  for use
by as many agencies as possible. Except as provided in ORS 183.630,  any agency may adopt all or
part of  the model rules by reference without complying with the rulemaking procedures under ORS
183.335. Notice of such adoption shall be filed with the Secretary  of State in the manner provided
by ORS 183.355 for the  filing of rules. The model rules may be amended from time to time by an
adopting agency or the Attorney General after notice and opportunity  for hearing as required by
rulemaking procedures under this chapter.
(2) Except as provided in ORS 183.630, all agencies shall  adopt rules of procedure to be utilized
in the adoption of  rules and conduct of proceedings in contested cases or, if exempt from the con-
tested case provisions of this chapter, for the conduct of proceedings.
(3) The Secretary of State shall publish in the Oregon Administrative Rules:
(a) The Attorney General’s model rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section;
(b) The procedural rules of all agencies that have not adopted the  Attorney General’s model
rules; and
(c) The notice procedures required by ORS 183.335 (1).
(4) Agencies shall adopt rules of procedure which will provide a reasonable  opportunity for in-
terested persons to be notified of the agency’s intention to adopt, amend or repeal a rule.  The rules
must require the agency to post all information regarding the agency’s  intention to adopt,
amend or repeal a rule on an agency website that allows  the public to search notices by date,
subject, regulatory program, statute and keywords.
(5) No rule adopted after September 13, 1975, is valid unless  adopted in substantial compliance
with the rules adopted pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 183.335 is amended to read:
183.335. (1) Prior  to the adoption, amendment or repeal of any rule, the agency shall give notice
of its intended action:
(a) In the manner established by rule adopted by the  agency under ORS 183.341 (4), which pro-
vides a reasonable opportunity for interested  persons to be notified of the agency’s proposed action;
(b) In the bulletin referred to in ORS 183.360 at least 21 days prior to the effective date;
(c) At least 28 days before the effective date, to  persons who have requested notice pursuant to
subsection (8) of this section; and
(d) Delivered only by electronic mail, at least 49 days before the effective date, to the  persons
specified in subsection (15) of this section.
(2)(a) The notice required by subsection (1) of this section must include:
(A) A caption of not more than 15  words that reasonably identifies the subject matter of the
agency’s intended action. The agency shall include the caption on each separate  notice, statement,
certificate or other similar document related to the intended action.
(B) An objective, simple and understandable statement summarizing the subject  matter and
purpose of the intended action in sufficient detail to inform a person that the person’s interests may
be affected, and the time, place and manner  in which interested persons may present their views on
the intended action.
(b) The agency shall include with the notice  of intended action given under subsection (1) of this
section:
(A) A citation of the statutory or  other legal authority relied upon and bearing upon the
promulgation of the rule;
[2]
HB 3382
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) A citation of the statute or other law the rule is intended to implement;
(C) A statement of the need for the rule and a statement of how the  rule is intended to meet the
need;
(D) A list of the principal documents, reports or studies, if any, prepared by or relied upon  by
the agency in considering the need for and in preparing the rule, and a  statement of the location
at which those documents are available for public inspection. The  list may be abbreviated if neces-
sary, and if so abbreviated there shall be identified the location of a complete list;
(E) A statement of fiscal impact identifying  state agencies, units of local government and the
public that may  be economically affected by the adoption, amendment or repeal of the rule and an
estimate of that economic impact on state agencies, units of local government and the public.  In
considering the economic effect of the proposed action on the public, the agency  shall utilize avail-
able information to project  any significant economic effect of that action on businesses which shall
include a cost of compliance effect on small businesses affected. For an agency specified in  ORS
183.530, the statement of fiscal impact shall also include  a housing cost impact statement as de-
scribed in ORS 183.534;
(F) A statement identifying how adoption of the rule will affect racial equity in this state;
(G) If an advisory committee is  not appointed under the provisions of ORS 183.333, an explana-
tion as to why no advisory committee was used to assist the agency in drafting the rule; and
(H) A request for public comment on whether  other options should be considered for achieving
the rule’s substantive goals while reducing the negative economic impact of the rule on business.
(c) The Secretary of State may omit the information  submitted under paragraph (b) of this sub-
section from publication in the bulletin referred to in ORS 183.360.
(d) When providing notice of an intended action under subsection (1)(c) of this  section, the
agency shall provide a copy of the rule that the agency proposes to adopt, amend or repeal,  or an
explanation of how the person may acquire a copy of the  rule. The copy of an amended rule shall
show all changes to the  rule by striking through material to be deleted and underlining all new
material, or by any other method that clearly shows all new and deleted material.
(3)(a) When an agency proposes to adopt, amend  or repeal a rule, it shall give interested persons
reasonable opportunity to submit data or views. Opportunity for oral hearing shall  be granted upon
request received from 10 persons or from an association having not less than 10 members before  the
earliest  date  that the rule could become effective after the giving of notice pursuant to subsection
(1) of  this section. An agency holding a hearing upon a request made under this subsection shall give
notice of the hearing at least 21 days before the hearing to the person  who has requested the
hearing, to persons who have requested notice pursuant to subsection (8) of this section  and to the
persons specified in subsection (15) of this section. The agency  shall publish notice of the hearing
in the bulletin referred to in ORS 183.360 at least  14 days before the hearing. The agency shall
consider fully any written or oral submission.
(b) If an agency is required to conduct an oral hearing under paragraph (a) of this subsection,
and the rule for which the hearing  is to be conducted applies only to a limited geographical area
within this state, or affects only a limited geographical area  within this state, the hearing shall be
conducted  within  the geographical area at the place most convenient for the majority of the resi-
dents within the geographical area. At least  14 days before a hearing conducted under this para-
graph, the agency shall publish notice of the hearing in the bulletin referred to in  ORS 183.360 and
in a newspaper of general circulation published within  the geographical area that is affected by the
rule or to which the rule applies.  If a newspaper of general circulation is not published within the
[3]
HB 3382
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
geographical area that is affected by  the rule or to which the rule applies, the publication shall be
made in the newspaper of general circulation published closest to the geographical area.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the Department of Corrections and  the
State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision may adopt rules limiting participation  by adults
in custody in the proposed adoption, amendment or repeal of any rule to written submissions.
(d) If  requested by at least five persons before the earliest date that the rule could become ef-
fective after the agency gives notice pursuant to subsection (1) of this  section, the agency shall
provide a statement that identifies the objective of the rule and a  statement of how the agency will
subsequently determine whether the rule is in fact accomplishing that objective.
(e) An agency that receives data or views concerning proposed rules from  interested persons
shall maintain a record of the data or views submitted. The record shall contain:
(A) All written materials submitted to an  agency in response to a notice of intent to adopt,
amend or repeal a rule.
(B) A recording or summary of oral submissions received at hearings  held for the purpose of
receiving those submissions.
(C) Any public comment received in response to  the request made under subsection (2)(b)(H) of
this section and the agency’s response to that comment.
(D) Any statements provided by the agency under paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(4) Upon request  of an interested person received before the earliest date that the rule could
become  effective  after the giving of notice pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the agency shall
postpone the date of its intended action no less than 21 nor more than 90 days in order to allow  the
requesting person an opportunity to submit data,  views or arguments concerning the proposed
action. Nothing in this subsection shall  preclude an agency from adopting a temporary rule pursuant
to subsection (5) of this section.
(5) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (4) of this section, an agency may adopt, amend  or sus-
pend a rule without prior notice or hearing or upon any abbreviated notice and  hearing that it finds
practicable, if the agency prepares:
(a) A statement of its findings that its failure to act promptly  will result in serious prejudice to
the public interest or the interest of the parties  concerned and the specific reasons for its findings
of prejudice;
(b) A citation of the statutory or other legal authority relied upon and bearing  upon the
promulgation of the rule;
(c) A statement of the need for the rule and a statement of how the rule is intended to meet the
need;
(d) A list of the principal documents, reports or studies,  if any, prepared by or relied upon by
the agency in considering the need for and in preparing the rule, and a  statement of the location
at which those documents are available for public inspection; and
(e) For an agency specified in ORS 183.530, a housing cost impact  statement as defined in ORS
183.534.
(6)(a) A rule  adopted, amended or suspended under subsection (5) of this section is temporary
and may be effective for a period of not longer than 180  days. The adoption of a rule under this
subsection does not preclude the subsequent adoption  of an identical rule under subsections (1) to
(4) of this section.
(b) A rule temporarily suspended shall  regain effectiveness upon expiration of the temporary
period of suspension unless the rule is repealed under subsections (1) to (4) of this section.
[4]
HB 3382
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (4) of this section, an agency may amend a rule without
prior notice or hearing if the amendment is solely for the purpose of:
(a) Changing the name of an agency by reason of a name change prescribed by law;
(b) Changing the name of a program, office or division within  an agency as long as the change
in name does not have a substantive effect on the functions of the program, office or division;
(c) Correcting spelling;
(d) Correcting grammatical mistakes in a manner that  does not alter the scope, application or
meaning of the rule;
(e) Correcting statutory or rule references;
(f) Correcting addresses or telephone numbers referred to in the rules; or
(g) Changing a term or phrase in order to conform with a change prescribed by law.
(8)(a) Any person may request in  writing that an agency send to the person copies of the
agency’s notices of intended  action issued under subsection (1) of this section. The person must
provide an address where the person elects to receive  notices. The address provided may be a postal
mailing address or, if the agency provides  notice by electronic mail, may be an electronic mailing
address.
(b) A request under this subsection must indicate that the person requests  one of the following:
(A) The person may request that the agency  mail paper copies of the proposed rule and other
information required by subsection (2) of this section to the postal mailing address.
(B) [ If the agency posts notices of intended action on a  website, ] The person may request that the
agency mail the  information required by subsection (2)(a) of this section to the postal mailing ad-
dress with a reference to the website where electronic copies  of the proposed rule and other infor-
mation required by subsection (2) of this section are posted.
(C) The person may  request that the agency electronically mail the information required by
subsection (2)(a) of this section to the electronic mailing address, and either  provide electronic
copies of the proposed rule and other information required by subsection  (2) of this section or pro-
vide a reference to [ a] the website where electronic copies of the proposed rule and  other informa-
tion required by subsection (2) of this section are posted.
(c) Upon receipt of any request under  this subsection, the agency shall acknowledge the request,
establish a mailing list and maintain a record of all  mailings made pursuant to the request. Agen-
cies may establish procedures for  establishing the mailing lists and keeping the mailing lists current.
Agencies by rule  may establish fees necessary to defray the costs of mailings and maintenance of
the lists.
(d) Members of the Legislative Assembly who receive notices under subsection  (15) of this sec-
tion may request that an agency furnish paper copies of the notices.
(9) This section does not apply to  rules establishing an effective date for a previously effective
rule or establishing a period during which a provision of a previously effective rule will apply.
(10) This section does not apply to ORS 279.835 to 279.855, 279A.140 to 279A.161, 279A.250 to
279A.290, 279A.990, 279B.050  to 279B.085, 279B.200 to 279B.240, 279B.270, 279B.275, 279B.280,
279C.360, 279C.365, 279C.370, 279C.375, 279C.380, 279C.385, 279C.500 to 279C.530, 279C.540, 279C.545,
279C.550 to 279C.570, 279C.580, 279C.585, 279C.590, 279C.600 to 279C.625, 279C.650 to 279C.670  and
279C.800 to 279C.870 relating to public contracts and purchasing.
(11)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, a  rule is not valid unless adopted
in substantial compliance with the provisions of this section in effect on the  date that the notice
required under subsection (1) of this  section is delivered to the Secretary of State for the purpose
[5]
HB 3382
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of publication in the bulletin referred to in ORS 183.360.
(b) In  addition to all other requirements with which rule adoptions must comply, a rule other
than a rule amended for a purpose described in subsection (7) of this  section is not valid if the rule
has not been submitted to the Legislative Counsel in the manner required by ORS  183.355 and
183.715.
(c) A rule is not subject to  judicial review or other challenge by reason of failing to comply with
subsection (2)(a)(A) of this section.
(12)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions  of subsection (11) of this section, but subject to paragraph
(b) of this subsection, an agency may correct its failure  to substantially comply with the require-
ments of subsections  (2) and (5) of this section in adoption of a rule by an amended filing, as long
as the noncompliance did not substantially prejudice the interests of persons to be affected  by the
rule.
(b) An agency may use an amended filing to correct  a failure to include a fiscal impact state-
ment in a notice of intended action, as required by subsection (2)(b)(E)  of this section, or to correct
an inaccurate  fiscal impact statement, only if the agency developed the fiscal impact statement with
the assistance of an advisory committee or fiscal impact  advisory committee appointed under ORS
183.333.
(13) Unless otherwise  provided by statute, the adoption, amendment or repeal of a rule by an
agency need not be based upon or supported by an evidentiary record.
(14) When an agency has established a deadline for comment on a proposed rule under the pro-
visions of  subsection (3)(a) of this section, the agency may not extend that deadline for another
agency  or  person unless the extension applies equally to all interested agencies and persons. An
agency shall not consider any submission made  by another agency after the final deadline has
passed.
(15) The notices required under subsections (1) and (3) of this section must be given by  the
agency to the following persons:
(a) If the proposed  adoption, amendment or repeal results from legislation that was passed
within two years before notice is given under subsection (1) of this  section, notice shall be given to
the legislator who introduced the  bill that subsequently was enacted into law, and to the chair or
cochairs of all committees that reported the bill out, except for  those committees whose sole action
on the bill was referral to another committee.
(b) If the proposed adoption, amendment or repeal does not result  from legislation that was
passed within two years  before notice is given under subsection (1) of this section, notice shall be
given to the chair or  cochairs of any interim or session committee with authority over the subject
matter of the rule.
(c) If notice cannot be given under paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, notice  shall be given
to the Speaker of the House  of Representatives and to the President of the Senate who are in office
on the date the notice is given.
(16)(a) Upon the request of  a member of the Legislative Assembly or of a person who would be
affected by a proposed adoption, amendment or repeal,  the committees receiving notice under sub-
section (15) of this section shall review the proposed adoption, amendment or  repeal for compliance
with the legislation from which the proposed adoption, amendment or repeal results.
(b) The committees shall  submit their comments on the proposed adoption, amendment or repeal
to the agency proposing the adoption, amendment or repeal.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 276A.253 is amended to read:
[6]
HB 3382
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
276A.253. (1)(a) The State Chief Information  Officer shall maintain and make available an
Oregon transparency website. The website must allow any person  to view information that is a
public record and is not exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478, including but not
limited to information described in subsection (3) of this  section. The State Chief Information Officer
shall provide on the home page  of the website a method for users to offer suggestions regarding the
form or content of the website.
(b) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall assist the State  Chief Information
Officer in performing duties  under paragraph (a) of this subsection to the extent the State Chief
Information Officer deems the assistance necessary.
(2) State agencies and education service districts, to the extent practicable and  subject to laws
relating to confidentiality, when at no additional cost, using existing data and existing resources  of
the state agency or education service district and without reallocation of resources, shall:
(a) Furnish information to the Oregon transparency website by posting reports and  providing
links to existing information system applications in accordance with  standards that the State Chief
Information Officer establishes; and
(b) Provide the information in the format and  manner that the State Chief Information Officer
requires.
(3) To the extent  practicable and subject to laws relating to confidentiality, when at no addi-
tional cost, using existing data and existing resources of the  state agency or education service dis-
trict and without  reallocation of resources, the Oregon transparency website must contain
information about each state agency and education service district, including but not limited to:
(a) Annual revenues of state agencies and education service districts;
(b) Annual expenditures of state agencies and education service districts;
(c) Annual human resources expenses, including compensation, of state agencies and education
service  districts;
(d) Annual tax expenditures of state agencies, including, when possible, the identity  of the re-
cipients of each tax expenditure;
(e) For each state agency, a description of the  percentage of expenditures made in this state and
the percentage of expenditures made outside this  state under all contracts for goods or services the
state agency enters into during each biennium;
(f) A prominently  placed graphic representation of the primary funding categories and approxi-
mate number of individuals that the state agency or the education service district serves;
(g) A description of the mission,  function and program categories of the state agency or educa-
tion service district;
(h) A copy of any audit report that the Secretary  of State issues for the state agency or the
education service district;
(i) The local service plans of the education service districts;
(j) A copy of each report required by statute for education service districts; and
(k) A copy of all notices of public meetings of the education service districts.
(4) In addition to the information described in subsection (3) of this section:
(a) The State Chief Information Officer shall post  on the Oregon transparency website notices
of public meetings the state agency must provide under  ORS 192.640. If the state agency maintains
a website where minutes or summaries of the public meetings are available, the  state agency shall
provide the State Chief Information Officer with the link to the  state agency website for posting on
the Oregon transparency website.
[7]
HB 3382
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The State Chief Information Officer shall post on the Oregon transparency website a  link for
the website that the Secretary of State maintains for rules that the state agency adopts. [ If the state
agency maintains a  website where the state agency posts the rules, or where any information relating
to the rules of the agency is posted, ] The state agency shall provide the  State Chief Information Of-
ficer with the  link to the website where the state agency posts the rules, or where any infor-
mation relating to the rules of the agency is posted,  for posting  on the Oregon transparency
website.
(c) The State Chief Information Officer shall  provide links on the Oregon transparency website
for information that the State Chief Information Officer receives concerning contracts  and subcon-
tracts that a state agency or education  service district enters into, to the extent that disclosing the
information is allowed by law  and the information is already available on websites that the state
agency or education service district maintains. To the  extent available, the information to which the
State Chief Information Officer links under this section must include:
(A) Information on professional, personal and material contracts;
(B) The date of each contract and the amount payable under the contract;
(C) The period during which the contract is or was in effect; and
(D) The names and addresses of vendors.
(d) The State Chief Information Officer shall provide an economic development section on the
Oregon transparency website for posting of  information submitted to the State Chief Information
Officer by state agencies responsible for  administering specific economic development programs. The
section shall include, but not be limited to, the following information, if it is already collected  or
available within an existing database maintained by the  state agency in the course of administering
the economic development program:
(A) The names of filmmakers or companies that have received reimbursements from the  Oregon
Production Investment Fund under ORS 284.368 and the amount of each reimbursement;
(B) The amount of revenue bonds issued under  ORS 285A.430 for the Beginning and Expanding
Farmer Loan Program, the names  of persons who received loans under the program and the amount
of the loan;
(C) The names of persons who received grants, loans or equity  investments from the Oregon
Innovation Council under ORS 284.742 and the  purpose and amount of the grant, loan or equity in-
vestment;
(D) Copies of, or links to, annual reports required to be filed under ORS 285C.615 under the
strategic investment program;
(E) Copies of, or links  to, annual certifications required to be filed under ORS 285C.506 for the
business development income tax exemption; and
(F) Information required to be posted on the Oregon  transparency website under ORS 276A.256.
(e) The information reported under paragraph (d) of this subsection:
(A) May not include proprietary information; and
(B) Shall be provided to the State Chief Information Officer by  the state agency in the format
and manner required by the State Chief Information Officer.
(f) The State Chief Information Officer shall post on the Oregon transparency  website informa-
tion describing the process for requesting copies of public records  from a public body, including a
link to the  public records section of the Department of Justice webpage. At the request of a state
agency or education service district, the State Chief Information Officer  shall include a link to a
location on the webpage of the agency or district that describes  the process for requesting public
[8]
HB 3382
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
records from the agency or district.
(5) In operating, refining and recommending enhancements to the Oregon transparency  website,
the State Chief Information Officer and the Transparency Oregon  Advisory Commission created in
ORS 276A.259 shall consider and, to the extent practicable, adhere to the following principles:
(a) The website must be accessible without cost and be easy to use;
(b) Information included  on the Oregon transparency website must be presented using plain,
easily understandable language; and
(c) The website should teach users about how  state government and education service districts
work and provide users with the opportunity to learn something about how state  government and
education service districts raise and spend revenue.
(6) If a state agency or an education service district is not able  to include information described
in this section on the Oregon transparency website because of the  lack of availability of information
or cost in acquiring information, the Transparency Oregon Advisory  Commission created in ORS
276A.259 shall list the information that is not included for the state agency  or education service
district in the commission’s report to the Legislative Assembly required under ORS 276A.259.
(7)(a) For the  purpose of providing transparency in the revenues, expenditures and budgets of
the following entities, the State Chief Information Officer shall include on the  Oregon transparency
website a page that provides links to websites established by:
(A) Local governments, as defined in ORS 174.116.
(B) Special government bodies, as defined in ORS 174.117.
(C) Semi-independent state agencies listed in ORS 182.454.
(D) Public universities listed in ORS 352.002.
(E) Public university statewide programs operated by a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(F) The Oregon Health and Science University.
(G) The Oregon Tourism Commission.
(H) The Oregon Film and Video Office.
(I) The Travel Information Council.
(J) The Children’s Trust Fund of Oregon Foundation.
(K) Oregon Corrections Enterprises.
(L) The State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(M) The Oregon Utility Notification Center.
(N) Any public corporation created under a statute of this state and specifically  designated as
a public corporation.
(b) The State Chief Information Officer shall include a link to an entity’s  website after receiving
a request from  the entity and shall consider recommendations from the Transparency Oregon Advi-
sory Commission for including other links to  websites of the entities listed in paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(c) At the request  of any local government, as defined in ORS 174.116, or special government
body, as defined in  ORS 174.117, the State Chief Information Officer shall include on the Oregon
transparency website notices of public meetings required to be provided under ORS 192.640 by  the
local government or special government body.  The local government or special government body
must submit public meeting notice information in the format and  manner required by the State Chief
Information Officer.
(d) The office of  Enterprise Information Services shall include a prominent link on the home
page of the Oregon transparency website for information posted to the  page described in paragraph
[9]
HB 3382
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
(a) of this subsection.
(8) Nothing  in this section prohibits the State Chief Information Officer or the Oregon Depart-
ment of  Administrative Services from incurring costs or requesting additional resources to develop,
maintain or enhance the Oregon transparency website.
SECTION 7.
(1) Sections 2 and 3 of this  2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 183.335,
183.341 and 276A.253 by sections 4 to 6 of this 2025 act become operative on January 1, 2027.
(2) The Secretary of State or an agency may take any action before the operative date
specified in subsection  (1) of this section to enable the secretary or the agency to exercise,
on and after  the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties,
functions and powers conferred on the secretary and the agency by sections 2 and  3 of this
2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 183.335, 183.341 and 276A.253 by sections 4  to 6 of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 8. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[10]