Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, which shall be expended to:
(1) Provide funding  to support five additional regional health equity coalitions for a
statewide total of 15;
(2) Provide funding to enable each regional health  equity coalition to hire two additional
full-time staff; and
(3) Provide funding to support regional health equity coalitions’ programmatic and staff-
ing costs, including:
(a) Facility costs;
(b) Costs related to providing child care, transportation  and interpretation and trans-
lation services; and
(c) Compensation of members and partners of regional health equity coalitions  for their
services.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 191