Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 1, chapter 808, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended by section 1,  chapter 67,
Oregon Laws 2016, section 10, chapter 747, Oregon Laws 2017, and section 4, chapter  106, Oregon
Laws 2018, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the following amounts are estab-
lished for a six-year  period beginning July 1, 2015, as the maximum limits for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding  lottery funds
and federal funds, collected or received by the state agencies listed, for the acquisition  of land and
the acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing, furnishing and equipping of buildings and
facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
(a) North Campus Demolition
and Site Improvement ...................... $ 8,300,000
(b) Department of Environmental
Quality Public Health Lab
Emergency Generator Upgrade ..... $ 2,926,140
(c) Employment Building Upgrades .... $ 2,217,398
(d) Electrical Upgrades/
Replacements ......................................$ 2,089,795
(e) Department of Human
Services Building, Cooling
Tower Replacement .......................... $ 1,701,702
(f) Executive Building
Elevator Upgrades ............................ $ 875,461
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 284
HB 5201
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(g) Executive Building Fire
Sprinkler..............................................$ 89,322
(h) Planning ..............................................$ 350,000
(i) Capital Investments/
Acquisitions ........................................$ 17,000,000
(j) Executive Building Central
Stairway Upgrade ............................. $ 377,443
(k) Oregon State Fair
Capital Repairs and
Deferred Maintenance ..................... $ 2,500,000
(2) Oregon Military Department:
(a) New Headquarters
Facilities ..............................................$  6,700,000
[(b) Youth Challenge Armory ................. $ 4,977,000]
(b) Youth Challenge Armory .......... $ 5,152,000
(c) Planning and Predesign ................... $ 136,281
(d) Oregon Military Museum ................ $ 1,104,689
(e) Regional Training Institute ............ $ 11,500,000
(3) Oregon Youth Authority:
(a) Rogue Valley Facility
Improvements ..................................... $ 9,880,000
(b) MacLaren Facility
Improvements ..................................... $ 30,934,000
(c) CCTV Cameras .................................. $ 1,147,435
(d) Deferred Maintenance
and Capital Improvements .............. $ 7,058,000
(4) Department of Corrections,
Deferred Maintenance ..................... $ 14,220,432
(5) Housing and Community
Services Department,
Family Affordable Housing ............. $ 40,000,000
(6) Department of Transportation:
(a) South Coast Maintenance
Station .................................................$ 4,500,000
(b) Meacham Maintenance
Station .................................................$ 7,500,000
(c) Maintenance Facilities
Colocation ...........................................$ 1
(d) Highway Improvement
Projects ................................................$ 35,000,000
(7) Oregon Department of Aviation:
(a) Condon State Airport,
Renovations ........................................$ 226,111
(b) McDermitt State Airport,
Rehabilitation ..................................... $ 259,599
[2]
HB 5201
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
(c) Aurora State Airport, Apron/
Taxiway and Taxilane Project ....... $ 130,000
(8) Department of Veterans’
Affairs, The Dalles Veterans’
Home Renovation .............................. $ 2,475,976
(9) State Department of Fish and
Wildlife:
(a) Cedar Creek Hatchery and Fish
Passage Improvements ..................... $ 2,000,000
(b) Lower Deschutes River Ranch
Acquisition ..........................................$ 227,269
(10) Legislative Administration Committee,
State Capitol Capital Repairs
and Improvements ............................. $ 30,000,000
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, and in lieu of the lim-
itation on expenditures established at the December 2018 Emergency Board meeting  (Item
No. 22), the amount  of $5,825,000 is established for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2017,
as the maximum limit for payment of expenses for  the Youth Challenge Program expansion
from federal funds collected or received by the Oregon Military Department.
SECTION 3. This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]