Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
This 2025 Act shall be known and may be cited as the 2025 Oregon Veterans’
Services Supplemental Investments Initiative.
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS’ AFFAIRS
APPROPRIATIONS FROM THE GENERAL FUND
SECTION 2. An appropriation to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs  out of the General
Fund may not be in an amount that is less than less $10,000,000,  as measured in 2015 and
adjusted for inflation as calculated by the Legislative Fiscal Office.
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS’ AFFAIRS
ADDITIONAL STAFF POSITIONS
SECTION 3. The Director of Veterans’ Affairs shall establish, hire  for and staff within
the Department of Veterans’ Affairs the following additional full-time equivalent positions:
(1) Two incarcerated veterans coordinators.
(2) One women veterans coordinator
(3) One addiction services coordinator.
(4) One behavioral health coordinator.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1227
HB 2845
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) One state approving agency staff.
(6) Two houseless veterans coordinators.
(7) Two financial recovery ombudspersons.
(8) One bridge grant support coordinator.
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS’ AFFAIRS
QUALIFICATIONS TO BE DIRECTOR OR DEPUTY DIRECTOR
SECTION 4.
 ORS 406.020 is amended to read:
406.020. The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall be under the supervision  and control of the
Director of Veterans’ Affairs. The Governor shall appoint  the director subject to confirmation by
the Senate in the manner provided in ORS 171.562 and 171.565. The appointment may not  be made
without the written approval of  the Advisory Committee provided for in ORS 406.210. The director
shall be a veteran[ ,] who received a discharge  or release under other than dishonorable con-
ditions, chosen on the basis of executive and administrative ability.
SECTION 5. The Director  of Veterans’ Affairs, subject to approval by the Governor, may
appoint a deputy director. The deputy director must be a  veteran who received a discharge
or release under other than  dishonorable conditions. The deputy director serves at the
pleasure of the director, has full authority to act for  the director and is subject to the con-
trol of the director. The appointment of the deputy director shall be by written order  filed
with the Secretary of State.
VETERANS SUICIDE PREVENTION PILOT PROGRAMS
SECTION 6. (1) As used in this section, “veteran” has the  meaning given that term in
ORS 408.225. “Veteran” includes a disabled veteran as defined in ORS 408.225.
(2) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall  develop and implement one or more pilot
programs for  suicide prevention and workforce preparation. The purpose of the pilot pro-
grams is to help veterans with suicide prevention and transition to  the workforce and busi-
ness community.
(3) The department shall implement the pilot  programs under this section by awarding
grants to:
(a) Entities involved in pairing suicide prevention and housing with workforce training
and preparation in the agriculture, fishery, forestry or natural resources industries; and
(b) Entities that provide temporary, low-barrier suicide prevention programs.
(4) The department shall:
(a) Develop criteria for entities that provide programs for suicide prevention and
workforce training and preparation;
(b) By rule, establish processes and procedures for veterans  to apply for assistance from
entities identified in subsection (3) of this section; and
(c) Prioritize awarding grants to entities that provide opportunities for veterans to  par-
ticipate in the veterans’ local communities.
(5) The department  may solicit and accept gifts, grants and donations from public and
private sources to further the purposes of this section.
(6) The department may use moneys in the Veterans’  Services Fund established pursuant
[2]
HB 2845
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to Article XV, section  4f, of the Oregon Constitution, to develop, implement and maintain the
pilot programs under this section.
(7) The department may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 7.
On or before November 15, 2026, the Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall
prepare and submit a report to the interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly related
to veterans’ services on the status of pilot programs  developed and implemented under sec-
tion 6 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8. (1) Section 6 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
(2) All moneys for the pilot programs developed and implemented under section 6 of this
2025 Act that are unexpended and unobligated on the date of the repeal of  section 6 of this
2025 Act shall revert to the Veterans’ Services Fund  and become available for use pursuant
to Article XV, section 4f, of the Oregon Constitution.
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
PROOF OF VETERAN STATUS
SECTION 9.  ORS 807.040 is amended to read:
807.040. (1) The Department of Transportation  shall issue a driver license to any person who
complies with all of the following requirements:
(a) The person must complete an application for a license under ORS 807.050.
(b)(A) As required by ORS 807.021, a person applying for a driver license or  driver permit must
provide  the  Social Security number assigned to the person by the United States Social Security
Administration or a written statement that the person has not been assigned a Social  Security
number.
(B) As used in this paragraph,  a “driver license” or “driver permit” means a driver license or
driver permit that is not a:
(i) Real ID;
(ii) Commercial driver license; or
(iii) Commercial learner driver permit.
(c) The person must submit to collection of biometric data by the department that  establish the
identity of the person as described in ORS 807.024.
(d) The person must not be ineligible  for the license under ORS 807.060 and must be eligible for
the license under ORS 807.062.
(e) The person must successfully pass all examination requirements  under ORS 807.070 for the
class of license sought.
(f) The person must  pay the appropriate license fee under ORS 807.370 for the class of license
sought.
(g) The person must pay the Student Driver Training Fund eligibility fee.
(h) If the application is for a commercial driver  license, the person must be the holder of a Class
C license or any higher class of license.
(i) If the application is for a commercial driver license, the department must have received  and
recorded, in a form approved by the department, the report of a medical examination that establishes
that the person meets the medical requirements to operate a commercial motor vehicle.  The de-
partment, by rule, shall establish medical requirements for purposes of this  paragraph. The medical
requirements established under  this paragraph may include any requirements the department deter-
[3]
HB 2845
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mines are necessary for the safe operation of vehicles permitted to be operated  under the class of
license for which the requirements are established.
(j) If the application is for a Real ID commercial driver license or a commercial  driver license
that is not a Real ID, the person must:
(A) Have at least one  year’s driving experience, including relevant experience obtained in the
military;
(B) Not be subject to a lifetime suspension of commercial driving privileges under ORS  809.520;
(C) Not be otherwise ineligible to hold a commercial driver license;
(D) Hold a commercial learner driver permit if the person  must complete a skills demonstration
under ORS 807.070 (3);
(E) Submit valid documentation, as defined by the department by rule, that the person is a citi-
zen or  lawful permanent resident of the United States or is a citizen of a country with a Compact
of Free Association with the United States; and
(F) Provide the Social Security number  assigned to the person by the United States Social Se-
curity Administration for verification by the department with the administration.
(k) The person must present acceptable documents to  prove identity, date of birth and address.
The department  shall determine by rule which documents are acceptable to prove identity, date of
birth and address.
(L) If the application is for a Real ID, the person must comply with  the requirements under the
vehicle code for issuance of Real IDs.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, acceptable documents to prove  identity,
date of birth or address under subsection (1)(k)  of this section when a person is applying for a driver
license, driver permit or identification card that is not a Real ID, a  commercial driver license, or
a commercial learner driver permit, include but are not limited to the following:
(a) An unexpired valid passport from the person’s country of citizenship;
(b) An unexpired valid consular identification document issued by the  consulate of the person’s
country of citizenship, if the department determines that the  procedure used in issuing the consular
identification document is sufficient to prove the person’s identity;
(c) A driver license, driver permit or identification card  issued by this state that expired not
more than 13 years from the date of the current application; [ or]
(d) A driver license, driver permit or identification card issued by another state that:
(A) Is unexpired; or
(B) Expired not more than one year from the date of the current application[ .]; or
(e) An identification card issued by  the United States Department of Defense or the
United States Department of Veterans Affairs.
(3) The department  may refuse to accept any document described in subsection (2) of this section
that is presented as proof of identity, date of birth or address, if the department has reason to  be-
lieve that:
(a) The document is fraudulent, has been altered  or does not belong to the person presenting the
document; or
(b) The procedures used by the agency that issued the document are no longer sufficient  for
proving a person’s identity or date of birth.
(4) Subsection (1)(j)(E) of this section does not apply to a limited term commercial driver license
or a limited term commercial learner driver permit issued under ORS 807.730.
(5) The department shall work with other agencies and organizations to attempt to  improve the
[4]
HB 2845
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
issuance system for driver licenses.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 10.
The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
[5]