Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
No later than December 31 of  each even-numbered year, the Legislative
Policy and Research Director shall distribute  to each interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly a summary of administrative rules that have been adopted in the  previous two
years that are relevant to the subject of the interim committee.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2382