Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
For purposes of  ORS 454.655 (4), the Department of Environmental Quality
may not determine that a community or  area-wide sewerage system is available unless the
sewerage system is within 200 feet of the property to be served.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2031.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3467