Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 317.
SECTION 2. If a taxpayer  has claimed, on the taxpayer’s federal income tax return, any
amount for salary or other compensation paid by the taxpayer in the  course of a trade or
business and deducted as  a trade or business expense under section 162 of the Internal Re-
venue Code:
(1) For each person to whom the  taxpayer has paid compensation during the tax year,
the taxpayer must list on the taxpayer’s Oregon income tax return the recipient’s  name,
date of birth, Social Security number and  the amount of salary or wages paid to the recipient
during the tax year.
(2) For any recipient of compensation for whom the taxpayer  does not provide all of the
information listed in  subsection (1) of this section, there shall be added to federal taxable
income the amount of compensation paid to that recipient and claimed  on the federal return.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2025  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 614