Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 18, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 18.  (1) For the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, at the request of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, after the  department consults with Multnomah County School District
No. 7, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to
286A.585 in an amount  that produces $2,331,872 in net proceeds for the purposes described in sub-
section (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated  by the State Treasurer to be neces-
sary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds  of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the depart-
ment for deposit in  the ODAS Economic Development Distributions Fund established under ORS
461.553 for distribution to  Multnomah County School District No. 7 for construction of a school-
based health center at Reynolds High  School in Troutdale. [ The project also includes renovation of
existing classroom space to establish  a temporary health center that will be restored upon completion
of the permanent health center. ]
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds  will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) Funding construction of public school facilities finances public education; and
(b) Student access to healthcare services improves educational outcomes and attainment.
SECTION 2.
This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 285