Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Behavioral health provider” means a provider, other  than a primary care provider,
who is licensed under ORS chapter 675 to provide behavioral health services.
(b) “Behavioral health services” means mental health or substance use disorder  treat-
ment and services that are provided in a  setting other than a hospital, emergency depart-
ment or urgent care center.
(c) “Conversion factor” means the dollar amount assigned to one  unit of the resource-
based relative value.
(d) “Dental care provider” means a provider:
(A) Who is a:
(i) Dentist or  dental hygienist licensed by the Oregon Board of Dentistry under ORS
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2191
SB 609
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
chapter 679 or 680; or
(ii) Team of dentists or a dental clinic; and
(B) Who provides dental care services.
(e) “Dental care  services” means the following services that are provided in a setting
other than a hospital, emergency department or urgent care center:
(A) Comprehensive primary dental care; or
(B) Basic diagnostic and preventative dental services.
(f) “Optometrist”  means a provider licensed under ORS chapter 683 to provide optometry
services.
(g) “Optometry services”  means preventative or routine eye examination services that
are provided in a setting other than  a hospital, emergency department or urgent care center.
(h) “Primary care provider” means a provider:
(A) Who is a:
(i) Physician licensed by the Oregon Medical Board under ORS chapter 677; or
(ii) Nurse  practitioner licensed by the Oregon State Board of Nursing under ORS 678.375
to 678.390; and
(B) Whose clinical practice is:
(i) Family medicine;
(ii) General internal medicine;
(iii) Pediatrics;
(iv) Prenatal and postnatal obstetrics; or
(v) General psychiatry.
(i) “Primary care services” means services provided by a  primary care provider in a
setting other than a hospital, emergency department or urgent care center.
(j) “Resource-based relative value” means  the weight assigned to a Current Procedural
Terminology code by the  Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services under 42 C.F.R. 414.22
or a weight assigned to  a dental service using a methodology similar to the methodology used
by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services under 42 C.F.R. 414.22.
(2)(a) Beginning January 1,  2026, the Oregon Health Authority shall establish the mini-
mum reimbursement amounts paid to a primary  care provider, optometrist, dental care
provider or behavioral health provider as follows:
(A) For primary care services and optometry services, a conversion factor of $85  multi-
plied by the resource-based relative value unit assigned to the applicable code for the service
that is published in the most recent Medicare Physician Payment Schedule final rule.
(B) For dental care services, the greater of:
(i) A conversion factor of $85 multiplied by the resource-based  relative value unit as-
signed to the applicable code for the service that is published in the most recent  Medicare
Physician Payment Schedule final rule, if applicable, or published by the relevant professional
association of dental providers; or
(ii) 100 percent of the average health insurer reimbursement rate for the service.
(C) For behavioral health services, the greater of:
(i) A conversion factor of $85 multiplied by the resource-based  relative value unit as-
signed to the applicable code for the service that is published in the most recent  Medicare
Physician Payment Schedule final rule; or
(ii) 150 percent of the average health insurer reimbursement rate for the service.
[2]
SB 609
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
(b) For each subsequent calendar year after 2026, the authority shall increase the  mini-
mum reimbursement amounts under this subsection by 3.4 percent.
(3) A coordinated care  organization shall reimburse contracted primary care providers,
optometrists, dental care providers and behavioral health providers the  amounts specified in
subsection (2) of this section excluding any bonus or  quality incentive payments received by
the provider. A coordinated care organization may  use alternate payment methodologies if
the payments are no less than the amounts specified in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) A coordinated care  organization shall expend the portion of any global budget that is
allocated for primary  care services, optometry services, dental care services and behavioral
health services solely on the provision of  primary care services, optometry services, dental
care services and behavioral health services.
(5) The authority may not request an increase in General Fund appropriations or in ex-
penditure limitations to carry out the provisions  of this section but must carry out the
provisions of this section within the authority’s legislatively approved budget.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon  Health Authority shall monitor and review changes in the
reimbursement amounts paid in accordance with section 2 of this 2025  Act over a four-year
period and prepare a report on whether the reimbursement amounts paid  for services de-
scribed in section 2 of this 2025 Act:
(a) Reduced wait times and increased  access and provider choice for medical assistance
recipients;
(b) Increased employment of traditional health workers;
(c) Improved health outcomes and equity among medical assistance recipients; and
(d) Reduced costs in  the medical assistance program due to lower utilization of services
in higher cost categories of services such as hospital or specialty care services.
(2) The authority shall submit the report prepared in accordance with  subsection (1) of
this section to  the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health no later
than December 31, 2031.
SECTION 4.
No later than  60 days after the effective date of this 2025 Act, the Oregon
Health Authority shall seek approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
to secure federal financial participation in the reimbursement amounts paid  to providers
under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act become operative  upon the receipt of ap-
proval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services under section 4 of this 2025 Act.
[3]