Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
WILDLIFE DAMAGE PREVENTION AND COMPENSATION PILOT PROGRAM
SECTION 1.
As used in this section and sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Best preventive measures” has the  meaning given that term in rule by the State
Department of Agriculture.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4384
HB 3657
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) “Eligible damage”:
(a) Means wildlife damage on  eligible land to standing or harvested agricultural crops,
including livestock  forage, or to infrastructure, including fences or agricultural equipment,
that has not been covered by insurance.
(b) May include the cost of third-party assessment of the damage.
(3) “Eligible land” means land:
(a) That is privately owned or leased.
(b) That is not enrolled in a conservation reserve program.
(c) That is in a pilot program area, as determined under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(d) For which no fee is charged for hunting on the land.
(4) “Eligible person” means a person who:
(a) Lives on, leases or works eligible land.
(b) Derives  $10,000 or more per year, on average, from producing agricultural crops, in-
cluding forage, on the eligible land.
(c) Owns crops or infrastructure that is damaged by wildlife.
(5) “Eligible preventive measure” means a measure that is reasonably expected to  reduce
wildlife damage on eligible land, including:
(a) Repellants used on small-size areas.
(b) Temporary or permanent barriers around medium-size areas such as specialty crops,
orchards or tree farms.
(c) Reasonable time  spent on nonlethal deterrence activities such as hazing, but not in-
cluding labor to build barriers.
SECTION 2.
(1) The State Department of Agriculture shall establish and implement  a
wildlife damage prevention and compensation pilot program.
(2) Under the pilot program, the department  shall use available moneys in the Wildlife
Damage Prevention and Compensation Fund established  under section 4 of this 2025 Act to
provide compensation for eligible damages or eligible preventive measures to eligible persons
who suffer loss due to wildlife damage.
(3) In consultation with the State Department of Fish  and Wildlife and local governments
that have wildlife damage pilot programs, the State Department of Agriculture shall  select
up to 10 pilot program areas in areas east of the Cascade Mountains and west  of the Cascade
Mountains after considering, for the areas:
(a) The history of wildlife damage to agriculture.
(b) The timing of wildlife damage, including throughout the year or seasonally.
(c) Past actions by agencies and landowners to alleviate wildlife damage.
(d) The sizes and distribution of wildlife populations that cause damage.
(e) How diverse agricultural crop types are.
(4) Under the pilot program, the  department may award compensation for eligible dam-
ages or eligible preventive measures to an eligible  person who demonstrates that the eligible
person:
(a) Has previously used best  preventive measures to prevent wildlife damage on the eli-
gible land.
(b) Has not intentionally or  unreasonably created circumstances that attract wildlife that
cause damage to the eligible land or  otherwise encourage wildlife damage on the eligible land.
SECTION 3.
To implement the wildlife damage and compensation pilot program  described
[2]
HB 3657
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in section 2 of this 2025 Act,  the State Department of Agriculture shall adopt rules to es-
tablish:
(1) A process for enrolling in, and periodically renewing enrollment in,  the pilot program
that includes verification of whether:
(a) The person qualifies as an eligible person.
(b) The person has implemented best preventive measures on the eligible land.
(c) The person has intentionally or unreasonably created  circumstances that attract
wildlife that cause damage to the eligible land or otherwise encourage wildlife damage on the
eligible land.
(2) A process for submitting claims, including evidence of eligible damage that includes
a finding by an  agent of the department, an agent of the United States Department of Agri-
culture or a crop adjuster licensed  under ORS 744.531 (3) that wildlife caused or probably
caused the eligible damage.
(3) A process for assessing claims that describes:
(a) How the State Department of Agriculture will assess the cost of eligible damage.
(b) The role and selection of professional damage assessors.
(c) Whether, or under what circumstances, an  eligible person may be reimbursed for the
cost of third-party damage assessment as part of compensation for eligible damages.
(4) Methods for determining:
(a) Compensation amounts for eligible damage, such as a  net loss in production at the
end of a growing season relative to regional averages and anticipated loss rates.
(b) Compensation amounts for reasonable time  spent on nonlethal wildlife deterrence
activities such as hazing.
(c) How to  reduce the amount of a claim that has been partially compensated by a private
insurance company.
(d) Maximum amounts  for compensation for eligible damages and eligible preventive
measures.
(5) A process for prioritizing awards of compensation to eligible persons who:
(a) Have made significant efforts to prevent or mitigate wildlife damage.
(b) Allow persons licensed by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife to take  wildlife
that cause damage on the property that is affected by the wildlife damage.
(6) A definition of  the term “best preventive measures” that lists ways to deter wildlife
damage, including the provision of hunting access, either to the public or to individuals by
permission, for lethal take of wildlife, consistent with applicable laws and rules.
(7) The  terms for awarding compensation for barriers, such as fencing, including requir-
ing:
(a) In-kind funds from the eligible person.
(b) That the eligible person demonstrate previous use of repellants, hazing or  temporary
barriers and that those measures did not adequately prevent wildlife damage.
(c) That the eligible person participate in available federal programs  that restore or im-
prove wildlife habitat.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Wildlife Damage Prevention and Compensation Fund  is established
in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The Wildlife Damage Prevention  and Compensation Fund consists of moneys appro-
priated by the Legislative Assembly for deposit in  the fund, grant funds received by the State
[3]
HB 3657
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Department of Agriculture, and other moneys appropriated, allocated,  deposited or trans-
ferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise.
(3) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the department for purposes
described in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
(1) Sections 1 to 4 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2030.
(2) Any moneys remaining in the Wildlife  Damage Prevention and Compensation Fund
established under section 4 of  this 2025 Act that are unexpended and unobligated on the date
specified in subsection (1) of this section shall revert to the General Fund.
REPORTS
SECTION 6. As soon as there are sufficient data and no later than September 15, 2028:
(1) The State Department of Agriculture shall  report, in the manner prescribed in ORS
192.245, to committees or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to natural
resources on the wildlife damage prevention and compensation pilot program described  in
section 2 of this 2025 Act. The report must include:
(a) A summary of pilot program descriptive statistics, including but not limited to:
(A) The number of persons participating in the pilot program.
(B) The types and quantities of damage reported under the pilot program.
(C) The amounts awarded under the pilot program.
(b) An evaluation of successes and challenges in administering the pilot program.
(c) A proposal for a permanent wildlife damage and compensation program.
(d) An evaluation of the benefits  and drawbacks of transitioning to a program that is
partially administered by counties.
(2) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall report, in the manner prescribed in
ORS 192.245, to committees or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to
natural resources on the pilot program. The report must:
(a) Compare the occurrence of wildlife damage inside and  outside, and over time within,
the pilot program areas.
(b) Analyze changes to hunting opportunities within the pilot program areas.
(c) Summarize information on wildlife population sizes throughout this state.
(d) Summarize any available information on wildlife distribution throughout this state.
(e) Describe the  types of data that would assist with better understanding wildlife dis-
tribution throughout this state and how the data might be obtained.
APPROPRIATION
SECTION 7.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $600,000, for deposit in the Wildlife Damage Prevention
and Compensation Fund established by section 4 of this 2025  Act, to be expended as described
in section 4 of this 2025 Act.
CAPTIONS
[4]
HB 3657
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
SECTION 8.
The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express  any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 9. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[5]