Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall study ways to reduce the number of
persons committed to the custody of a superintendent of a state mental hospital after being
determined to lack fitness to proceed.
(2) The authority shall provide the results of the authority’s study in a report  to the
appropriate interim committees of the  Legislative Assembly in the manner provided under
ORS 192.245 no later than December 31, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2831