Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A person commits the crime of criminal  defamation of a servicemember
if:
(a) The person intentionally harasses a  servicemember by making a statement alleging
less than honorable military service by the servicemember to a third person;
(b) The statement is  made with the intent to cause the servicemember financial or rep-
utational harm; and
(c) A reasonable person would interpret the statement as  likely to cause financial or
reputational harm to the servicemember.
(2) Criminal defamation of a servicemember is a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this section that:
(a) The statement is true; or
(b) The servicemember who is the subject of the statement  was discharged from service
in any manner other than an honorable discharge.
(4) As used in this section, “servicemember” means a current or  former member of the
Armed Forces of the United States, the reserve components  of the Armed Forces of the
United States or the National Guard.
SECTION 2.
(1) A person commits  the crime of unlawful appropriation of the identity of
a servicemember if the person, with the intent to deceive or to defraud:
(a) Falsely claims to be a servicemember; or
(b) Falsely claims  an official affiliation with a nonprofit or charitable organization for
servicemembers.
(2) Unlawful appropriation of the identity of a servicemember is a Class A  misdemeanor.
(3) As used in this section, “servicemember” means a current or  former member of the
Armed Forces of the United States, the reserve components  of the Armed Forces of the
United States or the National Guard.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 161.005 is amended to read:
161.005. ORS 161.005 to 161.055, 161.085 to  161.125, 161.150 to 161.175, 161.190 to 161.275, 161.290
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 713
HB 2905
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
to 161.373, 161.405 to 161.485, 161.505 to 161.585, 161.605, 161.615  to 161.685, 161.705 to 161.737,
162.005, 162.015 to 162.035, 162.055 to 162.115, 162.135 to 162.205, 162.225 to  162.375, 162.405 to
162.425, 162.465, 163.005,  163.095, 163.107, 163.115, 163.125 to 163.145, 163.149, 163.160 to 163.208,
163.196, 163.215 to 163.257, 163.261, 163.263, 163.264, 163.266, 163.275, 163.285, 163.305  to 163.467,
163.432, 163.433, 163.472,  163.505 to 163.575, 163.665 to 163.693, 163.700, 163.701, 163.715, 164.005,
164.015 to 164.135, 164.138, 164.140, 164.205 to 164.270, 164.305 to 164.377,  164.395 to 164.415, 164.805,
164.857, 164.886, 165.002 to 165.102, 165.109, 165.118, 165.805, 165.815, 166.005 to  166.095, 166.350,
166.382, 166.384, 166.660, 167.002 to 167.027, 167.057, 167.060 to 167.100, 167.117, 167.122 to 167.162,
167.203 to 167.252, 167.310 to 167.340,  167.350, 167.810 and 167.820 and sections 1 and 2 of this 2021
Act shall be known and may be cited as Oregon Criminal Code of 1971.
[2]