Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,  a municipal law
enforcement agency with jurisdiction over a municipality with  a population of at least 350,000
shall staff all enclosed motor  vehicles used for patrol duties with a minimum of two law
enforcement officers.
(2)(a) A municipal law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over  a municipality with a
population of at least 350,000  may staff an enclosed motor vehicle used for patrol duties with
only one law enforcement officer if extraordinary circumstances prevent  the agency from
complying with the requirement described in subsection (1) of this section.
(b) For each instance that a  law enforcement agency is prevented from complying with
the requirement described in subsection (1) of this  section due to extraordinary circum-
stances, the agency shall provide written notice to the Department of Justice with an ex-
planation of the specific circumstances.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3171