Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Corrections shall operate and maintain, and may  not
close, the Shutter Creek Correctional Institution in Coos County.
(2) For  the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, and each biennium thereafter, the amount
of moneys expended by the department for the operation and  maintenance of Shutter Creek
Correctional Institution must be equal  to or greater than the amount of moneys expended
by the department for the operation and maintenance  of the institution during the biennium
beginning July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3712