Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 197.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Industrial use” includes heavy, medium or light manufacturing, warehousing or  dis-
tribution of goods, automotive repair or body  shop, food processing, animal processing, waste
processing and  recycling or other manufacturing that requires an environmental discharge
permit.
(b) “Public health impacts analysis” means a document that measures or estimates pub-
lic health impacts of a particular industrial use, including air, water or land  pollution, path-
ways of human exposure, pedestrian safety, traffic emissions, noise, vibration, glare or light
pollution and urban heat island effects.
(c) “Sensitive uses” means uses of land frequently made by vulnerable populations,  in-
cluding residential uses or uses for public or private parks, schools, child care  facilities,
hospitals or residential care facilities.
(2) The comprehensive plan of each local government must include a map  identifying
sensitive uses within the urban growth boundary. The map must be updated each time a local
government updates its economic opportunity assessment under a statewide land use plan-
ning goal relating to economic development.
(3) Before an industrial use may  be sited within 1000 feet of a sensitive use, the local
government shall:
(a) Require the applicant to prepare a  public health impacts analysis for the industrial
use on sensitive uses, including sensitive uses  not mapped under subsection (2) of this sec-
tion.
(b) Adopt conditions of approval that protect sensitive uses from impacts identified in a
public health impacts analysis.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1066
HB 3062
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
(c) Prior to and separate from the final evidentiary hearing described in ORS 197.797,
conduct an additional hearing as provided in ORS 197.797 except that:
(A) In addition to notice provided under ORS 197.797 (2)(a), notice  must also be provided
to owners of record of property on the most recent  property tax assessment roll, where such
property is used for a sensitive use.
(B) The hearing will be exclusively for  considering evidence, arguments, and testimony
relating to:
(i) The adequacy of  the public health impacts analysis, including the need to include ad-
ditional sensitive uses; and
(ii) The conditions of approval required under paragraph (b) of this subsection and crite-
ria applicable to those conditions.
SECTION 3.
On or before January 1, 2027, each local government shall amend its com-
prehensive plan and adopt land use regulations to comply with section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]