Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of  State Police shall create an electronic statewide system
for the application and issuance of  search warrants pursuant to ORS 133.545. The system
must allow a person to make  an application for and receive authorization to execute a search
warrant from any location.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department of State Police, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may  be expended to create an electronic
statewide system for the application and issuance of search warrants pursuant  to ORS
133.545 as required under section 1 of this 2023 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3631