Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A person commits the  crime of incident exposure if the person exposes
the person’s genitalia while  in a public place, or a place visible from a public place, if the
place is open or available to persons of the opposite sex or minors.
(2) Indecent exposure is a Class B misdemeanor.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 161.005 is amended to read:
161.005. ORS 161.005 to 161.055,  161.065, 161.085 to 161.125, 161.150 to 161.175, 161.190 to
161.275, 161.290 to 161.373, 161.405 to 161.485, 161.505 to 161.585, 161.605, 161.615 to 161.685, 161.705
to 161.737, 162.005, 162.015 to 162.035,  162.055 to 162.115, 162.135 to 162.205, 162.225 to 162.375,
162.405 to 162.425, 162.465,  163.005, 163.095, 163.107, 163.115, 163.125 to 163.145, 163.149, 163.160 to
163.208, 163.191, 163.196, 163.215 to  163.257, 163.261, 163.263, 163.264, 163.266, 163.275, 163.285,
163.305 to 163.467, 163.429,  163.432, 163.433, 163.472, 163.505 to 163.575, 163.665 to 163.693, 163.700,
163.701, 163.715, 164.005, 164.015 to 164.135, 164.138, 164.140, 164.205 to 164.270,  164.305 to 164.377,
164.395 to 164.415,  164.805, 164.857, 164.886, 165.002 to 165.102, 165.109, 165.118, 165.805, 165.815,
166.005 to 166.095, 166.119, 166.125, 166.128, 166.350, 166.382, 166.384, 166.660, 167.002  to 167.027,
167.057, 167.060 to 167.100, 167.117, 167.122 to 167.162, 167.203 to 167.252,  167.310 to 167.340, 167.350,
167.810 and 167.820  and section 1 of this  2025 Act  shall be known and may be cited as Oregon
Criminal Code of 1971.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 856