Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 171.875 is amended to read:
171.875. [Every proposed legislative measure  that mandates a health insurance coverage, whether
by requiring payment for certain providers  or by requiring an offering of a health insurance coverage
by an insurer or health care service contractor as a component of individual or group health insurance
policies, shall be accompanied by a  report that assesses both the social and financial effects of the
coverage in the manner provided in  ORS 171.880, including the efficacy of the treatment or service
proposed. The report may  be prepared either by the chief sponsor or by any other proponent of the
proposed measure. The report shall be submitted with  the proposed measure when the proposed meas-
ure is submitted for filing, and shall be in writing and be a public record. ]
(1) The Health Insurance Mandate Review Advisory Committee  is established, consisting
of the following members jointly appointed by the President of the  Senate and the Speaker
of the House of Representatives:
(a) One member  representing businesses that offer group health insurance plans to em-
ployees.
(b) One member representing insurers that offer health benefit plans.
(c) One member representing health care  providers who are not employed by insurers
that offer health benefit plans.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 16
HB 4091
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) One member representing consumers of health insurance benefits who  are not rep-
resentative of businesses that  offer group health insurance, insurers or health care provid-
ers.
(e) One member representing an  organization or collaborative that promotes health eq-
uity policies and practices that are informed by racial justice principles.
(f) One member with expertise in the provision of health care  in rural areas of this state.
(2) The term of office  of each member of the advisory committee is four years, but the
President and Speaker may jointly remove a member for any cause. If there is a vacancy for
any cause,  the President and the Speaker shall make an appointment to become immediately
effective for the unexpired term.
(3) During the interim period between a regular or  special session of the Legislative As-
sembly, the chair or vice chair of an  interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related
to health may submit to  the Health Insurance Mandate Review Advisory Committee a pro-
posed legislative measure, sponsored by the committee or submitted  to the chair or vice
chair by the chief sponsor of the proposed measure, that mandates a health insurance  cov-
erage, whether by requiring payment for certain providers or by requiring an offering of a
health insurance coverage by an insurer or a health care  service contractor as a component
of individual or group health insurance policies.
(4)(a) The advisory committee shall develop and implement a process for reviewing  and
producing a report in accordance with ORS 171.880 on each proposed legislative measure  de-
scribed in subsection (3) of this section.
(b) With respect to each proposed measure described in  subsection (3) of this section, the
Legislative Policy and Research Director shall collect and  compile the data needed by the
advisory committee to analyze and make findings on each  factor listed in ORS 171.880 and
produce a report of its findings no later than January 15 of the year in which the proposed
measure may be introduced or 15 days after the date that  the review was requested, which-
ever is later.
(5) A majority of the members of the  advisory committee constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by the advisory  committee requires the approval of a majority of the
members of the advisory committee.
(7) The advisory committee shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) The  advisory committee shall meet at times and places specified by the call of the
chairperson or of a majority of the members of the advisory committee but may not meet
during a regular or special session of the Legislative Assembly.
(9) The advisory committee may adopt rules necessary for  the operation of the advisory
committee.
(10) The  Legislative Policy and Research Director shall provide staff support to the ad-
visory committee.
(11) Members of the advisory committee are not  entitled to compensation or reimburse-
ment for expenses and serve as volunteers on the advisory committee.
(12) All agencies of  state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, and the Oregon Health
and Science University are directed to assist the advisory committee in the performance of
the duties of the  advisory committee and, to the extent permitted by laws relating to
confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members  of the advisory committee
[2]
HB 4091
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 171.880 is amended to read:
171.880. (1) [ The] A Health Insurance Mandate  Review Advisory Committee  report required
under ORS 171.875, to the extent  that information is available, shall include but need not be limited
to [ the following ]:
[(1) Answers to the following questions concerning the social effect of the proposed measure: ]
[(a) To what extent is the treatment or service used by the general population of Oregon? ]
[(b) To what extent is the insurance coverage already generally available in Oregon? ]
[(c) What proportion of the population of Oregon already has such coverage? ]
[(d) To what extent does the lack of coverage result in financial hardship in Oregon? ]
[(e) What evidence exists to document the medical need in Oregon  for the proposed treatment or
services?]
[(2) Answers to the following questions concerning the financial effect of the proposed measure: ]
[(a) To what extent is the coverage expected to increase or decrease the cost of treatment  or ser-
vices?]
[(b) To what extent is the coverage expected to increase the use of the treatment or services? ]
[(c) To what  extent is the mandated treatment or services expected to be a substitute for more ex-
pensive treatment or services? ]
[(d) To what extent is the coverage expected to increase or decrease the administrative  expenses of
insurance companies and the premium and administrative expenses of policyholders? ]
[(e) What will be the effect of this coverage on the total cost of health care? ]
(a) The evidence that exists to document the medical need for the treatment or  services
covered under the proposed measure;
(b) The extent of the coverage under the proposed measure;
(c) Whether the proposed measure ensures more  or less equitable access to treatment
and services by residents of this state;
(d) Whether denying the coverage under the proposed measure  will disproportionately
impact individuals described in ORS 746.021 and, if so, a description of the impact;
(e) Whether the coverage under the proposed measure is an essential health  benefit as
defined in ORS 731.097;
(f) Other state or federal laws  that relate to the proposed measure including whether
other states are defraying the  cost of similar coverage in accordance with 42 U.S.C.
18031(d)(3);
(g) The extent to which the coverage in the proposed measure  is already provided by the
Public Employees’ Benefit Board,  the Oregon Educators Benefit Board or individual, small
employer group and large employer group health insurance plans;
(h) The extent to which the  coverage in the proposed measure is provided in the state
medical assistance program as prescribed by the Oregon Health Authority  under ORS 414.065
or in Medicare Parts A through D;
(i) The extent to which a lack of the coverage  in the proposed measure results in finan-
cial hardship to residents of this state; and
(j) The financial effects of the proposed measure based on an actuarial analysis conducted
by the Department of Consumer and Business Services including:
(A) The extent to which the proposed measure is  expected to increase or decrease the
cost of treatment or services and the utilization of treatment and services;
[3]
HB 4091
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) The extent to which the treatment or services covered by the  proposed measure are
expected to substitute for more expensive treatment or services;
(C) The per member per  month cost of the proposed measure on the Public Employees’
Benefit Board, the Oregon Educators Benefit Board and enrollees  in individual, small em-
ployer group and large employer group health insurance plans;
(D) The  extent to which the coverage required by the proposed measure will cause an
increase in premiums that will impose a  financial hardship on residents in this state, par-
ticularly in rural areas or frontier areas, as designated by the Office of Rural Health; and
(E) The estimated impact of the proposed measure  on the total cost of health care in this
state.
(2) The report may not contain policy recommendations.
SECTION 3.
No later than December 31, 2026,  the Legislative Policy and Research Di-
rector, in collaboration with the Director of the Department of Consumer  and Business
Services and the Health Insurance Mandate Review Advisory Committee, shall report to the
Legislative Assembly in the manner provided in ORS 192.245 on:
(1) The implementation of the amendments to ORS  171.875 and 171.880 by sections 1 and
2 of this 2024 Act; and
(2) Recommendations for changes to allow for and improve upon the review  of proposed
measures described in ORS 171.875 (3) during regular  or special sessions of the Legislative
Assembly. The recommendations may include legislation or the need for additional re-
sources.
SECTION 4.  ORS 171.875, as amended by section 1 of this 2024 Act, is amended to read:
171.875. [(1) The Health Insurance Mandate Review Advisory Committee is established, consisting
of the following members jointly appointed by the President of the Senate  and the Speaker of the House
of Representatives: ]
[(a) One member representing businesses that offer group health insurance plans to employees. ]
[(b) One member representing insurers that offer health benefit plans. ]
[(c) One member representing health care providers who are not employed by  insurers that offer
health benefit plans. ]
[(d) One member representing consumers of health  insurance benefits who are not representative
of businesses that offer group health insurance, insurers or health care providers. ]
[(e) One member representing an organization or collaborative that promotes health  equity policies
and practices that are informed by racial justice principles. ]
[(f) One member with expertise in the provision of health care in rural areas of this state. ]
[(2) The term of office of each member of the  advisory committee is four years, but the President
and Speaker may jointly remove a member for any cause. If there is  a vacancy for any cause, the
President and the Speaker shall make an  appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired
term.]
[(3) During the interim period between a regular or special session of the  Legislative Assembly, the
chair or vice chair of an interim committee  of the Legislative Assembly related to health may submit
to the Health  Insurance Mandate Review Advisory Committee a proposed legislative measure, spon-
sored by the committee or submitted  to the chair or vice chair by the chief sponsor of the proposed
measure, that mandates a  health insurance coverage, whether by requiring payment for certain pro-
viders or by requiring an offering of a health insurance  coverage by an insurer or a health care service
contractor as a component of individual or group health insurance policies. ]
[4]
HB 4091
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(4)(a) The advisory committee shall develop and  implement a process for reviewing and producing
a report in accordance with ORS  171.880 on each proposed legislative measure described in subsection
(3) of this section. ]
[(b) With respect to each proposed measure described in subsection  (3) of this section, the Legisla-
tive Policy and Research Director shall collect and compile the data needed by the  advisory committee
to analyze and make findings on each factor listed in ORS 171.880 and  produce a report of its findings
no later than January  15 of the year in which the proposed measure may be introduced or 15 days after
the date that the review was requested, whichever is later. ]
[(5) A majority of the members  of the advisory committee constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business. ]
[(6) Official action by the advisory committee requires  the approval of a majority of the members
of the advisory committee. ]
[(7) The advisory committee shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson. ]
[(8) The advisory committee shall meet at times and places specified by the call of the  chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the advisory committee  but may not meet during a regular or special
session of the Legislative Assembly. ]
[(9) The advisory committee may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the advisory
committee.]
[(10) The Legislative Policy and Research Director shall provide staff support to the  advisory
committee.]
[(11) Members of the advisory committee are not entitled to compensation  or reimbursement for
expenses and serve as volunteers on the advisory committee. ]
[(12) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, and the Oregon Health and
Science University are directed to assist the advisory committee in the performance  of the duties of the
advisory committee and, to the extent permitted  by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish informa-
tion and advice the members of the advisory committee consider necessary to perform their duties. ]
Every proposed legislative measure that mandates a health insurance coverage, whether
by requiring payment for certain providers or by requiring an offering of a health insurance
coverage by an insurer or health care  service contractor as a component of individual or
group health  insurance policies, shall be accompanied by a report that assesses both the so-
cial and financial effects of the coverage in the  manner provided in ORS 171.880, including
the efficacy of the treatment or service proposed. The report may be prepared either by the
chief sponsor or by any other  proponent of the proposed measure. The report shall be sub-
mitted with the proposed measure when  the proposed measure is submitted for filing, and
shall be in writing and be a public record.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 171.880, as amended by section 2 of this 2024 Act, is amended to read:
171.880. [(1) A Health  Insurance Mandate Review Advisory Committee report required under ORS
171.875, to the extent that information is available, shall include but need not be limited to: ]
[(a) The evidence that exists to document the medical need  for the treatment or services covered
under the proposed measure; ]
[(b) The extent of the coverage under the proposed measure; ]
[(c) Whether the proposed measure ensures more or less equitable access to treatment and services
by residents of this state; ]
[(d) Whether denying the coverage under the proposed  measure will disproportionately impact in-
dividuals described in ORS 746.021 and, if so, a description of the impact; ]
[5]
HB 4091
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(e) Whether the coverage under the proposed measure is an essential health benefit  as defined in
ORS 731.097; ]
[(f) Other state or federal laws that relate  to the proposed measure including whether other states
are defraying the cost of similar coverage in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 18031(d)(3); ]
[(g) The extent to which the coverage in  the proposed measure is already provided by the Public
Employees’ Benefit Board, the Oregon Educators Benefit Board or individual, small  employer group
and large employer group health insurance plans; ]
[(h) The extent to  which the coverage in the proposed measure is provided in the state medical
assistance program as prescribed by the Oregon Health  Authority under ORS 414.065 or in Medicare
Parts A through D; ]
[(i) The extent to which a lack of the coverage in the proposed measure results  in financial hard-
ship to residents of this state; and ]
[(j) The financial effects of the proposed measure based on an actuarial  analysis conducted by the
Department of Consumer and Business Services including: ]
[(A) The extent to which the proposed measure is  expected to increase or decrease the cost of
treatment or services and the utilization of treatment and services; ]
[(B) The extent to which the treatment  or services covered by the proposed measure are expected
to substitute for more expensive treatment or services; ]
[(C) The per member per month cost of the proposed measure on the Public Employees’ Benefit
Board, the Oregon Educators Benefit Board and enrollees in individual, small  employer group and
large employer group health insurance plans; ]
[(D) The  extent to which the coverage required by the proposed measure will cause an increase in
premiums that will impose a financial hardship on residents in this state,  particularly in rural areas
or frontier areas, as designated by the Office of Rural Health; and ]
[(E) The estimated impact of the proposed measure on the total cost of health care in this state. ]
[(2) The report may not contain policy recommendations. ]
The report required under  ORS 171.875, to the extent that information is available, shall
include but need not be limited to the following:
(1) Answers to  the following questions concerning the social effect of the proposed
measure:
(a) To what extent  is the treatment or service used by the general population of Oregon?
(b) To what extent is the insurance coverage already generally available in Oregon?
(c) What proportion of the population of Oregon already has such coverage?
(d) To what extent does the lack of coverage result in financial hardship in Oregon?
(e) What evidence exists to document the medical need in Oregon for the  proposed
treatment or services?
(2) Answers to the following questions concerning the financial effect of the proposed
measure:
(a) To what extent is the  coverage expected to increase or decrease the cost of treatment
or services?
(b) To what extent is the coverage expected to increase the use of  the treatment or
services?
(c) To what extent is the  mandated treatment or services expected to be a substitute for
more expensive treatment or services?
(d) To what extent is the coverage expected to increase or decrease the  administrative
[6]
HB 4091
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
expenses of  insurance companies and the premium and administrative expenses of
policyholders?
(e) What will be the effect of this coverage on the total cost of health care?
SECTION 6.
Section 3 of this 2024 Act is repealed on June 30, 2027.
SECTION 7. The amendments to ORS 171.875 and 171.880 by sections 4 and 5 of this 2024
Act become operative on June 30, 2027.
SECTION 8. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[7]