Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Health  Authority shall research, study and compare behavioral
health treatment in other states and report  the authority’s findings, in the manner provided
in ORS 192.245, to the appropriate  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly no later
than September 15, 2020.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1495