Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 279C.533 is amended to read:
279C.533. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Apprentice” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(b) “Apprenticeable occupation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(c) “Apprenticeship agreement” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(d) “Apprenticeship  training program” means the total system of apprenticeship that a particular
local joint committee, as defined in ORS 660.010,  operates, including the local joint committee’s
registered standards and  all other terms and conditions for qualifying, recruiting, selecting, em-
ploying and training apprentices in an apprenticeable occupation.
(e) “Minority individual” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
(f) “Qualifying agency” means:
(A) A state contracting agency; and
(B) The  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, a public university listed in ORS 352.002
and a community college district, as defined in ORS 341.005, to the extent that the commission, the
university or the district uses funds paid directly or indirectly from the State Treasury  for all or a
portion of the construction costs of a public improvement.
(g) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
(h) “Woman” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
(2) A qualifying agency shall  provide in each public improvement contract for which the con-
tract price exceeds $3 million that the contractor shall:
(a) Employ apprentices to perform 12 percent or more of  the work hours that workers in
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1795
HB 3216
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
apprenticeable occupations perform for each contract on the public improvement; and
(b) Require in each subcontract with a  contract price of $750,000 or more that the subcontractor
employ apprentices  to perform 12 percent or more of the work hours that workers in apprenticeable
occupations perform on the subcontract.
(3) A contractor or subcontractor shall pay an apprentice for work on the public improvement
at the hourly rate to which the apprentice is entitled under  an apprenticeship agreement or that the
apprenticeship training program specifies.
(4)(a) A qualifying agency shall require as  a material provision of a public improvement contract
that the contractor  establish and implement a plan for outreach to and recruitment and retention
of women, minority  individuals and veterans to perform work under the public improvement con-
tract, with an aspirational target of having individuals in one or more of these groups  to compose
at least 15 percent of the total number  of workers who perform work under the public improvement
contract. A contractor’s plan  for outreach, recruitment and retention must require the contractor
to, at a minimum:
(A) Advertise employment opportunities available under the  public improvement contract in
general circulation publications, trade association publications and publications  that serve an audi-
ence or readership that consists primarily of minority individuals, women or veterans;
(B) Follow up on the contractor’s initial solicitations of interest by contacting minority individ-
uals, women or veterans who expressed interest in or responded  to the initial solicitation to deter-
mine with certainty whether the minority individual, woman or  veteran is interested in the
opportunities described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;
(C) Provide  all persons who express continued interest with adequate information about hiring
qualifications, pay rates, benefits, the expected  duration of employment, work hours and other con-
ditions of employment under the public improvement contract;
(D) Make  efforts to encourage minority individuals, women and veterans to seek employment
under the public improvement contract that the contractor may  reasonably expect will produce a
level of participation that meets the aspirational target described in this paragraph; and
(E) Use the services of minority community  organizations, local, state, federal and tribal gov-
ernments or other organizations that have recruiting, training and otherwise assisting  minority in-
dividuals, women and veterans as  the organization’s primary purpose or mission to assist the
contractor with outreach, recruitment and retention.
(b) A contractor shall demonstrate adequate good faith efforts to comply with the  requirements
of paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) A contractor shall require any subcontractor with which the contractor has  a subcontract
with a contract price of $750,000 or more to  comply with the requirements set forth for the con-
tractor in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(5)(a) A contractor shall report the extent of the contractor’s  compliance with this section and
the compliance of a subcontractor described in subsection (4)(c) of this section to the  [ qualifying
agency] Bureau of Labor and Industries  on forms, in a format and with contents the Commissioner
of the Bureau of Labor and Industries specifies by rule, and at regular intervals  that the qualifying
agency specifies in the public improvement contract.
(b) [ A qualifying agency ] The bureau  shall require  the contractor to submit for each contract
and subcontract the report described in  paragraph (a) of this subsection as part of, or as a supple-
ment to, certified statements required under ORS 279C.845, shall require  contractors to preserve the
reports as provided for certified statements  in ORS 279C.845 (5), may disclose the reports as pro-
[2]
HB 3216
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vided in ORS 279C.845 (6) and may enforce a failure to submit a report as provided  in ORS 279C.845
(7). The reports described  in this subsection must include, at a minimum, for each contract or sub-
contract related to the public improvement contract:
(A) The name of or other identification for the public improvement project;
(B) The city or county in which the public improvement project is located;
(C) A detailed accounting of:
(i) The total  number of hours of work that workers performed under each contract and subcon-
tract;
(ii) The total number of hours of  work that workers performed in each apprenticeable trade or
craft for each contract and subcontract on the public improvement;
(iii) The total number of hours of work that apprentices performed  for each contract and sub-
contract on the public improvement; and
(iv) The total number of hours of  work that apprentices in each trade or craft performed for
each contract and subcontract on the public improvement; and
(D) The total  number of workers who performed construction work and the total numbers of
minority individuals, women and veterans who performed construction work under  the public im-
provement contract. A report under this subparagraph must  separately list for each worker the
worker’s race, ethnicity, gender, veteran status and, as applicable, trade, craft or job category.  The
Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries by rule may specify a  method for identifying,
collecting and reporting the information required under this subparagraph,  which may consist of
methods the United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission prescribes in regulations the
United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission adopts under Title VII of  the Civil Rights
Act of 1964, 42 U.S.C. 2000e et seq.
(6) At least 30  days before making any final payment to a contractor under a public improve-
ment contract, a qualifying agency shall determine the extent of the contractor’s  compliance with
the requirements  in subsections (2) and (3) of this section. The qualifying agency shall base the
determination on the ratio between the actual number of work hours that workers  in apprenticeable
occupations performed for each contract and subcontract on the public  improvement and the actual
number of  work hours that apprentices performed for each contract and subcontract on the public
improvement, as shown in reports the [ qualifying agency receives ] contractor submits  under sub-
section (5) of this section.
(7)(a) Not later than 30 days after making a final payment to a contractor under a public  im-
provement contract, a qualifying agency shall report to the Bureau of Labor  and Industries [ the in-
formation the  qualifying agency collected from the contractor under subsection (5) of this section,
together with ] the qualifying agency’s determination under subsection (6)  of this section as to
whether the contractor and any subcontractor met the requirements  for employing and paying ap-
prentices set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this  section. The bureau may specify the form and
contents of a report under  this paragraph and may require the qualifying agency to also report ag-
gregated data.
(b) Not later than  January 2 of each odd-numbered year, the bureau shall report to a committee
of the Legislative Assembly that considers matters related to apprenticeship and apprenticeship
utilization on public improvement contracts the following data concerning each public  improvement
contract and subcontract that each qualifying agency completed within the previous two years:
(A) The total number  of hours of work that workers performed for each contract or subcontract
on all public improvement projects;
[3]
HB 3216
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) The  total number of hours of work that workers performed in each apprenticeable trade and
craft for each contract and subcontract on all public improvement projects;
(C) The total number  of hours of work that apprentices performed for each contract and sub-
contract on all public improvement projects;
(D) The total number of hours of work that apprentices in each apprenticeable trade  or craft
performed for each contract and subcontract on all public improvement projects;
(E) The total number of minority individuals, women and veterans who performed work on the
public improvement projects; and
(F) Any additional information the bureau determines is necessary to carry out the  purposes of
this section.
(8)(a) A  qualifying agency shall reduce the payment due under a public improvement contract
to a contractor that does not meet the requirements set forth under subsections (2) and (3) of  this
section. The amount of the  reduction must be equivalent to the difference between the total number
of work  hours that apprentices in apprenticeable occupations should have performed on the public
improvement project to meet the requirement set forth in subsection (2) of this section less  the total
number of work hours that apprentices in apprenticeable occupations  actually performed on the
public improvement project, multiplied by $15 per hour.
(b) The qualifying agency shall pay the amount of the reduction  under paragraph (a) of this
subsection to the State Treasury to the credit of the Bureau of Labor and Industries Account es-
tablished under ORS 651.160. The bureau shall use the amount deposited to fund expansions of ap-
prenticeship training programs, with a focus on  programs in areas of this state where contractors
did not meet the targets specified in subsection (2) of this section.
(c) A contractor, in a subcontract related to the contractor’s public improvement  contract, may
provide to the same extent described in paragraph (a) of  this subsection for a reduction in the
amount due to the subcontractor if the subcontractor fails to perform the  subcontract in accordance
with the contractor’s requirements under subsections  (2) and (3) of this section. The contractor may
also provide in the contract for a reduction in the amount due a subcontractor that fails to  comply
with subsection (4)(c) of this section.
(9) This section  does not apply to a public contract that a qualifying agency enters into under
ORS 279B.080.
SECTION 2.
 ORS  279C.533, as amended by section 2, chapter 504, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
279C.533. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Apprentice” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(b) “Apprenticeable occupation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(c) “Apprenticeship agreement” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(d) “Apprenticeship  training program” means the total system of apprenticeship that a particular
local joint committee, as defined in ORS  660.010, operates, including the local joint committee’s
registered standards and all other terms and conditions for qualifying, recruiting,  selecting, em-
ploying and training apprentices in an apprenticeable occupation.
(e) “Minority individual” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
(f) “Qualifying agency” means:
(A) A state contracting agency; and
(B) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission, a public university listed in ORS  352.002
and a community college district, as defined in ORS 341.005, to the extent that the commission, the
[4]
HB 3216
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
university or the district uses  funds paid directly or indirectly from the State Treasury for all or a
portion of the construction costs of a public improvement.
(g) “Veteran” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.225.
(h) “Woman” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
(2) A qualifying agency shall provide in each public improvement contract  for which the con-
tract price exceeds $3 million that the contractor shall:
(a) Employ apprentices to perform 15 percent  or more of the work hours that workers in
apprenticeable occupations perform for each contract on the public improvement; and
(b) Require in each subcontract with a  contract price of $750,000 or more that the subcontractor
employ apprentices  to perform 15 percent or more of the work hours that workers in apprenticeable
occupations perform on the subcontract;
(3) A contractor or subcontractor shall pay an apprentice for work on the public improvement
at the hourly rate to which the apprentice is entitled under  an apprenticeship agreement or that the
apprenticeship training program specifies.
(4)(a) A qualifying agency shall require as  a material provision of a public improvement contract
that the contractor establish and implement a plan for outreach to and recruitment  and retention
of women, minority individuals and veterans to perform work under the public  improvement con-
tract, with an  aspirational target of having individuals in one or more of these groups to compose
at least 15 percent of the total number  of workers who perform work under the public improvement
contract. A contractor’s plan for outreach, recruitment and retention must  require the contractor
to, at a minimum:
(A) Advertise employment opportunities available under the  public improvement contract in
general circulation publications, trade association publications and publications  that serve an audi-
ence or readership that consists primarily of minority individuals, women or veterans;
(B) Follow up on the contractor’s initial solicitations of interest by contacting minority individ-
uals, women or veterans who expressed interest in or responded  to the initial solicitation to deter-
mine with certainty whether the minority individual, woman or  veteran is interested in the
opportunities described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;
(C) Provide  all persons who express continued interest with adequate information about hiring
qualifications, pay rates, benefits, the expected  duration of employment, work hours and other con-
ditions of employment under the public improvement contract;
(D) Make  efforts to encourage minority individuals, women and veterans to seek employment
under the public improvement contract that the contractor may  reasonably expect will produce a
level of participation that meets the aspirational target described in this paragraph; and
(E) Use the services of minority community  organizations, local, state, federal and tribal gov-
ernments or other organizations that have recruiting, training and otherwise assisting  minority in-
dividuals, women and veterans as  the organization’s primary purpose or mission to assist the
contractor with outreach, recruitment and retention.
(b) A contractor shall demonstrate adequate good faith efforts to comply with the  requirements
of paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) A contractor shall require any subcontractor with which the contractor has  a subcontract
with a contract price of $750,000 or more to  comply with the requirements set forth for the con-
tractor in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(5)(a) A contractor shall report the extent of the contractor’s  compliance with this section and
the compliance of a subcontractor described in subsection (4)(c) of this section to the  [ qualifying
[5]
HB 3216
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
agency] Bureau of Labor and Industries  on forms, in a format and with contents the Commissioner
of the Bureau of Labor and Industries specifies by rule, and at regular intervals  that the qualifying
agency specifies in the public improvement contract.
(b) [ A qualifying agency ] The bureau  shall require  the contractor to submit for each contract
and subcontract the report described in  paragraph (a) of this subsection as part of, or as a supple-
ment to, certified statements required under ORS 279C.845, shall require  contractors to preserve the
reports as provided for certified statements  in ORS 279C.845 (5), may disclose the reports as pro-
vided in ORS 279C.845 (6) and may enforce a failure to submit a report as provided  in ORS 279C.845
(7). The reports described  in this subsection must include, at a minimum, for each contract or sub-
contract related to the public improvement contract:
(A) The name of or other identification for the public improvement project;
(B) The city or county in which the public improvement project is located;
(C) A detailed accounting of:
(i) The total  number of hours of work that workers performed under each contract and subcon-
tract;
(ii) The total number of hours of  work that workers performed in each apprenticeable trade or
craft for each contract and subcontract on the public improvement;
(iii) The total number of hours of work that apprentices performed  for each contract and sub-
contract on the public improvement; and
(iv) The total number of hours of  work that apprentices in each trade or craft performed for
each contract and subcontract on the public improvement; and
(D) The total  number of workers who performed construction work and the total numbers of
minority individuals, women and veterans who performed construction work under  the public im-
provement contract. A report under this subparagraph must  separately list for each worker the
worker’s race, ethnicity, gender, veteran status and, as applicable, trade, craft or job category.  The
Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries by rule may specify a  method for identifying,
collecting and reporting the information required under this subparagraph,  which may consist of
methods the United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission prescribes in regulations the
United States Equal Employment Opportunity Commission adopts under Title VII of  the Civil Rights
Act of 1964, 42 U.S.C. 2000e et seq.
(6) At least 30  days before making any final payment to a contractor under a public improve-
ment contract, a qualifying agency shall determine the extent of the contractor’s  compliance with
the requirements  in subsections (2) and (3) of this section. The qualifying agency shall base the
determination on the ratio between the actual number of work hours that workers  in apprenticeable
occupations performed for each contract and subcontract on the public  improvement and the actual
number of  work hours that apprentices performed for each contract and subcontract on the public
improvement, as shown in reports the [ qualifying agency receives ] contractor submits  under sub-
section (5) of this section.
(7)(a) Not later than 30 days after making a final payment to a contractor under a public  im-
provement contract, a qualifying agency shall report to the Bureau of Labor  and Industries [ the in-
formation the  qualifying agency collected from the contractor under subsection (5) of this section,
together with ] the qualifying agency’s determination under subsection (6)  of this section as to
whether the contractor and any subcontractor met the requirements  for employing and paying ap-
prentices set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this  section. The bureau may specify the form and
contents of a report under  this paragraph and may require the qualifying agency to also report ag-
[6]
HB 3216
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
gregated data.
(b) Not later than  January 2 of each odd-numbered year, the bureau shall report to a committee
of the Legislative Assembly that considers matters related to apprenticeship and apprenticeship
utilization on public improvement contracts the following data concerning each public  improvement
contract and subcontract that each qualifying agency completed within the previous two years:
(A) The total number  of hours of work that workers performed for each contract or subcontract
on all public improvement projects;
(B) The total number of hours of work  that workers performed in each apprenticeable trade or
craft for each contract and subcontract on all public improvement projects;
(C) The total number of hours of work that apprentices performed for each  contract and sub-
contract on all public improvement projects;
(D) The total  number of hours of work that apprentices in each apprenticeable trade or craft
performed for each contract and subcontract on all public improvement projects;
(E) The total number of minority individuals, women and veterans who performed work on the
public improvement projects; and
(F) Any additional  information the bureau determines is necessary to carry out the purposes of
this section.
(8)(a) A qualifying agency shall reduce the payment due under a public improvement  contract
to a  contractor that does not meet the requirements set forth under subsections (2) and (3) of this
section. The amount of the  reduction must be equivalent to the difference between the total number
of work hours that apprentices in apprenticeable occupations should have performed on the  public
improvement project to meet the requirement set forth in subsection (2) of this section less  the total
number of work hours that  apprentices in apprenticeable occupations actually performed on the
public improvement project, multiplied by $15 per hour.
(b) The qualifying agency shall pay  the amount of the reduction under paragraph (a) of this
subsection to the State Treasury to the credit of the Bureau of Labor and Industries Account es-
tablished under ORS 651.160. The bureau shall use the amount deposited to fund expansions of ap-
prenticeship training programs, with a focus on programs in  areas of this state where contractors
did not meet the targets specified in subsection (2) of this section.
(c) A contractor, in a subcontract related to the contractor’s public improvement  contract, may
provide to the same extent described in paragraph  (a) of this subsection for a reduction in the
amount due to the subcontractor if the subcontractor fails to perform the  subcontract in accordance
with the contractor’s requirements under subsections  (2) and (3) of this section. The contractor may
also provide in the contract for a reduction in the amount due a subcontractor that fails to  comply
with subsection (4)(c) of this section.
(9) This section does not apply to a public contract that a qualifying agency enters  into under
ORS 279B.080.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 279C.845 is amended to read:
279C.845. (1) [ The] A  contractor or the contractor’s surety and every subcontractor or the
subcontractor’s surety shall file certified statements with the [ public agency ] Bureau of Labor  and
Industries in writing, on a form prescribed  by the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and In-
dustries, certifying:
(a) The hourly rate of wage paid each worker  whom the contractor or the subcontractor has
employed upon the public works; and
(b) That no worker employed upon the public works has been paid less  than the prevailing rate
[7]
HB 3216
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of wage or less than the minimum hourly rate of wage specified in the contract.
(2) The [ certified statement shall be verified by the  oath of the ] contractor or the contractor’s
surety or  the  subcontractor or the subcontractor’s surety  shall  verify by oath in the certified
statement  that the contractor or subcontractor has read  the certified statement, that the contrac-
tor or subcontractor  knows the contents of the certified statement and that to the contractor or
subcontractor’s knowledge the certified statement is true.
(3) The certified statements [ shall] must  set out accurately and completely the contractor’s  or
subcontractor’s payroll records, including the name  and address of each worker, the worker’s cor-
rect classification, rate of pay, daily and weekly number of hours worked and the gross wages the
worker earned upon the public works during each week identified in the certified statement.
(4) The contractor or  subcontractor shall [ deliver or mail ] complete  each certified statement
required by subsection (1) of this section [ to the public agency ] by means of  an electronic portal
that the bureau maintains for  the purpose of receiving certified statements . Certified state-
ments for each week  during which the contractor or subcontractor employs a worker upon the
public works [ shall] must  be submitted once  a month, by the fifth business day of the following
month. Information submitted on certified statements may  be used only to ensure compliance with
the provisions of ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870.
(5) Each contractor or subcontractor shall  preserve  a record of  the certified statements for a
period of three years [ from] after  the date of completion of the contract.
(6) Certified statements [ received by a public agency ] are public records subject to  the provisions
of ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(7) Notwithstanding ORS 279C.555 or 279C.570  (7), if a contractor [ is required to ] must  file
certified statements under this section, the public agency shall retain 25 percent of any  amount
[earned by ] the contractor  earns  on the public works until the contractor has filed  [ with the public
agency] certified statements as required by this section. The public agency shall pay the contractor
the amount retained under this subsection within 14 days after the  contractor files the certified
statements as required by this section, regardless of whether a  subcontractor has failed to file cer-
tified statements  as required by this section. Neither the public agency  nor the bureau  is [ not]
required to verify the truth of the contents of certified  statements [ filed by ] the contractor  files
under this section.
(8) Notwithstanding ORS  279C.555, the contractor shall retain 25 percent of any amount [ earned
by] a first-tier subcontractor  earns  on a  public works until the subcontractor has filed with the
[public agency ] certified statements  as required by this section. The contractor shall verify that the
first-tier subcontractor has filed the certified statements before the contractor may pay the  subcon-
tractor any amount retained under this  subsection. The contractor shall pay the first-tier subcon-
tractor the amount retained under this subsection  within 14 days after the subcontractor files the
certified statements as  required by this section. Neither the public agency , the bureau  nor the
contractor is required to verify the truth of the contents of  certified statements filed by a first-tier
subcontractor under this section.
(9)(a) The bureau shall devise and implement a secure electronic system for  receiving,
filing and storing, for  later retrieval, certified statements required under this section and the
reports required under ORS 279C.533 (5). The system must:
(A) Allow access via the Internet and by means of a mobile device;
(B) Include security features that enable a person  to verify the person’s identity and that
bar unauthorized access to the account  the person uses to submit a certified statement or
[8]
HB 3216
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
report and unauthorized access to the contents of the  certified statement or report the
person submits;
(C) Provide a standardized form for certified  statements and reports that makes entry
of required information as simple, quick and direct as possible while  allowing for submission
of unanticipated information, explanations or other data where necessary or useful;
(D) Provide a means by which a person  may print or retain an electronic copy of the
completed form with all information  that a contractor or subcontractor must retain as a
record of the certified statement under subsection (5) of this section;
(E) Provide a means by which a person can electronically sign, authenticate and verify
by oath the truth of the information the person submits in the certified  statement or report;
(F) Provide a means by which a public agency charged with determining a contractor’s
or subcontractor’s compliance with ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870 can easily retrieve  information
needed to make the determination; and
(G) Allow keyword searches of completed  certified statements and reports that enable
interested persons to find  any certified statement or report completed and submitted via the
electronic portal by entering:
(i) A contractor’s or subcontractor’s name, address or other contact information;
(ii) The name of a worker whose  wages the contractor or subcontractor paid in con-
nection with work on the public works;
(iii) The  date of the certified statement or report or the date on which a worker worked
on the public works;
(iv) A worker’s job classification or rate of pay; or
(v) Other data that would enable interested persons  to find a specific certified statement
or report.
(b) In addition to the electronic portal described  in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the
bureau shall provide adequate resources to receive, file and store printed  certified state-
ments or reports delivered or mailed by persons that are unable to gain access to the elec-
tronic portal or otherwise unable to submit certified statements or  reports via the electronic
portal.
SECTION 4.
(1)(a) To the extent practicable, the Bureau of Labor and Industries  shall
complete development of,  or contract with another person to develop, the electronic portal
described in ORS 279C.845 (9) and have the electronic portal,  together with all necessary
personnel and support to enable the electronic  portal and the certified statement reporting
system as a whole to function as intended, available  for submitting and receiving certified
statements and reports not later than December 31, 2026.
(b) The bureau shall report progress on development of the portal  to an interim com-
mittee of the Legislative Assembly related to public procurement at least once each quarter
until development on the electronic portal is complete and the electronic portal is available
for use.
(2) The amendments to ORS 279C.533 and 279C.845 by sections 1 to 3 of this 2025 Act apply
to certified statements and reports that a person submits on and after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[9]