Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall produce a  report on the
effects on Oregon wolf populations of changes made  during the last 10 years in protections
for Canis lupus, commonly known as the gray wolf, under the state lists of threatened spe-
cies or endangered species established pursuant to ORS 496.172 (2).
(2) On or before September 15, 2026, the department shall submit the  report identified in
subsection (1) of this section to a committee or interim  committee of the Legislative As-
sembly related to natural resources.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2341