Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Climate  Authority, for the biennium
beginning July  1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the following amounts for the following
purposes:
(1) Carbon Markets and Policy ....... $ 9,128,620
(2) Climate and Energy Policy
and Programs............................ $ 308,214
(3) Debt Service.............................. $ 4,334,048
(4) Administrative Services ............ $ 3,931,301
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$31,898,669 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Climate
Authority.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the amount of
$3,023,370 is established  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from  the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Oregon Climate  Authority for debt service for the energy
efficiency and sustainable technology loan program,  and for the Public Schools Grant Pro-
gram.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,435,545 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum  limit for
payment of expenses from federal  funds collected or received by the Oregon Climate Au-
thority.
SECTION 5. For the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, expenditures by the State Oregon
Note: For budget, see 2019-2021 Biennial Budget
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 9044
HB 5044
1
2
3
4
5
6
Climate Authority for loans for small  scale energy loan projects and expenditures by the
department for debt service are not limited.
SECTION 6. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
[2]