Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 418.017 is amended to read:
418.017. (1) A parent may leave an infant at an authorized  facility in the physical custody of an
agent, employee, physician  or other medical professional working at the authorized facility if the
infant:
(a) Is [ 30] 60 days of age or younger as determined to  a reasonable degree of medical certainty;
and
(b) Has no evidence of abuse.
(2) A parent leaving an  infant under this section is not required to provide any identifying in-
formation about the infant or the parent.
(3) An agent,  employee, physician or other medical professional working at an authorized facility
shall receive an infant brought to the authorized facility under this section.
(4) If acting in good faith in receiving an infant, an authorized facility receiving an infant under
this section  and any agent, employee, physician or other medical professional working at the au-
thorized facility are immune from any criminal or civil liability that otherwise might result from
their actions relating to receiving the  infant. A city, county or other political subdivision of this
state that operates a sheriff’s office, police station or fire station that receives an infant under  this
section is immune from any  criminal or civil liability that otherwise might result from the actions
taken by its employees or agents in receiving the infant.
(5) When an infant has been left at an authorized facility as provided in this section:
(a) The authorized facility shall notify the Department of Human Services that an infant has
been left at the facility as provided in subsection (1) of this  section no later than 24 hours after
receiving the infant.
(b) The infant is deemed abandoned for purposes  of ORS 419B.100, and the department is deemed
to have protective custody of the  infant under ORS 419B.150 from the moment the infant was left
at the facility. The department shall comply with the applicable provisions of ORS chapter 419B with
regard to the infant.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 987
HB 3076
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
(6) The authorized facility shall release the infant  to the department when release is appropriate
considering the infant’s medical condition  and shall provide the department with all information the
facility has regarding the infant.
(7) As used in this section:
(a) “Abuse” has the meaning given that term in ORS 419B.005.
(b) “Authorized facility” means a hospital as described in  ORS 442.015, freestanding birthing
center as defined in ORS 442.015, physician’s office, sheriff’s office, police station or fire station.
(c) “Physician” means a person licensed by the Oregon  Medical Board to practice medicine and
surgery or a naturopathic physician  licensed under ORS chapter 685 to practice naturopathic med-
icine.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 418.018 is amended to read:
418.018. (1)(a) The Department of Human Services shall inform the public about the  provisions
of ORS 418.017 and the affirmative defense created in ORS 163.535.
(b) The department shall post and maintain signs outside of each authorized facility  de-
scribed in ORS 418.017, notifying the public of the facility and providing  the information de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department of  Human Services may accept
gifts, grants or contributions from any source, whether public or  private, for the purpose of carrying
out subsection (1) of  this section. Moneys accepted under this subsection shall be deposited in the
State Treasury  to the credit of the department and are continuously appropriated to the department
for the payment of expenses and costs incurred in carrying out subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated  to the Department of Human Services, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $  for the
purpose of designing and posting the signs described in section 2 of this 2023 Act.
[2]