Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 496.252 is amended to read:
496.252. (1) The Oregon Conservation and Recreation Fund  is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the  Oregon Conservation and Re-
creation Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated to the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife to carry out activities that serve to protect, maintain or  enhance fish and wildlife resources
in Oregon. The activities for which the department may expend fund moneys include,  but are not
limited to:
(a) Promoting the health of  Oregon’s ecosystems and fish and wildlife species by implementing
conservation programs and strategies identified in  the Oregon Conservation Strategy, as defined in
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 116
HB 4014
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ORS 541.890, including conservation programs and strategies for the nearshore identified  in the
marine component of the Oregon Conservation Strategy;
(b) Improving engagement of the public in hunting and fishing opportunities and in other outdoor
recreation opportunities related to and in support of healthy fish, wildlife and habitats;
(c) Improving  educational outreach and engagement of the public, including diverse and under-
served communities, related to and in support of healthy fish, wildlife and habitats;
(d) Engaging in, and providing funding for, joint projects of  the department and the State Parks
and Recreation Department or other state agencies as recommended by the  Oregon Conservation
and Recreation Advisory Committee established under ORS 496.254;
(e) Implementing a Landowners Living with Beavers Grant Program  under which the
State Department of Fish and Wildlife  and the State Fish and Wildlife Commission undertake
the following, on recommendations  from the Oregon Conservation and Recreation Advisory
Committee:
(A) Awarding grants to eligible applicants, including watershed councils, soil and water
conservation districts and nonprofit organizations, of not more than  $50,000, in each grant
cycle, to implement projects on  private land that quickly and efficiently mitigate the effects
of beavers that live on, or regularly visit, the private land, including:
(i) Tree protection tools;
(ii) Flood prevention devices;
(iii) Culvert and infrastructure protection systems;
(iv) Crop protection strategies;
(v) Landowner education and outreach; and
(vi) Training related to mitigating the effects of beavers;
(B) Providing statewide technical assistance  to develop and expand skills and strategies
for coexisting with beavers; and
(C) Authorizing and administering the expenditures described in this paragraph;  and
[(e)] (f)  Other conservation, management, research, habitat improvement, enforcement,  outdoor
recreation or education activities.
(3) The fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife  for deposit in the fund
or otherwise transferred to the fund;
(b) Gifts, grants, contributions or other donations for use as described in subsection (2) of this
section, that are received by the department  from any public or private source and caused to be
deposited and credited to the fund; and
(c) Moneys in the subaccount described in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The Private  Forest Accord Mitigation Subaccount is established in the fund. The subaccount
shall consist of moneys  appropriated to the department for deposit in the subaccount or otherwise
transferred to the subaccount and gifts, grants, contributions  or other donations that are received
by the department from any  public or private source and caused to be deposited and credited to the
subaccount. Moneys in the subaccount may be used for:
(a) The purposes described in, and the administration of, ORS 496.257.
(b) Conducting outreach to persons that own or operate an artificial obstruction, as defined in
ORS 509.580, to further the goal of fish passage.
(c) Conducting outreach to persons that may undertake projects described in ORS 496.257.
(5) The department and the  Oregon Conservation and Recreation Advisory Committee shall
[2]
HB 4014
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
jointly submit a biennial report to the Legislative  Assembly as provided in ORS 293.640 regarding
the expenditure of moneys deposited in the fund, other than moneys  deposited in the Private Forest
Accord Mitigation Subaccount, and on the status of various activities funded by the moneys.
(6) The department and the Private  Forest Accord Mitigation Advisory Committee shall jointly
submit a biennial report to the Legislative Assembly as provided in ORS 293.640 regarding the ex-
penditure of  moneys deposited in the Private Forest Accord Mitigation Subaccount and on the status
of various activities funded by the moneys.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 496.252, as amended by section 66, chapter 33, Oregon Laws 2022,  is amended
to read:
496.252. (1) The Oregon Conservation and Recreation Fund  is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the  General Fund. Interest earned by the Oregon Conservation and Re-
creation Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the State  Department of Fish and
Wildlife to carry out activities that serve to protect, maintain or  enhance fish and wildlife resources
in Oregon. The activities  for which the department may expend fund moneys include, but are not
limited to:
(a) Promoting the health of Oregon’s ecosystems and fish and  wildlife species by implementing
conservation programs and strategies identified in the Oregon  Conservation Strategy, as defined in
ORS 541.890, including  conservation programs and strategies for the nearshore identified in the
marine component of the Oregon Conservation Strategy;
(b) Improving engagement of the public in hunting and fishing opportunities and in other outdoor
recreation opportunities related to and in support of healthy fish, wildlife and habitats;
(c) Improving educational outreach and engagement of the public, including diverse and  under-
served communities, related to and in support of healthy fish, wildlife and habitats;
(d) Engaging in, and providing funding for, joint projects of  the department and the State Parks
and Recreation Department  or other state agencies as recommended by the Oregon Conservation
and Recreation Advisory Committee established under ORS 496.254;
(e) Implementing a Landowners Living with Beavers Grant Program  under which the
State Department of Fish and Wildlife  and the State Fish and Wildlife Commission undertake
the following, on recommendations  from the Oregon Conservation and Recreation Advisory
Committee:
(A) Awarding grants to eligible applicants, including watershed councils, soil and water
conservation districts and nonprofit organizations, of not more than  $50,000, in each grant
cycle, to implement projects on  private land that quickly and efficiently mitigate the effects
of beavers that live on, or regularly visit, the private land, including:
(i) Tree protection tools;
(ii) Flood prevention devices;
(iii) Culvert and infrastructure protection systems;
(iv) Crop protection strategies;
(v) Landowner education and outreach; and
(vi) Training related to mitigating the effects of beavers;
(B) Providing statewide technical assistance  to develop and expand skills and strategies
for coexisting with beavers; and
(C) Authorizing and administering the expenditures described in this paragraph;  and
[(e)] (f)  Other conservation, management, research, habitat improvement, enforcement,  outdoor
[3]
HB 4014
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
recreation or education activities.
(3) The fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife  for deposit in the fund
or otherwise transferred to the fund; and
(b) Gifts, grants, contributions or other donations for use as described in subsection (2) of this
section, that are received by the department  from any public or private source and caused to be
deposited and credited to the fund.
(4) The department and the Oregon Conservation and  Recreation Advisory Committee shall
jointly submit a biennial report to the Legislative  Assembly as provided in ORS 293.640 regarding
the expenditure of moneys deposited in the fund and on the status of various activities  funded by
the moneys.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 496.254 is amended to read:
496.254. (1) The Oregon Conservation and  Recreation Advisory Committee is established as an
advisory committee to the State Fish and Wildlife Commission and  the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife for the purpose  of carrying out the duties described in subsection (2) of this section. The
commission shall determine the number of members of  the committee and the geographical repre-
sentation by the members. The Governor shall appoint the members of  the committee. The Associate
Director of Outdoor Recreation, or the associate director’s designee, shall serve  as a nonvoting, ex
officio  member.
(2) The committee shall :
(a) Review  department policies regarding the use of Oregon Conservation and Recreation Fund
moneys, other than policies regarding the use of Private Forest Accord Mitigation  Subaccount
moneys, and make recommendations to  the commission and the department regarding the use of fund
moneys for implementing and administering department activities.
(b) Make recommendations to the commission and  the department on expenditures under
the Landowners Living with Beavers Grant Program, as described in ORS 496.252 (2)(e).
(3) Members of the committee may not  receive compensation for service as members. However,
subject to any applicable  law regulating travel and other expenses of state officers and employees,
a member may be reimbursed for actual and  necessary travel and other expenses incurred in the
performance of official  duties from moneys available to the department for the purpose of re-
imbursement of committee members.
SECTION 4.  ORS 496.254, as amended by section 67, chapter 33, Oregon Laws 2022,  is amended
to read:
496.254. (1) The Oregon Conservation and  Recreation Advisory Committee is established as an
advisory committee to the State Fish and Wildlife Commission and  the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife for the purpose  of carrying out the duties described in subsection (2) of this section. The
commission shall determine the number of members of  the committee and the geographical repre-
sentation by the members. The Governor shall appoint the members of  the committee. The Associate
Director of Outdoor Recreation, or the associate director’s designee, shall serve  as a nonvoting, ex
officio  member.
(2) The committee shall :
(a) Review  department policies regarding the use of Oregon Conservation and Recreation Fund
moneys and make recommendations to the commission and the department regarding the use  of fund
moneys for implementing and administering department activities.
(b) Make recommendations to the commission and  the department on expenditures under
[4]
HB 4014
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
the Landowners Living with Beavers Grant Program, as described in ORS 496.252 (2)(e).
(3) Members of the committee may not receive  compensation for service as members. However,
subject to any applicable law regulating travel and other expenses of state  officers and employees,
a member may be reimbursed for actual and necessary  travel and other expenses incurred in the
performance of official duties from moneys available to the department for the purpose  of re-
imbursement of committee members.
SECTION 5.
On or before September 15, 2026, the State Department of Fish and Wildlife
and the Oregon Conservation and Recreation Advisory Committee shall jointly submit a  re-
port, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, to  the committees or interim committees of
the Legislative Assembly related to the environment  on the expenditures of moneys under
the Landowners Living with Beavers Grant Program described in ORS  496.252 (2)(e), includ-
ing the status and outcomes of activities funded under the grant program.
SECTION 6. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount  of $1,500,000, for deposit in the Oregon Conservation
and Recreation Fund for purposes related to the Landowners Living  with Beavers Grant
Program described in ORS 496.252 (2)(e).
(2) Up  to $40,000 of the amount described in subsection (1) of this section may be used
for the costs of administering the grant program.
SECTION 7. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[5]