Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 137.225, as amended by section 55, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
137.225. (1)(a) At any time after the person becomes  eligible as described in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, any person convicted of an offense who has fully complied  with and performed the sen-
tence of the court for the offense, and whose  conviction is described in subsection (5) of this section,
by motion may apply  to the court where the conviction was entered for entry of an order setting
aside the conviction. A person who is still under supervision as part of  the sentence for the offense
that is the subject of the motion has not fully complied with or performed the sentence of the court.
(b) A person is eligible to file a motion under paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) For  a Class B felony, seven years from the date of conviction or the release of the person
from imprisonment for the conviction sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(B) For a Class C felony, five years from  the date of conviction or the release of the person from
imprisonment for the conviction sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(C) For a  Class A misdemeanor, three years from the date of conviction or the release of the
person from imprisonment for the conviction sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(D) For a Class B or Class C  misdemeanor, a violation or the finding of a person in contempt
of court, one  year from the date of conviction or finding or the release of the person from
imprisonment for the conviction or finding sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(c) If no accusatory instrument is filed, at any time after 60 days from the  date the prosecuting
attorney indicates that the state has elected not to proceed with a prosecution or contempt pro-
ceeding, an arrested, cited or charged person may  apply to the court in the county in which the
person was arrested, cited or charged, for entry of an order setting aside the record of the  arrest,
citation or charge.
(d) At any time after an acquittal or  a dismissal other than a dismissal described in paragraph
(c) of this subsection, an  arrested, cited or charged person may apply to the court in the county in
which the person was arrested, cited or charged, for entry  of an order setting aside the record of
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4365
HB 3829
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the arrest, citation or charge.
(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection, a person whose sentence of probation  was
revoked may not apply to the court for entry of an order setting  aside the conviction for which the
person was sentenced to probation for a period of three years from the date  of revocation or until
the person becomes eligible as described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, whichever occurs later.
(f) A person filing a motion under this section is not required to pay  the filing fee established
under ORS 21.135.
(2)(a) A copy of the motion shall be served upon the office of the  prosecuting attorney who
prosecuted the offense, or who had authority  to prosecute the charge if there was no accusatory
instrument filed. The prosecuting attorney may  object to a motion filed under subsection (1)(a) of
this section and shall notify the court and the person of the objection within 120 days  of the date
the motion was filed with the court.
(b) When a prosecuting attorney is served with a copy of a motion to set aside  a conviction
under subsection  (1)(a) of this section, the prosecuting attorney shall provide a copy of the motion
and notice of the hearing date to the victim, if any,  of the offense by mailing a copy of the motion
and notice to the victim’s last-known address.
(c) When a person makes a motion under this section, the person shall  forward to the Depart-
ment of State  Police a full set of the person’s fingerprints on a fingerprint card or in any other
manner specified by the department.
(d) When a person makes  a motion under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the person must pay
a fee to the Department of State Police for the purpose of the  department performing a criminal
record check. The  department shall establish a fee in an amount not to exceed the actual cost of
performing the criminal record check. If the department  is required to perform only one criminal
record check for the person, the department may only charge one fee, regardless of the number of
counties in which the person is filing a motion to set  aside a conviction, arrest, charge or citation
under this section. The department shall provide a copy of the results of the criminal  record check
to the prosecuting attorney.
(e) The  prosecuting attorney may not charge the person a fee for performing the requirements
described in this section.
(3)(a) If an objection is received to a motion filed under subsection (1)(a) of this section,  the
court shall hold a hearing, and may require the filing of such affidavits and may require  the taking
of such proofs as the court deems proper. The court shall allow  the victim to make a statement at
the hearing. If the person is otherwise eligible for relief under this section, the  court shall grant the
motion and  enter an order as described in paragraph (b) of this subsection unless the court makes
written findings, by clear  and convincing evidence, that the circumstances and behavior of the per-
son, from the date of the conviction the person is seeking  to set aside to the date of the hearing on
the motion, do not warrant granting the motion due to the  circumstances and behavior creating a
risk to public  safety. When determining whether the person’s circumstances and behavior create a
risk to public safety, the court may only consider criminal behavior,  or violations of regulatory law
or administrative rule enforced by civil penalty or other administrative sanction that relate to the
character of the conviction sought to be set aside. The court may not consider nonpunitive civil
liability, monetary obligations and motor vehicle violations.  Upon granting the motion, the court
shall enter  an appropriate order containing the original arrest or citation charge, the conviction
charge, if different from the original, the date  of charge, the submitting agency and the disposition
of the charge. Upon the entry  of the order, the person for purposes of the law shall be deemed not
[2]
HB 3829
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to have been previously convicted, and the court shall issue an  order sealing the record of con-
viction and other official records in the case, including the records of arrest, citation or charge.
(b) The court shall grant a motion  filed under subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section, or under
subsection (1)(a) of this section if  no objection to the motion is received, and shall enter an appro-
priate order containing the  original arrest or citation charge, the conviction charge, if applicable
and different from the original, the date of charge, the submitting agency and  the disposition of the
charge. Upon the entry of the order, the person for purposes of the law shall be deemed not to have
been previously convicted, arrested, cited or charged, and the court shall issue an order sealing all
official records in the case, including the records of arrest, citation or charge, whether or  not the
arrest, citation or charge resulted in a further criminal proceeding.
(4) The  clerk of the court shall forward a certified copy of the order to such agencies as directed
by the  court. A certified copy must be sent to the Department of Corrections when the order con-
cerns a conviction. Upon entry of the order, the conviction,  arrest, citation, charge or other pro-
ceeding shall be deemed  not to have occurred, and the person may answer accordingly any questions
relating to its occurrence.
(5) The provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this section apply to a conviction for:
(a) A Class B felony, except for a violation of ORS 166.429 or any  crime classified as a person
felony as defined in the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(b) Any misdemeanor,  Class C felony or felony punishable as a misdemeanor pursuant to ORS
161.705.
(c) An offense constituting a violation under state law or local ordinance.
(d) An  offense committed before January 1, 1972, that, if committed after that date, would qualify
for an order under this section.
(e) The finding of a person in contempt of court.
(6) Notwithstanding subsection (5) of this section, the provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this sec-
tion do not apply to a conviction for:
(a) Criminal mistreatment  in the second degree under ORS 163.200 if the victim at the time of
the crime was 65 years of age or older.
(b) Criminal mistreatment in the first degree under ORS 163.205 if the victim at the  time of the
crime was  65 years of age or older, or when the offense constitutes child abuse as defined in ORS
419B.005.
(c) Endangering the welfare of a minor under ORS 163.575  (1)(a), when the offense constitutes
child abuse as defined in ORS 419B.005.
(d) Criminally negligent homicide under ORS 163.145, when  that offense was punishable as a
Class C felony.
(e) Assault in the third degree under ORS 163.165 (1)(h).
(f) Any sex crime, unless:
(A) The sex crime is listed in ORS 163A.140 (1)(a) and:
(i) The person has been relieved of the obligation  to report as a sex offender pursuant to a court
order entered under ORS 163A.145 or 163A.150; and
(ii) The person has not been  convicted of, found guilty except for insanity of or found to be
within the jurisdiction of the juvenile  court based on a crime for which the court is prohibited from
setting aside the conviction under this section; or
(B) The sex crime constitutes a Class C felony and:
(i) The person was under 16 years of age at the time of the offense;
[3]
HB 3829
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(ii) The person is:
(I) Less than two years and 180 days older than the victim; or
(II) At least two years and 180 days older, but  less than three years and 180 days older, than
the victim and the court finds that setting aside the conviction is  in the interests of justice and of
benefit to the person and the community;
(iii) The victim’s  lack of consent was due solely to incapacity to consent by reason of being less
than a specified age;
(iv) The victim was at least 12 years of age at the time of the offense;
(v) The person has not been convicted of, found  guilty except for insanity of or found to be
within the jurisdiction of the juvenile  court based on a crime for which the court is prohibited from
setting aside the conviction under this section; and
(vi) Each conviction or finding described in this subparagraph involved the same victim.
(7) Notwithstanding subsection  (5) of this section, the provisions of subsection (1) of this section
do not apply to:
(a) A conviction for a state or municipal traffic offense , unless:
(A) The offense is described in ORS 807.570, 811.140, 811.182 (4), 811.540 or 811.700; and
(B) The person did not have a commercial driver license or commercial learner driver
permit at the time of the offense or  at the time of the filing of the motion, and was not
driving a commercial vehicle at the time of the offense .
(b) A person convicted, within the following applicable time period immediately  preceding the
filing of the motion pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, of any other offense, excluding  motor
vehicle violations and unlawful possession of a controlled  substance constituting a drug enforcement
misdemeanor as described in section  35, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, whether or not the other
conviction is for conduct associated with  the same criminal episode that caused the arrest, citation,
charge or conviction that is sought to be set aside:
(A) For a motion concerning a Class B felony, seven years.
(B) For a motion concerning a Class C felony, five years.
(C) For a motion concerning a Class A misdemeanor, three years.
(D) For a motion concerning a Class B or Class C misdemeanor a violation or a finding of  con-
tempt of court, one year.
(c) A single violation, other than a motor vehicle violation, within the time period specified in
paragraph (b) of this subsection is not a conviction under this  subsection. Notwithstanding sub-
section (1) of this section, a conviction  that has been set aside under this section shall be considered
for the purpose of determining whether paragraph (b) of this subsection is applicable.
(d) A person who at  the time the motion authorized by subsection (1) of this section is pending
before the court is under charge of commission of any crime.
(8) The provisions of subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this  section do not apply to an arrest or citation
for driving while under the influence of intoxicants if the charge  is dismissed as a result of the
person’s successful completion of a diversion agreement described in ORS 813.200.
(9) The provisions of subsection (1)  of this section apply to convictions, arrests, citations and
charges that occurred before, as well as those that occurred after, September  9, 1971. There is no
time limit for making an application.
(10) For purposes of any civil action in which truth is an element  of a claim for relief or affir-
mative defense, the provisions of subsection (3) of this section providing that  the conviction, arrest,
citation, charge or other proceeding be deemed not to have occurred do not apply and a party  may
[4]
HB 3829
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
apply to the court for an order requiring disclosure of the official records in  the case as may be
necessary in the interest of justice.
(11)(a) Upon motion of any prosecutor or defendant  in a case involving records sealed under this
section, supported by affidavit showing good cause, the court with jurisdiction may  order the reo-
pening and disclosure of any records sealed under this section  for the limited purpose of assisting
the investigation of the movant. However, such  an order has no other effect on the orders setting
aside the conviction or the arrest, citation or charge record.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  when an arrest, citation or charge de-
scribed in subsection (1)(c) of this section is set  aside, a prosecuting attorney may, for the purpose
of initiating a criminal proceeding within the statute  of limitations, unseal the records sealed under
this section by notifying the court with jurisdiction over  the charge, record of arrest or citation.
The prosecuting attorney shall notify the person  who is the subject of the records of the unsealing
under this paragraph by sending written notification to the person’s last known address.
(12) The State Court Administrator shall create forms to be used throughout the state  for
motions and proposed orders described in this section.
(13) As used in this section:
(a) “Affidavit” includes a declaration under penalty of perjury.
(b) “Commercial driver license” has the meaning given that term in ORS 801.207.
(c) “Commercial motor vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 801.208.
[(b)] (d) “Sex crime” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163A.005.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[5]