Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Employment Department shall study issues related to the family  and
medical leave insurance program. The department shall submit  a report in the manner pro-
vided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the  interim com-
mittees of the Legislative  Assembly related to business and labor no later than September
15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1290