Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 163A.125 is amended to read:
163A.125. (1)(a) A person who is required to report as a sex offender under ORS  163A.010,
163A.015 or 163A.020 due to a conviction for  a sex crime and is classified as a level one sex offender
under ORS 163A.100 (1) may petition the State  Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision to re-
lieve the person  from the obligation to report as a sex offender under ORS 163A.010, 163A.015 or
163A.020.
(b) A person who is required to report as a sex offender under  ORS 163A.010, 163A.015 or
163A.020 due to being found guilty except for insanity under ORS 161.295 for a sex  crime, and is
classified as a level one sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (1), may petition  the Psychiatric Security
Review Board to relieve the person from the obligation to report  as a sex offender under ORS
163A.010, 163A.015 or 163A.020.
(c)(A) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph  (B) of this paragraph, a person described
in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection may file  the petition no sooner than five years after the
date supervision for the sex crime is terminated or, if the person was  not subject to supervision for
the sex crime, five years after the date the person was discharged from the jurisdiction  of the court,
Psychiatric Security Review Board or Oregon Health Authority.
(B) A person who was reclassified under subsection (2) of this section from a level two  sex
offender under ORS 163A.100  (2) to a level one sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (1) may file the
petition no sooner than five years after the date of reclassification.
(d) Notwithstanding paragraph (c) of this  subsection, if a person is required to report because
of a conviction or finding of guilty  except for insanity from another United States court as that term
is defined in ORS 163A.005, the person may not petition for relief from  reporting as a sex offender
in Oregon  unless the laws of the jurisdiction where the person was convicted or found guilty except
for insanity would permit a petition for relief from reporting as a sex offender.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 350
SB 819
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2)(a) A person who is required to report as  a sex offender under ORS 163A.010, 163A.015 or
163A.020 due to a conviction for a sex crime and is classified as a level three  sex offender under
ORS 163A.100 (3) may petition the State Board of Parole and  Post-Prison Supervision to reclassify
the person as a level two sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (2).
(b) A person who is required to report as a sex offender under  ORS 163A.010, 163A.015 or
163A.020 due to being found guilty except for insanity under ORS 161.295 for a sex  crime, and is
classified as a  level three sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (3), may petition the Psychiatric Security
Review Board to reclassify the person as a level two sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (2).
(c) A person who is required to report as a sex offender under ORS  163A.010, 163A.015 or
163A.020 due to a conviction for a sex crime and is classified as a level two sex offender  under ORS
163A.100 (2) may petition the State Board  of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision to reclassify the
person as a level one sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (1).
(d) A person who is required to report as a sex offender under  ORS 163A.010, 163A.015 or
163A.020 due to being found guilty except for insanity under ORS 161.295 for a sex  crime, and is
classified as a level two sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (2),  may petition the Psychiatric Security
Review Board to reclassify the person as a level one sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (1).
(e) The petition described in  this subsection may be filed no sooner than 10 years after the date
supervision for the sex crime is terminated or, if the person was  not subject to supervision for the
sex crime, 10 years after  the date the person was discharged from the jurisdiction of the court,
Psychiatric Security Review Board or Oregon Health Authority.
(3)(a) The  State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision or the Psychiatric Security Review
Board shall deny a petition filed under this section if, at any time after  the person is convicted or
found guilty except for insanity of a sex  crime, the person is convicted of or found guilty except for
insanity of a person felony or a person Class A misdemeanor,  as those terms are defined in the rules
of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(b) The appropriate board shall deny a petition filed under subsection (2)(c) or (d) of  this section
if the board has previously reclassified the person  as a level two sex offender under ORS 163A.100
(2) as the result of a petition filed under subsection (2)(a) or (b) of this section.
(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, if a  person files a petition
under subsection (1) of this section, the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision or  the
Psychiatric Security Review Board [ shall] may  hold a hearing  or may make a determination ad-
ministratively. [ At the  hearing ] Upon considering the petition , the board shall enter an order
relieving the person of the obligation to report as a sex  offender under ORS 163A.010, 163A.015 or
163A.020 if the board determines, by clear and convincing evidence, that the person:
(A) Is statistically unlikely to reoffend; and
(B) Does not pose a threat to the safety of the public.
(b)(A) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, if a  person files a petition
under subsection (2)(a) or  (b) of this section, the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision
or the Psychiatric Security Review Board [ shall] may  hold a hearing  or may make a determi-
nation administratively. [ At the hearing ] Upon considering the petition, the board shall enter an
order reclassifying the person as a level two sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (2) if, after completion
of a new risk assessment utilizing  the risk assessment methodology described in ORS 163A.100, the
person is classified as presenting a low or moderate risk of reoffending and the board  determines
that a lower level of notification is sufficient to protect public safety.
(B) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, if  a person files a petition
[2]
SB 819
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under subsection (2)(c) or (d) of this section, the State Board of  Parole and Post-Prison Supervision
or the Psychiatric Security Review Board  [ shall] may  hold a hearing  or may make a determi-
nation administratively. [ At the hearing ] Upon considering the petition, the board shall enter an
order reclassifying the  person as a level one sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (1) if, after completion
of a new risk assessment utilizing the risk assessment methodology  described in ORS 163A.100, the
person is classified as presenting a low risk of reoffending and  the board determines that a lower
level of notification is sufficient to protect public safety.
(c) Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, if  the Attorney General,
the district attorney of the county in which the person was convicted or the county in  which
the person resides, or the victim of a crime for which the person is required to report re-
quests a hearing on the petition, the board shall hold a hearing and may not  make a deter-
mination administratively.
(5) In making the  determinations described in subsection (4) of this section, the State Board of
Parole and Post-Prison Supervision or the Psychiatric Security Review Board shall consider:
(a) The nature of and degree of violence involved in the offense that requires reporting;
(b) The age and number of victims of the offense that requires reporting;
(c) The age of the person at the time of the offense that requires reporting;
(d) The length of time since  the offense that requires reporting and the time period during which
the person has not reoffended;
(e) The person’s performance on supervision for the offense that requires reporting;
(f) Whether  the person has participated in or successfully completed a court-approved sex
offender treatment program or any other rehabilitative programs;
(g) The person’s stability in employment and housing;
(h) The person’s community and personal support system;
(i) Other criminal and relevant noncriminal behavior of the person both before and after  the
offense that requires reporting; and
(j) Any other relevant factors.
(6)(a) The Attorney General may represent the state [ at a hearing conducted ] under this section
unless the district attorney of the county in which the person was  convicted or, if the conviction for
which the person is required to report as a sex offender was  entered in another United States court,
the district attorney of the county in which the person resides, elects to  represent the state. The
Attorney General may appear at a hearing or  may submit materials to the board conducting
the administrative review.
(b) If a district attorney elects to represent  the state, the district attorney shall give timely
written notice of the election to the Attorney General, the State Board of Parole and  Post-Prison
Supervision or the Psychiatric Security Review Board and the person who is the  subject of the
[hearing] petition.
(c) If the district attorney declines to represent the state, the district attorney shall  cooperate
with the Attorney General in securing the material necessary to represent the state.
(7)(a) When the State Board of Parole  and Post-Prison Supervision or the Psychiatric Security
Review Board enters an order under this section relieving a person of the  obligation to report as
a sex offender under ORS 163A.010, 163A.015 or 163A.020 or enters an order  reclassifying a person
as a level two sex offender under ORS 163A.100 (2) or as a level one sex offender under  ORS
163A.100 (1), the board shall forward a copy of the order to the Department of State Police.
(b) Upon receipt of an order relieving a person  of the obligation to report, the department shall
[3]
SB 819
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
remove from the Law Enforcement Data System the sex offender information obtained from the  sex
offender registration form submitted under ORS 163A.010, 163A.015 or 163A.020.
(c) Upon receipt of an order reclassifying a person as a level two sex offender under ORS
163A.100 (2) or as a level one sex  offender under ORS 163A.100 (1), the department shall update the
Law Enforcement Data System to reflect the reclassification.
(8) The State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision and  the Psychiatric Security Review
Board shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.  The rules may include a filing
fee in an amount determined by the appropriate  board. All fees paid under this subsection shall be
deposited into the General Fund and credited to the account of the appropriate board.
(9) As used in this section, “supervision”  means probation, parole, post-prison supervision or any
other form of supervised or conditional release.
[4]