Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Teacher  Standards and Practices Commission, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $3,000,000 to support the Oregon Registered
Teaching Apprenticeship Program.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 811