Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 90.
SECTION 2. (1) As soon as is practicable after  an incident involving a law enforcement
agency occurs on the premises of a dwelling unit in which a  tenant resides, the agency shall
provide notice of the incident and a copy of any police report to the landlord.
(2) In carrying out subsection (1) of this section, a law  enforcement agency shall exercise
due diligence to:
(a) Determine if an incident occurs on the premises of a dwelling unit in which  a tenant
resides; and
(b) Identify the name and contact information of the landlord.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3739