Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 459A.702, as amended  by section 8, chapter 80, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended
to read:
459A.702. ORS 459A.700 to 459A.744 apply to:
(1) Any individual, separate, sealed glass, metal or plastic bottle or can, except for a  carton, foil
pouch, drink box or metal container that requires a tool to be opened, that contains  any one of the
following beverages, intended for human consumption and  in a quantity less than or equal to three
liters:
(a) Water or flavored water;
(b) Beer or another malt beverage;
(c) Mineral water, soda water or a similar carbonated soft drink;
(d) Kombucha; [ or]
(e) Hard seltzer ; or
(f) Wine .
[(2) Wine in a can. ]
[(3)] (2) Any beverage  in a container type listed in subsection (1) of this section,  other than
those beverages specified in  [subsections (1) and (2) ] subsection (1)  of this section , that is intended
for human consumption  and is in a quantity more than or equal to four fluid ounces and less than
or equal to one and one-half liters, except distilled liquor, [ wine in  a container other than a can, ]
dairy or plant-based milks, infant formula and any other exemptions set  forth in rule by the Oregon
Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 459A.705, as amended  by section 9, chapter 80, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended
to read:
459A.705. (1) Except  as provided in [ subsections (2) and (3) ] subsection (2)  of this section, every
beverage container sold or offered for sale in this state shall have a refund value of not  less than
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3419
HB 3433
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[five] 10 cents.
[(2)(a) Every beverage container sold or offered for sale in this state shall  have a refund value of
not less than 10 cents, beginning on the later of: ]
[(A) Eight  months after the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission determines that, in each of
the two  previous calendar years, the number of beverage containers returned for the refund value
specified in this section was less than 80 percent of the  total number of beverage containers that were
sold in this state; or ]
[(B) January 1 of the calendar year  following the determination by the commission described in
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph. ]
[(b) In making a determination under this subsection, the commission may  not include the
beverages described in ORS 459A.702 (3) before January 1, 2021. ]
[(3)] (2) Every beverage container certified as provided in ORS 459A.725, sold or offered  for sale
in this state, shall have a refund value of not less than two cents.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 459A.715 is amended to read:
459A.715. (1)(a) A dealer may refuse to accept from any person,  and a distributor or importer
may refuse to accept  from a dealer, any empty beverage container that does not state thereon a
refund value as established by ORS 459A.705.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this  subsection, a dealer may not refuse to accept
from any person, and a distributor or importer may not refuse to accept from a dealer an
empty beverage container described in ORS 459A.720 (4) because the beverage container does
not state thereon a refund value established by ORS 459A.705.
(2) A dealer may refuse to accept and to pay the refund value of:
(a) Empty beverage containers if the place of business  of the dealer and the kind of empty
beverage containers are included in an order of the Oregon Liquor and  Cannabis Commission ap-
proving a full-service redemption center under ORS 459A.735.
(b) Any beverage container visibly containing or contaminated by a substance other than water,
residue of the original contents or ordinary dust.
(c)(A) More than 144 individual beverage containers returned by  any one person during one day,
if the dealer occupies a space of 5,000 or more square feet in a single area.
(B) More  than 50 individual beverage containers returned by any one person during one day, if
the dealer occupies a space of less than 5,000 square feet in a single area.
(d) Any beverage container that is damaged to the extent that the brand appearing on  the con-
tainer cannot be identified.
(3) The commission shall develop and provide to dealers notices that describe the  reasons a
dealer may refuse to  accept and to pay the refund value for empty beverage containers under sub-
section  (2)  of this section. The notices may contain additional information as determined by the
commission.
(4) A dealer must post in each area where beverage containers are received a  notice provided
to the dealer under subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 459A.720 is amended to read:
459A.720. (1) Every beverage container  sold or offered for sale in this state by a dealer shall
clearly indicate by embossing  or by a stamp, or by a label or other method securely affixed to the
beverage container, the refund value of the container.
(2) A beverage container containing wine is in compliance with subsection (1) of  this
section if the container is labeled with a code that a consumer may scan  with a smartphone
[2]
HB 3433
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or similar electronic device to view the refund value.
[(2)] (3) Subsection (1) of this  section shall not apply to glass beverage containers designed for
beverages having a brand name permanently marked thereon  which, on October 1, 1972, had a re-
fund value of not less than five cents.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to wine  in a can that was filled and la-
beled before July 1, 2025.
[(3)] (5) No person shall sell or offer for sale at retail in  this state any metal beverage container
so designed and constructed that a part of the container is  detachable in opening the container
without the aid of a can opener.
[(4)] (6) On or after  March 1, 1979, no person shall sell or offer for sale at retail in this state,
in addition to beverages as defined in ORS 459A.700 (1), any beverage in liquid form intended  for
human consumption in any beverage container so designed  and constructed that a metal part of the
container is detachable in opening the container through use of a  metal ring or tab without the aid
of a can opener. However, nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the sale of a container the only
detachable part of which is a piece of pressure sensitive tape.
[(5)] (7)  No person shall sell or offer for sale at  retail in this state metal beverage containers
connected to each other by a separate holding device constructed of plastic rings or  other material
which will not decompose by photobiodegradation, chemical degradation, or  biodegradation within
120 days of disposal.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 459A.720, as amended by section 4 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
459A.720. (1) Every beverage container  sold or offered for sale in this state by a dealer shall
clearly indicate by embossing  or by a stamp, or by a label or other method securely affixed to the
beverage container, the refund value of the container.
(2) A beverage container containing wine is  in compliance with subsection (1) of this section if
the container is labeled with a code that a consumer may scan with a smartphone or similar elec-
tronic device to view the refund value.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to glass beverage containers designed  for
beverages having a brand name permanently marked thereon which,  on October 1, 1972, had a re-
fund value of not less than five cents.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to :
(a) Wine in a can that was filled and labeled before July 1, 2025.
(b) Wine in a bottle that was filled and labeled before July 1, 2026.
(5) No person shall sell or  offer for sale at retail in this state any metal beverage container so
designed and constructed that a part  of the container is detachable in opening the container without
the aid of a can opener.
(6) On or after March 1, 1979, no person shall sell or offer  for sale at retail in this state, in
addition to beverages as defined in ORS 459A.700 (1), any beverage in liquid form intended for  hu-
man consumption in  any beverage container so designed and constructed that a metal part of the
container is detachable in opening the container through use of a  metal ring or tab without the aid
of a can opener. However, nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the sale of a container the only
detachable part of which is a piece of pressure sensitive tape.
(7) No person shall sell or offer for sale at retail in  this state metal beverage containers con-
nected to each other by a separate holding device constructed of plastic  rings or other material
which will not  decompose by photobiodegradation, chemical degradation, or biodegradation within
120 days of disposal.
[3]
HB 3433
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
SECTION 6.
 Section 11, chapter 80, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 11. (1) On and after [ the operative date specified in section 10 of this 2022 Act ] July 1, 2025,
and until [ October 1, 2026 ] January 1, 2027 :
[(1)] (a)  The refund value paid for a can that contains wine as described in ORS 459A.702  shall
be not less than 10 cents, regardless of  the refund value, or lack of a refund value, indicated on the
beverage  container.
[(2)] (b) A can that contains wine may be sold or offered for sale in this state  regardless of the
refund value, or lack of a refund value, indicated on the beverage container,  notwithstanding ORS
459A.720 (1).
(2) On and after the operative date specified in section 8 of this 2025 Act and until  Jan-
uary 1, 2028:
(a) The refund value paid  for a beverage container described in ORS 459A.702 that con-
tains wine, other  than a can, shall be not less than 10 cents, regardless of the refund value,
or lack of a refund value, indicated on the beverage container.
(b) A beverage container that contains wine, other than a can, may be sold or  offered for
sale in this state regardless of the refund value, or lack of a refund value, indicated on the
beverage container, notwithstanding ORS 459A.720 (1).
SECTION 7. (1) The amendments to ORS  459A.715 and 459A.720 by sections 3 and 4 of this
2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2025.
(2) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission may adopt rules and take  any action
before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable
the commission, on and after the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section,
to exercise all of the duties,  powers and functions conferred on the commission by the
amendments to ORS 459A.715 and 459A.720 by sections 3 and 4 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8. (1) The amendments to ORS 459A.702, 459A.705 and 459A.720 by sections 1,
2 and 5 of this 2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission may adopt rules and take  any action
before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable
the commission, on and after the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section,
to exercise all of the duties,  powers and functions conferred on the commission by the
amendments to ORS 459A.702, 459A.705 and 459A.720 by sections 1, 2 and 5 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 9. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]