Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 163.472, as amended by section 4, chapter 42, Oregon Laws 2024, is  amended
to read:
163.472. (1) A person commits the crime of unlawful dissemination of an intimate image if:
(a) The person, with the intent to harass, humiliate or injure another person,  knowingly causes
to be disclosed an  image of the other person whose intimate parts are visible or who is engaged in
sexual conduct , or a computer-generated explicit likeness ;
(b) The person knows or reasonably should have known that the other person does not  consent
to the disclosure;
(c) The other person is harassed, humiliated or injured by the disclosure; and
(d) A reasonable person would be harassed, humiliated or injured by the disclosure.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, unlawful dissemination of  an inti-
mate image is a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) Unlawful dissemination of an intimate image is a Class C felony if the person  has a prior
conviction under this section at the time of the offense.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Computer-generated explicit likeness” means a visual depiction purporting to be  of
another person’s intimate parts or of the other person engaging in  sexual contact that has
been created, manipulated or altered by using a computer software program, artificial intel-
ligence, editing application or similar means, so that  the depiction is not reasonably distin-
guishable from an actual image  of the other person’s intimate parts or the other person
engaging in sexual contact.
[(a)] (b) “Disclose” includes, but is not  limited to, transfer, publish, distribute, exhibit, advertise
and offer.
[(b)] (c)  “Image” includes, but is not limited to, a photograph, film, videotape, recording, digital
picture and other visual reproduction, regardless of the manner in which the image is stored.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 840
SB 414
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
[(c)] (d) “Information content provider” has the meaning given that term in 47 U.S.C. 230(f).
[(d)] (e)  “Interactive computer service” has the meaning given that term in 47 U.S.C. 230(f).
[(e)] (f)  “Intimate parts” means uncovered human genitals, pubic areas or female nipples.
[(f)] (g)  “Sexual conduct” means sexual intercourse or oral or anal sexual intercourse,  as those
terms are defined in ORS 163.305, or masturbation.
(4) This section does not apply to:
(a) Activity by law enforcement agencies investigating and prosecuting criminal offenses;
(b) Legitimate medical, scientific or educational activities;
(c) Legal proceedings, when disclosure is consistent with common practice in civil  proceedings
or necessary for the proper functioning of the criminal justice system;
(d) The reporting of unlawful conduct to a law enforcement agency;
(e) Disclosures that serve a lawful public interest;
(f) Disclosures of images:
(A) Depicting the  other person voluntarily displaying, in a public area, the other person’s inti-
mate parts or engaging in sexual conduct; or
(B) Originally created for a commercial purpose with the consent of the other person; or
(g) The provider of  an interactive computer service for an image of intimate parts provided by
an information content provider.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]