Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other provision of  law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the  Water Resources Department, by _____, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
for technical services, is decreased by $500,000.
SECTION 2. (1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the
General Fund, the Harney Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program  Match Fund. Inter-
est earned by the Harney Conservation Reserve Enhancement  Program Match Fund shall be
credited to the fund.
(2) All moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Water Resources De-
partment to provide the state contribution for water users located in the  Greater Harney
Valley Groundwater Area of Concern who cancel ground water rights as part of  enrollment
in the federal Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (16 U.S.C. 3831).
(3) The fund shall consist of all moneys credited to the fund, including moneys  appropri-
ated or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of  the
General Fund,  the amount of $500,000, for deposit in the Harney Conservation Reserve En-
hancement Program Match Fund established under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by _____,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum
limit for  payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous
Receipts, and including federal funds received under cooperative agreements with  or con-
tracts from the Bureau of Reclamation of the United States  Department of the Interior, the
United States Army Corps of Engineers, the United  States Geological Survey, the Bonneville
Power Administration and the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation, but  excluding lottery
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 408
HB 2813
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
funds and federal funds not described in this  section, collected or received by the Water
Resources Department, for technical services, is increased by $500,000,  for authorized
expenditures of moneys deposited in the Harney Conservation Reserve  Enhancement Pro-
gram Match Fund established under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]