Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to  the Legislative Assembly, for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2023, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $____, for the offices of the Senate
Independent Caucus, for the following positions:
(1) Caucus administrator;
(2) Legislative director; and
(3) Communications director.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4303