Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Human Services,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of
the General Fund, the amount of $700,000,  which may be expended for Oregon Hunger Re-
sponse Fund program services administered by the department in  accordance with ORS
458.530.
SECTION 2. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3294