Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 537.505 to
537.795.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Greater Harney Valley Groundwater Area of Concern” has the meaning given  that
term by the Water Resources Commission pursuant to ORS 537.743.
(b) “Minor amendment” means a change to an existing voluntary agreement that would
not result in  the voluntary agreement being a detriment to the public welfare, safety and
health or contrary in any particular to the intent, purposes and requirements of ORS 537.505
to 537.795 and 537.992.
(c) “Subarea” means a portion of the Greater Harney Valley Groundwater Area  of Con-
cern established and defined by the commission.
(d) “Voluntary agreement” means an agreement entered into  and approved in accordance
with this section.
(2) In the administration of ORS 537.505 to  537.795 and 537.992, the commission shall en-
courage, promote and approve voluntary  agreements between ground water users from the
same subarea of the Greater Harney Valley Groundwater Area of Concern to allow  ground
water users to determine how to achieve reasonably stable ground water levels over time in
ways that best serve local communities and the long-term sustainability of the resource.
(3)(a) Parties to a voluntary agreement may include:
(A) Individuals, corporations, associations, firms, partnerships, limited liability compa-
nies and joint stock companies;
(B) Local governments, as defined in ORS 174.116;
(C) The United States Government, or any federal department or agency;
(D) A federally recognized Indian tribe; and
(E) Subject to paragraph  (b) of this subsection, an agency of state government, as defined
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 166
HB 4049
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in ORS 174.111.
(b) The State of Oregon may only exercise the rights of  a party to a voluntary agreement
in the state’s capacity as a landowner.
(4)(a) Subject to paragraph (b)  of this subsection, any existing ground water right that
has not been canceled under ORS  540.610 to 540.650 may be included in a voluntary agree-
ment, including:
(A) A  ground water right or point of appropriation that is subject to and has exceeded a
condition that restricts water use based on a decline in ground water levels; or
(B) A ground water right or  point of appropriation subject to regulation following the
contested case associated  with the designation of Harney Valley as a Critical Groundwater
Area by the commission.
(b) A ground water right or point  of appropriation may be included in a voluntary
agreement, provided that withdrawals do not cause  water levels to exceed the limits estab-
lished in the voluntary agreement.
(5) A voluntary agreement must:
(a) Establish the baseline condition from which ground  water use reductions will be cal-
culated. Baseline conditions must account for whether and how any conservation practices
or water  use efficiency improvements implemented by a party during the five years imme-
diately preceding execution of the voluntary agreement will be recognized.
(b) Establish an agreed upon limit on the total volume  of water that may be used under
the voluntary agreement each year.
(c) Establish a schedule for implementing ground water use reductions, which may  in-
clude phased or adaptive timelines.
(d) Describe  how the parties will evaluate compliance with the voluntary agreement,
which may include but need not be limited to:
(A) A description of sources of data that the parties will use to measure ground  water
levels, water level trends, water  use and the effect of conservation and water efficiencies
implemented as part of the voluntary agreement; and
(B) Whether to credit the implementation of  efficiencies that are consistent with appli-
cable law and the long-term sustainability of the resource, even if ground water  levels are
not measurably increasing due to low-recharge geologic formations  and hydrogeological
conditions.
(6)(a) Parties seeking approval of a  voluntary agreement must submit the voluntary
agreement and any supporting documents to the commission.
(b) The commission shall place a voluntary agreement submitted to the commission on
the agenda of  the regularly scheduled meeting of the commission next following the 90th day
after the date on which the commission received the voluntary agreement.
(7)(a) No  later than 30 days after the commission receives a voluntary agreement, the
Water Resources Department shall:
(A) Review the voluntary agreement; and
(B) Meet with the parties to the voluntary  agreement to provide feedback based on the
department’s review.
(b) No later than 30 days after meeting with the department under paragraph  (a) of this
subsection, the parties to the agreement shall:
(A) Submit an updated agreement to the commission; or
[2]
HB 4049
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Notify the commission and the department that the parties have declined to  make
updates to the voluntary agreement.
(c) The department shall prepare a recommendation  to the commission, based on appli-
cable law, for approval  or rejection of the voluntary agreement, including any updates to the
voluntary agreement made pursuant to this subsection.
(8) The commission shall approve a voluntary agreement if  the commission finds that the
voluntary agreement:
(a) Is consistent  with the intent, purposes and requirements of ORS 537.505 to 537.795 and
537.992;
(b) Is likely to achieve reasonably stable ground water levels over time;
(c) Is likely to minimize and mitigate economic impacts to the region; and
(d) Satisfies the requirements of subsections (3) to (5) of this section.
(9) Notwithstanding any other provision of  law, the commission may not require a mini-
mum level of participation in a voluntary agreement as a condition of approval.
(10) Approval or rejection by the commission of a  voluntary agreement described in this
section shall constitute an order other than a  contested case subject to review as provided
in ORS 183.484.
(11) Notwithstanding ORS 536.025, the commission  may not delegate to the department
or the  Water Resources Director the commission’s authority to approve or reject a volun-
tary agreement.
(12) A  voluntary agreement shall control in lieu of a formal order of the commission or
rule adopted under ORS 537.505 to 537.795 and 537.992 until the agreement is terminated.
(13) After approval of a voluntary agreement the parties shall:
(a) Install a  wireless totalizing flow meter on any well used to appropriate ground water
under the voluntary agreement and maintain and  repair flow meters as needed prior to and
during the irrigation season;
(b) Prior to each irrigation season, and no later than March  1 of each year, develop an
irrigation plan for total annual use of ground  water under the terms of the voluntary
agreement, including the rate, duty and  acres to which water will be applied for irrigation
and the wells from which water will be appropriated;
(c) No later than November 15 of  each year, report to the department the parties’ actual
total annual use of ground water under the voluntary agreement; and
(d) Comply with the terms and conditions of the voluntary agreement.
(14)(a) The parties to a voluntary agreement may make minor  amendments to the vol-
untary agreement  after providing the proposed minor amendments to the department. The
parties may not implement the prosed minor amendments  until the department responds to
the proposed minor amendments or 30  days has passed since the parties provided the pro-
posed minor amendments to the department, whichever occurs first.
(b) Proposed minor amendments submitted to the department under  this subsection
section do not require the approval of the commission.
(15) Notwithstanding ORS 540.520 and 540.523, the  parties to a voluntary agreement may
change the place of use, type of use, point of diversion or point of appropriation of  water
covered under the voluntary agreement without making  an application required by ORS
540.520 or 540.523.
(16)(a) A voluntary agreement may only be terminated by:
[3]
HB 4049
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
(A) The lapse of time as provided in the voluntary agreement;
(B) The consent of the parties to the voluntary agreement; or
(C) Order of the commission, if the commission finds that:
(i) The voluntary agreement is not being substantially complied with by the parties; or
(ii) Changed conditions have made the continuance of the voluntary agreement a detri-
ment to the public welfare, safety and  health or contrary in any particular to the intent,
purposes and requirements of ORS 537.505 to 537.795 and 537.992.
(b) The commission shall hold a public hearing,  for which adequate notice was provided
to the parties and the public, before making a finding described in paragraph (a)(C)  of this
subsection.
SECTION 3.
This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]