Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 2. (1)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall  establish fee-for-service re-
imbursement rates in the medical assistance program  for inpatient psychiatric services
provided by hospitals that are no less than the budgeted, per diem rates for inpatient  psy-
chiatric rehabilitation provided by the Oregon State Hospital.
(b) The authority shall adjust  the rates established under this subsection to correspond
with any increases in the rates paid for individuals receiving inpatient psychiatric rehabili-
tation at the Oregon State Hospital.
(2) A coordinated care organization shall reimburse hospitals for providing inpatient
psychiatric services at the rates established in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies to contracts between  a coordinated care
organization and the Oregon Health Authority entered  into, amended or renewed on or after
the effective date of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2761