Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 247.016 is amended to read:
247.016. (1) Subject  to this section, an otherwise qualified person who is at least 16 years of age
may register to vote.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a person who  registers to vote under
subsection (1) of  this section may not vote in an election until the person attains the age of 18 years.
(3) A person who registers to vote  under subsection (1) of this section not later than 21
days before the date of the primary election and who will attain the age of 18 years after the
primary election but on or before the date of the general election may participate in  the
primary election for the purpose of selecting the nominees of a major political party:
(a) With which the person  who registered to vote under subsection (1) of this section is
affiliated; and
(b) That has  provided under ORS 254.365 for a primary election that includes persons
affiliated with the party who will attain the age of 18 years  after the primary election but
on or before the date of the general election.
[(3)] (4)  If a  person who registers to vote under subsection (1) of this section will be under 18
years of age on the date of the next election held  on a date listed in ORS 171.185 or the next special
election, the person’s voter registration information, including but not limited  to the person’s name
and any identifying information, may not be disclosed as a public  record under ORS 192.311 to
192.478.
SECTION 2.  ORS 254.365 is amended to read:
254.365. (1) An elector  is not qualified or permitted to vote at any primary election for any
candidate of a major political party, and it is unlawful for the elector to offer to do so, unless:
(a) The elector  is registered as being affiliated with one of the major political parties nominating
or electing its candidates for public office at the primary election; or
(b) The elector is registered as not being affiliated with any political party and  wishes to vote
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 806
HB 2707
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in the primary election  of a major political party that has provided under subsection (3) of this
section for a primary election that admits electors not affiliated with any political party.
(2) Except as provided in  ORS 254.470 (3), any elector offering to vote at the primary election
shall be given a ballot of the major political party with which the elector is registered  as being af-
filiated. The elector may not be given a ballot of any other political party at that primary  election.
An elector not affiliated with any political party and offering to vote at the  primary election shall
be given the ballot of  the major political party in whose primary election the elector wishes to vote
if that party  has provided under subsection (3) of this section for a primary election that admits
electors not affiliated with any political party. An elector not affiliated with any political party  who
is given a ballot of the major political party associates with the party  for the purpose of voting in
that primary election.
(3)(a) Not later than the 90th day before the date  of the primary election, a major political party
may file with the Secretary of State a certified copy of the current party rule allowing :
(A) An elector not affiliated with any political party to vote in the  party’s primary election ;
or
(B) A person who is registered to vote and  affiliated with the major political party, but
who will attain the age of 18 years after the primary election but on or before the date of
the general election,  to participate in the primary election for the purpose of selecting the
nominees of the party .
(b) The party may not  repeal the rule as filed during the 90 days before the primary election.
The rule shall continue to be effective after the date of the  primary election until the party gives
written notice to  the Secretary of State that the rule has been repealed. Except as provided in
paragraph [ (b)] (c)  of this subsection, a party rule under  this subsection may limit the candidates for
whom an elector who is not affiliated with any political party may vote.
[(b)] (c)  The party rule shall allow any elector who is permitted to vote for  the most numerous
branch of the Legislative Assembly also to vote in federal legislative elections, consistent with sec-
tion 2, Article I, and the Seventeenth Amendment to the United States Constitution.
(4) If the primary election ballot includes city,  county or nonpartisan offices or measures, and
it is given to an elector who is not eligible to vote for party candidates, the ballot shall be  marked
“non-affiliated.”
SECTION 3.
 ORS 254.115 is amended to read:
254.115. (1) The official primary election ballot shall be  styled “Official Primary Nominating
Ballot for the  Party.” and shall state:
(a) The name of the county for which it is intended.
(b) The date of the primary election.
(c) The names of all candidates for nomination at the primary election whose  nominating pe-
titions or declarations of candidacy have been made and filed, and who have not died, withdrawn
or become disqualified.
(d) The names of candidates for election as precinct committeeperson.
(e) The names of candidates for the party nomination for President  of the United States who
qualified for the ballot under ORS 249.078.
(2) Except as  provided in subsection (3) of this section,  the primary election ballot may in-
clude any city, county or nonpartisan office or the number, ballot  title and financial estimates under
ORS 250.125 of any measure.
(3) The primary election  ballot provided pursuant to ORS 247.016 and 254.365 to a person
[2]
HB 2707
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
who is under 18 years old shall be  limited to stating the information set forth in subsection
(1) of this section.
[(3)(a)] (4)(a)  The ballot may not contain the  name of any person other than those referred to
in subsections (1) [ and (2)] to (3)  of this section.
(b) The name of each candidate for  whom a nominating petition or declaration of candidacy has
been filed shall be printed on the ballot in but one  place, except in circumstances where a candidate
may hold more than one office or nomination without violating ORS 249.013.
(c) In the event that two  or more candidates for the same nomination or office have the same
or similar surnames, the location of their places of  residence shall be printed with their names to
distinguish one from another.
SECTION 4.  ORS 253.540 is amended to read:
253.540. (1) Any military or overseas elector may secure a  ballot by submitting an application
as specified in subsection (2) of this section to the clerk of  the county of the military or overseas
elector’s residence, or to the Secretary of State. If the application is  addressed to the Secretary of
State, the secretary shall forward it to the appropriate county clerk.
(2) An application for a ballot by a military or overseas  elector shall be made in the form of a
written request. The application shall be valid for every  subsequent election until the elector oth-
erwise notifies the clerk  or is no longer an elector of the county. The application shall be signed
by the applicant and contain:
(a) The name and current mailing address of the applicant;
(b) A statement that the applicant is a citizen of the United States;
(c) A statement  that the applicant will be 18 years of age or older on the date of the general
election;
(d) A  statement that for more than 20 days preceding the election the applicant’s home residence
has been in this state, and giving the address of the last home residence;
(e) A statement of the facts that qualify the applicant as a military  or overseas elector or as the
spouse or a dependent of a military or overseas elector;
(f) A statement that the applicant is not requesting a ballot from any other state and is  not
voting in any other manner in the election except by the requested ballot; and
(g) If the applicant desires to vote in a primary election, a designation of the applicant’s political
party affiliation or a statement that  the applicant is not affiliated with any political party. An ap-
plicant not affiliated with any political party may request a ballot for a major political  party. The
applicant shall be sent  the ballot for the political party that the applicant requested if that political
party has provided  under ORS 254.365 for a primary election that admits electors not affiliated with
any political party.
(3) The primary election ballot provided pursuant to ORS 247.016 and  254.365 to a military
or overseas elector under this section who is under 18 years of  age shall be limited to stating
the information set forth in ORS 254.115 (1).
SECTION 5.
 ORS 253.565 is amended to read:
253.565. (1) Any military or overseas elector  may secure a special ballot for a primary election
or general election by making an application under this section if the elector believes that:
(a) The elector will be residing, stationed  or working outside the territorial limits of the United
States and the District of Columbia; and
(b) The elector will be unable to vote and return a  regular ballot by normal mail delivery within
the period provided for regular absent electors.
[3]
HB 2707
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) A military or overseas elector shall make the application for  a special ballot in the form of
a written  request. The elector shall submit the application before the date of the applicable election
to the clerk  of the county of the military or overseas elector’s residence or to the Secretary of State.
If the application  is addressed to the Secretary of State, the secretary shall forward it to the ap-
propriate county clerk. The application shall be signed by the applicant and contain:
(a) The name and current mailing address of the applicant;
(b) A designation of the election for which the applicant requests a special ballot;
(c) A statement that the applicant is a citizen of the United States;
(d) A  statement that the applicant will be 18 years of age or older on the date of the general
election;
(e) A statement  that for more than 20 days preceding the election the applicant’s home residence
has been in this state, and giving the address of the last home residence;
(f) A statement of the facts that qualify the applicant as a military or overseas elector or as the
spouse or a dependent of a military or overseas elector;
(g) A statement of the facts that qualify the applicant to vote by means of a special ballot;
(h) A statement that the applicant is not  requesting a ballot from any other state and is not
voting in any other manner in the election except by the requested special ballot; and
(i) If the applicant requests a ballot for a primary election, a designation of the applicant’s pol-
itical party affiliation or a statement that the applicant is not affiliated with any  political party.
An applicant not affiliated with any political party may request a ballot for a  major political party.
The applicant shall be sent the ballot for the political party that the applicant  requested if that
political party has provided under ORS 254.365 for a primary election that  admits electors not af-
filiated with any political party.
(3) An application for a special ballot shall be valid only for the election specified  in the appli-
cation.
(4) The county clerk shall list on the special  ballot the offices and measures scheduled to appear
on the regular ballot, if known when the ballot is prepared, and provide space in which the elector
may write in the elector’s preference.
(5) The primary election ballot provided pursuant to ORS 247.016 and  254.365 to a military
or overseas elector under this section who is under 18 years of  age shall be limited to stating
the information set forth in ORS 254.115 (1).
[(5)] (6)  The  elector may write in the name of any eligible candidate for each office to be filled
or for which nominations will  be made at the election, and , except as provided in subsection (5)
of this section,  may vote on any measure submitted at the election.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 254.370 is amended to read:
254.370. The county clerk shall maintain:
(1) A monthly registration record of  all electors registered as not being affiliated with any pol-
itical party;
(2) At each primary election, a record of the number of electors who voted from each major
political party;
(3) A record of the  number of all persons under the age of 18 who are registered as af-
filiated with a major political party and who  participate in selecting the nominees of the
political party at a primary election pursuant to a rule adopted by the political party  under
ORS 254.365;
[(3)] (4)  A record of all electors registered as not being affiliated with any political party  who
[4]
HB 2707
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vote in a primary election of a major  political party that has provided under ORS 254.365 for a
primary election that admits electors not affiliated with any political party; and
[(4)] (5)  A record of all electors registered as not being affiliated with any political party  who
vote in the general election.
SECTION 7.  ORS 254.470, as amended by section 4, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2018, is  amended
to read:
254.470. (1) The Secretary of State by rule shall establish requirements  and criteria for the
designation of places of deposit for the ballots cast in an election. The rules shall also specify the
dates and times the places of deposit must be open  and the security requirements for the places of
deposit. At a minimum, the places designated under this section shall be  open on the date of the
election for a period of eight or more hours,  but must be open until at least 8 p.m. At each place
of deposit  designated under this section, the county clerk shall prominently display a sign stating
that the location is an official ballot drop site.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this  subsection, the county clerk shall mail
by nonforwardable mail  an official ballot with a return identification envelope and a secrecy envel-
ope not sooner than the 20th day before the  date of an election and not later than the 14th day
before the date of the election, to each active elector of the electoral  district as of the 21st day
before the date of the election.
(b) If the county clerk  determines that an active elector of the electoral district as of the 21st
day before the date of the election does not receive daily mail service from the United  States Postal
Service, the county clerk shall mail by nonforwardable mail an  official ballot with a return iden-
tification envelope and a  secrecy envelope to the elector not sooner than the 20th day before the
date of an election and not later than the 18th day before the date of the election.
(c) In the case of ballots to be mailed to addresses outside this state to electors who are not
military or overseas electors,  the county clerk may mail the ballots not sooner than the 29th day
before the date of the election.
(3) For an election held on the date of a primary election:
(a) The county clerk shall mail the official ballot of a major political party  to each elector who
is registered as being affiliated with the major political party as of  the 21st day before the date of
the election.
(b) The county clerk shall mail the official ballot of a major  political party to an elector not
affiliated with any political party if the elector has applied for the ballot as provided in this  sub-
section and that  party has provided under ORS 254.365 for a primary election that admits electors
not affiliated with any political party.
(c) The county clerk shall mail the portion of the  official ballot of a major political party
stating the information set forth in ORS 254.115 (1) to a person who has not attained the age
of 18 years, but who the party has provided under ORS 254.365 is eligible to  participate in the
primary election for the purpose of selecting the nominees of the party.
[(c)] (d)  An elector  not affiliated with any political party who wishes to vote in the primary
election of a  major political party shall apply to the county clerk in writing. The application must
be completed, signed and submitted by the elector electronically, in person or by mail, in a manner
determined by the secretary by rule and must indicate which major political party ballot the  elector
wishes to  receive. Except for electors described in subsection (4) of this section, and subject to ORS
247.203, the application must be received by the county clerk not later than 5 p.m.  of the 21st day
before the date of the election.
[5]
HB 2707
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(d)] (e)  If the primary  election ballot includes city, county or nonpartisan offices or measures,
the county  clerk shall mail to each elector who is not eligible to vote for party candidates a ballot
limited to those offices and measures for which the elector is eligible to vote.
(4) For each elector who updates a voter registration after the  deadline in ORS 247.025, the
county clerk shall make the official ballot, the return identification  envelope and the secrecy en-
velope available either by mail or at the county clerk’s  office or at another place designated by the
county clerk. An elector to  whom this subsection applies must request a ballot from the county
clerk.
(5) The ballot shall contain the following warning:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Any person who, by use  of force or other means, unduly influences an elector to vote in any
particular manner or to refrain from voting is subject to a fine.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(6)(a) Upon receipt of any ballot described in this section, the elector shall mark the ballot,  sign
the return identification envelope supplied with  the ballot and comply with the instructions provided
with the ballot.
(b) The elector may return the marked ballot to the county  clerk by United States mail or by
depositing the ballot at  the office of the county clerk, at any place of deposit designated by the
county clerk or at any location described in ORS 254.472 or 254.474.
(c) The ballot must be returned in the return identification  envelope. If the elector returns the
ballot by mail, the elector must provide the postage.
(d) Subject to paragraph  (e) of this subsection, if a person returns a ballot for an elector, the
person shall deposit the ballot in a manner  described in paragraph (b) of this subsection not later
than two days after receiving the ballot.
(e) A ballot must be received at the office of the county clerk, at  the designated place of deposit
or at any location described in ORS 254.472 or 254.474 not later than  the end of the period deter-
mined under subsection (1) of this section on the date of the election.
(7) An elector may obtain a replacement ballot if the ballot is destroyed, spoiled,  lost or not
received by the  elector. Replacement ballots shall be issued and processed as described in this
section  and  ORS 254.480. The county clerk shall keep a record of each replacement ballot provided
under this subsection. Notwithstanding any deadline for mailing ballots in subsection  (2) of this
section, a replacement ballot may be mailed, made available in the office of the county clerk or made
available at one central location in the electoral district  in which the election is conducted. The
county clerk shall designate the central location. A  replacement ballot need not be mailed after the
fifth day before the date of the election.
(8) A ballot shall be counted only if:
(a) It is returned in the return identification envelope;
(b) The envelope is signed  by the elector to whom the ballot is issued, unless a certified state-
ment is submitted under ORS 254.431; and
(c) The signature is verified as provided in subsection (9) of this section.
(9) The county clerk shall verify the signature of each  elector on the return identification en-
velope with the signature on the  elector’s registration record, according to the procedure provided
by rules adopted by the  Secretary of State. If the county clerk determines that an elector to whom
[6]
HB 2707
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
a replacement ballot has been issued has voted more than once, the county  clerk shall count only
one ballot cast by that elector.
(10) At 8 p.m. on election day, electors who are at the county clerk’s office, a  place of deposit
designated under subsection (1) of this section or  any location described in ORS 254.472 or 254.474
and who are in line waiting to vote or deposit a voted ballot shall be  considered to have begun the
act of voting.
SECTION 8. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to  the Secretary of State, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $_____, to be allocated to county clerks for the purpose of  carrying out
the amendments to ORS 247.016, 254.115, 254.365, 254.370 and 254.470 by  sections 1 to 3, 6 and
7 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 9.  The amendments to ORS 247.016, 253.540, 253.565,  254.115, 254.365, 254.370 and
254.470 by sections 1 to  7 of this 2019 Act apply to primary elections held on or after the ef-
fective date of this 2019 Act.
[7]