Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Mobile integrated health care” means  a coordinated, patient-centered, evidence-
based, holistic model of  care using collaborative, interdisciplinary teams to serve patient
needs at the most appropriate level of care at a safe location of the patient’s convenience.
(b) “Mobile integrated health care provider” means a health care provider,  acting within
the scope of the provider’s license or certification under  applicable state law, who provides
mobile integrated health care services.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall:
(a) Create and maintain a  publicly accessible registry on which mobile integrated health
care providers may be listed if  they meet the application and endorsement criteria prescribed
by the authority by rule;
(b) Provide technical support  to persons applying for an endorsement as a mobile inte-
grated health care provider;
(c) Establish billing  codes for the services provided by mobile integrated health care
providers; and
(d) Provide technical support to mobile integrated health care providers and their em-
ployers in submitting claims for reimbursement or revising claims for reimbursement.
(3) The authority may contract with  a designated peer-professional organization to per-
form any of the tasks described in this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of  the
General Fund, the  amount of $500,000, which may be expended for carrying out the provisions
of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The authority  shall use $150,000 of the amount appropriated under subsection (1) of
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2699
HB 2222
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
this section  for the authority’s initial implementation and management of the authority’s
responsibilities under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(3) If the authority contracts with a third party to carry out one or more of the
authority’s responsibilities under section 1 of this 2025 Act, the authority  shall maintain
fiscal responsibility for any funds provided to the third party to carry out the responsibilities.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]