Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “continuous glucose monitor” means:
(a) An instrument or device that is  designed and offered for the purpose of measuring
glucose levels at set intervals; and
(b) Any repair or replacement parts for the instrument or device.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 414.065 and 414.690, medical assistance shall include a contin-
uous glucose monitor prescribed for a recipient of medical assistance if the recipient:
(a) Is diagnosed with any type of  diabetes by the recipient’s primary care physician or
another licensed health care provider whose  authorized scope of practice includes the diag-
nosis of diabetes and:
(A) Is treated with insulin; or
(B) Has a history of severe hypoglycemia; and
(b) Attends a visit with a health care provider  to assess the efficacy of using the con-
tinuous glucose monitor to treat the recipient’s diabetes:
(A) At least once every six months during the first 18  months after receiving a pre-
scription for the continuous glucose monitor; and
(B) At least once every 12 months after the initial 18-month period.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. The Oregon Health Authority may take any action,  including seeking any
federal approval necessary  to implement the provisions of section 2 of this 2025 Act, before
the operative date specified in section  3 of this 2025 Act that is necessary to enable the au-
thority to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in  section 3 of this 2025 Act, all
of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the authority by section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies to prescriptions issued on or after the op-
erative date specified in section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1627
HB 2955
1
2
3
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]