Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 431A.175 is amended to read:
431A.175. (1) As used in this section and ORS 431A.183:
(a)(A) “Inhalant delivery system” means:
(i) A device that can be used to deliver nicotine or cannabinoids in the form of a vapor or  aer-
osol to a person inhaling from the device; or
(ii) A component of a device described in this subparagraph  or a substance in any form sold for
the purpose of being  vaporized or aerosolized by a device described in this subparagraph, whether
the component or substance is sold separately or is not sold separately.
(B) “Inhalant delivery system” does not include:
(i) Any product that has been approved by the United States Food  and Drug Administration for
sale as a  tobacco cessation product or for any other therapeutic purpose, if the product is marketed
and sold solely for the approved purpose; and
(ii) Tobacco products.
(b) “Tobacco products” means:
(A) Bidis,  cigars, cheroots, stogies, periques, granulated, plug cut, crimp cut, ready rubbed and
other smoking tobacco, snuff, snuff flour, cavendish, plug and twist tobacco, fine-cut  and other
chewing tobaccos, shorts, refuse scraps, clippings, cuttings  and sweepings of tobacco and other
forms of tobacco, prepared in a  manner that makes the tobacco suitable for chewing or smoking in
a pipe or otherwise, or for both chewing and smoking;
(B) Cigarettes as defined in ORS 323.010 (1); or
(C) A device that:
(i) Can be used to deliver tobacco products to a person using the device; and
(ii) Has not been approved by  the United States Food and Drug Administration for sale as a
tobacco cessation product or for any other therapeutic purpose, if  the product is marketed and sold
solely for the approved purpose.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4756
SB 1198
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
(2) It is unlawful:
(a) To violate ORS 167.755.
(b) To fail as a retailer of tobacco products to post a  notice substantially similar to the notice
described  in  subsection (3) of this section in a location that is clearly visible to the seller and the
purchaser of the tobacco products.
(c) To fail as a retailer of inhalant delivery systems to post a notice in a location that  is clearly
visible to the seller  and the purchaser of the inhalant delivery systems that it is unlawful to sell
inhalant delivery systems to persons under 21 years of  age. The Oregon Health Authority shall
adopt by rule the content of the notice required under this paragraph.
(d) To distribute, sell or allow  to be sold an inhalant delivery system if the inhalant delivery
system is not labeled in accordance with rules adopted by the authority.
(e) To distribute, sell or allow to be sold an inhalant  delivery system if the inhalant delivery
system is not packaged in child-resistant safety packaging, as required by the authority by rule.
[(f) To distribute, sell or allow to  be sold an inhalant delivery system if the inhalant delivery sys-
tem is packaged in a manner that is attractive to minors, as determined by the authority by rule. ]
(f) To distribute, sell or allow to be sold an inhalant  delivery system that is packaged
inconsistent with rules adopted by the authority that are tailored judiciously  to the specific
purpose of protecting minors from the negative health  effects of unlawfully using inhalant
delivery systems.
(g) To distribute, sell or  allow to be sold cigarettes in any form other than a sealed package that
contains at least 20 cigarettes.
(3) The notice required by subsection (2)(b) of this section must be substantially as follows:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
NOTICE
The sale of  tobacco in any form to persons under 21 years of age is prohibited by law. Any
person who sells, or allows to be sold, tobacco to  a person under 21 years of age is in violation of
Oregon  law.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(4) Rules adopted under subsection (2)(d), (e) and (f) of this section must be consistent with any
regulation adopted by  the United States Food and Drug Administration related to labeling or pack-
aging requirements for inhalant delivery systems.
[2]