Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “wildlife conflict species”:
(a) Means all species of wild cats, bears, weasels,  raccoons, skunks, opossums, beavers,
porcupines, rabbits, eagles, hawks, vultures, owls and wild canines other than wolves.
(b) Does not mean wolves, deer or elk.
(2) The State Department of  Agriculture shall establish by rule a Wildlife Conflict Species
Nonlethal Deterrence Grant Program for the purpose  of facilitating projects of livestock
management or other nonlethal deterrence by individuals who raise, keep or produce live-
stock or crops in order to reduce conflicts with wildlife conflict species.
(3) Under the program, the department:
(a) Shall, subject to available funding, award a block grant to a county that:
(A) Applies for a grant;
(B) Establishes a county  program for nonlethal deterrence of wildlife conflict species; and
(C) Establishes a five-member county advisory committee  overseeing the program that
consists of one member who is a county commissioner  or a county employee designated by
a county commissioner, two members  who own or manage livestock and are knowledgeable
about the use  of nonlethal deterrence practices and two members who support wildlife con-
servation or coexistence with wildlife.
(b) Must ensure that grant funds are not:
(A) Passed through to a federal or state agency or an animal damage control program.
(B) Used to compensate for loss of livestock.
(4) The department shall adopt rules concerning the block grants to counties that:
(a) Establish a process for counties to  apply for block grants and require that applica-
tions from counties  include information about the likely effectiveness of projects proposed
to the counties.
(b) Allow  counties that receive the block grants to use part of the block grants to pay
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2480
HB 2698
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
expenses incurred by the counties in administering the block grants.
(c) Provide for distribution of block grants in an equitable manner based on the likely
effectiveness of projects proposed to the counties.
(d) Establish  a process by which an individual applying for financial assistance under a
county program provides an estimate of the potential cost of the proposed project.
(e) Establish  a scoring system for a county advisory committee to use to assess requests
for financial assistance based on the likely effectiveness of proposed projects.
(f) Require a county  that receives a block grant to annually submit to the department,
during the duration of the block grant, a report that describes the  projects funded by the
county and the amounts of financial assistance that the  county provided to individuals for
the projects.
(5) The department shall adopt rules providing that:
(a) An individual who receives financial assistance from  a county program funded pur-
suant to subsection (3)(a) of this section must:
(A) Remove all wildlife attractants at the  project site, including excess animal feed,
afterbirth and sick, injured or dead livestock.
(B) Agree not to  use lethal methods for control of wildlife conflict species, except that
the individual may take a  member of a wildlife conflict species that the individual discovers
in the act of biting, wounding, chasing or killing healthy livestock.
(b) Projects supported  by financial assistance from a county program funded pursuant
to subsection (3)(a) of this section may include, but need not be limited to:
(A) Acquiring and keeping a  livestock guardian dog or other animal that deters a wildlife
conflict species.
(B) Building or enhancing fencing to prevent entrance by a wildlife conflict species inside
the fencing.
(C) Acquiring or  constructing birthing sheds for livestock, visual or acoustic scare de-
vices or flow devices such as beaver pond levelers.
(D) Capturing a member of a  wildlife conflict species in a nonlethal trap and releasing the
live member of the wildlife conflict species in another area, with prior  approval from the
department.
(6) The department shall annually review the grant program to assess to what  extent the
purpose described in subsection (2) of  this section is being achieved. The department shall
modify the process for  awarding grants as necessary to better achieve the purpose described
in subsection (2) of this section.
(7) Each biennium the  department shall report to a committee or interim committee of
the Legislative Assembly related to wildlife, in  the manner described in ORS 192.245, on block
grants awarded to counties, projects  that counties funded and the amounts of financial as-
sistance that counties provided  to individuals for projects. The department shall post the
report on a department website.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Wildlife Conflict Species Nonlethal Deterrence Fund is established
in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned by the
Wildlife Conflict Species Nonlethal Deterrence Fund shall be  credited to the fund. All moneys
in the fund are continuously appropriated to the State  Department of Agriculture for the
purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2023 Act.
(2) The  fund shall consist of all moneys credited to the fund, including moneys appropri-
[2]
HB 2698
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
ated or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 3.
There is appropriated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $______ for deposit
into the Wildlife Conflict Species  Nonlethal Deterrence Fund established in section 2 of this
2023 Act, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1  of this 2023 Act, in-
cluding paying expenses incurred by the department in administering the program  described
in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this 2023 Act are repealed on January 2, 2029.
(2) Any moneys remaining in  the Wildlife Conflict Species Nonlethal Deterrence Fund
that are unexpended and unobligated on the date of the repeal specified in subsection (1) of
this section shall revert to the General Fund.
SECTION 5. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]