Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in sections 1 to 3 of this 2023 Act:
(a) “Eviction” means a claim for possession of real property arising under ORS 105.110.
(b) “Eviction Mediation Program” or “program” means  the program described in sections
to 3 of this 2023 Act.
(c) “First appearance” means a first appearance as described in ORS 105.137.
(2) The Eviction Mediation Program is created  within the Housing and Community Ser-
vices Department.
(3) The purpose of the program is to facilitate the rapid and low-cost resolution  of
eviction matters and to provide independent, impartial and speedy mediations  to landlords
and tenants.
(4) Under the program, the department shall establish a mandatory court-connected
mediation program for each circuit and justice court that hears evictions.
(5) Notwithstanding ORS 36.185, at the first appearance or at any time before an eviction
trial, the court  shall refer the parties to the Eviction Mediation Program. The landlord and
tenant may jointly refer themselves to the program at any time before  trial, including before
a case is filed.
(6) Under the program,  the department shall employ mediators and provide the mediators
with initial and ongoing education and training that covers topics including mediation strat-
egies, professionalism, confidentiality and landlord-tenant law.
(7) The department may:
(a) Adopt rules implementing sections 1 to 3 of this 2023 Act; and
(b) Contract with third parties to develop, support and implement the program.
(8) The Judicial Department shall assist the Housing  and Community Services Depart-
ment in developing and operating the program.
SECTION 2.
(1) To serve as  a mediator under the Eviction Mediation Program, a
mediator must:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2835
SB 434













































(a) Complete any training required  by the Housing and Community Services Department;
(b) Demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department an understanding of  court-
connected mediations;
(c) Meet the qualifications of, and be approved  by, each circuit court in which the
mediator operates;
(d) Have mediated at least 35 cases in which a mediated agreement is  reached, including
at least 25 cases with one or more self-represented parties;
(e) Have at least 200 hours of mediation experience; and
(f) Have observed at least five first appearances, five eviction mediations and five eviction
trials.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in sections 1 to  3 of this 2023 Act, ORS 36.185 to 36.210
and 36.220 to 36.238 and the  provisions of Uniform Trial Court Rules chapter 12 apply to
mediators and mediations in the program.
SECTION 3.
(1) Mediations conducted under the Eviction Mediation Program:
(a) Must take place in person whenever possible.
(b) Must be  conducted as near as practicable in time and location to any first appearance,
including inside the courthouse, if possible.
(c) May not be conducted outside of court hours without the  agreement of the parties
and the mediator.
(d) Must allow parties to be represented by an attorney or non-attorney representative.
(e) May not require a payment of fees by any party or court.
(2) The mediator shall:
(a) Attempt to get the parties to reach a settlement agreement; and
(b) Dismiss the mediation  upon finding that the parties cannot reasonably reach an
agreement, including because one or more of the parties  is not participating in the mediation
in good faith.
(3) Notwithstanding any confidentiality requirement of the mediator, if an eviction  claim
has been filed with a court, the mediator shall:
(a) Notify the court in writing of the basis of any dismissal or settlement; or
(b) If the  parties have settled the matter, prepare a written settlement agreement and
provide the agreement to the court for entry of a judgment  or order under section 6 (2) of
this 2023 Act.
(4) Notwithstanding any confidentiality requirement or rule of  professional conduct that
otherwise may apply, a judge and mediator may communicate candidly  together about cases
and state on the record the facts or reasons supporting the resolution of a case.
(5) The court shall:
(a) Dismiss a complaint brought by a landlord if the mediator finds that the landlord did
not participate in mediation in good faith; or
(b) Enter a default judgment against a tenant if the mediator finds that  the tenant did
not participate in mediation in good faith.
(6) A judge or mediator may  continue a mediation for a reasonable period not to exceed
months,  during which time any disputes arising under the agreement must be first re-
ferred to the mediator for further mediation under this section.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for  the biennium beginning July
[2]
SB 434













































1, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $1, to implement and operate the Eviction
Mediation Program under sections 1 to 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5.
Section 6 of this  2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 105.105 to
105.168.
SECTION 6. (1) Prior to trial, through the Eviction  Mediation Program under sections 1
to 3 of this 2023 Act, other mediation programs or otherwise, the  parties may enter into a
settlement agreement.
(2) Upon receipt of a settlement agreement from a party  or a mediator under section 3
(3)(b) of this 2023 Act, the court may either:
(a) Enter a judgment dismissing  the matter and including any money award or award of
costs, disbursements or attorney fees described in the agreement; or
(b) Enter an order  incorporating a written settlement agreement or the essential terms
of an oral settlement  agreement and retaining jurisdiction over the matter for no longer
than 12 months.
(3) The court  shall enter a judgment of dismissal in favor of the defendant, without an
award of costs or fees to either party, following an order described under  subsection (2)(b)
of this section if:
(a) The landlord or mediator under the Eviction Mediation Program under sections 1  to
of this 2023  Act certifies that a defendant has fully complied with the order and settlement
agreement; or
(b) Twelve months or more  have passed since the order and no claim to enforce the order
is currently pending, including under ORS 105.146.
SECTION 7.  ORS 105.146 is amended to read:
105.146. (1) In an action to recover possession of the premises, if the court has entered an order
by stipulation that provides for the defendant to retain possession of  the premises contingent upon
the defendant’s performance  or payment of moneys by a certain date as provided under [ ORS 105.145
(2)] section 6 (2)(b)  of this 2023 Act , and the defendant fails to comply with the order, the plaintiff
may obtain and enforce a judgment of restitution of the premises pursuant to  this section and ORS
105.148 and 105.149.
(2) A plaintiff may obtain and enforce a judgment of restitution  based upon [ an order entered as
provided under  ORS 105.145 (2), provided the order includes only ] the defendant’s violation of an
order or settlement agreement under section 6 (2)(b) of this 2023 Act  that includes terms
that specify:
(a) The defendant’s future performance or conduct [ as described in the order ] for a period of
not more than six months following entry of the order;
(b) Payment [ of past due rent and other past due ] by the defendant of specified  amounts pur-
suant to  a schedule [ provided in the order for ] over a period of not more than six months following
entry of the order;
(c) Payment of rent due for [ future rental periods that follow entry of the order pursuant  to a
schedule provided  in the order for not more than ] the first three monthly rental periods following
entry of the order  pursuant to a schedule ; [ and]
[(d) Payment of any costs, disbursements or attorney  fees pursuant to a schedule provided in the
order.]
(d) That the defendant voluntarily deliver possession to the plaintiff by a  specified date
and time; or
[3]
SB 434













































(e) That a court may award costs, disbursements or attorney fees based on a defendant’s
violation of the order or breach of the agreement.
[(3) The order shall contain a statement providing that 12 months  following the entry of the order,
the court shall automatically dismiss the order without further notice to either the plaintiff or  the de-
fendant.]
[(4)] (3)  If the defendant fails to comply with the order, the plaintiff may file with the clerk  of
the court an affidavit or declaration of noncompliance describing how the defendant has  failed to
comply. The plaintiff shall attach a copy of the  order to the affidavit or declaration. The affidavit
or declaration, or the order, must include the terms of the underlying settlement agreement or
stipulation or have a copy of the agreement attached.
[(5)] (4) Upon receipt of a plaintiff’s affidavit or declaration:
(a) The court shall enter a judgment of restitution; and
(b) The clerk shall issue a notice of restitution as provided by ORS  105.151 and attach to the
notice a copy of the plaintiff’s  affidavit or declaration of noncompliance and any attachments for
service.
[(6)] (5) The court shall establish a procedure  that allows the defendant to request a hearing
on the plaintiff’s affidavit or declaration of noncompliance and delay expiration of the  notice of
restitution period or execution upon a judgment of restitution pending the hearing.
(6) A defendant  may obtain a judgment of dismissal, money award or award of costs,
disbursements or attorney fees based upon the plaintiff’s violation of  an order or settlement
agreement under section 6 (2)(b) of this 2023 Act that includes terms that:
(a) Specified the plaintiff’s  future performance or conduct, including repairs, for a period
of not more than six months following entry of the order;
(b) Payment by the plaintiff of specified amounts pursuant  to a schedule over a period
of not more than six months following entry of the order;
(c) A court may award costs, disbursements or attorney fees based on  a plaintiff’s vio-
lation of the order or breach of the agreement.
[(7) The court shall enter a judgment dismissing the plaintiff’s action in  favor of the defendant
without assessment of costs, disbursements, prevailing party  fee or attorney fees against either party
except as provided in the order and without further notice to either party: ]
[(a) Upon receipt of a writing signed by the plaintiff showing compliance with  or satisfaction of the
order; or]
[(b) Twelve months following entry of the order, unless the plaintiff has filed an  affidavit or dec-
laration of  noncompliance and the court has found in favor of the plaintiff on the affidavit or declara-
tion.]
SECTION 8.
 ORS 105.137 is amended to read:
105.137. [In the case of a dwelling unit to which  ORS chapter 90 applies: ] In an action for a
forcible entry or wrongful detainer:
(1) If the plaintiff  appears and the defendant fails to appear at the first appearance  or has failed
to participate in good faith in mediation under section 3 (2) of this 2023 Act , a default judgment
shall be entered in favor of the  plaintiff for possession of the premises and costs and disbursements.
(2) If the defendant  appears and the plaintiff fails to appear at the first appearance  or has failed
to participate in good faith in mediation under section 3 (2) of this 2023 Act , a default judgment
shall be entered in  favor of the defendant dismissing the plaintiff’s complaint and awarding costs and
disbursements.
[4]
SB 434













































(3) An attorney at law shall be entitled to appear on behalf  of any party, but attorney fees may
not be awarded to the plaintiff if the defendant does not contest the action.
(4) If the plaintiff dismisses the action  before the first appearance, a judgment of dismissal shall
be entered in favor of the defendant dismissing the plaintiff’s complaint and awarding costs  and
disbursements. The defendant may not recover attorney fees for prejudgment legal services  provided
after the delivery of written notice of the dismissal by the plaintiff to the defendant, or to  an at-
torney for the defendant, in the manner provided under ORS 90.155.
(5) The plaintiff or an agent of the plaintiff  may obtain a continuance of the action for as long
as the plaintiff or the agent of the plaintiff deems necessary [ to obtain the services of an  attorney at
law].
(6) If both parties appear  [ in court on the date contained in the summons ] at the first appear-
ance, the court shall :
(a) Continue the first appearance for up to  seven days for the purpose of completing
mediation under section 3 of this 2023 Act;
(b) Enter any order or judgment under section 6 (2) of this 2023 Act; or
(c) If mediation has completed without resolution,  set the matter for trial as soon  as
practicable[ , unless the court is advised by the parties that the matter has been settled ]. The  trial shall
be scheduled no later than 15 days from the date of such  appearance. If the matter is not tried
within the 15-day period, and the delay in trial is not  attributable to the landlord, the court shall
order the defendant to pay rent that is accruing into court, provided the  court finds after hearing
that entry of such an order is just and equitable.
(7)(a) The court shall permit an unrepresented defendant to a claim under ORS chapter 90  to
proceed to trial  by directing the defendant to file an answer in writing on a form which shall be
available from the court clerk, and to serve a copy upon the plaintiff on the same day  as first ap-
pearance.
(b) The answer shall be in substantially the following form:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
IN THE 
 COURT FOR
THE COUNTY OF 
(Landlord), )
)
Plaintiff(s), )
)
vs. ) No.
)
(Tenant), )
)
Defendant(s). )
ANSWER
I (we) deny that the plaintiff(s) is (are) entitled to possession because:
 The landlord did not make repairs.
List any repair problems: 
[5]
SB 434













































 The landlord  is attempting to evict me (us) because of my (our) complaints (or the eviction is
otherwise retaliatory).
 The  landlord is attempting to evict me because of my status as a victim of domestic violence,
sexual assault or stalking.
 The eviction notice is wrong.
 List any other defenses: 
I (we) may be entitled as the prevailing party to recover attorney fees from plaintiff(s) if I (we)
obtain legal services to defend this action pursuant to ORS 90.255.
I (we) ask that the plaintiff(s) not  be awarded possession of the premises and that I (we) be
awarded my (our)  costs and disbursements and attorney fees, if applicable, or a prevailing party fee.
Date Signature of defendant(s)
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(8) If an unrepresented defendant files an answer  as provided in subsection (7) of this section,
the answer may not limit the defenses available to the defendant at trial under ORS chapter 90. If
such a defendant seeks to assert at trial a defense not fairly raised by the answer,  the plaintiff shall
be entitled to a reasonable continuance for the purposes of preparing to meet the defense.
SECTION 9.  ORS 105.113 is amended to read:
105.113. (1) Notwithstanding ORCP 7, for premises to which ORS chapter 90  or ORS 91.120 ap-
plies, the summons must be  in substantially the following form and be available from the court clerk:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
IN THE CIRCUIT COURT
FOR THE COUNTY OF
No. 
SUMMONS
RESIDENTIAL EVICTION
PLAINTIFF (Landlord or agent):
vs.
[6]
SB 434













































DEFENDANT (Tenants/Occupants):
TO:  (Street address and city of property occupied by defendant)
 (Mailing address if different)
NOTICE TO TENANTS:
READ THESE PAPERS CAREFULLY
YOUR LANDLORD WANTS TO
EVICT YOU
ON , 2  AT  A.M./P.M., you must come to the County Court House
located at . You do not have to pay any fees to the court for this first hearing.
• If you do not appear in court  and your landlord does, your landlord will win automatically and
can have the Sheriff physically remove you.
• If you do show up in court and your landlord does not, this eviction action will be dropped.
• If both of you show up:
• [ The judge may ask  you to try to reach an agreement with your landlord, but this is volun-
tary. Trained mediators may be  available free of charge to help resolve disputes. ] If you have
not already participated in mediation, you may be assigned  a trained mediator to help
you and your landlord reach an agreement.
• The court will schedule a trial if you and your landlord do not reach an agreement [ or if
you do not agree to move out ].
IF YOU WANT A TRIAL, YOU MUST:
• Show up in court at the time scheduled above;
• On the same day, file an Answer with the Court giving a legal reason why you  should not be
evicted (the Court can give you a form);
• Give a copy of the Answer to your landlord (or your landlord’s agent or attorney); and
• Pay a  filing fee of $
 (the judge may allow payment to be deferred in certain circum-
stances).
IF YOU HAVE QUESTIONS, YOU  SHOULD SEE AN ATTORNEY IMMEDIATELY. If you need
[7]
SB 434













































help finding an attorney, you can contact  the Oregon State Bar’s Lawyer Referral Service online
at
 (current  website) or by calling  (current phone num-
bers).
Signature of Plaintiff (landlord or agent)
Plaintiff’s address:
Plaintiff’s telephone number: 
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(2) Except as provided in  ORS 408.515 (3), the information required under ORS 408.515 must be
included with the summons.
SECTION 10.  ORS 105.135 is amended to read:
105.135. (1) Except as provided in this section, the summons shall  be served and returned as in
other actions.
(2) The clerk shall enter  the first appearance date on the summons. That date shall be seven
days after the  judicial day next following payment of filing fees unless no judge is available for first
appearance at that time, in which case  the clerk may extend the first appearance date for up to
seven additional days. At the request of the  plaintiff, the clerk may enter a date more than seven
days after the judicial day next following payment of filing fees if a judge will be available.
(3) Notwithstanding ORCP 10, by the end of the judicial day  next following the payment of filing
fees:
(a) The clerk shall mail  the summons and complaint by first class mail to the defendant at the
premises.
(b) The process server shall serve the defendant with the summons and  complaint at the prem-
ises by personal delivery to the defendant or,  if the defendant is not available for service, by at-
taching the summons and complaint in a secure manner to the main entrance  to that portion of the
premises of which the defendant has possession.
(4) A sheriff may serve a facsimile of a summons and complaint that is transmitted  to the sheriff
by a trial court administrator or another sheriff by means of facsimile  communication. A copy of the
facsimile must be attached to the sheriff’s return of  service. Before transmitting a summons and
complaint to a sheriff under this subsection, the person sending the facsimile must receive confir-
mation by telephone from the sheriff’s  office that a telephonic facsimile communication device is
available and operating.
(5) The process server shall indicate the manner in which  service was accomplished by promptly
filing with the clerk a certificate of service as provided by ORCP 7 F(2)(a).
[8]
SB 434













































(6) [In the case of premises to which ORS chapter 90 applies, ] The  summons shall inform the de-
fendant of the procedures, rights and responsibilities of the parties as specified in ORS 105.137.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 105.145 is amended to read:
105.145. (1)  If an action for possession under ORS 105.110 is tried by the court [without a
jury,] and after  hearing the evidence the court or jury concludes that the complaint is not true, the
court  shall  enter judgment against the plaintiff for costs and disbursements. If [ the court finds ] the
complaint true or if judgment is rendered by default, the court shall render a general judgment
against the defendant and in favor of the plaintiff, for restitution of the premises and the costs  and
disbursements of the action. If the [ court finds the ] complaint is true in part, the court shall render
judgment for the restitution of such part only, and the costs and  disbursements shall be taxed as the
court deems just and equitable.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 14.250 to 14.270, a  judge may not be disqualified from trying an
action under this section  solely based on the judge’s role in presiding over the first appear-
ance, mediation or other pretrial settlement matters associated with the action.
[(2) If, as  a result of a court-sponsored or other mediation or otherwise, the plaintiff and defendant
agree, in the manner provided by ORCP 67 F for judgment by stipulation, that the  defendant shall
perform in a certain manner or that the plaintiff shall be paid moneys agreed to be owing by the  de-
fendant and that as a result of that performance or payment  the defendant shall retain possession of
the premises, including retention of  possession contingent upon that performance or payment of moneys
by the defendant by  a certain date, the court shall enter an order or judgment to that effect. In addition,
if the plaintiff and defendant agree that the plaintiff shall perform in a certain manner or pay moneys
to the defendant by a certain date, the court shall enter an order or judgment to that effect. ]
[(3) If, as provided by subsection (2) of this  section, the parties enter an order or judgment by
stipulation that requires the defendant to perform in a certain  manner or make a payment by a certain
date and the defendant later demonstrates compliance with the stipulation, the court shall enter  a
judgment of dismissal in favor of the defendant. ]
SECTION 12.
 ORS 105.148 is amended to read:
105.148. (1)(a) To contest a plaintiff’s affidavit or  declaration of noncompliance under ORS
105.146 and delay expiration of the notice  of restitution period or execution upon the judgment of
restitution, a defendant shall file a request for hearing with the clerk  of the court. The request must
be filed prior to issuance  by the clerk of a writ of execution of judgment of restitution and must
include a statement by the defendant describing how the defendant complied with the order  or de-
scribing why the defendant should not be required to comply.
(b) A court may, as part of the procedure authorized by ORS  105.146 [ (6)] (5) , require that a
defendant submit a hearing request to the court for ex parte review prior to the defendant’s  filing
the request with the clerk. If the court  provides for ex parte review, the ex parte review must be
available every judicial day for appearance by the defendant before the court within the  time period
between service of the notice of restitution and the date  of expiration of the notice of restitution.
The notice  of restitution must include or have attached to it a description of the requirements for
appearing before the court for ex parte review and a copy  of the hearing request form. The court
may not require that the defendant notify the plaintiff of the defendant’s intention to appear before
the court. If,  after hearing the defendant at the ex parte review, the court finds that the reasons
given by the defendant  for opposing the plaintiff’s affidavit or declaration of noncompliance do not
relate to the issues listed in ORS 105.149 (2), the court shall deny the request for a hearing.
(2) The clerk shall make available a document providing for  a request for hearing by a defend-
[9]
SB 434













































ant. The document must be in substantially the following form:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
IN THE CIRCUIT COURT
FOR THE COUNTY OF
Defendant’s Request for Hearing to
Contest an Affidavit or Declaration
of Noncompliance
Case No. 
Landlord or agent (Plaintiff):
vs.
Tenant/Occupant (Defendant):
Address of Property:
1. My landlord has filed a statement with the court saying that  I have not complied with a
court-approved agreement and that as a result my  landlord is entitled to possession of the property.
2. I deny the landlord is entitled  to possession of the property because (The reason must be one
of the following. You must check one or  more of these responses and you must explain in section
3.):
 a. The landlord is wrong. As explained below, I did comply with the agreement.
 b. Before  I could comply with the agreement, the landlord was supposed to do what is
explained below, which the landlord did not do.
 c. The landlord  and I changed the agreement and I complied with the agreement as
changed. The change we agreed to is explained below.
 d. The landlord prevented me from keeping the agreement. The way the landlord did
that is explained below.
 e. The agreement was not made in good faith as required by ORS 90.130. The  lack of
good faith is explained below.
 f. The portion of the agreement described below was  unconscionable as described in
ORS 90.135.
 g. The landlord is required by law  or contract to have good cause to force me to move
[10]
SB 434













































out and my alleged conduct or performance does not meet the standard of good cause,  as explained
below.
 h. The landlord is claiming I did not pay rent for a  period of time following the date
of the agreement. I  did not pay that rent because I have claims for money against the landlord to
offset the rent. Those claims arise from the landlord’s violation of the Residential Landlord and
Tenant Act or the rental agreement since the date of the court order and are explained below.
 i.  Under our agreement were required to be referred to mediation under section
(6) of this 2023 Act and mediation has not yet occurred.
3. Here is my explanation for the reason or reasons checked above:
4. I understand that if I lose in court, I may be responsible for the landlord’s  costs, disburse-
ments, any attorney fees and a prevailing party fee.
I hereby declare that the  above statement is true to the best of my knowledge and belief, and
that I understand it is made for use as evidence in court and is subject to penalty for perjury.
(Signature of tenant)
Date: 
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(3) As an alternative to the document described in subsection (2)  of this section, a defendant
may request a hearing by use of a notarized affidavit.
SECTION 13.  ORS 105.163 is amended to read:
105.163. (1) A  person who was a defendant in an action under ORS 105.105 to 105.168 may apply
by motion to  the court where the judgment was entered for an order setting aside the judgment and
sealing the official records of  the action pertaining to the applicant. The court shall grant the mo-
tion if the court finds that:
(a) The judgment was a judgment of restitution entered against the applicant,  the applicant has
satisfied any money award included in the judgment and:
(A) At least five years have passed from the date of the judgment; or
(B) The judgment was based on claims that arose on  or after April 1, 2020, and before March
1, 2022;
(b) The judgment was a judgment by stipulation of  the parties under [ ORS 105.145 (2) and the
applicant has complied with the terms of the stipulated agreement and ] section 6  (2)(a) of this 2023
Act, the applicant has  satisfied any money  award included in the judgment and at least 90 days
have passed from the date of the judgment ; or
(c) The judgment was a judgment  [ or judgment of dismissal ] entered in the applicant’s favor ,
including a judgment of dismissal .
(2) The  applicant shall serve a copy of the motion filed under subsection (1) of this section upon
[11]
SB 434











































the person who was the plaintiff in the action under ORS 105.105 to 105.168. Within 30 days of ser-
vice of the motion, if a written objection is filed, the court shall schedule a hearing.
(3) If, under subsection (2) of this section,  no objection is filed or after a hearing the court de-
termines that the applicant is eligible for  relief under subsection (1) of this section, the court shall
enter an appropriate order setting aside the judgment and sealing the  official records of the action
pertaining to the applicant. Upon entry of the order, the judgment that is the subject  of the motion
shall be deemed not to have been entered, and the applicant may answer  accordingly any questions
relating to its occurrence.
(4) The court may not charge a filing fee for the  filing of a motion under subsection (1) of this
section.
(5) The Judicial Department shall develop and publish  a form for the motion described in
subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 105.163, as amended by section 11,  chapter 39, Oregon Laws 2021, is
amended to read:
105.163. (1) A  person who was a defendant in an action under ORS 105.105 to 105.168 may apply
by motion to  the court where the judgment was entered for an order setting aside the judgment and
sealing the official records of  the action pertaining to the applicant. The court shall grant the mo-
tion if the court finds that:
(a) The judgment was a judgment of restitution entered against the applicant,  the applicant has
satisfied any  money award included in the judgment and at least five years have passed from the
date of the judgment;
(b) The judgment was a judgment by stipulation of  the parties under [ ORS 105.145 (2) and the
applicant has complied with the terms of the stipulated agreement and ] section 6  (2)(a) of this 2023
Act, the applicant has satisfied any money award included in  the judgment at least 90 days have
passed from the date of the judgment ; or
(c) The judgment was a judgment [ or judgment of dismissal ] entered in the applicant’s favor ,
including a judgment of dismissal .
(2) The  applicant shall serve a copy of the motion filed under subsection (1) of this section upon
the person who was the plaintiff in the action under ORS 105.105 to 105.168. Within 30 days of ser-
vice of the motion, if a written objection is filed, the court shall schedule a hearing.
(3) If, under subsection (2) of this section, no objection is filed  or after a hearing the court de-
termines that the applicant is eligible for relief under subsection (1)  of this section, the court shall
enter an appropriate order setting aside  the judgment and sealing the official records of the action
pertaining to the applicant. Upon entry of the order, the judgment that is the subject  of the motion
shall be deemed not to have been entered, and the applicant may answer  accordingly any questions
relating to its occurrence.
(4) The court may not charge a filing fee for  the filing of a motion under subsection (1) of this
section.
(5) The Judicial Department shall develop and publish  a form for the motion described in
subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 15.
This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[12]