Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
ORS 187.110 is repealed.
SECTION 2. The standard of time for the State of Oregon shall be the United States
standard of time as established by the Congress of the United States  for any particular area
of the state under  15 U.S.C. 261, except that from 2 a.m. on the second Sunday in March until
2 a.m. on the first Sunday in November the standard of time for any area of this  state shall
be one hour in advance of the standard established for that particular  area by the Congress
of the United States under 15 U.S.C. 261. No department of the  state government and no
county, city or other political subdivision shall  employ any other time or adopt any statute,
ordinance or order providing for the use of any other standard of time.
SECTION 3. If the State of California and the  State of Washington have each adopted the
standard of time  that is the United States standard of time for California and Washington
and that does not contain a one-hour advancement of  the standard time in those states, then
notwithstanding section 2 of this 2025 Act:
(1) The standard of time for the State of Oregon shall be the United  States standard of
time as established by the Congress of the  United States for any particular area of the state
under 15 U.S.C. 261.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 863
SB 1038
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The portion of the State of Oregon that is located  in the Pacific Time Zone is exempt
from 15 U.S.C. 260a, pursuant to the authority set forth in 15 U.S.C. 260a(a)(2).
(3) From 2 a.m. on  the second Sunday in March until 2 a.m. on the first Sunday in No-
vember the standard  of time for the portion of the State of Oregon that is located in the
Mountain Time Zone shall  be one hour in advance of the standard established for that par-
ticular area by the Congress of the United States under 15 U.S.C. 261.
(4) No department of the state government and no county, city or  other political subdi-
vision shall employ any other time or adopt any statute, ordinance or  order providing for the
use of any other standard of time.
SECTION 4.
If the Congress of the United  States has enacted law authorizing states to
adopt standards of time that are one hour in advance of  the United States standard of time
as established under 15 U.S.C. 261 and that may  apply for all 12 months of each calendar
year, and if the standard of time for the States of California and Washington is  one hour in
advance of the United States standard  of time for California and Washington for all 12
months of each calendar year, then notwithstanding sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act:
(1) The standard of time for the portion of the State of  Oregon that is located in the
Pacific Time Zone shall  be one hour in advance of the United States standard of time as es-
tablished by the Congress of the United States under 15 U.S.C. 261.
(2) The standard of time for the portion of the State of  Oregon that is located in the
Mountain Time Zone shall be:
(a) The United  States standard of time as established by the Congress of the United
States under 15 U.S.C. 261; and
(b) From 2 a.m. on the second Sunday in March until 2 a.m. on the first Sunday  in No-
vember, one hour in advance of the standard established  for that area by the Congress of the
United States under 15 U.S.C. 261.
(3) No department of  the state government and no county, city or other political subdi-
vision shall employ any other time or adopt any statute, ordinance or  order providing for the
use of any other standard of time.
SECTION 5. If, on December 31, 2035:
(1) The standards of time for the State of Oregon are established by  section 4 of this 2025
Act, sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act are repealed.
(2) The standards of time for the State of Oregon are established by  section 3 of this 2025
Act, sections 2 and 4 of this 2025 Act are repealed.
(3) The standards of time for the State of Oregon are established by  section 2 of this 2025
Act, sections 3 and 4 of this 2025 Act are repealed.
SECTION 6.  ORS 86.782 is amended to read:
86.782. (1)(a) A trustee shall hold a trustee’s sale on the date and at the time and place  desig-
nated in the notice of sale given under ORS 86.764. The designated time of the trustee’s sale  must
be after 9 a.m. and before 4 p.m., based on the standard  of time set forth in [ ORS 187.110] Oregon
law, and the designated place of the trustee’s sale must be in the  county or one of the counties in
which the property is situated. Except as provided  in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the trustee
may sell the property in one  parcel or in separate parcels and shall sell the parcel or parcels at
auction to the highest bidder for cash. Any person, including the beneficiary under the trust deed,
but excluding the trustee, may bid at  the trustee’s sale. An attorney for the trustee, or an agent that
the trustee or the attorney designates, may conduct the sale and act in the  sale as the trustee’s
[2]
SB 1038
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
auctioneer.
(b) If the  trustee sells property upon which a single residential unit that is subject to an af-
fordable housing covenant  is situated, the eligible covenant holder may purchase the property from
the trustee at the trustee’s sale for cash or cash equivalent in an amount that is the lesser of:
(A) The sum of the amounts payable under ORS 86.794 (1) and (2); or
(B) The highest bid received for the property other than a bid from the  eligible covenant holder.
(c)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, if an eligible covenant holder
purchases the property in accordance with paragraph (b) of this subsection, the  sale forecloses and
terminates all other interests in the property as provided in ORS 86.797 (1).
(B) If an interest  in the property exists that is prior to the eligible covenant holder’s interest,
other than the interest set forth in the trust deed that was the subject of  the foreclosure proceeding
under ORS 86.752, notwithstanding the provisions of ORS 86.797 (1) the sale does  not foreclose and
terminate the prior interest and the eligible covenant holder’s  title to the property is subject to the
prior interest.
(2)(a) The trustee  or the attorney for the trustee, or an agent that the trustee or the attorney
designates, may postpone the sale for one or more periods that total not more than  180 days from
the original sale date,  giving notice of each postponement by public proclamation made at the time
and place set for sale. The trustee, the attorney or an agent that the trustee or the attorney  desig-
nates may make the proclamation.
(b) If a person postpones the sale date as provided in paragraph (a) of  this subsection, the
trustee, in the manner provided for the notice of sale under ORS 86.764 (1), shall provide  written
notice of the new time, date and place for the sale to the grantor and to any person to whom notice
of the sale was given under ORS 86.771. The notice must be given at least  15 days before the new
sale date. The person may postpone the  sale once, for not more than two calendar days, without
giving notice as  provided in this paragraph. The person may not postpone the sale for more than two
calendar days or more than once without giving notice as provided in this paragraph.
(3) The purchaser  shall pay at the time of sale the price bid or the price determined in accord-
ance with subsection (1)(b) of this section, and,  within 10 days following payment, the trustee shall
execute and deliver the trustee’s deed to the purchaser.
(4)(a) Within 10 calendar days after the  date of the trustee’s sale, the trustee may rescind the
trustee’s sale and void the trustee’s deed only if:
(A) The trustee asserts that during the trustee’s sale a bona fide error occurred in:
(i) Setting, advertising or otherwise specifying the opening bid amount for the property that is
the subject of the trustee’s sale;
(ii) Providing a correct legal  description of the property that is the subject of the trustee’s sale;
or
(iii) Complying with a requirement or procedure that is imposed by law;
(B) The grantor and the  beneficiary agreed to a foreclosure avoidance measure, as defined in
ORS 86.707, that would postpone or discontinue the trustee’s sale; or
(C) The beneficiary accepted funds to reinstate the trust deed and obligation  in accordance with
ORS 86.778, even if the beneficiary did not have a legal duty to do so.
(b) Within 10 calendar days after the date of the trustee’s sale that  the trustee rescinded under
paragraph (a) of this subsection, the trustee shall provide notice of the rescission of  the trustee’s
sale to any person to whom notice of the sale was given. The trustee shall  mail or serve notice of
the rescission in the manner provided for serving or mailing the notice of sale under  ORS 86.764 (1).
[3]
SB 1038
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
The notice of rescission must:
(A) Display the date on which the trustee mailed the notice, served  the notice or delivered the
notice for service; and
(B) State that, and  explain why, the trustee rescinded the trustee’s sale and voided the trustee’s
deed.
(c) Not later than  three calendar days after the date displayed on the rescission notice described
in paragraph  (b) of this subsection, the trustee shall refund to the purchaser the amount the pur-
chaser paid for the property that is the subject of the rescission notice.
(d) If the trustee rescinded a trustee’s sale and voided a  trustee’s deed in accordance with this
subsection, the trustee, not later than 21 days after the date of the trustee’s  sale that resulted in
the rescission, shall present  for recording an affidavit that states that the trustee provided the no-
tice of rescission described in paragraph (b) of this subsection. The affidavit must identify the trust
deed that was subject to the rescinded trustee’s sale and the voided trustee’s deed.
(e) The trustee’s deed conveys to the purchaser the interest in  the property that the grantor
had, or had the power to convey, at the time the grantor executed the trust deed, together with any
interest the grantor or the  grantor’s successors in interest acquire after the execution of the trust
deed.
(5)(a) If property purchased at the trustee’s sale includes one or more dwelling units that are
subject to ORS chapter 90,  the purchaser must provide written notice of the change in ownership
to the  occupants of each unit within 30 days after the date of sale and before or concurrently with
service of a written termination notice authorized by subsection (6)(c)(B) of this section.
(b) The notice required by this subsection must:
(A) Explain that the dwelling unit has been sold at a foreclosure sale and that the purchaser
at the foreclosure sale is the new owner.
(B) Include the date on which the foreclosure sale took place.
(C) Include the  name, contact address and contact telephone number of the purchaser or the
purchaser’s representative.
(D) Provide information about the rights of bona fide residential tenants  as provided in sub-
sections (6)(c) and (e) and (9)(a) of this section.
(E) Include contact information for the Oregon State Bar and a person or organization that
provides legal help to individuals at no charge to the individual.
(c) The notice must be served by one or more of the following methods:
(A) Personal delivery to the tenant.
(B) First class mail to the tenant at the dwelling unit.
(C) First class mail to the tenant at the dwelling unit  and attachment of a second notice copy.
The second notice copy must be attached in a secure manner  to the main entrance to the portion
of the premises in the possession of the tenant.
(D) If the purchaser does not know the names of the tenants, the notice may be addressed  to
“occupants.”
(d) A notice that contains the information required under paragraph (b)(B) and (C) of this  sub-
section meets the requirements of paragraph (b) of this subsection if  the notice is in substantially
the following form:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
NOTICE TO RESIDENTIAL TENANTS OF
[4]
SB 1038
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
CHANGE IN OWNERSHIP
The property in which you are living has gone  through foreclosure and was sold to a new owner
on ________ (date). The contact information for the new owner or the  owner’s representative is
_____________ (name, address, telephone number).
IF YOU ARE A BONA FIDE  TENANT RENTING THIS PROPERTY AS A RESIDENTIAL
DWELLING, YOU HAVE THE RIGHT TO  CONTINUE LIVING IN THIS PROPERTY AFTER THE
FORECLOSURE SALE FOR:
• 60 DAYS FROM THE DATE YOU ARE GIVEN A WRITTEN  TERMINATION NOTICE, IF
YOU HAVE A FIXED TERM LEASE; OR
• AT LEAST 30 DAYS FROM  THE DATE YOU ARE GIVEN A WRITTEN TERMINATION
NOTICE, IF YOU HAVE A MONTH-TO-MONTH OR WEEK-TO-WEEK RENTAL AGREEMENT.
If the new owner wants to move in and use this property as  a primary residence, the new owner
can give you written notice and  require you to move out after 30 days, even though you have a fixed
term lease with more than 30 days left.
You must be provided with  at least 30 days’ written notice after the foreclosure sale before you
can be required to move.
A bona fide tenant is a residential tenant who is not the borrower  (property owner), or a child,
spouse or parent of the borrower, and whose rental agreement:
• Is the result of an arm’s-length transaction;
• Requires the payment of rent that is not substantially less than fair market rent for  the
property, unless the rent is reduced or subsidized due to a federal, state or local subsidy; and
• Was entered into prior to the date of the foreclosure sale.
IMPORTANT:
YOU SHOULD CONTACT  THE NEW OWNER OR THE OWNER’S REPRESENTATIVE AT
THE ADDRESS LISTED ON THIS NOTICE AS SOON AS POSSIBLE TO LET THE NEW OWNER
KNOW IF YOU ARE A BONA FIDE  TENANT. YOU SHOULD PROVIDE WRITTEN EVIDENCE
OF THE EXISTENCE OF YOUR RENTAL AGREEMENT, ESPECIALLY IF YOU HAVE  A FIXED
TERM RENTAL AGREEMENT OR LEASE WITH MORE THAN 30  DAYS LEFT. Written evidence
of your rental agreement can be a copy of your  lease or rental agreement, or other documentation
of the existence of your rental agreement. Keep your original documents and a record of any infor-
mation you give to the new owner.
YOUR TENANCY
BETWEEN NOW
AND THE MOVE-OUT DATE
The new owner may be willing to allow you  to stay as a tenant instead of requiring you to move
out after 30 or 60 days. You should contact the new owner if you  would like to stay. If the new
owner accepts rent from you, signs a new  residential rental agreement with you or does not notify
you in writing within 30 days after the date of the foreclosure sale that you  must move out, the new
owner becomes your new landlord and must maintain the property. Otherwise:
• You do not owe rent;
• The new owner is not your landlord and is not responsible for maintaining the property; and
• You must move out by the date the new owner specifies in a notice to you.
The new owner may offer to pay your moving expenses and any other costs or amounts you and
the new owner agree on in exchange  for your agreement to leave the premises in less than 30 or
[5]
SB 1038
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
60 days. You should speak with a lawyer to fully understand your rights before making any decisions
regarding your tenancy.
IT IS UNLAWFUL FOR ANY  PERSON TO TRY TO FORCE YOU TO LEAVE YOUR
DWELLING  UNIT  WITHOUT FIRST GIVING YOU WRITTEN NOTICE AND GOING TO COURT
TO EVICT YOU. FOR MORE INFORMATION ABOUT YOUR RIGHTS, YOU SHOULD CONSULT
A LAWYER. If you believe  you need legal assistance, contact the Oregon State Bar and ask for the
lawyer referral service. Contact information for the Oregon State Bar is included with this notice.
If you do not have enough money to  pay a lawyer and are otherwise eligible, you may be able to
receive legal assistance for free. Information about whom to contact for  free legal assistance is in-
cluded with this notice.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(6)(a) Except as provided in paragraph  (b) or (c) of this subsection, the purchaser at the trustee’s
sale is entitled to possession of the property on the 10th  day after the sale. A person that remains
in possession after the 10th day under any interest, except an interest prior to the trust deed, or
an interest the grantor or a  successor of the grantor created voluntarily, is a tenant at sufferance.
The purchaser may obtain possession of the property from a  tenant at sufferance by following the
procedures set forth in ORS 105.100 to 105.168 or other applicable judicial procedure.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, at  any time after the trustee’s sale
the purchaser may follow the procedures set forth in ORS 105.100 to 105.168 or other  applicable
judicial  procedure  to obtain possession of the property from a person that holds possession under
an interest that the grantor or a successor of the  grantor created voluntarily if, not earlier than 30
days before the date  first set for the sale, the person was served with not less than 30 days’ written
notice of the requirement to surrender or deliver possession of the property.
(c) If the property purchased at the trustee’s  sale includes a dwelling unit that is subject to ORS
chapter 90 and an  individual occupies the unit under a bona fide tenancy, the purchaser may obtain
possession by following the procedures set forth in ORS 105.100 to 105.168 and by using the com-
plaint form provided in ORS 105.124 or 105.126:
(A) At least 60 days after service of a written  termination notice, if the bona fide tenancy is a
fixed term tenancy as defined in ORS 90.100; or
(B) At least 30 days after service of a written termination notice if the bona fide tenancy is:
(i) A fixed term tenancy and the purchaser intends to occupy, as the purchaser’s primary  resi-
dence, the dwelling unit that is subject to the fixed term tenancy; or
(ii) A month-to-month tenancy or week-to-week  tenancy, as those terms are defined in ORS
90.100.
(d) If a purchaser gives a 30-day written termination  notice pursuant to paragraph (c) of this
subsection, the purchaser may include  in the notice a request that a tenant with a fixed term
tenancy  provide  written evidence of the existence of the tenancy to the purchaser at an address
described in the notice. Written evidence includes  a copy of the rental agreement or another docu-
ment that shows the existence of the fixed term  tenancy. The tenant’s failure to provide the re-
quested written evidence before the purchaser  files an action for possession based on a 30-day
notice:
(A) Does not prevent the tenant from asserting the existence of the fixed term tenancy  as a
defense to the action.
(B) Prevents the tenant from recovering prevailing party attorney fees or  costs and disburse-
[6]
SB 1038
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ments pursuant to subsection (11)(b) of this section. The 30-day  notice must describe the provisions
of this paragraph.
(e) A  purchaser may not commence a proceeding under ORS 105.100 to 105.168 that is authorized
under this subsection before the later of:
(A) The 10th day after the trustee’s sale;
(B) The date specified in a written notice of the requirement to surrender or deliver  possession
of the property if  the notice is required by and is given to the person in accordance with paragraph
(b) of this subsection;
(C) The date specified in a written notice of the purchaser’s intent to terminate a tenancy if the
notice  is  required by and is given to the person in accordance with paragraph (c) of this subsection;
or
(D) The date on which the term of a fixed term tenancy ends, if the property is a dwelling  unit
and the purchaser has not terminated the tenancy  in accordance with paragraph (c) of this sub-
section.
(f) A purchaser that seeks to obtain possession pursuant to ORS 105.100 to 105.168 must attach
proof of service of a written  termination notice required by paragraph (c) of this subsection to the
pleadings.
(g) In an action to obtain possession, violation of  the procedures required by subsection (5) of
this section or paragraph (c) of this subsection is a defense for a bona  fide tenant seeking to retain
possession.
(h) As used  in this subsection, “bona fide tenancy” means tenancy of a dwelling unit that is
subject to ORS chapter 90 that  results from an arm’s-length transaction that occurred before the
date of a foreclosure sale in which:
(A) The mortgagor or the child, spouse or parent of the mortgagor under the contract is not  the
tenant; and
(B) The rent required is not substantially less than fair market rent  for the dwelling unit, unless
the rent is reduced or subsidized due to a federal, state or local subsidy.
(7) A purchaser shall serve a notice under subsection (6) of this section by one  or more of the
following methods:
(a) Personal delivery to the tenant.
(b) First class mail to the tenant at the dwelling unit.
(c) First  class mail to the tenant at the dwelling unit and attachment of a second notice copy.
The second notice copy must be attached in  a secure manner to the main entrance to the portion
of the premises in the possession of the tenant.
(8) If the notice under subsection (6) of  this section is served by mail pursuant to subsection
(7)(b) of this section, the minimum period for compliance must be extended by three days and the
notice must include the extension in the period stated in the notice.
(9)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (6)(c) of  this section and except as provided
in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the purchaser  is not a landlord subject to the provisions of ORS
chapter 90 unless the purchaser:
(A) Accepts rent from the individual  who possesses the property under a tenancy described in
subsection (6)(c) of this section;
(B) Enters into a new rental agreement with the individual who possesses the property under
a tenancy described in subsection (6)(c) of this section; or
(C) Fails to terminate the tenancy  as provided in subsection (6)(c) of this section within 30 days
[7]
SB 1038
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
after the date of the sale.
(b) The purchaser may act as a landlord for purposes of terminating a tenancy in accordance
with the provisions of ORS 90.396.
(c) The purchaser is subject to the  provisions of ORS 90.322, 90.375, 105.165, 659A.421 and
659A.425. The application of ORS 90.375 to a purchaser that does  not become a landlord does not
impose an affirmative  duty to pay for or provide services. For the purpose of damages pursuant to
this paragraph, “rent” refers to  the amount the tenant pays to the landlord for the right to occupy
the unit before the foreclosure.
(10)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the purchaser is not  liable to the
individual who possesses the property under a tenancy described in subsection (6)(c) of  this section
for:
(A) Damage to the property or diminution in rental value; or
(B) Returning a security deposit.
(b) A purchaser that is a landlord under the provisions  of subsection (9)(a) of this section is li-
able to the individual who  possesses the property under a tenancy described in subsection (6)(c) of
this section for:
(A) Damage to the property or diminution  in rental value that occurs after the date of the
trustee’s sale; or
(B) Returning a security deposit the individual pays after the date of the trustee’s sale.
(11)(a) Except  as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection and notwithstanding an agreement
to the contrary, in an action or defense arising pursuant to subsection (6)(c), (d), (f)  or (g), (7) or
(9)(c) of this section, reasonable attorney fees at trial and  on appeal may be awarded to the pre-
vailing party together with costs and disbursements.
(b) If a tenant asserts a successful defense to an action for possession pursuant to subsection
(6)(c), (d), (f) or (g) of this section, the tenant is not entitled to prevailing party  fees, attorney fees
or costs and disbursements if the purchaser:
(A) Did not know, and did not have reasonable cause to  know, of the existence of a fixed term
tenancy when commencing the action for possession; and
(B) Promptly dismissed the  action upon becoming aware of the existence of a fixed term tenancy.
(c) As  used in this subsection, “prevailing party” means the party in whose favor final judgment
is rendered.
(12)(a) Notwithstanding subsection  (2)(a) of this section, except when a beneficiary has partic-
ipated in obtaining a stay, foreclosure proceedings that  are stayed by order of the court, by pro-
ceedings in bankruptcy or for any other lawful reason shall, after release from the stay,  continue
as if uninterrupted, if within 30 days after release the trustee sends amended notice  of sale by reg-
istered or certified mail to the persons listed in ORS 86.764 and 86.774 (1).
(b) In addition to the notice required under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the  trustee shall
send amended notice of sale:
(A) By registered or certified mail to:
(i) The address provided by each person who was present at the time and place set  for the sale
that was stayed; and
(ii) The address provided  by each member of the Oregon State Bar who by registered or certified
mail requests the  amended notice of sale and includes with the request the notice of default or an
identification number for  the trustee’s sale that would assist the trustee in identifying the property
subject to the trustee’s sale and a self-addressed, stamped envelope  measuring at least 8.5 by 11
[8]
SB 1038
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
inches in size; or
(B) By posting a true copy  or a link to a true copy of the amended notice of sale on the trustee’s
Internet website.
(c) The amended notice of sale must:
(A) Be given at least 15 days before the amended date of sale;
(B) Set an amended date of sale that may be the same  as the original sale date, or date to which
the sale was postponed, provided the requirements of this  paragraph and ORS 86.764 and 86.774 are
satisfied;
(C) Specify the time and place for sale;
(D) Conform to the requirements of ORS 86.771; and
(E) State that the original sale proceedings were stayed and the date the stay terminated.
(d) If the publication of the notice of sale was not completed before the  date the foreclosure
proceedings were stayed by order of the court, by proceedings in bankruptcy  or for any other lawful
reason, after release from the stay, in addition  to complying with the provisions of paragraphs (b)
and (c) of this subsection, the trustee shall complete the publication by publishing an amended no-
tice of sale that states that the notice has been amended following release  from the stay and that
contains the amended date of sale. The amended notice must be published in a newspaper  of general
circulation in each of the counties in which the property is situated once a  week for four successive
weeks, except that the required number of publications must be reduced by the number  of publica-
tions that were completed before the effective date of the stay. The last publication must be  made
more than 20 days before the date the trustee conducts the sale.
(e) If  a portion of the defaults specified in the original notice of default or in the original notice
of sale  was cured during the time the foreclosure proceedings were stayed, or if additional defaults
have occurred during that time, the trustee shall describe in the amended notice of  sale only those
defaults that existed on the date on which the stay was terminated.
(f) After a release from a stay of proceedings, the trustee or the attorney for the trustee, or  an
agent that the trustee or the attorney designates, may postpone a  sale for one or more periods that
total not more than the greater of 60  days or the portion of the 180-day period allowed for
postponement under subsection (2)(a) of this section that remained on the day  before the stay began.
A postponement under this paragraph must comply with the procedural and notice requirements
specified in subsection (2) of this section.
[9]