Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the  Admin-
istrative Services Economic Development Fund, to the  Higher Education Coordinating Com-
mission, the amount of $2,000,000 for the Oregon Promise Fund.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Promise Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) Moneys in the Oregon Promise Fund are continuously appropriated to the  Higher
Education Coordinating Commission to issue grants pursuant to ORS 341.522.
(3) Moneys in the Oregon Promise Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated or allocated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Amounts donated to the fund.
(c) Moneys from any other source.
SECTION 3.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2782