Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Affordable housing”  means multifamily residential housing units that may be pur-
chased or  rented, with or without government assistance, by persons whose individual or
household income is at or below 60 percent of the area median income.
(b) “Rural government” means the government of  a community outside the Portland
metropolitan area urban growth boundary:
(A) With a population  equal to or less than 15,000 located inside a county considered a
Metropolitan Statistical Area as designated by the United States Office of Management  and
Budget;
(B) With a population equal to or less than 40,000 located outside a  county considered a
Metropolitan Statistical Area as designated by the United States Office of Management  and
Budget; or
(C) That had within the three  years before a payment a population that satisfied sub-
paragraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph and at the time of  the payment has a population
within five percent of satisfying subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph.
(c) “System development charge” has the meaning given that term in ORS 223.299.
(2) The Housing and Community Services Department shall, with the advice and consent
of the Oregon  Housing Stability Council, develop, establish and implement the Rural System
Development Charges Program to  increase the supply of rural affordable multifamily hous-
ing.
(3) The department may use moneys appropriated for the program to pay system devel-
opment charges assessed by a rural government only if:
(a) The system development charges are triggered by a building permit for the con-
struction of multifamily housing or  for the addition of dwelling units to multifamily housing;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 150
HB 4084
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
and
(b) The person assessed  the system development charges has taken actions, including
entering into an affordable housing covenant held by the  department as described in ORS
456.280, to ensure that the assessed dwelling units remain  affordable housing for no less than
10 years.
(4) The department, with the  advice and consent of the council, may adopt criteria for
making payments under this section that give preference  for the development of affordable
housing:
(a) In rural communities that have received lower per capita spending from other  federal
and state housing programs;
(b) That reduces  burdens on public infrastructure or results in lower system development
charges;
(c) That offers the greatest number of affordable housing units  for the funding provided;
(d) That provides the longest duration of use  for qualified properties as affordable hous-
ing units; or
(e) That reserves a percentage of affordable housing units for veterans.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Rural System Development Charges Fund is  established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) Moneys in  the fund consist of amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the
fund by the Legislative Assembly or received from any state, federal or private source.
(3) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the Housing and Community
Services Department to  administer the fund and to develop and implement the Rural System
Development Charges Program established under section 1 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $750,000 for deposit into the  Rural System
Development Charges Fund.
SECTION 4. No later than December 1 of each  even-numbered year, the department shall
report to an interim committee of  the Legislative Assembly related to housing, in the man-
ner provided in ORS 192.245, on the implementation and administration of the program es-
tablished under section  1 of this 2020 Act and the manner in which moneys were expended
from, and the outstanding balance of, the fund established under section 2 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 5. (1) Sections 1, 2 and 4 of this 2020 Act are repealed on June 30, 2027.
(2) Any balance in the Rural System Development Charges Fund  established under sec-
tion 2 of this 2020 Act that is  unexpended and unobligated on the date of the repeal of section
2 of this 2020 Act, and all moneys that would have  been deposited in the Rural System De-
velopment Charges Fund had section 2 of this 2020 Act remained in effect,  shall be trans-
ferred to and deposited in the General Fund and made  available for general governmental
purposes.
SECTION 6. This 2020 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2020
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]