Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 352.102 or any other provision of law, the tuition
and mandatory enrollment fees charged by a public university listed in ORS 352.002 may not
exceed the amount charged by the university during the 2018-2019 academic year.
(2) This section applies to tuition and  mandatory enrollment fees for the 2019-2020 and
2020-2021 academic years that are charged to resident  undergraduate and graduate students.
SECTION 2.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 341.290 or any other provision of law, the tuition
charged by a community college operated under ORS  chapter 341 may not exceed the amount
charged by the community college during the 2018-2019 academic year.
(2) This section applies to tuition charged for the 2019-2020 and 2020-2021 academic  years
to students who are residents of the community college district  in which the community
college is located for the 2019-2020 and 2020-2021 academic years.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2019, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $ , to be allocated to public universities
listed in ORS 352.002  and community colleges operated under ORS chapter 341 for the pur-
pose of carrying out the provisions of sections 1 and 2 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) No later than March 31, 2020, each public university listed in ORS 352.002
shall provide to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission the following information:
(a) The mean, median and range of student loan debt owed by undergraduate and gradu-
ate students who graduate from the public university;
(b) The  percentage of undergraduate and graduate students enrolled at the public uni-
versity who receive student loans;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4187
HB 3381
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
(c) The average amount of dollars that undergraduate and graduate students  enrolled at
the public university spend annually on course textbooks; and
(d) The  average amount of dollars that undergraduate and graduate students enrolled at
the public university spend annually on housing and food.
(2) No later than March 31, 2020, each community college operated under chapter  341
shall provide to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission the following information:
(a) The mean, median and range of student loan debt  owed by students who graduate
from the community college;
(b) The percentage of students enrolled at the community college  who receive student
loans;
(c) The average amount  of dollars that students enrolled at the community college spend
annually on course textbooks; and
(d) The average  amount of dollars that students enrolled at the community college spend
annually on housing and food.
(3) The commission  shall present the results of the information received from public
universities and community colleges under subsections (1) and (2) of this section in a report
to the  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to higher education in the
manner provided under ORS 192.245 on or before September 15, 2020.
SECTION 5.
Section 4 of this 2019 Act is repealed on July 1, 2021.
SECTION 6. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]