Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 441.765 is amended to read:
441.765. (1) As used in this section, “unit” means  a hospital unit as defined by the chief execu-
tive officer of the hospital or the chief executive officer’s designee.
(2) With respect to  direct care registered nurses, a nurse staffing plan must ensure that at all
times:
(a) In an emergency department:
(A) A direct care registered nurse is assigned to not more than one trauma patient[ ; and ].
(B) Except as provided in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph,  the ratio of direct care reg-
istered nurses to patients averages no more than one to four over a 12-hour shift  and a single direct
care registered nurse may not be assigned more than five patients at one time. Direct  care regis-
tered nurses assigned to trauma patients may not be  taken into account in determining the average
ratio under this subparagraph or subparagraph (C) of this paragraph .
(C) The ratio of direct care registered nurses to patients averages no more than one to
six over a 12-hour shift and a single direct care registered nurse  may not be assigned more
than six patients at one time, for patients that:
(i) Are directed to an area within the emergency department designated to  provide faster
care to patients with less serious conditions; or
(ii) Are  assigned a level four or five on a five-level triage acuity scale using the Emer-
gency Severity Index.
(b) In an intensive care unit, a direct care registered nurse is  assigned to no more than two
patients.
(c) In a labor and delivery unit, a direct care registered nurse is assigned to no more than:
(A) Two patients if the patients are not in active labor or experiencing complications; or
(B) One patient if the patient is in active labor or if the patient is at any stage  of labor and is
experiencing  complications.
(d) In a postpartum, antepartum and well-baby nursery, a direct care registered nurse is assigned
to no more than six patients, counting mother and baby each as separate patients.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4828
HB 3985
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) In  a mother-baby unit, a direct care registered nurse is assigned to no more than eight pa-
tients, counting mother and baby each as separate patients.
(f) In an  operating room, a direct care registered nurse is assigned to no more than one patient.
(g) In an oncology unit, a direct care registered nurse is assigned to no more  than four patients.
(h) In a post-anesthesia care unit, a direct  care registered nurse is assigned to no more than two
patients.
(i) In an intermediate care unit, a direct care registered nurse is  assigned to no more than three
patients.
(j) In a medical-surgical unit, a direct care registered nurse is  assigned to no more than five
patients.
(k) In a cardiac telemetry unit, a direct care registered nurse is assigned  to no more than four
patients.
(L) In a pediatric unit, a direct care registered nurse is assigned  to no more than four patients.
(3) Notwithstanding  subsection (2) of this section, the direct care registered nurse-to-patient ra-
tio for an  individual patient shall be based on a licensed independent practitioner’s classification
of the patient, as indicated in the patient’s medical record, regardless of the unit where  the patient
is being cared for.
(4) With the  approval of a majority of the members of the hospital nurse staffing committee, a
unit can deviate from the direct care registered nurse-to-patient ratios in subsection (2)  of this sec-
tion, in pursuit of innovative care models that were  considered by the committee, by allowing other
clinical care staff to constitute up to 50 percent of the  registered nurses needed to comply with the
applicable nurse-to-patient ratio. The staffing  in an innovative care model must be reapproved by the
committee every two years.
(5) A hospital  shall provide for meal breaks and rest breaks in accordance with ORS 653.261,
and rules implementing ORS 653.261, and any applicable collective bargaining agreement.
(6) Each  hospital unit may deviate from a nurse staffing plan, except with respect to meal breaks
and rest breaks, including the applicable registered nurse-to-patient ratios under this section, within
a period of 12 consecutive hours, no more than six times during a rolling 30-day period, without
being in violation of the nurse staffing plan. The unit manager must notify the hospital nurse staffing
committee no later than 10 days after each  deviation. Each subsequent deviation during the 30-day
period constitutes a separate violation under ORS 441.792.
(7) A hospital may not require a direct care registered nurse to be assigned to more  patients
than as specified in this section or in the nurse staffing plan approved by the hospital nurse  staffing
committee, as applicable.
(8) A charge nurse may:
(a) Take patient  assignments, including patient assignments taken for the purpose of covering
staff who are on meal breaks or rest breaks, in units with 10 or fewer beds;
(b) Take patient assignments, including patient assignments taken for the purpose  of covering
staff who are on meal breaks or rest breaks, in  units with 11 or more beds with the approval of the
hospital nurse staffing committee; and
(c) Be taken into account in determining  the direct care registered nurse-to-patient ratio during
periods when the charge nurse is taking patient assignments under this subsection.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 441.765, as amended by section 17,  chapter 507, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
441.765. (1) As used in this section, “unit” means  a hospital unit as defined by the chief execu-
[2]
HB 3985
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tive officer of the hospital or the chief executive officer’s designee.
(2) With respect to  direct care registered nurses, a nurse staffing plan must ensure that at all
times:
(a) In an emergency department:
(A) A direct care registered nurse is assigned to not more than one trauma patient[ ; and ].
(B) Except as provided in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph,  the ratio of direct care reg-
istered nurses to patients averages no more than one to four over a 12-hour shift  and a single direct
care registered nurse may not be assigned more than five patients at one time. Direct  care regis-
tered nurses assigned to trauma patients may not be  taken into account in determining the average
ratio under this subparagraph or subparagraph (C) of this paragraph .
(C) The ratio of direct care registered nurses to patients averages no more than one to
six over a 12-hour shift and a single direct care registered nurse  may not be assigned more
than six patients at one time, for patients that:
(i) Are directed to an area within the emergency department designated to  provide faster
care to patients with less serious conditions; or
(ii) Are assigned a level four or five on a five-level triage acuity scale using the  Emer-
gency Severity Index.
(b) In an intensive care unit, a  direct care registered nurse is assigned to no more than two
patients.
(c) In a labor and delivery unit, a direct care registered nurse is assigned to no more than:
(A) Two patients if the patients are not in active labor or experiencing complications; or
(B) One patient if the  patient is in active labor or if the patient is at any stage of labor and is
experiencing complications.
(d) In a postpartum, antepartum and well-baby nursery, a direct care registered nurse is assigned
to no more than six patients, counting mother and baby each as separate patients.
(e) In a mother-baby unit, a direct care registered nurse is assigned to no more than eight  pa-
tients, counting mother and baby each as separate patients.
(f) In an  operating room, a direct care registered nurse is assigned to no more than one patient.
(g) In an oncology unit, a direct care registered nurse is assigned to no more  than four patients.
(h) In a post-anesthesia care unit, a direct  care registered nurse is assigned to no more than two
patients.
(i) In an intermediate care unit, a direct care registered nurse is  assigned to no more than three
patients.
(j) In a medical-surgical unit,  a direct care registered nurse is assigned to no more than four
patients.
(k) In a cardiac telemetry unit, a direct care registered nurse is assigned  to no more than four
patients.
(L) In a pediatric unit, a direct care registered nurse is assigned  to no more than four patients.
(3) Notwithstanding  subsection (2) of this section, the direct care registered nurse-to-patient ra-
tio for an  individual patient shall be based on a licensed independent practitioner’s classification
of the patient, as indicated in the patient’s medical record, regardless of the unit where  the patient
is being cared for.
(4) With the  approval of a majority of the members of the hospital nurse staffing committee, a
unit can deviate from the direct care registered nurse-to-patient ratios in subsection (2)  of this sec-
tion, in pursuit of innovative care models that were  considered by the committee, by allowing other
[3]
HB 3985
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
clinical care staff to constitute up to 50 percent of the  registered nurses needed to comply with the
applicable nurse-to-patient ratio. The staffing  in an innovative care model must be reapproved by the
committee every two years.
(5) A hospital  shall provide for meal breaks and rest breaks in accordance with ORS 653.261,
and rules implementing ORS 653.261, and any applicable collective bargaining agreement.
(6) Each  hospital unit may deviate from a nurse staffing plan, except with respect to meal breaks
and rest breaks, including the applicable registered nurse-to-patient ratios under this section, within
a period of 12 consecutive hours, no more than six times during a rolling 30-day period, without
being in violation of the nurse staffing plan. The unit manager must notify the hospital nurse staffing
committee no later than 10 days after each  deviation. Each subsequent deviation during the 30-day
period constitutes a separate violation under ORS 441.792.
(7) A  hospital may not require a direct care registered nurse to be assigned to more patients
than as specified in this section or in the nurse staffing plan approved by the hospital nurse  staffing
committee, as applicable.
(8) A charge nurse may:
(a) Take patient assignments, including patient assignments taken for the purpose  of covering
staff who are on meal breaks or rest breaks, in units with 10 or fewer beds;
(b) Take patient  assignments, including patient assignments taken for the purpose of covering
staff who are on meal breaks or rest breaks, in  units with 11 or more beds with the approval of the
hospital nurse staffing committee; and
(c) Be taken into account in determining  the direct care registered nurse-to-patient ratio during
periods when the charge nurse is taking patient assignments under this subsection.
[4]