Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of the wildlife laws.
SECTION 2. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 498.038 (2), in this state, a person may not:
(a) Raise octopus for the purpose of human consumption.
(b) Sell, offer for sale or otherwise participate in the sale  or offer for sale of octopus that
is raised for the purpose of human consumption.
(2) This section does not apply to raising octopus for the purpose of:
(a) Facilitating the keeping of octopus as pets.
(b) Laboratory research, as defined in ORS 609.410.
(3) A violation of this section shall be subject to the schedule of civil penalties  described
in ORS 496.146 (21).
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 114