Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Oregon  Broadband Advisory Council established under section 1,
chapter 782, Oregon Laws 2009,  shall conduct a study of issues related to broadband capacity
and access in this state.
(2) In conducting the study, the council shall:
(a) Examine public-private partnerships for broadband projects that are:
(A) Led by the private sector;
(B) Led by the public sector and supported by the private sector; or
(C) Jointly owned by the public and private sectors.
(b) Identify policies aimed at removing barriers to expansion of broadband capacity. Such
barriers include, but are not limited to, permits, easements and access to publicly owned
rights-of-way and vertical assets, such as buildings and towers.
(c) Identify  opportunities to create gigabit opportunity zones in economically challenged
rural areas, including offering  tax credits for expansion of broadband capacity and access
within the zones.
(3) Based on the findings of the study, the Oregon Broadband Advisory Council:
(a) Shall:
(A) Establish a statewide broadband plan; and
(B) Submit a report, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, to the  interim committees
of the Legislative  Assembly related to economic development on or before September 15,
2020.
(b) May submit proposals  for legislation related to subsection (2)(a) of this section for
consideration for the 2021 regular session of the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 2.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2057
SB 505
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $25 million for
grants to be  made through the department’s Rural Broadband Capacity Pilot Program for
broadband infrastructure projects in rural areas of this state that lack adequate  broadband
access.
SECTION 3.  Section 5, chapter 782, Oregon Laws 2009, as amended by section 5,  chapter 87,
Oregon Laws 2014, section 1, chapter 483, Oregon Laws 2015, and section 36, chapter  807, Oregon
Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  (1) Sections 1 to 4, chapter 782, Oregon Laws 2009, are repealed on January  2, [ 2020]
2022.
(2) The amendments to ORS 403.450 by section 4, chapter 87, Oregon Laws 2014, become oper-
ative on January 2, [ 2020] 2022.
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]