Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Fire Marshal shall study funding for fire districts. The  State Fire
Marshal shall submit a report on the study in  the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may
include recommendations for legislation, to  the committees or interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to natural resources no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3685