Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on the Water Rights and Transfers Protest Backlog is
established.
(2) The task force consists of members appointed as follows:
(a) The Governor shall appoint members who represent the Department of Justice, the
Office of Administrative Hearings, the State Department of Fish and Wildlife and  the Water
Resources Department, as well as members who  are protestants representing public and
private interests.
(b) The Chief Justice of the Oregon Supreme Court shall appoint  a member who repres-
ents the judicial branch.
(3) The task force shall draft a report that summarizes:
(a) The current status of the protest backlog.
(b) Trends in the types of applications  for water rights or transfers that are protested,
referred and resolved.
(c) Current policies  and practices for evaluating protests for contested case referral and
scheduling, including any standards for how the Water Resources Department communicates
with applicants and protestants.
(d) A thorough and holistic analysis of the current causes of delay.
(e) Recommendations for changes to, or  enhancements of, the current system to improve
the delivery of fair and efficient dispositions of protests.
(4) A majority of the members of the task  force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(5) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the members
of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4248
HB 3346
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit the report described in subsection  (3) of this section, in
the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to  a committee or interim committee of the Legislative
Assembly related to water no later than September 15, 2024.
(11) The Water Resources Department shall provide staff support to the task force.
(12) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on December 31, 2024.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Water Resources Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $_____, which may be expended for addressing the backlog  of
protests of decisions concerning water rights and transfers.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to  the Department of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $_____, which may be expended for addressing  capacity shortfalls
contributing to the backlog of protests of decisions concerning water rights and transfers.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Office of Administrative Hearings, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $_____, which may be  expended for addressing capacity
shortfalls contributing to the backlog of protests of decisions concerning  water rights and
transfers.
SECTION 6.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the State Department  of Fish and Wildlife, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $_____, which  may be expended for addressing ca-
pacity shortfalls contributing to the backlog of  protests of decisions concerning water rights
and transfers.
SECTION 7. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]