Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon  Department of Emergency Management shall create and
maintain a registry of persons who are able and  willing to provide volunteer services related
to emergency response. The registry may include:
(a) Persons included in  the emergency health care provider registry established under
ORS 401.654;
(b) Persons registered as volunteers with the Department of Human Services;
(c) Persons registered as volunteers with a local  government, as defined in ORS 174.116,
including members of community emergency response teams, neighborhood emergency
teams and volunteer firefighting associations;
(d) Current or former first responders;
(e) Persons experienced in construction or other skilled trades; and
(f) Other persons that the Oregon Department of  Emergency Management determines
are able to assist in emergency response.
(2) As  a condition of inclusion on the registry, the Oregon Department of Emergency
Management may require:
(a) Evidence of relevant qualifications;
(b) Training related to emergency response, including incident management  or command;
and
(c) Criminal background checks.
(3) The registry must include, for each person:
(a) The person’s name and contact information;
(b) The physical location where the person is based; and
(c) Specialized training or skills related to emergency response that the person has.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4476
HB 3754
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
(4) The registry must be accessible to emergency management  agencies and emergency
program managers described in ORS 401.305. The Oregon Department of  Emergency Man-
agement may make the registry accessible to any other  persons or entities if the department
determines that providing such access will enhance public safety.
(5) The Oregon Department of Emergency Management shall  establish procedures for
communicating with appropriate entities, including the Department of Human  Services, the
Oregon Health Authority and local governments, for the  purposes of gathering information
for the registry and regularly updating the information.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Department of Emergency Management shall  develop and
administer a statewide training  program for volunteers included in the registry established
under section 1 of this 2025 Act. The department shall consult  with the Department of Public
Safety Standards and Training in developing the training program.
(2) The  Oregon Department of Emergency Management shall base the training program
on the curriculum established by the  Emergency Management Institute of the Federal
Emergency Management Agency.
(3) The department shall  ensure that training is made available to persons in all regions
of this state. Such training may be provided through remote means.
(4) The department shall collaborate with  entities described in section 1 (5) of this 2025
Act to provide information about the training program to volunteers statewide.
SECTION 3. It is the policy of the Legislative Assembly that the Joint Committee on
Ways and Means shall, during each odd-numbered year  regular session of the Legislative
Assembly, dedicate a percentage  of moneys that are appropriated from the State Treasury
but are projected to be unexpended at the end of the  biennium to emergency volunteer pur-
poses.
[2]