Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 244.025 is amended to read:
244.025. (1) During a calendar year, a  public official, a candidate or a relative or member of the
household of the public official  or candidate may not solicit or receive, directly or indirectly, any
gift or gifts with an aggregate value in excess  of $50 from any single source that could reasonably
be known to have a legislative or administrative interest.
[(2) During a calendar year, a person who has a  legislative or administrative interest may not offer
to the public official or a relative or member of the household of the public official any  gift or gifts
with an aggregate value in excess of $50. ]
[(3) During a calendar year, a person who has a  legislative or administrative interest may not offer
to the candidate or a relative or member of the household of the candidate any gift or gifts with an
aggregate value in excess of $50. ]
[(4)] (2) This section does not apply to public officials subject to the Oregon Code of Judicial
Conduct.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 436