Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2023 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
chapter 458.
SECTION 2. (1) The Housing and Community  Services Department shall develop a stra-
tegic housing stipend pilot program to provide housing stipends to  individuals whose labor is
expected to meet the needs of a city’s economy as established by criteria  developed by an
advisory board described in section 3 of this 2023 Act.
(2) The department shall select three cities to participate in the  pilot program, including
one city with a population  greater than 55,000, one city with a population greater than 10,000
and not more than 50,000 and one city with a population of 10,000 or less.
(3) Individuals qualifying for stipends under this section must:
(a) Agree to move to the city from outside the city;
(b) Have skills or a career that benefits the economic development  or other goals of the
city;
(c) During the period for which stipends are awarded:
(A) Reside in the city;
(B) Be employed within the city full time; and
(C) Have a household income between 60 percent  and 120 percent of the area median in-
come; and
(d) Meet any other qualifications adopted by the advisory board under section 3 of  this
2023 Act.
(4) Housing stipends provided under this section:
(a) Must be given on a monthly basis;
(b) May not be given to the same individual or family for a  period of more than 18
months; and
(c) May not exceed $300 per month.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3689
HB 3210
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
(5) The department may contract with one or more nonprofit  organizations to administer
the pilot program or a portion of the pilot program.
SECTION 3.
(1) In developing the  strategic housing stipend pilot program described in
section 2 of this 2023 Act, including the qualifications and employment sector targets  for
each city, the Housing and Community Services Department  shall consult with an advisory
board.
(2) The advisory board consists of seven individuals, appointed as follows:
(a) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor  and Industries shall appoint one member
to represent the Bureau of Labor and Industries;
(b) The Director of the Employment  Department shall appoint one member to represent
the Employment Department;
(c) The Director of Veterans’  Affairs shall appoint one person to represent the Depart-
ment of Veterans’ Affairs;
(d) The Director of the Housing and Community  Services Department shall appoint one
member to represent the League of Oregon Cities; and
(e) The governing bodies of the three pilot cities selected under section 2 (2) of  this 2023
Act shall each appoint one member to represent economic development policy of the city.
(3) The Housing and Community Services Department shall staff the meetings of the
advisory board. The advisory board shall meet at times established by the department.
(4) Members of the advisory board are not entitled to compensation for  service as a
member.
(5) If there is  a vacancy on the advisory board for any cause, the appointing authority
shall appoint a replacement.
(6) A majority of the members of the advisory board constitutes a quorum.
SECTION 4.
On or before September 15, 2026, the Housing and Community Services De-
partment shall provide a report to an  appropriate interim committee of the Legislative As-
sembly in the manner provided in ORS 192.245 on the  strategic housing stipend pilot program
developed under section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for  the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for carrying out the purposes of
sections 2 and 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 6.
Section 3 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 7. Section 2 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
[2]