Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 352.089 is amended to read:
352.089. (1) A public university listed in ORS 352.002 shall adopt a  mission statement for the
university, and shall forward the statement to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(2) A public  university listed in ORS 352.002 shall submit any significant change in the
university’s  academic  programs to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission. The commission
shall establish a  process for reviewing the significant program change for approval. The commission
shall establish, by rule, what constitutes a significant change to a university’s  academic program.
The commission shall further ensure that approved programs:
(a) Are consistent with the mission statement of the university;
(b) Do not unnecessarily duplicate academic programs offered by Oregon’s other public  univer-
sities;
(c) Are not located in a geographic  area that will cause undue hardship to Oregon’s other public
universities;
(d) Are allocated among Oregon’s public  universities to maximize the achievement of statewide
needs and requirements; and
(e) Submitted by  Western Oregon University, Southern Oregon University or Eastern Oregon
University comply with ORS 352.011.
(3)(a) Pursuant to ORS 350.090, on or  before September 1 of each even-numbered year, the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall submit a consolidated funding request to  the
Governor on behalf of all public universities listed in ORS 352.002.
(b) The Governor’s budget may include funding requests from public universities.
(4) As part of a funding request submitted  under subsection (3) of this section, a public univer-
sity listed in ORS  352.002 may request, and appropriations may include but are not limited to,
funding for education and general operations,  statewide public services, state-funded debt service,
capital improvements, deferred maintenance, special initiatives and investments or any  other pur-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1074
HB 2389
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
pose authorized by ORS 350.075 (3)(e). Any moneys appropriated to pay  debt service for state bonds
must be held by the State Treasurer pursuant to an agreement entered into by the  State Treasurer
and a public university under ORS 352.135 (2).
(5) A public university listed in ORS 352.002 that wishes to  request the issuance of state bonds,
including a public university that elects to remain eligible to receive proceeds of  state bonds under
ORS 352.402, must make a request to this effect to the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission.
The commission shall establish a process for reviewing  the request to issue state bonds. The com-
mission shall decide whether, and in what manner, to make a request  for the issuance of state bonds
to the Legislative Assembly.
(6)(a) Each public university listed in ORS 352.002 shall respond to  a request for data from the
Legislative Assembly or other state body by submitting the requested information to the  Higher
Education Coordinating Commission. The commission  shall consolidate the data received from public
universities. The commission  shall be responsible for providing the data to the Legislative Assembly
or other requesting entity.
(b) As used in this subsection, “data” means any information that, as of August  14, 2013, is
collected  by  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission from each university and reported to
the Legislative Assembly or  any other state entity, including but not limited to retention and grad-
uation rates and demographic information on students.
(7)(a) A public university listed in ORS 352.002 may not  increase the enrollment at that
public university by more than five percent from the preceding academic year. For any public
university that receives a number of applications for  enrollment in excess of the limit pro-
vided under this subsection, that public  university shall refer each application received in
excess of the limit on enrollment to the nearest community college  to that applicant, if that
applicant resides in this state, and to Eastern  Oregon University, Oregon Institute of Tech-
nology, Southern Oregon University and Western Oregon University.
(b) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission  shall adopt rules necessary for the
administration of this subsection.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 352.089 by section 1 of this 2025  Act first apply to
the 2027-2028 academic year.
[2]