Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 284.754 is amended to read:
284.754. (1) (a) The Regional Solutions Program is established within the office of the Governor,
in collaboration with state agencies[ ,].
(b) [ consisting] The program shall consist  of :
(A) Regional solutions centers described in subsection (2) of this section[ ,];
(B) Regional solutions teams described in subsection (3) of this section ; [ and]
(C) Regional solutions advisory committees described in subsection (4) of this section ; and
(D) A state and federal grants coordinator described in subsection (5) of this section .
(c) The program shall work with state agencies, local governments,  public and private entities,
philanthropic organizations and academic institutions, as appropriate, to :
(A) Develop and coordinate regional implementation projects[ ,];
(B) Identify regional priorities for community and economic development[ ,];
(C) Remove barriers and increase access to state and federal funding programs;
(D) Address issues ; and
(E) Seize opportunities.
(2) The Regional Solutions Program [ includes] shall include regional  solutions centers located
throughout this state. The centers shall provide a physical location for, and serve as the primary
place for the business and operations of, the  regional solutions teams and the regional solutions
advisory committees.
(3)(a) Each regional solutions team shall include a regional solutions coordinator and staff.
(b) Staff may include, but  is not limited to, employees and representatives of the following state
agencies:
(A) The Department of Environmental Quality;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2735
HB 3113
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) The Department of Land Conservation and Development;
(C) The Department of Transportation;
(D) The Housing and Community Services Department;
(E) The Oregon Business Development Department; and
(F) Other state agencies identified by the regional  solutions coordinator and the regional sol-
utions advisory committee to participate as necessary.
[(b)] (c) Regional solutions teams shall operate in conjunction and consultation with  regional
solutions advisory committees.
[(c)] (d) Regional solutions teams  shall address community and economic development by work-
ing to address regional issues, priorities  and opportunities and leveraging funding opportunities for
sound and long-term economic growth.
[(d)] (e) The directors and staff of  the state agencies listed in paragraph [ (a)] (b) of this sub-
section and natural resource agencies shall work with  regional solutions coordinators and regional
solutions teams to fulfill regional priorities, in coordination with the office of the Governor.
[(e)] (f) Regional solutions teams shall review  and evaluate regional implementation project
proposals submitted in consultation with regional solutions advisory committees.
[(f)] (g) In  considering, reviewing or undertaking regional implementation project proposals or
projects that involve significant environmental issues, regional solutions  coordinators shall convene
all affected  stakeholders with the assistance of the Oregon Consensus Program established within
the Mark O. Hatfield School of Government for the purpose of  providing alternative dispute resol-
ution services to seek to resolve disputed issues, if any.
(4)(a) A regional solutions advisory committee shall be appointed for each region[ . Each  com-
mittee shall consist of a minimum of ], each committee consisting of at least  five members ap-
pointed by the Governor, and serving at the pleasure of the Governor, as follows:
(A) One local convenor  who represents the region, who shall serve as chairperson of the com-
mittee;
(B) One representative recommended by the executive body of the Association of Oregon  Coun-
ties;
(C) One representative recommended by the executive body of the League of Oregon Cities;
(D) One person who represents local and regional business and industry interests; and
(E) One person who represents philanthropic organizations.
(b) Regional solutions advisory committees shall:
(A) Establish regional priorities for community and economic development in the region;
(B) Assist regional solutions coordinators  and regional solutions teams with obtaining, and
connecting to, resources and funding; and
(C) Consider, review and recommend regional implementation project proposals.
(c) In considering,  reviewing and recommending regional implementation project proposals under
this subsection, regional solutions  advisory committees shall consider whether the project proposal
seeks to address the state’s economically, socially and environmentally sustainable goals and objec-
tives described in ORS 184.423.
(d) Members of  the regional solutions advisory committees are not entitled to compensation for
the performance of official duties and responsibilities.
(e) The regional solutions coordinators and regional solutions teams shall provide staff  to the
regional solutions advisory committees as  necessary to allow the committees to carry out the pro-
visions of paragraph (b) of this subsection.
[2]
HB 3113
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
(5) The regional  solutions state and federal grants coordinator shall work with the re-
gional solutions teams, state agencies listed in subsection (3)(b)(A) to  (E) of this section and
natural resources agencies to:
(a) Systematically  identify and address barriers that communities face in applying for and
managing state grants;
(b) Increase accessibility to state grant opportunities; and
(c) Improve interagency coordination  around grant opportunities, including the develop-
ment of streamlined application processes where possible.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 284.753 is amended to read:
284.753. (1)(a) In awarding  grants, loans or incentive funds for projects undertaken in con-
nection  with  grant, loan or incentive programs, state agencies listed in ORS 284.754 [ (3)(a)(A)]
(3)(b)(A) to (E) shall, consistent with the  programs’ enabling legislation[ ,] and rules [and
regulations], use regional priorities for  community and economic development as described in ORS
284.754 [in the consideration of ] when considering project funding decisions .
(b) [and base ] Decisions [ of] as to  which projects to  undertake shall be based upon whether the
project will:
[(1)] (A) Use regional and community-based problem solving.
[(2)] (B) Support regional and community-based means of  integrating state and local resources
and services.
[(3)] (C) Create  jobs in relation to the economy and population of the region directly impacted
by the project.
[(4)] (D) Involve investment of capital in relation to the economy and population of the region
directly impacted by the project.
[(5)] (E) Have community support, as indicated by the support  of the governing body of the local
government.
[(6)] (F) Have obtained appropriate land use  and environmental reviews and authorizations prior
to utilization of funds.
(2) The agencies listed in  ORS 284.754 (3)(b)(A) to (E) shall work with the state and fed-
eral grants coordinator to systematically identify and address barriers to  accessing and
managing state and federal grants, with a focus on opportunities to  reduce fragmentation
and streamline grant programs offered by state agencies.
SECTION 3. There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, from the Admin-
istrative Services Economic Development Fund, to the  Oregon Business Development De-
partment, the amount of $5,000,000 to be used to provide matches for federal  funds available
through the Federal Readiness and Leverage Fund.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]