Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 317A.100 is amended to read:
317A.100. As used in ORS 317A.100 to 317A.158:
(1)(a) “Commercial activity” means:
(A) The total amount realized by a person, arising from  transactions and activity in the regular
course of the  person’s trade or business, without deduction for expenses incurred by the trade or
business;
(B) If received by a financial institution:
(i) If the reporting person for a financial institution is a  holding company, all items of income
reported on the FR Y-9 filed by the holding company;
(ii) If the reporting person for a financial institution is a bank  organization, all items of income
reported on the call report filed by the bank organization; and
(iii) If the reporting person for a financial institution is a  nonbank financial organization, all
items of income reported in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles; and
(C)(i) If received by an insurer, as reported on the  statement of premiums accompanying the
annual statement required under ORS 731.574 to be filed with the Director of the  Department of
Consumer and Business Services, all gross direct  life insurance premiums, gross direct accident and
health insurance premiums and gross direct property and casualty insurance premiums; and
(ii) The gross amount of surplus lines premiums received on  Oregon home state risks as shown
in the report required by ORS 735.465.
(b) “Commercial activity” does not include:
(A) Interest income except:
(i) Interest on credit sales; or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 66
SB 1542
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(ii) Interest income, including service charges, received by financial institutions;
(B) Receipts from  the sale, exchange or other disposition of an asset described in section 1221
or 1231 of  the Internal Revenue Code, without regard to the length of time the person held the asset;
(C) If received by an insurer, federally reinsured premiums or income  from transactions between
a reciprocal insurer and its attorney in fact operating under ORS 731.142;
(D) Receipts from hedging transactions, to the extent that the transactions  are entered into
primarily to protect a financial position,  including transactions intended to manage the risk of ex-
posure to foreign currency fluctuations that affect assets, liabilities, profits, losses, equity or in-
vestments in foreign operations, risk of exposure to interest rate fluctuations  or risk of commodity
price fluctuations;
(E) Proceeds received attributable to the repayment, maturity or redemption of  the principal of
a loan, bond, mutual fund, certificate of deposit or marketable instrument;
(F) The principal amount received  under a repurchase agreement or on account of any trans-
action properly characterized as a loan to the person;
(G) Contributions received by a trust, plan or other arrangement, any of which is described in
section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue  Code, or to which title 26, subtitle A, chapter 1, subchapter
(D) of the Internal Revenue Code applies;
(H) Compensation, whether current or deferred, and whether in cash  or in kind, received or to
be received by an employee, a former employee or the employee’s legal successor for services  ren-
dered to or for an employer, including reimbursements  received by or for an individual for medical
or education expenses, health insurance premiums or employee expenses or  on account of a de-
pendent care spending  account, legal services plan, any cafeteria plan described in section 125 of
the Internal Revenue Code or any similar employee reimbursement;
(I) Proceeds received from the  issuance of the taxpayer’s own stock, options, warrants, puts or
calls, or from the sale of the taxpayer’s treasury stock;
(J) Proceeds received on the account of  payments from insurance policies, including crop in-
surance policies, owned by the taxpayer, except those proceeds received  for the loss of commercial
activity;
(K) Gifts or  charitable contributions received, membership dues received by trade, professional,
homeowners’ or condominium associations, payments received for  educational courses, meetings or
meals, or similar payments to a trade,  professional or other similar association, and fundraising re-
ceipts received by any person when any excess receipts are donated or used  exclusively for chari-
table purposes;
(L) Damages received as the result of litigation  in excess of amounts that, if received without
litigation, would be treated as commercial activity;
(M) Property, money and other amounts received or  acquired by an agent on behalf of another
in excess of the agent’s commission, fee or other remuneration;
(N) Tax refunds from any tax program, other tax benefit recoveries and reimbursements  for the
tax imposed under ORS 317A.100 to 317A.158 made by entities that are part  of the same unitary
group as provided under ORS 317A.106, and reimbursements made by entities that are  not members
of a unitary group that are required to be made for economic parity among  multiple owners of an
entity whose tax obligation under ORS 317A.100 to 317A.158 is required to be reported and  paid
entirely by one owner, as provided in ORS 317A.106;
(O) Pension reversions;
(P) Contributions to capital;
[2]
SB 1542
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(Q) Receipts from the sale, transfer, exchange or other  disposition of motor vehicle fuel or any
other product used for the propulsion of motor vehicles;
(R) In the case of receipts from the sale of cigarettes or  tobacco products by a wholesale dealer,
retail dealer, distributor, manufacturer or seller, an amount equal to  the federal and state excise
taxes paid by any person on or for such cigarettes or tobacco products under subtitle E of the
Internal Revenue Code or ORS chapter 323;
(S) In the case of receipts from the sale of malt beverages or wine, as defined in ORS  471.001,
cider, as defined in ORS  471.023 or distilled liquor, as defined in ORS 471.001, by a person holding
a license issued under ORS chapter 471, an amount equal to the federal and  state excise taxes paid
by any person on or for such  malt beverages, wine or distilled liquor under subtitle E of the Internal
Revenue Code or ORS chapter 471 or  473, and any amount paid to the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis
Commission for sales of distilled spirits by an agent appointed under ORS 471.750;
(T) In the case of receipts from the  sale of marijuana items, as defined in ORS 475C.009, by a
person holding a license issued under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525, an amount equal  to the federal and
state excise taxes paid  by any person on or for such marijuana items under subtitle E of the Internal
Revenue Code or ORS 475C.670 to 475C.734 and any local retail taxes authorized under ORS
475C.453;
(U) Local  taxes collected by a restaurant or other food establishment on sales of meals, prepared
food or beverages;
(V) Tips or gratuities collected by a  restaurant or other food establishment and passed on to
employees;
(W) Receipts realized  by a vehicle dealer certified under ORS 822.020 or a person described in
ORS 320.400 (8)(a)(B) from the sale  or other transfer of a motor vehicle, as defined in ORS 801.360,
to another vehicle dealer for the purpose of resale by  the transferee vehicle dealer, but only if the
sale or  other transfer was based upon the transferee’s need to meet a specific customer’s preference
for a motor vehicle or is an exchange of new vehicles between franchised motor vehicle  dealerships;
(X) Registration fees  or taxes collected by a vehicle dealer certified under ORS 822.020 or a
person described in  ORS 320.400 (8)(a)(B) at the sale or other transfer of a motor vehicle, as defined
in ORS 801.360, that are owed to a third party by the purchaser of  the motor vehicle and passed to
the third party by the dealer;
(Y) Receipts from a financial  institution for services provided to the financial institution in
connection with the issuance, processing, servicing and management of loans or credit  accounts, if
the financial institution and the recipient of the receipts have at least 50 percent of  their ownership
interests owned or controlled, directly or constructively through related interests, by common  own-
ers;
(Z) In the case of amounts retained as commissions by a holder of a license under ORS  chapter
462, an amount equal to the amounts specified under ORS chapter  462 that must be paid to or col-
lected by the Department of Revenue as a tax and the amounts specified under ORS chapter  462 to
be used as purse money;
(AA) Receipts of residential care facilities as defined in ORS 443.400 or  in-home care agencies
as defined in ORS 443.305, to the extent that the receipts are derived from  or received as compen-
sation for providing services to a medical assistance or Medicare recipient;
(BB) Dividends received;
(CC) Distributive income received from a pass-through entity;
(DD) Receipts from sales to a wholesaler in this state, if the seller receives  certification at the
[3]
SB 1542
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
time of sale from the wholesaler that the wholesaler will sell the purchased property outside this
state;
(EE) Receipts from the wholesale or retail sale of groceries, including receipts of a person that
owns groceries at the time of sale and compensation of any consignee engaged in effecting the  sale
of groceries on behalf the owner of the  groceries, but only to the extent that the compensation re-
lates to grocery sales;
(FF) Receipts from transactions among members of a unitary group;
(GG) Moneys, including public purpose charge moneys collected under  ORS 757.612 and moneys
collected to plan for  and pursue cost-effective energy efficiency resources under ORS 757.054, that
are collected from customers, passed to a utility and approved by the Public Utility  Commission and
that support energy conservation, renewable resource acquisition and low-income assistance  pro-
grams;
(HH) Moneys collected  by a utility from customers for the payment of loans through on-bill fi-
nancing;
(II) Surcharges collected under ORS 757.736;
(JJ) Moneys passed to a utility by the Bonneville Power Administration for the  purpose of
effectuating the Regional Power Act  Exchange credits or pursuant to any settlement associated with
the exchange credit;
(KK) Moneys collected or recovered, by  entities listed in ORS 756.310, cable operators as de-
fined in 47  U.S.C. 522(5), telecommunications carriers as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153(51) and providers
of information services as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153(24), for fees payable under ORS 756.310, right-of-
way fees, franchise fees, privilege taxes, federal taxes and local taxes;
(LL) Charges paid to the Residential Service Protection Fund required by chapter 290, Oregon
Laws 1987;
(MM) Universal  service surcharge moneys collected or recovered and paid into the universal
service fund established in ORS 759.425;
(NN) Moneys collected for public purpose funding as described in ORS 759.430;
(OO) Moneys collected or recovered and paid into the federal universal  service fund as deter-
mined by the Federal Communications Commission;
(PP) In the case of  a seller or provider of telecommunications services, the amount of tax im-
posed under ORS 403.200 for access to  the emergency communications system that is collected from
subscribers or consumers;
(QQ) In the case of a  transient lodging tax collector, the amount of tax imposed under ORS
320.305 and of any local transient lodging tax imposed upon the occupancy of transit lodging;
(RR) In the  case of a seller of bicycles, the amount of tax imposed under ORS 320.415 upon retail
sales of bicycles;
(SS) In the case of a qualified heavy equipment provider, the amount  of tax imposed under ORS
307.872 upon the rental price of heavy equipment;
(TT) Farmer sales to an  agricultural cooperative in this state that is a cooperative organization
described in section 1381 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(UU) Revenue received by a  business entity that is mandated by contract or subcontract to be
distributed to another  person or entity if the revenue constitutes sales commissions that are paid
to a person who is  not an employee of the business entity, including, without limitation, a split-fee
real estate commission;
(VV) Receipts from the sale of fluid milk by dairy farmers that are not  members of an agricul-
[4]
SB 1542
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tural cooperative; [ and]
(WW)(i) Cost paid by a dealer for items of precious metal.
(ii) As used in this subparagraph, “item of  precious metal” means an item of gold, silver,
platinum, rhodium or palladium that has been put through a process of smelting or  refining and that
is in a state or condition that its value depends on its contents and not its form[ .]; and
(XX) Amounts received as reimbursement paid:
(i) For the cost of health care provided to  medical assistance recipients under ORS
chapter 414;
(ii) By the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or by a Medicare  Advantage Plan
for the cost of care provided to Medicare recipients; or
(iii) For the cost of health care  provided, and paid by the Public Employees’ Benefit
Board, the Oregon Educators Benefit Board,  the Children’s Health Insurance Program or the
United States Department of Defense, under a TRICARE contract.
(2) “Cost inputs” means:
(a) The cost  of goods sold as calculated in arriving at federal taxable income under the Internal
Revenue Code; or
(b) In the case of a taxpayer that is engaged  in a farming operation, as defined in ORS 317A.102,
and that does not report cost of goods sold for federal  tax purposes, the taxpayer’s operating ex-
penses excluding labor costs.
(3) “Doing business” means engaging in any activity, whether legal or illegal,  that is conducted
for, or results in, the receipt of commercial activity at any time during a calendar year.
(4) “Excluded person” means any of the following:
(a) Organizations described  in sections 501(c) and 501(j) of the Internal Revenue Code, unless the
exemption is denied under section  501(h), (i) or (m) or under section 502, 503 or 505 of the Internal
Revenue Code.
(b) Organizations described in section 501(d) of the Internal  Revenue Code, unless the exemption
is denied under section 502 or 503 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(c) Organizations described in section 501(e) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(d) Organizations described in section 501(f) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(e) Charitable risk pools described in section 501(n) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(f) Organizations described in section 521 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(g) Qualified state tuition programs described in section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(h) Foreign or alien  insurance companies, but only with respect to the underwriting profit de-
rived from writing wet marine  and transportation insurance subject to tax under ORS 731.824 and
731.828 or if an insurance company is subject to the retaliatory tax  under ORS 731.854 and 731.859.
(i) Governmental entities.
(j) Any  person with commercial activity that does not exceed $750,000 for the tax year, other
than a person that is part  of a unitary group as provided in ORS 317A.106 with commercial activity
in excess of $750,000.
(k) Hospitals subject to assessment under ORS 414.855, long term care facilities  subject to as-
sessment under ORS 409.801 or any entity subject to assessment under ORS 414.880 or section 3 or
5, chapter 538, Oregon Laws 2017.
(L) Manufactured dwelling park nonprofit cooperatives organized under ORS chapter 62.
(5) “Financial institution” has the meaning  given that term in ORS 314.610, except that “finan-
cial institution” does not include a credit union.
[5]
SB 1542
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6)(a) “FR Y-9” means the consolidated or parent-only financial statements that a holding com-
pany is required to file with the Federal Reserve Board pursuant to 12 U.S.C. 1844.
(b) In the  case of a holding company required to file both consolidated and parent-only financial
statements, “FR  Y-9” means the consolidated financial statements that the holding company is re-
quired to file.
(7) “Governmental entity” means:
(a) The United States and any of its unincorporated agencies and instrumentalities.
(b) Any incorporated agency or  instrumentality of the United States wholly owned by the United
States or by a corporation wholly owned by the United States.
(c) The State of Oregon and any of its unincorporated agencies and instrumentalities.
(d) Any county, city, district or other political subdivision of the state.
(e) A special government body as defined in ORS 174.117.
(f) A federally recognized Indian tribe.
(8) “Groceries” means food as defined in  7 U.S.C. 2012(k), but does not include cannabinoid
edibles or marijuana seeds.
(9)(a) “Hedging transaction” means a hedging transaction as defined  in section 1221 of the
Internal Revenue Code or a transaction accorded hedge  accounting treatment under Financial Ac-
counting Standards Board Statement No. 133.
(b) “Hedging transaction” does not include  a transaction in which an actual transfer of title of
real or tangible property to another entity occurs.
(10) “Insurer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 317.010.
(11) “Internal Revenue Code,” except where the Legislative Assembly  has provided otherwise,
refers to the laws of the United States  or to the Internal Revenue Code as they are amended and
in effect on December 31, 2022.
(12) “Labor costs” means total compensation of all  employees, not to include compensation paid
to any single employee in excess of $500,000.
(13)(a) “Motor vehicle fuel or  any other product used for the propulsion of motor vehicles”
means:
(A) Motor vehicle fuel as defined in ORS 319.010; and
(B) Fuel the use of which in a motor vehicle is subject to taxation under ORS 319.530.
(b) “Motor vehicle fuel or any other product used for the propulsion of motor  vehicles” does not
mean:
(A) Electricity; or
(B) Electric batteries or any other mechanical or physical  component or accessory of a motor
vehicle.
(14) “Person” includes individuals, combinations of individuals  of any form, receivers, assignees,
trustees in bankruptcy, firms,  companies, joint-stock companies, business trusts, estates, partner-
ships, limited liability partnerships, limited liability companies, associations, joint ventures,  clubs,
societies, entities organized as for-profit corporations under ORS chapter 60,  C corporations, S cor-
porations, qualified subchapter S
subsidiaries, qualified subchapter S trusts, trusts, entities
that are disregarded for federal income tax purposes and any other entities.
(15) “Retailer” means a person doing business by selling tangible personal  property to a pur-
chaser for a purpose other than:
(a) Resale by the purchaser of the property as tangible personal property in the  regular course
[6]
SB 1542
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of business;
(b) Incorporation by the purchaser of the property in the course of regular business as  an in-
gredient or component of real or personal property; or
(c) Consumption by the purchaser of the property in the production for sale of a new  article of
tangible personal property.
(16) “Taxable commercial activity” means commercial activity sourced to  this state under ORS
317A.128, less any subtraction pursuant to ORS 317A.119.
(17)(a) “Taxpayer” means any person or unitary group required to register, file  or pay tax under
ORS 317A.100 to 317A.158.
(b) “Taxpayer” does not include excluded persons, except to  the extent that a tax-exempt entity
has unrelated business income as described in the Internal Revenue Code.
(18) “Tax year” means, except as otherwise provided in ORS 317A.103, a taxpayer’s annual  ac-
counting period used for  federal income tax purposes under section 441 of the Internal Revenue
Code.
(19)(a) “Unitary business” means  a business enterprise in which there exists directly or indi-
rectly between the members or parts of  the enterprise a sharing or exchange of value as demon-
strated by:
(A) Centralized management or a common executive force;
(B) Centralized administrative services or functions resulting in economies of scale; or
(C) Flow of goods, capital resources or services demonstrating functional integration.
(b) “Unitary business” may include a business enterprise the activities of which:
(A) Are in the same general line of business, such as manufacturing, wholesaling or  retailing;
or
(B) Constitute steps in  a vertically integrated process, such as the steps involved in the pro-
duction of natural resources, which might include exploration, mining, refining and marketing.
(20) “Unitary  group” means a group of persons with more than 50 percent common ownership,
either direct or indirect, that is engaged in business activities that constitute a unitary business.
(21) “Wholesaler” means a person primarily doing business by merchant distribution  of tangible
personal property to retailers or to other wholesalers.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 317A.125 is amended to read:
317A.125. (1) The corporate activity tax imposed  under ORS 317A.116 for each tax year shall
equal $250 plus the product of the taxpayer’s taxable  commercial activity in excess of [ $1 million]
$5 million for the tax year multiplied by 0.57 percent.
(2) A tax is not owed  under this section if the person’s taxable commercial activity does not
exceed [ $1 million] $5 million.
SECTION 3.  ORS 317A.137 is amended to read:
317A.137. (1) For purposes of the corporate activity tax imposed under ORS 317A.116, every
person doing  business in this state with commercial activity for the tax year in excess of [ $1
million] $5 million shall file an annual return not later than the 15th day of the fourth month fol-
lowing the end of the  tax year. If the 15th day of the fourth month falls on a Saturday, Sunday or
legal holiday, including any legal holiday in the District of Columbia, the return is due on the  next
business day following the Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday. The  return must be filed with the
Department of Revenue in a form prescribed by the department.
(2) The corporate activity  tax imposed under ORS 317A.116 is due and estimated tax payments
for the previous quarter are payable to  the department on or before the last day of the 4th, 7th and
[7]
SB 1542
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10th months of the tax year and of the first month immediately following the end of the tax year.
(3) The department may by rule extend the time for making any return. If  the time for filing a
return is extended, interest on any unpaid tax at the rate established under ORS  305.220 from the
time the return was originally required to be filed to the time of payment, shall be added and paid.
SECTION 4.
The amendments to ORS 317A.100, 317A.125 and 317A.137 by sections 1 to  3
of this 2024 Act apply to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.
SECTION 5. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[8]