Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this  section, “long-term recovery group” means a cooperative
organization comprising representatives of nonprofit, governmental,  business and faith-based
entities that works within  a local community to prepare for, build resilience against and re-
cover from emergencies, including performing any of the following functions:
(a) Providing local coordination of federal or state support;
(b) Serving as a primary local disaster recovery organization;
(c) Assessing local needs following  a disaster and determining locally informed plans for
action;
(d) Facilitating communication with local communities, including vulnerable populations;
(e) Leveraging philanthropic and other private funding and  coordinating with
philanthropic entities;
(f) Facilitating disaster case management, including providing a central hub for allocating
resources for unmet needs; or
(g) Providing emergency-related services and supports to the local community.
(2) The Oregon  Department of Emergency Management shall identify existing long-term
recovery groups in Oregon and provide grants  for their support. The department shall exe-
cute grant agreements with grant  recipients obligating recipients to use grant moneys for
purposes specified by the department.  The department shall determine the permissible pur-
poses for a grant under this section based  on the needs of the long-term recovery group and
the locality in which it operates.
(3) The department shall adopt rules necessary for the administration of this section.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Emergency Management, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $18,000,000 to provide grants under section
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2992
HB 3285
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
1 of this 2025 Act to long-term recovery groups for staffing and operations.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Emergency Management, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the  amount of $18,000,000 to provide grants under section
1 of this 2025 Act to long-term recovery groups for disaster case management services.
SECTION 4. (1) The Long-Term Recovery Group Fund is established in the State  Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the  General Fund. The Long-Term Recovery Group Fund
consists of moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or transferred  to the fund by the Leg-
islative Assembly or otherwise. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the
Oregon Department of Emergency Management for the purposes  specified in subsection (2)
of this section.
(2) The department may expend moneys from the fund to make grants to  long-term re-
covery groups, as defined in section 1 of this 2025 Act, if:
(a) The locality in which the long-term recovery group  operates has experienced, or will
imminently experience, an emergency; and
(b) The long-term recovery group  requests a grant from the fund to be used for increased
staffing or expedient incorporation or other organization.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]