Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 291.345 is amended to read:
291.345. (1)  For purposes of implementing Article IX, section 14 (3), of the Oregon Constitution,
if revenues received by the General Fund from the corporate income  and excise taxes during the
biennium exceed the amount estimated to  be received from such taxes for the biennium by two
percent or more, the Legislative Assembly shall appropriate an amount equal to the total amount
of the excess to the [ State School Fund established by ORS 327.008  for apportionment as provided in
ORS 327.008] School Facility Improvement  Fund created in ORS 327.320, for appropriation as
provided in ORS 327.330 (4).
(2) The amount appropriated under this section  shall be in addition to the total amount of re-
venues the Legislative Assembly  would otherwise appropriate, allocate or make available for the
biennium for funding [ kindergarten through grade 12 public education ] public school construction
projects and infrastructure improvements  if  excess revenues described in subsection (1) of this
section were not available.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 327.330 is amended to read:
327.330. (1) Subject to the rules of the State  Board of Education, the Superintendent of Public
Instruction shall make grants to school districts that apply therefor for the  purpose of construction
and maintenance of public school facilities.
(2) Grants shall not exceed $500,000 in  any biennium to any school district. In addition, a com-
bination of districts may submit a  joint grant application in an amount not to exceed $500,000.
However, a district or combination thereof  may apply in subsequent bienniums for additional grants
for the same facility. Grants must be matched  at least one local dollar for four state dollars by the
district or combination thereof.
(3) The state board by rule shall establish  criteria for grant approval. Such criteria shall include
but not be limited to:
(a) The age of public school facilities, the degree of overcrowding and the absence  of facilities
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2581
HB 3084
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
that are considered necessary to  accomplish the educational goals of the district and this state; and
(b) Maintenance and reconstruction needs related to  the deterioration of existing public school
facilities, which deterioration has the potential of affecting the health and safety of students.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (3) of this section, grants made  under this section
from moneys appropriated pursuant to ORS 291.345 (1) shall be awarded for  funding of school
construction projects and infrastructure improvements and shall be granted only to school
districts that:
(a) Have submitted general obligation bonds to  electors of the district during the pre-
ceding three years;
(b) Have  not received voter approval for general obligation bonds during the preceding
10 years; and
(c) Have reserve funds of not more than eight percent of the district’s adopted budget.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 291.349 is amended to read:
291.349. (1) As soon as practicable after adjournment sine die of the odd-numbered  year regular
session of the Legislative Assembly, the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services shall report
to the Legislative Revenue Officer and the Legislative Fiscal Officer the estimate as of  July 1 of the
first year of the biennium of General  Fund and State Lottery Fund revenues that will be received
by the state during  that biennium. The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall base its
estimate on the last forecast given to the Legislative Assembly before adjournment sine die  of the
odd-numbered year regular  session on which the printed, adopted budget prepared in the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services is based, adjusted only insofar as necessary to  reflect
changes in laws adopted at that session. The  report shall contain the estimated revenues from cor-
porate income  and excise taxes separately from the estimated revenues from other General Fund
sources. The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may revise the estimate if  necessary
following adjournment sine die of a special session or an  even-numbered year regular session of the
Legislative Assembly, but any revision does  not affect the basis of the computation described in
subsection (3) or (4) of this section.
(2) As soon as practicable after the end  of the biennium, the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services shall report to  the Legislative Revenue Officer and the Legislative Fiscal Officer,
or the Legislative Assembly  if it is in session, the amount of General Fund revenues collected as
of the last June 30  of the preceding biennium. The report shall contain the collections from corpo-
rate income and excise taxes separately from collections from other sources.
(3) If the revenues received from the corporate income and excise taxes during  the biennium
exceed the amounts estimated to be received from  such taxes for the biennium, as estimated after
adjournment sine die of the odd-numbered year regular session, by two percent or  more, the total
amount of that excess shall be retained in the General Fund and used, in the manner described in
ORS 291.345,  to provide additional funding for [ public education, ] public school construction
projects and infrastructure improvements, for the benefit of pupils  enrolled in  kindergarten
through grade 12.
(4) If the revenues received from General Fund revenue  sources, exclusive of those described in
subsection (3) of this section, during the biennium exceed the  amounts estimated to be received from
such sources for the biennium, as estimated after adjournment sine  die of the odd-numbered year
regular session, by two percent or more, there shall be credited  to personal income taxpayers an
amount equal to the total amount of that excess, reduced  by the cost certified by the Department
of Revenue  under ORS 291.351 as being allocable to credits described under this subsection. The
[2]
HB 3084
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
excess amount to be credited shall be credited to personal  income taxpayers in a percentage amount
of prior year personal income tax liability as determined under subsection (5) of this section.
(5)(a) If there is an excess to be credited under subsection (4) of this section, on or  before Oc-
tober 1, following the end of each  biennium, the Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall
determine and certify to the Department of Revenue the percentage  amounts of credit for purposes
of subsection (4) of this section. The percentage amounts determined shall be percentage amounts
to the nearest one-tenth of a  percent that will distribute the excess to be credited to personal in-
come taxpayers.
(b) The percentage amount applicable  to subsection (4) of this section shall equal the amount
distributed under subsection (4) of  this section divided by the estimated total personal income tax
liability for all personal income taxpayers for tax years beginning in the  calendar year immediately
preceding the calendar year in which the excess is determined.
(c) The amount of the surplus credit under subsection (4) of this section is determined by
multiplying the  percentage amount determined under paragraph (b) of this subsection by the total
amount of a personal  income taxpayer’s tax liability for the tax year beginning in the calendar year
immediately preceding the calendar year in which the excess is determined in order to  calculate the
amount to be credited to the taxpayer.
(d) The credit shall  be determined based on the tax liability as shown on the return of the tax-
payer or as corrected by the Department of Revenue.
(e) The credit shall be computed after the allowance of  a credit provided under ORS 316.082,
316.131 or 316.292, but  before the allowance of any other credit or offset against tax liability allowed
or allowable under any  provision of law of this state, and before the application of estimated tax
payments, withholding or other advance tax payments.
(f) For personal income taxpayers,  if a credit applied against tax liability as described in para-
graph (e) of this subsection reduces tax  liability to zero and an amount of the credit remains unused,
the remaining unused amount shall be refunded to the taxpayer. For purposes of ORS chapters  305,
314, 315 and 316, refunds  issued under this paragraph are refunds of an overpayment of tax imposed
under ORS chapter 316.
(g) The Department of Revenue may prescribe by rule the  manner of calculating and claiming
a credit if the filing status of a taxpayer changes between the tax year for which a credit may  be
claimed and the succeeding tax year.
(6) A refund may not be made under this section to a  taxpayer if the amount of the refund is
less than $1.
(7) Not later  than October 15 following the end of the biennium, the Department of Revenue
shall provide information and  guidance to taxpayers relating to the calculation of the credit. The
department may make the information and guidance available electronically or otherwise.
(8) The Department of Revenue may adopt rules specifying the manner for issuing  refunds under
this section to taxpayers who filed returns for the tax year  on which the credit is computed but who
are not required to file returns for the year in which the credit could be claimed.
SECTION 4.
The amendments to ORS  291.345, 291.349 and 337.330 by sections 1, 2 and 3
of this 2023 Act apply to biennia ending on or after June 30, 2025.
SECTION 5. This 2023 Act does not  take effect unless the amendment to the Oregon
Constitution proposed by House Joint Resolution 17 (2023) is approved by the people at  the
next regular general election held in November 2024. This 2023 Act takes effect  on the ef-
fective date of that constitutional amendment.
[3]
HB 3084
1
[4]