Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A county juvenile department may provide preventive services to  a per-
son who is under 12  years of age and who has committed an act that is a violation, or that
if done by an adult would  constitute a violation, of a law or ordinance of the United States
or a state, county or city.
(2) Preventive services provided under this section include, at a minimum:
(a) Individual, group and family therapy;
(b) Trauma-informed, developmentally appropriate services not otherwise covered by
health insurance, including community-based sexual offending services;
(c) Assessments to identify treatment need;
(d) Educational supports; and
(e) Family navigation and support services.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 417.855 is amended to read:
417.855. (1) Each board of  county commissioners shall designate an agency or organization to
serve as the lead  planning organization to facilitate the creation of a partnership among state and
local public and private entities in each county.  The partnership shall include, but is not limited to,
education representatives, public health representatives, local alcohol and  drug planning commit-
tees, representatives of the court system, local mental health planning committees,  city or municipal
representatives and local public safety coordinating  councils. The partnership shall develop a local
high-risk juvenile crime prevention plan.
(2) The local high-risk juvenile crime  prevention plans shall use services and activities to meet
the needs of a targeted population of youths who:
(a) Have more than one of the following risk factors:
(A) Antisocial behavior;
(B) Poor family functioning or poor family support;
(C) Failure in school;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2121
HB 2327
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(D) Substance abuse problems; [ or]
(E) Negative peer association; or
(F) Are under 12 years of age and  have committed an act that is a violation, or that if
done by an adult would constitute a violation, of a law  or ordinance of the United States or
a state, county or city;  and
(b) Are clearly  demonstrating at-risk behaviors that have come to the attention of government
or community agencies, schools or law enforcement and will lead to imminent or increased involve-
ment in the juvenile justice system.
(3)(a) The Youth Development Council shall allocate funds available  to support the local high-
risk juvenile crime prevention plans to counties based on the youth  population age 18 or younger
in those counties.
(b) The Youth Development Council shall award a minimum grant to small counties. The mini-
mum grant level shall be  determined by the council through a public process and reviewed by the
council  biennially.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 419C.005 is amended to read:
419C.005. (1) The juvenile court  has exclusive original jurisdiction in any case involving a per-
son who is at least 12 years of age and  under 18 years of age  and who has committed an act that
is a violation, or that if done by an adult would constitute a violation, of a law  or ordinance of the
United States or a state, county or city.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this  section do not prevent a court of competent juris-
diction from entertaining a civil action or suit involving a youth.
(3) The court does not have jurisdiction as provided in subsection (1) of this section after a  mi-
nor has been emancipated pursuant to ORS 419B.550 to 419B.558.
(4) The court’s jurisdiction over a person under this section  or ORS 419C.067 continues until
one of the following occurs:
(a) The court dismisses a petition filed under  this chapter or waives the case under ORS
419C.340. If jurisdiction is based on a previous adjudication, then dismissal or waiver of a later  case
does not terminate jurisdiction under the previous case unless the court so orders.
(b) The court transfers jurisdiction of the case as  provided in ORS 419C.053, 419C.056 and
419C.059.
(c) The court enters an order terminating jurisdiction.
(d) The person becomes 25 years of age.
(e) The court places the person under the  jurisdiction of the Psychiatric Security Review Board
as provided in ORS 419C.529. If the court also has jurisdiction over the person based  on a previous
adjudication under this chapter or ORS  chapter 419B, placing a person under the jurisdiction of the
board in a later case does not terminate wardship under the previous case unless the  court so or-
ders.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 419C.103 is amended to read:
419C.103. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, if  a youth taken into
custody is not released as provided in ORS 419C.100 and the juvenile court  for the county has not
established the alternative procedure authorized in subsection (5) of  this section, the person taking
the youth into custody shall, without unnecessary delay, do one of the following:
(a) Take the youth before the court or  a person appointed by the court to effect disposition
under ORS 419C.109 and 419C.136.
(b) Take  the youth to a place of detention or shelter care or a public or private agency desig-
[2]
HB 2327
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
nated by the court and as soon as possible thereafter notify the court that the  youth has been taken
into custody.
(2) If the person taking the youth into custody has probable cause  to believe that the youth,
while in or on a public building or court facility within the last 120 days, possessed a firearm  or
destructive device in violation of ORS 166.250, 166.370 or 166.382, the person may not  release the
youth from custody and shall do one of the following without unnecessary delay:
(a) Take the  youth before the court for a determination of initial disposition under ORS 419C.109
(3); or
(b) [ Notwithstanding ORS  419C.133, ] Take the youth to a place of detention and, as soon as
possible thereafter, notify the court and the juvenile  department that the youth has been taken into
custody and detained.
(3) Where a youth residing in some other county is taken into custody the youth may be:
(a) Released to the youth’s parent,  guardian or other responsible person in this state as provided
in ORS 419C.100.
(b) Delivered to a peace officer  or juvenile counselor in the county in which the youth resides,
if such delivery can be made without unnecessary delay. In such event, the  person to whom the
youth is delivered shall assume custody of the youth and shall proceed as provided in this chapter.
(4) Where a youth is released or delivered as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the  ju-
risdiction of the juvenile court of the county in which the youth  resides shall attach from the time
the youth is taken into custody.
(5) The juvenile court may establish, as  an alternative to the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section, that if  a youth taken into custody is not released as provided in ORS 419C.100, procedures
shall be followed that comply with the following:
(a) The person  taking the youth into custody may communicate, by telecommunications or oth-
erwise, with the person appointed by the court to effect disposition under ORS 419C.109.
(b) After interviewing the person taking  the youth into custody and obtaining such other infor-
mation as is considered necessary, the person appointed by the court under  ORS 419C.109 to effect
disposition may exercise the authority granted under  that section and shall, in such case, direct that
the person taking the youth into custody release the youth or deliver the  youth in accordance with
such direction.
(c) The person taking the youth into custody shall comply with the direction of the person  ap-
pointed by the court to effect disposition.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 419C.133 is amended to read:
419C.133. [No youth ] No person  under  12 years of age shall be placed in detention except pur-
suant to judicial review and written  findings describing why it is in the best interests of the
[youth] person to be placed in  detention. Such review may be ex parte, and the [ youth] person does
not need to be present. However, a juvenile court  judge or referee must determine that the [ youth]
person is eligible for detention under ORS [ 419C.145 or] 419C.156 and that appropriate  alternative
methods of  controlling the [ youth’s] person’s  behavior are unavailable. A [ youth] person  detained
under this section shall have the right to a hearing as provided in ORS 419C.153.
SECTION 6. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Youth Development Division, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______  for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of sec-
tion 1 of this 2023 Act and the amendments to ORS 417.855 by section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 7. (1) Section 1 of this 2023 Act and the  amendments to ORS 417.855 and
[3]
HB 2327
1
2
3
4
5
6
419C.005 by sections 2 and 3 of this 2023 Act  apply to acts committed by a person under 12
years of age before, on or after the effective date of this 2023 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 419C.103 and 419C.133 by sections 4  and 5 of this 2023 Act
apply to placements of persons under 12 years of age  in detention occurring on or after the
effective date of this 2023 Act.
[4]