Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
ORS 180.805, 180.810, 181A.820, 181A.822, 181A.823, 181A.826, 181A.827,
181A.828 and 181A.829 are repealed.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2265