Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 4 of this 2025 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS chapter
215.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Telecommunications tower” includes  a personal wireless service facility, a broadcast
communications facility and other technological communications facilities.
(b) “Telecommunications tower” does not include a roof-mounted,  building-integrated or
building-mounted communications structure unless the structure:
(A) Exceeds the height limitation of the zone; or
(B) Extends more than an additional five  feet above the highest ridge of the building’s
roof or 15 feet above the highest eave, whichever is higher.
(2) The development, replacement, alteration, modification  or reconstruction of a tele-
communications tower is not allowed except through a county’s  administrative review of an
application filed under subsection (4) of this section or approval of a permit filed under sub-
section (5) of this section.
(3) A telecommunications tower application must:
(a) Identify all communications providers that will colocate on the tower;
(b) Identify all existing telecommunications towers and all properties  that have obtained
approval for a telecommunications tower within two miles of the proposed tower location;
(c) Include certification by a professional engineer that the  construction will comply with
structural standards for a telecommunications tower;
(d) Demonstrate that the applicant has legal access to any private road necessary to ac-
cess the tower and that the applicant is obligated to improve and maintain the  private road;
and
(e) Include a site-specific study identifying  the tower site and demonstrating how the
materials, surfacing and coloration used on the tower and associated fixtures will  appropri-
ately blend into the background, match the surrounding environment  and minimize glare,
including by stealth construction or concealed towers.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3476
HB 3253
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
(4) An application may be approved by  administrative review only if the application in-
cludes evidence that the telecommunications tower will not:
(a) Have fewer than two communications providers colocate on the tower, or fewer  than
three communications providers colocate on the tower if the  tower is more than 100 feet in
height;
(b) Be sited within two miles of  any other telecommunications tower upon which the mile
radius of the tower will be unavailable or would not meet service coverage needs;
(c) Be more than 180 feet in height;
(d) If located within an urban growth boundary, be more than 40 feet in height;
(e) Be a monopole construction;
(f) Require electronic lighting or reflective material except  as required by Federal Avi-
ation Administration regulations or other federal or state law;
(g) Include a whip  antenna that will exceed the height of the tower by more than 20 feet;
or
(h) Include a directional or parabolic antenna that will exceed seven feet  in diameter or
width or 14 feet in height if attached to a tower.
(5) Approval of  a telecommunications tower that is not permitted under subsection (4)
of this section may be  approved only by permit under ORS 215.402 to 215.438. An application
for a telecommunications tower permit under this subsection must demonstrate:
(a) Why the tower cannot be approved through an application filed under subsection  (4)
of this section;
(b) Coverage limitations;
(c) The type of system, including broadcast or cellular signal;
(d) Technical and engineering feasibility of the tower;
(e) Public safety features of the tower; and
(f) Compliance with other requirements of local, state and federal agencies.
(6) The owner of a telecommunications tower that has  not operated for more than 18
months shall decommission and remove the tower.
(7) A county may impose a fine of up to $7,500 against the  owner of any telecommuni-
cations tower that does not comply with this section.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding section 2 of this 2025 Act, counties that have enacted de-
velopment standards or procedures that are similarly prescriptive  to section 2 of this 2025
Act relating to the  approval of, aesthetics for and permissible locations of telecommuni-
cations towers may continue to apply those standards  and procedures to all applications to
develop, replace, alter, modify or reconstruct a telecommunications tower that are  filed be-
fore January 1, 2030.
SECTION 4. No later than January 1, 2032, notwithstanding any county  permit or any
other order or decision issued before the effective date of this 2025 Act, the owner of a
telecommunications tower constructed prior to the effective  date of this 2025 Act must have
the tower approved as a modification under section 2 (2) or 3 of this 2025 Act or must  de-
commission and remove the tower.
SECTION 5.
Section 3 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2032.
[2]