Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Subject to the appropriation of sufficient moneys by the Legislative As-
sembly, Southern Oregon  University shall address Oregon’s behavioral and mental health
needs by:
(a) Materially increasing the number of mental health practitioners who graduate in
southern Oregon; and
(b) Teaching basic competencies  in behavioral and mental health to workforce sectors
not traditionally associated with behavioral and mental health through innovative alternative
academic pathways, including but not limited to microcredentials.
(2) Southern Oregon University shall accomplish the increase of graduates described in
subsection (1) of this section by:
(a) Establishing a fellowship program that offers a debt-free pathway to graduation  for
students pursuing behavioral and mental health degrees;
(b) Increasing the number of faculty,  university staff and field staff who are assisting
students who are enrolled in behavioral and mental health degree programs;
(c) Partnering with community organizations on pathways for behavioral and  mental
health student interns  to work with rural, veteran or homeless individuals, students or per-
sons from underserved communities; and
(d) Any other method determined by Southern Oregon University  to be necessary to en-
hance the state’s capacity to educate behavioral and mental health  practitioners in the
manner described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) As used in  this section, “persons from underserved communities” means persons who:
(a) Qualify as underrepresented persons as defined in ORS 342.120;
(b) Are from low-income families; or
(c) Experience disability, including intellectual or developmental disabilities.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4038
HB 3274
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning  July 1,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $2,500,000, to be allocated to Southern Oregon
University for the purposes set forth in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 3.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2023.
[2]