Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 243.650 to
243.782.
SECTION 2. (1) The purpose of this section is to preserve and  protect the fundamental
interests, rights and obligations of the people of this state expressed in ORS 243.656.
(2) Membership in a labor organization is voluntary. A public employer may not require
a public employee  that chooses not to join a labor organization to pay dues, initiation fees
or assessments to a labor organization.  An agreement involving union security entered into
between a public employer and an exclusive representative may provide for  the voluntary
payment by an employee to an exclusive representative of dues, initiation fees  or assess-
ments.
(3) An assessment is imposed on each public employer with  employees represented by an
exclusive representative. The amount of the assessment is  percent of the wages  paid
by the public employer to the public employees represented by the exclusive representative.
(4) A public employer shall pay the assessment under subsection (3) of this  section to the
Employment Relations Board, in the form and manner prescribed by  the board, no later than
the 15th day of the month following the  month in which the wages were paid. If a public
employer has public  employees in different bargaining units, the public employer shall pay
an assessment for each bargaining unit. The public employer shall maintain payroll records
necessary to verify that the employer paid the correct assessment.
(5) The board shall deposit all  assessments paid under subsection (4) of this section to
the Employment Relations Protection Account established in  section 3 of this 2019 Act. The
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3223
HB 2643
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
board shall distribute funds in the account to each exclusive representative for  which an
assessment was paid. The board  may retain a portion of the funds to pay the board’s costs
in administering the account.
(6) An exclusive representative that receives funds under  subsection (5) of this section
shall maintain the funds in a separate account and  may not comingle the funds with other
moneys. The exclusive representative may use funds in the separate account for any pur-
pose that serves the state policies expressed in ORS 243.656. Funds in the separate account
may not be used to:
(a) Promote or oppose any political committee, as defined in ORS 260.005, or the nomi-
nation or election of any candidate for political office;
(b) Gather signatures for an initiative, referendum or recall petition; or
(c) Promote  or oppose the adoption of a measure, as defined in ORS 260.005, a referendum
petition or the recall of a public office holder.
(7) The payment of an assessment under this section is not a violation  of ORS 243.668 or
243.670 or an unfair labor practice under ORS 243.672.
SECTION 3.
The Employment Relations Protection Account is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. The account consists  of moneys de-
posited in the account by the Employment Relations Board  in accordance with section 2 of
this 2019 Act.  Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the Employment Re-
lations Board for carrying out section 2  of this 2019 Act. Interest earned by the account shall
be credited to the account.
SECTION 4.  ORS 243.650 is amended to read:
243.650. As used in ORS 243.650 to 243.782, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Appropriate bargaining  unit” means the unit designated by the Employment Relations Board
or voluntarily recognized by the public employer to be  appropriate for collective bargaining.
[However, an appropriate bargaining unit may not include both academically licensed  and unlicensed
or nonacademically licensed school employees. Academically licensed units may include but  are not
limited to  teachers, nurses, counselors, therapists, psychologists, child development specialists and
similar positions. This limitation does not apply to any bargaining unit certified or recognized prior
to June 6, 1995, or to any school district with fewer than 50 employees. ]
(2) “Board” means the Employment Relations Board.
(3) “Certification” means  official recognition by the board that a labor organization is the ex-
clusive representative for all of the employees in the appropriate bargaining unit.
(4) “Collective bargaining” means the performance of the mutual obligation of  a public employer
and the representative of its employees to meet at  reasonable times and confer in good faith with
respect to employment relations for the purpose of negotiations concerning mandatory  subjects of
bargaining, to meet and confer in good faith in accordance with law with  respect to any dispute
concerning the interpretation or  application of a collective bargaining agreement, and to execute
written contracts incorporating agreements that have been reached on behalf  of the public employer
and the employees in  the bargaining unit covered by such negotiations. The obligation to meet and
negotiate does not compel either party to agree to a proposal  or require the making of a concession.
This subsection may not be construed to prohibit a public employer and a certified  or recognized
representative of its employees from discussing or executing written agreements regarding matters
other than mandatory subjects of bargaining that are not prohibited by law as long as  there is mu-
tual agreement of the parties to discuss these matters, which are permissive subjects  of bargaining.
[2]
HB 2643
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) “Compulsory arbitration” means the procedure whereby  parties involved in a labor dispute
are required by law to submit their differences to a third party for a final and binding decision.
(6) “Confidential employee” means one who assists and acts in a confidential capacity to a  per-
son who formulates, determines and effectuates management policies in the area  of collective bar-
gaining.
(7)(a) “Employment relations” includes, but is  not limited to, matters concerning direct or indi-
rect monetary benefits, hours, vacations,  sick leave, grievance procedures , matters related to the
assessments, payments or distributions under section 2 of this 2019 Act,  and other conditions
of employment.
(b) “Employment relations” does not include subjects determined  to be permissive, nonmanda-
tory subjects of bargaining by the Employment Relations Board prior to June 6, 1995.
(c) After June  6, 1995, “employment relations” does not include subjects that the Employment
Relations Board determines to have a greater impact on management’s prerogative than on employee
wages, hours, or other terms and conditions of employment.
(d) “Employment relations” does not  include subjects that have an insubstantial or de minimis
effect on public employee wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment.
(e) For school district bargaining, “employment relations” excludes class size,  the school or ed-
ucational calendar, standards of performance or criteria for evaluation of teachers, the  school cur-
riculum, reasonable  dress, grooming and at-work personal conduct requirements respecting smoking,
gum chewing and similar matters of personal conduct, the standards and procedures for  student
discipline, the time between student classes, the selection, agendas and decisions  of 21st Century
Schools Councils established under ORS 329.704, requirements for expressing milk under ORS
653.077, and any other subject proposed that is permissive under paragraphs (b), (c) and (d) of  this
subsection.
(f) For employee bargaining involving employees covered by ORS 243.736 and employees  of the
Department of Corrections who have direct contact with inmates, “employment  relations” includes
safety issues that have an impact on the on-the-job safety of the employees or staffing levels  that
have a significant impact on the on-the-job safety of the employees.
(g) For  all other employee bargaining except school district bargaining and except as provided
in paragraph (f) of this subsection,  “employment relations” excludes staffing levels and safety issues
(except those staffing levels and safety issues that have a direct and substantial effect on the on-
the-job safety of public  employees), scheduling of services provided to the public, determination of
the minimum qualifications  necessary for any position, criteria for evaluation or performance ap-
praisal, assignment of duties, workload when the effect on  duties is insubstantial, reasonable dress,
grooming, and at-work personal conduct requirements respecting smoking, gum chewing, and similar
matters of personal conduct at work, and any other subject proposed that is permissive  under par-
agraphs (b), (c) and (d) of this subsection.
(8) “Exclusive representative” means the labor organization that, as a  result of certification by
the board or  recognition by the employer, has the right to be the collective bargaining agent of all
employees in an appropriate bargaining unit.
(9) “Fact-finding” means identification of the major issues in a particular  labor dispute by one
or more impartial individuals who review the positions of  the parties, resolve factual differences and
make recommendations for settlement of the dispute.
[(10) “Fair-share agreement” means an  agreement between the public employer and the recognized
or certified bargaining  representative of public employees whereby employees who are not members of
[3]
HB 2643
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the employee organization  are required to make an in-lieu-of-dues payment to an employee organization
except as provided in ORS 243.666. Upon the filing with the board of  a petition by 30 percent or more
of the employees in an appropriate bargaining unit covered by such union security agreement  declaring
they desire that the  agreement be rescinded, the board shall take a secret ballot of the employees in the
unit and certify the results thereof to  the recognized or certified bargaining representative and to the
public employer. Unless a majority of the votes cast in an election favor  the union security agreement,
the board shall certify deauthorization of the agreement. A petition for deauthorization of  a union se-
curity agreement must  be filed not more than 90 calendar days after the collective bargaining agreement
is executed.  Only one such election may be conducted in any appropriate bargaining unit during the
term of a collective bargaining agreement between a public  employer and the recognized or certified
bargaining representative.]
[(11)] (10)  “Final offer” means the proposed contract language  and cost summary submitted to
the mediator within seven days of the declaration of impasse.
[(12)] (11)  “Labor dispute” means  any controversy concerning employment relations or con-
cerning the association or representation of persons in negotiating, fixing, maintaining,  changing,
or seeking to arrange terms or conditions of employment relations, regardless of whether  the
disputants stand in the proximate relation of employer and employee.
[(13)] (12)  “Labor organization” means any organization that has as  one of its purposes repre-
senting employees in their employment relations with public employers.
[(14)] (13) “Last best offer package” means the offer  exchanged by parties not less than 14 days
prior to the date scheduled for an interest arbitration hearing.
[(15)] (14)  “Legislative body” means the Legislative Assembly,  the city council, the county
commission and any other board or commission empowered to levy taxes.
[(16)] (15)  “Managerial employee” means an  employee of the State of Oregon or a public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002 who possesses authority to formulate and carry out management deci-
sions or who represents management’s interest by taking or effectively recommending discretionary
actions that control or  implement employer policy, and who has discretion in the performance of
these management responsibilities beyond the routine discharge of duties. A  “managerial
employee” need not act in a  supervisory capacity in relation to other employees. Notwithstanding
this subsection, “managerial  employee” does not include faculty members at a community college,
college or university.
[(17)] (16) “Mediation” means assistance by an impartial third party in reconciling a labor dis-
pute between the public employer and the exclusive representative regarding employment  relations.
[(18) “Payment-in-lieu-of-dues” means an assessment to defray the cost  for services by the exclusive
representative in negotiations and contract administration of  all persons in an appropriate bargaining
unit who are not members  of the organization serving as exclusive representative of the employees.
The payment must be equivalent to regular union dues and assessments, if any, or must  be an amount
agreed upon by the public employer and the exclusive representative of the employees. ]
[(19)] (17)  “Public employee” means an employee of a public employer but  does not include
elected officials, persons appointed to serve  on boards or commissions, incarcerated persons working
under section 41, Article I of the Oregon Constitution, or persons who  are confidential employees,
supervisory employees or managerial employees.
[(20)] (18) “Public employer” means the State of Oregon,  and the following political subdivisions:
Cities, counties, community  colleges, school districts, special districts, mass transit districts, metro-
politan service districts, public  service corporations or municipal corporations and public and
[4]
HB 2643
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
quasi-public corporations.
[(21)] (19)  “Public employer representative” includes any individual or individuals specifically
designated by the public employer to act in its interests in all  matters dealing with employee rep-
resentation, collective bargaining and related issues.
[(22)] (20) “Strike” means a public employee’s  refusal in concerted action with others to report
for duty, or his or her willful absence from his or her position, or his or her stoppage of work,  or
his or  her absence in whole or in part from the full, faithful or proper performance of his or her
duties of employment, for the purpose of inducing, influencing or  coercing a change in the condi-
tions, compensation, rights,  privileges or obligations of public employment; however, nothing shall
limit or impair the right of any public employee to lawfully express or communicate a complaint  or
opinion on any matter related to the conditions of employment.
[(23)(a)] (21)(a)  “Supervisory employee” means any  individual having authority in the interest
of the employer to hire, transfer, suspend, lay  off, recall, promote, discharge, assign, reward or dis-
cipline other employees, or responsibly to direct them, or to adjust  their grievances, or effectively
to recommend such action, if in connection therewith, the exercise  of the authority is not of a
merely routine or clerical nature but requires  the use of independent judgment. Failure to assert
supervisory status in any Employment Relations Board proceeding or in  negotiations for any col-
lective bargaining agreement does not thereafter prevent assertion of supervisory status in  any
subsequent board proceeding or contract negotiation.
(b) “Supervisory employee” includes a faculty member of a public university listed in ORS
352.002 or the Oregon Health and Science University who:
(A) Is  employed as a president, vice president, provost, vice provost, dean, associate dean, as-
sistant dean, head or equivalent position; or
(B) Is employed in an administrative position without a reasonable expectation of teaching,  re-
search or other scholarly accomplishments.
(c) “Supervisory employee” does not include:
(A) A nurse, charge nurse  or nurse holding a similar position if that position has not tradi-
tionally been classified as supervisory;
(B) A firefighter prohibited from striking by  ORS 243.736 who assigns, transfers or directs the
work of other employees but does not  have the authority to hire, discharge or impose economic
discipline on those employees; or
(C) A faculty member of a public university listed in ORS 352.002 or the Oregon Health  and
Science University who is not a faculty member described in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
[(24)] (22)  “Unfair labor practice” means the commission of an act designated  an unfair labor
practice in ORS 243.672.
[(25)] (23)  “Voluntary arbitration” means the procedure  whereby parties involved in a labor
dispute mutually agree to submit their differences to a third party for a final and binding decision.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 243.666 is amended to read:
243.666. (1) A labor organization certified by the Employment Relations Board or recognized by
the public employer is the exclusive representative of the employees of a  public employer for the
purposes of collective bargaining with respect to employment relations.  [Nevertheless any agreements
entered into involving union security including an all-union agreement or agency  shop agreement must
safeguard the rights of nonassociation of employees, based on bona fide religious tenets or  teachings
of a church or religious body of which such employee is a  member. Such employee shall pay an amount
of money equivalent to regular union dues and initiation fees and assessments,  if any, to a nonreligious
[5]
HB 2643
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
charity or to  another charitable organization mutually agreed upon by the employee affected and the
representative of the labor organization to which such  employee would otherwise be required to pay
dues. The employee shall furnish written proof to the employer of the  employee that this has been
done.]
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions  of subsection (1) of this section, an individual employee or
group of employees at any time  may present grievances to their employer and have such grievances
adjusted, without the intervention of the labor organization, if:
(a) The adjustment is not inconsistent with the terms of a collective bargaining  contract or
agreement then in effect; and
(b) The labor organization has been given opportunity to be present at the adjustment.
(3) Nothing in this section prevents a public  employer from recognizing a labor organization
which represents at least a majority of  employees as the exclusive representative of the employees
of a public employer when the board  has not designated the appropriate bargaining unit or when the
board has not certified an exclusive representative in accordance with ORS 243.686.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 243.672 is amended to read:
243.672. (1) It is an unfair labor  practice for a public employer or its designated representative
to do any of the following:
(a) Interfere with,  restrain or coerce employees in or because of the exercise of rights guaran-
teed in ORS 243.662.
(b) Dominate, interfere with or assist in the formation, existence or administration  of any em-
ployee  organization.
(c) Discriminate in regard to hiring, tenure or any terms or condition of employment for the
purpose of encouraging or discouraging  membership in an employee organization. [ Nothing in this
section is intended to prohibit the entering into of a fair-share agreement  between a public employer
and the exclusive bargaining  representative of its employees. If a “fair-share” agreement has been
agreed to by the public employer and exclusive representative, nothing prohibits the deduction of the
payment-in-lieu-of-dues from the salaries or wages of the employees. ]
(d) Discharge or otherwise discriminate against an employee because the  employee has signed
or filed an affidavit, petition or complaint or has given  information or testimony under ORS 243.650
to 243.782.
(e) Refuse to bargain collectively in good faith with the exclusive representative.
(f) Refuse or fail to comply with any provision of ORS 243.650 to 243.782.
(g) Violate the provisions of any written contract with respect to employment relations including
an agreement  to arbitrate or to accept the terms of an arbitration award, where previously the
parties have agreed to accept arbitration awards as final and binding upon them.
(h) Refuse to reduce an agreement, reached as a result  of collective bargaining, to writing and
sign the resulting contract.
(i) Violate ORS 243.670 (2).
(2) Subject to the limitations set forth in this subsection, it is an unfair labor practice for  a
public employee or for a labor organization or its designated representative  to do any of the fol-
lowing:
(a) Interfere with, restrain or coerce any employee in or because of the exercise of any  right
guaranteed under ORS 243.650 to 243.782.
(b) Refuse  to bargain collectively in good faith with the public employer if the labor organization
is an exclusive representative.
[6]
HB 2643
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Refuse or fail to comply with any provision of ORS 243.650 to 243.782.
(d) Violate the provisions  of any written contract with respect to employment relations, includ-
ing an agreement to arbitrate or to accept the terms of an arbitration award, where previously  the
parties have agreed to accept arbitration awards as final and binding upon them.
(e) Refuse to reduce an agreement, reached as a result of collective  bargaining, to writing and
sign the resulting contract.
[(f)] (3) It is an  unfair labor practice  for any labor organization to engage in unconventional
strike activity not protected for private sector employees under the  National Labor Relations Act
on June  6, 1995. This provision applies to sitdown, slowdown, rolling, intermittent or on-and-off again
strikes.
[(g)] (4) It is an unfair labor practice  for a labor organization or its agents to picket or  cause,
induce, or encourage to be picketed, or threaten  to engage in such activity, at the residence or
business premises of any individual who is a member of the governing body of a public employer,
with respect to a dispute over a collective  bargaining agreement or negotiations over employment
relations, if an objective or effect  of such picketing is to induce another person to cease doing
business with the  governing body member’s business or to cease handling, transporting or dealing
in goods  or services produced at the governing body’s business. For purposes of this [ paragraph]
subsection, a member of the Legislative  Assembly is a member of the governing body of a public
employer  when  the collective bargaining negotiation or dispute is between the State of Oregon and
a labor organization. The Governor  and other statewide elected officials are not considered members
of a governing body for purposes of this [ paragraph] subsection . Nothing  in this [ paragraph] sub-
section may be interpreted or applied in a manner that violates the  right of free speech and as-
sembly as protected by the Constitution of the United States or the  Constitution of the State of
Oregon.
[(3)] (5)  An injured party may file a written complaint with  the Employment Relations Board
not later than 180 days following the occurrence of  an unfair labor practice. For each unfair labor
practice complaint filed, a fee of $300 is imposed. For each answer to an unfair  labor practice
complaint filed with the  board, a fee of $300 is imposed. The board may allow any other person to
intervene in the proceeding and to present  testimony. A person allowed to intervene shall pay a fee
of $300 to the board. The board may, in  its discretion, order fee reimbursement to the prevailing
party in any case in which the complaint or answer is  found to have been frivolous or filed in bad
faith. The board shall deposit fees received under this section to the credit  of the Employment Re-
lations Board Administrative Account.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 292.055 is amended to read:
292.055. (1) Upon receipt of the request in writing of a  state officer or employee so to do, the
state official authorized  to disburse funds in payment of the salary or wages of such state officer
or employee each month shall deduct from the salary or wages of such  officer or employee the
amount of money  indicated in such request, for payment thereof to a labor organization as the same
is defined in ORS 243.650.
(2) Such state official each month shall pay such amount so deducted to  any such labor organ-
ization so designated to receive it.
(3) Unless there is a contract to the contrary, upon  receipt of the request in writing of such
officer or employee so to do, such state official shall cease making such deductions and payments.
(4) In addition to making such deductions and payments to  any labor organization certified un-
der the rules of the Employment Relations Board as representatives of employees in a  bargaining
[7]
HB 2643
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
unit, any  department, board, commission, bureau, institution or other agency of the state shall make
deductions for and payments to noncertified, yet bona fide, labor organizations, if requested to  do
so by officers and employees in that department, board, commission, bureau, institution,  or other
state agency, and for so long as  the requests are not revoked. No deductions for and payments to
any labor organization under this section  shall be deemed an unfair labor practice under ORS
243.672.
[(5) Upon receipt from  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services of a copy of a valid
fair-share agreement in a collective bargaining unit, the  state official authorized to disburse funds in
payment of the salary or wages of the employees in such unit each month  shall deduct from the salary
or wages of the  employees covered by the agreement the in-lieu-of-dues payment stated in the agreement
and pay such amount to  the labor organization party the agreement in the same manner as deducted
dues are paid to a labor organization. Such  deduction and payment shall continue for the life of the
agreement.]
SECTION 8.  ORS 243.682 is amended to read:
243.682. (1) If a question of representation exists, the Employment Relations Board shall:
(a) Upon application of  a public employer, a public employee or a labor organization, designate
the appropriate bargaining unit, and in making its determination shall consider such factors as
community of interest, wages, hours and other working conditions of the  employees involved, the
history of collective bargaining, and the  desires of the employees. The board may determine a unit
to be  the appropriate unit in a particular case even though some other unit might also be appro-
priate. Unless  a labor organization and a public employer agree otherwise, the board may not des-
ignate as appropriate a bargaining unit that includes:
(A) A faculty member  described in ORS 243.650 [ (23)(c)(C)] (21)(c)(C)  who supervises one or
more other faculty members; [ and]
(B) Any faculty member who is supervised by a faculty member  described in subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph ; or
(C) Both academically licensed and unlicensed  or nonacademically licensed school em-
ployees. Academically licensed units may include but are  not limited to teachers, nurses,
counselors, therapists, psychologists, child development  specialists and similar positions.
This limitation does not apply  to any bargaining unit certified or recognized prior to June
6, 1995, or to any school district with fewer than 50 employees .
(b) Investigate and conduct a hearing on a petition that has been filed by:
(A) A labor organization alleging that 30  percent of the employees in an appropriate bargaining
unit desire to be represented for collective bargaining by an exclusive representative;
(B) A labor organization alleging that 30 percent of  the employees in an appropriate bargaining
unit assert that the designated exclusive representative is no  longer the representative of the ma-
jority of the employees in the unit;
(C) A public  employer alleging that one or more labor organizations has presented a claim to
the public employer requesting recognition as the exclusive representative in an  appropriate bar-
gaining unit; or
(D) An employee or group of employees alleging  that 30 percent of the employees assert that the
designated exclusive representative is  no longer the representative of the majority of employees in
the unit.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding subsection  (1) of this section, when an employee, group of employees or
labor organization acting on behalf of the employees files a petition alleging that  a majority of em-
[8]
HB 2643
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ployees in a unit appropriate for the purpose  of collective bargaining wish to be represented by a
labor organization for that purpose, or when a labor organization files a  petition alleging that the
majority in a  group of unrepresented employees seek to be added to an existing bargaining unit, the
board shall investigate the petition. If the board finds  that a majority of the employees in a unit
appropriate for bargaining or a majority of employees  in a group of unrepresented employees that
is appropriate to add to an existing bargaining unit  have signed authorizations designating the labor
organization specified in the petition as the employees’ bargaining representative and that  no other
labor organization is currently certified  or recognized as the exclusive representative of any of the
employees in the unit or in the group of unrepresented employees seeking  to be added to an existing
bargaining unit, the board may not conduct an election  but shall certify the labor organization as
the exclusive representative unless a petition for a  representation election is filed as provided in
subsection (3) of this section.
(b) The  board by rule shall develop guidelines and procedures for the designation by employees
of a bargaining representative in the manner described in  paragraph (a) of this subsection. The
guidelines and procedures must include:
(A) Model collective bargaining authorization language that may be  used for purposes of making
the designations described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(B) Procedures to be used by the board to establish the authenticity  of signed authorizations
designating bargaining representatives;
(C) Procedures to be used by the board  to notify affected employees of the filing of a petition
requesting certification under subsection (3) of this section;
(D) Procedures for filing a petition  to request a representation election, including a timeline of
not more than  14 days after notice has been delivered to the affected employees of a petition filed
under paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
(E) Procedures for expedited resolution of any dispute about  the scope of the appropriate bar-
gaining unit. The resolution of the dispute may occur after an election is conducted.
(c) Solicitation and  rescission of a signed authorization designating bargaining representatives
are subject to the provisions of ORS 243.672.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, when a petition requesting  certification has
been filed under subsection (2) of this section, an  employee or a group of employees in the unit
designated by the petition, or one or more of the unrepresented  employees seeking to be added to
an existing bargaining unit, may file a  petition with the board to request that a representation
election be conducted.
(b) The petition requesting a representation election  must be supported by at least 30 percent
of the employees in the bargaining unit designated by the petition, or 30  percent of the unrepre-
sented employees seeking to be added to an existing bargaining unit.
(c) The representation election shall be conducted on-site or by  mail not later than 45 days after
the date on which the petition was filed.
(4) Except as provided in ORS 243.692, if the  board finds in a hearing conducted pursuant to
subsection (1)(b) of this  section that a question of representation exists, the board shall conduct an
election by secret ballot, at a time and place convenient  for the employees of the jurisdiction and
also within a reasonable period of time after the filing has  taken place, and certify the results of the
election.
SECTION 9.  ORS 243.676 is amended to read:
243.676. (1) Whenever a written complaint is filed alleging that any person  has engaged in or is
[9]
HB 2643
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
engaging in any unfair labor practice listed in ORS 243.672 (1) [ and (2) ] to (4)  and 243.752,  the
Employment Relations Board or its agent shall:
(a) Cause to be served upon such person a copy of the complaint;
(b) Investigate the complaint to determine if a hearing on  the unfair labor practice charge is
warranted. If  the investigation reveals that no issue of fact or law exists, the board may dismiss the
complaint; and
(c) Set the matter for  hearing if the board finds in its investigation made pursuant to paragraph
(b) of this subsection that an issue of  fact or law exists. The hearing shall be before the board or
an agent of the board not more than 20 days after  a copy of the complaint has been served on the
person.
(2) Where, as  a result of the hearing required pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this section, the
board finds that any person named in  the complaint has engaged in or is engaging in any unfair
labor practice charged in the complaint, the board shall:
(a) State its findings of fact;
(b) Issue and cause to be served on such person an order that the  person cease and desist from
the unfair labor practice;
(c) Take such affirmative action,  including but not limited to the reinstatement of employees
with or without back pay, as necessary to effectuate  the purposes of ORS 240.060, 240.065, 240.080,
240.123, 243.650 to 243.782, 292.055 and 341.290;
(d) Designate the amount and award representation costs, if any, to the prevailing party; and
(e) Designate the amount and award attorney fees, if any, to the prevailing party on appeal, in-
cluding proceedings for Supreme Court review, of a board order.
(3) Where the board finds that  the person named in the complaint has not engaged in or is not
engaging in an unfair labor practice, the board shall:
(a) Issue an order dismissing the complaint; and
(b) Designate the amount and award representation costs, if any, to the prevailing party.
(4)(a) The board may award a civil penalty to  any person as a result of an unfair labor practice
complaint  hearing,  in the aggregate amount of up to $1,000 per case, without regard to attorney fees,
if:
(A) The complaint has been affirmed  pursuant to subsection (2) of this section and the board
finds that the person who has committed, or who is engaging, in  an unfair labor practice has done
so repetitively,  knowing that the action taken was an unfair labor practice and took the action
disregarding this knowledge, or that the action constituting the unfair labor practice was egregious;
or
(B) The complaint has been dismissed pursuant to subsection (3)  of this section, and that the
complaint was frivolously filed, or filed with the intent to harass the other person, or both.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, if  the board finds that a public employer
named in the complaint violated ORS 243.670 (2), the board shall impose a civil  penalty equal to
triple the amount of funds  the public employer expended to assist, promote or deter union organiz-
ing.
(5) As used in  subsections (1) to (4) of this section, “person” includes but is not limited to indi-
viduals, labor organizations, associations and public employers.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 243.726 is amended to read:
243.726. (1) Participation in a strike shall be unlawful for any public  employee who is not in-
cluded in an appropriate bargaining unit  for which an exclusive representative has been certified
[10]
HB 2643
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
by the Employment Relations Board  or recognized by the employer; or is included in an appropriate
bargaining unit that provides for resolution of a labor dispute by petition to final  and binding arbi-
tration; or when the strike is not  made lawful under ORS 240.060, 240.065, 240.080, 240.123, 243.650
to 243.782, 292.055 and 341.290.
(2) It shall be lawful for  a public employee who is not prohibited from striking under subsection
(1) of this section and who is in the appropriate bargaining unit involved in  a labor dispute to par-
ticipate in a strike over mandatory subjects of bargaining provided:
(a) The requirements of ORS 243.712 and 243.722 relating  to the resolution of labor disputes
have been complied with in good faith;
(b) Thirty days have elapsed since the board  has made public the fact finder’s findings of fact
and recommendations or the mediator has made public the parties’ final offers;
(c) The exclusive representative has given 10 days’ notice by certified  mail of its intent to strike
and stating the reasons for its intent to strike to the board and the public employer;
(d) The collective bargaining agreement has expired, or  the labor dispute arises pursuant to a
reopener provision in a collective bargaining agreement or renegotiation under ORS 243.702  (1) or
renegotiation under ORS 243.698; and
(e) The  union’s strike does not include unconventional strike activity not protected under the
National Labor Relations Act on June 6, 1995, and does not constitute  an unfair labor practice un-
der ORS 243.672 [ (2)(f)] (3).
(3)(a) Where the strike occurring or is about to occur creates a clear and  present danger or
threat to  the health, safety or welfare of the public, the public employer concerned may petition the
circuit court of the county  in which the strike has taken place or is to take place for equitable relief
including but not limited to appropriate injunctive relief.
(b) If the strike is a strike of state employees the petition shall be filed in  the Circuit Court of
Marion  County.
(c) If, after hearing, the court finds that the strike  creates a clear and present danger or threat
to the health, safety  or welfare of the public, it shall grant appropriate relief. Such relief shall in-
clude an order that the labor dispute be submitted  to final and binding arbitration within 10 days
of the court’s order pursuant to procedures in ORS 243.746.
(4)(a) A labor  organization may not declare or authorize a strike of public employees that is or
would be in violation of this section. When it is alleged  in good faith by the public employer that
a labor organization has declared or  authorized a strike of public employees that is or would be in
violation of this section, the employer may petition the board for a declaration that  the strike is or
would be unlawful. The board, after conducting  an investigation and hearing, may make such dec-
laration if it finds that such declaration or authorization of a strike is or would be unlawful.
(b) When a labor organization or individual disobeys an  order of the appropriate circuit court
issued pursuant to enforcing an order of the board involving this section and ORS 243.736 or 243.738,
they shall be punished according to the provisions of ORS 33.015 to 33.155,  except that the amount
of the fine shall be at the discretion of the court.
(5) An unfair labor practice by a public employer shall not be  a defense to a prohibited strike.
The board upon the filing  of an unfair labor charge alleging that a public employer has committed
an unfair labor practice during or arising out of the collective bargaining procedures set forth in
ORS 243.712 and 243.722, shall take immediate  action on such charge and if required, petition the
court of competent jurisdiction for appropriate relief or a restraining order.
(6) As used in this section, “danger or threat to the health, safety or welfare of the  public” does
[11]
HB 2643
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
not include an economic or financial inconvenience to the public or to the public employer that  is
normally incident to a strike by public employees.
SECTION 11.  ORS 329A.430 is amended to read:
329A.430. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Certified family child care provider” means an individual  who operates a family child care
home that is certified under ORS 329A.280.
(b) “Child care subsidy” means a payment made by the  state on behalf of eligible children for
child care services provided for periods of less than 24 hours in a day.
(c) “Exempt family child care provider” means an individual who provides child  care services
in the home of the individual or in the home of the  child, whose services are not required to be
certified or registered under ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450 and who receives a child care subsidy.
(d) “Family child care provider” means an  individual who is a certified, registered or exempt
family child care provider.
(e) “Registered family child care provider” means an individual  who operates a family child care
home that is registered under ORS 329A.330.
(2) For purposes of collective  bargaining under ORS 243.650 to 243.782, the State of Oregon is
the public employer of record of family child care providers.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 243.650 [ (19)] (17) , family child care providers are considered to be
public employees governed by ORS 243.650 to  243.782. Family child care providers have the right to
form, join  and participate in the activities of labor organizations of their own choosing for the pur-
pose of  representation and collective bargaining on matters concerning labor relations. These rights
shall be exercised in accordance with the rights granted to public employees,  with mediation and
interest arbitration  under ORS 243.742 as the method of concluding the collective bargaining pro-
cess. Family child care providers may not strike.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, family child care providers  are not
for any other purpose employees of the State of Oregon or any other public body.
(5) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall represent  the State of Oregon in
collective bargaining negotiations with the  certified or recognized exclusive representatives of all
appropriate bargaining units of family child  care providers. The Oregon Department of Administra-
tive Services is authorized  to agree to terms and conditions of collective bargaining agreements on
behalf of the State of Oregon.
(6) Notwithstanding ORS 243.650 (1):
(a) The appropriate bargaining unit for certified and registered family  child care providers is a
bargaining unit of all certified and registered family child care providers in the state.
(b) The appropriate bargaining unit for exempt family child  care providers is a bargaining unit
of all exempt family child care providers in the state.
(7) This section does not modify any right of a parent or legal guardian to choose  and terminate
the services of a family child care provider.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 410.614 is amended to read:
410.614. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 243.650 [ (19) and (20) ] (17) and (18) , the Home Care Commis-
sion shall be considered a public employer and home care workers shall be considered public em-
ployees governed by ORS 243.650 to 243.782.
(2) Home care workers have the right to form, join and participate in the activities  of labor
organizations of their own choosing for the purpose of representation and  collective bargaining with
the commission on matters concerning employment relations. These rights  shall be exercised in ac-
[12]
HB 2643
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cordance with the rights granted to public employees with mediation and interest  arbitration under
ORS 243.742 as the method of concluding the collective bargaining process.
(3) Home care workers are not public  employees with respect to the Public Employees Retire-
ment System, the Oregon Public Service Retirement Plan or the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(4) Home care workers do not have the right to strike.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 410.614, as amended by section 16,  chapter 75, Oregon Laws 2018, is
amended to read:
410.614. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 243.650 [ (19) and (20) ] (17) and (18) , the Home Care Commis-
sion shall be considered a public employer and home  care workers and personal support workers
shall be considered public employees governed by ORS 243.650 to 243.782.
(2) Home care  workers and personal support workers have the right to form, join and participate
in the activities of labor organizations of their own  choosing for the purpose of representation and
collective bargaining with the commission  on matters concerning employment relations. These rights
shall be exercised in accordance with the rights granted to public employees  with mediation and
interest arbitration under ORS 243.742 as the method of concluding the collective bargaining  pro-
cess.
(3) Home care workers and personal support workers are not public  employees with respect to
the Public Employees Retirement System, the Oregon Public Service  Retirement Plan or the Public
Employees’ Benefit Board.
(4) Home care workers and personal support workers do not have the right to strike.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 443.733 is amended to read:
443.733. (1) As used in this section, “adult foster care home provider” means a person  who op-
erates an  adult foster home in the provider’s home and who receives fees or payments from state
funds for providing adult foster care  home services. “Adult foster care home provider” does not in-
clude a person:
(a) Who is a resident manager of an adult foster home who does  not provide adult foster care
home services in the resident manager’s own home or who does not have a controlling  interest in,
or is not an officer or partner in, the entity that is the provider of adult foster care  home services;
(b) Who is not a natural person; or
(c) Whose participation in collective bargaining is determined by the licensing  agency to be in-
consistent with this section or in violation of state or federal law.
(2) For purposes of collective  bargaining under ORS 243.650 to 243.782, the State of Oregon is
the public employer of record of adult foster care home providers.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 243.650 [ (19)] (17), adult  foster care home providers are considered to
be public employees governed  by ORS 243.650 to 243.782. Adult foster care home providers have the
right to form, join and  participate in the activities of labor organizations of their own choosing for
the purposes of representation  and collective bargaining on matters concerning labor relations.
Mandatory subjects of collective bargaining include but are not limited to provider base rates and
add-on payments. These rights shall be  exercised in accordance with the rights granted to public
employees, with mediation and interest arbitration under ORS 243.742 as the  method of concluding
the collective bargaining process. Adult foster care home providers may not strike.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (3) of this section, adult foster care home providers are
not for any other purpose employees of the State of Oregon or any other public body.
(5) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall represent  the State of Oregon in
collective bargaining negotiations with the certified or recognized exclusive representative  of an
[13]
HB 2643
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
appropriate bargaining unit of adult foster care home providers. The Oregon Department  of Admin-
istrative Services is authorized to agree to terms and conditions of  collective bargaining agreements
on behalf of the State of Oregon.
(6) Notwithstanding ORS 243.650 (1), an appropriate bargaining unit for  adult foster care home
providers is any bargaining unit recognized by the Governor in an executive  order issued prior to
January 1, 2008.
(7) This section does not modify any right of an adult receiving foster care.
SECTION 15.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[14]