Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
A public education program,  as defined in ORS 329.901, shall provide infor-
mation explaining current  adoption practices in this state and where to find adoption re-
sources and support in this state, when:
(1) Contraceptives are discussed or dispensed by personnel of  the public education pro-
gram or where the public education program is provided;
(2) Sexually transmitted infections are discussed by personnel of  the public education
program; or
(3) Testing for sexually transmitted infections is facilitated by the public education  pro-
gram or made available where the public education program is provided.
SECTION 2.  ORS 336.455 is amended to read:
336.455. (1) Each school district shall provide age-appropriate human sexuality education courses
in all public elementary and secondary schools as an integral part of  the health education curric-
ulum.
(2) Course material and instruction for all human sexuality  education courses shall enhance
students’ understanding of sexuality as a  normal and healthy aspect of human development. Course
instruction  shall:
(a) Be medically accurate.
(b) Be comprehensive.
(c) Include information  about responsible sexual behaviors and hygienic practices that eliminate
or reduce the risks of  pregnancy and the risks of exposure to human immunodeficiency virus,
hepatitis B, hepatitis  C and other sexually transmitted infections. Information about those risks shall
be presented in a manner designed  to allay fears concerning risks that are scientifically groundless.
(d) Promote abstinence  for school-age youth and mutually monogamous relationships with an
uninfected partner for adults as the most effective way to prevent pregnancy and the transmission
of sexually transmitted infections. However, abstinence may not be taught to the  exclusion of other
material and instruction  on contraceptive and infection reduction measures. Human sexuality edu-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1885
HB 3454
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
cation courses shall acknowledge the value of  abstinence while not devaluing or ignoring those
students who have had or are having sexual intercourse.
(e) Include a discussion about the characteristics of the emotional, physical and  psychological
aspects of a healthy relationship and  a discussion about the benefits of delaying pregnancy beyond
the adolescent years  as a means to better ensure a healthy future for parents and their children.
Students shall be provided with statistics based on  the latest medical information regarding both the
health benefits  and the possible side effects of all forms of contraceptives, including the success and
failure rates for prevention of pregnancy.
(f) Stress that sexually transmitted infections are serious possible outcomes of sexual  contact.
Students shall be provided with statistics based on the latest  medical information regarding the ef-
ficacy  of  all methods of sexual protection in preventing sexually transmitted infections, including
human immunodeficiency virus, hepatitis B and hepatitis C.
(g) Provide students with information  about Oregon laws that address young people’s rights and
responsibilities related to childbearing [ and], parenting  and adoption.
(h) Advise students of the circumstances in which it is unlawful under ORS  163.435 and 163.445
for persons 18 years of age or older to have sexual relations with persons younger than 18  years
of age to whom they are not married.
(i) Teach students  that no form of sexual expression is acceptable when the expression phys-
ically or emotionally harms oneself or others and teach students  not to make unwanted physical and
verbal sexual advances, and how to decline unwanted sexual advances or  accept the refusal of un-
wanted sexual advances. Students shall  be taught that it is wrong to take advantage of or to exploit
another person. Materials and information shall be presented in a manner sensitive to the  fact that
there are students who have experienced sexual abuse.
(j) Validate through course material and instruction  the importance of honesty with oneself and
others, respect for each person’s dignity and well-being, and responsibility for one’s actions.
(k) Assist students in the development and practice of effective communication skills, the de-
velopment of self-esteem and the ability to resist peer pressure.
(L) Encourage family  communication and involvement to help students learn to make responsible
decisions.
(3) Any course in any public elementary and secondary school, the main purpose of which is to
address human  sexuality education or sexually transmitted infections, including human
immunodeficiency virus, or both, must emphasize that abstinence from sexual contact is  the only
method that is 100 percent effective against unintended pregnancy,  sexually transmitted infections
and human immunodeficiency virus when  transmitted sexually. Abstinence must be stressed, but not
to the exclusion of other material  and instruction on contraceptive and infection reduction meas-
ures. Courses described  in this subsection must acknowledge the value of abstinence while not de-
valuing or ignoring those students who have had or are having sexual intercourse.
(4) Nothing in this  section prohibits instruction in sanitation, hygiene or traditional courses in
biology.
[2]