Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The CourtCare Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by  the CourtCare Fund shall be credited to
the fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Department  of Education
for purposes of distribution of the moneys to  counties to operate CourtCare programs that
provide child care  and serve as clearinghouses for information and resource referrals for
individuals and families with court-related matters or governmental business  in or near a
county courthouse or courthouse complex.
(2) The department shall establish criteria for determining whether  a county may receive
moneys from the CourtCare Fund.
SECTION 2.  ORS 21.155 is amended to read:
21.155. (1) A circuit court shall collect a filing fee of  $287 when a complaint or other document
is filed for the purpose of commencing  one of the following proceedings and when an answer or
other first appearance is filed in the proceeding:
[(1)] (a) Proceedings for dissolution of marriage, annulment of marriage or separation.
[(2)] (b) Filiation proceedings under ORS 109.124 to 109.230.
[(3)] (c) Proceedings under ORS 108.110, 109.100 and 109.103.
(2) In addition to the filing fee collected under subsection (1) of this  section, the court
shall collect a surcharge  of $  when a complaint or other document is filed for the
purpose of commencing one of the proceedings listed in  subsection (1) of this section and
when an answer or other first appearance is filed in the proceeding, to be  deposited in the
CourtCare Fund established in section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3.  ORS 813.020 is amended to read:
813.020. When a person is convicted of driving while under the influence of  intoxicants in vio-
lation of ORS 813.010,  a court shall comply with the following in addition to any fine or other pen-
alty imposed upon the person under ORS 813.010:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2086
HB 2244
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
(1) The court shall require the person to:
(a) Pay to the court the fee described under ORS 813.030 in addition to any fine imposed under
ORS 813.010;
(b) Pay to the court a surcharge  of $
, to be deposited in the CourtCare Fund es-
tablished in section 1 of this 2019 Act;
[(b)] (c) Complete a screening interview and  a treatment program as provided in ORS 813.021;
and
[(c)] (d) Submit to booking, if the person has not already been booked.
(2) The court must impose and not suspend execution of a sentence  requiring the person either
to serve at least 48 hours’ imprisonment, which shall be served consecutively unless justice  requires
otherwise, or to perform community service for  times specified by the court under ORS 137.129. For
purposes of this subsection:
(a) A court may provide for the imprisonment to be served  in jail, minimum security facilities
or inpatient rehabilitation or treatment centers.
(b) Whenever the judge provides for the mandatory imprisonment to be served other  than con-
secutively, the judgment must specifically so provide and the judge must state the reasons  in writ-
ing.
(3) In a county that has a victim impact program a court may require the person to  attend a
victim impact treatment session. If the court requires attendance under  this section, the court may
require the defendant to pay a reasonable fee to  the victim impact program to offset the cost of the
defendant’s participation.  The fee shall be established for each county by the victim impact panel
coordinator and steering committee of that county and shall be not less than $5 or more than $50.
SECTION 4.  ORS 21.006 is amended to read:
21.006. Notwithstanding ORS  21.005, each month the State Court Administrator shall transfer
to the State Court Technology Fund 8.85 percent of the fees collected  by the State Court Adminis-
trator under ORS 21.010, 21.135, 21.145, 21.155  (1), 21.160, 21.170, 21.180, 21.235, 46.570, 105.130 and
106.120.
SECTION 5.  ORS 21.185 is amended to read:
21.185. The filing fees and surcharges  described in ORS 21.135, 21.145, 21.155 and 21.160 may
not be charged to a district attorney or to the Division of Child  Support of the Department of Jus-
tice for the filing of any  proceeding related to the provision of support enforcement services as de-
scribed in ORS 25.080.
SECTION 6.  ORS 813.030 is amended to read:
813.030. The fee required by ORS 471.432 and 813.020  (1) (a) shall be in the amount of $255, ex-
cept that  the court may waive all or part of the fee in cases involving indigent defendants. The court
may make provision  for payment of the fee on an installment basis. A circuit court shall deposit the
fee in the Criminal Fine Account. If the fee is collected in a municipal or justice court, the  fee shall
be forwarded by the court to the Department of Revenue for deposit in the Criminal Fine Account.
SECTION 7. (1) The amendments to ORS 21.155 by  section 2 of this 2019 Act apply to
proceedings commenced on or after the effective date of this 2019 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 813.020 by section  3 of this 2019 Act apply to convictions
occurring on or after the effective date of this 2019 Act.
[2]