Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall study the  method
for determining the current service level for the  purpose of calculating the amount to ap-
propriate for the State School  Fund. The department shall submit a report in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and  may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education no  later than September 15,
2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1576