Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 734.110 to
734.440.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Collateral”  means collateral that meets the requirements for the categories of
collateral that are  set forth in 12 C.F.R. 1266.7(a), as in effect on the effective date of this
2025 Act, and in which a Federal Home Loan Bank holds a first priority perfected  security
interest.
(b) “Federal Home Loan Bank” has the meaning given that  term in 12 U.S.C. 1422, as in
effect on the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(c) “Insurer-member” means an insurer that is a member of a Federal Home Loan Bank.
(2) Notwithstanding requirements  for a form of claim against an insurer that are set
forth in ORS 734.280 and notwithstanding the priority of preferred claims against an  insurer
that are specified in ORS 734.290, of special deposit claims  against an insurer that are spec-
ified in ORS 734.300 or of secured claims against an insurer that are  specified in ORS 734.310,
in connection with a delinquency proceeding under ORS 734.110 to 734.440:
(a) A court may not stay or prohibit a Federal Home Loan Bank from exercising  the
Federal Home  Loan Bank’s rights with respect to collateral that an insurer-member has
pledged; and
(b) A receiver shall comply with the provisions of this section with respect to:
(A) The Federal Home Loan Bank’s rights in connection with an insurer-member; and
(B) Claims against an insurer-member.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3099
HB 2129
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) A Federal Home Loan Bank  that exercises a right with respect to collateral pledged
by an insurer-member that is subject to a delinquency  proceeding shall repurchase any out-
standing capital stock that exceeds the  amount of the Federal Home Loan Bank’s stock that
the insurer-member  must hold as a minimum investment if the Federal Home Loan Bank
determines in good faith that the repurchase is:
(a) Permissible under applicable laws, regulations,  regulatory obligations and the Federal
Home Loan Bank’s capital plan; and
(b) Consistent with the current capital stock practices the Federal Home Loan  Bank ap-
plies to the entire membership of the Federal Home Loan Bank.
(4) After the appointment of a receiver for an insurer-member, a Federal  Home Loan
Bank, within 10 business days after a  request from the receiver, shall establish a process and
timeline for:
(a) Releasing collateral that, under the terms of applicable  agreements between the
Federal Home Loan Bank and the insurer-member, exceeds the amount  required to support
obligations that remain after repaying loans;
(b) Releasing any of the insurer-member’s collateral that remains in the Federal Home
Loan Bank’s possession after payment in full of all of the insurer-member’s  outstanding ob-
ligations;
(c) Paying fees the insurer-member owes  and operating the insurer-member’s deposits
and accounts with the Federal Home Loan Bank; and
(d) Redeeming or repurchasing Federal Home Loan Bank stock or excess stock of any
class that an insurer-member must own.
(5) A Federal Home Loan Bank,  at a receiver’s request, shall provide any available op-
portunities that may exist for an insurer-member that is subject to  a delinquency proceeding
to renew or restructure a loan to defer prepayment fees, with due regard for:
(a) Market conditions;
(b) The terms of any loans to the insurer-member that are outstanding;
(c) Applicable policies of the Federal Home Loan Bank; and
(d) The Federal Home Loan Bank’s compliance with federal laws and regulations.
(6)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 734.350 and  except as provided in paragraph (b) of this sub-
section, a receiver for an insurer-member, including the Director  of the Department of
Consumer and Business  Services, may not void any transfer of, or obligation to transfer,
moneys or property that occurs or arises under or in connection with:
(A) A Federal Home Loan Bank security agreement;
(B) A pledge, security, collateral or guarantee agreement; or
(C) Any  other similar arrangement or credit enhancement that relates to a Federal Home
Loan Bank security agreement made  in the ordinary course of business and in compliance
with the applicable Federal Home Loan Bank agreement.
(b) A receiver may void a transfer if the transfer was made with an  intent to hinder,
delay or defraud the insurer-member, the receiver or existing or future creditors.
(c) This subsection does not affect a receiver’s rights under 12 C.F.R. 1266.4, as in  effect
on the effective date of this 2025 Act, with respect to advances  to an insurer-member that
is subject to a delinquency proceeding.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025  Act applies to delinquency proceedings that begin on
or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[2]
HB 2129
1
2
3
4
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]