Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 194.280 is amended to read:
194.280. (1) A notarial act must be evidenced by a certificate. The certificate must:
(a) Be signed and dated by the notarial officer and, if the notarial officer is a notary public,  be
signed in the same manner as on file with the Secretary of State;
(b) Identify  the type of document that is the subject of the notarial act, if any, and the
number of pages included in the document;
[(b)] (c) Identify the jurisdiction in which the notarial act is performed;
[(c)] (d) Contain the title of office of the notarial officer;
[(d)] (e) Contain the name of the person for whom the notarial act is performed  and, if appli-
cable, the representative capacity of the person for whom the notarial act is performed ; and
[(e)] (f) If the notarial officer is a notary public, indicate  the date of expiration, if any, of the
officer’s  commission.
(2) The notarial officer may subsequently correct any information  included on or omitted from
the certificate.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section,  if a notarial act regarding a tangible
record is performed by a notary  public, an official stamp must be affixed to the certificate. If a
notarial act regarding a tangible record  is performed by a notarial officer other than a notary public
and the certificate contains  the information specified in subsection (1)(a) to [ (d)] (e) of this section,
an official stamp may be affixed to the certificate. If a notarial act regarding an  electronic record
is performed by a notarial officer and the certificate  contains the information specified in subsection
(1)(a) to [ (d)] (e) of this section, an official stamp may be attached to or  logically associated with
the certificate.
(4) A certificate of a notarial act is sufficient  if it meets the requirements of subsections (1) to
(3) of this section and:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2854
HB 2952
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Is in a short form set forth in ORS 194.285;
(b) Is in a form otherwise permitted by the law of this state;
(c) Is in a form permitted by the law applicable in the jurisdiction in which the notarial act  was
performed; or
(d) Sets  forth the actions of the notarial officer and the actions are sufficient to meet the re-
quirements of the notarial act as  provided in ORS 194.230, 194.235 and 194.240 or law of this state
other than this chapter.
(5) By executing a certificate of a notarial act, a notarial officer certifies that  the officer has
complied with the requirements and made the determinations  specified in ORS 194.225, 194.230,
194.235 and 194.240.
(6) A notarial officer may not affix or  attach the officer’s signature to, or logically associate it
with, a certificate until the notarial act has been performed.
(7) If a notarial act is performed regarding a tangible record, a certificate of  a notarial act must
be part of or securely affixed to the record. If a  notarial act is performed regarding an electronic
record, the certificate  must be attached to or logically associated with the electronic record. If the
Secretary of State by rule has established standards pursuant  to ORS 194.360 for affixing, attaching
or logically associating the certificate, the process must conform to the standards.
(8) The imprint of the  official stamp of a notary public is not required to effectuate a
notarization of a subdivision or partition plat  required under ORS 92.010 to 92.192 or a condominium
plat required under ORS 100.115, or any replat, supplement or amendment thereto, if the following
appear below the notary public’s signature:
(a) The printed name of the notary public;
(b) The words “NOTARY PUBLIC -  OREGON”;
(c) The words “COMMISSION NO.” immediately  followed by the notary public’s commission
number; and
(d) The words “MY COMMISSION  EXPIRES” immediately followed by the date the notary
public’s commission  expires, expressed in terms of the month, by name not abbreviated, two-digit
date and four-digit year.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 194.285 is amended to read:
194.285. The following short form certificates of notarial acts are sufficient for the  purposes in-
dicated, if completed with the information required by ORS 194.280 (1) to (3):
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(1) For an acknowledgment in an individual capacity:
State of 
County of 
This [ record]  (document type) containing  pages  was acknowl-
edged before  me on (date)  by (name(s) of individual(s)) , Title(s) of
individual(s): .
Signature of notarial officer: 
Stamp (if required):
Title of office: 
My commission expires: 
[2]
HB 2952
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) For an acknowledgment in a representative capacity:
State of 
County of 
This [ record]  (document type) containing  pages  was acknowl-
edged before  me on (date)  by (name(s) of individual(s)) , Title(s) of
individual(s): , as (type of authority, such as officer or trustee)  of
(name of party on behalf of whom record was executed) .
Signature of notarial officer: 
Stamp (if required):
Title of office: 
My commission expires: 
(3) For a verification on oath or affirmation:
State of 
County of 
Signed and sworn to (or affirmed) before me on (date)  by  (name(s)  of individual(s))
making statement .
Signature of notarial officer:
Stamp (if required):
Title of office: 
My commission expires: 
(4) For witnessing or attesting a signature:
State of 
County of 
Signed (or attested) before me on  (date)  by (name(s) of individual(s))
.
Signature of notarial officer: 
Stamp (if required):
Title of office: 
My commission expires: 
(5) For certifying or attesting a copy of a record:
State of 
County of 
I certify (or attest) that this is a true and  correct copy of a record in the possession of
.
Dated
Signature of notarial officer: 
Stamp (if required):
Title of office: 
My commission expires: 
_______________________________________________________________________________________
[3]
HB 2952
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 3.
 ORS 205.160 is amended to read:
205.160. (1) The county clerk shall keep a direct general index and an indirect general index  in
the office of the clerk.
(2) The direct general index shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following:
(a) Date and time of reception.
(b) Names of grantors.
(c) Names of grantees.
(d) Nature or type of instrument.
(e) Volume and page where recorded or the instrument number.
(f) Remarks.
(g) Brief description of tract.
(h) To whom delivered.
(i) Fees received.
(3) The clerk shall make  correct entries in the direct general index of every instrument recorded
under the appropriate heading, entering the names of the grantors in alphabetical order.
(4) The indirect general index shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following:
(a) Date and time of reception.
(b) Names of grantees.
(c) Names of grantors.
(d) Nature or type of instrument.
(e) Volume and page where recorded or the instrument number.
(f) Remarks.
(g) Brief description of tract.
(h) Parcel identification number, which shall be of a kind selected for use  in the county
by the county clerk in consultation with the county assessor.
(i) Names and, if applicable, commission numbers of notaries public.
(5) The clerk shall make in the indirect general index correct  entries of every instrument re-
quired by law to be entered in the direct general index [ direct], entering the names of  the grantors
in alphabetical order.
(6) Whenever any mortgage,  bond, judgment or other instrument has been released or discharged
from record, or by recording a deed or lease,  the clerk shall immediately note in both the direct
general index and the indirect general index under the column headed “Remarks,”  and opposite the
appropriate entry, that such instrument has been satisfied.
(7) In lieu of both the direct general index  and the indirect general index a county clerk may
use a data processing device or computer to provide a combined  index to books or records defined
in law that shall contain the following:
(a) Date and time of reception.
(b) Names of grantees.
(c) Names of grantors.
(d) Nature or type of instrument.
(e) Recording number.
(f) Brief description of tract.
(g) To whom delivered.
(h) Fees received.
[4]
HB 2952
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) When available, a reference to the instrument being released or discharged.
(j) Such other information as the county clerk may require.
(8) The county clerk shall  provide public access to the combined index and otherwise meet
[the] applicable requirements of ORS chapter 192.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 205.232 is amended to read:
205.232. (1)(a) Except as provided in ORS 205.327, a county clerk shall  not accept any instru-
ment for recording unless the text of the instrument is typed, written or printed in 10-point  type or
larger on paper that is not larger  than 14 inches long and 8-1/2 inches wide and which paper is of
sufficient quality for recording photographically.
(b) [ However, this section ] Paragraph (a) of this subsection  does not apply to out-of-state
notarial acts or to certified copies of public records presented to a county clerk for recording.
(2) A  county clerk may refuse to accept a document that has any characteristic sug-
gesting it may be fraudulent.
SECTION 5.  ORS 205.234 is amended to read:
205.234. (1) When an instrument  is presented to a county clerk for recording, the first page of
the instrument must contain at least:
(a) The names of the transactions as required in ORS 205.236;
(b) The names of the persons described in ORS 205.125 (1)(a) and (b) and 205.160;
(c) The person to whom and, for mailing purposes only, the address to  which the instrument will
be delivered as provided in ORS 205.180;
(d) For instruments that convey or contract to convey  fee title to real estate and for memoranda
of the instruments, the true and actual consideration paid for the transfer as required by ORS
93.030;
(e) For instruments that convey or contract to convey fee title  to real estate, the tax statement
information required by ORS 93.260;
(f) For instruments that convey or establish an interest in  real estate, the parcel iden-
tification number for the affected parcel.
[(f)] (g) For instruments recorded in the County Clerk Lien Record, the information described
in ORS 205.125 (1)(c) and (e); and
[(g)] (h) For instruments that assign a mortgage or trust  deed, the name and address of the
assignee mortgagee or assignee trust deed beneficiary.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 205.327, if an instrument  presented for recording does not contain
the information required by subsection (1) of this section, a cover sheet  may be prepared that con-
tains the required information. The person that presents the instrument for recording  shall prepare
the cover sheet. The cover sheet  may be attached to the instrument and must be recorded as a part
of the instrument.
(b) Any errors in the cover sheet do not affect the transactions contained in the instrument.
(c) The cover sheet need not be separately signed or acknowledged.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 87.018 is amended to read:
87.018. (1) Except as provided in  ORS 87.093, all notices required under ORS 87.001 to 87.060
and 87.075 to 87.093 must be in writing and be delivered in person or by registered  or certified mail.
(2) A notice that must be  given under ORS 87.001 to 87.060 or 87.075 to 87.093 to a mortgagee
must be delivered to the mortgagee only if the name and address of the mortgagee appear  in a
mortgage of record or a trust deed of record as  required under ORS 205.234 (1)(b) or in the instru-
ment that assigns a mortgage or trust deed as required under ORS 205.234 [ (1)(g)] (1)(h).
[5]
HB 2952
1
2
3
SECTION 7.
The amendments to ORS 194.280 and 194.285 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025
Act apply to notarial acts performed on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[6]