Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “gender-affirming treatment” means a procedure,
service, drug, device  or product that a physical or behavioral health care provider prescribes
to treat an individual for incongruence between the individual’s  gender identity and the
individual’s sex assignment at birth.
(2)(a) Not later than August 30, 2025, the Health  Evidence Review Commission shall begin
a medical technology assessment of  gender-affirming treatment, and the development of
evidence-based health care guidelines for use by providers,  consumers and purchasers of
health care in Oregon.
(b) The commission shall conduct its medical technology assessment  in accordance with
its evidence-based report process and  methodology and consistent with its quality of evidence
statement in effect on the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(3) The commission’s medical technology assessment must include, at a minimum:
(a) Diagnostic criteria and assessment procedures to identify patients  most likely to
benefit from gender-affirming treatment; and
(b) An analysis of the safety, efficacy, balance between desirable  and undesirable effects,
quality of  evidence and strength of evidence for gender-affirming treatment for children,
adolescents and adults, including:
(A) Puberty blockers;
(B) Hormone replacement therapy;
(C) Mastectomies, breast reduction and breast augmentation;
(D) Genital surgeries, including hysterectomy,  vaginoplasty, penectomy, orchiectomy,
clitoroplasty, labiaplasty, vaginectomy, phalloplasty and scrotoplasty;
(E) Tracheal shave;
(F) Hair electrolysis; and
(G) Facial feminization surgery or other facial gender-affirming treatments.
(4) The commission shall submit a report on the results  of its medical technology as-
sessment in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the interim committees of the Legislative
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2721
HB 3338
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
Assembly related to health care no  later than September 15, 2026. The commission shall also
make a copy of the report publicly available on a website  maintained by the Oregon Health
Authority.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]