Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
CHILDREN’S ADVOCACY CENTERS
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2020 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 418.746 to
418.796.
SECTION 2. The Child Abuse Assessment Account is established  in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the account shall be cred-
ited to the account. The account consists of moneys  deposited into the account under ORS
418.796 and may include moneys  appropriated, allocated, deposited or transferred to the ac-
count by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise. The moneys in  the account are continuously
appropriated to the Department of Justice for the purposes specified in ORS 418.786.
SECTION 3.  ORS 418.746 is amended to read:
418.746. (1) The Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Account is  established separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned, if  any, shall inure to the benefit of the account.
The account consists of moneys deposited into the account under ORS 418.796 and  may in-
clude moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or transferred to the account  by the Legis-
lative Assembly or otherwise.  All moneys deposited in the account are  continuously appropriated
to the Department of Justice for the purposes of ORS 418.751 and this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 56
HB 4112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The Child Abuse  Multidisciplinary Intervention Program, with the advice of the Advisory
Council  on  Child Abuse Assessment, created by ORS 418.784, shall allocate moneys from the Child
Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Account to eligible  county child abuse multidisciplinary teams
formed under ORS 418.747, or entities designated  by the teams, serving the counties from which the
moneys were collected. The program may award only one  grant per county. The moneys shall be
allocated by the same formula as, or a formula similar to, the formula used by the Attorney  General
for equitable distribution of the  fund for victim’s assistance programs under ORS 147.227 (1). Moneys
allocated under this subsection may not be used as replacement revenues  for currently available
funds previously allocated by the county for child abuse intervention.
(3) The Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program shall determine  eligibility of the
applicants and:
(a) Allocate funds if the applicant is deemed eligible;
(b) Conditionally  allocate funds, with appropriate conditions, when necessary to establish eligi-
bility; or
(c) Deny funding.
(4) In making the eligibility determination, the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention  Pro-
gram shall consider the following nonexclusive list of factors:
(a) Whether the services  offered by an applicant substantially further the goals and purposes
of ORS 418.747, 418.790 and 418.792;
(b) Whether the county child abuse multidisciplinary team or the entity designated by the  team
has properly allocated other available funds;
(c) Any evaluations of previously funded services as required by subsection (7) of this section;
(d) The extent to  which the county’s coordinated child abuse multidisciplinary intervention plan
provides for comprehensive services to the victims of child abuse;
(e) Whether the funds are being used as replacement revenues as prohibited by subsection  (2)
of this section;
(f) Whether there is a children’s advocacy center  or similar advocacy center in existence or
proposed for the county; and
(g) The extent to which funding a children’s advocacy center is given priority in the intervention
plan as required under subsection (5) of this section.
(5)(a) At least  once a biennium, the county child abuse multidisciplinary team shall submit to
the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program a coordinated child  abuse multidisciplinary
intervention plan. The intervention plan must:
(A) Describe  all sources of funding, other than moneys that may be allocated from the Child
Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Account, including in-kind contributions that are  available for
the intervention plan;
(B) Describe the critical needs of victims of child  abuse in the county, including but not limited
to child abuse assessment, advocacy and treatment, and how the intervention plan addresses  those
needs in a comprehensive manner;
(C) Include the county’s written protocol and agreements required by ORS  418.747 (2) and
418.785; and
(D) Describe how the  intervention plan gives priority to funding a children’s advocacy center
and how the funding supports the center.
(b) When submitting the intervention plan, the county  child abuse multidisciplinary team shall
also submit:
[2]
HB 4112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Those applications  for funding received from entities under subsection (6) of this section that
the team  determines best meet the needs of the county’s intervention plan and a recommendation
that the applications for funding be granted; and
(B) If the team  is seeking funding from the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program,
an application setting forth the information required by rule of the program.
(6) An entity wishing to apply for funding from the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention
Program shall  submit an application to the county child abuse multidisciplinary team for the county
in which the entity proposes to provide services. The application shall:
(a) Describe the services to be funded with moneys from the Child  Abuse Multidisciplinary
Intervention Program according to the coordinated child abuse multidisciplinary intervention plan
and the anticipated outcomes in terms of benefits to children and families; and
(b) Describe how the services further the goals  and purposes of ORS 418.747, 418.790 and
418.792.
(7)(a) A designated entity providing services according to a coordinated child abuse multidisci-
plinary intervention plan funded  with moneys from the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention
Program shall  submit an annual report to the county child abuse multidisciplinary team. A county
child abuse multidisciplinary team shall  submit an annual report to the Child Abuse Multidiscipli-
nary Intervention Program.
(b) The annual report filed by the county child abuse multidisciplinary team must:
(A) Document how the moneys were  utilized and describe to what extent the services were able
to meet anticipated outcomes in terms of benefits to children and families.
(B) Include local and state issues and recommendations relating to the prevention of  child
fatalities identified in the fatality review process under ORS 418.785.
(c) A county child abuse multidisciplinary team receiving a  report from a designated entity shall
review  the  report and take into account success of the entity at meeting service outcomes before
making future recommendations regarding allocation of moneys.
(d) The  Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program shall review reports received under
this section before making future eligibility and allocation decisions  and when evaluating services
funded under this section.
(8) Two or more county child abuse multidisciplinary teams may join together to develop  joint
child abuse multidisciplinary  intervention plans. The joint intervention plans shall be submitted as
provided in subsection (5) of this section.
(9) The Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program may adopt rules to  carry out the
provisions of ORS 418.751 and this section including, but not limited to, the following:
(a) Notices and time limits for applications;
(b) Method of review and the role of advisory bodies; and
(c) Reallocation of moneys not applied for or disbursed.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 418.786 is amended to read:
418.786. (1) To accomplish the purpose described in ORS 418.780, with the assistance of the
Advisory Council on Child  Abuse Assessment, the administrator of the Child Abuse Multidiscipli-
nary Intervention Program shall develop and administer a grant program , separate  from the grant
program described in ORS 418.746,  to establish and maintain  children’s advocacy centers and re-
gional children’s advocacy centers, to support training and technical assistance  efforts for county
child abuse multidisciplinary teams and children’s advocacy centers and to  provide coordination and
support for the work of regional children’s advocacy centers.
[3]
HB 4112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The Child Abuse  Multidisciplinary Intervention Program shall allocate moneys from
the Child Abuse Assessment Account established by section  2 of this 2020 Act to eligible
children’s advocacy centers under ORS 418.746 to 418.796. The  moneys shall be allocated by
using the same formula as, or  a formula similar to, the formula used by the Attorney Gen-
eral for equitable distribution of the account for  victims’ assistance programs under ORS
147.227 (1), taking into consideration the size of each children’s advocacy center’s service
area and the associated  increased cost of equitably providing services to all victims within
that area. Moneys allocated under this subsection may not be used  as replacement revenues
for currently available funds previously allocated by the county  for children’s advocacy cen-
ters.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 418.788 is amended to read:
418.788. (1) Subject to the availability of funds under the provisions of ORS 418.786 and 418.796,
the administrator of the Child Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program shall make  grants for
the establishment and maintenance of children’s advocacy centers or regional  children’s advocacy
centers.
(2)(a) A public or private agency may apply to the administrator for a grant to:
(A) Establish and maintain a children’s advocacy center or regional children’s  advocacy center;
(B) Provide training and technical  assistance to children’s advocacy centers or county child
abuse multidisciplinary teams; or
(C) Provide coordination and support to regional children’s advocacy centers.
(b) The administrator may consolidate applications from more than one public or private agency
or may return the application with the recommendation that the application be consolidated.
(3) The administrator  shall by rule establish criteria for awarding grants to establish and
maintain children’s advocacy centers or regional children’s advocacy  centers, including but not
limited to:
(a) Expenses eligible for reimbursement from funds under ORS  418.786 and 418.796;
(b) The extent to which the applicant’s  proposal will best accomplish the purposes of ORS
418.746 to 418.796;
(c) The extent to which an applicant meets criteria for receiving a grant to:
(A) Establish and maintain a children’s advocacy center or regional children’s  advocacy center;
(B) Provide training and technical assistance to children’s  advocacy centers and county child
abuse multidisciplinary teams; or
(C) Provide coordination and support to regional children’s advocacy centers;
(d) Minimum facility standards for children’s  advocacy centers and regional children’s advocacy
centers consistent with national accreditation standards  to ensure that children receive consistent,
evidence-based intervention services statewide;
(e) Minimum forensic  interview training standards that are consistent with national forensic
interview training standards, evidence-based and supported by current  forensic interview research;
and
(f) For a regional children’s advocacy center, the extent to which the applicant’s proposal meets
the documented needs of the communities, children’s advocacy  centers and county child abuse
multidisciplinary teams in the region or regions to be served by the center.
(4) The administrator  is not required to fund any grant in the total amount requested in the
application.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 418.796 is amended to read:
[4]
HB 4112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
418.796. The  Advisory Council on Child Abuse Assessment may solicit and accept contributions
of funds and assistance from the United States, its agencies or from other  sources, public or private,
and agree to conditions not inconsistent with the purposes  of ORS 418.746 to 418.796. All funds re-
ceived are to  aid in financing the functions of the advisory council and the purposes of ORS 418.746
to 418.796. [and shall be deposited in the General Fund of the State Treasury to the credit of a separate
account and are continuously appropriated to the Child  Abuse Multidisciplinary Intervention Program
established by ORS 418.783  for the purposes of ORS 418.746 to 418.796. ] The advisory council may
deposit moneys the advisory council collects under this  section into the Child Abuse Multi-
disciplinary Intervention Account under ORS  418.746 or the Child Abuse Assessment Account
under section 2 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 147.105 is amended to read:
147.105. (1) An applicant for compensation under ORS 147.005 to  147.367 must file an application
under oath on a  form furnished by the Department of Justice. Except as provided in ORS 147.390
(2), the application [ shall] must  include:
(a) The name and address of the victim;
(b) If the victim is deceased, the name and address of the applicant and relationship to  the vic-
tim, the names and addresses of the victim’s dependents and the extent to which  each is so de-
pendent;
(c) The date and nature of the crime or attempted crime on which the application for compen-
sation is based;
(d) The date and place where, and the law enforcement officials to whom, notification of the
crime was given;
(e) The nature and extent of the injuries sustained by the victim, the names and addresses of
those giving medical and hospital treatment to the victim and whether death resulted;
(f) The loss to the applicant and to such other persons as are specified under paragraph (b) of
this subsection, resulting from the injury or death;
(g) The amount of benefits, payments or awards, if any, payable from any source, which the  ap-
plicant or other person, listed under paragraph (b) of this subsection, has received or  for which the
applicant or other person is eligible as a result of the injury or death;
(h) Releases  authorizing the surrender to the department of reports, documents and other in-
formation relating to the matters specified under this subsection; and
(i) Such other information as the department determines is necessary.
(2) The department may require that the  applicants submit with the application materials sub-
stantiating the facts stated in the application.
(3) If the department  finds that an application does not contain the required information or that
the facts stated therein have  not been substantiated, it shall notify the applicant in writing of the
specific additional items of information or materials required and that  the applicant has 30 days
from the date of mailing in  which to furnish those items to the department. Unless an applicant
requests and is granted an extension of time by the department,  the department shall reject with
prejudice the claim of the applicant for failure  to file the additional information or materials within
the specified time.
(4) An applicant may file an amended application or additional substantiating materials  to cor-
rect inadvertent errors or omissions at  any time before the department has completed its consider-
ation of the original application.
(5) The  filing of additional information or the amendment of the application pursuant to sub-
[5]
HB 4112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section (3) or (4) of this section shall be  considered for the purposes of ORS 147.005 to 147.367 to
have been filed at the same time as the original application.
(6) Unless the department finds good cause exists  for the applicant’s failure to satisfy a financial
obligation or unless the interest of justice requires otherwise, the department shall not process an
application filed by or on behalf of a victim who owes a  financial obligation ordered or imposed as
a result of  a previous criminal conviction until the department receives information or materials
establishing to the satisfaction of the department that the financial obligation  has been satisfied. If
the department does not receive the information  or materials within one year after the department
notifies the applicant of the need to fulfill this requirement, the application is void.
(7)(a) If at the time of  application, the applicant is incarcerated as a result of a conviction of
a crime, the application shall be refused and returned to the  applicant. The applicant is eligible to
refile the application within six months after the applicant is released from incarceration.
(b) At the time the application is refused and returned,  the department shall notify the applicant
of the right to refile the claim within six months of release from incarceration.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 147.390 is amended to read:
147.390. (1) Notwithstanding  that a child is not a victim under ORS 147.015 (1)(a), in cases of
suspected child sexual abuse as described in ORS 419B.005 (1)(a)(C), (D) or (E), or child physical
abuse by an adult or caretaker as otherwise described  in ORS 419B.005 (1)(a)(A), compensation may
be made on behalf of the  child for services provided by a children’s advocacy center, including a
child abuse assessment, a medical assessment or a forensic interview, if:
(a) The expenses are actually paid or incurred by the applicant; and
(b) A claim is filed on behalf of the child in the manner provided in ORS 147.015.
(2) The Department of Justice may pay compensation for child abuse  assessments or medical
assessments required by ORS 419B.023 regardless of whether a finding of abuse is made and only  if
other insurance is unavailable.  If the department pays compensation, the department shall pay the
compensation directly to the provider of the services. The medical fee schedules for payment  under
this section shall be  the schedules adopted under ORS 147.035.  The department shall adopt by
rule a claim form, abbreviated from the form required  under ORS 147.105, to be used for the
submission of claims under this section when a finding of abuse has not been made.
(3) As used in this section, “child abuse  assessment,” “children’s advocacy center,” “forensic
interview” and “medical assessment” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 418.782.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 147.391 is amended to read:
147.391. Notwithstanding ORS 147.390, when the moneys provided from the Criminal Injuries
Compensation Account for the purposes of ORS  147.390 are expended for any cumulative time period
within any biennium, the Criminal Injuries Compensation Account shall have no further  obligations
under ORS 147.390 for that time  period. However, if [ the Criminal Injuries Compensation Account has
unexpended moneys provided for at the end of any biennium, the balance shall be transferred to the
account created by ] at the end of the biennium there are unexpended moneys in  the account
and those unexpended moneys were allocated to the account for the  purposes of ORS 147.390,
the balance of those unexpended moneys may be deposited as provided by  ORS 418.796.
SECTION 10.
In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Justice, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $3,000,000 for deposit in the  Child Abuse Assessment Account
established by section 2 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 10a. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
[6]
HB 4112
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
$3,000,000 is established for  the biennium ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Justice  for the grant program established under
ORS 418.786 from the Child  Abuse Assessment Account established by section 2 of this 2020
Act.
CHILD ABUSE PREVALENCE STUDY
SECTION 11.
(1) The University of Oregon shall conduct an Oregon child  abuse preva-
lence study.
(2) No later than September  15 of each even-numbered year, the university shall submit
a report on the Oregon child abuse prevalence study to the interim committees of the  Leg-
islative Assembly related to human services.
SECTION 12. (1) In addition to and not in  lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending June
30, 2021, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $700,000, for the purposes specified in sec-
tion 11 (1) of this 2020 Act.
(2) Moneys distributed by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  to implement
the University of Oregon’s duties under section 11 of this 2020  Act may not be used to pay
the university for facilities and administrative costs.
SECTION 13. The report described in section 11 of this 2020 Act is first due no later  than
September 15, 2022.
SECTION 14. Section 11 of this 2020 Act is repealed on July 1, 2022.
ERIN’S LAW TRAINING
SECTION 15. In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Education, for the biennium ending June 30,  2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $_______, which shall be expended for the purposes of developing
curricula and providing educator  training related to ORS 336.059, 336.455 and 339.366 and
similar instructional requirements that relate to child safety.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 16.
The unit captions used in this 2020 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2020 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 17. This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[7]