Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Business Development Department shall, from the  Public Safety
Training Facility Construction Fund established  under section 2 of this 2017 Act, distribute
moneys through loans,  grants or a combination thereof to Curry County to be used to design,
develop, construct, furnish or operate a facility for training public safety personnel.
SECTION 2. (1) The Public Safety Training Facility Construction Fund is established  in
the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned on moneys
in the Public Safety Training Facility Construction Fund must be  credited to the fund. The
fund may include fees, revenues or other  income deposited into the fund by the Legislative
Assembly or by any other source, public or private.
(2) Moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Develop-
ment Department for the purposes described in section 1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon  Business Development Department, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2017, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $1,100,000, to be deposited in the Public Safety
Training Facility Construction Fund established under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3886