Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Public Records Advisory  Council shall study fees charged for public re-
cords requests. The council shall  submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to rules no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 196