Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Secretary of State shall  study small business. The department shall
submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245,  and may include recommendations
for legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to small busi-
ness no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3187