Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 90.303 is amended to read:
90.303. (1) When evaluating an applicant, a landlord may not consider  a previous action to re-
cover possession pursuant to ORS 105.100 to 105.168 if the action:
(a) Was dismissed or resulted in a general judgment  for the applicant before the applicant sub-
mits the application.
(b) Resulted in a general judgment against the applicant that was:
(A) Entered five or more years before the applicant submits the application; or
(B) Entered on claims that arose on or after April 1, 2020, and before March 1, 2022.
(2) When evaluating the applicant, a landlord may consider a previous arrest of the applicant
only if the arrest resulted in charges for criminal conduct as described in  subsection (3) of this
section and:
(a) The applicant was convicted of the charges; or
(b) The charges are pending and the  applicant is not presently participating in a diversion,
conditional discharge or deferral of judgment program on the charges.
(3) When evaluating the applicant, the landlord  may consider criminal convictions or pending
charges only for conduct that is presently illegal in this state and is:
(a) A drug-related crime, but not including convictions based solely on the use  or possession of
marijuana;
(b) A person crime;
(c) A sex offense;
(d) A crime involving financial fraud, including identity theft and forgery; or
(e) Any other crime if the conduct for which the applicant was convicted or charged is of a
nature that would adversely affect:
(A) Property of the landlord or a tenant; or
(B) The health, safety  or right to peaceful enjoyment of the premises of residents, the landlord
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4654
HB 3938
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
or the landlord’s agent.
(4) When evaluating an applicant,  a landlord may not consider the possession of a medical
marijuana card or status as a medical marijuana patient.
(5) When evaluating an applicant, a landlord may not  consider an applicant’s unpaid rent, in-
cluding rent reflected in judgments or referrals of  debt to a collection agency, that accrued on or
after April 1, 2020, and before March 1, 2022.
(6) When evaluating an applicant, a landlord may not consider the applicant’s credit score
if the applicant provides sufficient proof that the applicant or a member  of the applicant’s
household is eligible for medical assistance under the Oregon Health Plan.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 90.303, as amended by section 10, chapter 39, Oregon Laws 2021, is  amended
to read:
90.303. (1) When evaluating an applicant,  a landlord may not consider a previous action to re-
cover possession pursuant to ORS 105.100 to 105.168 if the action:
(a) Was dismissed or resulted in a general  judgment for the applicant before the applicant sub-
mits the application.
(b) Resulted in a general judgment  against the applicant that was entered five or more years
before the applicant submits the application.
(2) When evaluating the applicant, a landlord may consider a previous arrest of the applicant
only if the arrest resulted in charges for criminal conduct as described in  subsection (3) of this
section and:
(a) The applicant was convicted of the charges; or
(b) The charges are pending and the  applicant is not presently participating in a diversion,
conditional discharge or deferral of judgment program on the charges.
(3) When evaluating the applicant, the landlord  may consider criminal convictions or pending
charges only for conduct that is presently illegal in this state and is:
(a) A drug-related crime, but not including convictions based solely on the use  or possession of
marijuana;
(b) A person crime;
(c) A sex offense;
(d) A crime involving financial fraud, including identity theft and forgery; or
(e) Any other crime if the conduct for which the applicant was convicted or charged is of a
nature that would adversely affect:
(A) Property of the landlord or a tenant; or
(B) The health, safety  or right to peaceful enjoyment of the premises of residents, the landlord
or the landlord’s agent.
(4) When evaluating an applicant,  a landlord may not consider the possession of a medical
marijuana card or status as a medical marijuana patient.
(5) When evaluating an applicant, a landlord may not consider the applicant’s credit score
if the applicant provides sufficient proof that the applicant or a member  of the applicant’s
household is eligible for medical assistance under the Oregon Health Plan.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]