Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 419B.016 is amended to read:
419B.016. (1) A person commits the [ offense] crime  of making a false  report of child abuse if[ ,
with the intent to influence a custody, parenting time, visitation or child support  decision, ] the person:
(a) Makes a false report of child abuse to the Department of Human Services or a  law enforce-
ment agency, knowing that the report is false; or
(b) With the intent  that a public or private official make a report of child abuse to the Depart-
ment of Human  Services or a law enforcement agency, makes a false report of child abuse to the
public or private official, knowing that the report is false.
(2) Making a false report  of child abuse is a Class A [ violation] misdemeanor for a first or
second offense, and a Class C felony for a third or subsequent offense .
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 419B.016 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to  false
reports of child abuse made on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1233