Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 113.085 is amended to read:
113.085. (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of  this section, upon the filing of the petition
under ORS 113.035, if there is no will or  if there is a will and it has been proved, the court shall
appoint a qualified person the court finds suitable as  personal representative, giving preference in
the following order:
(a) The personal representative named in the will.
(b) If  the surviving spouse of the decedent is a distributee of the estate, the surviving spouse
of the decedent or the nominee of the surviving spouse of the decedent.
(c) If the person is a distributee of the estate, a person who would be entitled to property of  the
decedent under intestate succession.
(d) Any other distributee of the estate.
(e) The Director of Human Services or the Director of the Oregon Health Authority, or an  at-
torney approved under ORS 113.086, if the  decedent received public assistance as defined in ORS
411.010, received medical assistance as defined in ORS 414.025 or received care at an  institution
described in ORS 179.321 (1) and it appears that the assistance or the cost  of care may be recovered
from the estate of the decedent.
(f) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs, if the  decedent was a protected person under ORS
406.050 (10) and the department has joined in the petition for such appointment.
(g) Any other person.
(2) Before the court appoints a personal representative under subsection (1)(b) to (g)  of this
section, the court [ may] shall  require the petitioner to  make a reasonable attempt to locate and
notify persons of higher priority than the proposed personal  representative under [ subsection (1)(b)
to (g) of ] this section.
(3) Except  as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the court shall appoint the State Treas-
urer as personal  representative if it appears that the decedent died wholly intestate and without
known heirs. The Attorney General shall represent the State  Treasurer in the administration of the
estate. The State Treasurer shall deposit any funds received by the State Treasurer in  the capacity
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2144
SB 744
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
of personal representative in accounts, separate and distinct  from the General Fund, established in
the State Treasury. Interest earned by such account shall be credited to that account.
(4) The  court may appoint a person other than the State Treasurer to administer the estate of
a decedent who died wholly intestate and  without known heirs if the person filing a petition under
ORS 113.035 attaches written authorization from the State Treasurer approving the filing of the
petition by the person. Except as provided  by rule adopted by the State Treasurer, the State
Treasurer may consent to the appointment of another person to act  as personal representative only
if it appears after investigation that the estate is insolvent.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 113.085 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to estates
of decedents commenced on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[2]