Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of  Consumer and Business Services shall conduct a
study that examines claims processing procedures and results  for workers’ compensation
claims in this state and present the department’s findings in a report  to an appropriate
committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided under
ORS 192.245 on or before September 15, 2022.
(2) In the study described in subsection (1) of this section, the department shall:
(a) Investigate whether significant  disparities exist between how quickly or cooperatively
self-insured employers respond to workers’ compensation claims and how quickly or
cooperatively workers’ compensation insurers respond to workers’ claims;
(b) Determine the rate and frequency at which  self-insured employers approve or deny
workers’ compensation claims compared with the  rate and frequency at which workers’
compensation insurers approve or deny workers’ claims; and
(c) Identify, to the extent possible, the likely causes and sources of any  differences or
disparities that the department uncovers in examining the  data from investigations under
paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(3) If the department finds significant disparities as a  result of the department’s inves-
tigations under subsection (2) of  this section, the department in the report described in
subsection (1) of this section  shall recommend changes in statutes, administrative rules,
internal policies or enforcement measures that may be necessary to reduce  or correct the
disparities.
(4) In conducting investigations  under subsection (2) of this section, the department may
interview witnesses, require the production of documents and records and otherwise  take
actions necessary to develop information to complete the  study described in subsection (1)
of this section.
(5) An insurer or self-insured  employer that is subject to ORS chapter 656 shall cooperate
with the department in the department’s  investigations under subsection (2) of this section.
The department may impose a civil penalty under ORS 183.745 upon  an insurer or self-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2084
SB 801
1
2
3
4
insured employer that  fails to give the department adequate cooperation under this sub-
section.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
[2]