Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
ORS 653.412, 653.422, 653.428, 653.432, 653.436, 653.442, 653.450, 653.455, 653.460,
653.465, 653.470, 653.480, 653.485 and 653.490 are repealed.
SECTION 2.  ORS 659A.885, as amended by section 58, chapter 700, Oregon  Laws 2019, section
46, chapter 367, Oregon Laws 2021, section 9, chapter  99, Oregon Laws 2022, and section 49, chapter
9, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
659A.885. (1) Any person claiming to be  aggrieved by an unlawful practice specified in sub-
section (2) of this section may file  a civil action in circuit court. In any action under this subsection,
the court may order injunctive relief and any other equitable  relief that may be appropriate, in-
cluding but not limited to reinstatement or the hiring of employees with or without back pay.  A
court may order back pay in an action under this subsection only for the two-year period imme-
diately preceding the filing  of a complaint under ORS 659A.820 with the Commissioner of the Bureau
of Labor and Industries, or  if a complaint was not filed before the action was commenced, the two-
year period immediately preceding the filing of the action.  In any action under this subsection, the
court  may  allow the prevailing party costs and reasonable attorney fees at trial and on appeal. Ex-
cept as provided in subsection (3) of this section:
(a) The judge shall determine the facts in an action under this subsection; and
(b) Upon any appeal of a judgment in an action under this subsection, the appellate court  shall
review the judgment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (3).
(2) An action may be brought under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of[ :]
[(a)] ORS 10.090, 10.092, 25.337, 25.424, 171.120, 243.323,  408.230, 408.237 (2), 468B.519, 475C.285,
476.574, 652.020, 652.220, 652.355, 653.060,  653.263, 653.265, 653.547, 653.549, 653.601 to 653.661,
657B.060, 657B.070, 659.852, 659A.030, 659A.040,  659A.043, 659A.046, 659A.063, 659A.069, 659A.082,
659A.088, 659A.103 to 659A.145, 659A.147, 659A.150 to  659A.186, 659A.194, 659A.199, 659A.203,
659A.218, 659A.228,  659A.230, 659A.233, 659A.236, 659A.250 to 659A.262, 659A.277, 659A.290,
659A.300, 659A.306, 659A.309, 659A.315, 659A.318, 659A.320, 659A.343, 659A.355,  659A.357, 659A.370
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3694
HB 2237
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or 659A.421[ ; or ]
[(b) ORS 653.470, except an action may not be brought for a claim relating to ORS 653.450 ].
(3) In any action under subsection (1)  of this section alleging a violation of ORS 25.337, 25.424,
243.323, 652.220, 652.355, 653.547, 653.549, 657B.060, 657B.070, 659.852, 659A.030, 659A.040, 659A.043,
659A.046, 659A.069,  659A.082, 659A.103 to 659A.145, 659A.199, 659A.203, 659A.228, 659A.230,
659A.250 to 659A.262, 659A.290, 659A.318, 659A.343, 659A.355, 659A.357, 659A.370 or 659A.421:
(a) The court may award, in addition  to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
compensatory damages or $200, whichever is greater, and punitive damages;
(b) At the request of any party, the action shall be tried to a jury;
(c) Upon  appeal of any judgment finding a violation, the appellate court shall review the judg-
ment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (1); and
(d) Any attorney fee agreement shall be subject to approval by the court.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS  31.730, in an action under subsection (1) of this section alleging a vi-
olation of ORS 652.220, the court may award punitive damages if:
(a) It is proved by  clear and convincing evidence that an employer has engaged in fraud, acted
with malice or acted with willful and wanton misconduct; or
(b) An employer was previously adjudicated in a proceeding  under this section or under ORS
659A.850 for a violation of ORS 652.220.
(5) In any action under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS 653.060  or
659A.147, the court may award, in addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this  sec-
tion, compensatory damages or $200, whichever is greater.
(6) In any action under subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS  171.120, 476.574
or 659A.218, the court may award, in addition to  the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this
section, compensatory damages or $250, whichever is greater.
(7) In any action under  subsection (1) of this section alleging a violation of ORS 10.090 or 10.092,
the court may award, in  addition to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section, a civil
penalty in the amount of $720.
(8) Any individual against whom any distinction,  discrimination or restriction on account of
race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, marital  status or age,
if the individual is 18 years of  age or older, has been made by any place of public accommodation,
as defined in ORS  659A.400, by any employee or person acting on behalf of the place or by any
person aiding or abetting the place or person in violation of ORS  659A.406 may bring an action
against the operator or  manager of the place, the employee or person acting on behalf of the place
or the aider or abettor of the place or person. Notwithstanding  subsection (1) of this section, in an
action under this subsection:
(a) The court may award, in addition  to the relief authorized under subsection (1) of this section,
compensatory and punitive damages;
(b) The operator or manager of the  place of public accommodation, the employee or person
acting on behalf of the place, and any  aider or abettor shall be jointly and severally liable for all
damages awarded in the action;
(c) At the request of any party, the action shall be tried to a jury;
(d) The court shall award reasonable attorney fees to a prevailing plaintiff;
(e) The court may award reasonable attorney fees and expert  witness fees incurred by a de-
fendant who prevails only if the  court determines that the plaintiff had no objectively reasonable
basis for asserting a claim or no  reasonable basis for appealing an adverse decision of a trial court;
[2]
HB 2237
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
and
(f) Upon any appeal of a judgment under this subsection, the appellate court shall review  the
judgment pursuant to the standard established by ORS 19.415 (1).
(9) When the commissioner or the Attorney General  has reasonable cause to believe that a
person or group of persons is engaged in a pattern or practice of resistance to the rights  protected
by ORS 659A.145 or 659A.421 or federal housing law, or that a group of persons has been  denied
any of the rights protected by ORS 659A.145 or 659A.421  or federal housing law, the commissioner
or the Attorney General may file a civil action on behalf of the aggrieved persons in the  same
manner as a person or group of persons  may file a civil action under this section. In a civil action
filed under this subsection, the court may  assess against the respondent, in addition to the relief
authorized under subsections (1) and (3) of this section, a civil penalty:
(a) In an amount not exceeding $50,000 for a first violation; and
(b) In an amount not exceeding $100,000 for any subsequent violation.
(10) In any action under subsection (1) of  this section alleging a violation of ORS 659A.145 or
659A.421 or alleging discrimination under  federal housing law, when the commissioner is pursuing
the action on behalf of an aggrieved complainant, the  court shall award reasonable attorney fees to
the commissioner if the commissioner prevails in  the action. The court may award reasonable at-
torney fees and expert witness fees incurred by a defendant that prevails in  the action if the court
determines that the commissioner had no objectively reasonable basis for asserting the  claim or for
appealing an adverse decision of the trial court.
(11) In an action under subsection (1) or (9)  of this section alleging a violation of ORS 659A.145
or 659A.421 or discrimination under federal housing law:
(a) “Aggrieved person” includes a person who believes that the person:
(A) Has been injured by an unlawful practice or discriminatory housing practice; or
(B) Will be injured by an unlawful practice or discriminatory housing  practice that is about to
occur.
(b) An aggrieved  person in regard to issues to be determined in an action may intervene as of
right in the action. The  Attorney General may intervene in the action if the Attorney General cer-
tifies that the case is  of general public importance. The court may allow an intervenor prevailing
party costs and reasonable attorney fees at trial and on appeal.
[3]