Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 459.125 is amended to read:
459.125. (1) Subject to ORS 459.145 and the requirements of ORS 459.005 to 459.437 and  459.705
to 459.790, the [ board of county  commissioners ] Boards of County Commissioners  of Marion
County, Benton County, Linn County and Polk County may:
(a) Sell, enter into short or long-term contracts, solicit bids, enter into direct negotiations, deal
with brokers or use other methods of sale or disposal for the products or by-products  of the disposal
sites of the county.
(b) Require any person or class of persons who generate solid  waste to make use of the disposal,
transfer or material or energy recovery sites or facilities of the county  or disposal, transfer or ma-
terial or energy recovery sites or facilities designated by the county.
(c) Require any person or class of persons who pick up, collect or transport solid waste  to make
use of  the disposal, transfer or material or energy recovery sites or facilities of the county or dis-
posal, transfer or material or energy recovery sites or facilities designated by the county.
(d) Regulate,  license, franchise and certify disposal, transfer and material or energy recovery
sites or facilities; establish, maintain and amend rates charged by  disposal, transfer and material or
energy recovery sites or facilities; establish and  collect license or franchise fees; and otherwise
control and regulate the establishment  and operation of all public or private disposal, transfer and
material or energy recovery sites or facilities located within  the county. Licenses or franchises
granted by the board may be exclusive.
(e) Cause solid wastes received and accepted at the disposal sites of the county to be processed,
recycled or reused.
(2) Contracts and other  agreements authorized under subsection (1) of this section may be for
terms not longer than 20 years.
SECTION 2.  ORS 459.145 is amended to read:
459.145. ORS 459.125  [ and 459.135 do ] does  not apply to, or grant to Marion County , Benton
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4881
HB 3972
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
County, Linn County or Polk  County  any authority over , and ORS 459.135 does not apply to,
or grant to Marion County any authority over :
(1) Material kept separate from waste material for the  purpose of recycling or reuse by persons
who generate solid waste and which is handled separately from waste material.
(2) Material or energy recovery involving the collection,  storage, processing or use of materials
kept separate from waste material for the purpose of recycling or reuse by persons who generate
solid waste.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 459.005 to
459.437.
SECTION 4. (1) The Boards of County Commissioners of Benton County, Linn  County,
Marion County and Polk County  may enter into an intergovernmental agreement under ORS
chapter 190 to jointly manage the collection, disposal or material  or energy recovery of solid
waste generated within those counties.
(2) In addition to any provisions required under ORS 190.020, the intergovernmental
agreement may include, but need not be limited to:
(a) Provisions for the formation of an intergovernmental entity to exercise the authori-
ties granted to the counties under ORS 459.125; and
(b) Provisions for designating  sites or facilities owned by any county to be used as the
disposal, transfer or material or energy recovery sites or facilities of  the intergovernmental
entity.
[2]