Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is  added to and made a part of the Insurance Code.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “infertility” means:
(a) A disease, condition or status that results in a failure to establish a  pregnancy or to
carry a pregnancy to a live birth after regular, unprotected sexual intercourse for:
(A) Twelve months for a woman under the age of 35; or
(B) Six months for a woman 35 years of age or older; or
(b) An individual’s inability, without medical intervention, to reproduce either as a single
person or with the person’s partner.
(2) Health benefit plans offered in this state to large or small employers and individual
health benefit plans offered in this state shall reimburse the cost of:
(a) Procedures and medications to address infertility recommended by a licensed  treating
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1763
HB 2959
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
practitioner that are:
(A) Based on  the practitioner’s physical findings and diagnostic testing and an
individual’s medical history, sexual history, reproductive history and age; and
(B) Consistent with established, published  or approved medical practices or professional
guidelines from the American College of Obstetricians and  Gynecologists or the American
Society for Reproductive Medicine, or a successor organization.
(b) Procedures recommended by a licensed treating practitioner, including but not limited
to the storage of reproductive specimens for  the period of time deemed medically necessary
by the practitioner, that are:
(A) Based on the practitioner’s physical findings and diagnostic testing  and an
individual’s medical history, sexual history, reproductive history and age; and
(B) Consistent with established  medical practices or professional guidelines published by
the American Society for Reproductive Medicine or the  American Society of Clinical
Oncology, or a successor organization, for an individual who is at risk of infertility due to:
(i) A medical condition; or
(ii) An expected medication  therapy, surgery, radiation, chemotherapy or other medical
treatment that is recognized by medical professionals to cause a risk of infertility.
(3) The coverage required by subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Includes, but is not limited to:
(A) A minimum of  three completed oocyte retrievals with unlimited embryo transfers in
accordance with guidelines of the American Society  for Reproductive Medicine, or a succes-
sor organization, using single embryo transfer if recommended by  a licensed treating prac-
titioner and medically effective.
(B) Intrauterine insemination.
(C) Assisted hatching.
(D) Cryopreservation and thawing of eggs, sperm and embryos.
(E) Cryopreservation of ovarian tissue.
(F) Cryopreservation of testicular tissue.
(G) Embryo biopsy.
(H) Consultation and diagnostic testing.
(I) Fresh and frozen embryo transfers.
(J) Six completed egg retrievals per lifetime, with unlimited embryo  transfers in accord-
ance with the guidelines  of the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, using single
embryo transfer when recommended and medically appropriate.
(K) In vitro fertilization, including  in vitro fertilization using donor eggs, sperm or
embryos, and in vitro fertilization in which the  embryo is transferred to a gestational carrier
or surrogate.
(L) Intracytoplasmic sperm injection.
(M) Medications.
(N) Ovulation induction.
(O) Storage of oocytes, sperm, embryos and tissue.
(P) Surgery, including microsurgical sperm aspiration.
(Q) Medical and laboratory services that reduce excess embryo  creation through egg
cryopreservation and thawing.
(b) Must be provided to all beneficiaries under the health benefit plan policy or certif-
[2]
HB 2959
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
icate, including a covered spouse and covered dependents other  than spouses, to the same
extent as other pregnancy-related benefits under the plan.
(4) The health benefit plan  may not impose exclusions, limitations or other restrictions
on coverage of:
(a) Medications for the treatment of infertility described in subsection (2) of  this section
that are not imposed on other prescription benefits under the plan.
(b) Procedures described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section:
(A) Based on an  enrollee’s participation in fertility services provided by or to a third
party.
(B) That do not apply to other covered procedures under the plan.
(5) Subsection (4) of this section does not permit a health benefit plan to require step
therapy for services described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section that are  determined
by a treating practitioner to be medically necessary.
(6) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority,  in collaboration with the Department of
Consumer and Business Services, shall study access  to fertility and reproductive
endocrinology services by residents of this state, including:
(a) Availability and utilization of fertility and reproductive endocrinology services in the
commercial health insurance markets, self-insured health plans and the state medical  as-
sistance program;
(b) Financial and access  barriers to obtaining fertility and reproductive endocrinology
services including assisted reproductive technology; and
(c) Inequities in access to  fertility and reproductive endocrinology services based on race,
ethnicity, gender identity, sexual orientation, income,  marital status, immigration status and
disability.
(2) No later than September 15, 2026, the authority  shall report to the interim commit-
tees of the Legislative Assembly related to health, in the manner  provided in ORS 192.245,
the findings of the study described in subsection (1)  of this section and recommendations for:
(a) Reducing financial and access barriers to fertility and reproductive  endocrinology
services for residents of this state;
(b) Strategies to promote  equal access to fertility and reproductive endocrinology ser-
vices, including protections against  discrimination in the provision of fertility and reproduc-
tive endocrinology services;
(c) A  plan to provide equitable access to assisted reproductive technology for all residents
of this state;
(d) The feasibility of obtaining federal financial participation in or other federal resources
to support the plan described in paragraph (c) of this subsection; and
(e) Legislative changes necessary to implement the recommendations  under this sub-
section.
SECTION 4.  ORS 743B.005 is amended to read:
743B.005. For purposes of ORS 743.004, 743.007, 743.022, 743.416, 743.417, 743.535, 743A.101,
743B.003 to 743B.127, 743B.109, 743B.128, 743B.250 and 743B.323  and section 2 of this 2025 Act :
(1) “Actuarial certification” means a written statement by a member of  the American Academy
of Actuaries or other  individual acceptable to the Director of the Department of Consumer and
Business Services that a carrier is in compliance with the  provisions of ORS 743B.012 based upon
[3]
HB 2959
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the person’s  examination, including a review of the appropriate records and of the actuarial as-
sumptions and methods used by the carrier in establishing premium rates for  small employer health
benefit plans.
(2) “Affiliate” of, or person “affiliated” with, a specified person  means any carrier who, directly
or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls or is controlled by  or is under common
control with a specified person. For purposes  of this definition, “control” has the meaning given that
term in ORS 732.548.
(3) “Affiliation period” means,  under the terms of a group health benefit plan issued by a health
care service contractor, a period:
(a) That is applied uniformly and without regard to any health  status related factors to an
enrollee or late enrollee;
(b) That must expire before  any coverage becomes effective under the plan for the enrollee or
late enrollee;
(c) During which no premium shall be charged to the enrollee or late enrollee; and
(d) That begins on the enrollee’s or late enrollee’s first date of  eligibility for coverage and runs
concurrently with any eligibility waiting period under the plan.
(4) “Bona fide association” means an association that:
(a) Has been in active existence for at least five years;
(b) Has been formed and maintained in good faith for purposes other than obtaining insurance;
(c) Does not condition  membership in the association on any factor relating to the health status
of an individual or the individual’s dependent or employee;
(d) Makes health insurance coverage that is offered through the association  available to all
members of the association regardless of the health status of the member or  individuals who are
eligible for coverage through the member;
(e) Does not make  health insurance coverage that is offered through the association available
other than in connection with a member of the association;
(f) Has a constitution and bylaws; and
(g) Is not owned or controlled by a carrier, producer or affiliate of a carrier or producer.
(5) “Carrier” means any person who provides health benefit plans in this state, including:
(a) A licensed insurance company;
(b) A health care service contractor;
(c) A health maintenance organization;
(d) An association or group of employers that provides benefits by means of a multiple employer
welfare arrangement and that:
(A) Is subject to ORS 750.301 to 750.341; or
(B) Is fully insured and otherwise exempt under ORS 750.303 (4) but elects to be  governed by
ORS 743B.010 to 743B.013; or
(e) Any other person or corporation responsible for the payment of benefits or provision of  ser-
vices.
(6) “Dependent” means the spouse or child of an eligible employee, subject to  applicable terms
of the health benefit plan covering the employee.
(7) “Eligible employee” means an employee who is eligible for coverage under  a group health
benefit plan.
(8) “Employee” means any individual employed by an employer.
(9) “Enrollee” means an employee, dependent of the employee  or an individual otherwise eligible
[4]
HB 2959
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
for a group or individual health benefit plan who has enrolled for  coverage under the terms of the
plan.
(10) “Exchange” means the health insurance exchange as defined in ORS 741.300.
(11) “Exclusion  period” means a period during which specified treatments or services are ex-
cluded from coverage.
(12) “Financial impairment” means that a carrier is not insolvent and is:
(a) Considered by the director to be potentially unable to fulfill its contractual obligations; or
(b) Placed under an  order of rehabilitation or conservation by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(13)(a) “Geographic  average rate” means the arithmetical average of the lowest premium and the
corresponding highest premium to be charged by a carrier in a geographic area  established by the
director for the carrier’s:
(A) Group health benefit plans offered to small employers; or
(B) Individual health benefit plans.
(b) “Geographic average rate” does not include premium differences that are due  to differences
in benefit design, age, tobacco use or family composition.
(14) “Grandfathered health plan” has the meaning prescribed  by rule by the United States Sec-
retaries of Labor, Health and Human Services and the Treasury pursuant  to 42 U.S.C. 18011(e) that
is in effect on January 1, 2017.
(15) “Group eligibility waiting period”  means, with respect to a group health benefit plan, the
period of employment or membership with the group that a prospective enrollee must complete  be-
fore plan coverage begins.
(16)(a) “Health benefit plan” means any:
(A) Hospital expense, medical expense or hospital or medical expense policy or certificate;
(B) Subscriber contract of a health care service contractor as defined in ORS 750.005; or
(C) Plan provided by a  multiple employer welfare arrangement or by another benefit arrange-
ment defined in the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974,  as amended, to the
extent that the plan is subject to state regulation.
(b) “Health benefit plan” does not include:
(A) Coverage for accident only, specific disease or condition only, credit or disability income;
(B) Coverage of Medicare services pursuant to contracts with the federal government;
(C) Medicare supplement insurance policies;
(D) Coverage of TRICARE services pursuant to contracts with the federal government;
(E) Benefits delivered through a  flexible spending arrangement established pursuant to section
125 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, when  the benefits are provided in addition
to a group health benefit plan;
(F) Separately  offered long term care insurance, including, but not limited to, coverage of nurs-
ing home care, home health care and community-based care;
(G) Independent, noncoordinated, hospital-only indemnity insurance or other  fixed indemnity in-
surance;
(H) Short term health insurance policies;
(I) Dental only coverage;
(J) Vision only coverage;
(K) Stop-loss coverage that meets the requirements of ORS 742.065;
(L) Coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance;
(M) Insurance arising out of a workers’ compensation or similar law;
[5]
HB 2959
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(N) Automobile medical payment  insurance or insurance under which benefits are payable with
or without regard to fault and that is statutorily  required to be contained in any liability insurance
policy or equivalent self-insurance; or
(O) Any employee welfare benefit plan  that is exempt from state regulation because of the fed-
eral Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended.
(17) “Individual health benefit plan” means a health benefit plan:
(a) That is issued to an individual policyholder; or
(b) That provides individual coverage through a trust, association or  similar group, regardless
of the situs of the policy or contract.
(18) “Initial enrollment period” means a period of at least 30  days following commencement of
the first eligibility period for an individual.
(19) “Late enrollee” means an  individual who enrolls in a group health benefit plan subsequent
to the initial enrollment period during which the individual  was eligible for coverage but declined
to enroll. However, an eligible individual shall not be considered a late enrollee if:
(a) The individual  qualifies for a special enrollment period in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 300gg
or as prescribed by rule by the Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(b) The individual applies for coverage during an open enrollment period;
(c) A court issues an order that coverage be provided for  a spouse or minor child under an
employee’s employer sponsored health benefit plan and request for enrollment  is made within 30
days after issuance of the court order;
(d) The individual is employed by an employer that  offers multiple health benefit plans and the
individual elects a different health benefit plan during an open enrollment period; or
(e) The individual’s coverage under Medicaid, Medicare, TRICARE, Indian Health Service or  a
publicly sponsored or subsidized health  plan, including, but not limited to, the medical assistance
program under ORS chapter 414, has been involuntarily terminated within  63 days after applying for
coverage in a group health benefit plan.
(20) “Multiple employer  welfare arrangement” means a multiple employer welfare arrangement
as defined in section 3 of the federal  Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended,
29 U.S.C. 1002, that is subject to ORS 750.301 to 750.341.
(21) “Preexisting condition exclusion” means a limitation or exclusion of benefits or a denial  of
coverage based on a medical condition being present  before the effective date of coverage or before
the date coverage is denied, whether or not any medical advice, diagnosis, care or  treatment was
recommended or received for the condition before the date of coverage or denial of coverage.
(22) “Premium” includes insurance premiums or other fees charged for  a health benefit plan,
including the costs of benefits paid or reimbursements made to or on  behalf of enrollees covered by
the plan.
(23) “Rating  period” means the 12-month calendar period for which premium rates established
by a carrier are in effect, as determined by the carrier.
(24) “Representative” does  not include an insurance producer or an employee or authorized
representative of an insurance producer or carrier.
(25)(a) “Short term health insurance policy” means a policy of health  insurance that is in effect
for a period of three months or less, including the term of a renewal of the policy.
(b) As used in this subsection, “term of a renewal” includes the term of a new  short term health
insurance policy issued by an insurer to a policyholder no later than 60  days after the expiration
of a short term health insurance policy issued by the insurer to the policyholder.
[6]
HB 2959
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
(26) “Small employer” means an employer who  employed an average of at least one but not more
than 50 full-time equivalent employees on business days during the  preceding calendar year and who
employs at  least one full-time equivalent employee on the first day of the plan year, determined in
accordance with a methodology prescribed by the Department of Consumer and Business Services
by rule.
SECTION 5.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies to policies or certificates issued, renewed
or extended on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 6. The amendments to ORS 743B.005 by section 4 of this 2025  Act become op-
erative on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 7. Section 3 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 8. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[7]