Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
ORS 197.772 is repealed.
SECTION 2. Section 3 of this 2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 197.
SECTION 3. (1) As used in this  section, “National Register” means the National Register
of Historic Places under the National Historic  Preservation Act (P.L. 89-665, 54 U.S.C. 300101
et seq.).
(2) As part of its  comprehensive plan, a local government may adopt a historic resource
program that fosters and encourages the identification, designation and protection of historic
resources within the local government’s jurisdiction consistent with statewide  land use
planning goals and rules.
(3) A historic resource program must include:
(a) An inventory of historic resources within the local government’s jurisdiction;
(b) A process and criteria for determining whether a resource  on the inventory is sig-
nificant to local, regional, state or national history or prehistory as provided by rule;
(c) A process for designating significant historic resources on a resource list  as the re-
sult of a land use decision; and
(d) Land use regulations for the modification,  demolition and relocation of designated
historic resources.
(4) With respect to a resource  that is first listed in the National Register on or after the
effective date of this 2019 Act, a historic resource program:
(a) May require that the resource be included in the inventory under subsection (3)(a)
of this section;
(b) May  not automatically designate the resource under subsection (3)(c) of this section
or subject the resource to  the regulations adopted under subsection (3)(d) of this section; and
(c) May consider the listing as evidence sufficient  to determine that the resource is sig-
nificant under subsection (3)(b) of this  section or, if found to be persuasive within the land
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3269
SB 927
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
use process described under subsection (3)(c) of this section, to designate the  resource as
significant.
(5) With respect to a resource listed in the National  Register before the effective date
of this 2019 Act, a local  government may not approve an application for the demolition or
relocation of the resource except through a land use  decision that considers factors set forth
by rule. This subsection does not apply to accessory structures or noncontributing  resources
of a National Register listing.
(6) A historic resource determined  significant under subsection (3)(b) of this section may
not be demolished for 120 days following the  date of application to demolish the resource or
to remove the resource from the inventory under subsection (3)(a) of this section.
SECTION 4. Section 3 of  this 2019 Act and the repeal of ORS 197.772 by section 1 of this
2019 Act may not be interpreted to remove  any protections of historic resources that were
in effect before the  effective date of this 2019 Act based on a local government’s compre-
hensive plan or land use  regulations or rule of the Land Conservation and Development
Commission.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Land Conservation and Development  Commission, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $______, for the purpose of providing
grants or technical assistance to local  governments in developing or implementing a historic
resource program as described in section 3 of this 2019 Act.
[2]