Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Healthy School Facilities Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by  the Healthy School Facili-
ties Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated to
the Department of Education for the purpose of providing financial assistance to schools  in
carrying out testing and reporting as provided under ORS 332.166 and 332.167  and in under-
taking mitigation action as warranted by the  results of testing carried out under ORS 332.166
and 332.167.
SECTION 2. As used in ORS 332.166 and 332.167, “toxics” means:
(1) Asbestos;
(2) Carbon monoxide;
(3) Lead;
(4) Mold;
(5) Radon; and
(6) Any  other substance that the Department of Education determines by rule is likely
to be present in a school and,  if present at elevated levels, would present an undue danger
to school occupants.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 332.166 is amended to read:
332.166. (1)  The Department of Education, in cooperation with the Oregon Health
Authority , shall disseminate information related to elevated  levels of [ radon] toxics  to each school
district in this state. Information disseminated under this section must include:
(a) Information about [ radon] toxics  and the dangers associated  with elevated levels of [ radon]
toxics;
(b) [ The level of radon ] Any level for a toxic  at which the United States Environmental Pro-
tection Agency recommends schools take action to reduce the indoor  [radon] concentrations  of the
toxic;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1654
SB 886
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Processes by which schools may be tested for elevated levels of [ radon] toxics ; and
(d) Model plans developed pursuant to ORS 332.167.
(2) Dissemination of information under subsection (1)(c) of this  section must take into account
any industry standards for testing buildings for elevated levels of [ radon] toxics .
(3) [Upon request, the State Board of Education shall assist the authority in  disseminating the in-
formation described in this section. ] Dissemination of information  may occur by any reasonable
means, including posting the information on a  website maintained by the department or the  au-
thority [ or the Department  of Education ] and providing each school district with instructions on how
to access the information.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 332.167 is amended to read:
332.167. (1) A school district  shall develop  a plan for testing  schools for elevated levels of
[radon] toxics . At a minimum, plans developed under this subsection must:
(a) Provide for [ the testing of radon ] all toxics to be tested for in any frequently occupied room
[in contact  with the ground or located above a basement or a crawlspace ] in which the toxics are
likely to be present ; and
(b) Provide for [ the testing of radon ] all toxics to be tested for in a school at least  once every
10 years.
(2) The Department of  Education, in consultation with the  Oregon Health Authority , shall
develop model plans for school districts to  follow in implementing the requirements of this section.
The department and the  authority shall seek  the input of the Oregon School Boards Association
in developing the model plans.  To the extent consistent with the protection of school occu-
pants, the model plans must allow flexibility in  testing and reporting schedules sufficient for
a school to conduct testing  and reporting on a schedule that minimizes disruption, allows
more efficient use of resources or otherwise reduces the burden on the school.
(3) Results of a test performed under this section must be:
(a) Provided to the district school board;
(b) Provided to the [ authority] department  in a manner prescribed by the [ authority] depart-
ment; and
(c) Made readily available to parents,  guardians, students, school employees, school volunteers,
administrators and community representatives at the school’s office or school  district’s office or on
a website for the school or school district.
(4) Information provided and made available under subsection (3) of this section must [ include
the level of radon ] identify the level, if any, of each  toxic detected and include any level for
that toxic at which the United States Environmental Protection Agency recommends schools take
action to reduce the indoor [ radon] concentrations of the toxic .
SECTION 5.
(1) The Department of Education, in cooperation with the Oregon Health
Authority, shall disseminate information to  school districts concerning toxics described in
section 2 (1) to (4) of this 2017 Act no later than January 1, 2019.
(2) A school district  shall submit a plan developed under ORS 332.167 for the testing of
toxics described in section  2 (1) to (4) of this 2017 Act to the department on or before Janu-
ary 1, 2020.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 332.167 (1)(b), plans described  in subsection (2) of this section
shall require initial testing of schools for toxics described in section 2 (1) to (4) of  this 2017
Act on or before January 1, 2022.
(4) Subsection  (3) of this section does not apply to a school with regard to a toxic for
[2]
SB 886
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
which the school conducted  testing in accordance with industry standards on or after Janu-
ary 1, 2014, and before January 1, 2019. A school must submit the  results of testing described
in this subsection to  the department and the district school board and make the results
readily available to parents,  guardians, students, school employees, school volunteers, ad-
ministrators and community representatives  at the school’s office or school district’s office
or on a website for the school or school district.
(5) No later than  January 1, 2019, the authority shall provide the department with a copy
of any school plans, testing schedules and  reported test results for radon received by the
authority prior to January 1, 2019.
SECTION 6. The amendments to ORS 332.166 and 332.167 by sections 3 and 4 of this 2017
Act do not invalidate any information, processes  or model plans for radon testing developed
by the Oregon Health Authority prior to the effective date of this 2017 Act  or invalidate any
school testing  plan or schedule developed in accordance with the information, processes or
model plans. For purposes of ORS 332.166 and  332.167, the information, processes and model
plans for radon testing  developed by the authority prior to the effective date of this 2017 Act
shall be treated as information, processes and model  plans developed by the Department of
Education until amended, superseded or repealed by the department.
[3]