Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 181A.010 to
181A.350.
SECTION 2. (1) The Superintendent of State Police shall establish a division for the
purpose of identifying and implementing ways to better serve and protect drug endangered
children.
(2) The superintendent  shall appoint a director of the division established under sub-
section (1) of this section to perform such duties as the superintendent prescribes.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3018