Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 421.076 is amended to read:
421.076. [(1) The Department of Corrections may enter into a contract with an  inmate telephone
services  provider  in which the provider provides inmate telephone services or other inmate communi-
cations systems at the provider’s cost and reimburses the department: ]
[(a) For  the department’s internal and external costs to oversee and manage the inmate telephone
services or communications system; and ]
[(b) To pay third party providers. ]
[(2) The department may not enter into a contract with  an inmate telephone services provider that
authorizes the department to  receive a fee or commission for telephone services provided to inmates
other than the reimbursement described in subsection (1) of this section. ]
(1) The Department of Corrections shall enter into a contract  with a third party to pro-
vide communications services to all persons confined  at a Department of Corrections insti-
tution.
(2) The communications services  provided under subsection (1) of this section must be
provided at no direct or  indirect cost to the person confined at the Department of Cor-
rections institution or the person who is communicating with the  person confined at the
Department of Corrections institution.
(3) The department may not receive  any financial or in-kind compensation from any third
party provider in relation to the  provision of communications services under subsection (1)
of this section.
(4)(a) Except pursuant to rules adopted by the department, the  department may not limit
access to communications services for persons confined at a Department of Corrections in-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 813
HB 3118
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
stitution.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the department may not  limit ac-
cess to in-person visitations or communications services  to offset the cost or time of ad-
ministering this section.
(5)(a) The department shall submit  a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to the judiciary no later than September 15 of each even-numbered year.
(b) The report must include:
(A) A copy of any contract  for communications services entered into by the department
and a third party under subsection (1) of this section, including any amendments to  the
contract;
(B) A detailed accounting of expenditures by the department during  the prior biennium
to administer this section; and
(C) Data  on the usage of all communications services by persons confined at a Depart-
ment of Corrections institution, including monthly data disaggregated by the type of  com-
munication.
(6) As used in this section, “communications services” means:
(a) Voice communication by telephone, cellular telephone, Voice over  Internet Protocol
or other technology that  allows for real-time audio communication between people in differ-
ent locations.
(b) Video communication by  computer, tablet computer, cellular telephone or other
technology that allows for real-time audio and  video communication between people in dif-
ferent locations.
(c) Text communication by computer, tablet computer, cellular telephone  or other tech-
nology that allows for real-time text communication between people in different locations.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Department  of Corrections shall submit a progress report on the
implementation status of  section 1 of this 2025 Act in the manner provided by ORS 192.245,
and may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legisla-
tive Assembly related to the judiciary no later than February 1, 2026.
(2) The department shall submit the first report required under section 1 (5) of this  2025
Act no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
[2]