Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Minority individual” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
(b) “Minority-owned business” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department shall establish a program  to provide
grants to qualified nonprofit or community-based organizations that assist  businesses in be-
coming certified under ORS 200.055 as minority-owned businesses.
(3) The department by rule shall develop criteria for qualifying an organization  to receive
grants under the program described in subsection (2) of this section. The criteria must con-
sider, at a minimum:
(a) The extent to which the organization has demonstrated a  history of supporting the
development of businesses owned by minority individuals.
(b) Whether the organization provides such direct  assistance as mentoring, education
and other resources.
(c) How the organization would plan to use the grant moneys to  assist businesses to be-
come certified as minority-owned businesses and  how effective the organization’s plan is
likely to be.
(4) The department by rule shall develop and implement methods for determining  that
recipients of grant moneys under the program described in  subsection (2) of this section use
the grant  moneys effectively to carry out the purpose specified in subsection (2) of this sec-
tion.
(5) The department shall  monitor and evaluate the extent to which recipients of grant
moneys enabled  businesses owned by minority individuals to become certified under ORS
200.055 as minority-owned businesses and how any increases  in certifications affected the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1506
SB 569
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
economic resilience of communities within which the newly certified businesses operate.
(6) The department,  not later than September 1, 2026, shall submit a report to the Leg-
islative Assembly as provided in ORS 192.245 that includes, at a minimum, the following  in-
formation as of the date of the report:
(a) The identity of all grant recipients under the program;
(b) The amount of each grant;
(c) The number of businesses that each grant recipient contacted and assisted;
(d) The number of businesses that become certified under ORS 200.055  as minority-owned
businesses as a result of assistance from grant recipients; and
(e) An overall assessment of the effects of the  grant program on rates of certification
and the  economic resilience of communities within which the newly certified businesses op-
erate.
SECTION 2.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $4,000,000 for
the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2025 Act.
[2]