Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 336.840 is amended to read:
336.840. (1) As used in this  section, “independent communication” means communication that
does not require assistance or interpretation by an  individual who is not part of the communication
but that may require the use or assistance of an electronic device.
(2)(a) Each district school board shall adopt policies for the use of personal electronic  devices
in the schools of the school district as provided by this section.
(b) Any policy that relates  to the use of student cellular telephones and other personal
electronic devices  must, at a minimum, comply with the least restrictive model policy de-
veloped by the Department of Education as provided by subsection (8) of this section.  A
school district that does not comply with this  paragraph is considered nonstandard under
ORS 327.103.
(3) A district school board shall adopt a  policy for the use of personal electronic devices that
support academic activities and independent communications. The policy must provide that:
(a) Students may be allowed to use personal electronic devices that support academic  activities
and independent communications.
(b) Unless otherwise specifically prohibited by the policy,  students may not be denied the op-
portunity to use  a personal electronic device that supports academic activities and independent
communications.
(4) If  a school district implements a curriculum that uses technology, the district school board
shall adopt a policy that provides that:
(a) Students may be allowed, but are not required, to use their own personal electronic  devices
for the curriculum.
(b) Students who use their own personal electronic  devices for the curriculum must be granted
access to any applications or electronic materials that are available to  students who do not use
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1907
HB 3458
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
their own personal electronic devices for the curriculum.
(c) Students who use their own personal electronic devices  for the curriculum must be granted
access to applications and electronic materials free of charge if the applications and electronic ma-
terials are  provided free of charge to students who do not use their own personal electronic devices
for the curriculum.
(5) A  policy adopted under subsection (3) or (4) of this section must include a process and
timeline for  responding to a student’s request related to the use of a personal electronic device, in-
cluding an appeals process.
(6) School districts must ensure that the policies adopted under subsection (3) or (4)  of this
section are made available to:
(a) School district personnel whose duties  may require them to assist students with personal
electronic devices; and
(b) Students and parents or guardians of students.
(7) Nothing in the requirements of this section prevents a district school  board from prohibiting:
(a) Telephonic or electronic communications during regular school hours or during school events
if the communications are not related to academic activities or independent communications;
(b) Communications using  access to social media or to nonacademic sites during regular school
hours or during school events;
(c) The use of personal electronic  devices for any purpose that does not support academic ac-
tivities or independent communications; or
(d) The use of personal electronic devices for entertainment purposes.
(8) The Department of Education shall develop two or more model policies  related to the
use of student cellular telephones and  other personal electronic devices. The policies must
provide different levels of restrictiveness and must allow a district school  board to decide
which level of restrictiveness to adopt.
[(8)] (9) Nothing in  this section authorizes a district school board, or any employees of or vol-
unteers for the school district or a school of the  school district, to request, require or compel access
to a student’s electronic mail or personal online accounts.
[2]