Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 163.665 is amended to read:
163.665. As used in ORS 163.665 to 163.693:
(1) “Child” means a person who  is less than 18 years of age, and any reference to a child in
relation to a visual recording of the child is a reference to a person who was less than 18  years of
age at the time the original image in the visual recording was created and  not the age of the person
at the time of an alleged offense  relating to the subsequent reproduction, use or possession of the
visual recording.
(2) “Child abuse” means conduct that constitutes,  appears to constitute  or would constitute  if
committed in this state[ ,] a crime in which the victim is a child.
(3) “Sexually explicit conduct” means actual or simulated:
(a) Sexual intercourse or deviant sexual intercourse;
(b) Genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital or oral-anal contact, whether between persons of the
same or opposite sex or between humans and animals;
(c) Penetration of the vagina or rectum by any object other than as part  of a medical diagnosis
or treatment or as part of a personal hygiene practice;
(d) Masturbation;
(e) Sadistic or masochistic abuse; or
(f) Lewd exhibition of sexual or other intimate parts.
(4) “Visual depiction” includes, but is not limited to, visual recordings,  pictures and computer-
generated images , videos  and pictures, whether  made , altered  or produced by electronic, mechan-
ical, digital or other means  or by artificial intelligence .
(5) “Visual recording” includes, but  is not limited to, photographs, films, videotapes and com-
puter and other digital pictures, regardless of the manner in which the recording is stored.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 163.684 is amended to read:
163.684. (1) A person commits the crime of encouraging child sexual abuse in the first  degree if
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1250
SB 626
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the person:
(a)(A) Knowingly develops, duplicates, publishes, prints, disseminates, exchanges, displays,  fi-
nances, attempts to finance or sells a visual  recording of sexually explicit conduct involving a child
or a visual depiction of sexually explicit  conduct that appears to involve a child,  or knowingly
possesses, accesses or  views such a visual recording  or visual depiction with the intent to develop,
duplicate, publish, print, disseminate, exchange, display or sell it; or
(B) Knowingly brings into this state, or causes to be brought or sent into this state,  for sale or
distribution, a visual recording of sexually explicit conduct involving a child  or  a visual depiction
of sexually explicit conduct that appears to involve a child ; and
(b) Knows  or is aware of and consciously disregards the fact that [ creation of ] the visual re-
cording  or visual depiction  of sexually explicit conduct [ involved] portrays  child abuse.
(2) Encouraging child sexual abuse in the first degree is a Class B felony.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 163.686 is amended to read:
163.686. (1) A person commits the crime of encouraging  child sexual abuse in the second degree
if the person:
(a)(A)(i) Knowingly possesses or controls, or knowingly accesses with the intent to view, a visual
recording of sexually  explicit conduct involving a child , or a visual depiction of sexually explicit
conduct that appears  to involve a child,  for the purpose of arousing or satisfying the sexual de-
sires of the person or another person; or
(ii) Knowingly pays, exchanges or gives anything of value to obtain  or view a visual recording
of sexually explicit conduct involving a child , or a visual depiction of  sexually explicit conduct
that appears to involve a child,  for the purpose of  arousing or satisfying the sexual desires of the
person or another person; and
(B) Knows or is aware of and consciously disregards the fact that [ creation of ] the visual re-
cording  or visual depiction  of sexually explicit conduct [ involved] portrays  child abuse; or
(b)(A) Knowingly pays, exchanges or gives anything of value to observe sexually explicit conduct
by a child or knowingly observes, for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of  the
person, sexually explicit conduct by a child; and
(B) Knows or is aware of and consciously disregards the fact that  the conduct constitutes child
abuse.
(2) Encouraging child sexual abuse in the second degree is a Class C felony.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 163.687 is amended to read:
163.687. (1) A person commits the  crime of encouraging child sexual abuse in the third degree
if the person:
(a)(A)(i) Knowingly possesses or controls, or knowingly accesses with the intent to view, a visual
recording of sexually explicit conduct involving a child , or a visual depiction of  sexually explicit
conduct that appears to involve a child, for the purpose of arousing or satisfying the  sexual de-
sires of the person or another person; or
(ii) Knowingly pays, exchanges or gives  anything of value to obtain or view a visual recording
of sexually explicit conduct  involving a child , or a visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct
that appears to involve a child,  for the purpose of  arousing or satisfying the sexual desires of the
person or another person; and
(B) Knows or fails to be aware of a substantial and unjustifiable risk that [ the creation of ] the
visual recording  or visual depiction  of sexually  explicit conduct [ involved] portrays  child abuse;
or
[2]
SB 626
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
(b)(A) Knowingly pays, exchanges or gives anything of value to observe sexually explicit conduct
by a child or knowingly observes, for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of  the
person, sexually explicit conduct by a child; and
(B) Knows or fails to be aware of a substantial  and unjustifiable risk that the conduct consti-
tutes child abuse.
(2) Encouraging child sexual abuse in the third degree is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 163.690 is amended to read:
163.690. It is an  affirmative defense to any prosecution under ORS [ 163.684, 163.686, 163.687 or]
163.693 that the defendant, at the time of engaging in the conduct prohibited therein,  did not know
and did not have reason to know that the relevant sexually explicit conduct involved a child.
SECTION 6. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]