Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall study issues re-
lated to commercial evictions and present the  results of the study in a report to an appro-
priate committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly, in the manner provided
in ORS 192.245, on or before September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on December 31, 2022.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2476