Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Represen-
tatives shall appoint a work group to develop a framework  for a multi-sector plan for aging
to be administered by the Department of Human Services.
(2) The President and the Speaker shall jointly appoint up to 25 members of  the work
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2535
HB 2764
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
group who represent:
(a) Post-secondary education providers;
(b) Businesses;
(c) Philanthropists;
(d) Aging services providers  and other entities with experience in administering Oregon
Project Independence and programs under the Older Americans Act;
(e) Area agencies, as defined in ORS 410.040;
(f) An organization  that advocates for older adults and that has broad membership in this
state;
(g) A statewide nonprofit focused on older adults that has  technical expertise on aging
and on building capacity within organizations to better serve older adults;
(h) Communities that are members of a national  network of age-friendly states and
communities;
(i) Tribes;
(j) Labor organizations that represent paid caregivers;
(k) Local governments from rural areas of this state;
(L) The Department of Human Services;
(m) Health care providers including providers who serve patients  enrolled in Medicare
or Medicaid, and behavioral health providers;
(n) Consumer  advocates for veterans, multigenerational households, older adults who
identify as lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, intersex, asexual, pansexual and  allies,
older adults who are racially diverse, older adults  with disabilities and family unpaid
caregivers; and
(o) Organizations representing various housing  and care options for older adults, behav-
ioral, cognitive and physical health services providers and veterans.
(3) The work group shall:
(a) Devise goals for a multi-sector plan for aging;
(b) Develop a timeline for implementing the plan;
(c) Identify research or data needed;
(d) Identify information needed from state agencies;
(e) Define measures for the success of the plan; and
(f) Conduct an analysis of the landscape of services for older adults in this state.
(4) The work group shall consult with the following agencies in developing the plan:
(a) The Oregon Health Authority;
(b) The Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(c) The division within the Department  of Consumer and Business Services responsible
for providing aging services;
(d) The Oregon Business Development Department;
(e) The Department of Education;
(f) The Department of Transportation;
(g) The Bureau of Labor and Industries;
(h) The Housing and Community Services Department;
(i) The Department of Land Conservation and Development; and
(j) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs.
(5) The Department of Human Services shall provide staff support to the work group.
[2]
HB 2764
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
(6) The department shall:
(a) Not later than December 1, 2025,  provide an initial report to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to human services on the progress of the work group.
(b) During the 2026 regular  session of the Legislative Assembly, provide to the commit-
tees of the Legislative Assembly related  to human services a second report on the progress
of the work group.
(c) Not later than July 1, 2026, provide  a final report, in the manner provided in ORS
192.245, on a framework for developing a multi-sector plan for  aging to the interim commit-
tees of the Legislative Assembly related to human services.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]