Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 316.102 is amended to read:
316.102. (1) A credit  against taxes shall be allowed for voluntary contributions in money made
in the taxable year:
(a) To a major political party  qualified under ORS 248.006 or to a committee thereof or to a
minor political party qualified under ORS 248.008 or to a committee thereof.
(b) To or for the  use of a person who [ must be ] is a candidate for nomination or election to a
federal, state or local elective office in any primary election, general election or special election  in
this state. The person must, in the calendar year  in which the contribution is made, either be listed
on a primary election, general election or special election ballot in this state or  have filed in this
state one of the following:
(A) A prospective petition;
(B) A declaration of candidacy;
(C) A certificate of nomination; or
(D) A designation of a principal campaign committee.
(c) To a political committee, as defined in ORS 260.005, if the political committee has certified
the name of its treasurer to the filing officer, as defined in ORS 260.005, in the manner provided  in
ORS chapter 260.
(2) The credit allowed by subsection (1) of this section shall be the lesser of:
(a) The total contribution, not to exceed [ $100] $500 on a joint return or [ $50] $250 on any other
type of return; or
(b) The tax liability of the taxpayer.
(3) A  taxpayer may not claim the credit allowed under this section if the taxpayer has federal
adjusted gross income in excess of $150,000 on a joint return or $75,000 on any other type  of return.
(4) The claim for tax credit shall be substantiated by  submission, with the tax return, of official
receipts of the candidate, agent, political party or committee thereof or political  committee to whom
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1456
HB 2525
1
2
3
4
5
6
contribution was made.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 316.102 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, and before January 1, 2028.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]