Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in  this section, “betel nut” means the seed of the areca palm
(Areca catechu), commonly consumed as a stimulant.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall develop and implement a program to award  grants
to community-based organizations for the purpose of carrying out a public  health campaign
to educate the residents of this state on the negative health effects of using betel nuts.
(3)(a) The authority shall  prescribe the form and process by which a community-based
organization may apply for and be awarded grants under the program.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1300
HB 3511
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) To be eligible to receive a grant, a  community-based organizations must submit an
application to the authority that demonstrates:
(A) Knowledge of the negative health effects of using betel nuts; and
(B) Extensive relationships to communities in Oregon with disproportionately  high rates
of using betel nuts.
(4) A community-based organization  that receives a grant must conduct a public health
campaign to:
(a) Provide informational, prevention and cessation resources to the public;
(b) Establish and maintain a publicly accessible and user-friendly website;
(c) Employ culturally competent  practices, including the use of languages other than
English, to ensure that resources reach all communities in Oregon;
(d) Prioritize preparation and distribution of resources to communities in Oregon with
disproportionately high rates of using betel nuts; and
(e) Provide resources and training materials to health care providers.
(5) The authority may adopt rules necessary to carry out this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Medical Board  and the Oregon State Board of Nursing shall
ensure that all licensees, as defined in ORS 58.376, are trained and competent in:
(a) Understanding the negative health effects of using betel nuts.
(b) Recognizing the signs that a patient is using betel nuts.
(c) Providing culturally competent resources to diverse patients on the  negative health
effects of using betel nuts.
(2) The Department of Education shall require the  public schools, as defined in ORS
336.790, in this state to incorporate information on the negative health effects of  using betel
nuts into relevant curricula.
(3) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall require  institutions of higher
education, as  defined in ORS 350.259, to incorporate information on the negative health ef-
fects of using betel nuts into relevant curricula of courses and programs.
(4) In carrying out the requirements of this section, the Oregon Medical Board, the
Oregon State Board  of Nursing, the Department of Education and the Higher Education Co-
ordinating Commission shall exercise reasonable efforts to collaborate with and learn from
the expertise and insights of the community-based organizations that  receive a grant under
section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon Health  Authority shall submit a report in the manner pro-
vided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim com-
mittees of  the Legislative Assembly related to public health no later than December 15, 2026.
The report must address:
(a) The implementation progress of the  public health campaigns conducted by
community-based organizations under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(b) The effectiveness of the public health campaigns  conducted by community-based or-
ganizations under section 1 of this 2025 Act to provide culturally competent  resources to
communities with disproportionately high rates of using betel nuts.
(c) Recommendations for further action to reduce the  use of betel nuts and the associ-
ated negative health effects.
(2) No later than September 30,  2026, community-based organizations that receive a grant
under section 1 of this 2025  Act shall provide to the authority information requested by the
[2]
HB 3511
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
authority for the purpose of preparing the report required under this section.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount  of $1,500,000, for the purpose of carrying out sections 1 and 3 of
this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,500,000, to be distributed  among the Oregon Medical Board,
Oregon State Board  of Nursing, Department of Education and Higher Education Coordinating
Commission, for the purpose of each entity carrying out its  respective responsibilities under
section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]