Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 327.331 is amended to read:
327.331. (1) In addition to moneys distributed through  the State School Fund, the Department
of Education  shall award grants to school districts as provided by subsections (5) and (6) of this
section for up to  50 percent of student transportation costs described in subsection (2) of this sec-
tion.
(2) A school district may receive a grant  under this section only for student transportation
costs:
(a) For which the school district  does not receive any amount in distributions from the State
School Fund under ORS 327.013 or any amount related to transit activities.
(b) That are incurred by the school district  for the provision of transportation to students in
grades 9 through 12 on:
(A) A school bus, as defined in ORS 801.460; or
(B) A school activity vehicle, as defined in ORS 801.455.
(3)(a) Each school district may apply to the department for a grant under this section.
(b) The department shall review and approve applications based  on criteria established by the
State Board of Education and shall award grants as provided by subsections  (5) and (6) of this sec-
tion.
(c) The applications must include  the total amount of the student transportation costs described
in subsection (2) of this section and the purposes for which the student transportation  costs were
incurred.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 338.155 (9), the department may not award a grant under this section
directly to a public charter school.
(b) A school district that receives a grant under this section may transfer a portion of  the grant
to a  public charter school based on the charter of the school or any other agreement between the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 203
HB 4136
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
school district and the public charter school.
(c) A public charter school that receives grant funds under this subsection shall use those funds
for the student transportation costs described in subsection (2) of this section.
(5)(a) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, the amount of each  grant for a school district
= the school district’s ADMw ×  (the total amount available for distribution to school districts  as
grants in each fiscal year ÷  the total ADMw of all school districts that receive a grant).
(b) As used in this subsection, “ADMw” means the extended  weighted average daily membership
as calculated under ORS 327.013, 338.155 (1) and 338.165 (2).
(6) If the total amount of grants applied for under  subsection (3) of this section exceeds the total
amount available for distribution to school districts under this section, the department[ :]
[(a) Shall prioritize school districts that did not receive any public moneys in  the previous school
year for student transportation costs described in subsection (2) of this section; and ]
[(b) May otherwise ] may prioritize school districts  or prorate distributions based on rules
adopted by the board.
(7) Each school district shall deposit the grant funds it receives under this section in a separate
account and shall apply amounts in that account to pay for student transportation  costs described
in the school district’s grant application.
(8) The board may adopt any rules necessary for the administration of the grant program.
(9) Nothing in this section affects a school district’s eligibility to receive a  waiver as provided
by ORS 327.043.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 327.331 by section 1 of  this 2020 Act apply to grants
awarded on or after the effective date of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department  of Education, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,250,000, which shall be distributed as grants for  student
transportation costs as provided by ORS 327.331.
SECTION 4. This 2020 Act takes effect on July 1, 2020.
[2]