Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In collaboration  with other state agencies, the State Forestry Depart-
ment shall develop and apply sound forestry practices to:
(a) Promote forest health;
(b) Incorporate regulation or monitoring of pesticide use in forests;
(c) Employ adaptive resource management; and
(d) As related to forest management, advance climate science or climate policy.
(2) The department shall  undertake projects that further the purposes described in sub-
section (1) of this section.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 321.017 is amended to read:
321.017. (1) In addition to the  taxes levied under ORS 321.015 (1) to (4), there hereby is levied
a privilege tax upon taxpayers on the harvesting of all  merchantable forest products harvested on
forestlands in the amount provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The State Board of Forestry shall establish annually, at the beginning of each calendar
year, the rate of tax levied  in subsection (1) of this section [ shall be established annually at the be-
ginning of each calendar year by the board of directors of the Oregon Forest Resources Institute ], at
a rate not to exceed 75 cents per thousand feet, board measure, adjusted annually  for inflation since
1991 based on the  Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as
published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(3) The tax shall be measured by and be  applicable to each per thousand feet, board measure,
and such shall be subject to  and determined by the procedures and provisions of ORS 321.015 (5)
and (6).
(4) The tax levied by subsection (1) of this section  shall be due and payable to the Department
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1981
HB 2357
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of Revenue  in the manner and procedure, including penalties and interest, as set forth for the col-
lection of the privilege tax in ORS 321.005 to 321.185.
(5) The revenue from the tax levied by subsection (1) of  this section shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer who shall deposit it in a suspense account established  under ORS 321.145 (1). After
payment of refunds, which shall be paid in the same manner as other forest  products harvest tax
refunds are paid in ORS 321.145 (2), the balance of  the additional tax imposed under subsection (1)
of this section shall be credited to the State Forestry Department Account and  deposited  in the
[Oregon Forest Resources Institute Fund ] Sound Forestry Practices Subaccount established in
ORS 526.060.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 321.145 is amended to read:
321.145. (1) The  revenue from the taxes levied [ by] under ORS 321.005 to 321.185 and 321.560
to 321.600 shall be  remitted to the State Treasurer who shall deposit it in a suspense account es-
tablished under the provisions of ORS 293.445.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions  of ORS 291.238, the amount of moneys necessary to pay re-
funds of the taxes levied  under ORS 321.015 [ (1) to (4) hereby ] and 321.017  is appropriated contin-
uously to the  Department of Revenue from the suspense account referred to in subsection (1) of this
section, and shall be used by the department for the payment of all refunds of taxes levied  under
ORS 321.015 [ (1) to (4) ] and 321.017  that have been audited and approved by the department. Any
penalties, interest and taxes then due from the  taxpayer shall be applied in that order in computing
any refund, and only the balance due the taxpayer, if any, shall be  refunded. The department shall
on its records charge each refund against the revenue from  the tax with respect to which the refund
is made.
SECTION 4.  ORS 526.060 is amended to read:
526.060. (1) Except as provided in ORS 526.121, 530.147 and 530.280, all assessments, federal  ap-
portionments  or  contributions, and other moneys received by the forester or State Board of Forestry,
shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to the State Forestry Department  Account, which
is established separate and distinct from the  General Fund. All moneys in the State Forestry De-
partment Account are continuously appropriated, and shall  be used by the forester, under the
supervision and direction of the board, for the purposes authorized by law.
(2) The forester shall keep a record of all  moneys deposited in the State Forestry Department
Account. The record shall indicate by separate cumulative accounts the source from which the
moneys are derived and the individual activity or program against  which each withdrawal is
charged. All moneys in the account received pursuant to ORS 527.610 to 527.770  and 527.992 shall
be used only  for carrying out the duties, functions and powers of the State Forestry Department in
administering ORS 527.610 to 527.770 and 527.992.
(3) The Urban and Community Forestry Subaccount is established as  a subaccount of the State
Forestry Department Account. Moneys in the Urban and Community Forestry Subaccount  are con-
tinuously appropriated to the  State Forestry Department to be used for urban and community forest
activities described in ORS 469.634 and 469.652.
(4) The  State Forest Enhancement Donation Subaccount is established as a subaccount to the
State Forestry Department Account. Moneys in the State Forest Enhancement Donation  Subaccount
are continuously appropriated to the State Forestry Department to be used for the  purposes de-
scribed in ORS 526.065.
(5) The State Forest Nursery  Subaccount is established as a subaccount to the State Forestry
Department Account. Moneys in  the State Forest Nursery Subaccount are continuously appropriated
[2]
HB 2357
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
to the State Forestry Department to be used for the purposes described in ORS 526.235.
(6) The State Forest Tree Seed Bank Subaccount is established as a subaccount to the  State
Forestry Department Account.  Moneys in the State Forest Tree Seed Bank Subaccount are contin-
uously appropriated to the State Forestry Department  to be used for the purposes described in ORS
526.470.
(7) The State Forest Tree Seed Orchard Subaccount is established as a subaccount to the  State
Forestry Department Account. Moneys in the State  Forest Tree Seed Orchard Subaccount are con-
tinuously appropriated to the State Forestry Department to be used for the purposes described in
ORS 526.472.
(8) The Sound Forestry Practices Subaccount is established as a  subaccount of the State
Forestry Department Account. Moneys in the Sound Forestry Practices Subaccount are
continuously appropriated to the State Forestry Department for the purposes described in
section 1 of this 2021 Act.
[(8)] (9) Notwithstanding ORS 291.238, the moneys credited to  the subaccounts established under
subsections (5), (6) , [ and] (7)  and (8)  of this section shall be continuously available on a revolving
basis.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 526.274 is amended to read:
526.274. In furtherance of the policy established in ORS 526.271,  the State Board of Forestry, in
consultation with the Governor, may:
(1) In conformance  with federal law, including Public Law 108-7, direct the State Forester to
facilitate the development of stewardship contracts utilizing private  contractors and, when appro-
priate, to seek and enter into a stewardship  contract agreement with federal agencies to carry out
forest management activities on federal lands. The State Forester may, under the stewardship con-
tract  agreements:
(a) Perform road and trail maintenance;
(b) Set prescribed fires to improve forest health, composition, structure and condition;
(c) Manage vegetation;
(d) Perform watershed restoration and maintenance;
(e) Restore wildlife habitat;
(f) Control exotic weeds and species; and
(g) Perform other activities related to stewardship.
(2) Create a forum for interagency cooperation and collaborative  public involvement regarding
federal forest management issues that may include, at the discretion of  the board, the appointment
of advisory committees, the use  of existing advisory committees and procedures for holding public
hearings.
(3) Provide guidelines for  the State Forestry Department and State Forester to follow that con-
tain directions regarding the management of federal lands and that specify the goals  and objectives
of the board regarding the management of federal lands.
(4) Participate, to the extent allowed  by federal law, in the development of federal forest policies
and the forest management planning processes of federal agencies.
(5) Provide guidelines for the department to follow in implementing this section.
(6) Coordinate with Oregon State University, the State Department of  Fish and Wildlife, [ the
Oregon Forest Resources Institute, ] the Department of Environmental Quality, the Oregon Business
Development Department, the State Department of Energy and other agencies of  the executive de-
partment, as defined in ORS 174.112, to assist  the State Forestry Department in carrying out the
[3]
HB 2357
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
provisions of this section.
SECTION 6.
ORS 321.684 is amended to read:
321.684. (1) The Department of Revenue may:
(a) Furnish to any taxpayer or authorized representative, upon request of the taxpayer or  au-
thorized representative, a  copy of the taxpayer’s forest products harvest tax report or return re-
quired by ORS 321.045 or 321.741 that is filed with the department for any  year, or a copy of any
report filed by the taxpayer in connection with the return.
(b) Publish a list of taxpayers who are entitled to unclaimed tax refunds.
(c) Publish statistics classified so as to prevent the identification of taxable value  or any par-
ticulars contained in any report or return.
(d) Disclose a  taxpayer’s name, address and Social Security number or employer identification
number to the extent necessary in connection with the processing and  mailing of forms for any re-
port or return required in the administration of ORS 321.045 and 321.741.
[(e) Disclose to the State Forester, upon  request of the forester, for the purpose of soliciting nomi-
nations and recommendations referred to in ORS 526.610, the names of producers meeting  producer
class qualifications established under ORS 526.610 who filed forest products harvest tax returns. ]
[(f)] (e)  Disclose  appraisal data collected to make determinations of specially assessed value of
forestland under ORS 321.201 to 321.222 to any  member of a forestland value advisory committee the
department has convened under ORS 321.213.
(2) The department also  may disclose and give access to information described in ORS 321.682
to:
(a) The Commissioner of Internal Revenue or authorized representative, for tax purposes only.
(b) The United States Forest Service, Bureau of Land Management and the State Forestry  De-
partment pursuant to their regulatory programs and for investigative purposes related to timber
theft.
(c) The Attorney General, assistants and employees in the Department of Justice or other  legal
representative of the State of Oregon, to the extent the department  considers disclosure or access
necessary for the  performance of the duties of advising or representing the department pursuant to
ORS 321.045 and 321.741.
(d) Employees of the State of Oregon, other than  the Department of Revenue or Department of
Justice, to the extent the department considers disclosure or  access necessary for such employees
to perform their duties under contracts or agreements between the  department and any other de-
partment, agency or subdivision of the State of Oregon in the department’s  administration of the tax
laws.
(e) The Legislative Revenue Officer or the authorized  representative of the Legislative Revenue
Officer  upon  compliance with ORS 173.850. The officer or representative may not remove from the
premises of the department any materials that would  reveal the identity of any taxpayer or any
other person or the volume of harvest and value reported on individual returns and reports.
(f) Any agency of the State  of Oregon, or any person, or any officer or employee of the agency
or person to whom disclosure or access is given  by state law and not otherwise referred to in this
section, including but not limited to  the Secretary of State as Auditor of Public Accounts under
section 2, Article VI of the Constitution of the State of Oregon.
(3) Each officer or employee of the department and each person described  or referred to in
subsection (2)(b) to (f) of this section to whom disclosure or access to the tax information is given
under subsection (2)  of this section or any other provision of state law, prior to beginning employ-
[4]
HB 2357
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
ment or the performance of duties involving such  disclosure or access, shall be advised in writing
of the provisions of ORS 321.682 and 321.686  relating to penalties for the violation of ORS 321.682,
and shall, as a condition of employment  or performance of duties, execute a certificate for the de-
partment, in a form prescribed by the department, stating in substance that the  person has read
these provisions of law, that the  person has had them explained and that the person is aware of the
penalties for the violation of ORS 321.682.
SECTION 7.
ORS 526.600, 526.605, 526.610, 526.615, 526.620, 526.625, 526.630, 526.632, 526.635,
526.640, 526.645, 526.650, 526.655, 526.660, 526.665, 526.670 and 526.675 are repealed.
SECTION 8. All moneys in the Oregon Forest Resources Institute Fund that are unex-
pended and unobligated on the date that ORS  526.675 is repealed shall revert to the General
Fund.
[5]