Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section,  “COFA citizen” means an individual who is a
citizen of one of the following countries with a Compact  of Free Association with the United
States:
(a) The Republic of the Marshall Islands;
(b) The Federated States of Micronesia; or
(c) The Republic of Palau.
(2) The COFA Shared Services Office is established within the division of  the Department
of Human Services and the Oregon Health Authority that is responsible for shared services.
The office shall:
(a) Assist COFA citizens in applying for and accessing:
(A) Any federal, state  or local benefits for which they are eligible, including medical as-
sistance as defined in ORS 414.025, housing assistance, Supplemental Nutrition  Assistance
Program benefits, temporary  assistance for needy families benefits and federal Supplemental
Security Income benefits;
(B) Employment services;
(C) Legal representation; and
(D) Immigration services.
(b) Conduct outreach to inform COFA citizens about the availability of  the benefits and
services described in this subsection.
(c) Award grants to community organizations that provide culturally specific services to
COFA citizens and ensure that grant moneys are used effectively to  improve COFA citizens’
access to the benefits and services described in this subsection.
(d) Provide incentives to increase the recruitment and retention of traditional health
workers as defined in ORS 414.665 who are qualified to provide culturally specific health care
services to COFA citizens.
(e) Develop and maintain a website that provides  information, in the languages spoken
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 235
SB 442
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
by COFA citizens, about the office’s services.
(3) The office shall be under the  supervision and control of a director who shall be chosen
through an open hiring process. In addition to the director, the office shall include  at least
the following staff members:
(a) One innovator agent who shall collaborate with  the department, the authority and
coordinated care organizations as defined in ORS 414.025 on improving COFA citizens’ access
to health care services;
(b) One community ambassador; and
(c) Three community outreach specialists.
SECTION 2.
No later than September 15 of each year, the COFA Shared  Services Office
shall submit a report  in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the interim committees of
the Legislative Assembly related  to human services regarding the progress of the office in
implementing the functions and duties described in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) Section 1 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Department of Human Services and the Oregon  Health Authority may take any
action before the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary
to enable the department and the authority to exercise, on and after  the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers  conferred
on the department and the authority by section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]