Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 215.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “high wildfire hazard area” means  an area iden-
tified as a high wildfire hazard zone and within the wildland-urban interface on  the statewide
wildfire hazard map described in ORS 477.490.
(2) Notwithstanding any other limitations on the siting  of dwellings under this chapter
or under any land use  regulation applicable to the tract, the owner of a tract outside an
urban growth boundary may  site a family dwelling unit as provided in this section. A family
dwelling unit must:
(a) Be a newly constructed, single-family dwelling or newly sited manufactured dwelling;
(b) Be owned by an individual who resides in a single-family dwelling sited on the tract;
(c) Comply with all applicable laws and regulations  relating to sanitation and wastewater
disposal and treatment;
(d) Comply with the construction provisions  of section R327 of the Oregon Residential
Specialty Code if any part of the tract is within a high wildfire hazard area;
(e) Comply with county land use regulations that ensure that:
(A) The dwelling has adequate setbacks from adjacent lands zoned for resource use;
(B) The dwelling has adequate access for  firefighting equipment, safe evacuation and
staged evacuation areas; and
(C) If the dwelling  unit is within a high wildfire hazard area, the dwelling complies with
any requirements for  defensible space established by a local government pursuant to ORS
476.392; and
(f) Be sited:
(A) Not within an urban reserve as defined in ORS 197A.230;
(B) On a tract on which no existing  dwelling is subject to an order declaring it a nuisance
or any pending action under ORS 105.550 to 105.600; and
(C) Not within an area in  which new or existing ground water uses under ORS 537.545
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3381
SB 878
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
(1)(b) or (d) have been restricted by the Water Resources Commission if the  water supply
source for the dwelling unit or associated lands or gardens will be a water well.
(3) If the family dwelling unit will  be sited in a high wildfire hazard area, the dwelling
must comply with any applicable minimum defensible  space requirements for wildfire risk
reduction established by the Department of the State  Fire Marshal under ORS 476.392 and
any applicable local requirements for defensible space established by a local government
pursuant to ORS 476.392.
(4) A county may  not allow a family dwelling unit established under this section to be
used for:
(a) A vacation occupancy, as defined in ORS 90.100, for any person; or
(b) Except as provided  in subsections (5) and (6) of this section, occupancy by any person
who is not the owner’s:
(A) Parent;
(B) Stepparent or parent’s domestic partner, as described in ORS 106.310;
(C) Sibling or sibling’s spouse or domestic partner;
(D) Child or child’s spouse or domestic partner;
(E) Spouse or domestic partner;
(F) Spouse’s or domestic partner’s child or that child’s spouse or domestic partner;
(G) Grandchild; or
(H) Grandparent.
(5) For a period of 18 months following the date that a  family member of the owner
moves out of a dwelling established under this section, the owner  may use the dwelling for
a residential tenancy for a tenant  other than a family member of the owner. Following that
period, the dwelling may not be occupied except by a family member of the owner or  as al-
lowed under subsection (4) of this section.
(6) Limitations under subsection  (2)(b) of this section do not apply to a purchaser of the
tract following the establishment of a dwelling under this section.
(7) For a dwelling established under this section, a county  may not approve a subdivision,
partition or other division of the tract so that an existing  single-family dwelling is situated
on a different tract than the established dwelling.
(8) A county may approve the conversion of  a family dwelling unit to a permissible non-
residential use.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]