Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 118.140 is amended to read:
118.140. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Adjusted gross estate” means the value of the gross estate reduced by the sum  of the
amounts allowable under sections 2053 and 2054 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(b) “Family member” means a member of the family, as defined in section 2032A  of the Internal
Revenue Code, of the decedent.
(c) “Farm business” means a business operated for the primary purpose of  obtaining a profit in
money by:
(A) Raising, harvesting or selling fruit or crops;
(B) Feeding, breeding,  managing or selling livestock, poultry, fur-bearing animals or bees, or the
produce  thereof;
(C) Dairying and selling dairy products;
(D) Breeding, stabling or training equines;
(E) Propagating, cultivating, maintaining or harvesting aquatic species, birds or  animal species
to the extent allowed by the rules adopted by the State Fish and Wildlife Commission;
(F) Raising nursery stock;
(G) Practicing animal husbandry; or
(H) Raising other agricultural or horticultural products.
(d) “Farm use” has the meaning given that term in ORS 308A.056.
(e) “Fishing business” has the meaning given that term in section  1301(b)(4) of the Internal Re-
venue Code.
(f) “Forestland” has the meaning given that term in ORS 321.201.
(g) “Forestry business” means a business operated for the primary purpose  of obtaining a profit
in money by the planting, cultivating, caring for,  preparing, harvesting or cutting of timber or trees
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1577
SB 341
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
for market.
(h) “Homesite” has the meaning given that term in ORS 308A.250.
(i) “Natural resource property” means the following property in this state, if on the date  of the
decedent’s  death  the property is owned by the decedent and used in the operation of a farm business,
forestry business or fishing business owned by the decedent:
(A) Real property used as forestland or as forestland homesites, not to  exceed [ 5,000] 4,000
acres, or that is in farm use.
(B) Timber or trees.
(C) Crops, fruit or other horticultural products, both growing and stored.
(D) Forestry business or farm business equipment.
(E) Livestock, poultry, fur-bearing animals, bees, dairying animals, equines, aquatic species, birds
or other animal species, including stored products or by-products.
(F) Nursery stock as defined in ORS 571.005.
(G) Boats,  gear, equipment, vessel licenses or permits, commercial fishing licenses or permits
and other real or personal property used in the operation of a fishing business.
(H) Real or personal property used  to process and sell the catch of a fishing business in fresh,
canned or smoked form directly to  consumers, including a restaurant with seating capacity of fewer
than 15 seats at which catch from the fishing business is prepared and sold.
(I) An operating allowance.
(J) Any other tangible and intangible  personal property used in the operation of a farm business,
forestry business or fishing business.
(j) “Operating allowance” means cash or a cash  equivalent that is spent, maintained, used or
available for the operation of a farm business, forestry business or fishing business and not spent
or used for any other purpose.
(k) “Qualified beneficiary” has the meaning given that term in ORS 130.010.
(L) “Real property” means real property, as defined in ORS 307.010, that is in this state.
(2)(a) An estate shall be allowed a credit for the value of natural  resource property claimed.
Any operating allowance claimed under this section may not exceed  the lesser of $1 million or 15
percent of the total value  of natural resource property claimed, not including the operating allow-
ance.
(b) The credit allowed under this section shall be  computed by multiplying the tax that would
be payable under this chapter  absent the credit by a ratio, the numerator of which is an amount
equal to the lesser of the amount of natural resource property claimed under this  section or $7.5
million, and the denominator of which is an amount equal to the total adjusted gross estate.
(c) An executor may:
(A) Elect not to claim the credit allowed under this section;
(B) Elect to claim less than the full amount of the credit allowed under this section; or
(C) Elect to claim the credit only for the value of certain assets.
(3) Except as provided in subsections (4), [ (7) and (8) ] (5), (8) and (9)  of this section, a credit is
allowed under this section only if:
(a) The total adjusted gross estate does not exceed $15 million;
(b) The  total value of natural resource property in the estate is at least 50 percent of the total
adjusted gross estate that is in this state;
(c) The natural resource property is transferred to a family member; and
(d) During an  aggregate period of five out of the eight years ending on the date of the decedent’s
[2]
SB 341
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
death, the decedent or a family member operated a farm business,  forestry business or fishing busi-
ness and the property for which a credit is claimed under this section is part of the business.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1)(i)(A) and (3)(b) of  this section, a credit may be al-
lowed for natural resource property that is real property used as forestland  or as forestland
homesites, if:
(a) The real property exceeds 2,000 acres, but does not exceed 4,000 acres, and its  value
is at least 35 percent of the total adjusted gross estate that is in this state;
(b) The  real property exceeds 1,000 acres, but does not exceed 2,000 acres, and its value
is at least 30 percent of the total adjusted gross estate that is in this state;
(c) The real property exceeds 500 acres, but does not exceed 1,000 acres,  and its value is
at least 25 percent of the total adjusted gross estate that is in this state; or
(d) The real property does not exceed 500 acres, and its value is at least  20 percent of the
total adjusted gross estate that is in this state.
[(4)] (5) Property that otherwise meets the requirements of this section shall be allowed a  credit
under this section if:
(a) The property is the subject of a net  cash lease to or from the decedent or a qualified bene-
ficiary who is a family member;
(b) The property is held in trust for a qualified beneficiary who is a family member; or
(c) The property replaces natural resource property, and the replacement property  would oth-
erwise meet the definition of natural resource property except that  it was acquired after the date
of the decedent’s death but before the estate  tax return is filed. In order to qualify under this par-
agraph, real property must be replaced with real property.
[(5)] (6) A credit is allowed under this section for the following real property only if the  real
property was owned by the  decedent or a family member during an aggregate period of five out of
the eight years  ending on the date of the decedent’s death and used in a business described in sub-
section (3)(d) of this section:
(a) Real property used as forestland or  as forestland homesites, not to exceed [ 5,000] 4,000 acres.
(b) Real property used in farm use.
[(6)] (7) A credit is allowed under this section for property used in the operation of  a fishing
business only if the decedent or a family member, during an aggregate  period of five out of the eight
years ending on the date of the decedent’s death:
(a) Owned a vessel used in taking food fish or shellfish  for commercial purposes as defined in
ORS 506.006;
(b) Held a boat license as provided in ORS 508.260;
(c) Held a commercial fishing license under ORS 508.235; and
(d) Held one or more restricted fisheries permits as  provided in ORS chapter 508 or an equiv-
alent restricted vessel permit system under the laws of another state.
[(7)] (8) For  the purpose of meeting the requirements of subsection [ (5)] (6) of this section, in
determining the period of time during which the  decedent or a family member owned real property
received in exchange under section 1031 of the Internal  Revenue Code or acquired in an involuntary
conversion under section 1033 of the Internal Revenue  Code, the period during which the decedent
or a family member owned  the exchanged or acquired real property, if the exchanged or acquired
real property was used in the farm business or forestry business, may be included.
[(8)] (9) Property that otherwise meets the requirements of this  section and that is owned indi-
rectly by the decedent or a family member qualifies for a credit under this  section if the property
[3]
SB 341
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
is owned through an interest in  a limited liability company or in a corporation, partnership or trust
as the  terms corporation, partnership or trust are used in section 2032A(g) of the Internal Revenue
Code. In order to qualify under  this subsection, at least one family member must materially partic-
ipate in the business after the transfer. For purposes of this  subsection, “materially participate”
means to engage  in active management, as defined in section 2032A of the Internal Revenue Code,
of the farm business, forestry business or fishing business. The Department of Revenue may adopt
rules to administer this subsection consistent with this definition.
[(9)(a)] (10)(a) A disposition  shall occur and an additional tax under ORS 118.005 to 118.540 shall
be imposed if the  natural resource property for which a credit is allowed under this section is not
used in the operation  of a farm business, forestry business or fishing business for at least five out
of the eight calendar  years following the decedent’s death or is transferred to a person other than
a family member or another entity eligible for the credit allowed under this section.
(b) The use of cash or other assets for which a credit is claimed under  this section for the
payment of federal estate taxes or state inheritance or estate taxes shall  be a disposition and an
additional tax shall be imposed under this subsection.
(c) The conveyance after  the decedent’s death of property that otherwise meets the requirements
of this section and is conveyed as a qualified  conservation contribution, as defined in section 170(h)
of the Internal Revenue Code, is not a  disposition requiring payment of additional tax under this
subsection.
(d) Natural resource property may be replaced with real property or personal property after the
credit is claimed and not result in a disposition subject to an additional tax  if the replacement
property is used in the operation  of the farm business, forestry business or fishing business. Real
property for which a credit is claimed under this section may  be replaced only with real property
that would otherwise qualify as natural resource property and that replacement  must be made
within one year to avoid a disposition and additional tax,  except that a replacement of property that
is involuntarily  converted under section 1033 of the Internal Revenue Code must occur within two
years.
(e) The additional tax liability shall  be the amount of additional tax that would have been im-
posed, had the disqualified property not been  included in the numerator of the ratio in subsection
(2)(b) of this section, multiplied by  ((five minus the number of years the property was used as natural
resource property) divided by  five). The additional tax liability is the responsibility of the owner of
the property at the time of the disposition or disqualifying event and  is due within six months after
the date on which the disposition  or event occurs. The Department of Revenue may establish by rule
procedures for reporting the additional tax due, consistent with ORS chapter 305.
(f) Prior to the executor’s identification of property for which a credit under this section is
claimed, the executor shall  notify the transferee of the potential for tax consequences to the
transferee if the transferee fails to meet the conditions of paragraph (a) of  this subsection. The
transferee’s written acknowledgment of this notice shall be attached to the estate tax return.
[(10)] (11) The executor shall identify property for which a credit under this section is claimed,
by asset, on  a form prescribed by the department and filed with the estate tax return. Transferees
of property for which a credit under this section  has been claimed shall file a report with the de-
partment on a form prescribed by the department.  This report shall be filed annually until the re-
quirements of subsection [ (9)(a)] (10)(a) of this section are met and shall require tracking of  each
asset for which the credit has been claimed, with confirmation that each asset falls  into one of the
following  categories:
[4]
SB 341
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
(a) The asset is still used in the operation  of a farm business, forestry business or fishing busi-
ness;
(b) The asset  has been replaced with property that meets the requirements of subsection
[(9)(d)] (10)(d) of this section; or
(c) The asset  has been subject to a disposition under subsection [ (9)] (10) of this section, re-
sulting in additional tax.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 118.140 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to estates
of decedents dying on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[5]