Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) There is established within the Higher Education Coordinating  Commis-
sion the Strong Start Program to provide academic support  and comprehensive services for
first-year and underrepresented students at the public universities listed in ORS 352.002.
(2) The program established  under this section must provide comprehensive services to
be determined by the commission by rule, including services to  assist with community
building, summer programs, academic programs and wraparound supports.
(3) The commission  shall distribute moneys from the Strong Start Program Fund, es-
tablished under section 2 of this 2025 Act, to the public universities  through a formula that
ensures equitable allocation of resources based on the number of students in need of support.
The formula under this subsection shall be based on  prior-year fall term first-time students
who represent targeted populations who are federal Pell  Grant eligible, rural, underrepre-
sented or veterans.
(4) The commission shall adopt rules to administer this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the
General Fund, the Strong Start Program  Fund. All moneys in the Strong Start Program
Fund are continuously appropriated  to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission for
purposes of carrying out section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall  administer the fund established
under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning  July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $  which shall  be transferred to the
Strong Start Program Fund to carry out section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2189
SB 604
1
2
July 1, 2025.
[2]