Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
PARENTAL ADMISSION OF MINOR FOR INPATIENT
SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER TREATMENT
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Minor” means an  unemancipated individual who has not attained the age of majority,
as described in ORS 109.510.
(b) “Treatment facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 430.306.
(2) When the director  of a treatment facility receives an application under ORS 430.397
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 265
SB 1547
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
from the parent or guardian of a minor for  the voluntary admission of the minor for inpa-
tient diagnosis, evaluation and treatment of a substance  use disorder and the minor objects
to the admission, the director may only admit the minor if:
(a) The period of inpatient treatment does not exceed 14 days; and
(b) In the opinion of the director of the treatment facility:
(A) The minor has a substance use disorder and has lost  the ability to control the
minor’s personal use of a controlled substance or another substance with abuse potential,
or whose use is to the extent that the health of the  minor is substantially impaired or en-
dangered or the social or economic functioning of the minor is substantially disrupted;
(B) There is no less restrictive alternative available for the minor’s treatment;
(C) There is reason to believe that  the minor’s substance use disorder could be improved
by the recommended course of treatment or would deteriorate further if left untreated; and
(D) The minor’s condition or circumstances meet any other criteria  for admission es-
tablished by the Oregon Health Authority by rule.
(3) A minor admitted to a treatment facility under this  section shall be discharged from
the treatment facility:
(a) No later than 72 hours after the facility receives notice, in writing, from the minor’s
parent or guardian requesting the discharge; or
(b) If the director of the treatment facility determines that  the minor will no longer
benefit from continued treatment and  the minor is not dangerous to self or others. Before
discharging the minor under this paragraph, the treatment facility shall give notice, in
writing, of the pending discharge to the child’s parent or guardian.
(4) To the extent permitted under  federal law, the treatment facility may disclose infor-
mation regarding the minor’s evaluation, diagnosis and treatment,  or need for treatment, to
the minor’s parent or guardian, without the consent of the  minor. The treatment facility
shall encourage the minor to sign  an authorization for the disclosure of information that is
necessary for the parent or guardian to participate in the minor’s  discharge planning and to
provide appropriate support to the minor following discharge.
(5) This section does not apply to:
(a) The voluntary admission of a minor to a state hospital under ORS 426.220; or
(b) The placement of a child or ward in a congregate care  residential setting by the De-
partment of Human Services under ORS 418.322.
(6) The authority shall adopt rules for the  implementation of this section. The rules must
prioritize the best interests of the minor and  take into consideration any applicable due
process rights of the minor, the rights and duties of  the minor’s parent or guardian to
safeguard the mental  and physical well-being of the minor and the state’s interest in pro-
viding treatment and recovery services and supports for minors  experiencing substance use
disorders.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 430.397 is amended to read:
430.397. (1) Any person may voluntarily apply for admission to any treatment facility operated
pursuant to rules of the Oregon Health Authority.
(2) The director of the treatment facility shall determine whether  the person shall be admitted
as a patient, or referred to another appropriate treatment facility or denied referral or admission.
(3) If the person is under 18 years of age or an  incompetent, the director of the treatment fa-
cility shall notify the person’s parents or guardian of the admission or referral.
[2]
SB 1547
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) An application for  admission of a minor to a treatment facility made by a parent or
guardian of the minor is subject to the provisions of section 1 of this 2024 Act.
INSURANCE COVERAGE OF TREATMENT FOR CANNABIS USE BY MINORS
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2024 Act is  added to and made a part of the Insurance Code.
SECTION 4. (1) As use in this section:
(a) “Health benefit plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(b) “Mental health care provider” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475.528.
(2) A health  benefit plan that reimburses the cost of hospital expenses shall reimburse
the cost of inpatient treatment for cannabis use for an enrollee  who is a minor if prescribed
by the enrollee’s mental health care provider  based on a determination that the enrollee’s
use is habitual and likely to lead to the unlawful use of controlled substances.
(3) The coverage required by this  section may be subject to provisions of the health
benefit plan that apply to other inpatient benefits under  the plan including, but not limited
to, deductibles, coinsurance or other cost-sharing.
SECTION 5.
Section 4 of this 2024  Act applies to health benefit plans issued, renewed or
extended on or after January 1, 2025.
VIRTUAL OPIOID DEPENDENCY PROGRAM
SECTION 6. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall  establish a virtual opioid dependency
pilot program to provide on-demand intervention and treatment for  individuals with opioid
use disorder through the 9-8-8 suicide prevention and behavioral health crisis hotline. The
pilot program must enable  an individual to call the hotline 24 hours a day, seven days a week,
and speak to a health care provider  with prescribing privileges. The provider may imme-
diately:
(a) Start the caller on an opioid agonist therapy;
(b) Refer the caller immediately to treatment, transition services and  ongoing depend-
ency care; or
(c) Take other appropriate steps to intervene and provide a pathway to  treatment for the
caller.
(2) Health care providers  participating in the pilot program shall be immune from civil
liability for any actions taken in good faith.
(3) No later than September 15, 2025, the Oregon Health Authority shall  report to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health on the operation  and out-
comes of the pilot program. The report may  include recommendations for legislation to es-
tablish a permanent program.
SECTION 7.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, which may be expended to  establish and maintain
the pilot program described in section 6 of this 2024 Act.
EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES RECIPROCAL LICENSING
[3]
SB 1547
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 8.
(1) The Oregon  Health Authority shall convene an advisory committee to
provide recommendations to the authority regarding  the establishment of an emergency
medical services reciprocal license program for emergency medical services providers,  as
defined in ORS 682.025, and members of the  Armed Forces of the United States who are
trained to provide emergency medical care.
(2) The advisory committee shall consist of at least nine members as follows:
(a) Two members who are members of the Senate;
(b) Two members who are members of the House of Representatives;
(c) One member who represents the authority;
(d) One member who represents the Oregon Military Department;
(e) One member who represents a patient advocacy group;
(f) One member who represents an association of hospitals; and
(g) One member who represents an ambulance service, as described in ORS 682.025.
(3) The advisory committee shall:
(a) Determine the military occupational  specialties that are comparable to each type of
emergency medical services provider;
(b) Determine the necessary training and education required to enable a member of  the
Armed Forces of the  United States to be eligible for a reciprocal license as an emergency
medical services provider; and
(c) Provide recommendations for rules to establish the reciprocal  license program, in-
cluding rules:
(A) To allow the authority to issue a reciprocal license to a  member of the Armed Forces
of the United States who has received military training  to provide emergency care, regard-
less of whether the  member has completed any training and education required for licensure
under ORS 682.216;
(B) To  require an ambulance service that employs or contracts with an emergency med-
ical services provider who  holds a reciprocal license to ensure the licensee is appropriately
trained; and
(C) To  establish a fee for an application for a reciprocal license that is the same as the
fee for an application for an emergency medical services provider license issued under  ORS
682.216.
(4) Not later than September 15, 2024, the advisory  committee shall submit a report, in
the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to  the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
related to health. The report must include the recommendations described in  subsection (3)
of this section.
(5) The authority,  in consultation with the advisory committee and the department, shall
establish and begin issuing licenses under the reciprocal license program described in this
section not later than January 1, 2025.
SECTION 9.
Sections 6 and 8 of this 2024 Act are repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 10. The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 11. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]
SB 1547
1
[5]