Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 468A.205 is amended to read:
468A.205. (1) The Legislative Assembly declares that it is the policy  of this state to reduce
greenhouse gas emissions in Oregon  pursuant to the following greenhouse gas emissions reduction
goals:
(a) By 2010, arrest the  growth of Oregon’s greenhouse gas emissions and begin to reduce
greenhouse gas emissions.
(b) By 2020, achieve greenhouse gas levels that are 10 percent below 1990 levels.
(c) By 2050, achieve greenhouse gas levels that are at least 75 percent below 1990 levels.
(2) The Legislative Assembly declares that it is the policy of this state to include  atmo-
spheric carbon sequestered by the lands  and waters of this state, including Oregon’s forests,
desert lands and territorial sea, in any calculation to  determine progress toward the
greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals established by this section.
[(2)] (3)  The Legislative Assembly declares that it  is the policy of this state for state and local
governments,  businesses,  nonprofit organizations and individual residents to prepare for the effects
of global warming and by doing so, prevent and reduce the social, economic and environmental ef-
fects of global warming.
[(3)] (4)  This section  does not create any additional regulatory authority for an agency of the
executive department as defined in ORS 174.112.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1939