Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall  conduct a study
of water infrastructure needs in this state to identify projects to fund in  the future and shall
report on its findings.
(2) The department shall submit the  report required by subsection (1) of this section in
the manner provided under ORS 192.245, and may  include recommendations for legislation,
to the interim  committees of the Legislative Assembly related to water no later than Sep-
tember 15, 2025.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed January 2, 2026.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 133