Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 689.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “gluten-containing grain” means any of the fol-
lowing grains or a crossbred hybrid of any of the following grains:
(a) Wheat and any species belonging to the genus Triticum;
(b) Rye and any species belonging to the genus Secale;
(c) Barley and any species belonging to the genus Hordeum; or
(d) Oat and any species belonging to the genus Avena sativa.
(2) A manufacturer or wholesaler subject to ORS  689.305 may not sell or otherwise dis-
tribute, or offer to sell or otherwise distribute, an  orally administered drug that contains an
ingredient derived from a gluten-containing grain unless the  drug parcel, package or con-
tainer bears a  label stating that the drug contains the gluten-containing grain and identifying
the ingredient and type of gluten-containing grain from which the ingredient is derived.
SECTION 3.
(1) Section 2 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2028.
(2) The State Board of Pharmacy may take  any action prior to the operative date speci-
fied in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the board to exercise, on  and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the board by section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3321