Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon  Business Development Department, through the network of
small business development centers established under ORS 285B.165  to 285B.171, shall con-
duct a  statewide study of how cooperative resource sharing by groups of small businesses
may result in cost savings  and business expense reductions. Such resources shall include,
but not be limited to, supplies,  equipment, insurance, personnel and other costs and expenses
of business operations.
(2) The department shall produce a report based on the study that includes, at a  mini-
mum:
(a) A description of the types of resources that are  best suited to sharing by groups of
small businesses in this state;
(b) Findings regarding the usage of, and accessibility and the barriers to,  resource shar-
ing; and
(c) Recommendations for legislative or other changes  that may result in cooperative re-
source sharing among small businesses.
(3) Not later than September 15, 2026, the department shall  submit the report produced
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, in the manner  provided by ORS 192.245, to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to business development.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1808