Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 161.327 is amended to read:
161.327. (1) After the defendant is found guilty  except for insanity pursuant to ORS 161.319, if
the court finds  by a preponderance of the evidence that a person found guilty except for insanity
of a felony is affected by a qualifying mental disorder and presents a substantial danger  to others,
the court shall order as follows:
(a) If the court finds that the person is not a  proper subject for conditional release, the court
shall order the person committed to a state hospital or, if the person is under 18 years of age, to a
secure intensive community inpatient facility for custody, care and treatment. When the court orders
a person committed under this paragraph, the court shall place  the person under the jurisdiction
of the Psychiatric Security Review Board.
(b) If the court finds that  the person can be adequately controlled with supervision and treat-
ment if conditionally released  and that necessary supervision and treatment are available, the court
shall order the person conditionally released.
(2)(a) If a party intends  to request conditional release under this section, the party shall, as soon
as practicable, notify the opposing  party, the court and the board of the request. The party re-
questing conditional release shall make every effort to provide the notification in  a manner that
allows sufficient time to carry out the provisions described  in this subsection before the court de-
termination on conditional release.
(b) Upon receipt of a request for conditional release under this section:
(A) If the most serious offense  in the charging instrument is a Class C felony, the court shall
order that a local mental health program designated by the  board consult with the person to de-
termine whether the necessary supervision and treatment for  the person are available in the com-
munity and appropriate for the person and  shall order the release of any records to the program
director that are necessary to complete the consultation.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3244
SB 1114
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) If the most serious  offense in the charging instrument is a Class A or Class B felony, the
court may order that a local mental health  program designated by the board consult with the person
to determine whether the necessary supervision and treatment for the person are  available in the
community and appropriate for the person. If the court orders the consultation,  the court shall fur-
ther order the  release of any records to the program director that are necessary to complete the
consultation.
(3)(a) If the outcome of a consultation described  in subsection (2)(b) of this section indicates that
the necessary supervision and treatment are  available in the community and appropriate for the
person, the  local mental health program shall evaluate the person to determine whether the person
can be adequately controlled with  supervision and treatment if conditionally released, and the pro-
gram director shall  provide to the court and to the board a report of the findings resulting from the
consultation, a report of the findings resulting from the evaluation and recommendations for treat-
ment.
(b) If the outcome of a consultation described in subsection (2)(b) of this section  indicates that
the necessary supervision and treatment for the person are not available  in the community or not
appropriate  for  the person, the program director shall submit to the court and to the board a report
of the findings resulting from the consultation  and may include any recommendations for treatment.
(4) In determining whether a person should be conditionally released, the court:
(a) May order evaluations and examinations as provided in ORS 161.336 (3)  and 161.346 (2) or
as otherwise needed by the court;
(b) Shall act in  conformance with subsection (2)(b) of this section concerning an order for a local
mental health program designated by the board to consult with the person;
(c) Shall have as its primary concern the protection of society; and
(d) May not order conditional release without a report from the consultation described  in sub-
section (2)(b) of this section and the  evaluation described in subsection [ (3)(b)] (3)(a) of this section.
(5) When a person is conditionally released under this  section, the person is subject to those
supervisory orders of the court as are in the best interests of justice,  the protection of society and
the welfare of the person. The  court shall designate a person or state, county or local agency to
supervise the person upon release, subject to those  conditions as the court directs in the order for
conditional release. Prior to the designation, the court shall notify the  person or agency to whom
conditional release is contemplated and provide the person or  agency an opportunity to be heard
before the court. After receiving an  order entered under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the person
or agency designated shall assume supervision of the person pursuant to the  direction of the board.
The person or agency designated as supervisor shall  be required to report in writing no less than
once per month  to the board concerning the supervised person’s compliance with the conditions of
release.
(6) Upon placing a person on conditional release, the court shall within one judicial day  provide
to the board an electronic copy of the conditional release order. The court shall additionally notify
the board in writing of the supervisor appointed and all other conditions of release, and the  person
shall be on conditional release pending hearing before  the board. Upon compliance with this sec-
tion, the court’s jurisdiction over the person is terminated.
(7)(a) The total period of commitment or conditional release under ORS  161.315 to 161.351 may
not exceed [ the maximum sentence  provided by statute for the crime for which the person was found
guilty except for insanity. ]:
(A) The presumptive sentence the person would have  received if convicted of the crime
[2]
SB 1114
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under the sentencing guidelines  of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, except as pro-
vided in subparagraphs (B) and (C) of this paragraph;
(B) The mandatory minimum sentence the person would have received for  the crime
under ORS 137.700 or any other  statute, if the crime is subject to a mandatory minimum
sentence; or
(C) The maximum  sentence provided by statute for the crime, if the crime is a sex crime
as defined in ORS 163A.005 or the crime involved causing the death of another person.
(b) Any amount of time a person has spent in custody prior to being found guilty  except
for insanity  shall be included when determining whether the maximum total period of com-
mitment or conditional release for the person has been exceeded.
(8) An order of the court under this section  is a final order appealable by the person found
guilty except for insanity in accordance  with ORS 19.205 (5). Notwithstanding ORS 19.255, notice
of an appeal under this section shall be served and filed within 90 days after the order appealed from
is entered in the register. The person shall be entitled on appeal to suitable counsel possessing
skills and experience commensurate with the nature and complexity of the  case. If the person is fi-
nancially eligible, suitable counsel  shall be appointed in the manner provided in ORS 138.500 (1), and
the compensation for counsel and costs and expenses of  the person necessary to the appeal shall be
determined and paid as provided in ORS 138.500.
(9) Following the order described in subsection (1) of this section,  the court shall notify the
person of the right to appeal and the right to a hearing before the board in accordance  with ORS
161.336 (5) and 161.341 (3).
(10) The board shall hold a review hearing within 90 days for a person conditionally  released
under this section.
(11) The board shall  establish by rule standards for the consultations described in subsection
(2)(b) of this section and the evaluations described in subsection (3)(a) of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 138.510 (3), at any time within one  year after the
effective date of this 2025 Act, a person who was found  guilty except for insanity before the
effective date of this 2025 Act may file a petition for post-conviction relief under ORS 138.510
to 138.680 claiming, as grounds for relief, that the person was subject to a total period of
commitment and conditional release equal to the statutory maximum sentence for the  of-
fense in violation of ORS 161.327 (7), as amended by section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(2) ORS 138.550 does not apply to petitions  for post-conviction relief described in this
section.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 138.530, in a post-conviction relief proceeding under this section,
the petitioner has the burden of proving, by a preponderance of the evidence, that:
(a) The person was found guilty except for insanity and subject to a total period of com-
mitment and conditional  release equal to the statutory maximum sentence for the offense;
and
(b) The use of the statutory maximum sentence to determine the total period of  com-
mitment and conditional release is  not in conformance with ORS 161.327 (7), as amended by
section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 138.520, if post-conviction relief  is granted under this section,
the court shall vacate  the original judgment of guilty except for insanity and enter a new
judgment of guilty  except for insanity with a total period of commitment and conditional
release in accordance with ORS 161.327 (7), as amended by section 1 of this 2025 Act.
[3]
SB 1114
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
(5) Except as otherwise provided in this section, all provisions of ORS  138.510 to 138.680
apply to petitions for post-conviction relief described in this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
(2) The repeal of section 2 of this 2025 Act does not affect a  petition for post-conviction
relief described in section 2 of this 2025  Act filed within the time limitations described in
section 2 of this 2025 Act.
[4]