Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 76, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 76.  (1) As used  in this section, “deflection program” means a collaborative program be-
tween law enforcement agencies and behavioral health entities that assists  individuals who may
have substance use disorder,  another behavioral health disorder or co-occurring disorders, to create
community-based pathways to  treatment, recovery support services, housing, case management or
other services.
(2) The Oregon Behavioral Health Deflection Program is  established within the Improving
People’s Access to Community-based Treatment, Supports and  Services Grant Review Committee
established under ORS 430.234.  The program consists of grants awarded by the committee to coun-
ties and federally recognized tribal governments to fund deflection programs.
(3)(a) The purpose of the program described in this section is to:
(A) Address the need for more deflection programs to assist individuals whose behavioral health
conditions, including substance use disorder, lead to interactions with  law enforcement,
incarceration, conviction and other engagement with the criminal justice system.
(B) Track and report data  concerning deflection program outcomes in order to determine the
best practices for deflection programs within this state.
(b) ORS 430.230 to 430.236 do not apply to the program described in this section.
(4)(a) The  committee shall develop a grant application process for awarding grants under this
section.
(b) An application for a grant under this section may be submitted by a county or the designee
of a county, or by a tribal government or designee  of a tribal government. Only one application per
county may be submitted, but the application may request funding  multiple programs within a
county.
(c) Prior to submitting an  application for a grant under this section, the applicant shall coordi-
nate with all partners of the development and administration of the proposed deflection program  to
ensure that the partners have  the resources necessary to implement the deflection program. The
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1753
SB 782
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
partners shall include at least a  district attorney, a law enforcement agency, a community mental
health program established under ORS 430.620 and a provider from a Behavioral  Health Resource
Network established under ORS 430.389. Partners may also include a treatment  provider, a local
mental health authority, a tribal government, a peer support organization, a court or a local  gov-
ernment body.
(d) An application for a grant under this section must contain:
(A) A description of  the coordination with program partners required by paragraph (c) of this
subsection that has occurred;
(B) A description of the individuals who would be eligible for the program and what qualifies
as a successful outcome, formulated in cooperation with the program partners  described in para-
graph (c) of this subsection;
(C) A  description of how the program for which the applicant is seeking funding is culturally
and linguistically responsive, trauma-informed and evidence-based;
(D) A description of  a plan to address language access barriers when communicating program
referral options and program procedures to non-English speaking individuals; and
(E) A description of how  the program coordinator will communicate with program partners
concerning persons participating in the program  and any other matter necessary for the adminis-
tration of the program.
(5) To be eligible for funding under this section, a deflection program:
(a) Must be coordinated by or in consultation with a  community mental health program, a local
mental health authority or a federally recognized tribal government;
(b) Must have a coordinator with the following program coordinator duties:
(A) Convening deflection program partners as needed for the operation of the program;
(B) Managing grant program funds awarded under this section; and
(C) Tracking  and reporting data required by the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission under
section 37 , chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024  [ of this 2024 Act ];
(c) Must involve the partners described in subsection (4)(c) of this section; and
(d) May involve a partnership with one or more of the following entities:
(A) A first responder agency other than a law enforcement agency;
(B) A community provider;
(C) A treatment provider;
(D) A community-based organization;
(E) A case management provider;
(F) A recovery support services provider; or
(G) Any other individual  or entity deemed necessary by the program coordinator to carry out
the purposes of the deflection program, including individuals  with lived experience with substance
use disorder, a behavioral health disorder or co-occurring disorders.
(6) During a grant application period established by  the committee, the maximum proportion of
grant funds available to an applicant shall be determined as follows:
(a) The proportion of grant funds available  to an applicant other than a tribal government shall
be determined based on the county  formula share employed by the Oversight and Accountability
Council established under ORS 430.388, but an applicant may not receive  less than [ $150,000]
$500,000.
(b) The committee shall determine the proportion of funds available  to an applicant that is a
federally recognized tribal government.
[2]
SB 782
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
(7)(a) Grant funds awarded under this section may be used for:
(A) Deflection program expenses including but not limited  to law enforcement employees, deputy
district attorneys and behavioral health treatment workers, including peer navigators  and mobile
crisis and support services workers.
(B) Behavioral health workforce development.
(C) Capital construction of behavioral health treatment infrastructure.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the committee may award planning grants
for the development of deflection programs.
(c) The committee may allocate up to three percent of program funds  to support grantee data
collection and analysis or evaluation of outcome measures.
(8) The Oregon Criminal Justice Commission shall provide staff support to the grant program.
(9) The committee  and the commission may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this sec-
tion.
[3]