Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in this section and sections 2 and 3 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Allowable closing costs”  means disbursements listed in a settlement statement for
the purchase of a single family residence by an eligible program participant.
(2) “Eligible costs” means the down payment and allowable  closing costs for the purchase
of a single family residence by an eligible program participant.
(3) “Eligible program participant”  means an individual who is a resident of this state and
has been approved to  participate in the Homeownership Grants for Grads Program described
in section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(4) “First-time home buyer” means an individual who has not owned or purchased,  either
individually or jointly, a single family residence prior to the date of the purchase  of a single
family residence for which a grant is made under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(5) “Resident of this state” has the meaning given that term in ORS 316.027.
(6) “Settlement statement” means the statement of receipts and disbursements for a
transaction related to real estate, including a statement prescribed under the Real Estate
Settlement Procedures Act of 1974, 12 U.S.C. 2601 et seq., and regulations thereunder.
(7)(a) “Single family residence” means a residence intended for occupation  by a single
family unit that is owned and occupied by an  eligible program participant as the participant’s
principal residence.
(b) “Single family residence” includes a manufactured home, residential  trailer, mobile
home or condominium unit.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Homeownership Grants for Grads Program is established within the
Housing and Community Services Department. The purpose of the program is to provide
grants to first-time home buyers who have received  an associate, baccalaureate, master’s,
doctoral or other post-secondary degree to provide and enhance opportunities for  first-time
homeownership.
(2) The department may make grants to pay or  reimburse an eligible program participant
for the eligible costs associated with the purchase of a single family residence.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3233
HB 3240
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
(3)(a) The department shall specify by  rule the criteria for eligibility to participate in the
program. At a minimum, the rules must require  that an eligible program participant docu-
ment and verify that the applicant:
(A) Is a resident of this state;
(B) Is a first-time home buyer;
(C) Has received an associate, baccalaureate, master’s,  doctoral or other post-secondary
degree within 18 months immediately preceding the date of application to participate in the
program;
(D) Intends to live  and work in this state for at least five years following receipt of the
post-secondary degree described in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph;
(E) Has purchased or will be purchasing a single family residence; and
(F) Has eligible costs associated with the purchase of a single family residence.
(b) The department may not  impose any maximum or minimum income requirements
upon an individual for the purpose of establishing eligibility to participate in the program.
(c) An individual who is  married to an individual who has previously received a grant
under the program is ineligible to apply for and receive a grant under the program.
(d) An individual who has been found to be delinquent in the payment of personal income
taxes is ineligible to receive a grant under the program.
(4) The  department shall specify, by rule, an application process for individuals to apply
to participate in the Homeownership Grants for Grads Program.
(5) The department may not pay amounts for grants under this section from  any source
other than available funds in  the Homeownership Grants for Grads Program Fund estab-
lished in section 3 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Homeownership Grants for Grads Program Fund is established in the
State Treasury, separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Interest earned on the
Homeownership Grants for Grads Program Fund  must be credited to the fund. Moneys in the
Homeownership Grants for Grads Program Fund are continuously appropriated to the
Housing and Community Services  Department to make grants to eligible program partic-
ipants under section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(2) Moneys in the Homeownership Grants for Grads Program Fund  may be used by the
department to pay for the administrative expenses of the  department in establishing, imple-
menting and administering the Homeownership Grants for Grads Program.
(3) The Homeownership Grants for Grads Program Fund consists of:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(b) Moneys  transferred to the fund from the federal or state government or from private
contributions;
(c) Application fees, if any;
(d) Interest and other earnings on moneys in the fund; and
(e) Gifts, grants or donations received from any source.
[2]