Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 411.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “COFA citizen” has the meaning given that term
in ORS 413.614.
(2) A COFA citizen residing in this  state may not be denied public assistance, including
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits, on the basis of the COFA citizen’s im-
migration status.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Human Services, for the biennium ending June 30,  2025, out of the
General Fund, the  amount of $_______, which may be expended for providing public assistance
to COFA citizens as required under section 2 of this 2024 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 166