Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
ACCOUNTABILITY
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “performance audit” has  the meaning given that
term in ORS 297.070.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4777
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The Division of Audits shall conduct audits of the Department of Transportation as
follows:
(a) Once per biennium, a performance audit relating to the responsible use of moneys in
the State Highway Fund; and
(b) Once per year, a performance audit of capital projects carried out by the department.
(3) The Division of Audits shall present the  results of the audits described in subsection
(2) of this section to an appropriate standing  or interim committee of the Legislative As-
sembly.
(4) The Legislative Policy and Research Director shall enter into a professional services
contract for a performance audit  of the operations of the department, to include examination
of:
(a) The management of the department; and
(b) Whether and how the department addresses recommendations from  the management
review conducted pursuant to section 203, chapter 7, Oregon  Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5550).
SECTION 1a.
 ORS 184.620 is amended to read:
184.620. (1)  The Department of Transportation shall be under the supervision of a Director of
Transportation  who shall be appointed by and shall  hold office at the pleasure of the
Governor. [ The Oregon Transportation Commission shall appoint the director, after consultation  with
the Governor. The director serves at the pleasure of the commission. ]
(2) The appointment of the director shall be subject  to confirmation by the Senate in the manner
provided in ORS 184.623.
(3) The director may appoint:
(a) Deputy directors with full authority to act for the director, but subject to the  director’s
control. The appointment of a deputy director shall  be by written order filed with the Secretary of
State. A deputy director shall be in the unclassified services for purposes of the  State Personnel
Relations Law.
(b) All subordinate officers and employees of  the department and may prescribe their duties,
assignments and reassignments and fix their compensation, subject to any applicable  provisions of
the State Personnel Relations Law.
(4) Subject to  the approval of the [ commission] Oregon Transportation Commission , the di-
rector may organize and  reorganize the department as the director considers necessary to properly
conduct the work of the department. As  directed by the chairperson of the commission, the director
shall assign employees of the department to staff the commission.
(5) When service of summons or other process  is required by statute to be served on the Di-
rector of Transportation, the Department of Transportation or the Oregon Transportation Commis-
sion, such service shall be made upon the office of the director.
SECTION 1b.
 ORS 184.623 is amended to read:
184.623. (1) The executive appointment of the Director of Transportation  by the [ Oregon Trans-
portation Commission ] Governor under ORS 184.620 is subject to confirmation by the Senate. Con-
firmation requires the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the Senate.
(2) If an appointment made under ORS 184.620 is not confirmed by the Senate, the [ commission]
Governor shall make another appointment, subject to confirmation by the Senate.
(3) The name of the individual to be appointed  or reappointed shall be submitted to the Senate
by the [ commission] Governor under ORS 184.620. The Senate shall  take up the question of confir-
[2]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mation as soon after the convening of a regular or special  session as is appropriate. The question
of confirmation may be referred to committee or may be acted upon without a referral.
(4) If  the name of an individual to be appointed or reappointed submitted by the [ commission]
Governor is not acted upon during the term of the Legislative Assembly to which it  is submitted,
the name may be resubmitted to the subsequent term by the  [commission] Governor on or after the
date the Legislative Assembly convenes in the subsequent regular session.
SECTION 1c.
(1) The amendments to ORS 184.620 and 184.623 by sections 1a and 1b of this
2025 Act apply to appointments made on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(2) The Director of Transportation who is  serving on the effective date of this 2025 Act
continues to be governed by ORS 184.620 as in effect immediately before  the effective date
of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 1d. ORS 184.665 is amended to read:
184.665. [ (1) The Oregon Transportation Commission shall appoint a  Continuous Improvement
Advisory Committee composed  of members of the commission, employees of the Department of Trans-
portation and transportation stakeholders. The committee shall be of such size and representation  as
the commission determines appropriate. ]
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Chief engineer” means the person appointed by the Director  of Transportation under
ORS 184.628.
(b) “Major project” means a  transportation project that costs $250 million or more to
complete.
(2) The  Oregon Transportation Commission shall appoint a Continuous Improvement
Advisory Committee. The  members of the committee shall include, but are not limited to,
the following:
(a) Members of the commission;
(b) The Director of Transportation;
(c) The chief engineer;
(d) Individuals with demonstrated expertise in planning, executing and delivering major
projects; and
(e) At least one  individual with demonstrated knowledge and experience in the application
and implementation of the National Environmental Policy Act.
[(2)] (3) The committee shall:
(a) Advise the commission on ways to maximize the  efficiency of the Department of Transpor-
tation to allow  increased investment in the transportation system over the short, medium and long
term.
(b) Develop  key performance measures, based on desired outcomes, for each division of the de-
partment. The committee shall submit key performance measures to the commission for its  approval.
The committee shall report  quarterly  to the  commission [ at least once per year ] and to the Joint
Committee on Transportation  on the status of key performance  measures and what steps are be-
ing taken by the department to achieve the goals of the key performance measures.
[(3)] (4) The committee shall [ periodically] report  quarterly to the commission  and to the Joint
Committee on Transportation . The reports must include recommendations on ways the commis-
sion and the department may execute their duties more efficiently.
[(4) Each odd-numbered year, the commission shall submit a report, in the  manner provided by
ORS 192.245, to  the Joint Committee on Transportation established under ORS 171.858. The report
[3]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
must include information  on the activities and recommendations of the committee and information on
any actions taken by the commission or  the department to implement recommendations of the
committee.]
(5) The committee shall meet [ regularly] at least  once a month , at times and places fixed by
the chairperson of the committee or a majority of members of the committee.
(6) The department shall  provide office space and personnel to assist the committee as requested
by the chairperson, within the limits of available funds.
[(6)] (7) Members of the committee are entitled to compensation and expenses as provided  under
ORS 292.495.
SECTION 1e.
 ORS 171.861 is amended to read:
171.861. (1) As used in this section, “major project” means a transportation project that
costs $250 million or more to complete.
(2) The Joint Committee on Transportation shall :
(a) Examine transportation related policy ; [ and]
(b) Review transportation project expenditures ;
(c) Review the scope, schedule, changes and budget updates to major projects  on a
quarterly basis;
(d) Review requests for project scope  expansion requests submitted by a city or a county
under section 1f of this 2025 Act;  and
(e) Make recommendations related to transportation  and appropriation of funding to the Joint
Committee on  Ways and Means  during the period when the Legislative Assembly is in session,
or to the Emergency Board or the Joint Interim Committee on  Ways and Means during the
interim period between sessions .
(3) The Joint Committee on Transportation shall provide general legislative  oversight of the
Department of Transportation  and the Oregon Department of Aviation .
SECTION 1f. (1) As used in this section, “highway  improvement project” means a state
highway project for which the Department of  Transportation may use federal transportation
funds.
(2) If a city or county proposes  to expand the scope of a highway improvement project,
but does not provide funding, the city or  county shall submit the proposed change to the
Oregon Transportation Commission. If the commission approves  the proposed change, the
commission shall submit a  report to the Joint Committee on Transportation that informs the
committee about the proposed change and cost  associated with the expanded scope. After
reviewing the report, the committee may submit recommendations for  appropriations that
may be made in the future to cover the costs of the expanded scope  of the highway im-
provement project.
(3) This section applies to highway improvement projects when a city  or county is not
covering the costs of the expanded scope and:
(a) The project costs less than $25 million and the changes in scope the city or  county
is requesting increase the project costs by 10 percent or more; or
(b) The project costs $25 million or more and the changes  in scope the city or county is
requesting increase the project costs by five percent or more.
WEIGHT-MILE TAXES
[4]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 2.
 ORS 825.476 is amended to read:
825.476. (1) For the period beginning on July 1, 2028, and ending on December 31, 2029:
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
MILEAGE TAX RATE TABLE “A”
Declared Combined Fee Rates
Weight Groups Per Mile
(Pounds) (Mills)
26,001 to 28,000 76.4
28,001 to 30,000 80.9
30,001 to 32,000 84.6
32,001 to 34,000 88.4
34,001 to 36,000 91.8
36,001 to 38,000 96.6
38,001 to 40,000 100.2
40,001 to 42,000 103.8
42,001 to 44,000 107.7
44,001 to 46,000 111.3
46,001 to 48,000 114.9
48,001 to 50,000 118.7
50,001 to 52,000 123.1
52,001 to 54,000 127.7
54,001 to 56,000 132.5
56,001 to 58,000 138.0
58,001 to 60,000 144.3
60,001 to 62,000 151.7
62,001 to 64,000 160.1
64,001 to 66,000 169.3
66,001 to 68,000 181.3
68,001 to 70,000 194.1
70,001 to 72,000 206.9
72,001 to 74,000 218.7
74,001 to 76,000 230.0
76,001 to 78,000 241.1
78,001 to 80,000 251.2
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
AXLE-WEIGHT MILEAGE
TAX RATE TABLE “B”
Declared Combined Number of Axles
Weight Groups 5 6 7 8 9 or
(Pounds) (Mills) more
80,001 to 82,000 259.4 237.3 221.8 210.7 198.7
82,001 to 84,000 267.8 241.1 225.4 213.4 201.4
84,001 to 86,000 275.8 246.6 229.1 216.1 204.2
[5]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
86,001 to 88,000 285.2 252.0 232.7 219.9 206.9
88,001 to 90,000 296.2 258.4 236.5 223.5 210.7
90,001 to 92,000 309.0 265.9 239.9 227.1 214.4
92,001 to 94,000 323.0 273.1 243.8 230.8 217.2
94,001 to 96,000 337.7 281.5 248.3 234.6 220.7
96,001 to 98,000 353.3 291.7 253.9 238.4 224.5
98,001 to 100,000 302.5 259.4 242.8 228.1
100,001 to 102,000   264.9 248.3 231.9
102,001 to 104,000   270.5 253.9 236.5
104,001 to 105,500   277.7 259.4 241.1
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
MILEAGE TAX RATE TABLE “A”
Declared Combined Fee Rates
Weight Groups Per Mile
(Pounds) (Mills)
26,001 to 32,000
32,001 to 38,000
38,001 to 44,000
44,001 to 50,000
50,001 to 56,000
56,001 to 62,000
62,001 to 68,000
68,001 to 74,000
74,001 to 80,000
80,001 to 105,500
MILEAGE TAX RATE TABLE “E”
Declared Combined Fee Rates
Weight Groups Per Mile
(Pounds) (Mills)
26,001 to 32,000
32,001 to 38,000
38,001 to 44,000
44,001 to 50,000
50,001 to 56,000
56,001 to 62,000
62,001 to 68,000
68,001 to 74,000
74,001 to 80,000
[6]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
80,001 to 105,500
(2) For the period beginning on January 1, 2030, and ending on December 31, 2031:
MILEAGE TAX RATE TABLE “A”
Declared Combined Fee Rates
Weight Groups Per Mile
(Pounds) (Mills)
26,001 to 32,000
32,001 to 38,000
38,001 to 44,000
44,001 to 50,000
50,001 to 56,000
56,001 to 62,000
62,001 to 68,000
68,001 to 74,000
74,001 to 80,000
80,001 to 105,500
MILEAGE TAX RATE TABLE “E”
Declared Combined Fee Rates
Weight Groups Per Mile
(Pounds) (Mills)
26,001 to 32,000
32,001 to 38,000
38,001 to 44,000
44,001 to 50,000
50,001 to 56,000
56,001 to 62,000
62,001 to 68,000
68,001 to 74,000
74,001 to 80,000
80,001 to 105,500
(3) For the period beginning on January 1, 2032, and ending on December 31, 2033:
MILEAGE TAX RATE TABLE “A”
Declared Combined Fee Rates
[7]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Weight Groups Per Mile
(Pounds) (Mills)
26,001 to 32,000
32,001 to 38,000
38,001 to 44,000
44,001 to 50,000
50,001 to 56,000
56,001 to 62,000
62,001 to 68,000
68,001 to 74,000
74,001 to 80,000
80,001 to 105,500
MILEAGE TAX RATE TABLE “E”
Declared Combined Fee Rates
Weight Groups Per Mile
(Pounds) (Mills)
26,001 to 32,000
32,001 to 38,000
38,001 to 44,000
44,001 to 50,000
50,001 to 56,000
56,001 to 62,000
62,001 to 68,000
68,001 to 74,000
74,001 to 80,000
80,001 to 105,500
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 825.476 by section 2  of this 2025 Act become oper-
ative on July 1, 2028.
SECTION 4. The amendments to ORS 825.476 by section 2 of this 2025 Act  apply to taxes
imposed on or after July 1, 2028.
SECTION 5.  ORS 825.476, as amended by section 2 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
825.476. [(1) For the period beginning on July 1, 2028, and ending on December 31, 2029: ]
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
MILEAGE TAX RATE TABLE “A”
Declared Combined Fee Rates
Weight Groups Per Mile
(Pounds) (Mills)
26,001 to 32,000
[8]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
32,001 to 38,000
38,001 to 44,000
44,001 to 50,000
50,001 to 56,000
56,001 to 62,000
62,001 to 68,000
68,001 to 74,000
74,001 to 80,000
80,001 to 105,500
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
MILEAGE TAX RATE TABLE “E”
Declared Combined Fee Rates
Weight Groups Per Mile
(Pounds) (Mills)
26,001 to 32,000
32,001 to 38,000
38,001 to 44,000
44,001 to 50,000
50,001 to 56,000
56,001 to 62,000
62,001 to 68,000
68,001 to 74,000
74,001 to 80,000
80,001 to 105,500
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
[(2) For the period beginning on January 1, 2030, and ending on December 31, 2031: ]
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
MILEAGE TAX RATE TABLE “A”
Declared Combined Fee Rates
Weight Groups Per Mile
(Pounds) (Mills)
26,001 to 32,000
32,001 to 38,000
38,001 to 44,000
44,001 to 50,000
50,001 to 56,000
56,001 to 62,000
62,001 to 68,000
68,001 to 74,000
74,001 to 80,000
[9]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
80,001 to 105,500
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
MILEAGE TAX RATE TABLE “E”
Declared Combined Fee Rates
Weight Groups Per Mile
(Pounds) (Mills)
26,001 to 32,000
32,001 to 38,000
38,001 to 44,000
44,001 to 50,000
50,001 to 56,000
56,001 to 62,000
62,001 to 68,000
68,001 to 74,000
74,001 to 80,000
80,001 to 105,500
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
[(3) For the period beginning on January 1, 2032, and ending on December 31, 2033: ]
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
MILEAGE TAX RATE TABLE “A”
Declared Combined Fee Rates
Weight Groups Per Mile
(Pounds) (Mills)
26,001 to 32,000
32,001 to 38,000
38,001 to 44,000
44,001 to 50,000
50,001 to 56,000
56,001 to 62,000
62,001 to 68,000
68,001 to 74,000
74,001 to 80,000
80,001 to 105,500
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
MILEAGE TAX RATE TABLE “E”
Declared Combined Fee Rates
Weight Groups Per Mile
[10]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(Pounds) (Mills)
26,001 to 32,000
32,001 to 38,000
38,001 to 44,000
44,001 to 50,000
50,001 to 56,000
56,001 to 62,000
62,001 to 68,000
68,001 to 74,000
74,001 to 80,000
80,001 to 105,500
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
MILEAGE TAX RATE TABLE “A”
Declared Combined Fee Rates
Weight Groups Per Mile
(Pounds) (Mills)
26,001 to 32,000
32,001 to 38,000
38,001 to 44,000
44,001 to 50,000
50,001 to 56,000
56,001 to 62,000
62,001 to 68,000
68,001 to 74,000
74,001 to 80,000
80,001 to 105,500
MILEAGE TAX RATE TABLE “E”
Declared Combined Fee Rates
Weight Groups Per Mile
(Pounds) (Mills)
26,001 to 32,000
32,001 to 38,000
38,001 to 44,000
44,001 to 50,000
50,001 to 56,000
56,001 to 62,000
62,001 to 68,000
68,001 to 74,000
[11]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
74,001 to 80,000
80,001 to 105,500
SECTION 6. The amendments to ORS 825.476 by section 5 of this 2025 Act  apply to taxes
imposed on or after January 1, 2034.
SECTION 7. The amendments to ORS 825.476 by section 5  of this 2025 Act become oper-
ative on January 1, 2034.
SECTION 8.  ORS 825.474 is amended to read:
825.474. (1) In addition to other fees and taxes imposed by law upon carriers, there shall  be as-
sessed against and collected from every carrier a  tax for the use of the highways, to apply to the
cost of administration  of this chapter and for the maintenance, operation, construction and recon-
struction of public highways.
(2) The tax rate which shall apply to each motor vehicle shall be based  upon the declared
combined weight of the motor vehicle and in accordance with the weight group tax  rates as shown
in the tables set forth in ORS 825.476.
(3) For the purpose of computing the tax due:
(a) Table “A”  in ORS 825.476  applies  to motor vehicles subject to the tax imposed by this sec-
tion that are not issued an annual variance permit under ORS 818.200 (1)(a) to (c) to operate with
a combined weight of more than 80,000 pounds.
[(b) Table “B” applies to motor vehicles subject to the tax  imposed by this section that are issued
or required to obtain an annual variance permit under ORS  818.200 (1)(a) to (c) to operate with a
combined weight of more than 80,000 pounds. ]
(b) Table “E” in ORS  825.476 applies to electric vehicles subject to the tax imposed by this
section that are not issued an annual variance permit under ORS  818.200 (1)(a) to (c) to op-
erate with a combined weight of 26,001 pounds or more.
(c) The declared combined weight shall be  the combined weight, as defined in ORS 825.005, de-
clared in the [ application for authority under ORS 825.100, subject to audit and approval by the De-
partment of Transportation ] registration weight .
(d) In addition to any tax  due under this chapter, motor vehicles that exceed the maximum ve-
hicle weight limits for annual variance permits  under ORS 818.200 (1)(a) to (c) are subject to the
road use assessment fee imposed under ORS 818.225 for the  entire motor vehicle weight, minus the
road use assessment fee for the maximum vehicle weight  allowed under the annual variance permit.
(4) The tax for each motor vehicle [ when table “A” or “B” is used ] shall be computed by multi-
plying the extreme mileage of travel in Oregon by the appropriate weight group  tax rate as it ap-
pears in the table.
SECTION 9.
The amendments to ORS 825.474 by section 8  of this 2025 Act become oper-
ative on July 1, 2028.
SECTION 10. The amendments to ORS 825.474 by section 8 of this 2025 Act  apply to taxes
imposed on or after July 1, 2028.
DIESEL FUEL TAX ADMINISTRATION
SECTION 11.  ORS 319.010 is amended to read:
319.010. As used in ORS 319.010 to 319.430, unless the context requires otherwise:
[12]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(1) “Aircraft” means every contrivance now known, or hereafter  invented, used or designed for
navigation of or flight in the air, operated or propelled by the use of aircraft fuel.
(2) “Aircraft fuel” means any  gasoline and any other inflammable or combustible gas or liquid
by whatever name such gasoline, gas or liquid is known or sold, usable as fuel for  the operation of
aircraft, except gas or liquid, the chief use of which, as determined by  the Department of Trans-
portation is for purposes other than the propulsion of aircraft.
(3) “Airport” means any area of land or water, except a restricted  landing area, which is de-
signed for the landing and takeoff of aircraft.
(4) “Broker” means [ and includes ] every person other  than a dealer engaged in business as a
broker, jobber or wholesale merchant dealing in motor vehicle fuel or aircraft fuel.
(5) “Bulk transfer” means any change in ownership of motor vehicle fuel or aircraft fuel  con-
tained in a terminal storage facility or any physical movement of  motor vehicle fuel or aircraft fuel
between terminal storage facilities by pipeline or marine transport.
(6) “Consumer Price  Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region” means the Consumer
Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as published by the Bureau
of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
[(6)] (7) “Dealer” means any person who:
(a) Imports or  causes to be imported motor vehicle fuels or aircraft fuels for sale, use or dis-
tribution in, and after the same  reaches the State of Oregon, but “dealer” does not include any
person who imports  into this state motor vehicle fuel in quantities of 500 gallons or less purchased
from a supplier who is licensed as a dealer under ORS 319.010 to 319.430  and who assumes liability
for the payment of the applicable license tax to this state;
(b) Produces, refines, manufactures or compounds motor vehicle fuels  or aircraft fuels in the
State of Oregon for use, distribution or sale in this state;
(c) Acquires in this state for sale, use or distribution in this  state motor vehicle fuels or aircraft
fuels with respect to which there has been no license tax previously incurred; or
(d) Acquires title to or possession of motor  vehicle fuels or aircraft fuels in this state and ex-
ports the product out of this state.
[(7)] (8) “Department” means the Department of Transportation.
(9) “Diesel” or “diesel fuel” includes biodiesel and renewable diesel fuel and  other diesel
fuel blends.
[(8)] (10) “Distribution” means, in addition to  its ordinary meaning, the delivery of motor vehicle
fuel or aircraft fuel by a dealer to any service station or into any tank, storage facility or  series
of tanks or storage facilities  connected by pipelines, from which motor vehicle fuel or aircraft fuel
is withdrawn directly for sale  or for delivery into the fuel tanks of motor vehicles whether or not
the service station, tank or storage facility is owned, operated or controlled by the dealer.
[(9)] (11) “First sale, use or distribution of  motor vehicle fuel or aircraft fuel” means the first
withdrawal, other than by bulk transfer, of motor vehicle  fuel or aircraft fuel from terminal storage
facilities for sale, use or distribution. “First sale, use  or distribution of motor vehicle fuel or aircraft
fuel” also means the first sale, use or distribution of motor vehicle  fuel or aircraft fuel after import
into this state if the motor vehicle fuel or aircraft fuel is delivered other than to the terminal stor-
age facilities of a licensed dealer.
[(10)] (12)  “Highway” means every  way, thoroughfare and place, of whatever nature, open for
use of the public for the purpose of vehicular travel.
[(11)] (13) “Motor vehicle”  means all vehicles, engines or machines, movable or immovable, op-
[13]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
erated or propelled by the use of motor vehicle fuel.
[(12)] (14)(a)  “Motor vehicle fuel” means [ and includes ] gasoline , diesel  and any other
inflammable or combustible gas or liquid, by whatever name such  gasoline, gas or liquid is known
or sold, usable as fuel for the operation of motor vehicles, except gas or liquid[ ,] the chief use of
which, as  determined by the department, is for purposes other than the propulsion of motor vehicles
upon the highways of this state.
(b) “Motor vehicle fuel” does not include dyed diesel as defined in ORS 319.520.
[(13)] (15) “Person” includes every natural person, association, firm,  partnership, corporation or
the United States.
[(14)] (16)  “Restricted landing area” means  any area of land or water, or both, which is used
or made available for the landing and  takeoff of aircraft, the use of which, except in case of emer-
gency, is provided from time to time by the department.
[(15)] (17) “Service station” means [ and includes] any place operated for the purpose of retailing
and delivering motor vehicle  fuel into the fuel tanks of motor vehicles or aircraft fuel into the fuel
tanks of aircraft.
[(16)] (18) “Terminal storage facility” means any fuel storage  facility that has marine or pipeline
access.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 295.103 is amended to read:
295.103. (1) This section applies to the following moneys:
(a) Motor vehicle fuel taxes, penalties and interest that are:
(A) Imposed on motor carriers; and
(B) Payable through a clearinghouse operated under an  international fuel tax agreement entered
into under ORS 825.555; and
(b) Registration fees and other fixed fees and taxes that are:
(A) Imposed on motor carriers for motor vehicles proportionally registered in this state  and
other jurisdictions;
(B) Apportioned to this state; and
(C) Payable through  a clearinghouse operated under an agreement for proportional registration
entered into under ORS 826.007.
(2) Moneys described in subsection (1) of this  section are not public funds for purposes of ORS
295.001 to 295.108 for the period during which the moneys are held by a clearinghouse described  in
subsection (1) of this section pending disbursement to, or payment on behalf of, the state.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 319.390 is amended to read:
319.390. [Every dealer in motor vehicle fuel shall  keep a record in such form as may be prescribed
by the Department of Transportation of all purchases, receipts, sales and distribution of  motor fuel.
The records shall include copies of all invoices or bills of all such sales and shall at  all times during
the business hours of the day be subject to inspection by the department  or its deputies or other officers
duly authorized by the department. Upon request from the officials  to whom is entrusted the enforce-
ment of the motor fuel tax law of another state, territory, country or the federal  government, the de-
partment shall forward to such officials any information which it may have  relative to the import or
export of any motor vehicle fuel by any dealer,  provided such other state, territory, country or federal
government furnishes like information to this state. ]
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Department of  Transportation” or “department” includes deputies or other officers
or representatives duly authorized by the department.
[14]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) “Inspection” means any inspection, audit, examination or test reasonably required  in
the administration of this section.
(c) “Premises” means any premises, equipment, rolling stock or  facilities operated or
occupied by any dealer or broker.
(d) “Records”  means any records of purchases, receipts, sales and distribution of motor
vehicle fuel, including  copies of invoices or bills of such sales, and related books, papers,
statements and reports.
(2) The  Department of Transportation may, at any time during a dealer’s or broker’s
business hours, upon demand, enter upon the premises in order to:
(a) Conduct an inspection of records and equipment;
(b) Set  up and use any apparatus or appliance, and occupy necessary space, for the in-
spection;
(c) Verify the completeness, truth and accuracy of any records; and
(d) Determine  whether the dealer or broker has violated any provision of ORS 319.010 to
319.430.
(3) Any dealer or broker that refuses entry to the  department for an inspection, or a
demand to furnish records necessary  for the inspection, is subject to a civil penalty under
section 24 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 825.555 is amended to read:
825.555. (1) The Department of Transportation may enter into an international fuel  tax agree-
ment with jurisdictions outside [ of] this state to provide for cooperation and assistance among
member jurisdictions in the administration and collection of taxes imposed on motor carriers for  the
consumption of all fuels used in vehicles operated interstate.
(2) An agreement under this section may:
(a) Provide for determining a base state for motor carriers for purposes of the agreement.
(b) Impose record keeping requirements.
(c) Specify audit procedures.
(d) Provide for exchange of information among jurisdictions.
(e) Provide criteria for determining which carriers are eligible  to receive the benefits of the
agreement.
(f) Define qualified motor vehicles.
(g) Specify conditions under which bonds are required.
(h) Specify reporting requirements and periods, including but not limited to specifying  penalty
and interest rates for late reporting.
(i) Determine methods for collecting and forwarding of motor  vehicle fuel taxes, penalties and
interest to another jurisdiction.
(j) Provide that the  Department of Transportation may deny any person further benefits under
the agreement until all motor  vehicle fuel taxes  have been paid, if the department determines that
additional motor vehicle fuel taxes are owed by the person.
(k) Authorize the department to suspend , [ or] cancel  or  refuse to renew  benefits under the
agreement for any  person who violates any term or condition of the agreement or any law or rule
of this state relating to motor carriers or vehicles.
(L) Contain such other provisions as will facilitate the agreement.
(m) Authorize the department to  deny an international fuel tax agreement license if the
department has reasonable grounds to believe, based  on information contained in the de-
[15]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
partment files and records or based on  evidence presented during an administrative hearing,
that the  department has authority to deny or revoke an international fuel tax agreement li-
cense.
(3) An agreement may not  provide for any benefit, exemption or privilege with respect to any
fees or taxes levied or assessed against the use of highways or use or ownership of vehicles except
for motor vehicle fuel taxes and requirements related to motor  vehicle fuel taxes.
(4) The department may adopt any rules the  department deems necessary to enforce, effectuate
and administer the provisions of an agreement entered into under this section.  Nothing in the
agreement shall affect  the right of the department to adopt rules as provided in ORS chapter 823
and this chapter.
(5) An agreement shall  be in writing and shall be filed with the department within 10 days after
execution or on the effective date of the agreement, whichever is later.
(6)(a) The department shall adopt rules  establishing an annual fee to be paid by each motor
carrier receiving benefits from an agreement entered into under this section.
(b) In establishing fees, the department shall consider the size of the motor carrier’s fleet.
(c) Fees established under this subsection shall be  designed to recover the full direct and indi-
rect costs to the  department that result from participation in the agreement[ , but the department
may not establish a fee under this subsection that exceeds $650 ].
SECTION 15.
 ORS 810.530 is amended to read:
810.530. (1) A weighmaster or motor carrier enforcement officer in whose presence  an offense
described in this  subsection is committed may arrest or issue a citation for the offense in the same
manner as under ORS 810.410 as  if the weighmaster or motor carrier enforcement officer were a
police officer. This subsection applies to the following offenses:
(a) Violation of maximum weight limits under ORS 818.020.
(b) Violation of posted weight limits under ORS 818.040.
(c) Violation of administratively imposed weight or size limits under ORS 818.060.
(d) Violation of maximum size limits under ORS 818.090.
(e) Exceeding maximum number of vehicles in combination under ORS 818.110.
(f) Violation of posted limits on use of road under ORS 818.130.
(g) Violation of towing safety requirements under ORS 818.160.
(h) Operating with sifting or leaking load under ORS 818.300.
(i) Dragging objects on highway under ORS 818.320.
(j) Unlawful use of devices without wheels under ORS 815.155.
(k) Unlawful use of metal objects on tires under ORS 815.160.
(L) Operation without pneumatic tires under ORS 815.170.
(m) Operation in violation of vehicle variance permit under ORS 818.340.
(n) Failure to carry and display permit under ORS 818.350.
(o) Failure to comply with commercial vehicle enforcement requirements under ORS 818.400.
(p) Violation of any provision of ORS chapter 825.
(q) Operation without proper fenders or mudguards under ORS 815.185.
(r) Operating a vehicle without  driving privileges in violation of ORS 807.010 if the person is
operating a commercial motor vehicle and the person does not have commercial driving privileges.
(s) Violation driving while suspended or revoked in violation of ORS 811.175 if the person is
operating a commercial  motor vehicle while the person’s commercial driving privileges are sus-
pended or revoked.
[16]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(t) Failure to use vehicle traction tires or chains in violation of ORS  815.140 if the person is
operating a motor vehicle subject to ORS chapter 825 or 826.
(u) Failure to carry  vehicle traction tires or chains in violation of ORS 815.142 if the person is
operating a motor vehicle subject to ORS chapter 825 or 826.
(v) Illegally altering or displaying registration plate in violation of ORS 803.550.
(2) A weighmaster or motor carrier enforcement officer in whose presence  an offense described
in this subsection is committed by a person operating a commercial  motor vehicle may issue a ci-
tation for the offense. A weighmaster or  motor carrier enforcement officer who finds evidence that
an offense  described in this subsection has been committed by a person operating a commercial
motor vehicle or by a motor carrier for  which the person is acting as an agent may issue a citation
for the offense. A weighmaster or motor carrier enforcement officer issuing a citation under this
subsection  has the authority granted a police officer issuing a citation under ORS 810.410. A citation
issued under this subsection to the operator of a commercial  motor vehicle shall be considered to
have been issued to the motor carrier that owns the commercial motor vehicle if the operator  is not
the owner. This subsection applies to  the following offenses, all of which are Class A traffic vio-
lations under ORS 825.990 (1):
(a) Repeatedly violating or avoiding any order or rule of the Department of Transportation.
(b) Repeatedly refusing or repeatedly  failing, after being requested to do so, to furnish service
authorized by certificate.
(c) Refusing or failing to file the annual report as required by ORS 825.320.
(d) Refusing or failing to maintain records required by the department or to produce such  re-
cords for examination as required by the department.
(e) Failing to appear for a hearing after notice that the carrier’s certificate  or permit is under
investigation.
(f) Filing  with the department an application that is false with regard to the ownership, pos-
session or control of the equipment being used or the operation being conducted.
(g) Delinquency in reporting or paying any fee, tax or penalty due to the department  under ORS
chapter 825 or 826.
(h) Refusing or failing to file a deposit or bond as required under ORS 825.506.
(i) Failing to comply with  the applicable requirements for attendance at a motor carrier educa-
tion program as required by ORS 825.402.
(3) A weighmaster or motor carrier  enforcement officer who finds evidence that a person oper-
ating a  commercial motor vehicle has committed [ the offense of failure to pay the appropriate regis-
tration fee under ORS 803.315 ] one or more of the following offenses  may  issue a citation for the
offense in the same manner as under ORS 810.410 as  if the weighmaster or motor carrier enforce-
ment officer were a police officer[ .]:
(a) Failure to register a vehicle under ORS 803.300.
(b) Failure to pay the appropriate registration fee under ORS 803.315.
(c) Failure to submit a declaration of weight under ORS 803.440.
(d) Failure to renew vehicle registration under ORS 803.455.
(e) Failure to carry a registration card under ORS 803.505.
(f) Failure to display registration plates under ORS 803.540.
(g) Improper display of validating stickers under ORS 803.560.
(h) Failure to comply with an international fuel tax agreement under section  18 of this
2025 Act.
[17]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) Improper use of dyed diesel under section 19 of this 2025 Act.
(4) The authority of  a weighmaster or motor carrier enforcement officer to issue citations or
arrest under this section is subject to ORS chapter 153.
(5)(a) A person is a weighmaster for purposes of this section if the person is  a county
weighmaster or a police officer.
(b) A person is a  motor carrier enforcement officer under this section if the person is duly au-
thorized as a motor carrier enforcement officer by the Department of Transportation.
(6) A weighmaster or motor carrier enforcement officer may accept security in  the same manner
as a police officer under ORS 810.440 and 810.450 and may  take as security for the offenses, in ad-
dition to other security permitted under  this section, the sum fixed as the presumptive fine for the
offense.
(7) A weighmaster or motor carrier  enforcement officer may arrest a person for the offense of
failure to appear in a violation proceeding under ORS 153.992 if the  violation is based upon a cita-
tion for any offense described in subsection (1) or (3) of this  section except those described in sub-
section (1)(p) of this section.
(8) A weighmaster or motor carrier enforcement officer may exercise the same authority as a
police officer under ORS 810.490 to enforce vehicle  requirements and detain vehicles. A person who
fails to comply with the authority of a weighmaster or motor carrier  enforcement officer under this
subsection is subject to penalty under ORS 818.400.
SECTION 16.
Sections 17 to 19 of  this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of the
Oregon Vehicle Code.
SECTION 17. “Dyed diesel” has the meaning given that term in ORS 319.520.
SECTION 18. (1) A person commits the offense of failure to comply with an international
fuel tax agreement if the person is required to comply with the  requirements of an interna-
tional fuel tax agreement entered into under ORS 825.555 or any rule adopted  by the De-
partment of Transportation under ORS 825.555, and the person fails to comply.
(2) The offense described under this section, failure to comply with  an international fuel
tax agreement, is a Class A traffic violation.
SECTION 19. (1) A person commits the offense of improper use of dyed diesel if the
person operates a  motor vehicle on the highways of this state and has dyed diesel in the fuel
supply tank of the vehicle in violation of section 23 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The offense described under this section, improper use of dyed diesel, is  a Class A
traffic violation.
SECTION 20.  ORS 319.520 is amended to read:
319.520. As used  in ORS 319.510 to 319.880, unless the context clearly indicates a different
meaning:
(1) “Cardlock card” means a fuel card:
(a) Capable of generating an electronic invoice or electronic statement that includes the infor-
mation required by ORS 319.671 and the applicable fuel tax amount;
(b) Issued for a specific vehicle, a specific piece of equipment or a group of equipment;
(c) That includes the qualifying information, as  designated by the Department of Transportation
by rule, that is printed on the electronic invoice or electronic statement;
(d) That allows the tax status  of the cardlock card to be indicated on the electronic invoice or
electronic statement and includes state tax as a separate item on the invoice or statement; and
(e) That allows a cardlock card issuer to generate a statement recording, by fuel type, gallons
[18]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of fuel purchased for domestic and foreign customers each month.
(2) “Combined weight” means the total empty weight  of all vehicles in a combination plus the
total weight of the load carried on that combination of vehicles.
(3) “Delinquent” means having failed to pay a tax or penalty within the time provided by law.
(4) “Department” means the Department of Transportation.
(5) “Diesel” and “diesel fuel” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 319.010.
[(5)] (6) “Domestic customer” means a customer making a purchase  at a nonretail facility owned
by the cardlock card issuer.
(7) “Dyed diesel” means diesel fuel that  is dyed a color and meets the dyeing and marking
requirements of the Internal Revenue Service.
[(6)] (8) “Foreign customer”  means a customer making a purchase at a nonretail facility owned
by a seller other than the cardlock card issuer.
[(7)] (9) “Fuel” means any combustible gas, liquid or material of a kind used for  the generation
of power to propel a motor vehicle  on the highways except motor vehicle fuel as defined in ORS
319.010.
[(8)] (10) “Highway” means every way, thoroughfare and place, of whatever nature, open to  the
use of the public for the purpose of vehicular travel.
[(9)] (11) “Light weight” means the  weight of a vehicle when fully equipped for moving over the
highway.
[(10)] (12) “Liquefied petroleum gas” includes propane, pentane and  any mixture of propane and
pentane.
[(11)] (13) “Motor vehicle” means every self-propelled vehicle operated  on the highway, except
an implement of husbandry used in agricultural operations and only incidentally operated  or moved
upon the highway.
[(12)] (14) “Nonretail facility” means:
(a) An unattended facility accessible only by cardlock card  and not associated with a retail fa-
cility; or
(b) An unattended portion of a retail facility separate from the  retail operations and accessible
only by cardlock card.
[(13)] (15) “Person” means any  individual, firm, copartnership, joint venture, association, corpo-
ration, trust, receiver or any group or combination acting as a unit.
[(14)] (16) “Seller” means:
(a) A person that sells fuel to a user; or
(b) If the fuel is dispensed at a nonretail facility, the person that  owns the user’s accounts and
bills the user for fuel purchased at a nonretail facility.
[(15)] (17) “To sell fuel for use in a motor vehicle” means to dispense or place fuel  for a price
into a receptacle on a motor vehicle, from which  receptacle the fuel is supplied to propel the motor
vehicle.
[(16)] (18) “To use fuel in  a motor vehicle” means to receive into any receptacle on a motor
vehicle, fuel to be consumed in propelling the motor vehicle on  the highways of this state; and, if
the fuel is received into the receptacle outside the  taxing jurisdiction of the state, “to use fuel in
a motor vehicle” means to consume in propelling the motor vehicle on the highways of this state.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 319.550 is amended to read:
319.550. (1) Except as provided in this section,  a person may not use fuel in a motor vehicle in
this state unless the person holds a valid user’s license.
[19]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) A nonresident may use fuel in a motor vehicle not registered in Oregon for a period  not
exceeding 30 consecutive days without  obtaining a user’s license or the emblem issued under ORS
319.600, if, for all fuel used in a motor vehicle in this state, the nonresident pays to a seller, at  the
time of the sale, the tax provided in ORS 319.530.
(3) A user’s license is not required for a person who uses fuel in a motor vehicle if, for all  fuel
used in a motor vehicle in this state, the person pays to a seller, at the time of the  sale, the tax
provided in ORS 319.530.
(4) A user’s license is not required for a person who is subject to the weight-mile  tax described
in ORS 825.474 and 825.476 or the flat fee rate described in ORS 825.480.
(5)(a) A user’s  license is not required for a person who uses fuel as described in ORS 319.520
[(7)] (9) in the vehicles specified in this subsection if the person pays to a seller, at the time of the
sale, the tax provided in ORS 319.530.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection applies to the following vehicles:
(A) Motor homes as defined in ORS 801.350.
(B) Recreational vehicles as defined in ORS 174.101.
(6) A user’s license is not required for a person who uses fuel in a motor vehicle:
(a) Metered use by which is subject to the per-mile road usage charge imposed  under ORS
319.885; and
(b) That also uses fuels subject to ORS 319.510 to 319.880.
(7) A  user’s license is not required for a person who uses fuel in a motor vehicle on which an
emblem issued for the motor vehicle pursuant to ORS 319.535 is displayed.
SECTION 22.
Sections 23 and 24 of this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
319.510 to 319.880.
SECTION 23. Dyed diesel use. (1) A person may operate or maintain a motor vehicle on
the highways of this state with  dyed diesel in the fuel supply tank only if the use is author-
ized by an agency of the United  States or the person is eligible for a refund under ORS
267.570 (2) or 319.831.
(2) A person that owns, operates or maintains a fuel  storage tank or terminal storage
facility:
(a) Shall provide markings consistent with those directed by federal law; and
(b) May not knowingly store, or cause to be stored, dyed diesel in a fuel storage  tank or
terminal storage facility if the purpose of the tank or facility is to store undyed diesel.
(3) A person that violates this section is subject to a civil  penalty under section 24 of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 24.
Civil penalties. (1) In addition to any other penalty provided  by law, the
Department of Transportation may impose a  civil penalty for failure to comply with section
23 of this 2025 Act.
(2) Any civil penalty imposed under this section shall  be imposed in the manner provided
by ORS 183.745.
(3) The department shall adopt  rules implementing these provisions, including a schedule
of civil penalties.
(4) The civil penalty for each violation of section 23  of this 2025 Act may not exceed the
amount of $10 per gallon of capacity of the supply tank  of the motor vehicle, or $1,000,
whichever is  greater, plus the amount of tax that would have been paid for an equivalent
amount of motor vehicle fuel.
[20]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) A civil penalty imposed under this section may be remitted  or reduced upon such
terms and conditions as the department  considers proper and consistent with the public
health and safety.
(6)(a) In  imposing a penalty pursuant to the schedule adopted pursuant to this section,
the department shall consider the following factors:
(A) Any prior violations of section 23 of this 2025 Act.
(B) The extent to which the  violation threatens the public health or safety and the
immediacy of the threat.
(b) The penalty  imposed under this section may be remitted or mitigated upon such
terms and conditions as the department determines to be proper and consistent with  the
public benefit.
(7) All penalties recovered under this section shall be paid into the State Treasury and
credited to the State Highway Fund.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 319.700 is amended to read:
319.700. The tax and the penalty  imposed upon a user of fuel in a motor vehicle by ORS 319.510
to 319.880  or penalties associated with the improper use or storage of dyed diesel  shall con-
stitute a lien upon, and shall have the effect of an execution duly levied against, any  motor vehicle
in connection  with which the taxable use is made, attaching at the time of such use. The lien shall
not be removed until the tax has been paid or the motor vehicle subject to the  lien has been sold
in payment of such tax. The lien is paramount to all private liens or encumbrances of whatever
character upon the motor vehicle and to the rights  of any conditional vendor or any other holder
of the legal title in or to the motor vehicle.
SECTION 26.  ORS 823.012 is amended to read:
823.012. (1) If the Director of Transportation determines that an emergency, as defined  in ORS
401.025, has occurred or is imminent, the director may suspend operation of one or more of the  fol-
lowing statutes involving  motor carriers for the purpose of expediting the movement of persons or
property:
(a) ORS 818.400, compliance with commercial vehicle enforcement  requirements related to com-
mercial vehicle weight, size, load, conformation or equipment.
(b) ORS 825.100, certificate or permit  requirement for commercial transportation of persons or
property.
(c) ORS  825.104, registration requirement for for-hire or private carrier engaged in interstate
operations.
(d) ORS 825.160,  requirement for person operating as motor carrier to have policy of public li-
ability and property damage insurance.
(e) ORS 825.162, requirement for person operating as for-hire carrier of freight or  express to
have cargo insurance.
(f) ORS 825.250, requirement to stop and submit to an inspection of the  driver, the cargo or the
vehicle  or  combination of vehicles or an inspection of the fuel supply tank of the vehicle or
combination of vehicles.
(g) ORS 825.252, safety regulations for for-hire and private carriers.
(h) ORS 825.258, rules for transportation of hazardous waste, hazardous material and PCB.
(i) ORS 825.450, [ weight identifiers ] tax enrollments  issued by Department of Transportation.
(j) ORS 825.470, temporary pass for single trip or short-time operation of vehicle.
(k) ORS 825.474, assessment of tax for use of highways.
[21]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(L) ORS 826.031, registration of certain vehicles not already registered with state.
(m) Section 23 of this 2025 Act and ORS 319.020 and 319.530 related to the payment  of
motor vehicle fuel taxes or the use of dyed diesel on the highways.
(2) A suspension under this section  may occur prior to a declaration of a state of emergency
under ORS 401.165, but may not exceed 72 hours unless a state of emergency is declared under  ORS
401.165. If a state of emergency is declared under  ORS 401.165, the suspension shall last until the
state of emergency is terminated as provided under ORS 401.204.
(3) The director may designate by rule a  line of succession of deputy directors or other em-
ployees of the department who may suspend operations of  statutes under this section in the event
the director is not available.  Any suspension by a person designated by the director under this
subsection has the  same force and effect as if issued by the director, except that, if the director can
be reached, the  suspension must be affirmed by the director when the director is reached. If the
director does not set aside  a suspension within 24 hours of being reached, the suspension shall be
considered affirmed by the director.
SECTION 27.
 ORS 823.023 is amended to read:
823.023. (1) The Department of Transportation  or authorized representatives may enter upon any
premises, or any equipment, rolling stock , motor vehicles  or facilities , operated or occupied  by any
motor carrier or railroad for the purpose  of making any inspection, examination or test reasonably
required in the administration of ORS chapters 319, 823, 824, 825 and  826, and to set up and use on
such premises, equipment, rolling stock , motor vehicles  or facilities any apparatus or appliance and
occupy reasonable space therefor.
(2) The department or authorized representatives shall,  upon demand, have the right to inspect
the motor vehicles,  books, accounts, papers, records and memoranda of any  motor carrier or rail-
road and to examine under oath any officer, agent or employee of such  motor carrier or railroad in
relation to its business and affairs.
(3) Any person who on behalf of the  department makes demand of a motor carrier or railroad
for an  examination, inspection or test shall, upon request therefor, produce a certificate under the
seal of the department showing authority to make such examination, inspection or test.
(4) The department or authorized representatives  shall, upon demand, have the right to enter
any premises of a business that the department  has reasonable cause to believe tendered for ship-
ment, by motor or rail, any hazardous material and to  make any examination, inspection or test
reasonably required to  determine compliance with the health and safety regulations administered
or enforced by the department. Any person, who on behalf of the department demands  to make an
examination, inspection or  test, shall produce upon request a certificate under the seal of the de-
partment showing authority to make the examination, inspection or test.
(5) Nothing in this section authorizes the department to use any  information developed there-
under for any purpose inconsistent  with any statute governing motor carriers or railroads and ad-
ministered by the department or to make a disclosure thereof for other than regulatory purposes.
SECTION 28.  ORS 823.027 is amended to read:
823.027. (1) Every motor carrier and railroad shall furnish to the Department of  Transportation
all information required by  the department to carry into effect the provisions of ORS chapters  319,
823, 824, 825 and 826 and shall make specific answers to  all questions submitted by the department.
(2) If a motor carrier  or railroad is unable to furnish any information required under subsection
(1) of this section for any  reason beyond its control, it is a good and sufficient reason for such
failure. The answer or information shall be  verified under oath and returned to the department at
[22]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the department’s office within the period fixed by the department.
SECTION 29.
 ORS 823.085 is amended to read:
823.085. (1) Any motor  carrier or railroad that does, or causes or permits to be done, any matter,
act or thing prohibited by ORS chapters 319, 823, 824, 825 and 826, or omits to do any act, matter
or thing required to  be done by ORS chapters 319, 823, 824, 825 and 826, is liable to the person in-
jured thereby in the amount of damages sustained in consequence of such  violation. If the party
seeking damages alleges and proves that the wrong or omission was the result of  gross negligence
or willful misconduct, the motor carrier or railroad is liable to the person injured thereby  in treble
the amount of damages sustained in consequence of the violation. The  court may award reasonable
attorney fees to the prevailing party in an action under this section.
(2) Any recovery under this section does not  affect recovery by the state of the penalty, forfei-
ture or fine prescribed for such violation.
(3) This section does not apply with respect to the liability of any motor carrier or  railroad for
personal injury or property damage.
SECTION 30.  ORS 825.005 is amended to read:
825.005. As used in this chapter:
(1) “Carrier” or “motor carrier” means for-hire carrier or private carrier.
(2) “Cartage carrier” means any person who undertakes to transport any class  of property by
motor vehicle  for compensation when the transportation is performed wholly within an incorporated
city or a commercial zone adjacent to an incorporated city.
(3) “Certificate” means an authority issued to a for-hire carrier under ORS 825.110.
(4) “Combined weight” means the [ weight of the motor vehicle plus  the weight of the maximum
load which the applicant  has declared such vehicle will carry ] total empty weight of all vehicles
in a combination plus  the total weight of the load carried on that combination of vehicles
as listed in the vehicle registration for the time period shown on the registration document .
Any declared combined weight is subject to audit and approval by the Department of Transporta-
tion.
(5) “Department” means the Department of Transportation.
(6) “Electric vehicle” means a motor  vehicle that uses electricity as its only source of
motive power.
[(6)] (7) “Extreme  miles” or “extreme mileage” means the total miles operated by a vehicle over
the public highways, except  the extra miles necessarily operated in traversing detours or temporary
routes on account of road blockades in the state.
[(7)] (8) “For-hire carrier” means:
(a) Any person who transports persons or property for hire or who  publicly purports to be
willing to transport persons or property for hire by motor vehicle; or
(b) Any person who leases, rents or otherwise provides a motor vehicle to the  public and who
in connection therewith in the regular course of business provides,  procures or arranges for, di-
rectly, indirectly or by course of dealing, a driver or operator therefor.
[(8)] (9) “Household  goods” means the personal effects or other property used or to be used in
a dwelling but does not include property transported from a store or factory or property exclusively
for office use.
[(9)] (10) “Motor vehicle” means any self-propelled vehicle and any such vehicle in  combination
with any  trailing units, used or physically capable of being used upon any public highway in this
state in the transportation of persons or property, except vehicles operating wholly on fixed  rails
[23]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or tracks and electric  trolley buses. “Motor vehicle” includes overdimension vehicles or vehicles
permitted excessive weights pursuant to a special authorization issued by a  city, county or the De-
partment of Transportation.
[(10)] (11) “Permit” means an authority issued to a carrier under ORS 825.102, 825.104, 825.106,
825.108 or 825.127.
[(11)] (12)  “Private carrier” means any person  who operates a motor vehicle over the public
highways of this state for the purpose  of transporting persons or property when the transportation
is incidental to a primary business enterprise, other  than transportation, in which such person is
engaged.
[(12)] (13) “Privilege taxes” means the weight-mile tax and fees prescribed in this chapter.
[(13)] (14) “Property” includes, but is not  limited to, permanent loads such as equipment, appli-
ances, devices, or ballast that are attached to, carried on, or made a  part of the vehicle and that
are designed to serve some functional purpose.
[(14)] (15) “Public highway”  means every street, alley, road, highway and thoroughfare in this
state used by the public or dedicated or appropriated to public use.
[(15)] (16) “Transit-type motor vehicle” means any passenger-carrying  vehicle that does not have
a separate space for transporting baggage or express.
[(16)] (17) “Transporter” has the meaning given that term in ORS 466.005.
SECTION 31.
Section 32 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 825.
SECTION 32. (1) Before operating a motor vehicle on  the public highways of this state,
an out-of-state motor  carrier not licensed under an international fuel tax agreement shall
obtain a  valid fuel trip permit from the Department of Transportation in accordance with
this section.  A motor carrier shall obtain a fuel trip permit under this section if the motor
carrier:
(a) Is operating a motor vehicle with a combined weight of  more than 26,000 pounds or
a motor  vehicle with three or more axles, regardless of weight, on the public highways of this
state; and
(b) The vehicle is not registered under ORS 826.009 or 826.031.
(2) This section does not apply to  a motor carrier who has a valid international fuel tax
agreement license issued by a jurisdiction other than Oregon.
(3) The Department of Transportation shall develop a standardized application form  for
a fuel trip permit issued under this section.
(4) The department may not issue more than three fuel  trip permits in a calendar year
for any one motor vehicle.
(5) No report of mileage is required for  the motor vehicle to which the fuel trip permit
relates.
(6) A fuel trip permit issued under this section is valid:
(a) For three consecutive days beginning and ending on the dates  specified on the face
of the fuel trip permit; and
(b) Only for the motor vehicle for which the fuel trip permit was issued.
(7) The fee for the fuel trip permit shall be determined by the department by rule.
(8) The department may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 33.
 ORS 825.326 is amended to read:
825.326. (1) Except as provided in subsection  (2) of this section, all fees, taxes, charges and other
sums collected by the Department of Transportation or from International Fuel Tax Agreement
[24]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
member jurisdictions under this chapter shall be paid into the State Treasury  and shall be placed
to the credit of an  account, separate and distinct from the General Fund, to be known as the Motor
Carrier Account. Interest earned by the account shall be credited to the account.
(2) Notwithstanding  ORS 823.991, all fees collected under ORS 825.247 and all penalties collected
under ORS 825.950 for offering to transport or transporting household goods without  a certificate
shall be paid into the State Treasury and shall  be placed to the credit of an account, separate and
distinct from the General Fund,  to be known as the Consumer Protection Household Moves Account.
Interest earned by the account  shall be credited to the account. Moneys in the account are con-
tinuously appropriated to the department for purposes specified in subsection (5) of this section.
(3) The department may purchase the necessary supplies and equipment and provide for  all
necessary  and  incidental expenses incurred by the department in administering and enforcing this
chapter.
(4) All claims, duly approved by  the department, that have been incurred in pursuance of law,
shall be paid by  warrants drawn in the manner provided by law, payable out of the Motor Carrier
Account or the Consumer Protection Household Moves Account.
(5) Moneys in the Consumer Protection  Household Moves Account shall be used by the depart-
ment exclusively for administration and  enforcement of provisions of this chapter relating to persons
that offer to provide or provide transportation of household goods without a certificate.
SECTION 34.
 ORS 825.104 is amended to read:
825.104. An interstate for-hire carrier or private carrier required  to obtain a United States De-
partment of Transportation registration number engaged or to engage in interstate  operations may
not perform transportation services on the public highways of this state without having first :
(1) Complied with federal registration and financial responsibility requirements ; and
(2) Obtained a certificate under ORS 825.100 or a temporary pass under ORS 825.470 .
SECTION 35.  ORS 825.141, as amended by section 72 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
825.141. In addition to any other requirements of this chapter, a carrier whose operating  au-
thority  or permit  has been suspended shall pay a reinstatement fee of  $25 to the Department of
Transportation before the operating  authority may be reinstated and shall demonstrate operational
activity at the time of reinstatement.
SECTION 36.  ORS 825.450 is amended to read:
825.450. (1) [ Upon application by  a carrier, ] The Department of Transportation may [ issue a
weight identifier ] utilize a motor carrier’s registration card  as the tax enrollment document
for each eligible vehicle the carrier enrolls with the department[ , which ]. The tax enrollment
document must state the combined weight of the vehicle or combination of vehicles. [ The depart-
ment shall  record each weight identifier electronically. ] This subsection does not apply to vehicles is-
sued a temporary pass under ORS 825.470.
(2) A person may not load any motor vehicle in excess of  the combined weight stated on the
[weight identifier issued ] tax enrollment document  for that  motor vehicle under subsection (1) of
this section.
(3) [ Weight identifiers issued ] Tax enrollments  under this section are valid [ from the first day
of any calendar quarter to the last day of the fourth consecutive  calendar quarter. Each carrier may
select the calendar quarter in which the period will begin  except that, if necessary for administrative
convenience, the department may require a carrier to adopt a starting date chosen by  the department ]
based on the dates shown on the  motor vehicle’s registration card, as issued by the juris-
diction in which the vehicle is registered .
[25]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(4) All vehicles operating under the carrier’s authority shall have the same four-quarter period of
weight identifier  validity. The department may allow a carrier to operate with expired weight identifiers
for up to one extra  quarter if the renewal application has been submitted. The extension of time allowed
by this subsection shall be granted only if the department determines that the extension is necessary
for the administrative convenience of the department. ]
[(5)] (4) The department may adopt rules necessary to administer the provisions of this section.
SECTION 37.
 ORS 825.492 is amended to read:
825.492. [(1) Whenever in the judgment of the Department of Transportation the estimated  annual
tax payable by a carrier will be  less than $100, and the vehicles operated by the carrier are of less than
30,000 pounds combined  weight, the department may authorize the carrier to file reports annually in
lieu of monthly reports required by ORS 825.490 and 825.515. Annual reports and  accompanying re-
mittances shall be filed on or before the due date of February 28 for the preceding calendar year. ]
[(2)] (1) At the request of a  motor carrier, the Department  of Transportation may authorize the
carrier to file quarterly reports in lieu of monthly  reports required by ORS 825.490 and 825.515.
Quarterly reports and accompanying remittances due  shall be filed on or before the due date as
follows: First calendar quarter, May 31; second quarter, August 31; third  quarter, November 30;
fourth quarter, February 28.
[(3)] (2)  Such  authorizations may be withdrawn at any time upon the mailing of notice to the
carrier at the last address of  record of the carrier with the department. Any provisions of ORS
825.490 and 825.515 otherwise applicable to reports and remittances shall be applicable to reports
and remittances under this section.
SECTION 38.
 ORS 319.665 is amended to read:
319.665. (1) The seller of fuel for use in a motor vehicle shall collect the tax provided by  ORS
319.530 at the time the fuel is sold, unless one of the following situations applies:
(a) The Department of Transportation has  issued for the vehicle into which the seller delivers
or places the fuel a [ weight identifier ] tax enrollment document  under ORS 825.450 or a valid
user’s emblem under ORS 319.600.
(b) The  fuel is dispensed at a nonretail facility, in which case the seller shall collect any tax
owed at the same time the seller collects the purchase price from the person to whom the fuel was
dispensed at the nonretail facility. A seller is not required to collect the tax under this paragraph
from a person who  certifies to the seller that the use of the fuel is exempt from the tax imposed
under ORS 319.530.
(c) A cardlock card is used  for purchase of the fuel at an attended portion of a retail facility
equipped with a cardlock card  reader, in which case the cardlock card issuer licensed in this state
is responsible for collecting and remitting the tax unless the  person making the purchase certifies
to the seller that the use of the fuel is exempt from the tax imposed under ORS 319.530.
(2) If a cardlock card is used for purchase  of fuel at an attended portion of a retail facility
equipped with a cardlock card reader, the seller at the retail  facility may deduct fuel purchases
made with a cardlock card from  the seller’s retail transactions if the seller provides the department
with the following information:
(a) A monthly statement from a cardlock card issuer that details the cardlock  card purchases
at the retail facility; and
(b) A listing of cardlock card  issuers and gallons of fuel purchased at the retail facility by the
issuers’ customers.
(3) The department shall supply each seller of fuel for use in  a motor vehicle with a chart which
[26]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sets forth the tax imposed on given quantities of fuel.
SECTION 39.
 ORS 825.250 is amended to read:
825.250. (1) An authorized representative of the  Department of Transportation may require a
person driving a vehicle or combination of vehicles subject  to regulation by the department on a
street or highway to stop and submit to an inspection of the driver, the cargo or the vehicle or
combination of vehicles at any location where representatives of the  department are conducting
tests and inspections when signs are displayed requiring such stop.
(2) An authorized representative of the department may require a person driving a vehi-
cle or combination of vehicles subject to regulation by the department on a street or highway
to stop and submit to an inspection of the  fuel supply tank of the vehicle or combination of
vehicles at any location where representatives of the department  are conducting tests and
inspections when signs are displayed requiring such stop.
[(2)] (3)  As used in this  section, “authorized representative” means a city, county or state em-
ployee who has been trained and certified by the  department as a commercial vehicle inspector and
who is employed either by the department or by an agency that has  an agreement with the depart-
ment to provide inspections of commercial vehicles, drivers, general cargo or hazardous materials.
SECTION 40.
 ORS 825.990 is amended to read:
825.990. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection  (2)  or (5)  of this section, every person
who violates or  procures, aids or abets violation of this chapter and any person who refuses or fails
to obey any order, decision or  rule, made under or pursuant to this chapter commits a Class A
traffic violation.
(2) Knowingly  violating an out-of-service notice issued under authority of the Department of
Transportation is a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) A person is subject to the penalties under  subsection (4) of this section if the person know-
ingly:
(a) Transports any hazardous waste listed under ORS 466.005 or rules adopted  thereunder to a
facility that does not have appropriate authority to receive the waste  under ORS 466.005 to 466.385
and 466.992.
(b) Disposes of any  hazardous waste listed under ORS 466.005 or rules adopted thereunder
without appropriate authority under ORS 466.005 to 466.385 and 466.992.
(c) Materially violates terms of any permit or authority issued to the  person under this chapter
or ORS 466.005 to 466.385 and 466.992 in the transporting or disposing of hazardous waste.
(d) Makes any false material statement or representation in any application, label, manifest, re-
cord, report, permit or other document filed, maintained or used for purposes  of compliance with
requirements under this chapter for the safe transportation of hazardous wastes.
(e) Fails to include material information required under rules of  the Department of Transporta-
tion in  any application for any permit or authority to transport hazardous waste under this chapter.
(f) Violates any rules  adopted by the Department of Transportation concerning the transporta-
tion of hazardous wastes.
(4) Subject to ORS 153.022, violation of subsection (3) of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.
(5) Violating ORS 825.250 (2) is a Class B misdemeanor.
SECTION 41.
 ORS 818.400 is amended to read:
818.400. (1) A person commits the offense of failure to comply with  commercial vehicle enforce-
ment requirements if the person is driving a vehicle  or combination of vehicles and the person does
not comply with any of the following or if the  person is the owner of a vehicle or combination of
[27]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vehicles and the person causes or permits the  vehicle or combination not to comply with any of the
following:
(a) A vehicle or combination of vehicles must stop and submit  to any enforcement of commercial
vehicle weight, size,  load, conformation or equipment regulation when directed to do so by an
“OPEN” sign displayed at a permanently established truck scale.
(b) A vehicle or combination of vehicles must stop and submit  to any enforcement of commercial
vehicle weight, size, load, dyed diesel use,  conformation  or equipment regulation when directed to
do so by any sign or signal displayed or given by  a police officer, motor carrier enforcement officer
or weighmaster acting in accordance with authority granted under ORS 810.490.
(c) A vehicle or combination of vehicles must move into the right lane for  purposes of a weight
or size check when instructed to do so by a  sign indicating the presence of a weigh-in-motion scale.
(d) The directions of any police officer, motor  carrier enforcement officer or weighmaster that
are given in accordance with authority granted under ORS 810.490 or 810.530 must be complied with.
(2) The requirement of subsection (1)(a) of this section does not apply to:
(a) An empty combination of a log  truck and pole trailer if the pole trailer is bunked on the log
truck and there is no other load; or
(b) A vehicle or combination of vehicles if:
(A) The normal route of the  vehicle or combination of vehicles requires turning off the highway
after passing the “OPEN” sign but before reaching the scale; and
(B) The vehicle or combination of vehicles is  en route to a terminal or other legitimate business.
(3) Operation of any vehicle or combination of vehicles in violation of this section  is prima facie
evidence that the owner of such vehicle or combination  caused or permitted it to be so operated and
the owner shall be liable for any penalties imposed under this section.
(4) The offense described in this  section, failure to comply with commercial vehicle enforcement
requirements, is a Class  B misdemeanor. The penalty provided under this subsection is in addition
to any penalty provided for violation of any  prohibition relating to vehicle weight, size, load, con-
formation or equipment.
SECTION 42.
ORS 825.486 is repealed.
SECTION 43. Sections 17 to 19, 23, 24 and 32 of  this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS
295.103, 319.010, 319.390, 319.520, 319.550,  319.665, 319.700, 810.530, 818.400, 823.012, 823.023,
823.027, 823.085, 825.005, 825.104, 825.141, 825.250, 825.326, 825.450, 825.492,  825.555 and 825.990
by sections 11 to 15, 20, 21, 25  to 30 and 33 to 41 of this 2025 Act and the repeal of ORS 825.486
by section 42 of this 2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2028.
HIGHWAY COST ALLOCATION STUDY
SECTION 44.  ORS 366.506 is amended to read:
366.506. (1) Once every two years, the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services shall
conduct a highway cost allocation study. The purpose of the study is to determine:
(a) The proportionate share that the users of each class of vehicle should  pay for the costs of
maintenance, operation and improvement of the highways, roads and streets in the state; and
(b) Whether the users of each class are paying that share.
(2) Each study must include:
(a) An examination of the most recent study period for  which actual data are available for the
purpose of determining the accuracy of the most recently published study results; and
[28]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) An examination of the prospective study period based on  projected data for the purpose de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section  and that incorporates the results of  the examination
described in paragraph (a) of this subsection .
(3) The department may use any study design the department determines will best accomplish
the purposes stated in  subsection (1) of this section. In designing the study, the department may
make decisions that include, but are not limited to, the methodology to be used for the study,  what
constitutes a class of vehicle for purposes of  collection of data under subsections (1) to (5) of this
section and the nature and scope of costs that will be included in the study.
(4) The  department may appoint a study review team to participate in the study required by
subsection (1) of this  section. The team may perform any functions assigned by the department, in-
cluding, but not limited to, consulting on the design of the study.
(5) A report on  the results of the study shall be submitted to the legislative revenue committees
and the Joint Committee on Transportation by January 31 of each odd-numbered year.
(6) The Legislative Assembly  shall use the report described in subsection (5) of this section to
determine whether adjustments to revenue sources described in Article  IX, section 3a (3), of the
Oregon Constitution, are needed in order to carry  out the purposes of Article IX, section 3a (3), of
the Oregon Constitution. If such adjustments are needed,  the Legislative Assembly shall enact
whatever measures are necessary to make the adjustments.
(7)(a) No later than September 30th of each odd-numbered  year, notwithstanding the
weight-mile tax rates described under ORS 825.476, the department shall, by rule,  decrease
the rates effective January 1 of the next even-numbered year in an amount  to achieve equity
between light and heavy vehicle classes, if:
(A) The most current highway cost allocation report indicates that the  equity ratio for
the heavy vehicle class is greater than 1-5/100; and
(B) The Legislative Assembly has  not enacted whatever measures are necessary to make
the adjustments needed to carry out the purposes of Article IX, section 3a (3), of the  Oregon
Constitution, within 120 days of the Joint Committee on Transportation receiving the  report
under subsection (5) of this section.
(b) No later than September 30th  of each odd-numbered year, notwithstanding the fuel
tax rates computed under ORS 319.020 (4) and 319.530 (1), the department  shall, by rule, de-
crease the rates effective January 1, of the next even-numbered year in an amount to
achieve equity between light and heavy vehicle classes, if:
(A) The highway cost allocation  report indicates that the equity ratio for the light vehicle
class is greater than 1-5/100; and
(B) The Legislative Assembly has  not enacted whatever measures are necessary to make
the adjustments needed to carry out the purposes of Article IX, section 3a (3), of the  Oregon
Constitution, within 120 days of the Joint Committee on Transportation receiving the  report
under subsection (5) of this section.
(8) The department shall repeal an administrative rule decreasing tax rates adopted
pursuant to subsection (7) of this section if the department  determines that, after the rule
was adopted, the Legislative Assembly adjusted revenue sources described in Article  IX,
section 3a (3), of the Oregon Constitution, to carry out the purposes of Article IX, section
3a (3), of the Oregon Constitution.
MOTOR VEHICLE FUEL TAX INCREASES
[29]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 45.
 ORS 319.020 is amended to read:
319.020. (1) [ Subject to  subsections (2) to (4) of this section, in addition to the taxes otherwise
provided for by law, ] This  section applies to  every dealer engaging in the dealer’s own name, or
in the name of others, in the first sale, use or distribution of motor vehicle fuel  or aircraft fuel or
withdrawal of motor vehicle fuel or aircraft fuel for sale,  use or distribution within areas in this
state within which the state  lacks the power to tax the sale, use or distribution of motor vehicle fuel
or aircraft fuel .[, shall: ]
[(a)] (2) Subject to subsections (6) to (8) of this section, in addition to the taxes otherwise
provided for by law,  not later than the 25th  day of each calendar month, every dealer described
in subsection (1) of this section shall  render a statement to the Department of Transportation  of
all motor vehicle fuel or aircraft fuel sold, used, distributed or so withdrawn  by the dealer in the
State of Oregon as well as  all such fuel sold, used or distributed in this state by a purchaser
[thereof] of the fuel  upon which sale, use or distribution  the dealer has assumed liability for the
applicable license tax during the preceding calendar month. The dealer  shall render the statement
to the department in the manner provided by the department by rule.
[(b)] (3) Subject to subsections (6) to (8) of this section, in addition to the taxes otherwise
provided for by law, and except as provided in ORS 319.270, every dealer described in subsection
(1) of this section shall  pay a license tax  [computed on the basis of 34 cents per gallon ] on the first
sale, use or distribution of such motor vehicle  fuel or aircraft fuel so sold, used, distributed or
withdrawn as shown by such statement in the manner and within the time provided in  ORS 319.010
to 319.430[.] computed in accordance with subsection (4) of this section.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section,  the license tax rate shall be computed
as follows:
(a) For calendar years 2026 and 2027, 50 cents per gallon.
(b) For calendar year 2028, 55 cents per gallon.
(c) For  calendar years 2029 and later, a per-gallon license tax rate set by the Oregon
Transportation Commission by:
(A) Dividing the monthly averaged Consumer Price Index  for All Urban Consumers, West
Region, for the 12 consecutive months  ending June 30 of the prior year by the monthly av-
eraged Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West  Region, for the 12 consecutive
months ending June 30, 2027;
(B) Multiplying 55 cents by the quotient determined  under subparagraph (A) of this par-
agraph; and
(C) Rounding the product determined under subparagraph (B) of this paragraph to  the
next lower one-tenth  of one cent that is not less than 100 percent or greater than 103 percent
of the rate set for the prior calendar year.
(5)(a) The commission shall determine license tax rates  as soon as practicable after
September 30 of each year and notify the department of the rate.
(b) The adjusted rate shall become operative on January 1 of the  succeeding calendar
year.
(c) Before January 1 of each year, the department shall notify dealers  of the adjusted
rate.
[(2)] (6) When aircraft  fuel is sold, used or distributed by a dealer, the license tax shall be
computed on the  basis of 11 cents per gallon of fuel so sold, used or distributed, except that when
aircraft fuel usable in aircraft operated by turbine engines (turbo-prop or jet) is sold,  used or dis-
[30]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tributed, the tax rate shall be three cents per gallon.
[(3)] (7) In lieu of claiming refund of the tax paid on  motor vehicle fuel consumed by such dealer
in nonhighway use as provided in ORS 319.280,  319.290 and 319.320, or of any prior erroneous pay-
ment of license tax made to the state  by such dealer, the dealer may show such motor vehicle fuel
as a credit or deduction on the monthly statement and payment of tax.
[(4)] (8) The license tax computed on the basis  of the sale, use, distribution or withdrawal of
motor vehicle or aircraft fuel  may not be imposed wherever such tax is prohibited by the Constitu-
tion or laws of the United States with respect to such tax.
SECTION 46.
The amendments to ORS 319.020 by section 45 of  this 2025 Act become op-
erative on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 47.  ORS 319.020, as amended by section 45 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
319.020. (1) This section applies to every dealer engaging in the dealer’s own name, or  in the
name of others, in the first sale, use or distribution of motor vehicle  fuel or aircraft fuel or with-
drawal of motor vehicle fuel or aircraft fuel for sale, use or distribution within areas in  this state
within which the state lacks the power to tax  the sale, use or distribution of motor vehicle fuel or
aircraft fuel.
(2) Subject to subsections (6) to (8) of this section, in addition to the taxes  otherwise provided
for by law, not later than the 25th day of each calendar month, every dealer described  in subsection
(1) of this  section shall render a statement to the Department of Transportation of all motor vehicle
fuel or aircraft  fuel sold, used, distributed or so withdrawn by the dealer in the State of Oregon as
well as all such  fuel sold, used or distributed in this state by a purchaser of the fuel upon which
sale, use or distribution  the dealer has assumed liability for the applicable license tax during the
preceding calendar month. The dealer shall render the statement to the department in  the manner
provided by the department by rule.
(3) Subject to  subsections (6) to (8) of this section, in addition to the taxes otherwise provided
for by law,  and except as provided in ORS 319.270, every dealer described in subsection (1) of this
section shall pay a license  tax on the first sale, use or distribution of such motor vehicle fuel or
aircraft fuel so sold, used, distributed or withdrawn as shown by such statement in the  manner and
within the time provided in ORS 319.010 to 319.430 computed  in accordance with subsection (4) of
this section.
(4) For purposes  of subsection (3) of this section, the Oregon Transportation Commission
shall compute the per-gallon license tax rate [ shall be computed as follows ] by:
[(a) For calendar years 2026 and 2027, 50 cents per gallon. ]
[(b) For calendar year 2028, 55 cents per gallon. ]
[(c) For calendar years 2029 and later, a per-gallon license tax  rate set by the Oregon Transpor-
tation Commission by: ]
[(A)] (a) Dividing the monthly averaged Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West
Region, for the 12 consecutive months ending June 30 of the prior  year by the monthly averaged
Consumer Price  Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region, for the 12 consecutive months ending
June 30, 2027;
[(B)] (b) Multiplying 55 cents by the quotient determined under [ subparagraph (A) of this ] par-
agraph (a) of this subsection ; and
[(C)] (c) Rounding the product determined under  [subparagraph (B) of this ] paragraph (b) of this
subsection to the next lower one-tenth of one cent that is not less than 100  percent or greater than
103 percent of the rate set for the prior calendar year.
[31]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5)(a) The commission shall determine license tax rates as soon as practicable  after September
30 of each year and notify the department of the rate.
(b) The adjusted rate shall become operative on January 1 of the succeeding calendar year.
(c) Before January 1 of each year, the department shall notify dealers of the adjusted rate.
(6) When aircraft fuel is sold, used or distributed by a  dealer, the license tax shall be computed
on the basis of 11 cents per gallon of fuel so sold, used or distributed, except  that when aircraft fuel
usable in  aircraft operated by turbine engines (turbo-prop or jet) is sold, used or distributed, the tax
rate shall be three cents per gallon.
(7) In lieu of claiming refund of the  tax paid on motor vehicle fuel consumed by such dealer in
nonhighway use as  provided in ORS 319.280, 319.290 and 319.320, or of any prior erroneous payment
of license tax  made to the state by such dealer, the dealer may show such motor vehicle fuel as a
credit or deduction on the monthly statement and payment of tax.
(8) The license tax computed on the basis of the sale, use, distribution or withdrawal of  motor
vehicle or aircraft fuel may not be imposed  wherever such tax is prohibited by the Constitution or
laws of the United States with respect to such tax.
SECTION 48.
The amendments to ORS 319.020 by section 47 of  this 2025 Act become op-
erative on January 1, 2030.
SECTION 49.  ORS 319.530 is amended to read:
319.530. (1) To compensate this state partially for the use of its  highways, an excise tax [ hereby
is imposed at the rate  of 34 cents per gallon ] is imposed on the use of fuel in a motor vehicle at the
rate per gallon computed under ORS 319.020 (4) .
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (3) to (6) of this section, 100 cubic feet  of fuel
used or sold in a gaseous state, measured at  14.73 pounds per square inch of pressure at 60 degrees
Fahrenheit, is taxable at the same rate as a gallon of liquid fuel.
(3) 123.57 cubic feet, or 5.66 pounds, of compressed natural gas  used or sold in a gaseous state
is taxable at the same rate as one gasoline gallon.
(4) 1.353 gallons, or 5.75 pounds, of liquefied petroleum gas is taxable at  the same rate as one
gasoline gallon.
(5) 1.71 gallons, or 6.059 pounds, of liquefied natural gas is taxable at the same rate as one diesel
gallon.
(6) One kilogram of hydrogen is taxable at the same rate as one gasoline gallon.
SECTION 50.
 ORS 319.023, as amended by section 1, chapter 82, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
319.023. (1) The following amounts shall be distributed in the manner  prescribed in this section:
(a) Any amount  of tax on aircraft fuel usable in aircraft operated by turbine engines that is
computed on a basis in  excess of one cent per gallon and any amount of tax on all other aircraft fuel
that is computed on a basis in excess of nine cents per gallon, under ORS 319.020 [ (2)] (6); and
(b) Any amount of tax  on aircraft fuel usable in aircraft operated by turbine engines in excess
of one cent per gallon and any amount of tax on all other aircraft fuel  in excess of nine cents per
gallon, that is deducted before the refunding of tax under ORS 319.330 (1).
(2)(a) Applications for distributions under subsection (5)  of this section may not be approved
unless the applicant demonstrates  a commitment to contribute at least five percent of the costs of
the project to which the application relates. The Oregon Department of Aviation shall  adopt rules
for purposes of this paragraph.
(b) The department may adopt rules that:
[32]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Set higher minimum contribution commitment requirements; or
(B) Establish maximum grant amounts.
(3)(a) The State Aviation Board shall establish a  review committee composed of one member
from each of the area commissions on transportation chartered by the Oregon Transportation  Com-
mission.
(b) The review committee shall meet as necessary to review applications for  distributions of
amounts pursuant to this section. In reviewing applications, the review committee shall consider:
(A) Whether a proposed project:
(i) Reduces transportation costs for Oregon businesses  or improves access to jobs and sources
of labor in this state;
(ii) Results in an economic benefit to this state;
(iii) Connects elements of Oregon’s aviation system in a  way that will measurably improve
utilization and efficiency of the system;
(iv) Is ready for construction or implementation; and
(v) Has a useful life expectancy that offers maximum benefit to this state; and
(B) How much of the cost of the proposed project can be  borne by the applicant from sources
other than Oregon Department of Aviation funds or the Connect Oregon Fund.
(c) The review committee shall recommend applications to the State  Aviation Board for ap-
proval.
(4)(a) Five percent of the amounts described in subsection (1) of this section  are appropriated
to the Oregon  Department of Aviation for the costs of the department and the State Aviation Board
in administering this section.
(b) The  remaining 95 percent of the amounts described in subsection (1) of this section shall be
distributed pursuant to subsections (5) and (6) of this section.
(5)(a) Seventy-five percent of  the amounts described in subsection (4)(b) of this section shall be
distributed for the following purposes:
(A) To assist airports in  Oregon with match requirements for Federal Aviation Administration
grants.
(B) To make grants for emergency preparedness and  infrastructure projects, in accordance with
the Oregon Resilience Plan or the Oregon Aviation Plan.
(C) To make grants for:
(i) Services critical or essential to aviation, including, but not  limited to, fuel, sewer, water and
weather equipment;
(ii) Aviation-related business development, including, but not limited to, hangars, parking for
business aircraft and related facilities; or
(iii) Airport development for local economic benefit, including, but not  limited to, signs and
marketing.
(D)(i) To assist commercial air service to rural Oregon.
(ii) The Oregon Department of Aviation may adopt a definition of “rural Oregon” for purposes
of this subparagraph.
(b) The  State Aviation Board may establish by rule priorities for the distributions made pursuant
to this subsection.
(6) Twenty-five percent of the amounts described in subsection (4)(b) of this section  shall be
distributed to state-owned airports for the purposes of:
(a) Safety improvements recommended by the  State Aviation Board and local community air-
[33]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ports.
(b) Infrastructure projects at public use airports.
(7)(a) Not later than September  15 of each year, the State Aviation Board shall submit the re-
ports described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, in the manner provided  in ORS 192.245, to the
interim committees, as applicable, of the Legislative Assembly related to air transportation.
(b) The  reports required under this subsection shall describe in detail the projects for which
applications have been submitted and approved, the airports affected, the names of  the applicants
and the persons who will perform the work proposed in the applications, the  progress of projects for
which applications have been approved and any other information the board considers necessary for
a comprehensive analysis of the implementation of this section.
SECTION 51.
 ORS 319.245 is amended to read:
319.245. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Indian tribe” means a federally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon.
(b) “Tribal entity” means an entity wholly owned by an Indian tribe.
(c) “Tribal member entity” means an entity wholly  owned and operated by an enrolled member
of an Indian tribe.
(2) The first sale,  use or distribution of motor vehicle fuel in this state is exempt from the li-
cense tax imposed under ORS 319.020 [ (1)(b)] (3) if:
(a) The motor vehicle fuel is purchased by an Indian tribe, tribal  entity or tribal member entity
directly or from a dealer that purchased  the motor vehicle fuel in a transaction that would other-
wise be subject to the tax; and
(b) The motor vehicle fuel is  delivered to a service station that is owned by an Indian tribe,
tribal entity or tribal member entity and operated on the respective  Indian tribe’s reservation or
trust land.
(3) In order to be eligible for the exemption under subsection (2) of this section, the Indian  tribe
must:
(a) Impose a tax on the distribution of the motor vehicle fuel at the same rate as  the license tax
imposed under ORS 319.020 [ (1)(b)] (4);
(b) Expend the  revenue from the tax imposed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection solely
for uses that are consistent with the requirements of Article IX, section  3a, of the Oregon Consti-
tution; and
(c) Certify annually to the Department  of Transportation that the Indian tribe is in compliance
with this subsection.
(4) A dealer described in subsection (2)(a) of this  section shall report to the department such
sales of motor vehicle fuel to Indian tribes, tribal entities and tribal member entities.
(5) The department  shall adopt rules prescribing the processes, forms and information that the
forms must include for the certification required under subsection (3)(c) of this section and  the re-
ports required under subsection (4) of this section.
SECTION 52.
 ORS 319.410 is amended to read:
319.410. (1) The Department of Transportation shall promptly turn over the license tax to the
State Treasurer to be disposed of as provided in ORS 802.110.
(2) The revenue from the license tax collected from the use, sale or distribution of  aircraft fuel
as imposed by ORS  319.020 [ (2)] (6) shall be transferred upon certification of the department to the
State Treasurer, who shall credit the  certified amount to the State Aviation Account for the purpose
of carrying out the provisions of the state aviation laws.
[34]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 53.
The amendments to ORS 319.023, 319.245, 319.410 and 319.530 by sections  49
to 52 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
TRANSIT
SECTION 54.  ORS 320.550 is amended to read:
320.550. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Employer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 316.162.
(b) “Resident of this state” has the meaning given that term in ORS 316.027.
(c) “Wages” has the meaning given that term in ORS 316.162.
(2)(a) A  tax is imposed [ at the rate of one-tenth of one percent of ] on the wages of an employee
who is:
[(a)] (A) A resident of this state, regardless of where services are performed.
[(b)] (B) Not a resident of this state, for services performed in this state.
(b) The tax shall be imposed at the following rates:
(A) For calendar years 2026 and 2027, 0.18 percent.
(B) For calendar years 2028 and 2029, 0.25 percent.
(C) For calendar years 2030 and later, 0.3 percent.
(3) Every employer at the time of the payment  of wages shall deduct and withhold from the total
amount of the wages paid for  services described under subsection (2) of this section an amount equal
to the total amount of wages multiplied by the rate of tax imposed under subsection (2) of  this sec-
tion.
(4) An employer shall  report and pay the tax imposed under this section to the Department of
Revenue at the time and in the manner determined by the department by rule.
(5) For purposes of the tax imposed under this section, an employer is considered a taxpayer.
(6) If a lender, surety or other person who  supplies funds to or for the account of an employer
for the purpose of  paying wages of the employees of such employer has actual notice or knowledge
that such employer does not intend to or will not be able to make timely payment  or deposit of the
tax required to be deducted and withheld, such lender, surety or other person shall be liable  to the
State of Oregon in a sum equal to the taxes, together with  interest, that are not timely paid over
to the Department  of Revenue. Such liability shall be limited to the principal amount supplied by
the lender, surety or other person, and any amounts so paid to the department shall be credited
against the liability of the employer.
(7)(a) An employer  shall submit an annual return pursuant to ORS 316.202 to the Department
of Revenue. The amounts deducted from the wages  during any calendar year in accordance with this
section shall be considered to be in  payment of the tax imposed under subsection (2) of this section.
(b) The return submitted  by the employer shall be accepted by the Department of Revenue as
evidence in favor of the employee of the amounts so deducted from the employee’s wages.
(8) Nothing in this section prohibits the Department of Revenue from  including the tax imposed
under this section in the combined quarterly tax report required under ORS 316.168.
(9) An employer that fails to deduct and withhold the tax required under this section:
(a) Is deemed responsible  for the payment of the tax obligation in an amount equal to the
amount required to be withheld from the employee’s wages and remitted  to the Department of Re-
venue; and
(b) Is subject to  a penalty of $250 per employee, up to a maximum penalty of $25,000, if the
[35]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
employer knowingly fails to deduct and withhold the tax.
(10) Residents subject to the tax imposed under this section on wages  earned outside this state
from an employer not doing  business within this state shall report and pay the tax in an amount
not to exceed  [one-tenth of one percent of ] the wages earned outside this state multiplied by the rate
set under subsection (2)(b) of this section , and at the time and in  the manner, as determined by
the Department of Revenue by rule.
SECTION 55.
The amendments to ORS 320.550 by section 54 of  this 2025 Act become op-
erative on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 55a.  ORS 320.550, as amended by section 54 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
320.550. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Employer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 316.162.
(b) “Resident of this state” has the meaning given that term in ORS 316.027.
(c) “Wages” has the meaning given that term in ORS 316.162.
(2)(a) A tax is imposed on the wages of an employee who is:
(A) A resident of this state, regardless of where services are performed.
(B) Not a resident of this state, for services performed in this state.
(b) The tax shall be imposed at the [ following rates: ]
[(A) For calendar years 2026 and 2027, 0.18 percent. ]
[(B) For calendar years 2028 and 2029, 0.25 percent. ]
[(C) For calendar years 2030 and later, ] rate of  0.3 percent.
(3) Every employer at the time of the payment  of wages shall deduct and withhold from the total
amount of the wages paid for  services described under subsection (2) of this section an amount equal
to the total amount of wages multiplied by the rate of tax imposed under subsection (2) of  this sec-
tion.
(4) An employer shall  report and pay the tax imposed under this section to the Department of
Revenue at the time and in the manner determined by the department by rule.
(5) For purposes of the tax imposed under this section, an employer is considered a taxpayer.
(6) If a lender, surety or other person who  supplies funds to or for the account of an employer
for the purpose of  paying wages of the employees of such employer has actual notice or knowledge
that such employer does not intend to or will not be able to make timely payment  or deposit of the
tax required to be deducted and withheld, such lender, surety or other person shall be liable  to the
State of Oregon in a sum equal to the taxes, together with  interest, that are not timely paid over
to the Department  of Revenue. Such liability shall be limited to the principal amount supplied by
the lender, surety or other person, and any amounts so paid to the department shall be credited
against the liability of the employer.
(7)(a) An employer  shall submit an annual return pursuant to ORS 316.202 to the Department
of Revenue. The amounts deducted from the wages  during any calendar year in accordance with this
section shall be considered to be in  payment of the tax imposed under subsection (2) of this section.
(b) The return submitted  by the employer shall be accepted by the Department of Revenue as
evidence in favor of the employee of the amounts so deducted from the employee’s wages.
(8) Nothing in this section prohibits the Department of Revenue from  including the tax imposed
under this section in the combined quarterly tax report required under ORS 316.168.
(9) An employer that fails to deduct and withhold the tax required under this section:
(a) Is deemed responsible  for the payment of the tax obligation in an amount equal to the
amount required to be withheld from the employee’s wages and remitted  to the Department of Re-
[36]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
venue; and
(b) Is subject to  a penalty of $250 per employee, up to a maximum penalty of $25,000, if the
employer knowingly fails to deduct and withhold the tax.
(10) Residents subject to the tax imposed under this section on wages  earned outside this state
from an employer not doing  business within this state shall report and pay the tax in an amount
not to exceed the wages earned outside this state multiplied by the rate set  under subsection (2)(b)
of this section, and at the time and in the manner, as determined by  the Department of Revenue by
rule.
SECTION 55b.
The amendments to ORS 320.550 by  section 55a of this 2025 Act become
operative on January 1, 2031.
SECTION 56. (1) No later than September 15, 2026, the Department of  Transportation
shall conduct a study and review  the method of funding distribution from the Statewide
Transportation Improvement Fund to qualified entities.
(2) The goal of  the review is to determine the department’s ability to effectively and
equitably distribute moneys in the Statewide Transportation Improvement Fund to address
current and reasonably expected transit service levels around this state. As  part of the re-
view, the department shall evaluate whether there is sufficient moneys  to cover the admin-
istrative costs incurred by the department and the Department of Revenue  related to the
implementation of the tax imposed under ORS 184.752 to 184.766 and 320.550.
SECTION 57.
Section 56 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Section 58 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
VEHICLE PRIVILEGE AND USE TAXES
SECTION 59.  ORS 320.405 is amended to read:
320.405. (1) A tax is imposed on each vehicle dealer for the privilege of engaging  in the business
of selling taxable motor vehicles at retail in this state.
(2)(a) The privilege tax shall be computed at the rate of [ 0.5] one percent of the retail sales price
of the taxable motor vehicle. The tax may be rounded to the nearest whole cent.
(b) The privilege tax becomes due upon the sale at retail of a taxable motor vehicle that:
(A) Has never been registered in this state; or
(B) Has been  registered only to a vehicle dealer for use as a demonstrator in the course of the
vehicle dealer’s business.
(3)(a) A vehicle dealer may collect the amount of the privilege tax computed on the  retail sales
price of a taxable motor vehicle from the purchaser of the taxable motor vehicle.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the  purchaser of a taxable motor vehicle
from whom the privilege tax is collected is not considered a taxpayer  for purposes of the privilege
tax imposed under this section.
SECTION 60.
 ORS 320.410 is amended to read:
320.410. (1) A use tax is imposed  on the storage, use or other consumption in this state of tax-
able motor vehicles purchased at retail from any seller.
(2) The  use tax shall be computed at the rate of [ 0.5] one percent of the retail sales price of the
taxable motor vehicle.
(3) The use tax is a liability of the purchaser of the taxable motor vehicle.
(4) The use tax shall be reduced, but not below zero, by  the amount of any privilege, excise,
[37]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sales or use tax imposed by any jurisdiction on the sale, or on the storage, use or  other consump-
tion, of the taxable motor vehicle. The reduction under  this subsection shall be made only upon a
showing by the purchaser that a privilege, excise, sales or use tax has been paid.
(5) The amount of the use tax shall be separately stated on an invoice, receipt  or other similar
document that the seller  provides to the purchaser or shall be otherwise disclosed to the purchaser.
(6) A purchaser’s liability for the use tax is satisfied by a valid receipt given to  the purchaser
under ORS 320.420 by the seller of the taxable motor vehicle.
SECTION 60a.
 ORS 320.435 is amended to read:
320.435. (1) The Department  of Revenue shall deposit all revenue collected from the privilege tax
imposed under ORS 320.405 and the use  tax imposed under ORS 320.410 in a suspense account es-
tablished under ORS 293.445 for the purpose of receiving the revenue. The department  may pay ex-
penses for the administration and enforcement of the privilege and use taxes out of  moneys received
from the privilege and use taxes. Amounts  necessary to pay administrative and enforcement ex-
penses are continuously appropriated to the department from the suspense account.
(2) After payment of administrative and enforcement expenses under subsection  (1) of this sec-
tion and refunds or credits arising from erroneous  overpayments, the department shall transfer the
balance of the moneys received from the privilege and use taxes as follows:
(a) Moneys attributable to the privilege tax shall be transferred as follows:
(A) Fifty percent of the gross amount of moneys received from the privilege  tax shall be
transferred annually to the Railroad Fund established under ORS 824.014; and
(B) Of the remaining 50 percent:
[(A)] (i) The greater of $12 million or 45 percent [ of the  gross amount ] of the moneys received
[from the privilege tax ] shall be transferred annually to  the Zero-Emission Incentive Fund established
under ORS 468.449.
[(B)] (ii) After the transfer  required under [ subparagraph (A) of this paragraph ] sub-
subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph , the balance of the  moneys shall be transferred to the
Connect Oregon Fund established under ORS 367.080.
(b) Moneys attributable to the use tax shall be transferred to the State Highway Fund.
SECTION 60b.
 ORS 824.014 is amended to read:
824.014. (1) The Railroad Fund is established separate and distinct from the  General Fund. [ In-
terest earned, if any,  shall inure to the benefit of the Railroad Fund. ] Interest earned by the Rail-
road Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) All fees, penalties and other moneys  collected by the Department of Transportation under
ORS 824.010 and 824.012 shall be  paid by the department into the State Treasury within 30 days
after the collection thereof, and shall be [ placed] credited by the State Treasurer to the [ credit of
the] Railroad Fund [ created by subsection (1) of this section. The fees, penalties and other  moneys col-
lected from railroads shall be used only for the purpose of paying the expenses  of the department in
performing the duties imposed by law upon the department in respect to railroads ].
(3) The fund consists of:
(a) Amounts deposited in the fund under ORS 320.435;
(b) Fees, penalties and other moneys collected from railroads;
(c) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by  the Legislative As-
sembly; and
(d) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any other source.
(4) Moneys in the Railroad Fund are continuously appropriated to the Department  of
[38]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Transportation for the purposes of:
(a) Carrying out programs or projects to support public transportation by rail; and
(b) Paying the expenses of the department in performing  the duties imposed by law upon
the department with respect to railroads.
SECTION 61.
The amendments to ORS 320.405, 320.410 and  320.435 by sections 59 to 60a
of this 2025 Act apply to sales  of taxable motor vehicles that become final, and the storage,
use or  other consumption in this state of taxable motor vehicles that become taxable, on or
after January 1, 2026.
VEHICLE FEES AND TAXES
SECTION 62.  ORS 803.420 is amended to read:
803.420. (1) The vehicle registration fees imposed under this  section shall be based on the clas-
sifications determined by the  Department of Transportation by rule. The department may classify a
vehicle to ensure that registration fees for the vehicle are the same as for other  vehicles the de-
partment determines to be comparable.
(2) Except  as otherwise provided in this section, or unless the vehicle is registered quarterly,
the fees described in this section are for an entire registration period for the  vehicle as described
under ORS 803.415. For a vehicle registered for a  quarterly registration period under ORS 803.415,
the department shall  apportion any fee under this section to reflect the number of quarters regis-
tered.
(3) Vehicle registration fees are due when a vehicle is  registered and when the registered owner
renews the registration.
(4) In addition to the registration fees listed in this section, a county or a district  may impose
an additional registration fee as provided under ORS 801.041 and 801.042.
(5) A rental or leasing company, as  defined in ORS 221.275, that elects to initially register a
vehicle for an annual or biennial registration period shall pay a fee of $2 in addition to  the vehicle
registration fee provided under this section.
(6) The registration fees for each year of the registration  period for vehicles subject to biennial
registration are as follows:
(a) Passenger vehicles not otherwise provided for in this section or ORS 821.320, [ $43] $113.
(b) Utility trailers or light trailers, as those  terms are defined by rule by the department, [ $63]
$129.
(c) Mopeds and motorcycles, [ $44] $110.
(d) Low-speed vehicles, [ $63] $129.
(e) Medium-speed electric vehicles, [ $63] $129.
(7) The registration  fees for vehicles that are subject to biennial registration and that are listed
in this subsection are as follows:
(a) State-owned  vehicles registered under ORS 805.045 and undercover vehicles registered under
ORS 805.060, $10 upon registration or renewal.
(b) Fixed load vehicles:
(A) If a declaration of weight described under ORS 803.435 is submitted establishing  the weight
of the vehicle at 3,000 pounds or less, $61.
(B) If no declaration of weight is submitted or if the weight of  the vehicles is in excess of 3,000
pounds, $82.
[39]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Travel trailers, special use  trailers, campers and motor homes, based on length as determined
under ORS 803.425:
(A) Trailers or campers that are 6 to 10 feet in length, $81.
(B) Trailers or campers over 10 feet in length,  $81 plus $7 a foot for each foot of length over
the first 10 feet.
(C) Motor homes that are 6 to 14 feet in length, $86.
(D) Motor homes over 14 feet in length, $126 plus $8 a foot for each foot of length over the  first
10 feet.
(8) The registration fee for trailers for hire that are equipped with  pneumatic tires made of an
elastic material and that are not travel trailers  or trailers registered under permanent registration
is $30.
(9) The registration fees for vehicles subject to ownership registration are as follows:
(a) Government-owned vehicles registered under ORS 805.040, $5.
(b) Vehicles registered with  special registration for disabled veterans under ORS 805.100 or for
former prisoners of war under ORS 805.110, $15.
(c) School vehicles registered under ORS 805.050, $5.
(10) The registration fees for vehicles subject to permanent registration are as follows:
(a) Antique vehicles registered under ORS 805.010, $100.
(b) Vehicles of special interest registered under ORS 805.020, $100.
(c) Racing activity vehicles registered under ORS 805.035, $100.
(d) Trailers, $10.
(e) State-owned vehicles  registered under ORS 805.045 and undercover vehicles registered under
ORS 805.060, $10.
(11) The  registration fee for trailers registered as part of a fleet under an agreement reached
pursuant to ORS 802.500 is the same  fee as the fee for vehicles of the same type registered under
other provisions of the Oregon Vehicle Code.
(12) The  registration fee for vehicles with proportional registration under ORS 826.009, or pro-
portional fleet registration under ORS 826.011, is the same fee as  the fee for vehicles of the same
type under this section except that the fees shall be fixed on  an apportioned basis as provided under
the agreement established under ORS 826.007.
(13) In addition to any other registration fees charged for registration  of vehicles in fleets under
ORS 805.120, the department may charge the following fees:
(a) Service charge for each vehicle entered into a fleet, $3.
(b) Service charge for each vehicle in the fleet at the time of renewal, $2.
(14)(a) The registration fee for motor vehicles required to establish  a registration weight under
ORS 803.430 or 826.013, tow vehicles used to transport property for hire other than as described in
ORS 822.210 and commercial buses is as  provided in the following chart, based upon the weight
submitted in the declaration of weight prepared under ORS 803.435 or 826.015:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Weight in Pounds Fee
8,000 or less $ 74
8,001 to 10,000 464
10,001 to 12,000 528
12,001 to 14,000 591
[40]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
14,001 to 16,000 655
16,001 to 18,000 718
18,001 to 20,000 801
20,001 to 22,000 864
22,001 to 24,000 949
24,001 to 26,000 1,031
26,001 to 28,000 375
28,001 to 30,000 391
30,001 to 32,000 422
32,001 to 34,000 438
34,001 to 36,000 468
36,001 to 38,000 485
38,001 to 40,000 515
40,001 to 42,000 532
42,001 to 44,000 562
44,001 to 46,000 578
46,001 to 48,000 593
48,001 to 50,000 625
50,001 to 52,000 656
52,001 to 54,000 672
54,001 to 56,000 686
56,001 to 58,000 717
58,001 to 60,000 750
60,001 to 62,000 780
62,001 to 64,000 811
64,001 to 66,000 827
66,001 to 68,000 857
68,001 to 70,000 874
70,001 to 72,000 904
72,001 to 74,000 921
74,001 to 76,000 951
76,001 to 78,000 967
78,001 to 80,000 998
80,001 to 82,000 1,014
82,001 to 84,000 1,045
84,001 to 86,000 1,061
86,001 to 88,000 1,092
88,001 to 90,000 1,108
90,001 to 92,000 1,139
92,001 to 94,000 1,155
94,001 to 96,000 1,185
96,001 to 98,000 1,202
98,001 to 100,000 1,218
100,001 to 102,000 1,249
102,001 to 104,000 1,265
[41]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
104,001 to 105,500 1,295
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(b)(A) The registration fee for motor  vehicles with a registration weight of more than 8,000
pounds that are described in ORS 825.015,  that are operated by a charitable organization as defined
in ORS 825.017 (13), is as provided in the following chart:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Weight in Pounds Fee
8,001 to 10,000 $ 71
10,001 to 12,000 85
12,001 to 14,000 92
14,001 to 16,000 107
16,001 to 18,000 114
18,001 to 20,000 128
20,001 to 22,000 135
22,001 to 24,000 149
24,001 to 26,000 156
26,001 to 28,000 170
28,001 to 30,000 178
30,001 to 32,000 192
32,001 to 34,000 199
34,001 to 36,000 213
36,001 to 38,000 220
38,001 to 40,000 234
40,001 to 42,000 241
42,001 to 44,000 256
44,001 to 46,000 263
46,001 to 48,000 270
48,001 to 50,000 284
50,001 to 52,000 298
52,001 to 54,000 305
54,001 to 56,000 312
56,001 to 58,000 327
58,001 to 60,000 341
60,001 to 62,000 355
62,001 to 64,000 369
64,001 to 66,000 376
66,001 to 68,000 391
68,001 to 70,000 398
70,001 to 72,000 412
72,001 to 74,000 419
74,001 to 76,000 433
76,001 to 78,000 440
78,001 to 80,000 454
[42]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
80,001 to 82,000 462
82,001 to 84,000 476
84,001 to 86,000 483
86,001 to 88,000 497
88,001 to 90,000 504
90,001 to 92,000 518
92,001 to 94,000 525
94,001 to 96,000 540
96,001 to 98,000 547
98,001 to 100,000 554
100,001 to 102,000 568
102,001 to 104,000 575
104,001 to 105,500 589
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(B) The registration fee for motor vehicles that are certified under ORS 822.205, unless the mo-
tor vehicles  are registered under paragraph (a) of this subsection, or that are used exclusively to
transport manufactured structures, is as provided in the following chart:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Weight in Pounds Fee
8,000 or less $ 63
8,001 to 10,000 145
10,001 to 12,000 173
12,001 to 14,000 187
14,001 to 16,000 217
16,001 to 18,000 231
18,001 to 20,000 260
20,001 to 22,000 274
22,001 to 24,000 304
24,001 to 26,000 318
26,001 to 28,000 346
28,001 to 30,000 362
30,001 to 32,000 391
32,001 to 34,000 405
34,001 to 36,000 435
36,001 to 38,000 449
38,001 to 40,000 477
40,001 to 42,000 491
42,001 to 44,000 521
44,001 to 46,000 535
46,001 to 48,000 550
48,001 to 50,000 578
50,001 to 52,000 608
52,001 to 54,000 622
[43]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
54,001 to 56,000 636
56,001 to 58,000 665
58,001 to 60,000 694
60,001 to 62,000 723
62,001 to 64,000 753
64,001 to 66,000 767
66,001 to 68,000 795
68,001 to 70,000 809
70,001 to 72,000 839
72,001 to 74,000 853
74,001 to 76,000 882
76,001 to 78,000 896
78,001 to 80,000 926
80,001 to 82,000 940
82,001 to 84,000 968
84,001 to 86,000 983
86,001 to 88,000 1,012
88,001 to 90,000 1,027
90,001 to 92,000 1,055
92,001 to 94,000 1,071
94,001 to 96,000 1,099
96,001 to 98,000 1,113
98,001 to 100,000 1,127
100,001 to 102,000 1,157
102,001 to 104,000 1,172
104,001 to 105,500 1,200
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(C) The owner of a vehicle described in  subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph must certify
at the time of initial registration, in a manner determined by the department by rule,  that the motor
vehicle will be used exclusively to transport manufactured structures or exclusively  as described in
ORS 822.210, unless the motor vehicle is registered under paragraph (a) of this subsection, or as
described in ORS 825.015 or 825.017 (13). Registration of a  vehicle described in subparagraph (A) or
(B) of this paragraph  is invalid if the vehicle is operated in any manner other than that described
in the certification under this subparagraph.
(c) Subject to paragraph (d) of this  subsection, the registration fee for motor vehicles registered
as farm vehicles under ORS 805.300 is as provided in the following chart, based upon the registra-
tion weight given in the declaration of weight submitted under ORS 803.435:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Weight in Pounds Fee
8,000 or less $ 50
8,001 to 10,000 65
10,001 to 12,000 75
12,001 to 14,000 97
[44]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
14,001 to 16,000 108
16,001 to 18,000 129
18,001 to 20,000 141
20,001 to 22,000 162
22,001 to 24,000 172
24,001 to 26,000 195
26,001 to 28,000 204
28,001 to 30,000 226
30,001 to 32,000 237
32,001 to 34,000 258
34,001 to 36,000 270
36,001 to 38,000 291
38,001 to 40,000 302
40,001 to 42,000 324
42,001 to 44,000 334
44,001 to 46,000 356
46,001 to 48,000 366
48,001 to 50,000 388
50,001 to 52,000 399
52,001 to 54,000 409
54,001 to 56,000 432
56,001 to 58,000 453
58,001 to 60,000 463
60,001 to 62,000 474
62,001 to 64,000 496
64,001 to 66,000 517
66,001 to 68,000 528
68,001 to 70,000 540
70,001 to 72,000 561
72,001 to 74,000 571
74,001 to 76,000 594
76,001 to 78,000 604
78,001 to 80,000 625
80,001 to 82,000 636
82,001 to 84,000 657
84,001 to 86,000 669
86,001 to 88,000 690
88,001 to 90,000 700
90,001 to 92,000 723
92,001 to 94,000 733
94,001 to 96,000 754
96,001 to 98,000 765
98,001 to 100,000 787
100,001 to 102,000 798
102,001 to 104,000 819
[45]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
104,001 to 105,500 831
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(d) For any  vehicle that is registered under a quarterly registration period, the registration fee
is a minimum of $15 for each quarter registered plus an additional fee of $2.
(15) The registration and renewal fees  for vehicles specified in this subsection that are required
to establish a registration weight under ORS 803.430 or 826.013 are as follows:
(a) State-owned vehicles registered under ORS 805.045, $10.
(b) Undercover vehicles registered under ORS 805.060, $10.
SECTION 63.
 ORS 803.090 is amended to read:
803.090. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the fee  to issue a certificate of
title under ORS 803.045 or 803.140,  to transfer title under ORS 803.092, to issue a duplicate or re-
placement certificate of title under ORS 803.065  or to issue a new title due to name or address
change under ORS 803.220 is as follows:
(a) $182; or
[(a)] (b) For a salvage title, [ $27] $44.
[(b) For a vehicle title for  trailers eligible for permanent registration under ORS 803.415 (1) and
motor vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating over 26,000 pounds, excluding motor homes, $90. ]
[(c) For a vehicle title for vehicles  other than those vehicles described in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, $77.]
(2) If an application for a duplicate or replacement certificate of title is filed  at the same time
as an application for a transfer of title for the same vehicle, the applicant is required  to pay only
the transfer of title fee.
(3) The fee for late presentation of certificate of title under ORS 803.105 is $25 from the  31st
day after the transfer through the 60th day after the transfer and $50 thereafter.
(4) The fees for title transactions  involving a form of title other than a certificate shall be the
amounts established by the Department of Transportation by rule under ORS 803.012.
SECTION 64.  ORS 818.225 is amended to read:
818.225. (1) As used in this section, “equivalent single-axle  load” means the relationship between
actual or requested weight and an 18,000 pound single-axle load as  determined by the American
Association  of  State Highway and Transportation Officials Road Tests reported at the Proceedings
Conference of 1962.
(2)(a) In addition to any fee for a single-trip nondivisible load permit, a person who is issued the
permit or  who operates a vehicle in a manner that requires the permit is liable for payment of a
road use assessment fee [ of ten and nine-tenths cents ] computed on the basis of the following rates
per equivalent single-axle load mile traveled[ .]:
(A) For the period beginning on July 1, 2028,  and ending on December 31, 2029,
$ .
(B) For  the period beginning on January 1, 2030, and ending on December 31, 2031,
$ .
(C) For the period beginning on January 1, 2032, and ending on  December 31, 2033,
$ .
(b) If the  road use assessment fee is not collected at the time of issuance of the permit, the de-
partment shall bill the permittee for the amount due. The account shall be  considered delinquent if
not paid within 60 days of billing.
[46]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) The miles of travel authorized by a single-trip nondivisible load permit  shall be exempt from
taxation under ORS chapter 825.
(3) The department may adopt rules:
(a) To standardize the determination  of equivalent single-axle load computation based on aver-
age highway conditions; and
(b) To establish procedures for  payment, collection and enforcement of the fees and assessments
established by this chapter.
SECTION 65.
 ORS 818.225, as amended by section 64 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
818.225. (1) As used in this section, “equivalent single-axle  load” means the relationship between
actual or requested weight and an 18,000 pound single-axle load as  determined by the American
Association  of  State Highway and Transportation Officials Road Tests reported at the Proceedings
Conference of 1962.
(2)(a) In addition to any fee for a single-trip nondivisible load permit, a person who is issued the
permit or  who operates a vehicle in a manner that requires the permit is liable for payment of a
road use assessment fee [ computed on the basis  of the following rates ] of $  per equivalent
single-axle load mile traveled[ :].
[(A) For the period beginning on July 1, 2028, and ending on December 31, 2029, $ .]
[(B) For the period beginning on January 1, 2030, and ending on December 31, 2031, $ .]
[(C) For the period beginning on January 1, 2032, and ending on December 31, 2033, $ .]
(b) If the  road use assessment fee is not collected at the time of issuance of the permit, the de-
partment shall bill the permittee for the amount due. The account shall be  considered delinquent if
not paid within 60 days of billing.
(c) The miles of travel authorized by a single-trip nondivisible load permit  shall be exempt from
taxation under ORS chapter 825.
(3) The department may adopt rules:
(a) To standardize the determination  of equivalent single-axle load computation based on aver-
age highway conditions; and
(b) To establish procedures for  payment, collection and enforcement of the fees and assessments
established by this chapter.
SECTION 66.
 ORS 825.480 is amended to read:
825.480. [(1)(a) In lieu of other fees provided in ORS 825.474, carriers engaged  in operating motor
vehicles in the transportation of logs, poles, peeler  cores or piling may pay annual fees for such oper-
ation computed at the rate of $11.60 for each 100 pounds of declared combined weight. ]
(1)(a) In lieu of other fees provided in ORS 825.474, carriers engaged in operating  motor
vehicles in the transportation of logs,  poles, peeler cores or piling may pay annual fees for
such operation computed at the following rate for each 100 pounds of  declared combined
weight:
(A) For electric motor vehicles:
(i) For the period beginning on July 1, 2028, and ending on December 31, 2029, $
.
(ii) For the period beginning on January 1, 2030, and  ending on December 31, 2031,
$ .
(iii) For the period beginning on January 1, 2032, and  ending on December 31, 2033,
$ .
(B) For vehicles other than electric motor vehicles:
(i) For the period beginning on July 1, 2028, and ending on December 31, 2029, $
.
[47]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(ii) For the period beginning on January 1, 2030, and  ending on December 31, 2031,
$
.
(iii) For the period beginning on January 1, 2032, and  ending on December 31, 2033,
$ .
(b) Any carrier electing to pay fees under this method may, as to vehicles otherwise exempt from
taxation, elect to be  taxed on the mileage basis for movements of such empty vehicles over public
highways whenever operations are for  the purpose of repair, maintenance, servicing or moving from
one exempt highway operation to another.
(2) The annual fees provided in subsections (1)[ , (4) and (5) ] and (3)  of this section may be paid
on a monthly basis. Any carrier electing to pay fees under this method may not change an  election
during the same calendar year  in which the election is made, but may be relieved from the payment
due for any month during which a motor vehicle is not operated. A carrier electing to pay  fees un-
der this method shall report and  pay these fees on or before the 10th of each month for the pre-
ceding month’s operations. A monthly report shall be made on all vehicles on the annual fee basis
including any vehicle not operated for the month.
[(3)(a) In lieu of the fees provided in ORS 825.470 to 825.474, motor  vehicles described in ORS
825.024 with a combined weight of less than 46,000 pounds that are being operated  under a permit is-
sued under ORS 825.102 may pay annual fees for such operation computed at the  rate of $9.60 for each
100 pounds of declared combined weight. ]
[(b) The annual fees provided in this subsection shall be paid in advance but may be paid on a
monthly basis on or before the first day of the month. A carrier may be relieved from the fees  due for
any month during which the motor  vehicle is not operated for hire if a statement to that effect is filed
with the Department of Transportation on or before the fifth day of the  first month for which relief is
sought.]
[(4)(a)] (3)(a)  In  lieu of other fees provided in ORS 825.474, carriers engaged in the operation
of motor vehicles equipped with dump bodies and  used in the transportation of sand, gravel, rock,
dirt, debris, cinders, asphaltic concrete mix, metallic ores and  concentrates or raw nonmetallic
products, whether crushed or  otherwise, moving from mines, pits or quarries may pay annual fees
for such operation computed at the following rate  [ of $11.50] for each 100 pounds of declared com-
bined weight[ .]:
(A) For electric motor vehicles:
(i) For the period beginning on July 1, 2028, and ending on December 31, 2029, $
.
(ii) For the period beginning on January 1, 2030, and  ending on December 31, 2031,
$ .
(iii) For the period beginning on January 1, 2032, and  ending on December 31, 2033,
$ .
(B) For vehicles other than electric motor vehicles:
(i) For the period beginning on July 1, 2028, and ending on December 31, 2029, $
.
(ii) For the period beginning on January 1, 2030, and  ending on December 31, 2031,
$ .
(iii) For the period beginning on January 1, 2032, and  ending on December 31, 2033,
$ .
(b) Any carrier electing to pay fees under this method  may, as to vehicles otherwise exempt for
taxation, elect to be taxed on the mileage basis for movements of such empty  vehicles over public
highways whenever operations are for  the purpose of repair, maintenance, servicing or moving from
[48]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
one exempt highway operation to another.
[(5)(a) In lieu of other fees provided in ORS 825.474, carriers engaged in operating motor  vehicles
in the transportation of wood chips, sawdust, barkdust, hog fuel  or shavings may pay annual fees for
such operation computed at the rate of $47 for each 100 pounds of declared combined weight. ]
[(b) Any carrier electing to pay under  this method may, as to vehicles otherwise exempt from tax-
ation, elect to be taxed on the mileage  basis for movement of such empty vehicles over public highways
whenever operations are for the purpose of repair, maintenance, service or moving from one exempt
highway operation to another. ]
SECTION 67.
 ORS 825.480, as amended by section 66 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
825.480. (1)(a) In lieu of other fees provided in ORS 825.474, carriers engaged in  operating motor
vehicles in the transportation of logs, poles, peeler cores or piling may pay annual fees for  such
operation computed at the following rate for each 100 pounds of declared combined weight:
(A) For electric motor vehicles , $ .[:]
[(i) For the period beginning on July 1, 2028, and ending on December 31, 2029, $ .]
[(ii) For the period beginning on January 1, 2030, and ending on December 31, 2031, $ .]
[(iii) For the period beginning on January 1, 2032, and ending on December 31, 2033, $ .]
(B) For vehicles other than electric motor vehicles , $ .[:]
[(i) For the period beginning on July 1, 2028, and ending on December 31, 2029, $ .]
[(ii) For the period beginning on January 1, 2030, and ending on December 31, 2031, $ .]
[(iii) For the period beginning on January 1, 2032, and ending on December 31, 2033, $ .]
(b) Any carrier electing to pay fees under this method may, as to vehicles otherwise exempt from
taxation, elect to be taxed on the mileage basis for movements of such empty  vehicles over public
highways whenever operations are for  the purpose of repair, maintenance, servicing or moving from
one exempt highway operation to another.
(2) The annual fees provided in subsections (1) and (3) of  this section may be paid on a monthly
basis. Any carrier electing to pay fees under this method  may not change an election during the
same calendar year in which the election is made, but may be relieved from the payment due  for
any month during which a motor vehicle is not operated. A carrier electing to pay  fees under this
method shall  report and pay these fees on or before the 10th of each month for the preceding
month’s operations. A monthly report shall be made on  all vehicles on the annual fee basis including
any vehicle not operated for the month.
(3)(a) In lieu of other fees provided in ORS 825.474,  carriers engaged in the operation of motor
vehicles equipped with dump bodies and used in the  transportation of sand, gravel, rock, dirt, debris,
cinders, asphaltic concrete mix, metallic ores  and concentrates or raw nonmetallic products,
whether crushed or otherwise, moving from mines, pits or  quarries may pay annual fees for such
operation computed at the following rate for each 100 pounds of declared combined weight:
(A) For electric motor vehicles , $ .[:]
[(i) For the period beginning on July 1, 2028, and ending on December 31, 2029, $ .]
[(ii) For the period beginning on January 1, 2030, and ending on December 31, 2031, $ .]
[(iii) For the period beginning on January 1, 2032, and ending on December 31, 2033, $ .]
(B) For vehicles other than electric motor vehicles , $ .[:]
[(i) For the period beginning on July 1, 2028, and ending on December 31, 2029, $ .]
[(ii) For the period beginning on January 1, 2030, and ending on December 31, 2031, $ .]
[(iii) For the period beginning on January 1, 2032, and ending on December 31, 2033, $ .]
(b) Any carrier electing to pay fees under this method  may, as to vehicles otherwise exempt for
[49]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
taxation, elect to be taxed on the mileage basis for movements of such empty  vehicles over public
highways whenever operations are for  the purpose of repair, maintenance, servicing or moving from
one exempt highway operation to another.
SECTION 68.
 ORS 803.575 is amended to read:
803.575. (1) The fee for issuance of  a duplicate or replacement registration card under ORS
803.510 is $5.
(2) The fee for issuance of  a replacement or duplicate registration plate under ORS 803.530 is
the fee established under ORS 803.570, together with a fee of [ $12] $33.
(3) The fee for transfer of a registration plate under ORS 803.530 is [ $30] $44.
(4) The fee for issuance of replacement registration stickers under ORS 803.555 is $10.
(5) The fee for issuance of both replacement or duplicate registration  plates and replacement
registration stickers, when issued at the  same time, is the fee established under ORS 803.570, to-
gether with a fee of [ $12] $33.
(6) A fee paid  under subsection (2), (4) or (5) of this section includes the cost of any duplicate
or replacement registration card issued.
SECTION 69.
 ORS 807.370 is amended to read:
807.370. (1) Fees for issuance of or application for a driving privilege are as follows:
(a) Class C driver license or restricted Class C driver license, [ $58] $100.
(b) Class C limited term driver license or restricted Class C limited term driver license, $23.
(c) Commercial driver license, whether or not the driver license contains endorsements, $160.
(d) Limited term commercial driver license, whether or not the driver license  contains endorse-
ments, $45.
(e) Instruction driver permit, [ $30] $111.
(f) Commercial learner driver permit, $40.
(g) Limited term commercial learner driver permit, $23.
(h) Special student driver permit, $23.
(i) Emergency driver permit, $23.
(j) Special limited vision condition learner’s permit, $13.
(k) Disability golf cart driver permit, $44.
(L) Hardship driver permit application, [ $75] $168.
(2) In addition  to paying a fee under this section for issuance of a commercial driver license of
any class, when the Department of  Transportation accepts skills test results from a driver compe-
tency tester certified under ORS 807.080, the person shall pay a fee of $40.
(3) Fees for a motorcycle endorsement are as follows:
(a) In addition to  any fee for the endorsed driver license, for an original motorcycle endorsement
added at the time of an original issuance of a driving privilege or with  a renewal or replacement
of an existing driving privilege, [ $60] $105.
(b) For an original motorcycle endorsement added  without an original issuance of a driving
privilege or without a renewal or replacement of an existing driving privilege, $60.
(c) A Motorcycle Safety Subaccount fee:
(A) Upon original issuance of a motorcycle endorsement, $38.
(B) Upon renewal of a driver license with a motorcycle endorsement, $28.
(4) Fees for a farm endorsement are as follows:
(a) In addition  to any fee for the endorsed driver license, for an original farm endorsement added
at the time of  an original issuance of a driving privilege or with a renewal or replacement of an
[50]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
existing driving privilege, [ $26] $87.
(b) For  an original farm endorsement added without an original issuance of a driving privilege
or without a renewal or replacement of an existing driving privilege, [ $29] $87.
(5) Fees for renewal of a driving privilege are as follows:
(a) Class C driver license, [ $48] $74.
(b) Class C limited term driver license, $8.
(c) Commercial driver license, $98.
(d) Limited term commercial driver license, $14.
(e) Instruction driver permit, [ $26] $69.
(f) Disability golf cart driver permit, $32.
(6) Fee to replace a driver license or driver permit, [ $30] $56.
(7) Fees to take tests required for driving privileges or to remove restrictions are as follows:
(a) The knowledge test for a Class C driver license or  Class C limited term driver license, [ $7]
$10.
(b) The knowledge test for a motorcycle endorsement, $7.
(c) The knowledge test for any commercial driver license or commercial learner driver  permit,
to remove a commercial driving privilege restriction or to add  a commercial driving privilege
endorsement, $10.
(d) The skills test for a Class C driver  license or Class C limited term driver license, [ $45]
$111.
(e) The skills test for any  commercial driver license, to remove a restriction or to add any
commercial driver license endorsement, [ $145] $540.
(8) Student Driver Training Fund eligibility fee, $6.
(9) Limited term Student Driver Training Fund eligibility fee, $2.
(10) Fee for  reinstatement of revoked driving privileges under ORS 809.390 or reinstatement of
suspended driving privileges under ORS 809.380, $85.
(11) The department may adopt rules to provide for the assessment or  retention of the skills test
fee when a test is scheduled but the applicant fails to appear at the scheduled time.
SECTION 70.
 ORS 822.700 is amended to read:
822.700. (1) Fee for issuance or renewal of dismantler certificates covering a single place  of
business, or a supplemental certificate for each  additional place of business to be covered by that
certificate and operated under the same name, [ $500] $2,492.
(2) Fee for each duplicate dismantler certificate issued under ORS 822.110, $40.
(3) Fee for original issuance or  renewal of vehicle dealer certificate under ORS 822.020 of a
vehicle dealer certificate:
(a) [ $1,100] $2,044, for a certificate covering a single place of business; and
(b) [ $350] $1,053, for each additional place of business to be covered by the certificate  and op-
erated under the same name.
(4) Fee for each corrected vehicle dealer certificate issued under ORS 822.040, $30.
(5) If a vehicle dealer or dismantler fails to pay a fee required under this section on  or before
the date the fee is due, there shall be added as a late payment charge a fee of $150.
(6) Fee for show license issued under ORS 822.084, $50.
(7) Fee for issuance of towing business certificate under ORS  822.205 or renewal under ORS
822.210, $17 for each vehicle used for towing or recovery purposes.
(8) Fee  for issuance or renewal of vehicle transporter certificate under ORS 822.310, [ $450]
[51]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
$1,294.
(9) Fee for issuance or renewal of driver training instructor certificate under ORS  822.515, $200.
(10) Fee for issuance or renewal of commercial driver training school certificate under ORS
822.515, $400.
(11) Fee  for issuance or renewal of vehicle appraiser certificate under ORS 819.480, [ $100]
$504.
SECTION 71.
 ORS 803.645 is amended to read:
803.645. Fees for trip permits issued under ORS 803.600 are as follows:
(1) For a heavy motor vehicle trip permit, $43.
(2) For a heavy trailer trip permit, [ $10] $27.
(3) For a light vehicle trip permit, $35.
(4) For a recreational vehicle trip permit, $35.
(5) For a registration weight trip permit, [ $5] $27.
(6) For a registered vehicle trip permit, [ $7.50] $27.
(7) For a 10-day trip permit issued under ORS 803.600  (2) by a person with a vehicle dealer
certificate or a towing business certificate, $15.
SECTION 71a.
 ORS 826.023 is amended to read:
826.023. (1) The fee for issuance of a duplicate or replacement registration card is [ $3] $15.
(2) The fee for issuance of each original, replacement or [ duplicate] renewal of a  registration
plate is [ $3] $20 and includes a registration card and sticker.
[(3) The fee for renewal of a registration plate is $3 and includes a registration card and sticker. ]
(3) The fee for a  pair of plates is $25 and includes a registration card and a pair of
stickers.
(4) The fee for issuance of replacement registration stickers is : [ $3.]
(a) For a single sticker, $12.
(b) For a pair of stickers, $13.
[(5) If a second plate is required for one vehicle, the fee for the plate or for a sticker  for the plate
is $3.]
(5) The fee for issuance of each original, replacement or  duplicate trusted carrier plate
is $36.
(6) The fee for the issuance of each original, replacement or duplicate  preclearance
transponder is $79.
SECTION 72.
 ORS 825.141 is amended to read:
825.141. In  addition to any other requirements of this chapter, a carrier whose operating au-
thority has been suspended shall pay a reinstatement  fee of $25 to the Department of Transportation
before the operating authority may be reinstated[ , plus $5 for each vehicle  issued a weight identifier
under ORS 825.450, ] and shall demonstrate operational activity at the time of reinstatement.
SECTION 73.  ORS 803.065 is amended to read:
803.065. (1) The Department of Transportation may issue  a duplicate or replacement certificate
of title when all of the following occur:
(a) The department is satisfied as to the loss, mutilation or destruction of a  certificate of title
or salvage title certificate.
(b) The fee  for issuance of a [ duplicate or replacement ] certificate of title or for a salvage title
certificate established under ORS 803.090 is paid.
(2) The department may accept an application for a duplicate or replacement  title certificate at
[52]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the time of any transfer of a vehicle under ORS 803.092. The following apply to this subsection:
(a) The department shall only accept the application if, at the time of transfer, the title certif-
icate is lost, mutilated or destroyed.
(b) When the department accepts  an application, the department may accept proof of transfer
other than the certificate of  title or may accept a certificate of title that has not been completed
along with other proof of transfer for purposes of transferring a vehicle under ORS 803.092. The
department may accept any proof of transfer under this paragraph that establishes  to the satisfac-
tion of the department that the vehicle  has been transferred including, but not limited to, statements
of release of interest, bills of sale, assignments of interest or other similar proof.
(c) If an application is made under this subsection, the fee for duplicate or replacement title
certificate under ORS 803.090 shall be paid in addition to the transfer fee under ORS 803.090.
(d) The department may include the form for  application under this subsection as part of the
form for transfer of a vehicle or may make the forms separate, as the department finds convenient.
(e) The department is  not required by this subsection to issue a duplicate or replacement title
before transfer, but may withhold issuance of title until new title is issued upon completion  of
transfer.
(f) The department may adopt rules to establish procedures and requirements for  effecting a
transfer under ORS 803.092 when application is made under this subsection at the same time.
SECTION 74.
 ORS 803.092 is amended to read:
803.092. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, upon  the transfer of any interest in a
vehicle covered by an Oregon title the transferee shall submit an application  for title to the De-
partment of  Transportation. Such application shall be submitted to the department within 30 days
of the date of transfer of interest.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, application is not required under this section
when:
(a) The change involves  only a change in the security interest where the security interest holder
or lessor  is a financial institution, a financial holding company or a bank holding company, as those
terms are defined in ORS 706.008, a licensee under ORS chapter 725, or any subsidiary or affiliate
of any of the foregoing and the transfer of the interest of the security interest holder or lessor:
(A) Results from the merger, conversion, reorganization, consolidation or acquisition of  the se-
curity interest holder or lessor;
(B) Is to an entity that is a member of the same affiliated group as  the security holder or lessor;
or
(C) Is made in connection with a transfer in bulk.
(b) The vehicle is transferred to a  vehicle dealer and the vehicle will become part of the dealer’s
inventory  for  resale. Upon the transfer of a vehicle to a dealer, however, the dealer shall imme-
diately notify the department of such transfer. This exemption from the requirement to apply for
title does not apply if the department determines that application for title is necessary  in order to
comply with odometer  disclosure requirements. If the department determines that application for
title is not required, it may require filing of documents under ORS 803.126.
(c) The vehicle is to be titled in another jurisdiction.
(d) The vehicle has been totaled, wrecked,  dismantled, disassembled, substantially altered or
destroyed, in which case the provisions of ORS 819.010, 819.012, 819.014  or 822.135 relating to notice
and surrender of title documents shall be complied with.
(e) The transfer involves the creation or termination of a leasehold interest in a vehicle that  is
[53]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
proportionally registered under ORS  826.009 or 826.011, if the department is furnished with satis-
factory proof of the lease.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the transferee shall:
(a) Submit an application that meets requirements for title under ORS 803.045 and 803.050  and
any applicable rules of the department.
(b) Submit the title transfer [ fees] fee  as required under ORS 803.090.
(c) Comply with the provisions of ORS 803.065 and any applicable rules of the department under
that statute and submit the duplicate or replacement title fee as  provided under ORS 803.090, if the
transfer includes an application for duplicate or replacement title and transfer of title.
(d) Submit an odometer disclosure containing information required by the department  for the
kind of transaction involved.
(e) Submit any late presentation of certificate  of title fee as provided under ORS 803.090 if such
fee is required under ORS 803.105.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) “Affiliated group” has the  meaning given to the term in section 1504(a) of the Internal Re-
venue Code of 1986, as amended (26 U.S.C. 1504(a)).
(b) A “transfer in bulk” is:
(A) The sale or assignment of, the grant of a security interest in, or any other transfer of either
a group of loans secured by vehicles, leases of vehicles or both or  a participation or other interest
in the group of loans;
(B) The creation of asset-backed securities or other securing of assets involving the  loans or
leases; or
(C) Any similar transaction involving the loans or leases.
SECTION 75.
 ORS 803.092, as amended by  section 3, chapter 428, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
803.092. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this  section, upon the transfer of any interest in a
vehicle covered by an Oregon title  the transferee shall submit an application for title to the De-
partment of Transportation. Such application shall be submitted to the department within 30  days
of the date of transfer of interest.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, application is not required under this section
when:
(a) The change involves  only a change in the security interest where the security interest holder
or lessor  is a financial institution, a financial holding company or a bank holding company, as those
terms are defined in ORS 706.008, a licensee under ORS chapter 725, or any subsidiary or affiliate
of any of the foregoing and the transfer of the interest of the security interest holder or lessor:
(A) Results from  the merger, conversion, reorganization, consolidation or acquisition of the se-
curity interest holder or lessor;
(B) Is to an entity that is a member of the same affiliated group as  the security holder or lessor;
or
(C) Is made in connection with a transfer in bulk.
(b) The vehicle is transferred to a  vehicle dealer and the vehicle will become part of the dealer’s
inventory for resale. Upon the transfer of a vehicle to a dealer, however, the dealer  shall imme-
diately notify the department of such transfer. This exemption from the requirement to apply for
title does not apply  if the department determines that application for title is necessary in order to
comply with odometer disclosure requirements. If the department determines that  application for
[54]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
title is not required, it may require filing of documents under ORS 803.126.
(c) The vehicle is to be titled in another jurisdiction.
(d) The vehicle has been totaled,  wrecked, dismantled, disassembled, substantially altered or
destroyed, in which case the provisions of ORS 819.010, 819.012, 819.014  or 822.135 relating to notice
and surrender of title documents shall be complied with.
(e) The transfer involves the creation or termination of a leasehold interest in a vehicle that  is
proportionally registered under ORS 826.009 or 826.011, if the department is  furnished with satis-
factory proof of the lease.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the transferee shall:
(a) Submit an application that meets requirements for title under ORS 803.045 and 803.050 and
any applicable rules of the department.
(b) Submit the title transfer [ fees] fee  as required under ORS 803.090.
(c) Comply with the provisions of ORS 803.065 and any applicable rules of the department under
that statute and submit the duplicate or replacement title fee as  provided under ORS 803.090, if the
transfer includes an application for duplicate or replacement title and transfer of title.
(d) Submit an  odometer disclosure containing information required by the department for the
kind of transaction involved.
(e) Submit any late presentation of certificate  of title fee as provided under ORS 803.090 if such
fee is required under ORS 803.105.
(4)(a) If requested  on the application for title, the department shall provide the primary security
interest holder with an electronic title. If  no request is made on the application, the department may
issue a certificate of title.
(b) When the primary security interest holder receives an electronic title, within  30 days of the
release of the  security interest the primary security interest holder shall electronically submit the
release of interest to the department in the manner provided by the department by rule.
(c) A duly certified copy of the department’s electronic  record of the title reflecting the lien is
admissible in any civil, criminal or administrative  proceeding in this state as evidence of the exist-
ence of a lien.
(d) The department shall adopt  rules related to electronic application and the electronic release
of liens and notice to lienholders.
(5) For purposes of this section:
(a) “Affiliated group” has the meaning given to the term in section 1504(a)  of the Internal Re-
venue Code of 1986, as amended (26 U.S.C. 1504(a)).
(b) A “transfer in bulk” is:
(A) The sale or assignment of, the grant of a security interest in, or any other transfer of either
a group of loans secured by  vehicles, leases of vehicles or both or a participation or other interest
in the group of loans;
(B) The creation  of asset-backed securities or other securing of assets involving the loans or
leases; or
(C) Any similar transaction involving the loans or leases.
SECTION 76.
 Section 18, chapter 30, Oregon Laws 2010, as amended by section 71L, chapter
750, Oregon Laws 2017, section 32, chapter 93, Oregon  Laws 2018, and section 11, chapter 491,
Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 18.  The Department of Transportation shall report semiannually to the legislative commit-
tees on revenue  if the Legislative Assembly is in session or, if the Legislative Assembly is not in
[55]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
session, to the Legislative Revenue Officer. The department’s report shall include:
(1) An estimate of the amounts received in the previous two quarters  from the increased taxes
and fees established in ORS [ 803.091 and] 803.422 [ and section 45, chapter 750, Oregon Laws 2017, ]
and the amendments  to ORS 319.020, 319.530, 803.420, 803.645, 818.225, 818.270, 825.476, 825.480 and
826.023 by sections 34, 35, 40 to 43, 48, 49, 51,  52, 54, 63, 64, 66, 67 and 70, chapter 750, Oregon Laws
2017, and  an estimate of the projected revenue in the current quarter and the next quarter from the
increased  taxes  and fees established in ORS [ 803.091 and ] 803.422 [ and section 45, chapter 750,
Oregon Laws 2017, ] and the amendments to ORS 319.020, 319.530, 803.420,  803.645, 818.225, 818.270,
825.476, 825.480 and 826.023 by  sections 34, 35, 40 to 43, 48, 49, 51, 52, 54, 63, 64, 66, 67 and 70,
chapter 750, Oregon Laws 2017.
(2) An estimate of the amounts received in the previous  biennium to date from the increased
taxes and fees established in ORS [ 803.091 and] 803.422 [ and section 45, chapter 750, Oregon Laws
2017,] and the amendments to ORS  319.020, 319.530, 803.420, 803.645, 818.225, 818.270, 825.476,
825.480 and 826.023 by sections 34, 35, 40 to 43, 48, 49, 51, 52, 54,  63, 64, 66, 67 and 70, chapter 750,
Oregon Laws 2017, and an  estimate of the projected revenue in the remaining current biennium from
the increased taxes and fees established in  ORS [ 803.091 and] 803.422 [ and section 45, chapter 750,
Oregon Laws 2017, ] and the amendments to ORS 319.020, 319.530, 803.420,  803.645, 818.225, 818.270,
825.476, 825.480 and 826.023 by  sections 34, 35, 40 to 43, 48, 49, 51, 52, 54, 63, 64, 66, 67 and 70,
chapter 750, Oregon Laws 2017.
(3) Information about the expenditures and distributions made under  ORS 367.095, including but
not limited to:
(a) Information about the department’s total funds as well as the funds raised  separately by the
increased taxes and fees established in ORS [ 803.091 and ] 803.422 [ and section 45, chapter  750,
Oregon Laws 2017, ] and  the amendments to ORS 319.020, 319.530, 803.420, 803.645, 818.225, 818.270,
825.476, 825.480 and 826.023 by sections 34, 35, 40 to 43, 48, 49, 51, 52, 54, 63, 64,  66, 67 and 70,
chapter 750, Oregon Laws 2017, and expended as described in ORS 367.095 (3).
(b) Semiannual amounts that include all  the actual and forecasted expenditures and distributions
made under ORS 367.095  for each quarter of the current biennium and the forecasted expenditures
and distributions for the following biennium.
SECTION 77.
Section 45, chapter 750, Oregon Laws 2017, as amended by section  43,
chapter 93, Oregon Laws 2018, section 1, chapter 250, Oregon Laws  2019, and section 7,
chapter 491, Oregon Laws 2019, is repealed.
SECTION 78.  ORS 367.095 is amended to read:
367.095. (1) The following amounts shall be distributed in the manner  prescribed in this section:
(a) The amount attributable to the increase in tax rates by [ section 45,  chapter 750, Oregon Laws
2017, and] the amendments to  ORS 319.020 and 319.530 by sections 40 to 43, chapter 750, Oregon
Laws 2017.
(b) The amount attributable to the vehicle  registration [ and title ] fees imposed under ORS
[803.091 and] 803.422.
(c) The amount attributable  to the increase in taxes and fees by the amendments to ORS 803.420,
803.645, 818.225, 825.476, 825.480 and 826.023 by sections 34, 35, 48, 49, 51, 52, 63, 64, 66, 67 and 70,
chapter 750, Oregon Laws 2017.
(2) The amounts described in subsection  (1) of this section shall be distributed in the following
order and for the following purposes:
(a)(A) $30 million per year shall be used to pay for:
[56]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) The Interstate 5 Rose Quarter Project;
(ii) The Interstate 205 Improvements: Stafford Road to Oregon Route 213 Project;
(iii) The Interstate 5 Boone Bridge and Seismic Improvement Project; and
(iv) The implementation of the toll program established under ORS 383.150.
(B) The amount described in  subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall be used to pay for costs,
including project costs on a current basis and paying for debt service  on bonds issued to finance the
projects or toll program,  only until the later of the date on which the projects or toll program is
completed or on which all  bonds issued to fund the projects or toll program have been repaid. Any
remaining moneys shall be distributed as described in subsection (3) of this section.
(b) $15 million per year shall be deposited  into the Safe Routes to Schools Fund for the purpose
of providing Safe Routes to Schools matching grants under  ORS 184.742. The remainder of the
moneys shall be distributed as described in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The moneys described in subsection (1) of this section that remain after the allocation of
moneys described in subsection (2) of this section shall be allocated as follows:
(a) 50 percent to the Department of Transportation.
(b) 30 percent to counties for distribution as provided in ORS 366.762.
(c) 20 percent to cities for distribution as provided in ORS 366.800.
(4) The moneys described in subsection (3)(a) of this section or equivalent  amounts that become
available to the Department of Transportation shall be allocated as follows:
(a) $10 million for safety.
(b) Of the remaining balance:
(A) Forty percent for bridges.
(B) Thirty percent for seismic improvements related to highways and bridges.
(C) Twenty-four percent for state highway pavement preservation and culverts.
(D) Six percent for state highway maintenance and safety improvements.
SECTION 79.
(1) The amendments to ORS 803.090,  803.420, 803.575, 803.645, 807.370,
818.225, 822.700, 825.141, 825.480 and  826.023 by sections 62 to 64, 66 and 68 to 72 of this 2025
Act apply to taxes and fees imposed on or after January 1, 2026.
(2) The amendments to ORS 818.225 and 825.480 by sections 65 and 67 of this  2025 Act
apply to taxes and fees imposed on or after January 1, 2034.
(3) The amendments to ORS 803.090 by section 63  of this 2025 Act apply to titles issued
or transferred on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 80. The amendments to ORS 818.225 and 825.480 by sections 65 and 67 of this
2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2034.
TRANSFER TAXES
SECTION 81.  ORS 320.400 is amended to read:
320.400. As used in ORS 320.400 to 320.490 [ and 803.203]:
(1)(a) “Bicycle” means:
(A) A vehicle  that is designed to be operated on the ground on wheels for the transportation
of humans and is propelled exclusively by human power; or
(B) An electric assisted bicycle as defined in ORS 801.258.
(b) “Bicycle” does not include:
(A) Carts;
[57]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Durable medical equipment;
(C) In-line skates;
(D) Roller skates;
(E) Skateboards;
(F) Stand-up scooters;
(G) Strollers designed for the transportation of children;
(H) Trailer cycles or other bicycle attachments; or
(I) Wagons.
(2) “Bicycle tax” means the excise tax imposed under ORS 320.415.
(3) “New” means that a motor vehicle:
(a) If equipped with an odometer, has 7,500 miles or less on the odometer; or
(b) If not equipped with an  odometer, has a manufacturer’s certificate of origin or a
manufacturer’s statement of origin.
(4) “Privilege tax” means the tax imposed under ORS 320.405.
(5) “Privilege tax vehicle” means a new motor vehicle that:
(a) Has a gross vehicle weight rating of 26,000 pounds or less; and
(b) Is:
(A) A vehicle as defined in ORS 744.850, other than an all-terrain vehicle or a trailer;
(B) A camper as defined in ORS 801.180;
(C) A commercial bus as defined in ORS 801.200;
(D) A commercial motor vehicle as defined in ORS 801.208;
(E) A commercial vehicle as defined in ORS 801.210;
(F) A fixed load vehicle as defined in ORS 801.285;
(G) A moped as defined in ORS 801.345;
(H) A motor home as defined in ORS 801.350;
(I) A motor truck as defined in ORS 801.355;
(J) A tank vehicle as defined in ORS 801.522;
(K) A trailer as defined in ORS 801.560 that is required to be registered in this state;
(L) A truck tractor as defined in ORS 801.575; or
(M) A worker transport bus as defined in ORS 801.610.
(6) “Privilege use tax” means the tax imposed under ORS 320.410.
[(2)(a)] (7)(a) “Retail sales price” means the total  price paid at retail for a [ taxable] bicycle or
motor vehicle, exclusive of the  amount of any excise, privilege or use tax, to a seller by a purchaser
of the [ taxable] bicycle or motor  vehicle.
(b) “Retail sales price” does not include the retail value of:
(A) Modifications to a [ taxable] motor vehicle that are necessary for a person with a  disability
to enter or drive or to otherwise operate or use the motor vehicle.
(B) Customized industrial modifications to the chassis of a truck that has a gross vehicle  weight
rating of at least 10,000 pounds and not more than 26,000 pounds.
[(3)] (8) “Seller” means:
(a) With respect to the privilege tax [ imposed under ORS  320.405 ] and the privilege use tax
[imposed under ORS 320.410 ], a vehicle dealer.
(b) With respect to the transfer tax and the transfer use tax,  a person that sells transfer
tax vehicles, whether in the course of the seller’s business or otherwise.
[(b)] (c) With respect to the [ excise tax imposed under ORS 320.415 ] bicycle tax, a person en-
[58]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
gaged in whole or in part in the business of selling bicycles.
[(4)] (9) “Taxable bicycle” means a new bicycle that has a retail sales price of $200 or more.
[(5) “Taxable motor vehicle” means a vehicle that: ]
[(a) Has a gross vehicle weight rating of 26,000 pounds or less; ]
[(b)(A) If equipped with an odometer, has 7,500 miles or less on the odometer; or ]
[(B) If not equipped with  an odometer, has a manufacturer’s certificate of origin or a
manufacturer’s statement of origin; and ]
[(c) Is: ]
[(A) A vehicle as defined in ORS 744.850, other than an all-terrain vehicle or a trailer; ]
[(B) A camper as defined in ORS 801.180; ]
[(C) A commercial bus as defined in ORS 801.200; ]
[(D) A commercial motor vehicle as defined in ORS 801.208; ]
[(E) A commercial vehicle as defined in ORS 801.210; ]
[(F) A fixed load vehicle as defined in ORS 801.285; ]
[(G) A moped as defined in ORS 801.345; ]
[(H) A motor home as defined in ORS 801.350; ]
[(I) A motor truck as defined in ORS 801.355; ]
[(J) A tank vehicle as defined in ORS 801.522; ]
[(K) A trailer as defined in ORS 801.560 that is required to be registered in this state; ]
[(L) A truck tractor as defined in ORS 801.575; or ]
[(M) A worker transport bus as defined in ORS 801.610. ]
[(6) “Taxable vehicle” means a taxable bicycle or a taxable motor vehicle. ]
[(7) “Transportation project taxes” means the privilege  tax imposed under ORS 320.405, the use tax
imposed under ORS 320.410 and the excise tax imposed under ORS 320.415. ]
(10) “Transfer sales price” means the  total consideration paid or otherwise agreed to by
a purchaser for the  transfer of ownership of a transfer tax vehicle, as shown on the vehicle
bill of sale submitted to the Department  of Transportation, exclusive of the amount of any
excise, privilege, transfer, sales or use tax paid with respect to the transaction.
(11) “Transfer tax” means the tax imposed under section 83 of this 2025 Act.
(12) “Transfer tax vehicle” means a new or used motor vehicle that:
(a) Has a gross vehicle weight rating of 10,000 pounds or less; and
(b) Was sold in  the transfer tax transaction for a transfer sales price that is greater than
$10,000.
(13) “Transfer use tax” means the tax imposed under section 84 of this 2025 Act.
(14) “Use taxes” means the privilege use tax and the transfer use tax.
(15) “Used” means that a motor vehicle is not a new motor vehicle.
[(8)(a)] (16)(a) “Vehicle dealer” means:
(A) A person engaged in business in this state that  is required to obtain a vehicle dealer cer-
tificate under ORS 822.005; and
(B) A person  engaged in business in another state that would be subject to ORS 822.005 if the
person engaged in business in this state.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a person is not a vehicle dealer for  pur-
poses of ORS 320.400 to 320.490 [ and 803.203] to the extent the person:
(A) Conducts an event that lasts less than seven consecutive days, for  which the public is
charged admission and at  which otherwise taxable [ motor] privilege tax vehicles are sold at auction;
[59]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or
(B) Sells an otherwise taxable [ motor] privilege tax vehicle at auction at an event described in
this paragraph.
SECTION 82.
Sections 83, 84 and 91 of this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
320.400 to 320.490.
SECTION 83. (1) A tax is imposed on the use of transfer tax vehicles sold in this state.
(2)(a) The tax shall be computed by multiplying the transfer sales price by:
(A) For new transfer tax vehicles, two percent.
(B) For used transfer tax vehicles, one percent.
(b) The tax may be rounded to the nearest whole cent.
(c) The tax becomes due upon each transfer of ownership of a transfer tax vehicle.
(3)(a) The tax shall be collected by the Department of Transportation  from the purchaser
of the transfer tax vehicle in accordance with ORS 803.045.
(b) The purchaser of the transfer tax vehicle from whom  the tax is collected shall be
considered the taxpayer for purposes of the tax imposed under this section.
SECTION 84.
(1) A use tax is imposed on the storage, use or other consumption  in this
state of transfer tax vehicles purchased from any seller.
(2) The use tax shall be computed by multiplying the transfer sales price by:
(a) For new transfer tax vehicles, two percent.
(b) For used transfer tax vehicles, one percent.
(3) The use tax is a liability of the purchaser of the transfer tax vehicle.
(4) The use  tax shall be reduced, but not below zero, by the amount of any privilege, ex-
cise, sales, transfer or use tax imposed by  any jurisdiction on the sale, or on the storage,
use or other consumption, of the transfer tax vehicle. The reduction  under this subsection
shall be made only  upon a showing by the purchaser that a privilege, excise, sales, transfer
or use tax has been paid.
(5) The use tax shall be collected by the Department of  Transportation from the pur-
chaser of the transfer tax vehicle in accordance with ORS 803.045.
SECTION 85.
 ORS 320.401 is amended to read:
320.401. For purposes of ORS 315.037, any tax expenditure enacted with respect to  any or all
[transportation project ] taxes  imposed under ORS 320.400 to 320.490  shall remain  in continuous
effect until the Legislative Assembly expressly provides otherwise.
SECTION 86.  ORS 320.405, as amended by section 59 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
320.405. (1) A tax is imposed on each vehicle dealer for the privilege of engaging  in the business
of selling [ taxable motor ] privilege tax vehicles at retail in this state.
(2)(a) The privilege tax shall be computed at the rate of one percent of the retail sales price  of
the [ taxable motor ] privilege tax vehicle. The tax may be rounded to the nearest whole cent.
(b) The privilege tax becomes due upon the sale at  retail of a [ taxable motor ] privilege tax ve-
hicle that:
(A) Has never been registered in this state; or
(B) Has been registered only to a vehicle dealer for use as a demonstrator in the course  of the
vehicle dealer’s business.
(3)(a) A vehicle dealer may collect the amount of the privilege tax computed on the  retail sales
price of a [ taxable motor ] privilege tax vehicle from the purchaser of the  [ taxable motor ] privilege
tax vehicle.
[60]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph  (a) of this subsection, the purchaser of a [ taxable motor ] privilege
tax vehicle  from whom the privilege tax is collected is not considered a taxpayer for purposes of
the privilege tax imposed under this section.
SECTION 87.
 ORS 320.410, as amended by section 60 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
320.410. (1) A use tax  is imposed on the storage, use or other consumption in this state of [ tax-
able motor ] privilege tax vehicles purchased at retail from any seller.
(2) The use tax shall be computed at the rate of one percent of the retail sales price of  the
[taxable motor ] privilege tax vehicle.
(3) The use tax is a liability of the purchaser of the [ taxable motor ] privilege tax vehicle.
(4) The use tax shall be reduced, but not below zero, by  the amount of any privilege, excise,
sales, transfer  or use tax  imposed by any jurisdiction on the sale, or on the storage, use or other
consumption, of the [ taxable motor ] privilege tax vehicle. The reduction under this subsection shall
be made only upon a showing by the purchaser that  a privilege, excise, sales or use tax has been
paid.
[(5) The amount of the use tax shall be separately stated  on an invoice, receipt or other similar
document that the seller provides to the purchaser or shall be otherwise disclosed to the purchaser. ]
[(6) A purchaser’s liability for the use tax is satisfied by a  valid receipt given to the purchaser
under ORS 320.420 by the seller of the taxable motor vehicle. ]
(5) The use tax shall  be collected by the Department of Transportation from the pur-
chaser of the privilege tax vehicle in accordance with ORS 803.045.
SECTION 88.  ORS 320.420 is amended to read:
320.420. [ (1) A seller shall collect the use tax imposed under ORS 320.410 from a purchaser of a
taxable motor vehicle and give the purchaser a receipt  for the use tax in the manner and form pre-
scribed by the Department of Revenue if: ]
[(a) The seller is: ]
[(A) Engaged in business in this state; ]
[(B) Required to collect the use tax; or ]
[(C) Authorized  by the department, under rules the department adopts, to collect the use tax and,
for purposes of the use tax, regarded as a seller engaged in business in this state; and ]
[(b) The seller makes sales of taxable motor vehicles for storage,  use or other consumption in this
state that are subject to the use tax. ]
[(2) A seller required to collect the use tax under this section shall collect the tax: ]
[(a) At the time of the taxable sale; or ]
[(b) If the storage, use or other consumption of the taxable motor vehicle  is not taxable at the time
of sale, at the time the storage, use or other consumption becomes taxable. ]
[(3)] (1) To ensure the proper administration of ORS 320.410  and section 87 of this 2025 Act ,
and to prevent evasion of the use [ tax] taxes, the following presumptions are established:
(a) A [ taxable] motor vehicle is stored, used or otherwise consumed in this state if it  is present
in this state for private or public display or storage.
(b)[(A)] A [ taxable] motor vehicle sold by any seller for  delivery in this state was sold for stor-
age, use or other consumption in this state unless the contrary is proved.
[(B) The burden of proving the contrary is on the seller unless the seller  takes from the purchaser
a resale certificate to the effect that the taxable  motor vehicle was purchased for resale in the ordinary
course of the purchaser’s business. ]
[(c)(A) A taxable motor vehicle delivered outside this state to a purchaser  known by the seller to
[61]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
be a resident of this state was purchased  from the seller for storage, use or other consumption in this
state and stored, used or otherwise consumed in this state unless the contrary is proved. ]
[(B) The contrary may be proved by: ]
[(i) A statement in writing, signed by the purchaser or an authorized agent of the purchaser  and
retained by the seller, that the  taxable motor vehicle was purchased for storage, use or other con-
sumption exclusively at a designated point or points outside this state; or ]
(2)(a) A purchaser ordinarily engaged in the business of selling motor vehicles  is not li-
able for use taxes with respect to any motor  vehicle purchased in the course of that business
upon a showing of:
(A) A resale certificate related to the purchase of the motor vehicle; or
[(ii)] (B) Other evidence satisfactory to the Department of Transportation  that the  [ taxable]
motor vehicle was not purchased for storage, use or other consumption in this state.
(b) The resale certificate must be substantially in the form prescribed by the department
by rule.
SECTION 89.
 ORS 320.425 is amended to read:
320.425. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 320.405, a seller is not liable for the privilege tax  with respect
to a [ taxable motor ] privilege tax vehicle that is sold to:
(a) A purchaser who is not a resident of this state; or
(b) A business if the storage, use  or other consumption of the [ taxable motor ] privilege tax ve-
hicle will occur primarily outside this state.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS  320.405, a seller is not liable for the privilege tax with respect to an
otherwise taxable [ motor] privilege tax  vehicle  that is sold at an event that lasts less than seven
consecutive days, for which the public is charged admission  and at which otherwise taxable
[motor] privilege tax vehicles are sold at auction.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 320.405 [ to 320.420] and 320.415, a resale certificate taken from  a
purchaser ordinarily engaged in the business  of selling [ taxable] privilege tax vehicles or taxable
bicycles relieves the  seller from the obligation to collect and remit [ transportation project ] the re-
spective taxes.
(b) For purposes of this subsection,  a resale certificate must be substantially in  the form
prescribed by the Department of Revenue by rule.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding section 83 of this  2025 Act, a purchaser ordinarily engaged in the
business of selling transfer tax vehicles is not liable for the transfer  tax with respect to any
transfer tax vehicle purchased in the course of that business upon a showing of a resale
certificate related to the purchase of the transfer tax vehicle.
(b) For  purposes of this subsection, a resale certificate must be substantially in the form
prescribed by the Department of Transportation by rule.
SECTION 90.
 ORS 320.430 is amended to read:
320.430. (1)(a) If the amount  of [ transportation project taxes ] privilege taxes or bicycle taxes
paid by a seller or purchaser exceeds the amount of taxes  due, the Department of Revenue shall
refund the amount of the excess.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, the period prescribed  for the depart-
ment to allow or make a refund of any overpayment of [ transportation project ] the taxes paid shall
be as provided in ORS 314.415.
(c) The department shall  apply any overpayment of tax first to any amount of [ transportation
project] the taxes that is then outstanding.
[62]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2)(a) This subsection applies whenever a  [ taxable motor ] privilege tax  vehicle with respect to
which the privilege tax [ imposed under ORS 320.405 ] has been paid by the  vehicle dealer is returned
by or on behalf of the purchaser to the vehicle dealer pursuant to ORS 646A.400 to 646A.418.
(b) The vehicle dealer shall notify the department of the return of the [ taxable motor ] privilege
tax vehicle, and  the department shall refund the amount of the privilege tax collected with respect
to the [ taxable motor ] privilege tax vehicle to the vehicle dealer.
(c) Upon receipt of the refund under this subsection, the vehicle  dealer shall return the amount
received under paragraph (b) of this subsection to the purchaser.
SECTION 91.
(1) If the amount  of transfer taxes or use taxes paid by a purchaser exceeds
the amount of taxes due, the Department of Transportation shall refund the amount  of the
excess.
(2) The department  shall apply any overpayment of tax first to any amount of transfer
taxes or use taxes that is then outstanding.
SECTION 92.  ORS 320.435, as amended by section 60a of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
320.435. (1) The Department  of Revenue shall deposit all revenue collected from the privilege tax
[imposed under ORS 320.405 and the use tax  imposed under ORS 320.410 ] in a suspense account es-
tablished under ORS 293.445 for the purpose of receiving the revenue. The department  may pay ex-
penses for the administration and enforcement of the privilege  tax  [ and use taxes ] out of moneys
received  from  the privilege  tax  [ and use taxes ]. Amounts necessary to pay administrative and
enforcement expenses are continuously appropriated to the department from the suspense account.
(2) After payment of administrative  and enforcement expenses under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion and refunds or credits arising from  erroneous overpayments, the department shall transfer the
balance of the moneys received from the privilege  tax  [ and use taxes ] as follows:
[(a) Moneys attributable to the privilege tax shall be transferred as follows: ]
[(A)] (a) Fifty percent of the gross amount of moneys received from the  privilege tax shall be
transferred annually to the Railroad Fund established under ORS 824.014; and
[(B)] (b) Of the remaining 50 percent:
[(i)] (A) The greater of $12 million or 45 percent  of the moneys received shall be transferred
annually to the Zero-Emission Incentive Fund established under ORS 468.449.
[(ii)] (B) After the transfer required  under [ sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph ] subpar-
agraph (A) of this paragraph , the balance of the moneys shall be transferred to the Connect
Oregon Fund established under ORS 367.080.
[(b) Moneys attributable to the use tax shall be transferred to the State Highway Fund. ]
SECTION 93.  ORS 320.440 is amended to read:
320.440. (1) The Department of Revenue shall deposit all revenue collected from  the [ excise tax
imposed under ORS 320.415 ] bicycle tax  in a suspense account established under ORS 293.445 for
the purposes of receiving the  [ excise tax ] revenue. The department may pay expenses for the ad-
ministration and enforcement of the [ excise ] bicycle tax  out of moneys received from the [ excise ] tax.
Amounts necessary to pay administrative  and enforcement expenses are continuously appropriated
to the department from the suspense account.
(2) After payment of administrative  and enforcement expenses under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion and refunds or credits arising from  erroneous overpayments, the department shall transfer the
balance of the moneys received from the [ excise ] bicycle tax to the Multimodal  Active Transporta-
tion Fund established under ORS 367.091 for the purpose of providing grants  for bicycle and pedes-
trian transportation projects under ORS 367.093.
[63]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 94.
 ORS 320.445 is amended to read:
320.445. (1) [ Except as otherwise provided in ORS 320.400 to 320.490 and 803.203, the use tax im-
posed under ORS 320.410 and ] The [ excise ] bicycle tax  [ imposed under ORS 320.415 ] shall be col-
lected at the point of sale and remitted by each seller that engages in the retail sale of taxable
[vehicles] bicycles. [ Each] The bicycle  tax is considered a tax upon the seller  that is required to
collect the tax, and the seller is considered a taxpayer.
(2) Each seller of [ taxable] privilege tax vehicles or taxable bicycles  that is liable for [ trans-
portation project ] the privilege taxes or bicycle  taxes shall file a  return with the Department of
Revenue, in the form and manner prescribed by the department, on or before the last day of January,
April, July and October of each year for the previous calendar quarter. The return  shall show the
amount of [ transportation project ] the taxes due for retail sales made during  the calendar quarter
to which the return relates.
(3) Each seller shall pay the [ applicable transportation  project ] taxes to the department in the
form and manner  prescribed by the department, but not later than the date of submitting each
quarterly return, without regard to extensions under subsection (5) of this section.
(4) Sellers of privilege tax vehicles and  taxable [ vehicles] bicycles  shall file the returns re-
quired under this section with respect to  the [ privilege tax imposed under ORS 320.405 and the excise
tax imposed under ORS 320.415 ] taxes regardless of whether any taxes are owed.
(5) The department may extend  the time for making any return required under this section if a
written request is filed with the department during or  prior to the period for which the extension
may be granted. The department may not grant an extension of more than 30 days.
(6) Interest shall be added to delinquent tax amounts at the  rate established under ORS 305.220
from the time the return to which the delinquent tax amounts relate was originally required to  be
filed to the time of payment.
SECTION 95.
 ORS 320.450 is amended to read:
320.450. (1) Every seller of [ taxable] privilege tax vehicles  or taxable bicycles  [ who] that col-
lects any amount of [ transportation project taxes ] privilege taxes or bicycle  taxes  shall hold the
amount in trust for the State of Oregon and for payment to  the Department of Revenue in the
manner and at the time provided in ORS 320.445.
(2) If a seller of [ taxable] privilege tax vehicles or taxable bicycles  fails to remit any amount
of [ transportation project ] the taxes, whether collected or  not, the department may enforce collection
by the issuance of a distraint warrant for the collection of the delinquent amount  and all penalties,
interest and collection charges accrued on the delinquent amount. The warrant  shall be issued and
proceeded upon in the same manner and shall  have the same force and effect as is prescribed with
respect to warrants for the collection of delinquent income taxes.
(3)(a) In the case of a seller that is assessed under the provisions of ORS 305.265 (12) and 314.407
(1), the department  may issue a notice of liability to any officer, employee or member of the seller
at any time within three years after the assessment. Within 30 days after the date on  which the
notice of liability is mailed to the officer, employee or member, the officer, employee or member shall
pay the assessment, plus penalties and interest,  or advise the department in writing of objections to
the liability and, if desired, request a conference. A conference shall be governed by  the provisions
of ORS 305.265 pertaining to a conference requested from a notice of deficiency.
(b) After a conference or, if no conference is  requested, a determination of the issues raised in
the written objections, the department shall mail the officer, employee  or member a conference let-
ter affirming, canceling or adjusting the notice of liability. Within 90 days after the date on which
[64]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the conference letter is mailed to the officer, employee or member, the  officer, employee or member
shall pay the assessment,  plus penalties and interest, or appeal to the tax court in the manner pro-
vided for an appeal from a notice of assessment.
(c) If the department does not receive payment or written objection to the notice of liability
within 30 days after the notice of liability was mailed,  the notice of liability becomes final. The of-
ficer, employee or member may appeal the notice of liability to the  tax court within 90 days after
the notice became final in the manner provided for an appeal from a notice of assessment.
(4)(a) In the case of a seller that fails to  file a return on the due date, in addition to any action
described in the provisions of ORS 305.265 (10) and 314.400, the department may  issue a notice of
determination and assessment to any officer, employee or member  of the seller at any time within
three years after the assessment. The time of assessment against the officer, employee  or member
is 30 days after the date on which the notice of  determination and assessment is mailed. Within 30
days after the date on which the  notice of determination and assessment is mailed to the officer,
employee or member,  the officer, employee or member shall pay the assessment, plus penalties and
interest, or advise the department in writing of  objections to the assessment and, if desired, request
a conference. A conference shall be governed by the provisions of  ORS 305.265 pertaining to a
conference requested from a notice of deficiency.
(b) After a conference or, if no conference is  requested, a determination of the issues raised in
the written objections, the department shall mail the officer, employee  or member a conference let-
ter affirming,  canceling or adjusting the notice of determination and assessment. Within 90 days af-
ter the date on which the conference letter is mailed to the  officer, employee or member, the officer,
employee or member shall pay the assessment, plus penalties  and interest, or appeal to the tax court
in the manner provided for an appeal from a notice of assessment.
(c) If the department does not  receive payment or written objection to the notice of determi-
nation and assessment  within 30 days after the notice of determination and assessment was mailed,
the notice of determination and  assessment becomes final. The officer, employee or member may
appeal the notice of determination and assessment to the tax court within  90 days after the notice
became final in the manner provided for an appeal from a notice of assessment.
(5)(a) More than one officer or employee of a corporation may be held jointly and severally lia-
ble for payment of [ transportation project ] privilege taxes or bicycle  taxes.
(b) Notwithstanding the confidentiality provisions of ORS 320.475,  if the department determines
that more than one officer or employee of  a corporation may be held jointly and severally liable for
payment of  the [ transportation project ] taxes, the department may require any or all of the officers
or employees to appear before the department for a joint determination of liability.  The department
shall notify each officer or employee of the time and place set for the determination of liability.
(c) Each individual notified of a joint determination under this subsection must  appear and
present such  information as is necessary to establish the individual’s liability or nonliability for
payment of  the taxes to the department. If an individual who was notified fails to appear, the de-
partment shall make the  determination on the basis of all the information and evidence presented.
The department’s determination is binding on all individuals notified and required to appear under
this subsection.
(d)(A) If any individual determined to be liable for unpaid [ transportation project ] taxes under
this subsection appeals the determination to the Oregon Tax Court  under ORS 320.470, the individ-
ual plaintiff shall implead all  individuals required to appear with the plaintiff before the department
under this subsection. The department may implead any officer or employee who may  be held jointly
[65]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and severally liable for the  payment of the [ transportation project ] taxes. Each individual impleaded
under this paragraph shall  be made a party to the action before the tax court and shall make
available to the tax court the information that was presented before the department, as well as other
information that may be presented to the tax court.
(B) The tax court may determine that one or more individuals impleaded under this paragraph
are liable for unpaid  [transportation project ] taxes without regard to any earlier determination by the
department that an impleaded individual was not liable for the unpaid taxes.
(C) If an individual required to appear before the tax court  under this subsection fails or refuses
to appear or bring such information in part or in whole, or is  outside the jurisdiction of the tax
court, the tax court shall make its determination on the  basis of all the evidence introduced.
Notwithstanding ORS 320.475, the evidence introduced in the tax court constitutes a public  record
and shall be available to the parties and the tax court. The determination of the tax court is
binding on all individuals made parties to the action under this subsection.
(e) This subsection may not be construed to preclude a determination by the department or the
tax court that  more than one officer or employee is jointly and severally liable for unpaid [ trans-
portation project ] privilege taxes or bicycle  taxes.
SECTION 96.
 ORS 320.460 is amended to read:
320.460. (1)(a)  A seller of [ taxable] privilege tax vehicles  or taxable bicycles  shall keep re-
ceipts, invoices and other pertinent records related to retail sales of [ taxable] privilege tax vehicles
or taxable bicycles  in the form required by  the Department of Revenue. Each record shall be pre-
served for five years from the time to which the record relates, or  for as long as the seller retains
the [ taxable] privilege tax vehicles or taxable bicycles  to which the  record relates, whichever is
later.
(b) During the retention period and at any time prior  to the destruction of records, the depart-
ment may give written notice to the seller not to destroy records described in the  notice without
written permission of the department.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department shall preserve reports  and re-
turns filed with the department for at least five years.
(2) ORS 314.425 applies to the authority  of the Department of Revenue to examine, or cause to
be examined by an agent or representative designated by  the department for the purpose, any books,
papers, records or memoranda bearing upon  the matter required to be included in any return re-
quired under ORS [ 320.400 to 320.490 and 803.203 ] 320.445 for the purpose of ascertaining the cor-
rectness  of  the return or for the purpose of making an estimate of the taxable sales of the taxpayer.
SECTION 97.  ORS 320.465 is amended to read:
320.465. (1) The Department of Revenue may, by order or subpoena  to be served with the same
force and effect and in  the same manner as a subpoena is served in a civil action in the circuit court
or the  Oregon Tax Court, require the production at any time and place the department designates
of any books, papers, accounts  or other information necessary to carry out ORS 320.400 to 320.490
[and 803.203]. The department may require the  attendance of any individual having knowledge in the
premises, and may take testimony and require proof material for the  information, with power to
administer oaths to the individual.
(2)(a) If an individual fails to comply with a subpoena or order of the department  or to produce
or permit  the examination or inspection of any books, papers, records and equipment pertinent to
an investigation  or inquiry under ORS 320.400 to 320.490 [ and 803.203], or to testify to any matter
regarding which the individual is lawfully interrogated, the department may apply to the Oregon
[66]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Tax Court or to the circuit court of  the county in which the individual resides or where the indi-
vidual is for  an order to the individual to attend and testify or otherwise comply with the demand
or request of the department.
(b) The department shall apply  to the court by ex parte motion, upon which the court shall make
an order requiring the individual against whom the motion is  directed to comply with the request
or demand of the department within 10 days after the service of the order, or within the  additional
time granted by the court, or to justify the failure within that time.  The order shall be served upon
the individual to whom it is directed in the  manner required by this state for service of process,
which is required to confer jurisdiction upon the court.
(3) Failure to obey any order issued by the court under this section is contempt of court.
(4) The remedy provided by this section is in addition  to other remedies, civil or criminal, ex-
isting under the tax laws or other laws of this state.
SECTION 98.
 ORS 320.470 is amended to read:
320.470. (1) Notwithstanding the confidentiality provisions of ORS  320.475, the Department of
Revenue may disclose information received under ORS 320.400 to 320.490 [ and 803.203] to the De-
partment of Transportation for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of ORS [ 320.405, 320.410
and 803.203] 320.400 to 320.490.
(2) The  Department of Transportation may disclose information obtained under ORS 320.410 and
803.203 and sections 83  and 84 of this 2025 Act  to the Department of Revenue for the purposes
of carrying out the provisions of ORS 320.400 to 320.490 [ and 803.203].
(3) [ Any ] An officer or employee of the Department of Transportation to whom  information is
disclosed under subsection (1) of this section is  not required to execute a certificate under ORS
314.840 (3)(a).
(4) Except as otherwise provided in ORS 320.400 to 320.490  [ and 803.203], a person aggrieved
by an act or determination of the Department of Revenue or its authorized  agent under ORS 320.400
to 320.490 [ and 803.203] may appeal, within 90 days after the act or determination, to the Oregon
Tax Court in the manner provided in ORS 305.404 to 305.560. These appeal rights are the  exclusive
remedy available to determine the person’s  liability for the [ transportation project taxes ] privilege
tax or the bicycle tax .
SECTION 99.  ORS 320.475 is amended to read:
320.475. Except as otherwise provided in ORS 320.400 to 320.490 [ and 803.203] or  where the
context requires otherwise, the provisions of ORS chapters 305  and 314 as to the audit and exam-
ination of returns, periods of limitation, determinations of and  notices of deficiencies, assessments,
collections, liens, delinquencies, claims for refund and refunds,  conferences, appeals to the Oregon
Tax Court, stays of collection pending appeal, confidentiality of returns and the related penalties,
and the related procedures, apply to the determinations of taxes, penalties  and interest under ORS
320.400 to 320.490 [ and 803.203].
SECTION 100.
 ORS 320.480 is amended to read:
320.480. (1) The Department of Revenue  shall administer and enforce [ ORS 320.400 to 320.490
and 803.203] the privilege tax and the bicycle tax .
(2) The department may adopt or establish rules and procedures that  the department considers
necessary or appropriate for the implementation,  administration and enforcement of [ ORS 320.400
to 320.490 and 803.203 ] the privilege tax and the bicycle tax  and  that are consistent with ORS
320.400 to 320.490 [ and 803.203].
(3) The Department of Transportation [ shall] may enter into [ an] any agreement with the De-
[67]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
partment of Revenue that the departments consider necessary or  convenient for purposes of the
implementation, administration and  enforcement [ by the Department of Transportation of those pro-
visions of ORS 803.203, and rules or procedures adopted or established by  the Department of Revenue
under this section, that the Department of  Transportation and the Department of Revenue determine
are necessary for the effective and efficient implementation, administration  and enforcement of ORS
803.203] of the privilege tax, the transfer tax, the use taxes or the bicycle tax .
SECTION 101.
 ORS 320.490 is amended to read:
320.490. (1) (a) A local government may not impose a tax described in paragraph (b) of this
subsection [ (2) of this section ] unless the tax is:
[(a)] (A) Authorized by statute; or
[(b)] (B) Approved by the governing body of the local government and in effect on or before
October 6, 2017.
[(2)] (b) This [ section] subsection applies to:
[(a)] (A) A tax  imposed on the privilege of engaging in the business of selling [ taxable motor ]
privilege tax vehicles at retail; and
[(b)] (B) Any privilege, excise, sales , transfer  or use tax imposed on or with respect to [ taxable
motor] privilege tax vehicles.
(2) A  local government may not impose any privilege, excise, sales, transfer or use tax
on or with respect to transfer tax vehicles unless the tax is:
(a) Authorized by statute; or
(b) Approved by the governing  body of the local government and in effect on or before
the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 102.
ORS 320.455 and 320.485 are repealed.
SECTION 103. ORS 803.045 is amended to read:
803.045. (1) The Department of Transportation shall issue  title for a vehicle if the applicant and
the vehicle meet the following qualifications:
(a) The applicant must  satisfy the department that the applicant is the owner of the vehicle and
is otherwise entitled to have title issued in the applicant’s name.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in ORS  803.050 (2), the applicant must submit a completed and
signed application for title described in ORS 803.050.
(c) The applicant must pay the fee for issuance of a certificate of title under ORS 803.090 or  the
fee for issuance  of title in another form, as established by the department by rule in accordance with
ORS 803.012.
(d) The applicant must pay any amount of tax imposed under  ORS 320.410 or section 83
or 84 of this 2025 Act that is due with respect to the transaction in which  the motor vehicle
for which title is sought was purchased.
[(d)] (e) If the vehicle is a reconstructed vehicle or  an assembled vehicle, the applicant must
provide the following information in addition to any other information required under this section:
(A) The certificate of title last issued for the frame of the vehicle, a salvage  title certificate is-
sued for the vehicle or other evidence of ownership satisfactory to the department.
(B) Bills of sale for major components used to build the vehicle.
[(e)] (f) If the vehicle is covered by an Oregon title or  salvage title certificate, the applicant
shall surrender the Oregon  title or salvage title certificate, submit an application as provided under
ORS 803.065 or submit other evidence of ownership satisfactory to the department.
[(f)] (g) Unless the department adopts rules to the contrary, if the vehicle is from another ju-
[68]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
risdiction, the applicant shall surrender to the department with the application the certificate of ti-
tle issued by the other jurisdiction, if such jurisdiction requires certificates of  title. If such
jurisdiction does not require certificates of title, then the applicant shall surrender the registration
cards.
[(g)] (h) If required by the department, the applicant must submit proof of ownership as  de-
scribed under ORS 803.205.
[(h)] (i) Other than a racing activity vehicle as defined in ORS 801.404, if the  department has
reason to believe a vehicle was not certified by the original  manufacturer as conforming to federal
vehicle standards, the department may require the applicant to provide proof  satisfactory to the
department that the vehicle conforms to federal vehicle standards.
[(i)] (j) Unless the vehicle is exempted from odometer disclosure requirements,  the applicant
shall submit an appropriate odometer  disclosure form. The department shall determine what consti-
tutes an appropriate form in any particular situation. The department may make  exceptions by rule
to the requirement for submission of an odometer disclosure form.
(2) The department may not issue title for a vehicle:
(a) Required by ORS 803.210 to be inspected unless the vehicle has been inspected as  described
in ORS 803.212 and the inspection fee paid under ORS 803.215.
(b) If the current vehicle title,  certificate, ownership document or the vehicle record available
through electronic record inquiry:
(A) Has a junk status;
(B) Is a junk title, junk certificate or similar ownership  document issued by another jurisdiction;
or
(C) Has a junk or similar brand or notation.
(c) As prescribed in ORS 803.591.
(3) The department may adopt  any rules it considers necessary for the administration of sub-
section (2)(a) and (b) of this section.
SECTION 104.
 ORS 803.203 is amended to read:
803.203. (1) A person that purchases a [ taxable motor ] privilege tax  vehicle from a seller that
is not subject to the privilege tax imposed under ORS 320.405 or a transfer tax vehicle  may not
register or title the [ taxable motor ] vehicle in Oregon unless the person provides proof that:
(a)(A) The person paid the  privilege use tax imposed under ORS 320.410; or
[(b)] (B) The person is not  required to pay the  privilege use tax for the reasons provided in ORS
320.410 (4) or 320.420; [ or]
(b)(A) The person paid the transfer tax imposed under section 83 of this 2025 Act; or
(B) The person is not required to pay the  transfer tax for the reasons provided in ORS
320.425;
(c)(A) The person paid  the transfer use tax imposed under section 84 of this 2025 Act;
or
(B) The person is not required to pay the  transfer use tax for the reasons provided in
ORS 320.410 (4) or 320.420; or
[(c)] (d) The [ taxable motor ] vehicle was purchased and titled  by a car rental company as defined
in ORS 803.219 using an electronic integrator.
(2) The person shall provide the proof described in subsection  (1) of this section to the Depart-
ment of Transportation in the manner established by the department by rule.
SECTION 105.
 ORS 803.585 is amended to read:
[69]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
803.585. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section or ORS 801.041 or 801.042,  the regis-
tration fees under the vehicle code are in lieu of all other taxes  and licenses, except municipal li-
cense fees under regulatory ordinances,  imposed on vehicles, the owners of such vehicles or the use
of or any privilege related to such vehicles. Fixed load vehicles  are not exempt from ad valorem
taxation by this section.
(2) Travel trailers subject to registration and titling under the vehicle code  are not subject to
ad valorem taxation, but may be reclassified as manufactured structures and  made subject to taxa-
tion as provided in ORS 308.880.
(3) This section does not apply to the privilege tax imposed under ORS 320.405 , [ or] the  privi-
lege use tax imposed under ORS 320.410 , the transfer tax  imposed under section 83 of this 2025
Act or the transfer use tax imposed under section 84 of this 2025 Act .
SECTION 106.
 ORS 822.043 is amended to read:
822.043. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Integrator” has the meaning given that term in ORS 802.600.
(b) “Vehicle dealer” means a person issued a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS 822.020.
(2) A vehicle dealer that the Department of Transportation has designated to act as  an agent
of the department under  ORS 802.031 may elect to prepare, submit, or prepare and submit documents
necessary to:
(a) Issue or transfer a certificate of title for a vehicle;
(b) Register a vehicle or transfer registration of a vehicle;
(c) Issue a registration plate;
(d) Verify and clear a title;
(e) Perfect, release or satisfy a lien or other security interest;
(f) Comply with federal security requirements; or
(g) Render any other services  for the purpose of complying with state and federal laws related
to the sale of a vehicle.
(3) A vehicle dealer who prepares any documents described in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) May charge a purchaser of a vehicle a document processing  fee for the preparation of those
documents.
(b) May not charge a  purchaser of a vehicle a document processing fee for the submission of
any document or the issuance of a registration plate.
(c) May  charge a purchaser of a vehicle a document processing fee for performing any of the
services described in subsection (2) of this section in connection with preparing the documents de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) A purchaser of a vehicle may  negotiate the amount of the document processing fee with a
vehicle dealer, but in no case shall the  document processing fee charged by a vehicle dealer under
this section exceed:
(a) $250, if the vehicle dealer uses an integrator; or
(b) $200, if the vehicle dealer does not use an integrator.
(5) If a vehicle dealer charges a document processing fee  under subsection (4)(a) of this section,
of the amount collected $35 shall be paid to the integrator.
(6) Unless otherwise provided by rule, if a vehicle dealer uses an integrator and charges a doc-
ument processing fee greater than that charged for not using an integrator, the dealer  must inform
the purchaser of the vehicle of the  option of using an integrator to prepare the documents. The
purchaser may then elect whether or not to have  the vehicle dealer use an integrator to prepare the
[70]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
documents.
(7) If the purchaser of a vehicle  pays a document processing fee, the vehicle dealer shall prepare
and submit all documents to complete the transaction as permitted by law.
(8)(a) A vehicle dealer who collects  the privilege tax imposed under ORS 320.405 from the pur-
chaser of a [ taxable motor ] privilege tax vehicle may collect the  privilege tax at the same time and
in the same manner as the vehicle dealer collects document processing fees under this section.  The
amount of the privilege tax shall be in addition to  and not in lieu of document processing fees col-
lected under this section.
(b) A vehicle dealer may exclude the amount of the privilege tax  from the capitalized cost and
offering price of a [ taxable motor ] privilege tax  vehicle as those terms are defined by the Depart-
ment of Justice by rule.
SECTION 107.
 ORS 317A.100, as amended by section 26, chapter 75,  Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
317A.100. As used in ORS 317A.100 to 317A.158:
(1)(a) “Commercial activity” means:
(A) The total amount realized by a person, arising from  transactions and activity in the regular
course of the person’s trade or business, without deduction for expenses incurred by the  trade or
business;
(B) If received by a financial institution:
(i) If the reporting person for a  financial institution is a holding company, all items of income
reported on the FR Y-9 filed by the holding company;
(ii) If the reporting person for a financial institution is a bank  organization, all items of income
reported on the call report filed by the bank organization; and
(iii) If the reporting person  for a financial institution is a nonbank financial organization, all
items of income reported in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles; and
(C)(i) If received by an insurer,  as reported on the statement of premiums accompanying the
annual statement required  under ORS 731.574 to be filed with the Director of the Department of
Consumer and Business Services, all gross direct  life insurance premiums, gross direct accident and
health insurance premiums and gross direct property and casualty insurance premiums; and
(ii) The gross amount of surplus lines  premiums received on Oregon home state risks as shown
in the report required by ORS 735.465.
(b) “Commercial activity” does not include:
(A) Interest income except:
(i) Interest on credit sales; or
(ii) Interest income, including service charges, received by financial institutions;
(B) Receipts from the sale, exchange or other disposition of an asset described in  section 1221
or 1231 of  the Internal Revenue Code, without regard to the length of time the person held the asset;
(C) If received by an insurer, federally reinsured premiums or income  from transactions between
a reciprocal insurer and its attorney in fact operating under ORS 731.142;
(D) Receipts from hedging  transactions, to the extent that the transactions are entered into
primarily to protect a financial position, including transactions intended to  manage the risk of ex-
posure to foreign currency fluctuations that affect assets, liabilities, profits, losses, equity or in-
vestments in foreign operations, risk  of exposure to interest rate fluctuations or risk of commodity
price  fluctuations;
(E) Proceeds received attributable  to the repayment, maturity or redemption of the principal of
[71]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a loan, bond, mutual fund, certificate of deposit or marketable instrument;
(F) The principal amount received under a repurchase agreement or on  account of any trans-
action properly characterized as a loan to the person;
(G) Contributions received by a trust, plan or other arrangement, any of which is described in
section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue  Code, or to which title 26, subtitle A, chapter 1, subchapter
(D) of the Internal Revenue Code applies;
(H) Compensation, whether current or deferred, and whether in cash  or in kind, received or to
be received by an employee, a former employee or the employee’s legal successor for services  ren-
dered to or for an employer, including reimbursements  received by or for an individual for medical
or education expenses, health insurance premiums or employee expenses or  on account of a de-
pendent care spending  account, legal services plan, any cafeteria plan described in section 125 of
the Internal Revenue Code or any similar employee reimbursement;
(I) Proceeds received from the  issuance of the taxpayer’s own stock, options, warrants, puts or
calls, or from the sale of the taxpayer’s treasury stock;
(J) Proceeds received on the account of  payments from insurance policies, including crop in-
surance policies, owned by the taxpayer, except those proceeds received  for the loss of commercial
activity;
(K) Gifts or  charitable contributions received, membership dues received by trade, professional,
homeowners’ or condominium associations, payments received for  educational courses, meetings or
meals, or similar payments to a trade,  professional or other similar association, and fundraising re-
ceipts received by any person when any excess receipts are donated or used  exclusively for chari-
table purposes;
(L) Damages received as the result of litigation  in excess of amounts that, if received without
litigation, would be treated as commercial activity;
(M) Property, money and other amounts received or  acquired by an agent on behalf of another
in excess of the agent’s commission, fee or other remuneration;
(N) Tax refunds from any tax program, other tax benefit recoveries and reimbursements  for the
tax imposed under ORS 317A.100 to 317A.158 made by entities that are part  of the same unitary
group as provided under ORS 317A.106, and reimbursements made by entities that are  not members
of a unitary group that are required to be made for economic parity among  multiple owners of an
entity whose tax obligation under ORS 317A.100 to 317A.158 is required to be reported and  paid
entirely by one owner, as provided in ORS 317A.106;
(O) Pension reversions;
(P) Contributions to capital;
(Q) Receipts from the sale, transfer, exchange or other  disposition of motor vehicle fuel or any
other product used for the propulsion of motor vehicles;
(R) In the case of receipts from the sale of cigarettes or  tobacco products by a wholesale dealer,
retail dealer, distributor, manufacturer or seller, an amount equal to  the federal and state excise
taxes paid by any person on or for such cigarettes or tobacco products under subtitle E of the
Internal Revenue Code or ORS chapter 323;
(S) In the case of receipts from the sale of malt beverages or wine, as defined in ORS  471.001,
cider, as defined in ORS  471.023 or distilled liquor, as defined in ORS 471.001, by a person holding
a license issued under ORS chapter 471, an amount equal to the federal and  state excise taxes paid
by any person on or for such  malt beverages, wine or distilled liquor under subtitle E of the Internal
Revenue Code or ORS chapter 471 or  473, and any amount paid to the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis
[72]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Commission for sales of distilled spirits by an agent appointed under ORS 471.750;
(T) In the case of receipts from the  sale of marijuana items, as defined in ORS 475C.009, by a
person holding a license issued under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525, an amount equal  to the federal and
state excise taxes paid  by any person on or for such marijuana items under subtitle E of the Internal
Revenue Code or ORS 475C.670 to 475C.734 and any local retail taxes authorized under ORS
475C.453;
(U) Local  taxes collected by a restaurant or other food establishment on sales of meals, prepared
food or beverages;
(V) Tips or gratuities collected by a  restaurant or other food establishment and passed on to
employees;
(W) Receipts realized  by a vehicle dealer certified under ORS 822.020 or a person described in
ORS 320.400 [ (8)(a)(B)] (16)(a)(B)  from the sale or other transfer of  a motor vehicle, as defined in
ORS 801.360, to another vehicle dealer for the purpose of resale by the  transferee vehicle dealer,
but only if the sale or other transfer  was based upon the transferee’s need to meet a specific
customer’s preference for a motor vehicle or is  an exchange of new vehicles between franchised
motor vehicle dealerships;
(X) Registration fees  or taxes collected by a vehicle dealer certified under ORS 822.020 or a
person described in ORS 320.400 [ (8)(a)(B)] (16)(a)(B) at the sale  or other transfer of a motor vehi-
cle, as defined in ORS  801.360, that are owed to a third party by the purchaser of the motor vehicle
and passed to the third party by the dealer;
(Y) Receipts from a financial institution for services provided to  the financial institution in
connection with the  issuance, processing, servicing and management of loans or credit accounts, if
the financial institution and the recipient of the receipts have at least 50 percent of  their ownership
interests owned  or controlled, directly or constructively through related interests, by common own-
ers;
(Z) In the case of amounts retained as commissions by a holder of a license under ORS  chapter
462, an amount equal to the amounts specified under  ORS chapter 462 that must be paid to or col-
lected by the Department of Revenue as a tax and the amounts specified under ORS chapter  462 to
be used as purse money;
(AA) Receipts of residential  care facilities as defined in ORS 443.400 or in-home care agencies
as defined in ORS 443.305,  to the extent that the receipts are derived from or received as compen-
sation for providing services to a medical assistance or Medicare recipient;
(BB) Dividends received;
(CC) Distributive income received from a pass-through entity;
(DD) Receipts from sales  to a wholesaler in this state, if the seller receives certification at the
time of sale from the wholesaler that the wholesaler will sell the purchased property outside this
state;
(EE) Receipts from the wholesale or retail sale of groceries, including receipts of a person that
owns groceries at the time of sale and compensation of any consignee engaged in effecting the  sale
of groceries on behalf the owner of the groceries, but only  to the extent that the compensation re-
lates to grocery sales;
(FF) Receipts from transactions among members of a unitary group;
(GG) Moneys, including public purpose charge moneys collected under  ORS 757.612 and moneys
collected to plan for and pursue cost-effective energy efficiency resources under  ORS 757.054, that
are collected from customers, passed to a utility and approved by the Public Utility  Commission and
[73]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
that support  energy conservation, renewable resource acquisition and low-income assistance pro-
grams;
(HH) Moneys collected by a utility from customers for the payment of loans through  on-bill fi-
nancing;
(II) Surcharges collected under ORS 757.736;
(JJ) Moneys passed  to a utility by the Bonneville Power Administration for the purpose of
effectuating the Regional Power Act  Exchange credits or pursuant to any settlement associated with
the exchange credit;
(KK) Moneys collected or recovered, by  entities listed in ORS 756.310, cable operators as de-
fined in 47  U.S.C. 522(5), telecommunications carriers as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153(51) and providers
of information services as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153(24), for fees payable under ORS 756.310, right-of-
way fees, franchise fees, privilege taxes, federal taxes and local taxes;
(LL) Charges paid to the Residential Service Protection Fund required by chapter 290, Oregon
Laws 1987;
(MM) Universal  service surcharge moneys collected or recovered and paid into the universal
service fund established in ORS 759.425;
(NN) Moneys collected for public purpose funding as described in ORS 759.430;
(OO) Moneys collected or recovered and paid into the federal universal  service fund as deter-
mined by the Federal Communications Commission;
(PP) In the case of  a seller or provider of telecommunications services, the amount of tax im-
posed under ORS 403.200 for access to  the emergency communications system that is collected from
subscribers or consumers;
(QQ) In the case of a  transient lodging tax collector, the amount of tax imposed under ORS
320.305 and of any local transient lodging tax imposed upon the occupancy of transit lodging;
(RR) In the  case of a seller of bicycles, the amount of tax imposed under ORS 320.415 upon retail
sales of bicycles;
(SS) In the case of a qualified heavy equipment provider, the amount  of tax imposed under ORS
307.872 upon the rental price of heavy equipment;
(TT) Farmer sales to an  agricultural cooperative in this state that is a cooperative organization
described in section 1381 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(UU) Revenue received by a  business entity that is mandated by contract or subcontract to be
distributed to another  person or entity if the revenue constitutes sales commissions that are paid
to a person who is  not an employee of the business entity, including, without limitation, a split-fee
real estate commission;
(VV) Receipts from the sale of fluid milk by dairy farmers that are not  members of an agricul-
tural cooperative; and
(WW)(i) Cost paid by a dealer for items of precious metal.
(ii) As used in this subparagraph, “item of  precious metal” means an item of gold, silver,
platinum, rhodium or palladium that has been put through a process of smelting or  refining and that
is in a state or condition that its value depends on its contents and not its form.
(2) “Cost inputs” means:
(a) The cost  of goods sold as calculated in arriving at federal taxable income under the Internal
Revenue Code; or
(b) In the case of a taxpayer that is engaged  in a farming operation, as defined in ORS 317A.102,
and that does not report cost of  goods sold for federal tax purposes, the taxpayer’s operating ex-
[74]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
penses excluding labor costs.
(3) “Doing business” means engaging in any activity, whether legal or illegal,  that is conducted
for, or results in, the receipt of commercial activity at any time during a calendar year.
(4) “Excluded person” means any of the following:
(a) Organizations described  in sections 501(c) and 501(j) of the Internal Revenue Code, unless the
exemption is denied under section 501(h), (i) or (m) or under section 502, 503 or  505 of the Internal
Revenue Code.
(b) Organizations described in section 501(d) of the Internal  Revenue Code, unless the exemption
is denied under section 502 or 503 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(c) Organizations described in section 501(e) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(d) Organizations described in section 501(f) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(e) Charitable risk pools described in section 501(n) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(f) Organizations described in section 521 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(g) Qualified state tuition programs described in section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(h) Foreign or alien insurance companies, but only with respect to the  underwriting profit de-
rived from writing wet marine and transportation insurance subject to tax  under ORS 731.824 and
731.828 or if an insurance company is subject to the retaliatory tax  under ORS 731.854 and 731.859.
(i) Governmental entities.
(j) Any person with commercial activity that does not exceed $750,000 for the tax year,  other
than a person that is part  of a unitary group as provided in ORS 317A.106 with commercial activity
in excess of $750,000.
(k) Hospitals subject to  assessment under ORS 414.855, long term care facilities subject to as-
sessment under ORS 409.801 or any entity subject to assessment under ORS 414.880 or section 3 or
5, chapter 538, Oregon Laws 2017.
(L) Manufactured dwelling park nonprofit cooperatives organized under ORS chapter 62.
(5) “Financial institution” has the meaning given that term in  ORS 314.610, except that “finan-
cial institution” does not include a credit union.
(6)(a) “FR Y-9” means the consolidated or parent-only financial statements that a holding com-
pany is required to file with the Federal Reserve Board pursuant to 12 U.S.C. 1844.
(b) In the  case of a holding company required to file both consolidated and parent-only financial
statements, “FR Y-9” means the consolidated financial statements that the holding company is  re-
quired to file.
(7) “Governmental entity” means:
(a) The United States and any of its unincorporated agencies and instrumentalities.
(b) Any incorporated agency or  instrumentality of the United States wholly owned by the United
States or by a corporation wholly owned by the United States.
(c) The State of Oregon and any of its unincorporated agencies and instrumentalities.
(d) Any county, city, district or other political subdivision of the state.
(e) A special government body as defined in ORS 174.117.
(f) A federally recognized Indian tribe.
(8) “Groceries” means food as defined in 7 U.S.C.  2012(k), but does not include cannabinoid
edibles or marijuana seeds.
(9)(a) “Hedging transaction” means a hedging transaction as defined  in section 1221 of the
Internal Revenue Code or a transaction accorded hedge  accounting treatment under Financial Ac-
counting Standards Board Statement No. 133.
[75]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) “Hedging transaction” does not include  a transaction in which an actual transfer of title of
real or tangible property to another entity occurs.
(10) “Insurer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 317.010.
(11) “Internal Revenue Code,” except where the Legislative Assembly  has provided otherwise,
refers to the laws of the United States  or to the Internal Revenue Code as they are amended and
in effect on December 31, 2023.
(12) “Labor costs” means total compensation of all  employees, not to include compensation paid
to any single employee in excess of $500,000.
(13)(a) “Motor vehicle fuel or any other product used for the  propulsion of motor vehicles”
means:
(A) Motor vehicle fuel as defined in ORS 319.010; and
(B) Fuel the use of which in a motor vehicle is subject to taxation under ORS 319.530.
(b) “Motor vehicle fuel or any other product used for the propulsion of motor  vehicles” does not
mean:
(A) Electricity; or
(B) Electric batteries or any other mechanical  or physical component or accessory of a motor
vehicle.
(14) “Person” includes individuals, combinations of individuals  of any form, receivers, assignees,
trustees in bankruptcy, firms, companies, joint-stock companies, business  trusts, estates, partner-
ships, limited  liability partnerships, limited liability companies, associations, joint ventures, clubs,
societies, entities organized as for-profit  corporations under ORS chapter 60, C corporations, S cor-
porations, qualified subchapter S subsidiaries, qualified subchapter S trusts, trusts, entities that  are
disregarded for federal income tax purposes and any other entities.
(15) “Retailer” means a person  doing business by selling tangible personal property to a pur-
chaser for a purpose other than:
(a) Resale by  the purchaser of the property as tangible personal property in the regular course
of business;
(b) Incorporation by  the purchaser of the property in the course of regular business as an in-
gredient or component of real or personal property; or
(c) Consumption by  the purchaser of the property in the production for sale of a new article of
tangible personal property.
(16) “Taxable commercial activity” means  commercial activity sourced to this state under ORS
317A.128, less any subtraction pursuant to ORS 317A.119.
(17)(a) “Taxpayer” means any person or unitary group required to register, file  or pay tax under
ORS 317A.100 to 317A.158.
(b) “Taxpayer” does not include excluded persons, except to  the extent that a tax-exempt entity
has unrelated business income as described in the Internal Revenue Code.
(18) “Tax year” means, except as otherwise provided in ORS 317A.103, a taxpayer’s annual  ac-
counting period used for  federal income tax purposes under section 441 of the Internal Revenue
Code.
(19)(a) “Unitary business” means  a business enterprise in which there exists directly or indi-
rectly between the members or parts of  the enterprise a sharing or exchange of value as demon-
strated by:
(A) Centralized management or a common executive force;
(B) Centralized administrative services or functions resulting in economies of scale; or
[76]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Flow of goods, capital resources or services demonstrating functional integration.
(b) “Unitary business” may include a business enterprise the activities of which:
(A) Are in the same general line of business, such as manufacturing, wholesaling or  retailing;
or
(B) Constitute steps in  a vertically integrated process, such as the steps involved in the pro-
duction of natural resources, which might include exploration, mining, refining and marketing.
(20) “Unitary  group” means a group of persons with more than 50 percent common ownership,
either direct or indirect, that is engaged in business activities that constitute a unitary business.
(21) “Wholesaler” means a person primarily doing business by merchant distribution  of tangible
personal property to retailers or to other wholesalers.
SECTION 108.
 ORS 366.505 is amended to read:
366.505. (1) The State Highway Fund shall consist of:
(a) All moneys and revenues derived under and by  virtue of the sale of bonds, the sale of which
is authorized by law and the proceeds thereof to be dedicated to highway purposes.
(b) All moneys and revenues accruing from the licensing of motor  vehicles, operators and
chauffeurs.
(c) Moneys and revenues derived  from any tax levied upon gasoline, distillate, liberty fuel or
other volatile and inflammable liquid fuels, except moneys and revenues described in ORS  184.642
(2)(a) that become part of the Department of Transportation Operating Fund.
(d) Moneys and revenues derived from the road usage charges imposed under ORS 319.885.
(e) Moneys and revenues derived from the  privilege use tax imposed under ORS 320.410.
(f) Moneys and revenues derived from the transfer tax imposed under section 83 of this
2025 Act.
(g) Moneys  and revenues derived from the transfer use tax imposed under section 84 of
this 2025 Act.
[(f)] (h) Moneys  and revenues derived from or made available by the federal government for road
construction, maintenance or betterment purposes.
[(g)] (i) All moneys and revenues received from all other sources which by law  are allocated or
dedicated for highway purposes.
(2) The State Highway Fund shall  be deemed and held as a trust fund, separate and distinct from
the General Fund, and may  be used only for the purposes authorized by law and is continually ap-
propriated for such purposes.
(3) Moneys in the State Highway Fund may be invested  as provided in ORS 293.701 to 293.857.
All interest earnings on any of the funds designated in subsection  (1) of this section shall be placed
to the credit of the highway fund.
SECTION 109.
Sections 83, 84 and 91 of  this 2025 Act, the amendments to ORS 317A.100,
320.400, 320.401, 320.405, 320.410, 320.420,  320.425, 320.430, 320.435, 320.440, 320.445, 320.450,
320.460, 320.465, 320.470, 320.475, 320.480, 320.490, 366.505, 803.045, 803.203,  803.585 and 822.043
by sections 81, 85 to 90, 92 to 101 and 103 to 108  of this 2025 Act and the repeal of ORS 320.455
and 320.485 by section 102 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2027.
USE OF REVENUES
SECTION 110. (1) The following amounts shall be distributed in  the manner prescribed
in this section:
[77]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The amount attributable  to the increase in tax rates by the amendments to ORS
319.020 and 319.530 by sections 45 and 49 of this 2025 Act.
(b) The amount attributable to the increase in taxes and fees by the amendments to  ORS
803.420 and 803.090 by sections 62 and 63 of this 2025 Act.
(2) Of the  moneys described in subsection (1) of this section, $125 million per year shall
be deposited by the Department of Transportation  into the Anchor Project Account estab-
lished in section 120 of this  2025 Act and shall be used to pay for costs, including project
costs, on a current basis and to  pay for debt service on bonds issued to finance transporta-
tion projects in the following order of priority:
(a) The Interstate 5 Rose Quarter Project;
(b) The Abernethy Bridge Project; and
(c) The Oregon Transportation Commission shall determine the  order of completion for
the following project or project phases with the remaining funds:
(A) The Interstate 205 Freeway Widening Project;
(B) The Newberg-Dundee Bypass Project; and
(C) The State Highway 22 and Center Street Bridge seismic retrofit  in the City of Salem.
(3) When the Oregon  Transportation Commission determines that a project listed in
subsection (2)(c) of this section is completed, the commission shall  reallocate any amount
remaining from the allocation made  under this section to the next project or project phase
on the list.
(4) Once the Oregon Transportation Commission determines that all projects listed  in
subsection (2)(c) of this section are  completed, $125 million each year shall be allocated as
described in subsection (5) of this section.
(5) The moneys described in subsection  (1) of this section that remain after the allocation
of moneys described in subsection (2) of this section shall be allocated as follows:
(a) 50 percent to the Department of Transportation.
(b) 28.63 percent to counties for distribution as provided in ORS 366.762.
(c) 1.37 percent to small counties for distribution as provided in ORS 366.772 (3).
(d) 20 percent to cities for distribution as provided in ORS 366.800.
SECTION 111.
 Section 110 of this 2025 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 110. (1) The  following amounts shall be distributed in the manner prescribed in this section:
(a) The amount attributable to the increase in  tax rates by the amendments to ORS 319.020 and
319.530 by sections 45 and 49 of this 2025 Act.
(b) The amount attributable to the increase in taxes and fees  by the amendments to ORS 803.420
and 803.090 by sections 62 and 63 of this 2025 Act.
(c) The  amount attributable to the moneys and revenues derived from the transfer tax
imposed under section 83 of this 2025 Act.
(d) The amount attributable to moneys and revenues derived from  the transfer use tax
imposed under section 84 of this 2025 Act.
[(2) Of the moneys described in subsection (1) of this section,  $125 million per year shall be de-
posited by the Department of Transportation  into the Anchor Project Account established in section 120
of this 2025 Act and shall be used to pay for costs, including  project costs, on a current basis and to
pay for debt service on bonds issued to finance transportation projects in the following  order of prior-
ity:]
(2) The  amounts described in subsection (1) of this section shall be distributed in the
[78]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
following order and for the following purposes:
(a) $125 million per year shall be deposited into  the Great Streets Fund established in
section 156 of this  2025 Act for the purpose of providing grants under section 156 of this 2025
Act.
(b) $25 million per year shall be  deposited into the Safe Routes to Schools Fund for the
purpose of providing Safe Routes to Schools matching grants under ORS 184.742.
(c) $5 million per year  for the Wildlife-Vehicle Collision Reduction Fund established under
section 117 of this 2025 Act.
(d) $125 million per year shall be  deposited by the Department of Transportation into the
Anchor Project  Account established in section 120 of this 2025 Act and shall be used to pay
for costs, including project costs, on a current basis and to pay  for debt service on bonds
issued to finance transportation projects in the following order of priority:
[(a)] (A) The Interstate 5 Rose Quarter Project;
[(b)] (B) The Abernethy Bridge Project; and
[(c)] (C) The Oregon Transportation  Commission shall determine the order of completion for the
following project or project phases with the remaining funds:
[(A)] (i) The Interstate 205 Freeway Widening Project;
[(B)] (ii) The Newberg-Dundee Bypass Project; and
[(C)] (iii) The State Highway 22 and Center Street Bridge seismic retrofit in the City of Salem.
(3) When the Oregon  Transportation Commission determines that a project listed in subsection
[(2)(c)] (2)(d)  of this section is completed, the commission  shall reallocate any amount remaining
from the allocation made under this section to the next project on the list.
(4) Once the Oregon Transportation Commission determines that  all projects listed in subsection
[(2)(c)] (2)(d) of this section are completed,  $125 million each year shall be allocated as described in
subsection (5) of this section.
(5) The moneys described in subsection (1) of this section that remain after the allocation of
moneys described in subsection (2) of this section shall be allocated as follows:
(a) 50 percent to the Department of Transportation.
(b) 28.63 percent to counties for distribution as provided in ORS 366.762.
(c) 1.37 percent to small counties for distribution as provided in ORS 366.772 (3).
(d) 20 percent to cities for distribution as provided in ORS 366.800.
SECTION 112.
The amendments to section 110 of  this 2025 Act by section 111 of this 2025
Act become operative on July 1, 2027.
SECTION 113.  Section 110 of this 2025 Act, as amended by  section 111 of this 2025 Act, is
amended to read:
Sec. 110. (1) The  following amounts shall be distributed in the manner prescribed in this section:
(a) The amount attributable to the increase in  tax rates by the amendments to ORS 319.020 and
319.530 by sections 45 and 49 of this 2025 Act.
(b) The amount attributable to the increase in taxes and fees by the amendments to ORS
803.420, [ and] 803.090, 818.225, 825.474, 825.476 and 825.480 by sections  2, 8,  62 [ and 63] to 64 and
66 of this 2025 Act.
(c) The amount attributable to the  moneys and revenues derived from the transfer tax imposed
under section 83 of this 2025 Act.
(d) The amount attributable to moneys and  revenues derived from the transfer use tax imposed
under section 84 of this 2025 Act.
[79]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The amounts described in subsection  (1) of this section shall be distributed in the following
order and for the following purposes:
(a) $125 million per year shall be deposited  into the Great Streets Fund established in section
156 of this 2025 Act for the purpose of providing grants under section 156 of this 2025 Act.
(b) $25 million per year shall be deposited  into the Safe Routes to Schools Fund for the purpose
of providing Safe Routes to Schools matching grants under ORS 184.742.
(c) $5 million per year for the Wildlife-Vehicle Collision Reduction  Fund established under sec-
tion 117 of this 2025 Act.
(d) $125 million per year  shall be deposited by the Department of Transportation into the An-
chor Project Account established in section 120 of this 2025 Act and shall be used to  pay for costs,
including project costs, on a current basis and to pay for debt service on bonds  issued to finance
transportation projects in the following order of priority:
(A) The Interstate 5 Rose Quarter Project;
(B) The Abernethy Bridge Project; and
(C) The Oregon Transportation Commission shall determine the order of  completion for the fol-
lowing project or project phases with the remaining funds:
(i) The Interstate 205 Freeway Widening Project;
(ii) The Newberg-Dundee Bypass Project; and
(iii) The State Highway 22 and Center Street Bridge seismic retrofit in the City of Salem.
(3) When the Oregon Transportation Commission determines that a project  listed in subsection
(2)(d) of this section is completed, the commission  shall reallocate any amount remaining from the
allocation made under this section to the next project on the list.
(4) Once the Oregon Transportation Commission determines that  all projects listed in subsection
(2)(d) of this section are completed, $125 million each year shall be allocated as described in sub-
section (5) of this section.
(5) The moneys described in subsection (1) of this section that remain after the allocation of
moneys described in subsection (2) of this section shall be allocated as follows:
(a) 50 percent to the Department of Transportation.
(b) 28.63 percent to counties for distribution as provided in ORS 366.762.
(c) 1.37 percent to small counties for distribution as provided in ORS 366.772 (3).
(d) 20 percent to cities for distribution as provided in ORS 366.800.
SECTION 114.
The amendments to section 110 of  this 2025 Act by section 113 of this 2025
Act become operative on July 1, 2028.
SECTION 115.  Section 110 of this 2025 Act, as amended by sections  111 and 113 of this 2025
Act, is amended to read:
Sec. 110. (1) The  following amounts shall be distributed in the manner prescribed in this section:
(a) The amount attributable to the increase in  tax rates by the amendments to ORS 319.020 and
319.530 by sections 45 and 49 of this 2025 Act.
(b) The amount  attributable to the increase in taxes and fees by the amendments to ORS 803.420,
803.090, 818.225, 825.474, 825.476 and 825.480 by sections 2, 5, 8[ , 62 to 64 and 66 ] and 62 to 67  of
this 2025 Act.
(c) The amount attributable to the moneys and revenues derived  from the transfer tax imposed
under section 83 of this 2025 Act.
(d) The amount attributable to moneys and revenues derived  from the transfer use tax imposed
under section 84 of this 2025 Act.
[80]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The amounts described in subsection (1) of this section shall  be distributed in the following
order and for the following purposes:
(a) $125 million per year shall be deposited into  the Great Streets Fund established in section
156 of this 2025 Act for the purpose of providing grants under section 156 of this 2025 Act.
(b) $25 million per year shall be deposited  into the Safe Routes to Schools Fund for the purpose
of providing Safe Routes to Schools matching grants under ORS 184.742.
(c) $5 million per year for the Wildlife-Vehicle Collision Reduction  Fund established under sec-
tion 117 of this 2025 Act.
(d) $125 million per year  shall be deposited by the Department of Transportation into the An-
chor Project Account established in section 120 of this 2025 Act and shall be used to  pay for costs,
including project costs, on a current basis and to pay for debt service on bonds  issued to finance
transportation projects in the following order of priority:
(A) The Interstate 5 Rose Quarter Project;
(B) The Abernethy Bridge Project; and
(C) The Oregon Transportation Commission shall determine the order of  completion for the fol-
lowing project or project phases with the remaining funds:
(i) The Interstate 205 Freeway Widening Project;
(ii) The Newberg-Dundee Bypass Project; and
(iii) The State Highway 22 and Center Street Bridge seismic retrofit in the City of Salem.
(3) When the Oregon Transportation Commission determines that a project  listed in subsection
(2)(d) of this section is completed, the commission  shall reallocate any amount remaining from the
allocation made under this section to the next project on the list.
(4) Once the Oregon Transportation Commission determines that  all projects listed in subsection
(2)(d) of this section are completed, $125 million each year shall be allocated as described in sub-
section (5) of this section.
(5) The moneys described in subsection (1) of this section that remain after the allocation of
moneys described in subsection (2) of this section shall be allocated as follows:
(a) 50 percent to the Department of Transportation.
(b) 28.63 percent to counties for distribution as provided in ORS 366.762.
(c) 1.37 percent to small counties for distribution as provided in ORS 366.772 (3).
(d) 20 percent to cities for distribution as provided in ORS 366.800.
SECTION 116.
The amendments to section 110 of  this 2025 Act by section 115 of this 2025
Act become operative on January 1, 2034.
SECTION 117. (1) The Wildlife-Vehicle Collision Reduction Fund is established in the
State Treasury, separate  and distinct from the State Highway Fund. Interest earned by the
Wildlife-Vehicle Collision Reduction Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The Wildlife-Vehicle Collision Reduction Fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts deposited in the fund by the Department of Transportation under  section
110 of this 2025 Act;
(b) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the  Legislative As-
sembly; and
(c) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any other source.
(3) Moneys in the  Wildlife-Vehicle Collision Reduction Fund are continuously appropri-
ated to the Department of  Transportation for the purposes of carrying out the program es-
tablished under ORS 366.161.
[81]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 118.
Section 117 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2027.
SECTION 119. Section 71d, chapter 750, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 71d. (1) The Oregon Transportation Commission shall use the proceeds of bonds,  as defined
in ORS 367.010, authorized under ORS  367.620 (3)(d) to finance the transportation projects listed in
this section. The commission shall determine  the order of completion for the projects listed in sub-
section (2) of this section.
(2) No later than January 1, 2024, the  commission shall allocate the following amounts to each
region, as described in ORS 366.805, for the projects listed below, provided that the  commission de-
termines that the projects could constitutionally be  funded by revenues described in Article IX,
section 3a, of the Oregon Constitution:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(a) Region one: ....................... $ 249,700,000
(A) State Highway 211
improvements beginning where
the highway intersects with
State Highway 213 and ending
where the highway intersects
Molalla Avenue in the
City of Molalla
(B) WaNaPa Street improvements
in the City of Cascade
Locks
(C) Port of Hood River bridge
replacement environmental
impact study
(D) Columbia Boulevard
pedestrian safety
(E) Southeast Powell
Boulevard jurisdiction
transfer as described
under section 134 , chapter
750, Oregon Laws 2017
[of this 2017 Act ]
(F) Interstate 205 active traffic
management project
(G) Interstate 205 corridor
bottleneck project
(H) State Highway 217
Northbound project
(I) State Highway 217
Southbound project
(J) Improvements to Graham
Road where it intersects
with Interstate 84 in
[82]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the City of Troutdale
(b) Region 2: ........................... $ 201,950,000
(A) Oregon Manufacturing
Innovation Center
Access Roads in Columbia
County
(B) Interstate 5 at the
Aurora-Donald interchange,
Phase I
(C) State Highway 99E in
the City of Halsey
(D) State Highway 214
pedestrian safety
improvements at the
intersection with
Jefferson Street in the
City of Silverton
(E) Territorial Highway
jurisdiction transfer
as described under
section 134 , chapter 750,
Oregon Laws 2017 [ of this ]
[this 2017 Act ]
(F) U.S. Highway 20 safety
upgrades from the
City of Albany to the
City of Corvallis
[(G) State Highway 58, adding ]
[passing lanes west of the ]
[City of Oakridge ]
[(H)] (G) State Highway 22 and Center
Street Bridge, seismic
retrofit in the City
of Salem
[(I)] (H) State Highway 99 in
City of Eugene
jurisdiction transfer
as described
under section 134 ,
chapter 750, Oregon
Laws 2017 [ of]
[this 2017 Act ]
[(J)] (I) State Highway 126
Florence-Eugene
Highway for
[83]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
environmental impact study
[(K)] (J) 42nd Street in the City
of Springfield
[(L)] (K) Newberg and Dundee Bypass,
State Highway 99W,
Phase II, design only
(c) Region 3: ........................... $ 75 million
(A) Scottsburg Bridge on
State Highway 38 in
Douglas County
(B) Southern Oregon seismic
triage transportation
project
(d) Region 4: ........................... $ 76,493,000
(A) U.S. Highway 97 Cooley
Road mid-term
improvements
(B) U.S. Highway 97 at
Terrabonne
(C) Improvements to Alder
Creek Road in
Wheeler County
(D) Pedestrian safety
improvements
in the City of Dufur
(E) Pedestrian safety
improvements in the
City of Prineville
(F) Tom McCall Road
roundabout
(G) Pedestrian safety
improvements
in the City of Arlington
(e) Region 5: ........................... $ 43,647,000
(A) Port of Umatilla Road
(B) Hermiston North First
Place Project in the
City of Hermiston
(C) State Highway 30 and
Hughes Lane intersection
in Baker County
(D) Eastern Oregon Trade and
Event Center access road
(E) Pedestrian safety
improvements in the
[84]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
City of Heppner
(F) Pedestrian safety
improvements in the
City of Milton-Freewater
(G) Columbia Development
Authority Access Road
(H) Pedestrian safety
improvements
in the City of Burns
(I) Pedestrian safety
improvements
in the City of Irrigon
(J) U.S. Highway 20 freight
mobility enhancements
(K) Cedar Street and Hughes
Lane enhancements in
Baker County
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(3)(a) When the commission  determines that a project described in this section is completed, the
commission  shall  reallocate any amount remaining from the allocation made under this section to
another project described in the same region.
(b) When the commission determines that all of the projects within a region  are completed, the
commission  shall  reallocate any amount remaining from the allocation made under this section to
any other project listed in this section.
(4) The amounts described in this section for jurisdiction transfers described  in section 134 ,
chapter 750, Oregon Laws 2017,  [ of this 2017 Act ] may not be allocated until after the transfer for
which the allocation is dedicated occurs.
SECTION 120.
(1) The Anchor Project Account is  created within the State Highway Fund.
Moneys in  the account are continuously appropriated to the Department of Transportation.
Interest on the account is credited to the State Highway Fund.
(2) The account consists of:
(a) Amounts deposited in the fund under section 110 of this 2025 Act;
(b) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the  Legislative As-
sembly; and
(c) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any other source.
(3) The funds in the account shall be used by the department in carrying out the purposes
for which the funds were received under section 110 (2)(c) of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 120a.
 Section 120 of this 2025 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 120.  (1) The Anchor Project Account is created within the State Highway  Fund. Moneys
in the  account are continuously appropriated to the Department of Transportation. Interest on the
account is credited to the State Highway Fund.
(2) The account consists of:
(a) Amounts deposited in the fund under section 110 of this 2025 Act;
(b) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred  to the fund by the Legislative Assembly; and
[85]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any other source.
(3) The funds in  the account shall be used by the department in carrying out the purposes for
which the funds were received under section 110 [ (2)(c)] (2)(d) of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 120b.
The amendments to section 120 of this 2025 Act by section 120a of this
2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2027.
SECTION 121. ORS 366.772 is amended to read:
366.772. (1) Not later than July  31 in each calendar year, the sum of $5,500,000 shall be with-
drawn from the appropriation specified in ORS  366.762 and the sum of $250,000 shall be withdrawn
from moneys available to the Department of Transportation from the  State Highway Fund. The sums
withdrawn shall be transferred to a separate account to be administered by the Department  of
Transportation.
(2) Not later than July 31 in each calendar year, the  sum of $5,750,000 shall be withdrawn from
the separate account described in subsection (1) of this section and distributed to counties as fol-
lows:
(a) An amount  of $750,000 shall be distributed to the following counties in the following
amounts:
(A) Harney County .................. $ 271,909
(B) Malheur County ................ $ 187,947
(C) Morrow County................. $ 108,073
(D) Gilliam County .................. $ 94,036
(E) Sherman County ............... $ 79,700
(F) Wheeler County ................ $ 8,335
(b) An amount of $5,000,000  shall be distributed proportionally to counties with fewer than
200,000 registered  vehicles based on a ratio of road miles maintained by each county to registered
vehicles.
(3) Not later  than July 31 in each calendar year, moneys received under section 110 (5)(c)
of this 2025 Act shall be distributed proportionally to counties with fewer  than 200,000 reg-
istered vehicles based on a ratio of road miles  maintained by each county to registered ve-
hicles.
[(3)] (4)  Moneys allocated as provided  in this section may be used only for maintenance, repair
and improvement of existing roads that are:
(a) Not a part of the state highway system;
(b) Within counties with fewer than 200,000 registered vehicles; and
(c) Inadequate for the capacity the roads serve or are in a condition detrimental to safety.
[(4)] (5) All moneys in the account shall be allotted each year.
SECTION 122.
 ORS 366.805 is amended to read:
366.805. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the appropriation specified  in
ORS 366.800 shall be allocated to the cities as provided  in this subsection. The moneys subject to
allocation under this subsection shall be distributed  by the Department of Transportation according
to the following:
(a) The moneys shall be distributed to all the cities.
(b) Each city shall receive such share of the moneys as its population bears to the total popu-
lation of the cities.
(2) Each year, the sum of [ $2,500,000] $3,000,000 shall be withdrawn from  the appropriation
specified in ORS 366.800 and [ $2,500,000] $3,000,000 shall be withdrawn from moneys available to the
[86]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Department of Transportation from the State Highway Fund. The sums withdrawn shall be trans-
ferred to a  separate account to be administered by the Department of Transportation. The following
apply to the account described in this subsection:
(a) Money from the account shall be used only on roads:
(A) That are not a part of the state highway system, with the exception of project  elements that
are required to comply with federal or state law;
(B) That are within , or under the jurisdiction  of,  cities with populations of 5,000 or fewer
persons; and
(C) That are inadequate for the capacity the roads serve or are in a condition detrimental to
safety.
(b) To the extent moneys are available to fund whole projects, all moneys in  the account shall
be allocated each year.
(c) Subject  to paragraph (d) of this subsection, the department shall determine annual allocation
after considering applications, including project budgets, submitted by the cities to the department.
(d) The department may  enter into agreements with cities upon the advice and counsel of the
small city advisory committee to determine allocation based on those applications.
(3) The Director of Transportation shall establish a small city advisory  committee. The small
city advisory committee shall review department recommendations and approve  applications sub-
mitted by small cities to the director. In consultation with the League of Oregon Cities,  the director
shall appoint  to the small city advisory committee one representative of a small city in each of the
five regions of this state.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) Region one consists of Clackamas, Hood River, Multnomah and Washington Counties.
(b) Region two consists of Benton, Clatsop, Columbia, Lane,  Lincoln, Linn, Marion, Polk,
Tillamook and Yamhill Counties.
(c) Region three consists of Coos, Curry, Douglas, Jackson and Josephine Counties.
(d) Region four consists of  Crook, Deschutes, Gilliam, Jefferson, Klamath, Lake, Sherman, Wasco
and Wheeler Counties.
(e) Region five consists of Baker,  Grant, Harney, Malheur, Morrow, Umatilla, Union and
Wallowa Counties.
ROAD USAGE CHARGE
SECTION 123.
Section 124 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 319.883 to
319.946.
SECTION 124. The recording, reporting and payment  provisions of ORS 319.883 to 319.946
do not apply to a registered owner or lessee voluntarily participating in the per-mile road
usage charge program for reporting periods beginning on or  after July 1, 2031, until such
reporting period, if any,  for which the registered owner or lessee is required to participate
in the per-mile road usage charge program under ORS 319.883, as amended by sections 122
and 124 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 125.
Section 124 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2037.
SECTION 126. ORS 319.890 and section 2,  chapter 428, Oregon Laws 2019, are repealed on
July 1, 2031.
SECTION 127. ORS 319.883 is amended to read:
[87]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
319.883. As used in ORS 319.883 to 319.946:
(1) “Delivery vehicle” means a motor vehicle that:
(a) Has a gross vehicle weight  rating greater than 8,000 pounds and not more than 26,000
pounds;
(b) Is operated by a person required to be licensed under ORS 825.100;
(c) Is used for  the delivery of e-commerce property from a fulfillment center to addresses
in Oregon; and
(d) Uses any source of motive power.
(2) “E-commerce property”  means tangible personal property purchased through elec-
tronic commerce.
(3)(a) “Electric delivery vehicle”  means a delivery vehicle that uses electricity as its only
source of motive power.
(b) “Electric delivery vehicle” does not include any delivery vehicle that is used  exclu-
sively to deliver medical goods or supplies.
(4) “Electric vehicle” means a motor  vehicle that uses only electricity as its source of
motive power.
(5) “Electronic commerce” means engaging in commercial or retail transactions  pre-
dominantly over  the Internet or a computer network, using the Internet as a platform for
transacting business or facilitating the use of  the Internet by other persons for transacting
business, and may be further defined by the Department of Transportation by rule.
(6) “Fleet of delivery vehicles” or “fleet” means 10 or more  delivery vehicles owned or
operated by a person for the purpose of:
(a) Delivering e-commerce property sold or otherwise transferred in  the course of the
person’s own business; or
(b) Delivering, for consideration under an  agreement with another person, e-commerce
property sold or otherwise transferred in the course of the other person’s business.
[(1)] (7) “Fuel taxes” means motor vehicle fuel taxes imposed under ORS 319.010  to 319.430 and
taxes imposed on the use of fuel in a motor vehicle under ORS 319.510 to 319.880.
[(2)] (8) “Highway” has the meaning given that term in ORS 801.305.
[(3)] (9) “Lessee” means a person that leases a motor vehicle that is  required to be registered
in Oregon.
[(4)(a)] (10)(a) “Motor vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 801.360.
(b) “Motor vehicle” does  not mean a motor vehicle designed to travel with fewer than four
wheels in contact with the ground.
[(5)] (11) “Registered owner” means  a person, other than a vehicle dealer that holds a certificate
issued under ORS 822.020, that is required to register a motor vehicle in Oregon.
[(6)] (12) “Subject vehicle” means a motor vehicle  that: [is the subject of an application approved
pursuant to ORS 319.890. ]
(a) Is or will be classified  as a passenger vehicle by the Department of Transportation
and that is:
(A) For reporting periods beginning on or after  July 1, 2026, an electric vehicle that is
not a new electric vehicle;
(B) For reporting periods beginning on or after January 1, 2027:
(i) A motor vehicle described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph; or
(ii) A new electric vehicle;
[88]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) For reporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 2027:
(i) A motor vehicle described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph; or
(ii) A plug-in hybrid electric vehicle;
(D) For reporting periods beginning before July 1, 2031:
(i) A motor vehicle described in subparagraph (A), (B) or (C) of this paragraph; or
(ii) The subject of an application approved pursuant to ORS 319.890; or
(b) For reporting periods beginning on or  after July 1, 2028, is an electric delivery vehicle.
(13) “Taxpayer” means:
(a) The registered owner of a subject vehicle;
(b) The lessee of a subject vehicle; or
(c) The owner or operator of an electric delivery vehicle.
[(7)] (14) “Vehicle dealer” means a person engaged in business in this  state that is required to
obtain a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS 822.005.
SECTION 128.
The amendments  to ORS 319.883 by section 127 of this 2025 Act become
operative on July 1, 2026.
SECTION 129. ORS 319.883, as amended by section 127 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
319.883. As used in ORS 319.883 to 319.946:
(1) “Delivery vehicle” means a motor vehicle that:
(a) Has a gross vehicle weight rating greater than  8,000 pounds and not more than 26,000
pounds;
(b) Is operated by a person required to be licensed under ORS 825.100;
(c) Is used for the delivery of  e-commerce property from a fulfillment center to addresses in
Oregon; and
(d) Uses any source of motive power.
(2) “E-commerce property” means tangible  personal property purchased through electronic
commerce.
(3)(a) “Electric delivery vehicle” means  a delivery vehicle that uses electricity as its only source
of motive power.
(b) “Electric delivery vehicle” does not include any  delivery vehicle that is used exclusively to
deliver medical goods or supplies.
(4) “Electric vehicle” means a motor vehicle that uses only electricity  as its source of motive
power.
(5) “Electronic commerce” means engaging in  commercial or retail transactions predominantly
over the Internet or a computer network, using the Internet  as a platform for transacting business
or facilitating the use of the Internet by other persons for transacting  business, and may be further
defined by the Department of Transportation by rule.
(6) “Fleet of  delivery vehicles” or “fleet” means 10 or more delivery vehicles owned or operated
by a person for the purpose of:
(a) Delivering e-commerce property sold or otherwise transferred in the  course of the person’s
own business; or
(b) Delivering,  for consideration under an agreement with another person, e-commerce property
sold or otherwise transferred in the course of the other person’s business.
(7) “Fuel taxes” means motor vehicle fuel taxes imposed under ORS 319.010  to 319.430 and taxes
imposed on the use of fuel in a motor vehicle under ORS 319.510 to 319.880.
(8) “Highway” has the meaning given that term in ORS 801.305.
[89]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(9) “Lessee” means a person that leases a motor vehicle that is required  to be registered in
Oregon.
(10)(a) “Motor vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 801.360.
(b) “Motor vehicle” does  not mean a motor vehicle designed to travel with fewer than four
wheels in contact with the ground.
(11) “Registered owner” means a person, other than a vehicle dealer that holds a  certificate is-
sued under ORS 822.020, that is required to register a motor vehicle in Oregon.
(12) “Subject vehicle” means a motor vehicle that:
(a) Is or will be classified as a passenger vehicle by the Department  of Transportation and that
is:
(A) [ For reporting periods beginning on  or after July 1, 2026, ] An electric vehicle that is not a
new electric vehicle;
[(B) For reporting periods beginning on or after January 1, 2027: ]
[(i) A motor vehicle described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph; or ]
[(ii)] (B) A new electric vehicle; or
[(C) For reporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 2027: ]
[(i) A motor vehicle described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph; or ]
[(ii)] (C) A plug-in hybrid electric vehicle; or
[(D) For reporting periods beginning before July 1, 2031: ]
[(i) A motor vehicle described in subparagraph (A), (B) or (C) of this paragraph; or ]
[(ii) The subject of an application approved pursuant to ORS 319.890; or ]
(b) [ For reporting periods beginning on or after July 1, 2028, ] Is an electric delivery vehicle.
(13) “Taxpayer” means:
(a) The registered owner of a subject vehicle;
(b) The lessee of a subject vehicle; or
(c) The owner or operator of an electric delivery vehicle.
(14) “Vehicle dealer” means a person engaged in business in this state that  is required to obtain
a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS 822.005.
SECTION 130.
The amendments  to ORS 319.883 by section 129 of this 2025 Act become
operative on July 1, 2031.
SECTION 131. ORS 319.885 is amended to read:
319.885. (1)(a) Except as provided in  paragraph (b) of this subsection, the registered owner of a
subject vehicle shall pay a per-mile road usage charge  for metered use by the subject vehicle of the
highways in Oregon.
(b) During the term of a lease, the lessee of a subject vehicle shall pay the per-mile road  usage
charge for metered use by the subject vehicle of the highways in Oregon.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  the rate of the per-mile road
usage charge is five percent  of the rate of the per-gallon license tax provided in ORS 319.020
[(1)(b)] (4) in effect at the time the charge becomes due.
(b) Instead of paying the per-mile rate under paragraph (a)  of this section, a registered
owner or lessee may elect to pay a flat annual fee of $340.
(3) A subject vehicle is not subject to the additional amount of registration fees  imposed
under ORS 803.422.
SECTION 132. The amendments to ORS 319.885 by section 131 of this  2025 Act become
operative on July 1, 2026.
[90]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 133.
 ORS 319.885, as amended by section 131 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
319.885. (1)(a) Except as provided  in paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection, the registered owner
of a subject vehicle shall pay a per-mile road usage charge for metered use by  the subject vehicle
of the highways in Oregon.
(b) During the term of a lease, the lessee of a subject vehicle shall pay the per-mile road  usage
charge for metered use by the subject vehicle of the highways in Oregon.
(c) The owner or operator of a fleet of delivery vehicles shall pay the total amount of the
per-mile road usage charge for metered use  of the highways in Oregon by all electric delivery
vehicles in the owner or operator’s fleet.
(2)(a) Except as  provided in [ paragraph (b) ] paragraphs (b) and (c)  of this subsection, the rate
of the per-mile road usage charge is five percent of the rate of the per-gallon license  tax provided
in ORS 319.020 (4) in effect at the time the charge becomes due.
(b) Instead of paying the per-mile rate under paragraph (a) of this  section, a registered owner
or lessee may elect to pay a flat annual fee of $340.
(c) For an electric delivery vehicle, the rate of the per-mile road usage charge  is 10 per-
cent of the rate of  the per-gallon license tax provided in ORS 319.020 (4) in effect at the time
the charge becomes due.
(3) A subject vehicle is not  subject to the additional amount of registration fees imposed under
ORS 803.422.
SECTION 134. The amendments  to ORS 319.885 by section 133 of this 2025 Act become
operative on July 1, 2028.
SECTION 135. ORS 319.910 is amended to read:
319.910. (1) The Department  of Transportation shall establish by rule reporting periods for the
road usage charges imposed under ORS 319.885.
(2) Reporting periods established under this section may vary according to the facts and  cir-
cumstances applicable to classes of [ registered owners, lessees ] taxpayers and subject vehicles.
(3) In establishing reporting periods, the department shall consider:
(a) The effort required by [ registered owners or lessees ] taxpayers to report metered use  and to
pay the per-mile road usage charge;
(b) The amount of the per-mile road usage charge owed;
(c) The cost to the [ registered owner or lessee ] taxpayer of  reporting metered use and of paying
the per-mile road usage charge;
(d) The administrative cost to the department; and
(e) Other relevant factors that the department deems important.
SECTION 136.
 ORS 319.915 is amended to read:
319.915. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Certified service provider” means an entity that has entered  into an agreement with the
Department of Transportation under ORS 367.806 for reporting metered use by a  subject vehicle or
for administrative services related to the  collection of per-mile road usage charges and authorized
employees of the entity.
(b) “Personally identifiable information” means  any information that identifies or describes a
person, including, but not limited to,  the person’s travel pattern data, per-mile road usage charge
account number, address, telephone number, electronic mail address, driver license  or identification
card number, registration  plate number, information related to a permit issued under section
150 of this  2025 Act,  photograph, recorded images, bank account information and credit card num-
[91]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ber.
(c) “VIN summary report” means a monthly report by the department or  a certified service
provider that includes a summary of all vehicle identification numbers of subject vehicles and asso-
ciated total metered use during the month. The report may not include location information.
(2) Except as provided in  subsections (3) and (4) of this section, personally identifiable informa-
tion used for reporting metered use or for administrative services related to the  collection of the
per-mile road usage charge imposed under ORS 319.885 is confidential within the  meaning of ORS
192.355 (9)(a) and is a public record exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(3)(a) The department, a certified service provider or a  contractor for a certified service pro-
vider may not disclose personally identifiable information  used or developed for reporting metered
use by a  subject vehicle or for administrative services related to the collection of per-mile road us-
age charges to any person except:
(A) The [ registered owner or lessee ] taxpayer;
(B) A financial institution, for the purpose of collecting per-mile road usage charges owed;
(C) Employees of the department;
(D) A certified service provider;
(E) A contractor for a certified service provider, but only to the extent the  contractor provides
services directly related to the certified service provider’s agreement with the department;
(F) An entity expressly approved by the taxpayer to receive the information [ by the registered
owner or lessee of the subject vehicle ]; or
(G) A police officer pursuant to a valid court order based on probable cause and  issued at the
request of  a federal, state or local law enforcement agency in an authorized criminal investigation
involving a person to whom the requested information pertains.
(b) Disclosure under paragraph (a)  of this subsection is limited to personally identifiable infor-
mation necessary to the respective recipient’s function under ORS 319.883 to 319.946.
(4)(a) Not later than 30 days after completion  of payment processing, dispute resolution for a
single reporting period or a noncompliance investigation,  whichever is latest, the department and
certified service providers shall destroy records of the location and  daily metered use of subject
vehicles.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) For purposes of traffic management  and research, the department and certified service pro-
viders may  retain, aggregate and use information in the records after removing personally identifi-
able information.
(B) A certified service provider may retain the records if the [ registered owner or lessee ] tax-
payer consents to the retention. Consent under this subparagraph does  not entitle the department
to obtain or use the records or the information contained in the records.
(C) Monthly summaries of  metered use by subject vehicles may be retained in VIN summary
reports by the department and certified service providers.
(5) The department, in any agreement with a certified service  provider, shall provide for penal-
ties if the certified service provider violates this section.
SECTION 137.
 ORS 319.920 is amended to read:
319.920. (1)  On a date determined by the Department of Transportation under ORS 319.910, [ the
registered owner or lessee of a subject vehicle ] a taxpayer  shall report the metered use by the
taxpayer’s subject vehicle and pay  to the department the per-mile road usage charge due under
ORS 319.885 for the reporting period.
[92]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) Unless a [ registered owner or lessee ] taxpayer presents evidence in a manner  approved by
the department by  rule that the subject vehicle has been driven outside this state, the department
shall assume  that all metered use reported represents miles driven by the subject vehicle on the
highways in Oregon.
SECTION 138.
 ORS 319.925 is amended to read:
319.925. (1) The Department of Transportation shall provide  a refund to a [ registered owner or
lessee] taxpayer that has overpaid the per-mile road usage charge imposed under ORS 319.885.
(2) The department may provide  by rule that the refund under this section be granted as a credit
against future per-mile road usage charges incurred by the [ registered owner or lessee ] taxpayer.
SECTION 139. ORS 319.930 is amended to read:
319.930. (1) A [ registered owner or lessee ] taxpayer that has paid the per-mile road usage charge
imposed under ORS 319.885 may apply to the Department of Transportation for a  refund for metered
use of a road, thoroughfare or property in private ownership.
(2) An application for a refund under this section must  be submitted to the department within
15 months after the date on which the per-mile road  usage charge for which a refund is claimed is
paid.
(3) The application required under this section shall be in a form prescribed  by the department
by rule and must include a signed statement by the applicant indicating the number of miles  for
which the refund is claimed.
(4) The department may require the applicant for a refund under this section to  furnish any in-
formation the department considers necessary for processing the application.
SECTION 140. ORS 803.422 is amended to read:
803.422. (1) As used in this section[ ,]:
(a) “Electric vehicle” means a motor vehicle that  uses electricity as its only source of
motive power.
(b) “Miles per gallon” or “MPG” means the distance traveled in a vehicle  powered by one gal-
lon of fuel.
(2) The Department of Transportation shall determine  the combined MPG ratings for each motor
vehicle pursuant to a method determined by the department.
(3) Except as provided in ORS 319.885 and 319.890 (3), in addition to the registration fees  pre-
scribed  under  ORS 803.420 (6)(a), there shall be paid for each year of the registration period, an
additional amount as follows:
[(a) For vehicles that have a rating of 0-19 MPG, $20. ]
[(b)] (a)  For vehicles that have a combined rating of 20-39 MPG, $25.
[(c)] (b) For vehicles that have a  combined rating of 40 MPG or greater, $35.
[(d)] (c)  For electric vehicles, $115.
SECTION 141. The amendments to ORS 803.422 by section 140 of this  2025 Act become
operative on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 142. ORS 803.422, as amended by section 140 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
803.422. (1) As used in this section ,[:]
[(a) “Electric vehicle” means a motor vehicle that uses electricity as its only source of motive
power.]
[(b)] “miles per gallon” or “MPG” means the distance traveled in a vehicle powered by  one
gallon of fuel.
(2) The Department of Transportation shall determine  the combined MPG ratings for each motor
[93]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
vehicle pursuant to a method determined by the department.
(3) Except as provided in ORS 319.885 [ and 319.890 (3)], in addition to the registration fees pre-
scribed  under  ORS 803.420 (6)(a), there shall be paid for each year of the registration period, an
additional amount as follows:
(a) For vehicles that have a combined rating of 20-39 MPG, $25.
(b) For vehicles that have a combined rating of 40 MPG or greater, $35.
[(c) For electric vehicles, $115. ]
SECTION 143.
The amendments to ORS 803.422 by section 142 of this  2025 Act become
operative on July 1, 2031.
SECTION 144. ORS 803.445 is amended to read:
803.445. (1) The governing body of a county  may impose registration fees for vehicles as pro-
vided in ORS 801.041.
(2) The  governing body of a district may impose registration fees for vehicles as provided in ORS
801.042.
(3) The  Department of Transportation shall provide by rule for the administration of laws au-
thorizing county and district registration fees and for the collection of those fees.
(4) Any registration fee imposed under this section shall be  imposed in a manner consistent with
ORS 803.420.
(5) A county  or district may not impose a vehicle registration fee that would by itself, or in
combination with any other vehicle registration fee  imposed under this section, exceed the sum of
the fee imposed  under ORS 803.420 (6)(a) and the fee applicable to the registered vehicle under ORS
803.422. The owner of any vehicle subject  to multiple fees under this section shall be allowed a
credit or credits with respect to one or more of such fees so that the total of such fees does not
exceed the sum of the fee imposed under ORS 803.420 (6)(a) and the  fee applicable to the registered
vehicle under ORS 803.422.
(6) A subject vehicle exempt under ORS 319.885 (3) from the fees applicable under  ORS
803.422 shall remain liable for any amount of vehicle registration fee imposed by a county
or a district under this section that would be required  if the exemption did not exist. As used
in this subsection, “subject vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 319.883.
SECTION 145.
 ORS 801.041 is amended to read:
801.041. The following apply to the authority granted to counties by ORS 801.040  to establish
registration fees for vehicles:
(1) An ordinance establishing registration fees under this section must be enacted by the  county
imposing the registration fee and filed with the Department of Transportation. Notwithstanding
ORS 203.055 or any provision of a county charter, the governing body of a county with a population
of 350,000 or more may enact an ordinance establishing registration fees. The governing body of  a
county with a population of less than 350,000 may enact an ordinance establishing registration fees
after submitting  the ordinance to the electors of the county for their approval. The governing body
of the county imposing the registration fee shall enter into an intergovernmental  agreement under
ORS 190.010 with the department by which the department shall collect the registration fees, pay
them over to the county and, if necessary, allow the credit or credits  described in ORS 803.445 (5).
The intergovernmental agreement must state the date on  which the department shall begin collect-
ing registration fees for the county.
(2) The  authority granted by this section allows the establishment of registration fees in addition
to those described in ORS 803.420 and 803.422. There  is no authority under this section to affect
[94]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
registration periods, qualifications, cards, plates, requirements or any other provision  relating to
vehicle registration under the vehicle code.
(3) Except  as otherwise provided for in this subsection, when registration fees are imposed under
this section, they must  be imposed on all vehicle classes. Registration fees as provided under this
section may not be imposed on the following:
(a) Snowmobiles and Class I all-terrain vehicles.
(b) Fixed load vehicles.
(c) Vehicles registered under ORS 805.100 to disabled veterans.
(d) Vehicles registered as antique vehicles under ORS 805.010.
(e) Vehicles registered as vehicles of special interest under ORS 805.020.
(f) Government-owned or operated vehicles registered under ORS 805.040 or 805.045.
(g) School buses or school activity vehicles registered under ORS 805.050.
(h) Law enforcement undercover vehicles registered under ORS 805.060.
(i) Vehicles registered on a proportional basis for interstate operation.
(j) Vehicles with a registration weight of 26,001 pounds or more described  in ORS 803.420 (14)(a)
or (b).
(k) Vehicles registered as farm vehicles under the provisions of ORS 805.300.
(L) Travel trailers, campers and motor homes.
(m) Vehicles registered to an employment address as provided in ORS 802.250  when the eligible
public employee  or household member’s residence address is not within the county of the employ-
ment address. The department may adopt rules it considers necessary for the administration of  this
paragraph.
(n) Vehicles registered under ORS 805.110 to former prisoners of war.
(4)(a) Any registration fee imposed  by a county must be a fixed amount not to exceed, with re-
spect to any vehicle class, the sum of the  registration fee established under ORS 803.420 (6)(a) and
the fee applicable to  the registered vehicle under ORS 803.422. For vehicles on which a flat fee is
imposed under ORS 803.420, the fee must be a whole dollar amount.
(b) A  subject vehicle exempt under ORS 319.885 (3) from the fees applicable under ORS
803.422 shall remain liable for any amount of vehicle registration fee imposed by a county
under this section that would be required if the exemption did not exist. As used in  this
subsection, “subject vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 319.883.
(5) Moneys from registration fees established under this section must  be paid to the county es-
tablishing the registration fees as provided in ORS 802.110.
(6) Except  as provided in ORS 801.044, or unless a different distribution is agreed upon by the
county and the cities within the jurisdiction of the  county, the county ordinance shall provide for
payment of at least 40 percent of the  moneys from registration fees established under this section
to cities within the county.
(7) The moneys for the cities and the county shall be used for any purpose for which  moneys
from registration fees may be used, including the payment of debt service and costs  related to bonds
or other obligations issued for such purposes.
(8) Two  or more counties may act jointly to impose a registration fee under this section. The
ordinance of each county acting jointly with another under  this subsection must provide for the
distribution of moneys collected through a joint registration fee.
SECTION 146.
 ORS 801.042 is amended to read:
801.042. The following apply to the authority granted to a district by ORS 801.040 to  establish
[95]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
registration fees for vehicles:
(1) Before the governing body of a district can  impose a registration fee under this section, it
must submit the proposal to  the electors of the district for their approval and, if the proposal is
approved, enter into  an intergovernmental agreement under ORS 190.010 with the governing bodies
of all  counties, other districts and cities with populations of over 300,000 that overlap the district.
The intergovernmental  agreement must state the registration fees and, if necessary, how the revenue
from the fees shall be apportioned among counties and  the districts. Before the governing body of
a county can enter into such an intergovernmental agreement, the county shall consult  with the
cities in its jurisdiction.
(2) If a district raises revenues from  a registration fee for purposes related to highways, roads,
streets and roadside rest areas, the governing body of that district  shall establish a Regional Ar-
terial Fund and shall deposit in the Regional Arterial Fund all such registration fees.
(3) Interest received on moneys credited to the Regional Arterial Fund shall accrue to  and be-
come a part of the Regional Arterial Fund.
(4) The Regional Arterial Fund must be  administered by the governing body of the district re-
ferred to in subsection (2) of this section and such governing body by ordinance may  disburse mon-
eys in the Regional Arterial Fund. Moneys within the Regional Arterial Fund  may be disbursed only
for a program of projects recommended by  a joint policy advisory committee on transportation
consisting of local officials and  state agency representatives designated by the district referred to
in subsection (2) of this section. The projects for which the joint policy  advisory committee on
transportation can recommend funding must concern arterials, collectors or other  improvements
designated by the joint policy advisory committee on transportation.
(5) Ordinances establishing  registration fees under this section must be filed with the Depart-
ment of Transportation. The governing body of the district imposing the registration  fee shall enter
into an intergovernmental agreement under  ORS 190.010 with the department by which the depart-
ment shall collect  the registration fees, pay them over to the district and, if necessary, allow the
credit or credits described in ORS 803.445 (5). The intergovernmental agreement must state the  date
on which the department shall begin collecting registration fees for the district.
(6) The  authority granted by this section allows the establishment of registration fees in addition
to those described in ORS 803.420 and 803.422. There  is no authority under this section to affect
registration periods, qualifications, cards, plates, requirements or any other provision  relating to
vehicle registration under the vehicle code.
(7) Except  as otherwise provided for in this subsection, when registration fees are imposed under
this section, the fees must be imposed on  all vehicle classes. Registration fees as provided under this
section may not be imposed on the following:
(a) Snowmobiles and Class I all-terrain vehicles.
(b) Fixed load vehicles.
(c) Vehicles registered under ORS 805.100 to disabled veterans.
(d) Vehicles registered as antique vehicles under ORS 805.010.
(e) Vehicles registered as vehicles of special interest under ORS 805.020.
(f) Government-owned or operated vehicles registered under ORS 805.040 or 805.045.
(g) School buses or school activity vehicles registered under ORS 805.050.
(h) Law enforcement undercover vehicles registered under ORS 805.060.
(i) Vehicles registered on a proportional basis for interstate operation.
(j) Vehicles with a registration weight of 26,001 pounds or more described  in ORS 803.420 (14)(a)
[96]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or (b).
(k) Vehicles registered as farm vehicles under the provisions of ORS 805.300.
(L) Travel trailers, campers and motor homes.
(m) Vehicles registered to an employment address as provided in ORS 802.250  when the eligible
public employee or household member’s residence address is not within the county of the  employ-
ment address.  The department may adopt rules it considers necessary for the administration of this
paragraph.
(n) Vehicles registered under ORS 805.110 to former prisoners of war.
(8) Any registration fee imposed by the governing body  of a district must be a fixed amount not
to exceed, with respect to  any vehicle class, the registration fee established under ORS 803.420 (6)(a)
and the fee applicable to the registered vehicle under ORS  803.422. For vehicles on which a flat fee
is imposed under ORS 803.420, the fee must be a whole dollar amount.
(9) A subject vehicle exempt under ORS 319.885 (3) from the fees applicable under  ORS
803.422 shall remain liable for any amount  of vehicle registration fee imposed by a district
under this section that would be required if the exemption did not exist. As used in  this
subsection, “subject vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 319.883.
SECTION 147.
 Section 6, chapter 491, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 6. (1)  Notwithstanding  ORS 803.445 (5), a metropolitan service district established under
ORS chapter 268 may impose a vehicle registration fee that does not exceed the sum  of the fee im-
posed under ORS 803.420 (6)(a) and the fee applicable to the  registered vehicle under ORS 803.422,
if the vehicle registration fee is approved by the electors of the district before December 31, 2022.
(2) A subject vehicle exempt under ORS 319.885 (3) from the fees applicable under  ORS
803.422 shall remain liable for any amount  of vehicle registration fee imposed by a district
under this section that would be required if the exemption did not exist. As used in  this
section, “subject vehicle” has the meaning given that term in ORS 319.883.
SECTION 148. ORS 803.091 is repealed on July 1, 2026.
SECTION 149. Section 150 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 319.883 to
319.946.
SECTION 150. (1) As used in this section, “permit tag” means a tag or sticker or other
form of identification that the Department of Transportation considers appropriate for  the
purpose of showing compliance with this section.
(2) The owner or operator  of a fleet of delivery vehicles shall obtain a per-mile road usage
permit from the department.
(3) The following apply to per-mile road usage permits issued under this section:
(a) Permits issued or renewed under this section may be annual or biennial as determined
by the department by rule.
(b) The department shall assign an identification to a fleet of  delivery vehicles and, upon
payment of appropriate fees, issue permit tags to the  fleet owners or operators. The de-
partment may establish the use of any appropriate form of identification under  this para-
graph that the department considers convenient.
(c) The permit tag issued under this section shall be displayed on any delivery vehicle  to
which it has been assigned by the department.
(d) Application for a  per-mile road usage permit under this section shall be in the manner
determined by the department by rule.
(e) An owner or operator of a fleet shall maintain records and provide information to  the
[97]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
department as required by the department by rule  and allow the department to audit the
records of the owner  or operator and conduct inspections at any reasonable time to deter-
mine compliance with this section and payment  of the per-mile road usage charge under ORS
319.885.
(f) Delivery vehicles shall be added to a fleet and transferred from the fleet  according to
procedures established by the department by rule.
(g) The delivery vehicles in the fleet shall be marked in compliance with  any requirement
for vehicle markings the department determines to be necessary  for identification of the
vehicles.
(h) The per-mile road usage permit fee for a delivery vehicle in a  fleet that is subject to
this section is $20.
(i) The department may schedule the time for payment of per-mile road usage permit fees
in any manner convenient to the department or to the fleet owner or operator.
(j) An owner or operator of a fleet shall comply with any rules  the department adopts for
the permitting of fleets of delivery vehicles under this section.
(k) The department shall establish procedures for the reporting of odometer  disclosures
for the delivery vehicles in a fleet  on a quarterly basis. The reports shall provide any infor-
mation the department determines by rule to be necessary for the  administration of the
per-mile road usage charge.
(4) The department  shall adopt rules necessary for the administration of this section. The
rules may include any provisions  that increase the convenience of the administration or of
the permitting process under this section.
SECTION 151.
 ORS 319.940 is amended to read:
319.940. (1) A person may not intentionally make a false statement in a report  or refund appli-
cation or when supplying other information required under ORS 319.920 or 319.930  or  section 150
of this 2025 Act .
(2) A person may not intentionally apply for, receive or attempt to receive a refund under ORS
319.925 or 319.930 to which the person is not entitled.
(3) A person may not intentionally aid or assist another person to violate  any provision of ORS
319.920, 319.925 or 319.930 or section 150 of this 2025 Act .
(4) A person who violates any provision of this section commits a Class A violation.
SECTION 152.
 ORS 815.425 is amended to read:
815.425. (1) A person  commits the offense of failure to submit an odometer disclosure if the
person is required by ORS 803.102, 803.370, 805.120 or 815.415  or section  150 of this 2025 Act  to
submit an odometer disclosure and the person fails to submit the required odometer disclosure.
(2) The offense described in this section, failure  to submit an odometer disclosure, is a Class C
misdemeanor.
SECTION 153. Section 150 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 319.910, 319.915,
319.920, 319.925, 319.930, 319.940, 367.095, 801.041, 801.042, 803.445 and 815.425 and  section 18,
chapter 30, Oregon Laws 2010, section 45, chapter 750, Oregon Laws 2017, and  section 6,
chapter 491, Oregon Laws 2019, by  sections 76 to 78, 135 to 139, 144 to 147, 151 and 152 of this
2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2026.
GREAT STREETS PROGRAM AND GENERAL CHANGES
[98]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 154.
 Section 1, chapter 323, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 1. (1) The [ Jurisdictional Transfer ] Great Streets  Advisory Committee is established within
the Department of Transportation.
(2) The committee consists of 11 members  appointed by the Governor. The members of the
committee shall include:
(a) Two members who are transportation engineers;
(b) Two members who represent cities  and who have experience working on transportation
projects;
(c) One member  who represents a county and who has experience working on transportation
projects;
(d) One member who represents a regional government  and who has experience working on
transportation projects;
(e) One member who represents road users;
(f) One member who represents law enforcement;
(g) One member who represents transit users;
(h) One member who represents the advisory committee on bicycle  traffic established in ORS
366.112; and
(i) One member who  represents the Transportation Safety Committee established in ORS 802.300.
(3) The Governor shall appoint members to the  [Jurisdictional Transfer ] Great Streets  Advisory
Committee so that there is at least one member of the  committee from each congressional district
in this state.
(4) The [ Jurisdictional Transfer ] Great Streets  Advisory Committee  shall, from the jurisdic-
tional transfer applications submitted under section 3 , chapter 323, Oregon Laws  2023 [of this 2023
Act]:
(a) Review the applications; and
(b) Develop a list of three jurisdictional transfers to recommend for grant funding  under sec-
tion 157 of this 2025 Act .
(5) The committee shall actively solicit reviews and comments from  the Oregon Transportation
Commission in the development of the list described in subsection  (4)(b) of this section. The com-
mittee shall also shall take into consideration the following:
(a) The difference between the applicant’s and the department’s standards of maintenance;
(b) The amount of deferred maintenance;
(c) A description of how the highway is used in the community;
(d) The climate impact of a transfer and subsequent upgrades the applicant could provide;
(e) The potential positive impacts on historically underserved groups;
(f) The increase in multimodal transportation options provided by a transfer;
(g) A description of the safety issues that exist; and
(h) A transfer readiness assessment that may include:
(A) The interest of the community;
(B) Funding capacity of the applicant for the transfer and maintenance in the future; and
(C) The existing condition of the highway and its current state of maintenance.
(6) No later than September 15 of each [ even-numbered] year, the [ Jurisdictional Transfer ] Great
Streets Advisory Committee  shall submit a report to the Joint Committee on Transportation, in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245,  and to the Oregon Transportation Commission,  that includes :
(a) The list of jurisdictional transfers recommended for funding under subsection (4)(b)  of this
[99]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section[ .];
(b) The list of final projects selected for grant awards under section  157 of this 2025 Act;
and
(c) The status of progress on the projects awarded a grant under  section 157 of this 2025
Act.
(7) The term of office of each member of  the [ Jurisdictional Transfer ] Great Streets  Advisory
Committee is four years, but a member serves at  the pleasure of the Governor. Before the expiration
of the term of a  member, the Governor shall appoint a successor whose term begins on January 1
next following. A member is eligible for reappointment.  However, a member of the committee may
not serve more than two terms.  If there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make an
appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term. When  a vacancy occurs in an
appointment made from a  congressional district, the successor shall be appointed from the congres-
sional district for which the vacancy exists.
(8) A majority of the members of the committee constitutes a quorum for  the transaction of
business.
(9) Official action by the committee requires the approval of a majority of  the members of the
committee.
(10) The committee shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(11) The committee shall meet  at times and places specified by the call of the chairperson or
of a majority of the members of the committee, provided that the committee meets at least four times
a year.
(12) The committee may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the committee.
(13) The Department of Transportation shall provide  assistance and space for meetings as re-
quested by the chair of the committee.
(14) Qualified members, as defined in ORS  292.495, of the advisory committee are entitled to
compensation for actual and necessary travel or other expenses  incurred in the performance of their
official duties as specified for qualified members of boards or commissions in ORS 292.495 (4).
SECTION 155.
 Section 3, chapter 323, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) The Department of Transportation shall adopt rules specifying the process by  which
a city  or county may apply for inclusion on the list of jurisdictional transfers recommended for
funding and submitted  to the Joint Committee on Transportation under section 1 , chapter 323,
Oregon Laws 2023 [ of this 2023 Act ].
(2) An application under this section must be on a form prescribed by the  department and must
include the following:
(a) The name of the city or county;
(b) A description of the portion of the highway to be transferred;
(c) A desired timeline for the transfer;
(d) The scope of the transfer;
(e) A description of which body assumes liability during and after the transfer;
(f) The cost to update the segment of highway transferred to a state of good repair; and
(g) Any other information necessary or helpful to the  [ Jurisdictional Transfer ] Great Streets
Advisory Committee established in section 1 , chapter 323, Oregon Laws 2023,  [ of this 2023 Act ] in
making its recommendations to the Joint Committee on Transportation.
(3) A jurisdictional transfer applicant must submit:
(a) Plans to  provide at least 20 percent of the moneys required for the jurisdictional transfer;
[100]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and
(b) A community vision plan that  describes the applicant’s plan for managing and improving the
highway.
SECTION 156.
(1) The Great Streets Fund is  established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Earnings on moneys in the Great Streets  Fund shall
be deposited into the fund. Moneys in the Great Streets Fund are continuously appropriated
to the Department of  Transportation for the purposes described in this section and in section
1, chapter 323, Oregon Laws 2023.
(2) The fund consists of the following:
(a) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Earnings on moneys in the fund.
(c) Moneys from any other source.
(3) The department shall use moneys in the  Great Streets Fund to provide grants as
provided in section 157 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 156a.
 Section 156 of this 2025 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 156.  (1) The Great Streets Fund is established in the State Treasury,  separate and distinct
from the General Fund. Earnings on  moneys in the Great Streets Fund shall be deposited into the
fund. Moneys in the Great Streets Fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of  Trans-
portation for the purposes described in this section  and in section 1, chapter 323, Oregon Laws 2023.
(2) The fund consists of the following:
(a) Moneys transferred to the fund under section 110 of this 2025 Act.
[(a)] (b) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
[(b)] (c)  Earnings on moneys in the fund.
[(c)] (d) Moneys from any other source.
(3) The department shall use moneys in the Great Streets Fund to provide grants as  provided
in section 157 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 156b.
The amendments to section 156 of this 2025 Act by section 156a  of this
2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2027.
SECTION 157. (1) The Department of Transportation may  provide, from moneys in the
Great Streets Fund established under section 156 of this 2025 Act,  grants for projects iden-
tified by the Great Streets Advisory Committee under section 1 (4), chapter 323, Oregon Laws
2023.
(2) The department shall adopt rules, after consulting  with the Great Streets Advisory
Committee, specifying the process by which a public body may apply for a  grant under this
section and prescribing the terms and conditions of grants.
(3) The department, in consultation with the Great Streets Advisory  Committee, shall
make the final selection  of projects to be awarded grants with moneys in the Great Streets
Fund. The department shall prioritize projects for grants that:
(a) Support jurisdictional transfers;
(b) Benefit facilities with:
(A) Above-average risk and rates of traffic injury or death;
(B) Limited transportation options; or
(C) A history of known safety concerns for vulnerable road users;
(c) Improve safety, access and mobility for all highway users;
(d) Combine infrastructure elements such as sidewalks, curb ramps,  crosswalks, lighting
[101]
HB 2025
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
and bike lanes into coordinated projects that promote efficient and complete highways;
(e) Reduce vehicle miles traveled and greenhouse gas emissions; or
(f) Support multimodal connectivity and regional mobility.
SECTION 158.
 ORS 802.348 is amended to read:
802.348. (1) The Department of Transportation  shall ensure that the membership of advisory
committees to the department reflects the racial and ethnic and ability composition of this  state as
determined by the most recent American  Community Survey from the United States Census Bureau.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies  to all advisory committees to the department, including
but not limited to:
(a) The Continuous Improvement Advisory Committee established in ORS 184.665.
(b) The Freight Advisory Committee established in ORS 366.212.
(c) The Road User Fee Task Force established in ORS 184.843.
(d) Any stakeholder forum established under ORS 366.215.
(e) The advisory committee on vehicle dealer regulation established in ORS 802.370.
(f) The advisory committee on bicycle traffic established in ORS 366.112.
(g) The Transportation Safety Committee established in ORS 802.300.
[(h) The Jurisdictional Transfer Advisory Committee established in section 1, chapter 323, Oregon
Laws 2023.]
SECTION 159.
Sections 6 and 7, chapter 323, Oregon Laws 2023, are repealed.
SECTION 160. ORS 366.215 is amended to read:
366.215. (1) The Oregon Transportation Commission may select,  establish, adopt, lay out, locate,
alter, relocate, change and  realign primary and secondary state highways , except that the com-
mission may not  reduce the width of an existing motor vehicle travel lane on an identified
freight route to less than 12 feet .
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the commission may  not permanently
reduce the vehicle-carrying capacity of an identified  freight route when altering, relocating, chang-
ing or realigning a state highway unless safety or access considerations require the reduction.
(3) A local government, as defined in  ORS 174.116, may apply to the commission for an ex-
emption from the prohibition in subsection (2) of this section. The  commission shall grant the ex-
emption if it finds that the exemption is in the best interest of the state and that freight movement
is not unreasonably impeded by the exemption.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 161.
The unit and section captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for
the convenience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory  law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
[102]