Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A person commits the crime of threatening a public official if:
(a) The person knowingly delivers or conveys, directly or indirectly and by any  means, a
threatening communication to a public official or a member of the  public official’s immediate
family;
(b) A reasonable person would expect the threatening communication to be followed by
unlawful acts of violence; and
(c) The person delivered or conveyed the threatening communication because of:
(A) The performance or nonperformance of some public duty of the public official;
(B) The status or position of the public official; or
(C) Any other factor related to the public official’s office or duties.
(2)(a) Threatening a public official is a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, threatening a public official is a
Class C felony if the person has a prior conviction under this section at the time of the  of-
fense.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Immediate family” means a spouse, persons related by descending  lineal
consanguinity, stepchildren, lawfully adopted children and foster children.
(b) “Public official” means a person  who was elected or appointed or who has filed the
required documents for nomination or election to an  office established, and the qualifications
and duties of which are prescribed, by statute to perform a  public duty for the state or any
political subdivision of the state. “Public official” includes an assistant  or deputy district
attorney, an assistant attorney general and a judge serving upon appointment as  a senior
judge or a judge pro tempore.
(c) “Threatening communication” means a communication that instills in  the recipient
a fear that the person delivering  or conveying the communication will cause imminent and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1701
SB 473
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
serious physical injury to or the death of the recipient or the recipient’s immediate family.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 161.005 is amended to read:
161.005. ORS 161.005 to 161.055,  161.065, 161.085 to 161.125, 161.150 to 161.175, 161.190 to
161.275, 161.290 to 161.373, 161.405 to 161.485, 161.505 to 161.585, 161.605, 161.615 to 161.685, 161.705
to 161.737, 162.005, 162.015 to 162.035,  162.055 to 162.115, 162.135 to 162.205, 162.225 to 162.375,
162.405 to 162.425, 162.465,  163.005, 163.095, 163.107, 163.115, 163.125 to 163.145, 163.149, 163.160 to
163.208, 163.191, 163.196, 163.215 to  163.257, 163.261, 163.263, 163.264, 163.266, 163.275, 163.285,
163.305 to 163.467, 163.429,  163.432, 163.433, 163.472, 163.505 to 163.575, 163.665 to 163.693, 163.700,
163.701, 163.715, 164.005, 164.015 to 164.135, 164.138, 164.140, 164.205 to 164.270,  164.305 to 164.377,
164.395 to 164.415,  164.805, 164.857, 164.886, 165.002 to 165.102, 165.109, 165.118, 165.805, 165.815,
166.005 to 166.095, 166.119, 166.125, 166.128, 166.350, 166.382, 166.384, 166.660, 167.002  to 167.027,
167.057, 167.060 to 167.100, 167.117, 167.122 to 167.162, 167.203 to 167.252,  167.310 to 167.340, 167.350,
167.810 and 167.820  and section 1 of this  2025 Act  shall be known and may be cited as Oregon
Criminal Code of 1971.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]