Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In addition  to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of  the
General Fund, the amount of $10 million, which shall be expended to:
(a) Hire one trained and experienced staff person or clinician for each  community mental
health program who will be responsible for programs addressing the behavioral  health needs
of seniors and persons with disabilities;
(b) Increase  the number of behavioral health specialists committed to serving seniors and
persons with disabilities in each community mental health program;
(c) Provide programmatic support for behavioral health services, consultation and train-
ing provided by specialists to seniors and persons with disabilities who  are served by com-
munity mental health programs  and social service agencies, with emphasis on reaching
seniors and persons with disabilities in rural or remote areas  or areas that lack sufficient
behavioral health treatment providers;
(d) Provide evidence-based programming, approaches and models to  help seniors and
persons with disabilities who have mental health and addiction issues;
(e) Provide suicide prevention services within the senior and disability communities,
particularly to older men;
(f) Provide aging and  disability resource center programming concerning community
outreach, information and referral to seniors and persons with disabilities;
(g) Provide community-based  behavioral health counseling options, including individual,
group and peer counseling, to seniors and persons with disabilities in their homes and in
community-based settings, including community-based long term care facilities;
(h) Provide training and education to seniors and persons  with disabilities and to their
advocates, family members,  care providers, health professionals and mental health profes-
sionals;
(i) Enhance care assessment and services for seniors and persons with disabilities;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1239
SB 173
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
(j) Collect data and research on behavioral health issues and service needs of seniors and
persons with disabilities;
(k) Carry out the recommendations of the preadmission screening  programs in the au-
thority and  the Department of Human Services regarding the behavioral health of seniors
and persons with disabilities;
(L) Provide opioid response and education, including peer mentoring, to  seniors and per-
sons with disabilities; and
(m) Carry out a public health  campaign addressing behavioral health issues affecting
seniors and persons with disabilities.
(2) The authority shall transfer to the department, out of the  moneys appropriated under
subsection (1) of this section, amounts sufficient to pay for the services described in  sub-
section (1) of this section that are provided by the department.
SECTION 2. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
[2]