Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Every corporation that is incorporated in this state as  described in ORS
60.051 or  that is a foreign corporation that is authorized to transact business in this state
under ORS 60.701 each year must file an affidavit in which the corporation attests that the
corporation registered  or attempted to register with the United States Selective Service
System.
(2) The corporation  shall file the affidavit with the Department of Revenue at the time
the corporation files a corporate excise or income tax return under ORS chapter 317 or 318.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a  corporation fails to file an affidavit
as described in subsection (2) of this section, the department  shall disallow all Oregon sub-
tractions and credits the corporation claimed on the corporation’s return.
(4) The department shall allow a corporation to file an affidavit  that brings the corpo-
ration into compliance with this section for three years after  the date on which the corpo-
ration filed the corporation’s return.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2662