Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 4, chapter 641, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  Section 3 [ of this 2019  Act ], chapter 641, Oregon Laws 2019,  is repealed January 2,
[2022] 2024.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to  the Department of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, to assist victims of domestic violence and sexual assault
with housing needs under section 3, chapter 641, Oregon Laws 2019.
SECTION 3. No later  than September 15, 2022, the Department of Justice shall provide
a report to an appropriate interim committee of the Legislative  Assembly in the manner
provided in ORS 192.245 on the expenditures of the department under section 3, chapter 641,
Oregon Laws 2019.
SECTION 4.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3535