Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 327.531 is amended to read:
327.531. (1)(a) A school or school district that meets the  eligibility requirements of the special
provisions of the United States Department of Agriculture’s National School Lunch Program  or
School Breakfast Program may offer  reimbursable breakfasts, lunches or both at no charge and
without consideration of individual eligibility by applying to the Department of Education.
(b) If the school or school district is approved under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the school
or school district must offer breakfasts, lunches or both to  all students of the school or school dis-
trict at no charge to the student.
(c) For each breakfast or  lunch that a school or school district provides at no charge as de-
scribed in this  subsection, the Department of Education shall provide reimbursement pursuant to
ORS 327.545 (2).
(2)(a) If a school or school district does not offer reimbursable  breakfasts or lunches as de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section, the school district must ensure that each  school of the
school district:
(A) Offers lunch at no  charge to students [ from households with incomes that do not exceed 300
percent of the federal poverty guidelines ].
(B) Offers breakfast at no charge  to students [ from households with incomes that do not exceed
300 percent of the federal poverty guidelines ], if breakfast must be offered pursuant to ORS 327.535.
(b) For each breakfast or lunch  that a school or school district provides at no charge as de-
scribed in this  subsection, the Department of Education shall provide reimbursement pursuant to
ORS 327.545 (3).
(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a  school or school district is not re-
quired to provide breakfast or lunch at no charge to  students if the Department of Education has
insufficient  funds to provide reimbursement pursuant to ORS 327.545 (2) or (3). The State Board of
Education shall adopt rules that describe:
(a) The method for determining when the department has insufficient funds;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1263
HB 3312
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
(b) The content and timing of the notice to  be provided to school districts when the department
determines that the department has insufficient funds; and
(c) The procedures the school or school district must follow upon receiving  notice of insufficient
funds.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 327.545 is amended to read:
327.545. (1) For  school districts with schools that provide United States Department of Agricul-
ture reimbursable meals to students as described in ORS 327.531 and  327.535, the Department of
Education shall reimburse  the school districts for costs incurred by the school districts in providing
the meals.  The amounts of the reimbursements may not exceed the amounts prescribed by sub-
sections (2) and (3) of this section.
(2) For schools that offer reimbursable breakfast and lunch at no charge to all students of the
school without consideration of individual eligibility for free or reduced price  meals as described in
ORS 327.531 (1), the amount  of reimbursements provided under this section may not exceed the dif-
ference between:
(a) The free reimbursement rate established by  the United States Department of Agriculture for
reimbursable meals; and
(b) Any amounts otherwise reimbursed or paid by state, federal or other sources.
(3) For schools that offer reimbursable breakfast and  lunch at no charge to students [ from
households with incomes that do not exceed 300 percent of  the federal poverty guidelines ] as described
in ORS 327.531 (2), the amount of  reimbursements provided under this section may not exceed the
difference  between:
(a) The free reimbursement rate established by  the United States Department of Agriculture for
reimbursable meals; and
(b) Any amounts otherwise reimbursed or paid by state, federal or other sources.
(4) The State Board of Education may adopt any  rules necessary for making reimbursements
under this section.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
[2]