Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 215.501 is amended to read:
215.501. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Accessory dwelling unit” means a residential structure that is used in  connection with or
that is auxiliary to a single-family dwelling.
(b) “Area zoned for rural residential use” means land that is not located inside  an urban growth
boundary as defined in ORS 197.015 and that is :
(A) Subject to an acknowledged exception to a statewide land use planning  goal relating to
farmland or forestland and planned and zoned by the county to allow residential  use as a primary
use[.]; or
(B) Zoned for exclusive farm use, but has a dwelling which was sited  under ORS 215.213
(3) or (4) or 215.284.
(c) “Historic home” means a single-family dwelling constructed between 1850 and 1945.
(d) “New” means that the dwelling being constructed did not previously exist in  residential or
nonresidential form. “New” does not include the acquisition, alteration, renovation or  remodeling
of an existing structure.
(e) “Single-family dwelling”  means a residential structure designed as a residence for one family
and sharing no common wall with another residence of any type.
(2) Notwithstanding any local zoning or local regulation or ordinance pertaining  to the siting
of accessory dwelling units in areas zoned  for rural residential use, a county may allow an owner
of a lot or parcel within an area zoned  for rural residential use to construct a new single-family
dwelling on the lot or parcel, provided:
(a) The lot or parcel is not located in an area designated as an urban reserve as defined in  ORS
197A.230;
(b) The lot or parcel is at least two acres in size;
(c) A historic home is sited on the lot or parcel;
(d) The  owner converts the historic home to an accessory dwelling unit upon completion of the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1667
SB 940
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
new single-family dwelling; and
(e) The accessory dwelling unit complies with all applicable laws  and regulations relating to
sanitation and wastewater disposal and treatment.
(3) An owner that constructs a new single-family dwelling under subsection (2) of this  section
may not:
(a) Subdivide, partition or otherwise divide the lot or parcel so that the new  single-family
dwelling is situated on a different lot or parcel from the accessory dwelling unit.
(b) Alter, renovate or remodel the accessory dwelling unit  so that the square footage of the
accessory dwelling unit is more than  120 percent of the historic home’s square footage at the time
construction of the new single-family dwelling commenced.
(c) Rebuild the accessory dwelling unit if the structure is lost to fire.
(d) Construct an additional accessory dwelling unit on the same lot or parcel.
(4) A county may require that a new  single-family dwelling constructed under this section be
served by the same water supply source as the accessory dwelling unit.
(5) A  county may impose additional conditions of approval for construction of a new single-
family dwelling or conversion of a historic home to an accessory dwelling unit under this section.
[2]