Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 316.
SECTION 2. There shall be subtracted from federal taxable income any amount of income
that is properly reported on the taxpayer’s federal income tax return, if the return:
(1) Is filed as a joint return, or filed by a surviving spouse; and
(2) Lists at least  three dependents who in relation to the taxpayer are qualifying children,
as defined in section  152(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, and who at the close of the tax
year are under the age of 18.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2026, and before January 1, 2032.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1952