Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Within each Department of  Corrections facility, there is established a
correctional facility staffing committee. Each committee shall:
(a) Consist of an equal number of managers and staff; and
(b) For that portion of the committee composed of staff, consist of correctional  officers,
nurses and other medical staff, behavioral health specialists and facility and professional
staff.
(2) A  correctional facility staffing committee shall develop a written facility-wide staffing
plan in accordance with section 2 of this 2025 Act. The committee’s primary goals in  devel-
oping the staffing plan shall be to ensure that the facility is staffed to  provide for the health,
safety and security of adults in custody and department employees. The committee shall re-
view and modify the staffing plan in accordance with section 3 of this 2025 Act.
(3) A majority of the members of a  correctional facility staffing committee constitutes
a quorum for the transaction of business.
(4) A correctional  facility staffing committee shall have two cochairs. One cochair shall
be a manager elected  by the members of the committee who are managers and one cochair
shall be a staff member elected by the members of the committee who are staff.
(5)(a) A  decision made by a correctional facility staffing committee must be made by a
vote of a majority of the members of the committee. If a quorum  of members comprises an
unequal number of managers and staff, only  an equal number of managers and staff may
vote.
(b) If the committee is unable  to reach an agreement on the staffing plan, either cochair
of the committee may invoke a 30-day period during which the committee shall continue to
develop the staffing plan. During the 30-day period, the superintendent of the correctional
facility shall respond in a timely manner to reasonable requests from members of the com-
mittee for data that will enable the committee to  reach a resolution. If, at the end of the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3183
HB 3269
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
30-day period, the committee remains unable to reach an  agreement on the staffing plan, one
of the cochairs shall notify the Director of the Department of Corrections of the impasse.
(c) Upon receiving notification under  paragraph (b) of this subsection, the director shall
provide the committee with a mediator to assist the committee in reaching an agreement
on the staffing plan. Mediation conducted under this paragraph must  be consistent with the
requirements for implementing and reviewing staffing plans under sections  2 and 3 of this
2025 Act.
(6) A correctional facility staffing committee shall meet:
(a) At least once every three months; and
(b) At any time and place specified by either cochair.
(7)(a) Subject to paragraph (b) of this subsection, a correctional  facility staffing com-
mittee meeting must be open to:
(A) All facility employees as observers; and
(B) Upon invitation by either cochair, other observers or presenters.
(b) At any time, either cochair may exclude persons described  in paragraph (a) of this
subsection from a committee meeting for purposes related to deliberation and voting.
(8) Minutes of correctional facility staffing committee meetings must:
(a) Include motions made and outcomes of votes taken;
(b) Summarize discussions; and
(c) Be made available in a timely manner to facility staff and upon request.
(9) A Department of Corrections facility shall release a member of  the correctional fa-
cility staffing committee from the member’s  assignment, and provide the member with paid
time, to attend committee meetings.
SECTION 2.
(1) Each Department of  Corrections facility shall implement the written
facility-wide staffing plan developed and approved by  the correctional facility staffing com-
mittee under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The staffing plan:
(a) Must be based on the specialized qualifications and competencies of staff and provide
for the skill mix and level  of competency necessary to ensure that the correctional facility
is staffed to meet the health, safety and security needs of adults in custody and department
employees; and
(b) Must be based on the specific population of adults in custody in the facility.
(3)(a) The department may not impose upon unionized department staff any changes  in
wages, hours or other terms  and conditions of employment pursuant to a staffing plan unless
the employer first provides notice to and, upon request, bargains with the  union as the ex-
clusive collective bargaining representative of the nursing staff in the bargaining unit.
(b) A staffing plan does not create, preempt or modify a collective bargaining  agreement
or require a union or employer to bargain over the staffing plan while a  collective bargaining
agreement is in effect.
SECTION 3.
(1) A correctional facility staffing committee established pursuant  to section
1 of this 2025 Act shall review the written  facility-wide staffing plan developed by the com-
mittee under section 2 of this 2025 Act:
(a) At least once every year; and
(b) At any other date and time specified by either cochair of the committee.
(2) In reviewing a staffing plan, a correctional facility staffing committee shall consider:
[2]
HB 3269
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
(a) Complaints regarding staffing;
(b) The aggregate hours of mandatory overtime worked by facility staff;
(c) The aggregate hours of voluntary overtime worked by facility staff;
(d) The percentage of shifts for which staffing differed from what is required by  the
staffing plan; and
(e) Any other matter determined  by the committee to be necessary to ensure that the
facility is staffed to ensure the health, safety and security of  adults in custody and depart-
ment employees.
(3) Upon reviewing a staffing plan, a correctional facility staffing committee shall:
(a) Report whether the staffing plan ensures  the health, safety and security of adults in
custody and department employees; and
(b) Modify  the staffing plan as necessary to ensure the health, safety and security of
adults in custody and department employees.
[3]