Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 821.150 to
821.292.
SECTION 2. A Class I, Class III or Class  IV all-terrain vehicle may be lawfully operated
on a highway under the following circumstances:
(1) The all-terrain vehicle is registered under ORS 803.310; and
(2) The vehicle is operated on a highway that is not an interstate highway.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 821.190 is amended to read:
821.190. (1) A person commits the offense of unlawful operation of an off-road vehicle on  a
highway or railroad if the person operates a vehicle described in subsection (2) of this  section in
any of the following described areas:
(a) On or across the paved portion, the shoulder,  inside bank or slope of any highway, on or
across the median  of any divided highway or on or across any portion of a highway right of way
under construction.
(b) On or across a railroad right of way.
(2) This section applies to:
(a) Snowmobiles.
(b) Class I all-terrain vehicles  that:
(A) Are not properly equipped for operation on a highway; and
(B) Are not registered under ORS 803.310 .
(c) Class II all-terrain vehicles that are not properly equipped for operation on a highway.
(d) Class III all-terrain vehicles that:
(A) Are not properly equipped for operation on a highway; and
(B) Are not registered under ORS 803.310 .
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 936
HB 3155
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) Class IV all-terrain vehicles that:
(A) Are not properly equipped for operation on a highway; and
(B) Are not registered under ORS 803.310 .
(3) Exemptions from this section are established under ORS 821.055 and 821.200.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to Class I, Class III or Class IV all-terrain
vehicles that are  registered under ORS 803.310 and operate on highways that are not inter-
state highways as permitted under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
[(4)] (5) In addition to penalties provided by this section, the operator or owner of a  snowmobile
or Class I, Class II, Class III or Class  IV all-terrain vehicle may be liable as provided under ORS
821.310.
[(5)] (6)  The offense described in this section, unlawful  operation of an off-road vehicle on a
highway or railroad, is a Class B traffic violation.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 803.310 is amended to read:
803.310. (1) The Department of Transportation, by rule, may provide for optional registration of
vehicles that are exempt from vehicle registration requirements by  ORS 803.305. The rules adopted
for purposes of this subsection may provide for the registration of categories of vehicles,  types of
vehicles or otherwise.  Upon request of an owner, the department may issue registration for a vehicle
that meets the requirements of rules adopted under this section.
(2) The department, by rule, shall provide for optional registration of Class I,  Class III
and Class IV all-terrain  vehicles. Notwithstanding the requirement in ORS 803.350 (9) that a
vehicle registered in this state be designed for operation on highways, an applicant may re-
quest optional registration of a Class I, Class III or Class IV all-terrain  vehicle if the appli-
cant provides the department  with satisfactory proof that the all-terrain vehicle meets
equipment requirements imposed by statute or rule for the lawful operation of a vehicle on
the highways. The  department may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this subsection,
including but not limited to specifying what constitutes  satisfactory proof under this sub-
section and the amount of the registration fee.
[(2)] (3)  A vehicle that  is registered under this section is subject to the same provisions, condi-
tions, fees and other requirements for registration as are other vehicles under the vehicle code.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 807.020, as amended by section 3, chapter 12, Oregon Laws 2024, is  amended
to read:
807.020. A person who is granted a driving privilege by this section  may exercise the driving
privilege described without  violation of the requirements under ORS 807.010. A grant of driving
privileges to operate a motor vehicle under this section is subject to suspension  and revocation the
same as other  driving privileges granted under the vehicle code. This section is in addition to any
exemptions from the vehicle code under ORS 801.026. The following persons are  granted the de-
scribed driving privileges:
(1) A person who is not a resident of this  state or who has been a resident of this state for less
than 30 days may operate a motor vehicle without an Oregon license or driver permit  if the person
holds a current out-of-state license issued to the person. For the purpose of this subsection, a  person
is a resident of this state if the person meets the residency requirements described in  ORS 807.062.
To qualify under this subsection, the person must have the  out-of-state license or driver permit in
the person’s possession. A person is not granted driving privileges under this subsection:
(a) If the person is under the minimum age required to be eligible for  driving privileges under
ORS 807.060;
[2]
HB 3155
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) During a period of suspension or revocation by this state or any other jurisdiction of  driving
privileges or of the right to apply for a license or driver permit  issued by this state or any other
jurisdiction;  or
(c) That exceed the driving privileges granted  to the person by the out-of-state license or driver
permit.
(2) A person who is a member  of the Armed Forces of the United States or a member of the
commissioned corps of the National  Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration may operate a motor
vehicle without an Oregon license or  driver permit if the person is operating a motor vehicle in the
course of the person’s duties in the Armed Forces or the National  Oceanic and Atmospheric Ad-
ministration.
(3) A person without a license or driver permit may operate a  road roller or road machinery
that is not required to be registered under the laws of this state.
(4) A person without a license or  driver permit may temporarily operate, draw, move or propel
a farm tractor or implement of husbandry.
(5) A person without a license or driver permit may operate a motor  vehicle to demonstrate
driving ability during the course of  an examination administered under ORS 807.070 for the purpose
of qualifying for a license or driver permit. This subsection only  applies when an authorized exam-
iner is in a seat beside the driver of the motor vehicle.
(6) Driving privileges for snowmobiles are exclusively as provided in ORS 821.150.
(7) Driving privileges for Class  I all-terrain vehicles are exclusively as provided in ORS 821.170,
unless:
(a) A person  is operating a Class I all-terrain vehicle on an all-terrain vehicle highway access
route that is designated by the Oregon Transportation  Commission as open to all-terrain vehicles ;
or
(b) A person  registers the Class I all-terrain vehicle under ORS 803.310 and is operating
the Class I all-terrain vehicle on a highway as permitted under section 2 of this 2025 Act .
(8) Driving privileges for Class III all-terrain vehicles are exclusively as provided in ORS
821.172, unless:
(a) A person is operating  a Class III all-terrain vehicle on an all-terrain vehicle highway access
route that is designated by the commission as open to all-terrain vehicles ; or
(b) A person registers the Class III all-terrain vehicle under ORS 803.310 and  is operating
the Class III all-terrain vehicle on a highway as permitted under section 2 of this 2025 Act .
(9) Driving privileges for Class IV all-terrain vehicles are exclusively as provided in ORS
821.176, unless:
(a) A person is operating  a Class IV all-terrain vehicle on an all-terrain vehicle highway access
route that is designated by the commission as open to all-terrain vehicles ; or
(b) A  person registers the Class IV all-terrain vehicle under ORS 803.310 and is operating
the Class IV all-terrain vehicle on a highway as permitted under section 2 of this 2025 Act .
(10) A person without a license or driver permit may operate a golf cart in  accordance with an
ordinance adopted under ORS 810.070.
(11) The spouse of a member of the Armed Forces of the United States on active duty or the
spouse of a member of the commissioned corps of the National  Oceanic and Atmospheric Adminis-
tration who  is accompanying the member on assignment in this state may operate a motor vehicle
if the spouse has a current out-of-state  license or driver permit issued to the spouse by another state
in the spouse’s possession.
[3]
HB 3155
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(12) A person who is a member of the Armed Forces of  the United States on active duty or a
member of the commissioned corps of the National Oceanic and  Atmospheric Administration may
operate a motor vehicle if the person  has a current out-of-state license or driver permit in the
person’s possession that is issued to the  person by the person’s state of domicile or by the Armed
Forces of the United States in a foreign country. Driving privileges described  under this subsection
that are granted by the Armed Forces  apply only for a period of 45 days from the time the person
returns to the United States.
(13) A person who does not  hold a motorcycle endorsement may operate a motorcycle if the
person is:
(a) Within an enclosed cab;
(b) Operating a vehicle designed to travel  with three wheels in contact with the ground at
speeds of less than 15 miles per hour; or
(c) Operating an autocycle.
(14) Except  as provided in subsection (15) of this section, a person may operate a bicycle without
any grant of driving privileges.
(15) A person may operate the following without any grant of driving  privileges if the person is
16 years of age or older:
(a) A Class 1 electric assisted bicycle;
(b) A Class 2 electric assisted bicycle; or
(c) A Class 3 electric assisted bicycle.
(16) A  person may operate a motor assisted scooter without a driver license or driver permit if
the person is 16 years of age or older.
(17) A person who is not a resident of this state or who has been  a resident of this state for less
than 30 days may operate a motor vehicle without an Oregon license or driver permit  if the person
is at least 15 years of age  and has in the person’s possession a current out-of-state equivalent of a
Class C instruction driver permit issued to the person. For the purpose of this subsection, a person
is a resident  of this state if the person meets the residency requirements described in ORS 807.062.
A person operating a motor  vehicle under authority of this subsection has the same privileges and
is subject to the same  restrictions as a person operating under the authority of a Class C instruction
driver permit issued as provided in ORS 807.280.
(18) A person may operate an electric personal assistive mobility device without any grant of
driving privileges if the person is 16 years of age or older.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 803.525 is amended to read:
803.525. The Department of Transportation shall issue  two registration plates for every vehicle
that is registered by the department except as otherwise provided in this section or ORS  803.530.
Upon renewal or when otherwise provided  under ORS 803.555, the department may issue stickers in
lieu of or in addition to registration plates. The following shall be issued plates as described:
(1) Only one registration plate  shall be issued for a moped, motorcycle, trailer, antique vehicle
or vehicle of special interest registered by the department.
(2) Only one plate shall be issued  for a camper  or Class I, Class III or Class IV all-terrain
vehicle that is registered. Stickers may be issued in lieu of a plate.
SECTION 7.  ORS 806.020 is amended to read:
806.020. This section provides exemptions from the necessity for  compliance with or proof of
compliance with financial responsibility requirements in accident reports under ORS 811.725,  when
applying for vehicle  registration under ORS 803.370 or 803.460 and for operating a vehicle under
[4]
HB 3155
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
ORS 806.010. The owner or operator of a vehicle is exempt, as provided by this section, from finan-
cial responsibility  requirements if the vehicle involved in the accident, sought to be registered or
operated is any of the following:
(1) An antique vehicle issued permanent registration under ORS 805.010.
(2) A farm trailer.
(3) A farm tractor.
(4) An implement of husbandry.
(5) A vehicle of special interest that is maintained as a collector’s item and  used for exhibitions,
parades, club activities and similar uses, but not  used primarily for the transportation of persons
or property.
(6) A snowmobile or a Class I, Class III or Class IV all-terrain vehicle, unless the  vehicle is
operating on an all-terrain vehicle highway access route  that is designated by the Oregon Trans-
portation Commission as open to all-terrain  vehicles  or on a highway as permitted under section
2 of this 2025 Act .
(7) Any motor vehicle  not operated on any highway or premises open to the public in this state.
(8) A motor assisted scooter.
(9) An electric personal assistive mobility device.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 815.110 is amended to read:
815.110. This section establishes requirements for ORS 815.115. The  requirements under this
section are in addition to any other requirements for lighting  equipment provided by law. Except
as specifically provided by an exemption under ORS 815.120, a person violates ORS 815.115 if the
person does not comply with any of the following requirements:
(1) The following types of vehicles must display slow-moving vehicle emblems  described under
ORS 815.060:
(a) Vehicles or combinations  of vehicles designed for customary use at speeds of less than 25
miles per hour.
(b) Golf carts or similar vehicles when operated by a person with a disability.
(c) [ Class I, Class II and Class IV ] All-terrain vehicles operated  on a highway under ORS
821.191 (1) or section 2 of this 2025 Act .
(2) Slow-moving vehicle emblems must meet the requirements for such emblems  established by
the Department of Transportation by rule under ORS 815.060.
(3) Slow-moving vehicle emblems shall be displayed on the rear of the power unit.  When a
combination of vehicles is being operated in a manner that  obscures the emblem mounted on the
power unit, an additional emblem shall be displayed on the  rear of the rearmost vehicle in the
combination.
[5]