Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 181A.820 and 181A.822 to 181A.829, when a person
is arrested for delivery  or manufacture of fentanyl, the arresting officer shall immediately
notify federal immigration authorities.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 135.230 to 135.290, a person arrested for delivery or manufacture
of fentanyl is not eligible for any form of release, except as required by the Oregon Consti-
tution, until the notification described in subsection (1) of this section has occurred and
federal immigration authorities have confirmed  that the person does not need to be detained
for violating federal immigration law.
(3) As used  in this section, “federal immigration authorities” means agents of the United
States Immigration and  Customs Enforcement, or a successor agency, who receive reports
of and investigate violations of immigration law.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3918