Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used  in this section and section 2 of this 2025 Act, “homestead” has
the meaning given that term in ORS 311.666.
(2) Upon compliance with section 2 of this 2025 Act, 50 percent of  the assessed value of
a homestead meeting the requirements of subsection (3) of this section shall be exempt from
ad valorem property taxation.
(3) The property for which a claim is filed must:
(a) Be the homestead of:
(A) An individual who is or will become at least 65 years of age  during the property tax
year for which the file is claimed; or
(B) Regardless of age, the  surviving spouse of an individual described in subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph.
(b) Have been the homestead of  the individual filing the claim for at least five years
preceding April 1 of the year in which the claim is filed.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 143
HB 3249
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
(4) A partial exemption allowed under this section is in addition to  and not in lieu of any
other property tax limit, partial exemption, special assessment, deferral or credit.
SECTION 2.
(1)(a) An individual seeking the partial exemption  for a homestead allowable
under section 1 of this  2025 Act must file with the county assessor, on forms supplied by the
assessor, a claim in writing on or before April 1 immediately preceding the property  tax year
for which the partial exemption is claimed.
(b)(A) The surviving spouse described in section 1 (3)(a)(B) of this 2025  Act of an indi-
vidual whose homestead has been granted  a partial exemption under this section may elect,
at any time during the property  tax year, to continue the partial exemption without filing a
new claim if the individual died during the previous property tax year.
(B) The  surviving spouse of the individual must notify the county assessor of the
election.
(C) Upon receipt of the notice, the county assessor shall continue  the partial exemption
if the surviving spouse meets all the eligibility requirements to claim the partial  exemption
other than the timely filing of a claim under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) The claim of an individual or surviving spouse must:
(a) Be in writing on a form supplied by the Department of Revenue;
(b) Designate the homestead to which the partial exemption will apply;
(c) Recite all facts establishing the eligibility  of the homestead for, and of the individual
or surviving spouse to claim, the partial exemption;
(d) Have attached documentary proof showing:
(A) The individual’s age;
(B) For the surviving spouse of  an individual, the official spousal and death records of
the individual;
(C) That the residence is the individual’s or the surviving spouse’s homestead;
(D) That the individual or  surviving spouse is a United States citizen or is legally resident
in the United States; and
(E) Any  other information the department considers necessary for processing the claim;
and
(e) Include a written declaration made by the  individual or surviving spouse under pen-
alties for false swearing under ORS 162.075 that the statements contained in the  claim are
true.
SECTION 3.
Sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act apply to property tax years beginning on
or after July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]