Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 778.215 is amended to read:
778.215. (1) Upon the expiration  of the term of a commissioner, a successor shall be appointed
by the Governor, subject to confirmation as provided by ORS 171.562  and 171.565. Except as pro-
vided in ORS 778.220 and 778.235, appointees, when confirmed, shall  hold office for a term of four
years and until their respective successors have been appointed, confirmed and qualified.
(2) If a vacancy occurs by death, resignation or disqualification of a commissioner, the  vacancy
shall be filled by appointment by the Governor for the  unexpired term subject to confirmation as
provided by subsection (1) of this section.
(3) In making an appointment under subsections (1)  and (2) of this section, the Governor
shall interview at least one candidate  from an underserved racial, ethnic or minority popu-
lation.
(4) Subsection (3) of this section does  not require the Governor to appoint a candidate
who is interviewed under subsection (3) of this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2001