Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
OREGON MEDICAL AND THERAPEUTIC CANNABIS ACT
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 5 of this 2021 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 475B.785
to 475B.949.
SECTION 2. (1) A person designated to produce marijuana by a registry identification
cardholder may transfer, pursuant to an agreement entered into with the registry  identifi-
cation cardholder  and subject to the limits established in ORS 475B.825, 475B.831 and
475B.834, all or part of the seeds, immature marijuana plants and usable marijuana  associ-
ated with the production of marijuana described in this  subsection to another registry iden-
tification cardholder or the other registry identification cardholder’s designated primary
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2569
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
caregiver.
(2) A transfer made under this section is subject to tracking under ORS 475B.895.
(3) The Oregon Health Authority may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 3.
The Oregon Health Authority shall include on a website dedicated to the
program administered under ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949 a statement declaring that cannabis
is to be treated as a medicine, the program administered under  ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949 is
a public health program and the authority is dedicated to ensuring equitable  access to the
program for all  Oregonians. The authority shall adopt and abide by internal policies that
focus on ensuring equitable access to the program for all Oregonians.
SECTION 4.
(1) A medical marijuana dispensary may transfer usable marijuana,  imma-
ture marijuana plants, seeds, medical cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates  and
cannabinoid extracts to an  individual who provides to the medical marijuana dispensary proof
that the individual is the holder of a medical marijuana patient card issued by another state.
(2) A medical marijuana dispensary shall post in an area visible to the public a notice that
an individual described in subsection (1) of  this section is not exempt from ORS 475B.227 or
475B.381.
(3) The Oregon Health Authority:
(a) May adopt rules regarding the validity of medical  marijuana patient cards described
under subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) Shall adopt rules to establish requirements for the notice described under subsection
(2) of this section.
SECTION 5.
The Oregon Health Authority  shall, in consultation with the Oregon Liquor
Control Commission and other state agencies as necessary:
(1) Ensure the highest level of  protection and privacy for information submitted and
maintained in the databases established under  ORS 475B.879 and 475B.882, the electronic
system established under ORS 475B.892 and the tracking system established under ORS
475B.177;
(2) Continually revise information handling and submission processes to reduce multiple
submissions of  personally identifiable information in the databases established under ORS
475B.879 and 475B.882, the electronic system established under ORS 475B.892 and the tracking
system established under ORS 475B.177; and
(3) Ensure any third  party vendors with which the authority or the commission contracts
for the management of the  databases established under ORS 475B.879 and 475B.882, the
electronic system  established under ORS 475B.892 and the tracking system established under
ORS 475B.177 prevent cybersecurity breaches.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 475B.788 is amended to read:
475B.788. ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949 shall be known as the Oregon  Medical [ Marijuana] and
Therapeutic Cannabis Act.
SECTION 7.  ORS 475B.791 is amended to read:
475B.791. As used in ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949:
(1) “Attending [ physician] provider” means [ a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677 ] one
of the following health care providers  who has primary responsibility for the care and treatment
of a person diagnosed with a debilitating medical condition[ .]:
(a) A physician licensed under ORS chapter 677;
(b) A physician assistant licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525;
[2]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) A nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390;
(d) A naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685;
(e) A dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679; or
(f) An optometrist licensed under ORS 683.010 to 683.340.
(2) “Cannabinoid” means any of  the chemical compounds that are the active constituents of
marijuana.
(3) “Cannabinoid concentrate” means a substance  obtained by separating cannabinoids from
marijuana by:
(a) A mechanical extraction process;
(b) A chemical extraction process using a nonhydrocarbon-based solvent, such as vegetable
glycerin, vegetable oils, animal fats, isopropyl alcohol or ethanol;
(c) A chemical extraction process using the hydrocarbon-based solvent carbon  dioxide, provided
that the process does not involve the use of high heat or pressure; or
(d) Any other process identified by  the Oregon Health Authority, in consultation with the
Oregon Liquor Control Commission, by rule.
(4) “Cannabinoid edible” means food  or potable liquid into which a cannabinoid concentrate,
cannabinoid extract or dried leaves or flowers of marijuana have been incorporated.
(5) “Cannabinoid extract” means  a substance obtained by separating cannabinoids from
marijuana by:
(a) A chemical extraction process using a hydrocarbon-based solvent, such as butane, hexane
or propane;
(b) A chemical extraction process using the hydrocarbon-based  solvent carbon dioxide, if the
process uses high heat or pressure; or
(c) Any other process identified by the Oregon  Health Authority, in consultation with the
Oregon Liquor Control Commission, by rule.
(6) “Debilitating medical condition” means:
(a) Cancer, glaucoma, a degenerative  or pervasive neurological condition, positive status for
human immunodeficiency virus or acquired immune deficiency  syndrome, or a side effect related to
the treatment of those medical conditions;
(b) A medical condition or treatment for  a medical condition that produces, for a specific pa-
tient, one or more of the following:
(A) Cachexia;
(B) Severe pain;
(C) Severe nausea;
(D) Seizures, including seizures caused by epilepsy; or
(E) Persistent muscle spasms, including spasms caused by multiple sclerosis;
(c) Post-traumatic stress disorder , presumptive post-traumatic stress disorder based on the
person’s history of arrest or imprisonment  or a medical condition related to post-traumatic
stress disorder, including:
(A) Chronic anxiety; and
(B) Chronic depression; or
(d) Any other medical condition or side effect related to the treatment of a medical  condition
adopted by the Oregon Health Authority by rule [ or], approved by the authority pursuant  to a pe-
tition filed under ORS 475B.946 or as determined by an attending provider in the professional
judgment and ongoing medical oversight of the attending provider .
[3]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(7)(a) “Delivery” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475.005.
(b) “Delivery” does  not include transfer of marijuana by a registry identification cardholder to
another registry identification cardholder if no consideration is paid for the transfer.
(8)(a) “Designated primary caregiver” means an individual:
(A) Who is 18 years of age or older;
(B) Who has significant responsibility for  managing the well-being of a person who has been
diagnosed with a debilitating medical condition; and
(C) Who is designated as the person responsible for managing the well-being of  a person who
has been  diagnosed with a debilitating medical condition on that person’s application for a registry
identification card or in other written notification submitted to the authority.
(b) “Designated primary caregiver” does not include a person’s attending [ physician] provider.
(9) “High heat” means a temperature exceeding 180 degrees.
(10) “Immature marijuana plant” means a marijuana plant that is not flowering.
(11)(a) “Marijuana” means the plant Cannabis family  Cannabaceae, any part of the plant
Cannabis family Cannabaceae and the seeds of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae.
(b) “Marijuana” does not include:
(A) Industrial hemp, as defined in ORS 571.269; or
(B) Prescription drugs, as that term is defined in ORS 689.005, including those  containing one
or more  cannabinoids, that are approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and
dispensed by a pharmacy, as defined in ORS 689.005.
(12) “Marijuana grow site” means  a location registered under ORS 475B.810 where marijuana
is produced for use by a registry identification cardholder.
(13) “Marijuana processing  site” means a marijuana processing site registered under ORS
475B.840 or a site  for which an applicant has submitted an application for registration under ORS
475B.840.
(14) “Mature marijuana plant” means a marijuana plant that is not an immature marijuana
plant.
(15)(a) “Medical cannabinoid product” means a cannabinoid edible and any  other product in-
tended for human consumption or use, including a product intended to  be applied to a person’s skin
or hair, that contains cannabinoids or dried leaves or flowers of marijuana.
(b) “Medical cannabinoid product” does not include:
(A) Usable marijuana by itself;
(B) A cannabinoid concentrate by itself;
(C) A cannabinoid extract by itself; or
(D) Industrial hemp, as defined in ORS 571.269.
(16) “Medical marijuana dispensary” means a medical marijuana  dispensary registered under
ORS 475B.858 or a  site for which an applicant has submitted an application for registration under
ORS 475B.858.
(17) “Medical use of  marijuana” means the production, processing, possession, delivery or ad-
ministration of marijuana, or use of paraphernalia used to administer marijuana, to  mitigate the
symptoms or effects of a debilitating medical condition.
(18) “Person designated to produce marijuana by a registry  identification cardholder” means a
person designated to produce marijuana by a registry identification cardholder  under ORS 475B.810
who produces  marijuana for a registry identification cardholder at an address other than the address
where the registry identification cardholder resides or at an address  where more than 12 mature
[4]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
marijuana plants are produced.
(19) “Process” means the  compounding or conversion of marijuana into medical cannabinoid
products, cannabinoid concentrates or cannabinoid extracts.
(20) “Production” means:
(a) Planting, cultivating, growing, trimming or harvesting marijuana; or
(b) Drying marijuana leaves or flowers.
(21) “Registry identification card” means  a document issued by the Oregon Health Authority
under ORS 475B.797 that identifies a person authorized to engage in the medical  use of marijuana
and, if the person has a designated  primary caregiver under ORS 475B.804, the person’s designated
primary caregiver.
(22) “Registry identification cardholder” means a person to  whom a registry identification card
has been issued under ORS 475B.797.
(23)(a) “Usable marijuana” means the dried leaves and flowers of marijuana.
(b) “Usable marijuana” does not include:
(A) The seeds, stalks and roots of marijuana; or
(B) Waste material that is a by-product of producing marijuana.
(24) “Written documentation” means  a statement signed by the attending [ physician] provider
of a person diagnosed with  a debilitating medical condition or copies of the person’s relevant med-
ical records.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 475B.797 is amended to read:
475B.797. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish a program  for the issuance of registry
identification cards to applicants who meet the requirements of this section.
(2) The authority shall issue a registry identification card to an  applicant who is 18 years of age
or older if the applicant pays a fee in an amount established by the authority by rule and  submits
to the authority an application containing the following information:
(a) Written documentation  from the applicant’s attending [ physician] provider stating that the
attending [ physician] provider has diagnosed the applicant as having a debilitating  medical condi-
tion and that the medical use of marijuana may mitigate  the symptoms or effects of the applicant’s
debilitating medical condition;
(b) The name, address and date of birth of the applicant;
(c) The name, address and telephone number of the applicant’s attending [ physician] provider;
[(d) Proof of residency, submitted in a form required by the authority by rule; ]
[(e)] (d) The name and address of the applicant’s  designated primary caregiver, if the applicant
is designating a primary caregiver under ORS 475B.804; [ and]
[(f)] (e) The information described in ORS 475B.810 (2), if  the applicant is applying to produce
marijuana or designate another person under ORS 475B.810 to produce marijuana[ .]; and
(f) Whether the applicant is enrolled in the state medical assistance program.
(3)(a) The authority shall issue a registry identification  card to an applicant who is under 18
years of age if:
(A) The applicant pays the fee and submits the application  described in subsection (2) of this
section; and
(B) The custodial parent or legal guardian who is responsible for the health care  decisions of
the applicant signs and submits to the authority a written statement that:
(i) The applicant’s attending [ physician] provider has explained to the applicant and to the
custodial parent or legal guardian the possible risks and benefits of the medical use of marijuana;
[5]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(ii) The custodial parent or legal guardian consents to the  medical use of marijuana by the ap-
plicant;
(iii) The custodial parent or legal guardian  agrees to serve as the applicant’s designated primary
caregiver; and
(iv) The custodial parent or legal guardian agrees to control the acquisition, dosage  and fre-
quency of the medical use of marijuana by the applicant.
(b) An applicant  who is under 18 years of age may not apply to produce marijuana under sub-
section [ (2)(f)] (2)(e) of this section.
(4) The authority shall:
(a) On the date on which the  authority receives an application described in subsection (2) of this
section, issue a receipt to  the applicant verifying that the authority received an application under
subsection (2) or (3) of this section; and
(b) Approve or deny an application received under subsection (2) or  (3) of this section within
30 days after receiving the application.
(5)(a) If the  authority approves an application, the authority shall issue a serially numbered
registry  identification  card to the applicant within five days after approving the application. The
registry identification card must include the following information:
(A) The registry identification cardholder’s name, address and date of birth;
(B) The issuance date and expiration date of the registry identification card;
(C) If the registry identification cardholder designated a primary caregiver under ORS 475B.804,
the name and address of the registry identification cardholder’s designated primary caregiver; and
(D) Any other information required by the authority by rule.
(b) If the registry identification cardholder  designated a primary caregiver under ORS 475B.804,
the authority shall issue an identification card to the designated primary  caregiver. The identifica-
tion card must contain the information required by paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) If an applicant under subsection (2) of this section provides written documentation
from the applicant’s attending provider that the attending  provider has diagnosed the appli-
cant as having a debilitating medical condition of which the applicant cannot be cured  and
the authority approves the applicant’s application, the authority  shall issue to the applicant
a permanent registry identification  card that contains the information described in para-
graph (a)(A), (C) and (D) of this subsection and that is not subject to the  renewal require-
ments under subsection (6)(b) of this section.
(6) A registry identification cardholder shall:
(a) In a form and manner prescribed by the authority,  notify the authority of any change con-
cerning the registry identification cardholder’s:
(A) Name, address or attending [ physician] provider;
(B) Designated  primary caregiver, including the designation of a primary caregiver made at a
time other than at the time of applying for or renewing a registry identification card; or
(C) Person responsible for a marijuana grow  site, including the designation of a person respon-
sible for a marijuana grow site made at a time other than at the time of applying for or renewing
a registry identification card.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (5)(c) of this section,  annually renew the registry
identification card by paying a fee in an amount established by the authority by rule and  submitting
to the authority an application that contains the following information:
(A) Updated written documentation  from the registry identification cardholder’s attending [ phy-
[6]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sician] provider stating that  the registry identification cardholder still has a debilitating medical
condition and that the  medical use of marijuana may mitigate the symptoms or effects of the registry
identification cardholder’s debilitating medical condition;
(B) The information described in subsection (2)(b) to (f) of this section; and
(C) If the registry identification cardholder is  under 18 years of age, a statement signed by the
custodial parent or legal guardian of the  registry identification cardholder that meets the require-
ments of subsection (3) of this section.
(7) The authority shall:
(a) On the date on which the  authority receives an application described in subsection (2) of this
section, issue a receipt to  the applicant verifying that the authority received an application under
subsection (6)(b) of this section; and
(b) Approve or deny an application received under subsection (6)(b) of  this section within 30
days after receiving the application.
(8)(a) If the registry identification cardholder’s  attending [ physician] provider determines that
the registry identification cardholder no longer has a debilitating medical condition, or  determines
that the medical use of marijuana is contraindicated for the registry  identification cardholder’s de-
bilitating medical condition,  the registry identification cardholder shall return the registry identifi-
cation card to the authority within 30 calendar days after receiving notice of the determination.
(b) If, because of circumstances beyond the control of the registry identification  cardholder, a
registry identification cardholder is unable to  obtain a second medical opinion about the registry
identification  cardholder’s  continuing eligibility for the medical use of marijuana before having to
return the registry identification card  to the authority, the authority may grant the registry iden-
tification cardholder additional time to obtain a second medical opinion.
(9)(a) The authority may deny an application for a registry identification  card or an application
to renew a registry identification card, or may suspend or revoke a registry identification card, if:
(A) The applicant or registry identification cardholder  does not provide the information required
by this section;
(B) The authority determines that the applicant or  registry identification cardholder provided
false information; or
(C) The authority determines that  the applicant or registry identification cardholder violated a
provision of ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949 or a rule adopted under ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949.
(b) If a registry identification card is revoked, any associated identification card issued under
subsection (5)(b) of this section, or marijuana grow site registration card issued  under ORS 475B.810
[(6)] (5), shall also be revoked.
(c) A person whose application is denied, or whose registry identification card is revoked,  under
this subsection may not reapply for a registry identification card for six  months from the date of the
denial or revocation unless otherwise authorized by the authority.
(10)(a) The authority may deny a designation of a primary caregiver made under  ORS 475B.804,
or suspend or revoke an associated identification card  issued under subsection (5)(b) of this section,
if the authority  determines that the designee or the registry identification cardholder violated a
provision of ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949 or a rule adopted under ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949.
(b) A person whose designation has been  denied, or whose identification card has been revoked,
under this subsection may not  be designated as a primary caregiver under ORS 475B.804 for six
months from the date of the denial or revocation unless otherwise authorized by the authority.
(11)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) or (6)(b) of this  section, if an applicant for a registry
[7]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
identification card, or a  registry identification cardholder applying for renewal of a registry iden-
tification card, submits  to the authority [ proof of having served in the Armed Forces of the United
States] applicable documentation listed in paragraph (c) of this subsection , the authority may
not impose  a fee that is greater than $20 for the issuance or renewal of the registry identification
card.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection  (6)(b)(A) of this section, the requirement that a registry identifi-
cation cardholder include in the application to renew a registry identification card updated written
documentation from the cardholder’s attending [ physician] provider regarding the  cardholder’s con-
tinuing debilitating medical condition does not apply to a service-disabled veteran who:
(A) Has been assigned a total and  permanent disability rating for compensation that rates the
veteran as unable to secure or follow a substantially gainful occupation as a result of service-
connected disabilities as described in 38 C.F.R. 4.16; or
(B) Has a United States Department of  Veterans Affairs total disability rating of 100 percent
as a result of an  injury or illness that the veteran incurred, or that was aggravated, during active
military service and who received a discharge or release under other than dishonorable conditions.
(c) The following are  acceptable documentation for the purposes of paragraph (a) of this
subsection:
(A) Proof of having served in the Armed Forces of the United States;
(B) Proof of receiving Supplemental Security Income; or
(C) Proof of receiving Social Security Disability Insurance benefits.
(12) For any purpose described in ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949, including  exemption from criminal
liability under ORS 475B.907, a receipt issued by  the authority verifying that an application has
been submitted  to the authority under subsection (2), (3) or (6)(b) of this section has the same legal
effect as a registry  identification card for 30 days following the date on which the receipt was issued
to the applicant.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 475B.801 is amended to read:
475B.801. A designated  primary caregiver may assist the designating registry identification
cardholder with any matter related to the medical use of marijuana, including:
(1) The production of marijuana at  the address provided by the registry identification cardholder
to the Oregon Health Authority pursuant to ORS 475B.797 [ (2)(f)] (2)(e); and
(2) The processing of  marijuana into cannabinoid concentrates or medical cannabinoid products.
SECTION 10.  ORS 475B.807 is amended to read:
475B.807. (1) Notwithstanding  ORS 475B.804, an organization that provides hospice, palliative
or home health care services, or a residential facility as defined in ORS 443.400, that has  significant
responsibility for managing the  well-being of a person who has been diagnosed with a debilitating
medical condition may be designated,  in addition to an individual designated pursuant to ORS
475B.804, as an additional caregiver for a registry identification cardholder in  the same manner that
an individual is designated as  the primary caregiver for a registry identification cardholder under
ORS 475B.804.
(2) An organization or residential facility  that is designated under this section has all the duties,
functions  and  powers of a designated primary caregiver as prescribed by ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949
or a rule adopted under ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949.
(3) An organization or residential facility designated under this section:
(a) Shall allow the registry identification cardholder described in subsection (1)  of this
section to  consume marijuana for medical use in the facility operated by or on behalf of the
[8]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
organization or residential facility.
(b) May not confiscate marijuana from a registry  identification cardholder described in
subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 475B.810 is amended to read:
475B.810. (1)(a) The  Oregon Health Authority shall establish by rule a marijuana grow site
registration system to track and regulate the production of  marijuana by a registry identification
cardholder or a person designated by the registry identification cardholder  to produce marijuana for
the registry identification cardholder.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, a person may not produce  marijuana
unless the person is registered under this section.
(c) Paragraph (b) of this  subsection does not apply to the production of marijuana as provided
in ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545 or as otherwise provided for by the statutory laws of this state.
(2) Rules adopted under  this section must require an applicant for a registry identification card,
or a registry identification cardholder who produces  marijuana or who designates another person
to produce marijuana, to submit an application to the  authority containing the following information
at the time of making an application under ORS 475B.797 (2), renewing  a registry identification card
under ORS 475B.797 (6)(b), or notifying the authority of a change under ORS 475B.797 (6)(a):
(a) The name of the person responsible for the marijuana grow site;
(b) Proof that the person is 21 years of age or older;
(c) If the registry identification cardholder or  the person responsible for the marijuana grow site
is not the owner of the premises  of the marijuana grow site, signed informed consent from the owner
of the premises to register the premises as a marijuana grow site;
(d) The address of the marijuana grow site; and
(e) Any other information that the authority  considers necessary to track the production of
marijuana under ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949.
[(3)(a) The authority shall conduct a criminal records check under ORS 181A.195 of  any person
whose name is submitted under this section as the person responsible for a marijuana grow site. ]
[(b) A person convicted of a Class A or Class B felony  under ORS 475.752 to 475.920 for the
manufacture or delivery of a controlled substance in Schedule I or Schedule II may  not act as or be
designated a person responsible for a marijuana grow site for two years from the date of conviction. ]
[(c) A person convicted more than once  of a Class A or Class B felony under ORS 475.752 to
475.920 for the manufacture or delivery of a controlled substance in Schedule I or Schedule II may not
act as or be designated a person responsible for a marijuana grow site. ]
[(4)] (3) Subject to subsection [ (11)] (10) of this section,  the authority shall issue a marijuana
grow site registration card if the requirements of  [ subsections (2) and (3) ] subsection (2)  of this
section are met.
[(5)] (4) A  person who holds a marijuana grow site registration card under this section must
display the card at the marijuana grow site at all times.
[(6)] (5) A marijuana grow site registration card  must be obtained and posted for each registry
identification cardholder for whom marijuana is being produced at a marijuana grow site.
[(7)(a)] (6)(a) Except as provided in section 2  of this 2021 Act, all seeds, immature marijuana
plants, mature marijuana plants and usable marijuana associated with the production of  marijuana
for a registry identification  cardholder by a person responsible for a marijuana grow site are the
property of the registry identification cardholder.
(b) Except as provided in section 2 of this 2021 Act,  all  seeds, immature marijuana plants,
[9]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mature marijuana plants and usable marijuana associated with the production of marijuana for  a
registry identification cardholder  by a person responsible for a marijuana grow site must be trans-
ferred to the registry identification cardholder upon the request of the registry identification
cardholder.
(c) Except as provided in  section 2 of this 2021 Act,  all usable marijuana associated with the
production of marijuana for a registry identification cardholder by a person responsible  for a
marijuana grow site must be transferred to a marijuana processing site upon the request  of the
registry identification cardholder. For purposes of this paragraph, a request to transfer usable
marijuana constitutes an assignment of the right to possess the usable marijuana.
(d) Except as provided in section 2 of this 2021  Act,  all seeds, immature marijuana plants and
usable marijuana associated with the production of marijuana for a registry identification cardholder
by a person responsible for a  marijuana grow site must be transferred to a medical marijuana
dispensary upon request of the registry identification cardholder. For purposes  of this paragraph, a
request to transfer seeds, immature marijuana  plants or usable marijuana constitutes an assignment
of the right to possess the seeds, immature marijuana plants or usable marijuana.
(e) Information related to transfers made  under this subsection must be submitted to the au-
thority in the manner required by ORS 475B.816.
[(8)] (7) A registry  identification cardholder, or the designated caregiver of a registry identifi-
cation cardholder, may reimburse  a person responsible for a marijuana grow site for all costs asso-
ciated with the production of marijuana for the registry identification cardholder.
[(9)] (8) The authority may inspect:
(a) The marijuana grow site of a person designated to produce marijuana by  a registry identifi-
cation cardholder to ensure compliance with this  section and ORS 475B.816 and 475B.831 and any
rule adopted under this section and ORS 475B.816 and 475B.831; and
(b) The records of the marijuana grow site of a person designated to produce marijuana  by a
registry identification cardholder to ensure compliance with this  section and ORS 475B.816 and any
rule adopted under this section and ORS 475B.816.
[(10)] (9) The authority may refuse to register a registry  identification cardholder or a designee
under this section or may suspend or revoke  the registration of a person responsible for a marijuana
grow site if the authority determines that the applicant  or the person responsible for a marijuana
grow site violated a provision of  ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949, a rule adopted under ORS 475B.785 to
475B.949 or an ordinance adopted pursuant to ORS 475B.928.
[(11)] (10) The authority may require a person responsible for a marijuana grow site, prior to
issuing a marijuana grow  site registration card under subsection [ (4)] (3) of this section, to pay a
fee reasonably calculated to pay costs incurred under this section and ORS 475B.816 and 475B.879.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 475B.816 is amended to read:
475B.816. (1) A person designated  to produce marijuana by a registry identification cardholder
must submit to the Oregon Health Authority, in a form and manner established by  the authority by
rule, the following information related to the production of marijuana:
(a) The  number of mature marijuana plants and immature marijuana plants, the amount of
marijuana leaves and flowers being dried, and  the amount of usable marijuana, in the person’s pos-
session;
(b) The number  of mature marijuana plants and immature marijuana plants, and the amount of
usable marijuana, that the person transfers  to each registry identification cardholder for whom the
person produces marijuana;
[10]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) The amount of usable  marijuana that the person transfers to each marijuana processing site;
and
(d) The number of immature marijuana plants, and  the amount of usable marijuana, that the
person transfers to each medical marijuana dispensary.
(2) The authority shall by rule require a person designated to produce  marijuana by a registry
identification cardholder to submit the information described in  subsection (1) of this section once
each month. The authority may not employ any method other than that described in this section to
obtain information related to the  production of marijuana from a person designated to produce
marijuana by a registry identification cardholder.
(3) In  addition to submitting the information as required by subsection (1) of this section, a
person designated to produce  marijuana by a registry identification cardholder must keep a record
of the information described in subsection (1) of this section for two  years after the date on which
the person submits the information to the authority.
(4) A person designated to produce  marijuana by a registry identification cardholder is
not subject to this section if the person designated to produce marijuana possesses  12 or
fewer mature marijuana plants.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 475B.822 is amended to read:
475B.822. Notwithstanding ORS 475B.810 [ (7)] (6), a person responsible for a marijuana grow site
may enter into an agreement with  a registry identification cardholder under which the registry
identification cardholder assigns, to  the person responsible for the marijuana grow site, a portion
of the right to possess the seeds, immature marijuana plants and usable marijuana that  are the
property of the registry identification cardholder.
SECTION 14.  ORS 475B.831 is amended to read:
475B.831. (1)(a) A registry identification cardholder and  the designated primary caregiver of the
registry identification cardholder may jointly possess:
(A) Six or fewer mature marijuana plants; and
(B) Twelve or fewer immature marijuana plants.
(b)(A) Unless an address is the marijuana grow site of  a person designated to produce marijuana
by a registry  identification cardholder, the address where a registry identification cardholder or the
primary caregiver of a  registry identification cardholder produces marijuana may be used to produce
not more than:
(i) Six or fewer mature marijuana plants per registry identification cardholder, up to 12 mature
marijuana plants; and
(ii) Twelve or fewer immature marijuana plants per registry identification cardholder, up  to 24
immature marijuana plants.
(B) Except as provided in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph, an address that is  subject to this
paragraph may not be used to produce plants in the genus  Cannabis within the plant family
Cannabaceae pursuant to ORS 475B.301.
(C) Subject to subparagraph (D) of this paragraph, an  address that is subject to this paragraph
may be  used to produce plants in the genus Cannabis within the plant family Cannabaceae pursuant
to ORS 475B.301 if a person other than a registry identification cardholder who is using the  address
to produce marijuana plants pursuant to ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949 resides at the address.
(D) An address that is subject to this  paragraph may not be used to produce more than 12 total
mature marijuana plants.
(2)(a) A person may be designated to produce marijuana under ORS 475B.810 by no  more than
[11]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
eight registry identification cardholders.
(b) A person responsible for a marijuana grow site may  produce for a registry identification
cardholder who designates the person to produce marijuana no more than:
(A) Six mature marijuana plants;
(B) 12 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height; and
(C) The amount, established by the Oregon Health Authority by rule,  of immature marijuana
plants that are less than 24 inches in height.
(3) If the address of a person responsible for a marijuana grow site registered  under ORS
475B.810 is located within city limits in an area zoned for residential use:
(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  no more than the following amounts
of marijuana plants may be produced at the address:
(A) 12 mature marijuana plants;
(B) 24 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height; and
(C) The amount, established by the authority by rule, of  immature marijuana plants that are less
than 24 inches in height; or
(b) Subject  to subsection (5) of this section, if each person responsible for a marijuana grow site
located at the address first registered with the authority under ORS 475B.810  before January 1,
2015, no more than the following amounts of marijuana plants may be produced at the address:
(A) The amount of mature marijuana plants located at that address  on December 31, 2014, in
excess of 12 mature marijuana plants, not to exceed 24 mature marijuana plants;
(B) 48 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height; and
(C) The amount, established by the authority by rule, of  immature marijuana plants that are less
than 24 inches in height.
(4) If the address of a person responsible for a marijuana grow site registered  under ORS
475B.810 is located in an area other than an area described in subsection (3) of this section:
(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  no more than the following amounts
of marijuana plants may be produced at the address:
(A) 48 mature marijuana plants;
(B) 96 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height; and
(C) The amount, established by the authority by rule, of  immature marijuana plants that are less
than 24 inches in height; or
(b) Subject to subsections (5) and (6) of  this section, if each person responsible for a marijuana
grow site located at the address first registered with the authority under ORS 475B.810  before
January 1, 2015, no more than the following amounts of marijuana  plants may be produced at the
address:
(A) The amount of mature marijuana plants located at that address  on December 31, 2014, in
excess of 48 mature marijuana plants, not to exceed 96 mature marijuana plants;
(B) 192 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height; and
(C) The amount, established by the authority by rule, of  immature marijuana plants that are less
than 24 inches in height.
(5)(a) If  the authority suspends or revokes the registration of a person responsible for a
marijuana grow site that is located at an address  described in subsection (3)(b) of this section, no
more than the following amounts of marijuana plants may subsequently be produced at any  address
described in subsection (3) of this section at which  the person responsible for the marijuana grow
site produces marijuana:
[12]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) 12 mature marijuana plants;
(B) 24 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height; and
(C) The amount, established by the authority by rule, of  immature marijuana plants that are less
than 24 inches in height.
(b) If the authority suspends or  revokes the registration of a person responsible for a marijuana
grow site that is  located at an address described in subsection (4)(b) of this section, no more than
the following  amounts of marijuana plants may subsequently be produced at any address described
in subsection (4) of  this section at which the person responsible for the marijuana grow site
produces marijuana:
(A) 48 mature marijuana plants;
(B) 96 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height; and
(C) The amount, established by the authority by rule, of  immature marijuana plants that are less
than 24 inches in height.
(6) If a registry identification cardholder who designated a person to produce  marijuana for the
registry identification cardholder pursuant to ORS 475B.810 terminates the designation, the person
responsible  for  the marijuana grow site whose designation has been terminated may not be desig-
nated to produce marijuana by another registry  identification cardholder, except that the person
may be designated by another registry identification cardholder if no more than 48 mature
marijuana plants and no more than 96 immature marijuana plants that are 24 or more  inches in
height are produced at the address for the marijuana grow site at which the  person produces
marijuana.
(7) Subject to the limits described in subsections  (2) to (6) of this section, if multiple persons
responsible for a marijuana grow site under ORS 475B.810 are located at the same address,  the
persons designated to produce marijuana by  registry identification cardholders who are located at
that address may collectively produce marijuana plants for any number of  registry identification
cardholders who designate the persons to produce marijuana.
(8) If a law enforcement officer determines that there is a number of marijuana plants at an
address in excess of the quantities specified in this section, or that an  address is being used to
produce a number of marijuana plants  in excess of the quantities specified in subsection (1)(b) of this
section, the law enforcement officer may confiscate only the excess number of marijuana plants.
(9) This section does not apply to a marijuana grow site that:
(a) Is located at an address within city  limits, or within an urban growth boundary,
where a marijuana grow site may be restricted in size;
(b) Does not exceed 250 square feet in total area;
(c) Cannot be seen by normal unaided vision from a public place at ground level; and
(d) Is not used to produce marijuana for more  than two registry identification
cardholders.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 475B.837 is amended to read:
475B.837. A person to whom a registry identification card has  been issued under ORS 475B.797
(5)(a) or (c) , an identification card has been issued under ORS 475B.797 (5)(b), or a marijuana  grow
site registration card  has been issued under ORS 475B.810, may not possess marijuana, usable
marijuana, medical cannabinoid products,  cannabinoid concentrates or cannabinoid extracts in a
location other than the address on file with the Oregon Health  Authority unless the person is car-
rying the card.
SECTION 16.  ORS 475B.840 is amended to read:
[13]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
475B.840. (1)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish by rule a marijuana processing  site
registration system to track and regulate the processing of marijuana by a person responsible for
a marijuana processing site.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c)  of this subsection, a person may not process marijuana
unless the person is registered under this section.
(c) Paragraph (b) of this subsection does not apply  to the processing of marijuana as provided
in ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545 or as otherwise provided for by the statutory laws of this state.
(2) The registration system established under subsection (1) of this section must  require an ap-
plicant for a marijuana processing site to submit an application to the authority that includes:
(a) The name of the individual who owns the marijuana processing site or, if a business entity
owns the marijuana processing site, the name of each individual who has a financial  interest in the
marijuana processing site;
(b) The name of the individual or individuals  responsible for the marijuana processing site, if
different from the name of the individual who owns the marijuana processing site;
(c) The address of the marijuana processing site;
(d) Proof that  each individual responsible for the marijuana processing site is 21 years of age
or older;
(e) Documentation, as required by the authority by  rule, that demonstrates the marijuana pro-
cessing site meets the requirements of subsection (3) of this section; and
(f) Any other information that the authority considers necessary.
(3) To qualify for registration under this section, a marijuana processing site:
(a) May not be located  in an area that is zoned for residential use if the marijuana processing
site processes cannabinoid extracts;
(b) Must be registered as a business, or have  filed an application to register as a business, with
the office of the Secretary of State; and
(c) Must meet the requirements of any rule adopted by the authority under subsection  [(10)] (9)
of this section.
[(4)(a) The authority shall conduct a  criminal records check under ORS 181A.195 for each indi-
vidual named in an application under subsection (2) of this section. ]
[(b) An individual convicted for the manufacture or delivery of a controlled substance in  Schedule
I or Schedule II may  not own or be responsible for a marijuana processing site for two years from the
date the individual is convicted. ]
[(c) An individual convicted more than once for the manufacture or delivery of a controlled sub-
stance in Schedule I or Schedule II may not own or be responsible for a marijuana processing site. ]
[(5)] (4) If a  person submits the application required under subsection (2) of this section, if the
marijuana processing site identified in the application meets the  requirements of this section and
any rules adopted under this section [ and if each  individual named in the application passes the
criminal records check  required under subsection (4) of this section ], the authority shall register the
marijuana processing site and issue proof of registration. Proof  of registration must be displayed on
the premises of the marijuana processing site at all times.
[(6)] (5) A marijuana processing site that is registered under this section is  not required to
register with the State Board of Pharmacy under ORS 475.125.
[(7)] (6) The individual or individuals responsible for a marijuana processing site shall  maintain
documentation  of  each transfer of usable marijuana, medical cannabinoid products, cannabinoid
concentrates and cannabinoid extracts.
[14]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(8)] (7) The authority may inspect:
(a) The premises of a proposed marijuana processing site or a  registered marijuana processing
site to  ensure compliance with this section and ORS 475B.846 and 475B.849 and any rules adopted
under this section and ORS 475B.846 and 475B.849; and
(b) The records of a registered marijuana  processing site to ensure compliance with subsection
[(7)] (6) of this section.
[(9)] (8) Subject to the provisions of ORS chapter  183, the authority may refuse to register an
applicant under this section or may suspend or revoke the registration of  a marijuana processing
site if the authority determines that the applicant, the owner of the marijuana processing  site, a
person responsible for the marijuana processing  site, or an employee of the marijuana processing
site, violated a provision of ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949, a rule adopted under ORS  475B.785 to
475B.949 or an ordinance adopted pursuant to ORS 475B.928.
[(10)] (9) The authority shall adopt rules to implement this section, including rules that:
(a) Require a  registered marijuana processing site to annually renew the registration for that
site;
(b) Establish fees for registering, and renewing the registration of, a marijuana processing site;
(c) Require that medical cannabinoid products, cannabinoid  concentrates and cannabinoid ex-
tracts transferred by a marijuana processing  site be tested to ensure the public health and safety;
and
(d) Impose any other standard on the operation of a marijuana processing site to  ensure the
public health and safety.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 475B.858 is amended to read:
475B.858. (1)(a) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish by rule  a medical marijuana
dispensary registration system for the purpose of tracking and regulating the transfer of:
(A) Usable marijuana, immature marijuana plants and seeds from registry identification
cardholders, designated primary caregivers and persons responsible  for marijuana grow sites to
medical marijuana dispensaries;
(B) Medical cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates and cannabinoid  extracts from
persons responsible for marijuana processing sites to medical marijuana dispensaries; and
(C) Usable marijuana, immature marijuana plants, seeds, medical cannabinoid  products,
cannabinoid concentrates and cannabinoid extracts from medical marijuana dispensaries to  registry
identification cardholders and designated primary caregivers.
(b) A person may not operate an  establishment for the purpose of providing the services de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection unless the person is registered under this section.
(2) The registration system  established under subsection (1) of this section must require an ap-
plicant for a medical marijuana dispensary to submit an application to the authority that includes:
(a) The name of the individual who owns the medical  marijuana dispensary or, if a business
entity owns the medical marijuana dispensary, the name of each individual who has a financial in-
terest in the medical marijuana dispensary;
(b) The name of the individual or individuals responsible  for the medical marijuana dispensary,
if different from the name of the individual who owns the medical marijuana dispensary;
(c) The address of the medical marijuana dispensary;
(d) Proof that each individual responsible for the medical marijuana dispensary is  21 years of
age or older;
(e) Documentation, as required by  the authority by rule, that demonstrates the medical
[15]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
marijuana dispensary meets the requirements of subsection (3) of this section; and
(f) Any other information that the authority considers necessary.
(3) To qualify for registration under this section, a medical marijuana dispensary:
(a) May not be located in an area that is zoned for residential use;
(b) May not be located at the same address as a marijuana grow site;
(c) Must be registered as a business, or have filed  an application to register as a business, with
the office of the Secretary of State;
(d) Except as provided under ORS 475B.864, may not be located within 1,000 feet of:
(A) A public elementary or secondary school for which attendance  is compulsory under ORS
339.020; or
(B) A private or parochial elementary or secondary school, teaching children as described  in
ORS 339.030 (1)(a);
(e) Must not be located within 1,000 feet of another medical marijuana dispensary; and
(f) Must meet the requirements of any rule adopted by the authority  under subsection [ (10)] (9)
of this section.
[(4)(a) The authority shall conduct a  criminal records check under ORS 181A.195 for each indi-
vidual named in an application submitted under subsection (2) of this section. ]
[(b) An individual convicted for the manufacture or delivery of a controlled substance in  Schedule
I or Schedule II may not own or be responsible for a medical  marijuana dispensary for two years from
the date the individual is convicted. ]
[(c) An individual convicted more than once for the manufacture or delivery of a controlled sub-
stance in Schedule I or Schedule II may not own or be responsible for a medical marijuana
dispensary.]
[(5)] (4) If a person submits the application required under subsection (2) of this  section, if the
medical marijuana dispensary identified in the application meets the requirements of this section and
any rules adopted under this section [ and if each  individual named in the application passes the
criminal records check  required under subsection (4) of this section ], the authority shall register the
medical marijuana dispensary and issue proof of registration. Proof  of registration must be displayed
on the premises of the medical marijuana dispensary at all times.
[(6)] (5) A medical marijuana dispensary that is registered under this section is  not required to
register with the State Board of Pharmacy under ORS 475.125.
[(7)] (6) The individual or individuals responsible for  a medical marijuana dispensary shall
maintain documentation  of each transfer of usable marijuana, medical cannabinoid products,
cannabinoid concentrates, cannabinoid extracts, immature marijuana plants and seeds.
[(8)] (7) The authority may inspect:
(a) The premises of a proposed medical marijuana dispensary or a registered  medical marijuana
dispensary to ensure compliance with this section and ORS  475B.867 and any rules adopted under
this section or ORS 475B.867; and
(b) The records of a registered medical marijuana dispensary to ensure  compliance with sub-
section [ (7)] (6) of this section.
[(9)] (8) Subject to the provisions of ORS chapter  183, the authority may refuse to register an
applicant under this section or may suspend or revoke the registration of  a medical marijuana
dispensary if the authority determines that the applicant, the  owner of the medical marijuana
dispensary, a person responsible for the medical marijuana dispensary, or an employee of the  med-
ical marijuana dispensary, violated a provision  of ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949, a rule adopted under
[16]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949 or an ordinance adopted pursuant to ORS 475B.928.
[(10)] (9) The authority shall adopt rules to implement this section, including rules that:
(a) Require a registered medical marijuana dispensary to annually  renew the registration for
that dispensary;
(b) Establish fees for registering, and renewing the registration of, a medical  marijuana
dispensary;
(c) Require that each medical marijuana  dispensary install and maintain a minimum security
system that includes video surveillance, an alarm system and a safe;
(d) Require that usable marijuana, medical cannabinoid  products, cannabinoid concentrates,
cannabinoid extracts and immature marijuana plants transferred by a  medical marijuana dispensary
be tested to ensure the public health and safety; and
(e) Impose any other  standard on the operation of a medical marijuana dispensary to ensure the
public health and safety.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 475B.885 is amended to read:
475B.885. (1) Any personally identifiable information, as defined in ORS  432.005, other than a
name of an individual or  an address submitted with an application under ORS 475B.840 or 475B.858,
that the Oregon Health Authority collects and maintains for purposes of registering a  marijuana
grow  site  under ORS 475B.810, a marijuana processing site under ORS 475B.840, or a medical
marijuana dispensary under ORS 475B.858, is confidential and not subject to public disclosure under
ORS 192.311 to 192.478, except  that the authority may provide personally identifiable information to
a person registered under ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949 if the registrant requests the information and
the information is related to a designation made under ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949.
(2) Any personally identifiable  information, as defined in ORS 432.005, submitted to the authority
under ORS 475B.816, 475B.846 or 475B.867 or  pursuant to ORS 475B.879 is confidential and not
subject to public disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(3) Any record that the authority keeps or maintains for purposes related to the  installation or
maintenance of a security system by a medical marijuana  dispensary pursuant to rules adopted un-
der ORS 475B.858 [ (10)] (9) is  confidential and not subject to public disclosure under ORS 192.311
to 192.478.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 475B.898 is amended to read:
475B.898. (1) A person responsible for a  marijuana processing site, or a person responsible for
a medical marijuana dispensary, may designate that responsibility to another person.
(2) If a designation is made under  this section, the designee must submit to the Oregon Health
Authority proof that the designee meets the requirements and restrictions set forth in:
(a) For marijuana processing sites, ORS 475B.840 (2)(d) [ and (4)]; or
(b) For medical marijuana dispensaries, ORS 475B.858 (2)(d) [ and (4)].
(3) The authority may prescribe the form and  manner of submitting proof under subsection (2)
of this section.
SECTION 20.  ORS 475B.901 is amended to read:
475B.901. (1) A person responsible for a marijuana processing  site, or a person responsible for
a medical marijuana dispensary, may assign that responsibility to another person.
(2) If an assignment is made under this section, the assignee must submit to the Oregon  Health
Authority proof that the assignee meets the requirements and restrictions set forth in:
(a) For marijuana processing sites, ORS 475B.840 (2)(d) [ and (4)]; or
(b) For medical marijuana dispensaries, ORS 475B.858 (2)(d) [ and (4)].
[17]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) The authority may prescribe the form and  manner of submitting proof under subsection (2)
of this section.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 475B.904 is amended to read:
475B.904. (1)  In the event that a marijuana processing site or a medical marijuana dispensary
is foreclosed or otherwise ceases operations as described in ORS chapter 79, a secured  party, as
defined in ORS 79.0102, may continue  operations at the marijuana processing site or medical
marijuana dispensary upon submitting to the Oregon Health Authority proof that the secured  party
or, if the secured party is a business entity, any  individual who has a financial interest in the se-
cured party, meets the requirements and restrictions set forth in:
(a) For marijuana processing sites, ORS 475B.840 (2)(d) [ and (4)]; or
(b) For medical marijuana dispensaries, ORS 475B.858 (2)(d) [ and (4)].
(2) The authority may prescribe the form and  manner of submitting proof under subsection (1)
of this section.
SECTION 22.  ORS 475B.913 is amended to read:
475B.913. (1) Except as provided in  ORS 475B.910, a person has an affirmative defense to a
criminal charge of possession, delivery or manufacture of marijuana, or any  other criminal offense
in which possession, delivery or  manufacture of marijuana is an element, if the person charged with
the offense:
(a) Was diagnosed with a debilitating medical condition  within 12 months of the date on which
the person  was arrested and was advised by the person’s attending [ physician] provider that the
medical use of marijuana may mitigate the symptoms or effects of that debilitating medical  condi-
tion;
(b) Is engaged in the medical use of marijuana; and
(c) Possesses, delivers or manufactures marijuana only in quantities permitted under ORS
475B.831.
(2) A person does not need to lawfully possess  a registry identification card to assert the affir-
mative defense established in this section.
(3) A person engaged in the medical use of marijuana who claims that marijuana provides  med-
ically necessary benefits and who is charged with a crime pertaining to the use  of marijuana is not
precluded from presenting a  defense of choice of evils, as set forth in ORS 161.200, or from pre-
senting evidence supporting the necessity of marijuana for  treatment of a specific disease or medical
condition, provided that:
(a) The person possesses, delivers or  manufactures marijuana only as permitted under ORS
475B.831 (1); and
(b) The person has taken  a substantial step toward complying with the provisions of ORS
475B.785 to 475B.949.
(4) A defendant proposing to use the affirmative defense established in this section in a  criminal
action shall, not less than five days before the trial of the cause, file and serve upon  the district
attorney a written notice of the intention to  assert the affirmative defense. The notice must specif-
ically state the reasons why the defendant is entitled  to assert the affirmative defense and the fac-
tual basis for the affirmative defense. If the defendant fails to file and serve the notice, the defendant
is not permitted to assert the affirmative defense at the trial of the cause unless the court orders,
for good cause, otherwise.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 475B.916 is amended to read:
475B.916. The Oregon Board of Dentistry, Oregon Board of Naturopathic Medicine, Oregon
[18]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Board of Optometry,  Oregon Medical Board and Oregon State Board of Nursing  may not impose
a civil penalty or take other disciplinary action against an attending [ physician] provider for:
(1) Advising a person diagnosed as having a  debilitating medical condition by the attending
[physician] provider or another physician licensed under  ORS chapter 677 , physician assistant li-
censed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525, nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390,
naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685, dentist licensed under ORS chapter
679 or optometrist licensed under  ORS 683.010 to 683.340 about the risks and benefits associated
with the medical use of marijuana or that the medical use of marijuana may  mitigate the symptoms
or effects of the person’s debilitating medical condition, provided that the  advice is based on the
attending [ physician’s] provider’s personal  assessment of the person’s medical history and current
medical condition; or
(2) Providing the written documentation necessary  for issuance or renewal of a registry iden-
tification card under ORS 475B.797, provided that the  written documentation is based on the at-
tending [ physician’s] provider’s personal assessment  of the person’s medical history and current
medical condition and the attending [ physician] provider has discussed with the person the potential
risks and benefits associated with the medical use of marijuana.
SECTION 24.
(1) The Oregon Health  Authority and the Oregon Liquor Control Commis-
sion shall, in collaboration, study and determine:
(a) A method for the commission to provide to the authority information related to  the
transfer of marijuana items from marijuana retailers, as defined in ORS  475B.015 and li-
censed under ORS 475B.105, to  registry identification cardholders, as defined in ORS
475B.791; and
(b) How to efficiently anonymize the information described in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section and make the anonymized information available for observational research studies.
(2) Not later than December 31, 2022,  the authority and the commission shall submit, in
the manner provided in ORS 192.245, a report of the determinations described in  subsection
(1) of this section to  an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related to public
health. The authority and the commission may include in the  report recommendations for
legislation.
SECTION 25. Section 24 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 26. ORS 475B.794, 475B.843 and 475B.861 are repealed.
SECTION 27. (1) Sections 2 to 5 of  this 2021 Act, the amendments to ORS 475B.788,
475B.791, 475B.797, 475B.801, 475B.807, 475B.810,  475B.816, 475B.822, 475B.831, 475B.837,
475B.840, 475B.858, 475B.885, 475B.898, 475B.901, 475B.904, 475B.913 and 475B.916 by sections  6
to 23 of this 2021  Act and the repeal of ORS 475B.794, 475B.843 and 475B.861 by section 26 of
this 2021 Act become operative on January 1, 2022.
(2) The Oregon Board of Dentistry, Oregon  Board of Naturopathic Medicine, Oregon
Board of Optometry, Oregon  Health Authority, Oregon Liquor Control Commission, Oregon
Medical Board and Oregon State Board of Nursing may take any action before the  operative
date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is  necessary to enable the authority, the
commission and the boards to exercise, on and after the operative  date specified in sub-
section (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the authority,
the commission and the boards by  sections 2 to 5 of this 2021 Act, the amendments to ORS
475B.788, 475B.791, 475B.797, 475B.801, 475B.807,  475B.810, 475B.816, 475B.822, 475B.831,
475B.837, 475B.840, 475B.858, 475B.885, 475B.898, 475B.901, 475B.904, 475B.913 and 475B.916 by
[19]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sections 6 to 23 of this 2021 Act and the repeal of ORS 475B.794,  475B.843 and 475B.861 by
section 26 of this 2021 Act.
TESTING RESULTS
SECTION 28.
Section 29 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 475B.550 to
475B.590.
SECTION 29. (1) A marijuana retailer licensed under ORS 475B.105 and a medical
marijuana dispensary, as defined in ORS 475B.791, shall publish on a website  operated by or
on behalf of the marijuana retailer or medical marijuana dispensary the results of testing
required under  ORS 475B.555 for each marijuana item sold by the marijuana retailer or
medical marijuana dispensary if the testing included a complete terpene profile.
(2)(a) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall adopt rules to  carry out this section
with regard to marijuana retailers.
(b) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules to carry out this section  with regard
to medical marijuana dispensaries.
SECTION 30.
(1) Section 29 of this 2021 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2022.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority and the Oregon Liquor Control Commission may take
any action before the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section that is neces-
sary to enable the authority  and the commission to exercise, on and after the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred
on the authority and the commission by section 29 of this 2021 Act.
OREGON LIQUOR CONTROL COMMISSION LICENSEES
SECTION 31. Sections 32 and 34 of this 2021 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
475B.010 to 475B.545.
SECTION 32. (1) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall collaborate  with the
Oregon Health Authority and the Oregon Cannabis Commission  to establish a registry iden-
tification cardholder care and accommodation program to ensure that  registry identification
cardholders have  long-term access to marijuana for medical use from marijuana retailers
licensed under ORS 475B.105. The program established under this section must include, but
is not limited to, the following:
(a) Minimum standards for availability and quality of marijuana items;
(b) Expanded registry identification cardholder services;
(c) Compensation for licensees;
(d) Access for registry  identification cardholders to marijuana items at no cost and to
package doses of marijuana items; and
(e) For individuals who hold permits issued under ORS 475B.266, training related  to ac-
cess to and use of marijuana for medical use.
(2) An applicant for a license or renewal  of a license issued under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090,
475B.100 and 475B.105 shall submit with the application a care and accommodation  plan that
meets the program requirements established by rule by the Oregon Liquor Control Commis-
sion.
SECTION 33.
Section 32 of this 2021  Act applies to applications for licenses or renewal
[20]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of licenses under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105  submitted on or after the op-
erative date specified in section 36 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 34.
(1) A marijuana retailer licensed under ORS 475B.105  may transfer
marijuana items to an individual who provides to the marijuana  retailer proof that the indi-
vidual is the holder of a medical marijuana patient card issued by another state.
(2) A marijuana retailer licensed under ORS 475B.105 shall  post in an area visible to the
public a notice that an individual described in subsection (1) of this section is not exempt
from ORS 475B.227 or 475B.381.
(3) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall adopt  by reference rules adopted by the
Oregon Health Authority under section 4 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 35.
 ORS 475B.139 is amended to read:
475B.139. (1) To process marijuana for medical purposes,  a marijuana processor that holds a li-
cense issued under ORS 475B.090  must register with the Oregon Liquor Control Commission under
this section.
(2) The commission shall register a marijuana processor for the purpose  of processing marijuana
for medical purposes if the marijuana processor:
(a) Holds a license issued under ORS 475B.090;
(b) Meets any qualifications adopted by the commission by rule;
(c) Applies to the commission in a form and manner prescribed by the commission; and
(d) Pays any fee adopted by the commission by rule.
(3) A marijuana processor registered under this section may:
(a) Process marijuana and usable marijuana into medical grade cannabinoid  products,
cannabinoid concentrates and cannabinoid extracts; and
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 475B.206[ ,]:
(A) Receive marijuana and usable marijuana from, and  for a fee process that marijuana and
usable marijuana into  cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates and cannabinoid extracts for,
a registry identification cardholder or the designated primary caregiver of a registry  identification
cardholder,  provided  that the cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates and cannabinoid ex-
tracts meet the requirements of ORS 475B.550 to 475B.590 and the  concentration standards adopted
under ORS 475B.625[ .]; and
(B) Receive marijuana and usable marijuana from a  marijuana grow site registered under
ORS 475B.810 to process into medical grade cannabinoid  products, cannabinoid concentrates
and cannabinoid extracts.
(4)(a) The commission shall adopt rules necessary to administer this section.
(b) The rules  must provide that any fee adopted by the commission under subsection (2)(d) of this
section  be  in an amount reasonably calculated to not exceed, together with other fees collected
under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545, the cost of administering ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545.
SECTION 36.
(1) Sections 32 and 34 of this 2021 Act  and the amendments to ORS 475B.139
by section 35 of this 2021 Act become operative on January 1, 2022.
(2) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission, the Oregon Health  Authority and the Oregon
Cannabis Commission may take any action before the operative date specified in  subsection
(1) of this  section that is necessary to enable the commissions and the authority to exercise,
on and after  the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties,
functions and powers conferred on the  commissions and the authority by sections 32 and 34
of this 2021 Act and the amendments to ORS 475B.139 by section 35 of this 2021 Act.
[21]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
OREGON CANNABIS COMMISSION
SECTION 37.
 ORS 475B.952 is amended to read:
475B.952. (1) The Oregon  Cannabis Commission is established within the Oregon Health Au-
thority. The commission consists of:
(a) The Public Health Officer or the Public Health Officer’s designee; and
(b) Eight members appointed by the Governor as follows:
(A) A registry identification cardholder, as defined in ORS 475B.791;
(B) A  person designated to produce marijuana by a registry identification cardholder, as defined
in ORS 475B.791;
(C) An attending [ physician] provider, as defined in ORS 475B.791;
(D) A person representing the Oregon Health Authority;
(E) A person representing the Oregon Liquor Control Commission;
(F) A local health officer, as described in ORS 431.418;
(G) A law enforcement officer; and
(H) A person knowledgeable about research proposal grant protocols.
(2) The term of office of each member of  the commission is four years, but a member serves at
the pleasure of the Governor. Before the expiration of the  term of a member, the Governor shall
appoint a successor whose term begins on January 1 of  the following year. A member is eligible for
reappointment. If there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make  an appointment to be-
come immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(3) The appointment of each member of the  commission is subject to confirmation by the Senate
in the manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
(4) Members of the commission are not entitled to compensation,  but may be reimbursed for
actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred by them  in the performance of their official
duties in the manner and amounts provided for in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 38.
 ORS 475B.961 is amended to read:
475B.961. (1) In addition to any other duty  prescribed by law, the Oregon Cannabis Commission
shall:
[(1)] (a) [ Provide advice to ] Collaborate with the Oregon  Health Authority [ with respect to ] in
the administration of ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949;
[(2)] (b) [ Provide advice to ] Collaborate with the Oregon  Liquor Control Commission [ with re-
spect to ] in the  administration of ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545, insofar as those statutes pertain to
registry identification cardholders and designated primary caregivers, as those terms are defined in
ORS 475B.791;
[(3)] (c) Develop a long-term strategic  plan for ensuring that cannabis will remain a therapeutic
option for persons with debilitating medical conditions as defined in ORS 475B.791;
[(4)] (d) Develop a long-term strategic plan for ensuring that cannabis will remain affordable for
persons with debilitating medical conditions as defined in ORS 475B.791; and
[(5)] (e) Monitor and study federal laws, regulations and policies regarding marijuana.
(2) On or before  September 2 of each odd-numbered year, the Oregon Cannabis Commis-
sion shall submit a report about  the long-term strategic plans described in subsection (1)(c)
and (d) of this section, in the manner prescribed in ORS 192.245, to  the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to health and the  judiciary. The Oregon Cannabis Com-
mission may include with the submission described in  this subsection any recommendations
[22]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
for legislation.
SECTION 39.
(1) The amendments to ORS 475B.952 and 475B.961 by sections 37 and 38  of
this 2021 Act become operative on January 1, 2022.
(2) The Oregon Cannabis Commission may take any action before  the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the  commission to ex-
ercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the
duties, functions and powers  conferred on the commission by the amendments to ORS
475B.952 and 475B.961 by sections 37 and 38 of this 2021 Act.
OTHER AMENDMENTS
SECTION 40.
 ORS 475B.020 is amended to read:
475B.020. ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545 may not be construed:
(1) To amend or affect state or federal law pertaining to employment matters;
(2) To amend or affect state or federal law pertaining to landlord-tenant matters;
(3) To prohibit a recipient of a federal grant or an applicant for a federal  grant from prohibiting
the manufacture, delivery, possession or  use of marijuana to the extent necessary to satisfy federal
requirements for the grant;
(4) To prohibit a party  to a federal contract or a person applying to be a party to a federal
contract from prohibiting the manufacture, delivery, possession or use  of marijuana to the extent
necessary to comply with the terms and conditions of the contract or  to satisfy federal requirements
for the contract;
(5) To require a person to violate a federal law;
(6) To exempt a person from a federal law or obstruct the enforcement of a federal law; or
(7) To amend or affect the Oregon Medical [ Marijuana] and Therapeutic Cannabis Act.
SECTION 41.
 ORS 475B.220 is amended to read:
475B.220. (1) As used in this section, “information that may be used  to identify a consumer”
means information that may be acquired through the production of  a piece of identification as de-
scribed in ORS 475B.216, whether the information is contained  in a piece of identification described
in ORS 475B.216 or in a different document or record.
(2) A consumer may not be required to  procure for the purpose of acquiring or purchasing a
marijuana item a piece of identification other than:
(a) A piece of identification described in ORS 475B.216; and
(b)(A) If the consumer is a registry identification cardholder, as defined in ORS 475B.791, a
registry identification card, as defined in ORS 475B.791[ .]; or
(B) If the person is the  holder of a medical marijuana patient card issued by another
state, the person’s medical marijuana patient card.
(3) A marijuana retailer may not record and retain any information that may be used to  identify
a consumer, except as necessary to make deliveries  to consumers pursuant to ORS 475B.206 (3), as
required by any rules adopted under ORS 475B.206 (3).
(4) A marijuana retailer may not transfer any  information that may be used to identify a con-
sumer to any other person.
(5)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section,  a marijuana retailer may record and retain
the name and contact information of  a consumer for the purpose of notifying the consumer of ser-
vices that the marijuana retailer provides or  of discounts, coupons and other marketing information
[23]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
if:
(A) The marijuana retailer asks the consumer whether the marijuana retailer may record and
retain the information; and
(B) The consumer consents to the recording and retention of the information.
(b) This subsection does not  authorize a marijuana retailer to transfer information that may be
used to identify a consumer.
(6) This section does not apply to deidentified information the documentation and  transfer of
which is required by the Department of Revenue for purposes of ORS 475B.707.
SECTION 42.
 ORS 475B.531 is amended to read:
475B.531. Except for ORS 475B.526 and 475B.529, ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545:
(1) Do not apply to the extent a person acts within the scope of  and in compliance with the
Oregon Medical [ Marijuana] and Therapeutic Cannabis Act; and
(2) Do not amend  or affect duties, functions and powers of the Oregon Health Authority under
the Oregon Medical [ Marijuana] and Therapeutic Cannabis Act.
SECTION 43.
 ORS 475B.570 is amended to read:
475B.570. ORS 475B.550 to 475B.590 do not apply to:
(1) A person responsible for a marijuana grow  site under ORS 475B.810 if the person is trans-
ferring usable marijuana or an immature marijuana plant, as defined in ORS 475B.015, to:
(a) A person who holds a registry identification card  under ORS 475B.797 and who designated
the person responsible for the marijuana grow site to grow marijuana for the  person who holds a
registry identification card; or
(b) A  person who has been designated as the primary caregiver under ORS 475B.804 of a person
who holds a registry identification card under ORS 475B.797 and who designated the person  re-
sponsible for  the marijuana grow site to grow marijuana for the person who holds a registry iden-
tification card; [ or]
(2) A person  who has been designated as the primary caregiver under ORS 475B.804 of a person
who holds  a registry identification card under ORS 475B.797 if the person is transferring a
marijuana item to the person who holds a registry identification card[ .]; or
(3) A person designated to produce marijuana by a registry identification cardholder  if
the person is transferring all or part of the seeds, immature marijuana plants  and usable
marijuana pursuant to an agreement described in section 2 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 44.
 ORS 475B.630 is amended to read:
475B.630. (1) ORS 475B.600 to 475B.655 do not apply to:
(a) A person responsible for a marijuana  grow site under ORS 475B.810 if the person is trans-
ferring usable marijuana or an immature marijuana plant, as defined in ORS 475B.015, to:
(A) A  person who holds a registry identification card under ORS 475B.797 and who designated
the person responsible for the marijuana grow site to grow marijuana for the  person who holds a
registry identification card; or
(B) A person who has been designated as the primary caregiver under ORS  475B.804 of a person
who holds a registry identification card under ORS  475B.797, and who designated the person re-
sponsible for  the marijuana grow site to grow marijuana for the person who holds a registry iden-
tification card; [ or]
(b) A  person who has been designated as the primary caregiver under ORS 475B.804 of a person
who holds  a registry identification card under ORS 475B.797 if the person is transferring a
marijuana item to the person who holds a registry identification card[ .]; or
[24]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) A person designated to produce marijuana by a registry identification  cardholder if
the person is transferring all or part of the seeds, immature marijuana plants  and usable
marijuana pursuant to an agreement described in section 2 of this 2021 Act.
(2) The labeling and packaging requirements and standards of ORS 475B.600 to 475B.655  do not
apply to a marijuana processor registered under ORS 475B.139 when the marijuana processor  re-
ceives marijuana and usable marijuana from, and for a fee processes  that marijuana and usable
marijuana into cannabinoid products, cannabinoid concentrates and cannabinoid  extracts for, a
registry identification cardholder or  the designated primary caregiver of a registry identification
cardholder.
SECTION 45.
 ORS 475B.707 is amended to read:
475B.707. (1) As used in this section, “designated primary caregiver,” “registry  identification
card” and “registry identification cardholder” have the meanings given those terms in ORS
475B.791.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 475B.705:
(a) A tax is not imposed  upon the retail sale of marijuana items in this state to a registry
identification cardholder , [or] to a designated primary caregiver who is  purchasing a marijuana item
for a registry identification cardholder or to an individual who holds a medical  marijuana pa-
tient card issued by another state ; and
(b) A marijuana retailer may  not collect the tax imposed under ORS 475B.705 from a consumer
if, at the time at  which the retail sale of the marijuana item occurs, the consumer provides proof
to the marijuana retailer that the consumer:
(A) Holds a valid registry identification card under ORS 475B.797; [ or]
(B) Holds a valid identification card under ORS 475B.797 (5)(b)  and is purchasing the marijuana
item for a registry identification cardholder[ .]; or
(C) Holds a valid medical marijuana patient card issued by another state.
(3) The Department of Revenue:
(a) Shall adopt rules establishing procedures by which a marijuana retailer shall  document that
a consumer  holds a valid registry identification card issued under ORS 475B.797 [ or], a valid iden-
tification card issued under ORS 475B.797 (5)(b) or a valid medical marijuana patient  card issued
by another state ; and
(b) May adopt rules establishing procedures by which the department may verify that a
marijuana retailer collects the tax imposed under ORS 475B.705 from  consumers of marijuana items
who are not registry identification cardholders [ or], designated primary caregivers or holders of
medical marijuana patient cards issued by other states .
SECTION 46.
 ORS 475B.759, as amended by section 10,  chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020)), is amended to read:
475B.759. (1) There is established the Oregon Marijuana Account, separate  and distinct from the
General Fund.
(2) The account shall consist of moneys transferred to the account under ORS 475B.760.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly the amount of moneys available  in the
Oregon Marijuana Account.
(b) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, and after making the transfer of moneys  required
by subsection (7) of this section, the department shall transfer  quarterly 20 percent of the moneys
in the Oregon Marijuana Account as follows:
(A) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to the  cities of this state in
[25]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred  in shares that reflect the popu-
lation of each city of this state that is  not exempt from this paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)
of this section compared to the population of  all cities of this state that are not exempt from this
paragraph pursuant to subsection  (4)(a) of this section, as determined by Portland State University
under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately preceding the date of the transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five  percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business  day
of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located in each city compared
to the number of licenses  held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten  percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the following
shares:
(i) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the total  commer-
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant
to ORS 475B.070 on the last business day of  the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer
for all premises located in  each county compared to the total commercially available area of all
grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent of  the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number of li-
censes held pursuant to ORS  475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business day of the cal-
endar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located  in each county compared to
the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
(c) After making the transfer of moneys required by  subsection (7) of this section, eighty percent
of the remaining moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account must be used as follows:
(A) [ Forty] Thirty-nine percent of the moneys in the  account must be used solely for purposes
for which moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used;
(B) [ Twenty] Nineteen percent of the moneys in the  account must be used solely for mental
health treatment or for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment;
(C) [ Fifteen] Fourteen percent of the moneys in the account must  be used solely for purposes
for which moneys in the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020 may be used; [ and]
(D) [ Five] Four percent of  the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes related
to alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services[ .]; and
(E) Four percent of the moneys in the  account must be used solely for the purposes of
administering ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949.
(4)(a) A city that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment  of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is  required is not eligible to
receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section.
(b) A  county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.070  is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
subsection (3)(b)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 or  475B.105 is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B)(ii) of this section.
[26]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5)(a) A city or county that is ineligible under subsection (4) of this section to  receive a transfer
of moneys from the Oregon Marijuana Account during a given quarter but has received a  transfer
of moneys for that quarter shall return the amount transferred to the Department of Revenue,  with
interest as described under paragraph (f) of this subsection. An ineligible city or county  may vol-
untarily transfer the moneys to the Department of Revenue immediately upon receipt of the ineligi-
ble transfer.
(b) If the Director of the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services determines that a city
or county received a transfer of moneys under subsection (3)(b) of this section but was  ineligible to
receive that transfer under subsection (4)  of this section, the director shall provide notice to the
ineligible city or  county and order the city or county to return the amount received to the Depart-
ment of Revenue, with interest as  described under paragraph (f) of this subsection. A city or county
may appeal the order within 30 days of the  date of the order under the procedures for a contested
case under ORS chapter 183.
(c) As soon as the order under paragraph  (b) of this subsection becomes final, the director shall
notify the Department of  Revenue and the ineligible city or county. Upon notification, the Depart-
ment of Revenue immediately shall proceed to collect the amount stated in the notice.
(d) The Department of Revenue shall have the  benefit of all laws of the state pertaining to the
collection of income and  excise taxes and may proceed to collect the amounts described in the no-
tice under paragraph (c) of this subsection. An assessment of tax is not necessary and  the collection
described in this subsection is not precluded by any statute of limitations.
(e) If a city or county is subject to  an order to return moneys from an ineligible transfer, the
city or county shall  be denied any further relief in connection with the ineligible transfer on or after
the date that the order becomes final.
(f) Interest under this section shall accrue at  the rate established in ORS 305.220 beginning on
the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(g) Both the moneys and  the interest collected from or returned by an ineligible city or county
shall be redistributed to the cities or counties that were eligible to  receive a transfer under sub-
section (3)(b) of this section on the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(6)(a) Not later than July 1 of each year, each city  and county in this state shall certify with
the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services whether the city or county has an ordinance
prohibiting the establishment of a premises for  which issuance of a license under ORS 475B.070,
475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required.  The certification shall be made concurrently with the
certifications under ORS 221.770, in a form and manner prescribed by the Oregon Department  of
Administrative Services.
(b) If  a city fails to comply with this subsection, the city is not eligible to receive transfers of
moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section. If a county fails to comply  with this subsection,
the county is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B) of this section.
(c) A city or county that repeals an ordinance as provided  in ORS 475B.496 shall file an updated
certification with the Oregon Department of Administrative Services in a  form and manner pre-
scribed by the department, noting the effective date of  the change. A city or county that repeals an
ordinance as provided in ORS 475B.496 is eligible to  receive quarterly transfers of moneys under
this section for quarters where  the repeal is effective for the entire quarter and the updated certi-
fication was filed at least 30 days before the date of transfer.
(7) Before making the transfer of moneys required by subsection (3) of  this section, the depart-
ment shall transfer quarterly to the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund all  moneys in the
[27]
SB 758
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
Oregon Marijuana Account in excess of $11,250,000.
SECTION 47.
(1) The amendments to  ORS 475B.020, 475B.220, 475B.531, 475B.570, 475B.630,
475B.707 and 475B.759 by sections 40 to 46 of this 2021 Act become operative on January 1,
2022.
(2) The Department  of Revenue and the Oregon Liquor Control Commission may take any
action before the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary
to enable the department and commission to exercise,  on and after the operative date spec-
ified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and  powers conferred on the
department and the commission by the amendments to ORS 475B.020, 475B.220, 475B.531,
475B.570, 475B.630, 475B.707 and 475B.759 by sections 40 to 46 of this 2021 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 48.
The unit captions used in this 2021 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 49. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[28]