Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Company” includes corporations, associations,  firms, partnerships, limited liability
companies and joint stock companies.
(b) “High-value farmland” has the meaning given that term in ORS 195.300.
(c) “State agency” means any state  officer, board, commission, department, division, in-
stitution, branch or agency of the state government.
(2) A company or state  agency that diverts a creek, stream, river or other body of water
within 15 miles of high-value farmland shall conduct a  study to ensure that the diverted
creek, stream, river or other  body of water will not negatively impact the topsoil or water
supply of the high-value farmland during years of high or low precipitation.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4372