Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the State Workforce and Talent  Development
Board, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of
$25,000,000 for distribution to local workforce development boards. Moneys distributed under
this section must be used to enhance job training opportunities.
SECTION 2.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2060