Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 757.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Community microgrid” means a  microgrid that is composed of a localized group of
customers and distributed energy resources within clearly defined electrical boundaries.
(b) “Energy resource” means a small-scale energy system or mechanism that generates,
stores or consumes energy or works  to balance and match energy demand with energy sup-
ply.
(c) “Front-of-meter” means the utility side  of a transmission or distribution system in
reference to a customer’s meter.
(d) “Microgrid” means an interconnected system  of loads and energy resources appro-
priately sized to meet customer needs within clearly defined electrical boundaries that  can
function as a single, controllable system independent from a utility transmission or distrib-
ution system.
(e) “Microgrid operator” means an entity that is responsible for operating a  microgrid,
including coordinating and optimizing the operations of the distributed energy resources that
make up the microgrid. A microgrid operator may operate one or more microgrids.
(2) The Public Utility Commission shall:
(a) Investigate and create a standard for  reasonable shared costs for community energy
resilience that is provided  by a microgrid. The standards must allow for owners or operators
of a microgrid to recover the costs for designing, constructing and maintaining the microgrid
from customers who use:
(A) The microgrid;
(B) The distribution system located within a microgrid zone within which  the microgrid
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1516
HB 2064
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
is located; or
(C) The distribution system local to the microgrid.
(b) Allow for redundant infrastructure that supports community microgrids.
(c) Approve a community microgrid if the community microgrid enhances  local energy
resilience and is capable of supporting critical infrastructure during and after an  emergency,
natural disaster or disruption to the electric grid or energy supply.
(d) Allow a microgrid operator to operate one or  more microgrids independently from the
electric grid system and direct the microgrid’s front-of-meter energy resources during  and
after an emergency to provide energy resilience services to the customers within the elec-
trical boundaries of the microgrid.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 455.
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Community microgrid” means a microgrid that is composed of  a localized group of
customers and distributed energy resources within clearly defined electrical boundaries.
(b) “Energy resource” means a small-scale energy system or mechanism that generates,
stores or consumes energy or works to balance and match  energy demand with energy sup-
ply.
(c) “Microgrid” means an interconnected system of  loads and energy resources appro-
priately sized to meet customer needs within clearly defined electrical boundaries that  can
function as a single, controllable system independent from a utility transmission or distrib-
ution system.
(2) The Department of Consumer and  Business Services shall adopt rules to the state
building code that support the integration of buildings with community microgrids.
SECTION 5.
Section 6 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 197.
SECTION 6. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Community microgrid” means a microgrid that is composed of  a localized group of
customers and distributed energy resources within clearly defined electrical boundaries.
(b) “Energy resource” means a small-scale energy system or mechanism that generates,
stores or consumes energy or works to balance and match  energy demand with energy sup-
ply.
(c) “Microgrid” means an interconnected system of  loads and energy resources appro-
priately sized to meet customer needs within clearly defined electrical boundaries that  can
function as a single, controllable system independent from a utility transmission or distrib-
ution system.
(2) A local government may:
(a) Adopt land use regulations that correspond to microgrid zones to encourage develop-
ment that is compatible with microgrids and community microgrids.
(b) Designate a  geographical area based on existing electric service infrastructure located
within the jurisdiction of the local government as a microgrid zone, subject to the approval
of the Public Utility Commission.
(c) Enter into an intergovernmental agreement with one or more local governments to
designate a geographical area based on existing electric service infrastructure located within
and across the jurisdictions of the local governments as a microgrid zone, subject to the
approval of the commission.
SECTION 7.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
[2]
HB 2064
1
2
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]