Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Forestry Department shall establish by rule a pilot grant pro-
gram for the purpose of managing wildfire risk by:
(a) Encouraging methods that include, but are not limited to, clearing ladder fuels, cre-
ating slash piles, removing underbrush and using other forest management practices.
(b) Promoting the use of air curtains by persons that make biochar.
(2) In administering the program, the department:
(a) Shall develop criteria for receiving a grant and a process for applying for  a grant; and
(b) May require a recipient  of a grant to report to the department on the use of the grant
funds.
SECTION 2.
There is appropriated to the State Forestry Department, for the biennium
beginning on July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000 for  the purpose
of funding the grant program described in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on June 30, 2027.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1416