Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 2.  (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall:
(a) Oversee coordinated care  organizations’ compliance with statutory and regulatory
requirements for the  expenditure of funds provided under Title XIX and Title XXI of the
Social Security Act.
(b) Collect from each  coordinated care organization and submit to the Centers for Medi-
care and Medicaid Services any data required to be reported by coordinated care  organiza-
tions.
(c) Provide all coordinated care organizations with equal and uniform access to:
(A) Information;
(B) Opportunities to comment on  proposed policies or rules, or to meet and discuss policy
or rules; and
(C) Opportunities to participate in advisory committees.
(2) The authority shall  invite a representative from each coordinated care organization
to participate in any advisory committee  responsible for making recommendations regarding
the services that must be provided by coordinated care organizations, and any  meeting of
such advisory committee shall be open to the public and invite public comment.
(3)(a) Rules adopted by the authority must be strictly tailored to the requirements  of
state statutes and federal law.
(b) The authority may not adopt rules that apply  to a period that begins less than 30 days
after the date the rule is filed with the Secretary of State.
(c) The authority shall appoint an advisory committee  under ORS 183.333 with respect to
the development of  any rule that affects a coordinated care organization and shall invite a
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1833
SB 236
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
representative from each coordinated care organization to serve on the committee.
(d) Upon filing a final rule with the Secretary of  State, the authority shall publish notice
of the rule on its website along with summaries of comments received during  the comment
period for the rule and the authority’s responses to the comments.
(e) The statement of fiscal impact required by ORS 183.335 must include a description  of
all alternatives for implementing the policy that were considered by  the authority that would
be less  costly to coordinated care organizations and the authority’s justification for not
adopting a less costly alternative.
(4) The authority may not require a coordinated care organization to provide  health
services to medical assistance recipients whose assistance is  reimbursed on a fee-for-service
basis.
(5) The authority shall adopt health outcome and quality measures approved  by the
Oregon Health Policy Board under ORS 413.017 (4) but may not prescribe for coordinated care
organizations how to achieve the measures.
(6) The authority shall apply to the Centers for Medicare  and Medicaid Services to amend
the terms and conditions of the Medicaid demonstration project  to conform to legislative
changes enacted during a session of the Legislative Assembly immediately  upon adjournment
sine die of the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 3.
(1) As  used in this section, “global budget” has the meaning given that term
in ORS 414.025.
(2) The Department of Consumer and Business Services must  certify each global budget
established by the Oregon Health Authority before the global budget may take effect.
(3) The department may  certify a global budget only if the department determines that
the global budget:
(a) Meets the requirements of ORS 414.065 (5); and
(b) Is based  on sound data, assumptions and methodologies uniformly applied to all co-
ordinated care organizations.
(4) The department shall consider:
(a) All information provided by the Oregon Health Authority;
(b) Comments provided to the authority by a  coordinated care organization under ORS
414.652 (4)(b); and
(c) Other information that the department deems relevant.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 413.011, as amended by section 6, chapter 389, Oregon Laws 2015,  is amended
to read:
413.011. (1) The duties of the Oregon Health Policy Board are to:
(a) Be the policy-making and  oversight body for the Oregon Health Authority established in ORS
413.032 and all of the authority’s departmental divisions.
(b) Develop and submit a plan to the Legislative Assembly by December 31,  2010, to provide and
fund access to affordable, quality health care for all Oregonians by 2015.
(c) Develop a  program to provide health insurance premium assistance to all low and moderate
income individuals who are legal residents of Oregon.
(d) Publish health outcome and quality measure data collected by the  Oregon Health Authority
at aggregate  levels that do not disclose information otherwise protected by law. The information
published must report, for each coordinated care organization and each health  benefit plan sold
through the health insurance exchange or offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit  Board or the
[2]
SB 236
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Public Employees’ Benefit Board:
(A) Quality measures;
(B) Costs;
(C) Health outcomes; and
(D) Other information that is necessary for members of the public to evaluate the value of health
services delivered by each coordinated care organization and by each health benefit plan.
(e) Establish evidence-based clinical standards and practice  guidelines that may be used by
providers.
(f) Approve and monitor community-centered health initiatives described in  ORS 413.032 (1)(h)
that are consistent  with public health goals, strategies, programs and performance standards
adopted by the Oregon Health Policy Board to improve the health of all Oregonians,  and shall reg-
ularly report to the Legislative Assembly on the accomplishments and needed changes to the  initi-
atives.
(g) Establish cost containment mechanisms to reduce health care costs.
(h) Ensure that Oregon’s health care workforce is sufficient  in numbers and training to meet the
demand that will be created by the expansion  in health coverage, health care system transforma-
tions, an increasingly diverse population and an aging workforce.
(i) Work with the Oregon  congressional delegation to advance the adoption of changes in federal
law or policy to promote Oregon’s comprehensive health reform plan.
(j) Establish a health benefit package in accordance with ORS  741.340 to be used as the baseline
for all health benefit plans offered through the health insurance exchange.
(k) Investigate and  report annually to the Legislative Assembly on the feasibility and advis-
ability of future changes to the health insurance market in Oregon,  including but not limited to the
following:
(A) A requirement for every resident to have health insurance coverage.
(B) A payroll tax as a means to encourage employers to continue providing  health insurance to
their employees.
(L) Meet cost-containment goals by structuring reimbursement  rates to reward comprehensive
management of diseases, quality outcomes and the efficient use of resources by  promoting cost-
effective procedures, services and programs including, without limitation, preventive  health, dental
and primary care services, web-based office  visits, telephone consultations and telemedicine consul-
tations.
(m) Oversee the expenditure of moneys from the Health Care Workforce Strategic  Fund to sup-
port grants to primary care providers and rural health practitioners, to increase the number of pri-
mary care educators and to support efforts to create and develop career ladder opportunities.
(n) Work  with the Public Health Benefit Purchasers Committee, administrators of the medical
assistance program and  the Department of Corrections to identify uniform contracting standards for
health benefit plans that achieve maximum quality and cost outcomes and  align the contracting
standards for all state programs to the greatest extent practicable.
(o) Work with the  Health Information Technology Oversight Council to foster health information
technology systems and practices that promote the  Oregon Integrated and Coordinated Health Care
Delivery System established by ORS 414.620 and  align health information technology systems and
practices across this state.
(p) Provide independent oversight of the authority’s  compliance with federal and state
requirements for the administration of the  medical assistance program and for contracting
[3]
SB 236
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
with coordinated care organizations.
(q) Ensure that coordinated care organizations are reporting to  the authority and that
the authority is compiling all required data including, but not limited to, data  concerning the
compliance of coordinated care organizations with the quality  performance benchmarks es-
tablished under paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(r)(A) Investigate complaints or concerns expressed with  respect to a coordinated care
organization’s compliance with requirements adopted by rule under ORS 414.625;
(B) Report the results of the investigation to the Director of the  Oregon Health Au-
thority along with a plan for corrective actions; and
(C) Require  the director to regularly report to the board on the progress made in
achieving the corrective actions.
(s) Approve proposed legislative  measures before they may be submitted to the Governor
for approval under ORS 171.133.
(2) The Oregon Health Policy Board is authorized to:
(a) Appoint  all subordinate officers and employees of the board, prescribe their duties and fix
their compensation.
(a) Subject to the approval of the Governor, organize and  reorganize the authority as the board
considers necessary to properly conduct the work of the authority.
(b) Submit directly to the Legislative Counsel,  no later than October 1 of each even-numbered
year, requests for measures necessary to provide statutory authorization to carry out  any of the
board’s duties or to implement any of the board’s recommendations. The  measures may be filed prior
to the beginning of the legislative session in accordance with the  rules of the House of Represen-
tatives and the Senate.
(3) If the board or  the authority is unable to perform, in whole or in part, any of the duties
described  in ORS 413.006 to 413.042 and 741.340 without federal approval, the authority is authorized
to request,  in accordance with ORS 413.072, waivers or other approval necessary to perform those
duties. The authority shall implement any portions of  those duties not requiring legislative authority
or federal approval, to the extent practicable.
(4) The enumeration of duties, functions and powers in this section is not  intended to be exclu-
sive nor to limit the duties, functions and powers imposed on the board by ORS 413.006  to 413.042
and 741.340 and by other statutes.
(5) The board shall consult with the Department of Consumer and  Business Services in com-
pleting the tasks set forth in subsection (1)(j) and (k)(A) of this section.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 414.025, as amended by section 9, chapter 389, Oregon Laws 2015,  is amended
to read:
414.025. As used in this chapter and ORS chapters 411 and 413,  unless the context or a specially
applicable statutory definition requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Alternative payment methodology” means a  payment other than a fee-for-services pay-
ment, used by coordinated care organizations as compensation for the provision of integrated  and
coordinated health care and services.
(b) “Alternative payment methodology” includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Shared savings arrangements;
(B) Bundled payments; and
(C) Payments based on episodes.
(2) “Behavioral health clinician” means:
[4]
SB 236
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) A licensed psychiatrist;
(b) A licensed psychologist;
(c) A certified nurse practitioner with a specialty in psychiatric mental health;
(d) A licensed clinical social worker;
(e) A licensed professional counselor or licensed marriage and family therapist;
(f) A certified clinical social work associate;
(g) An intern or resident who is working under a  board-approved supervisory contract in a
clinical mental health field; or
(h) Any other clinician whose  authorized scope of practice includes mental health diagnosis and
treatment.
(3) “Behavioral health home” means a mental health disorder or substance use  disorder treat-
ment organization, as defined by the  Oregon Health Authority by rule, that provides integrated
health care to individuals whose primary diagnoses are mental health disorders or  substance use
disorders.
(4) “Category of aid” means assistance provided by the Oregon Supplemental  Income Program,
aid granted under ORS 411.877 to 411.896 and 412.001 to 412.069  or federal Supplemental Security
Income payments.
(5) “Community health worker” means an individual who:
(a) Has expertise or experience in public health;
(b) Works in an urban or rural community, either for pay or as a volunteer  in association with
a local health care system;
(c) To the extent practicable, shares ethnicity, language, socioeconomic status and life  experi-
ences with the residents of the community where the worker serves;
(d) Assists members of the community to improve their health  and increases the capacity of the
community to meet the health care needs of its residents and achieve wellness;
(e) Provides health education and information that is culturally appropriate to the  individuals
being served;
(f) Assists community residents in receiving the care they need;
(g) May give peer counseling and guidance on health behaviors; and
(h) May provide direct services such as first aid or blood pressure screening.
(6) “Coordinated care organization” means an organization meeting criteria adopted by the
Oregon Health Authority under ORS 414.625.
(7) “Dually eligible for Medicare and Medicaid” means, with respect to eligibility for enrollment
in a coordinated care organization, that an individual is eligible for health services funded by  Title
XIX of the Social Security Act and is:
(a) Eligible for or enrolled in Part A of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act; or
(b) Enrolled in Part B of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act.
(8) “Global budget” means a total amount [ established prospectively by the Oregon Health  Au-
thority to be ] paid to a coordinated care  organization by the Oregon Health Authority on a pro-
spective basis for the delivery of, management of, access to  and quality of the health care delivered
to members of the coordinated care organization.
(9) “Health insurance exchange” or “exchange” means an  American Health Benefit Exchange
described in 42 U.S.C. 18031, 18032, 18033 and 18041.
(10) “Health  services” means at least so much of each of the following as are funded by the
Legislative Assembly based upon the prioritized list of health services  compiled by the Health Evi-
[5]
SB 236
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
dence Review Commission under ORS 414.690:
(a) Services required by federal law to be included in the state’s medical assistance program  in
order for the program to qualify for federal funds;
(b) Services provided by a physician as defined in ORS  677.010, a nurse practitioner certified
under ORS 678.375 or other licensed practitioner within the scope of the practitioner’s practice as
defined by state law, and ambulance services;
(c) Prescription drugs;
(d) Laboratory and X-ray services;
(e) Medical equipment and supplies;
(f) Mental health services;
(g) Chemical dependency services;
(h) Emergency dental services;
(i) Nonemergency dental services;
(j) Provider services, other than services described in paragraphs (a) to (i), (k), (L) and (m)  of
this subsection, defined by  federal law that may be included in the state’s medical assistance pro-
gram;
(k) Emergency hospital services;
(L) Outpatient hospital services; and
(m) Inpatient hospital services.
(11) “Income” has the meaning given that term in ORS 411.704.
(12)(a) “Integrated health care” means care provided to individuals and their families in  a pa-
tient centered primary care home or behavioral health home by licensed primary care clinicians,
behavioral health clinicians and other care team members, working together to address one or more
of the following:
(A) Mental illness.
(B) Substance use disorders.
(C) Health behaviors that contribute to chronic illness.
(D) Life stressors and crises.
(E) Developmental risks and conditions.
(F) Stress-related physical symptoms.
(G) Preventive care.
(H) Ineffective patterns of health care utilization.
(b) As used in this subsection, “other care team members” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Qualified mental health professionals or  qualified mental health associates meeting require-
ments adopted by the Oregon Health Authority by rule;
(B) Peer wellness specialists;
(C) Peer support specialists;
(D) Community health workers who have completed a state-certified training program;
(E) Personal health navigators; or
(F) Other qualified individuals approved by the Oregon Health Authority.
(13) “Investments and savings” means  cash, securities as defined in ORS 59.015, negotiable in-
struments as defined in ORS 73.0104 and such similar investments or savings  as the department or
the authority may establish by rule  that are available to the applicant or recipient to contribute
toward meeting the needs of the applicant or recipient.
(14) “Medical assistance” means so much of the medical,  mental health, preventive, supportive,
[6]
SB 236
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
palliative and remedial care and services as may be prescribed by the  authority according to the
standards established pursuant to  ORS 414.065, including premium assistance and payments made for
services provided under an insurance  or other contractual arrangement and money paid directly to
the recipient for the purchase of health services and for services described in ORS 414.710.
(15) “Medical assistance”  includes any care or services for any individual who is a patient in
a medical  institution or any care or services for any individual who has attained 65 years of age
or is under 22 years of age, and who is a patient in a  private or public institution for mental dis-
eases. Except as provided in ORS 411.439 and 411.447, “medical assistance” does not include  care
or services for a resident of a nonmedical public institution.
(16) “Patient centered primary care home” means a health  care team or clinic that is organized
in accordance with the standards established  by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 414.655
and that incorporates the following core attributes:
(a) Access to care;
(b) Accountability to consumers and to the community;
(c) Comprehensive whole person care;
(d) Continuity of care;
(e) Coordination and integration of care; and
(f) Person and family centered care.
(17) “Peer support specialist” means  any of the following individuals who provide supportive
services to a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment:
(a) An individual who is a current or former consumer of mental health treatment;
(b) An individual who is in recovery, as defined by the Oregon Health Authority by rule, from
an addiction disorder; or
(c) A family member of a current or former consumer of mental health or addiction treatment.
(18) “Peer wellness specialist” means  an individual who is responsible for assessing mental
health and  substance use disorder service and support needs of a member of a coordinated care or-
ganization through community outreach, assisting  members with access to available services and
resources,  addressing  barriers to services and providing education and information about available
resources for individuals  with mental health or substance use disorders in order to reduce stigma
and discrimination toward consumers of mental health and substance use disorder  services and to
assist the member in creating and maintaining recovery, health and wellness.
(19) “Person centered care” means care that:
(a) Reflects the individual patient’s strengths and preferences;
(b) Reflects the clinical needs of the patient as identified  through an individualized assessment;
and
(c) Is based upon the patient’s goals and will assist the patient in achieving the goals.
(20) “Personal health navigator” means an individual who  provides information, assistance, tools
and support to enable a patient to make the best health care decisions in the  patient’s particular
circumstances and in light of the patient’s needs, lifestyle, combination of conditions and  desired
outcomes.
(21) “Prepaid managed care health services organization” means a managed  dental care, mental
health or chemical dependency organization that contracts with the authority under  ORS 414.654
or with a coordinated care organization on a prepaid capitated basis to provide  health services to
medical assistance recipients.
(22) “Quality  measure” means the health outcome and quality measures and benchmarks identi-
[7]
SB 236
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
fied by the Health Plan  Quality Metrics Committee and the metrics and scoring subcommittee in
accordance with ORS 413.017 (4) and 414.638.
(23) “Resources” has the meaning  given that term in ORS 411.704. For eligibility purposes, “re-
sources” does not include charitable  contributions raised by a community to assist with medical
expenses.
SECTION 6.  ORS 414.638, as amended by section 10,  chapter 389, Oregon Laws 2015, is
amended to read:
414.638. (1) There is created in the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee a nine-member met-
rics and scoring subcommittee  appointed by the Director of the Oregon Health Authority. The
members of the subcommittee serve two-year terms and must include:
(a) Three members at large;
(b) Three individuals with expertise in health outcomes measures; and
(c) Three representatives of coordinated care organizations.
(2) The subcommittee shall select, from the health  outcome and quality measures identified by
the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee, the health outcome and quality measures  applicable to
services provided by coordinated care  organizations. If approved by the Oregon Health Policy
Board, the Oregon Health  Authority shall incorporate these measures into coordinated care or-
ganization contracts to hold the organizations accountable for performance and customer satisfac-
tion requirements. The authority shall notify each coordinated care  organization of any changes in
the measures at least three months before the  beginning of the contract period during which the
new measures will be in place.
(3) The subcommittee shall evaluate the health outcome  and quality measures annually, report-
ing recommendations based  on its findings to the Health Plan Quality Metrics Committee, and adjust
the measures to reflect:
(a) The amount of the global budget for a coordinated care organization;
(b) Changes in membership of the organization;
(c) The organization’s costs for implementing  health outcome and quality measures; and
(d) The  community health assessment and the costs of the community health assessment con-
ducted by the organization under ORS 414.627.
(4) The authority shall evaluate on a regular  and ongoing basis the  health outcome and quality
measures selected by the subcommittee under this  section for members in each coordinated care
organization and for members statewide.
(5) The authority shall make the health outcome and quality measures available to  the
coordinated care organizations no later than October 1 of the year prior to  the year in which
the measures are to be in effect.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 414.652, as amended by section 1, chapter 79, Oregon Laws 2016, is  amended
to read:
414.652. (1)  A contract entered into between the Oregon Health Authority and a coordinated
care organization under ORS 414.625 (1) shall provide the coordinated care organization with
maximum flexibility in the delivery of health  services subject only to those requirements
specified by state statutes or federal law and :
(a) Shall be for a term of five years;
(b) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, may not be amended more than once  in
each 12-month period; and
(c) May be terminated if a coordinated care  organization fails to meet outcome and quality
[8]
SB 236
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
measures specified in the contract or is otherwise in breach of the contract.
(2) This section does not prohibit  the authority from allowing a coordinated care organization
a reasonable amount of time in which to cure any failure  to meet outcome and quality measures
specified in the contract prior to the termination of the contract.
(3) A contract entered into between the authority and a coordinated care organization may be
amended more than once in each 12-month period if:
(a) The authority and the coordinated care  organization mutually agree to amend the contract;
or
(b) Amendments are necessitated by changes in federal or state law.
(4)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the authority [ must] shall give
a coordinated care organization at  least 60 days’ advance notice of any amendments the authority
proposes  to  existing contracts between the authority and the coordinated care organization, or to
contracts to be renewed[ , including  the global budget paid to the coordinated care organization under
the contract ].
(b) The authority shall give a coordinated  care organization notice of an amendment to
the global budget  paid to the coordinated care organization under the contract at least 30
days before submitting the amendment to the  Department of Consumer and Business Ser-
vices for certification under section 3 of this 2017 Act.
(5) An amendment to a contract may apply retroactively only if:
(a) The amendment does not  result in a claim by the authority for the recovery of amounts paid
by the authority to the coordinated care organization prior to the date of the amendment; or
(b) The Centers for Medicare and  Medicaid Services notifies the authority, in writing, that the
amendment is a condition for approval of the contract by the Centers for Medicare and  Medicaid
Services.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 414.688 is amended to read:
414.688. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Practice of pharmacy” has the meaning given that term in ORS 689.005.
(b) “Retail drug outlet” has the meaning given that term in ORS 689.005.
(2) The Health Evidence  Review Commission is established [ in the Oregon Health Authority ]
under the supervision and oversight of the Oregon Health  Policy Board , consisting of 13
members appointed by the Governor in consultation with  professional and other interested organ-
izations, and confirmed by the Senate, as follows:
(a) Five members must be physicians licensed to practice medicine in this  state who have clin-
ical expertise in the areas  of family medicine, internal medicine, obstetrics, perinatal health,
pediatrics, disabilities, geriatrics or general surgery. One of the  physicians must be a doctor of
osteopathy, and one must be a hospital  representative or a physician whose practice is significantly
hospital-based.
(b) One member must be a dentist licensed under ORS chapter 679 who has clinical expertise
in general, pediatric or public health dentistry.
(c) One member must be a public health nurse.
(d) One member must be a  behavioral health representative who may be a social services
worker, alcohol and drug treatment provider, psychologist or psychiatrist.
(e) Two members must be consumers of health care who are patient advocates or represent the
areas of indigent services, labor, business, education or corrections.
(f) One member must be a complementary or alternative medicine  provider who is a chiropractic
[9]
SB 236
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
physician licensed under ORS chapter 684, a naturopathic physician  licensed under ORS chapter 685
or an acupuncturist licensed under ORS chapter 677.
(g) One member must be an insurance industry representative who may be a medical director
or other administrator.
(h) One member must be a pharmacy representative who engages in the practice  of pharmacy
at a retail drug outlet.
(3) No more than six members of the commission may be physicians either  in active practice or
retired from practice.
(4) Members of the commission serve for  a term of four years at the pleasure of the Governor.
A member is eligible for reappointment.
(5) Members are not entitled to compensation,  but may be reimbursed for actual and necessary
travel and other expenses incurred by them in the performance of their official duties  in the manner
and amounts provided for in ORS 292.495. Claims for expenses shall be paid out of funds  available
to the Oregon Health [ Authority ] Policy Board  for purposes of the commission.
SECTION 9.  ORS 414.689 is amended to read:
414.689. (1) The Health Evidence Review Commission  shall select one of its members as chair-
person and another as vice chairperson, for  terms and with duties and powers the commission de-
termines necessary for the performance of the functions of the offices.
(2) A majority of the members of the commission constitutes a  quorum for the transaction of
business.
(3) The commission shall meet at least four times per year at a place, day and  hour determined
by the chairperson. The commission  also shall meet at other times and places specified by the call
of the chairperson or of a majority of the members of the commission.
(4) The commission may use advisory committees  or subcommittees whose members are ap-
pointed by the chairperson of the commission subject to approval by a majority of the members  of
the commission. The  advisory committees or subcommittees may contain experts appointed by the
chairperson  and  a majority of the members of the commission. The conditions of service of the ex-
perts will be determined by the chairperson and a majority of the members of the commission.
(5) The Oregon Health [ Authority ] Policy Board  shall provide staff and support services to the
commission.
SECTION 10.  ORS 414.690 is amended to read:
414.690. (1) The  Health Evidence Review Commission shall regularly solicit testimony and in-
formation from stakeholders representing consumers, advocates, providers,  carriers and employers
in conducting the work of the commission.
(2) The commission shall actively solicit public involvement  through a public meeting process
to guide health resource allocation decisions.
(3) The commission shall develop and maintain a list  of health services ranked by priority, from
the most important to  the least important, representing the comparative benefits of each service to
the population to be served. The list must  be submitted by the commission pursuant to subsection
(5) of this section and is not subject to alteration by any other state agency.
(4) In order to encourage effective and efficient medical evaluation and  treatment, the commis-
sion:
(a) May include clinical practice guidelines in its prioritized list of services. The  commission
shall actively solicit testimony and information from the medical community and  the public to build
a consensus on clinical practice guidelines developed by the commission.
[10]
SB 236
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) May include statements of intent in its prioritized list of services. Statements of intent should
give direction  on coverage decisions where medical codes and clinical practice guidelines cannot
convey the intent of the commission.
(c) Shall consider both the clinical effectiveness and cost-effectiveness of health services, in-
cluding drug therapies, in determining their relative importance using peer-reviewed  medical litera-
ture as defined in ORS 743A.060.
(5) The commission shall report the prioritized list of services to the Oregon Health
[Authority ] Policy Board  for budget determinations by July 1 of each even-numbered year.
(6) The commission shall make its report during each  regular session of the Legislative Assem-
bly and shall submit a copy of its report to the Governor, the Speaker of the House of  Represen-
tatives and the President of the Senate.
(7) The commission may alter the list during the interim only as follows:
(a) To make technical changes to correct errors and omissions;
(b) To accommodate changes due to advancements  in medical technology or new data regarding
health outcomes;
(c) To accommodate changes to clinical practice guidelines; and
(d) To add statements of intent that clarify the prioritized list.
(8) If a service is deleted or  added during an interim and no new funding is required, the com-
mission shall report to the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the  President of the Senate.
However, if a service to be added requires increased funding to avoid discontinuing another  service,
the commission shall report to the Emergency Board to request the funding.
(9) The prioritized list of services remains in effect for  a two-year period beginning no earlier
than October 1 of each odd-numbered year.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 414.695 is amended to read:
414.695. (1) As used in this section and ORS 414.698:
(a) “Medical technology” means medical equipment and devices, medical or surgical  procedures
and techniques used by health care providers in delivering medical care  to individuals, and the or-
ganizational or supportive systems within which medical care is delivered.
(b) “Medical technology assessment” means evaluation of the use, clinical effectiveness and  cost
of a technology in comparison with its alternatives.
(2) The  Health Evidence Review Commission shall develop a medical technology assessment
process. The Oregon Health [ Authority ] Policy Board  shall direct the commission  with regard to
medical technologies to be assessed and the timing of the assessments.
(3) The commission shall appoint and work  with an advisory committee whose members have the
appropriate expertise to conduct a medical technology assessment.
(4) The commission shall present its preliminary findings at a  public hearing and shall solicit
testimony and information from health care consumers. The commission shall give strong  consider-
ation to  the recommendations of the advisory committee and public testimony in developing its as-
sessment.
(5) To ensure that confidentiality is maintained, identification  of a patient or a person licensed
to provide health services may not be included with the data  submitted under this section, and the
commission shall release such data only in aggregate  statistical form. All findings and conclusions,
interviews, reports, studies, communications  and statements procured by or furnished to the com-
mission in connection with obtaining the data necessary to  perform its functions is confidential
pursuant to ORS 192.501 to 192.505.
[11]
SB 236
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
SECTION 12.  ORS 414.735 is amended to read:
414.735. (1) If insufficient resources are available during a contract period:
(a) The population of eligible persons determined by law may not be reduced.
(b) The reimbursement rate for providers and plans established under  the contractual agreement
may not be reduced.
(2) In the circumstances described in subsection (1) of this section, reimbursement shall  be ad-
justed by reducing  the health services for the eligible population by eliminating services in the order
of priority recommended by the Health Evidence  Review Commission, starting with the least im-
portant and progressing toward the most important.
(3) The Oregon Health [ Authority ] Policy Board  shall  obtain the approval of the Legislative
Assembly, or the Emergency Board if the Legislative Assembly is not in session, before instituting
the reductions. In addition, providers contracting to provide  health services under [ ORS 414.631,
414.651 and 414.688 to 414.745 ] this chapter  must be notified at least two weeks prior to any leg-
islative consideration of such reductions. Any reductions made under  this section shall take effect
no sooner than 60 days following final legislative action approving the reductions.
(4) This section does not apply to reductions made by the  Legislative Assembly in a legislatively
adopted or approved budget.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 442.011 is amended to read:
442.011. There is created in the Oregon  Health [ Authority ] Policy Board  the Office for Oregon
Health Policy and Research. The Administrator of the  Office for Oregon Health Policy and Research
shall be appointed by the [ Director of the Oregon Health Authority ] chairperson of the board . The
administrator shall be  an individual with demonstrated proficiency in planning and managing pro-
grams with complex public policy and fiscal aspects  such as those involved in the medical assistance
program.
SECTION 14. Section 3 of this 2017 Act applies to global budgets in effect on  and after
January 1, 2018.
[12]