Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section,  “provider of water” means a city, a quasi-
municipal corporation, a domestic water supply district formed under ORS chapter 264, a
water supplier as defined in ORS 448.115 or a water authority  formed under ORS chapter 450.
(2) A provider of water appropriated from a source within the Deschutes River  Basin
may collect a  fee of three and one-half cents per 100 cubic feet from recipients of the water
on behalf of a nonprofit corporation described in section 2 of this 2019 Act.  A provider of
water shall forward all moneys collected by the provider of water under this  section, without
reduction, to the nonprofit corporation.
SECTION 2.
(1) A nonprofit corporation that is organized  under ORS chapter 65 and ex-
empt from taxation under  section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code may accept moneys
collected and forwarded under section 1 of this 2019 Act  and accept gifts, grants or donations
of moneys from any other public or  private source for purposes consistent with this section.
A public body, as defined in ORS 174.109, may not be a member of or participate in the
management or operation of a nonprofit corporation described in this section, other than  as
a distributee under subsection (3) of this  section. The nonprofit corporation shall use moneys
received by the nonprofit corporation:
(a) To purchase mitigation credits or  to purchase temporary transfers of water under
ORS 540.585; or
(b) If the purchase of mitigation credits or temporary transfers  is not practicable due to
lack of supply or excessive cost,  to engage in projects designed to increase the flow or water
quality of the upper or middle portions of  the Deschutes River or tributaries to those
portions of the Deschutes River.
(2) The  Water Resources Department shall provide a nonprofit corporation with prelimi-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3199
SB 700
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
nary finding services under ORS 537.746 (2) for potential projects under  consideration by the
nonprofit corporation. The department shall grant approval under ORS 537.746 to  any project
the nonprofit corporation elects to undertake that meets the project guidelines  established
by the department under section 3 of this 2019 Act.
(3) A nonprofit corporation shall distribute water that becomes available to the nonprofit
corporation among the providers of water that  collect and forward fees under section 1 of
this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) The  Water Resources Department shall adopt rules to establish guide-
lines for projects, water distributions and other water-related activities of  nonprofit corpo-
rations under section 2 of this 2019 Act. The department may amend  rules and provide
ongoing monitoring of the nonprofit corporation activities. The department may not exercise
any authority over carrying out of the daily activities of the nonprofit  corporation, the se-
lection of water flow or water quality projects or the basis for water distributions to water
providers.
(2) The department may require a nonprofit corporation  to periodically provide the de-
partment with information regarding the water-related activities of the corporation.
[2]