Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Department of  Administrative Services shall provide a grant
to a soil and water conservation district that operates in at least three of the following
counties:
(a) Crook County;
(b) Jefferson County;
(c) Klamath County;
(d) Deschutes County;
(e) Harney County; or
(f) Lake County.
(2) In rural areas of this state, the districts  that receive grants under this section shall
coordinate efforts to identify and apply for sources of funding for western  juniper treatment,
or other water conservation projects, among cities, counties or other districts.
(3) The prevailing rate of  wage, as defined in ORS 279C.800, does not apply to activities
under a grant awarded pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, unless the grant is for
$750,000 or more.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $15,000,000, which may be expended  for the
purpose of carrying out section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3457