Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, to  be distributed by grant or loan
to Curry Health District for the following purposes:
(1) $1,700,000 to open an emergency room in Curry Medical  Center in Brookings, Oregon;
and
(2) $300,000 to acquire an ambulance that is used exclusively for transport  related to
maternity care.
SECTION 2. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2585