Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $50,000,000 for
the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 2 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Earned revenue” means income from the  sales of goods or services, including,
but not limited to,  admission tickets, merchandise, food and beverages, advertising sales and
contracted presentation income.
(B) “Earned  revenue” does not include other sources of income, including, but not limited
to, donations, federal, state and local governmental assistance or returns on investments.
(b) “Oregon cultural organization” means a public  or private entity, whether operated for
profit or as a nonprofit, that:
(A) Has its business headquarters, and operates primarily, in this state; and
(B) Operates primarily for the purpose of producing, promoting or  presenting the arts,
culture, humanities, heritage  or entertainment, other than adult entertainment, to the pub-
lic.
(2)(a) The Oregon Business Development Department shall develop  and implement a
program for awarding grants directly to Oregon cultural organizations.
(b) To be eligible  for a grant, an Oregon cultural organization must demonstrate to the
department’s satisfaction that, at any time after February 29, 2020, and before January 1,
2022, the organization experienced a significant loss in earned revenue because of statewide
mandates, or guidance of the Oregon Health Authority, in response to the  COVID-19
pandemic.
(3)(a) The department shall prescribe the form  and process by which Oregon cultural
organizations may apply for and be awarded grants under the program.
(b) The application period shall open on  the operative date specified in section 3 of this
2022 Act for a period not to exceed eight weeks.
(c) Applications must be accompanied by a verification  of the Oregon cultural
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 268
HB 4040
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
organization’s need, as described in subsection (4) of this section, in the form of:
(A) The organization’s federal tax return for the periods to which the application  relates;
and
(B) For  organizations seeking $750,000 or more in grant moneys, a financial statement
audit.
(4) Subject to subsections (5) and (6) of this section,  grant moneys shall be awarded with
priority given to the applicants demonstrating  the greatest dollar amount of need, deter-
mined as follows:
(a) An Oregon cultural organization’s estimated loss of earned revenue shall  be deter-
mined by subtracting earned revenue for  each fiscal year to which the application relates
from the organization’s earned revenue for fiscal year 2019.
(b) The difference determined under paragraph (a) of this subsection  shall be multiplied
by 25 percent.
(c) The product  determined under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be multiplied by
one plus the percentage change in the monthly  averaged Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers, West Region (All Items), as published by the  Bureau of Labor Statistics of the
United States Department of Labor, for the  fiscal year to which the application relates
compared to the monthly averaged Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers,  West
Region (All Items), for the fiscal year that ended on June 30, 2020.
(5) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, grant moneys shall  be awarded proportion-
ately among the geographic regions of this state  based on the relative population, and the
number and total budgets of cultural organizations, in the regions.
(6) Grant moneys shall be awarded in the following proportions:
(a) Sixty percent to Oregon cultural organizations that operate  cultural venues, per-
forming arts organizations and museums; and
(b) Forty percent to Oregon  cultural organizations that operate cultural support busi-
nesses.
(7) Before awarding  grants, the department may withhold an amount not to exceed five
percent of the total amount appropriated under section 1 of this  2022 Act to reimburse the
department for the actual costs of developing and implementing the program.
(8) Notwithstanding any other provision of law,  this section shall apply to any grant
moneys that the department awards to  an Oregon cultural organization on or after the ef-
fective date of this 2022 Act in response to the negative impact of the COVID-19  pandemic
on the organization’s business.
SECTION 3.
(1) Section 2 of this 2022 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2022.
(2) Notwithstanding the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, the
Oregon Business Development Department may take any action before  the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary for the department to  exercise,
on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, the powers, duties
and functions conferred on the department under section 2 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]