Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 285B.627 is amended to read:
285B.627. (1) In consultation with  the Department of Revenue, the Oregon Business Development
Department shall  establish and administer the Oregon Industrial Site Readiness Program. The pur-
pose of the program is to:
(a) Enter into tax reimbursement arrangements with qualified project  sponsors pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section; or
(b) Provide loans, including  forgivable loans, to qualified project sponsors pursuant to subsection
(5) of this section.
(2)(a) Subject to standards and procedures that the Oregon Business Development  Department
shall establish by rule, the department shall  designate regionally significant industrial sites for
inclusion in the program.
(b) A regionally significant  industrial site designated under this section must be an industrial
site that is planned and zoned for industrial use.
(3) A project sponsor may apply to participate in the program by submitting an  application and
development plan in writing in a form prescribed by the department by rule.
(4) The department shall establish by rule criteria and standards  for the qualification of project
sponsors to participate in the program.
(5) Upon qualification of a project sponsor under this section, and before July 1, [ 2023] 2033, the
department may:
(a) Enter into  a tax reimbursement arrangement with the project sponsor pursuant to which the
project sponsor shall receive an amount equal  to 50 percent of the estimated incremental income tax
revenues generated by  an eligible employer per tax year, beginning with the first tax year following
the tax year in which a project sponsor is qualified under this section, until  the total investment
of the qualified project  sponsor in the eligible site preparation costs, including interest, established
under subsection (7) of this section has  been recovered, at which time the tax reimbursement ar-
rangement shall end; or
(b) Enter into a loan  agreement with the project sponsor under terms and conditions specified
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1442
HB 2663
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and required by the department. In making  a determination to enter into a loan agreement with the
project sponsor, the department  shall consider the reasonableness of the project sponsor’s estimated
costs to prepare the site for industrial use,  including but not limited to eligible site preparation
costs established by the department  pursuant to subsection (7) of this section. The agreement may
specify that a portion of the loan may be  forgiven if the project sponsor enters into a contract with
an eligible employer to conduct a business in the traded sector  industry on a regionally significant
industrial site within seven years after the project sponsor was qualified under this section.
(6)(a) The total amount of the loan that may be forgiven under subsection  (5) of this section is
the lesser of:
(A) Fifty percent of the total cost of eligible site preparation costs; or
(B) Fifty  percent of the amount of the estimated incremental income tax revenues for the eligible
employer for the term of the loan.
(b) Loan forgiveness may not be allowed under subsection (5) of this section if any  portion of
the loan that would not  be forgiven would be repaid by the project sponsor with state funds received
from any source.
(7) The department shall establish, by rule, eligible site preparation costs  including, but not
limited to, some or all of the following:
(a) Acquisition and assembly costs associated with creating large development parcels.
(b) Transportation improvements such as  access roads, intersections, turning lanes, signals,
sidewalks, curbs, transit stops and storm drains.
(c) Water and sewer infrastructure.
(d) Natural resource mitigation.
(e) Site grading activities.
(f) Environmental remediation and mitigation activities to address brownfields  issues in accord-
ance with state and federally approved remediation plans.
(g) Planning, engineering  and administrative costs associated with applying for necessary local,
state and federal permits.
(h) Interest-carrying costs incurred by a project sponsor for amounts borrowed to  develop a re-
gionally significant industrial  site, not to exceed 20 percent of the total amount forgiven, if any,
under subsection (5) of this section.
(8) The total amount of tax reimbursement arrangements and loan amounts authorized under this
section may not exceed $10 million per year.
(9) Funds received pursuant to a tax reimbursement arrangement or  a loan agreement under
subsection (5) of this section may not be used for the payment of:
(a) A penalty or fine; or
(b) Environmental remediation activities conducted at a regionally significant industrial site that
is listed or proposed to be listed as a national priority pursuant  to the Comprehensive Environ-
mental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980 (42  U.S.C. 9605) for which the project
sponsor, eligible employer or any  party to the tax reimbursement arrangement or loan agreement
is liable under 42 U.S.C. 9607 at that regionally significant industrial site.
(10) The department shall adopt rules  to administer and implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $50,000,000 for
deposit in the Oregon Industrial Site Readiness Program  Fund established under ORS
285B.632. The moneys may be used for any purpose for which moneys in the fund may be
[2]
HB 2663
1
2
3
4
5
used.
SECTION 3.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]