Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
ORS 179.478, 427.215, 427.235, 427.245, 427.255, 427.265, 427.270, 427.275, 427.280,
427.285, 427.290, 427.292, 427.293, 427.295, 427.300 and 427.306 are repealed.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “services” includes but is not limited to  hospital
services, psychiatric services, community-based services and residential services.
(2) A public body, as defined in ORS 174.109, may not deny  access to services provided to
individuals with mental illness on the basis that the individual  seeking the services also has
an intellectual disability.
SECTION 3.  ORS 21.010 is amended to read:
21.010. (1) Except as provided in this section, the appellant in an appeal or the petitioner in a
judicial review in the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals shall pay  a filing fee of $391 in the
manner prescribed by ORS 19.265. The respondent in such case and any other person  appearing in
the appeal,  upon entering first appearance or filing first brief in the court, shall pay to the State
Court Administrator a filing fee of $391. The  party entitled to costs and disbursements on such ap-
peal shall recover from the opponent the amount so paid.
(2) Filing and appearance fees may not be assessed in appeals from habeas corpus proceedings
under ORS 34.710, post-conviction relief  proceedings under ORS 138.650, juvenile court under ORS
419A.200, the involuntary commitment of  persons determined to be persons with mental illness under
ORS 426.135 [ or persons determined to have an intellectual disability under ORS 427.295 ] or orders
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 161
SB 129
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision or on judicial review of orders entered
under ORS 161.315 to 161.351 by the Psychiatric Security Review Board.
(3) Filing and appearance fees shall be assessed  in an appeal from an appeal to a circuit court
from a justice court  or municipal court in an action alleging commission of a state offense desig-
nated as a violation or an action alleging violation  of a city charter or ordinance, but not in an
action alleging commission of a state crime.
(4) Filing and appearance fees shall only be  assessed in an appeal in a contempt proceeding
seeking imposition of remedial sanctions under the provisions of ORS 33.055.
(5) The filing and appearance fees established by this section  apply to cases of original juris-
diction in the Supreme Court.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 109.322 is amended to read:
109.322. (1) If a parent has been adjudged to be a  person with mental illness under ORS 426.130
[or a person with an intellectual disability who is in need of commitment for residential care,  treatment
and training under ORS 427.290 ], and  remains so at the time of the adoption proceedings, or if a
parent is imprisoned in a state or federal prison under a sentence for a term of not less than three
years and has actually served three years, the  petitioner, in accordance with ORS 109.330, shall
serve on the parent, if the parent has not consented in  writing to the adoption, a summons and a
motion and order to  show cause why the adoption of the child should not be ordered without the
parent’s consent.
(2) In the case of a parent  adjudged to be a person with mental illness under ORS 426.130 [ or
a person with an intellectual disability who is in need  of commitment for residential care, treatment
and training under ORS 427.290 ], the petitioner shall also serve the summons and the  motion and
order to show cause upon the guardian of the parent. If  the parent has no guardian, the court shall
appoint a guardian ad litem to appear for the parent in the adoption proceedings.
(3) Upon hearing, except as provided in ORS 109.330 (8) if the child is an  Indian child, if the
court finds that the adoption is in the best interests of the child, the consent of  the parent who is
imprisoned or adjudged to be  a person with mental illness [ or an intellectual disability ] is not re-
quired, and the court may proceed regardless of the objection of the parent.
(4) This section does not apply when consent is given in loco parentis  under ORS 109.325 or
109.327.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 161.367 is amended to read:
161.367. (1) If at any time the court determines that the  defendant lacks fitness to proceed, the
court shall further determine whether there is a substantial probability that the defendant,  in the
foreseeable future, will gain or regain fitness to proceed. If the court determines that there is  no
substantial probability that the defendant,  in the foreseeable future, will gain or regain fitness to
proceed, the court shall dismiss, without  prejudice and in accordance with subsection (6) of this
section, all charges against the defendant and:
(a) Order that the defendant be discharged; or
(b) Initiate commitment proceedings under ORS 426.070[ ,] or  426.701 [ or 427.235 to 427.292 ].
(2)(a) The  superintendent of the hospital or director of the facility in which the defendant is
committed under ORS 161.370 or a person examining the defendant as a condition  of release to
community restoration  services shall notify the court if the defendant gains or regains fitness to
proceed.
(b) A party to the  case may notify the court if the defendant has gained or regained fitness to
proceed.
[2]
SB 129
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) The court may, upon  its own motion or the request of either party, hold a hearing to deter-
mine whether the defendant has gained or regained fitness to proceed.  If the court determines that
the defendant has gained or regained fitness to  proceed, the court shall resume the criminal pro-
ceeding unless the court  determines that so much time has elapsed since the commitment or release
of the defendant to community restoration services that it would be unjust to  resume the criminal
proceeding.  If  the court determines that it would be unjust to resume the criminal proceeding, the
court, on motion of either party, may dismiss the charge  in accordance with subsection (6) of this
section, and may order the defendant  to be discharged or cause a proceeding to be commenced
forthwith under ORS 426.070 to 426.170[ ,] or  426.701 [ or 427.235 to 427.292 ].
(3) If the defendant gains or regains fitness to proceed, the defendant  shall be given credit
against each charge alleged in the accusatory instrument for each day the defendant was  committed
under ORS 161.370 to the custody  of a state mental hospital, or to the custody of a secure intensive
community inpatient facility designated by the Oregon Health Authority.
(4) Notwithstanding  the suspension of the criminal proceeding under ORS 161.370 (2), the fact
that the defendant is unfit to proceed does not preclude any objection through counsel and  without
the personal participation of the defendant on  the grounds that the indictment is insufficient, that
the statute of limitations has run, that double jeopardy principles apply or  upon any other ground
at the discretion of the court which the court deems susceptible  of fair determination prior to trial.
(5) At the time  that the court determines that the defendant lacks fitness to proceed under ORS
161.370 (2), the court shall notify the defendant in writing that federal law prohibits the defendant
from purchasing or possessing a firearm unless the person obtains relief from the prohibition under
federal law. The court shall again  notify the defendant in writing of the prohibition if the court finds
that the defendant has gained or regained fitness to proceed under subsection (2) of this section.
(6) If the court intends to dismiss all charges involving orders of  commitment against a defend-
ant who is committed to  and currently located at a state mental hospital or other facility, the court
shall order that the defendant  be immediately transported back to the jurisdiction in which the
charges were initiated, and the dismissal shall take effect only upon  the defendant’s arrival in that
jurisdiction.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 161.370 is amended to read:
161.370. (1)(a) When the defendant’s fitness to  proceed is drawn in question, the issue shall be
determined by the court.
(b) If neither the prosecuting attorney nor counsel for the defendant contests the finding of the
report filed under  ORS 161.365, the court may make the determination on the basis of the report.
If the finding  is contested, the court shall hold a hearing on the issue. If the report is received in
evidence in the hearing, the party who contests the finding has the right to summon and to  cross-
examine any certified evaluator who submitted the  report and to offer evidence upon the issue.
Other evidence regarding the defendant’s fitness to proceed may be introduced by either party.
(2)(a) If the court determines that the defendant lacks fitness to proceed, the criminal proceeding
against the defendant shall be suspended and the court shall proceed  in accordance with this sub-
section.
(b) After making the determination under  paragraph (a) of this subsection, the court shall re-
ceive a recommendation from a community mental health program  director or the director’s
designee, and from any local entity that would  be responsible for treating the defendant if the de-
fendant were to be released  in the community, concerning whether appropriate community restora-
tion services are present and available in the community.
[3]
SB 129
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) If the parties agree as to the appropriate action  under this section, the court may, after
making all findings required by law, enter any order authorized by this section. If the parties  do not
agree as to the appropriate action,  the court and the parties shall, at a hearing, consider an ap-
propriate action in the case, and the court shall make a determination and enter  an order necessary
to implement  the action. In determining the appropriate action, the court shall consider the primary
and secondary release criteria as defined in ORS 135.230, the least restrictive  option appropriate for
the defendant, the needs of the defendant and the interests of justice. Actions  may include but are
not limited to:
(A) Commitment for the defendant to gain or regain fitness to proceed  under subsection (3) or
(4) of this section;
(B) An order to engage in community restoration services,  as recommended by the community
mental health program director or designee, under subsection (6) of this section;
(C) Commencement of a civil commitment  proceeding under ORS 426.070 to 426.170[ ,] or 426.701
[or 427.235 to 427.292 ];
(D) Commencement of protective proceedings under ORS chapter 125; or
(E) Dismissal of the charges pursuant to ORS 135.755 and in accordance with ORS 161.367 (6).
(d) If the court, while considering or ordering an appropriate  action under this subsection, does
not order the defendant  committed to a state mental hospital or other facility, but finds that ap-
propriate community restoration services are not present and available in the community,  for any
defendant remaining in custody  after such determination, the court shall set a review hearing seven
days from the date of the determination under  paragraph (a) of this subsection. At the review
hearing, the court shall  consider all relevant information and determine if commitment to the state
mental hospital or other facility is appropriate under subsection (3) or (4) of this section,  or if an-
other action described in paragraph (c) of this subsection is appropriate. At the  conclusion of the
hearing the  court shall enter an order in accordance with the defendant’s constitutional rights to
due process.
(e) If the court determines that the appropriate action in the case is  an order for the defendant
to engage in community restoration  services, but the defendant has a pending criminal case, warrant
or hold in one or more other jurisdictions,  the other jurisdictions shall, within two judicial days of
becoming aware of the proceeding under this section, communicate with the court and the  other
jurisdictions, if applicable, to develop a plan  to address the interests of all jurisdictions in the de-
fendant in a timely manner.
(3)(a) If the most serious offense in the charging instrument  is a felony, the court shall commit
the defendant to the custody of the superintendent of a state  mental hospital or director of a facility
designated by the Oregon Health Authority if the defendant is at least 18 years of age, or to the
custody of the director of a secure intensive community inpatient facility designated by the  author-
ity if the defendant is under 18 years of age, if the court makes the following findings:
(A) The defendant requires a  hospital level of care due to public safety concerns if the defendant
is not hospitalized or in custody or the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying  mental
disorder; and
(B) Based on the findings resulting from a consultation described in ORS 161.365 (1),  if applica-
ble, from any information provided by community-based mental health providers or any other
sources, and primary and secondary release criteria as defined in ORS 135.230, the appropriate
community restoration services are not present and available in the community.
(b) If the defendant is committed under this  subsection, the community mental health program
[4]
SB 129
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
director, or director’s designee, shall at regular intervals, during any period of commitment,  review
available  community  restoration services and maintain communication with the defendant and the
superintendent of the state mental hospital or director of the  facility in order to facilitate an effi-
cient transition to treatment in the community when ordered.
(c) If the  court does not order the commitment of the defendant under this subsection, the court
shall proceed in accordance with subsection (2)(c) of this section to determine  and order an appro-
priate action other than commitment.
(4)(a) If the most serious offense in the charging instrument is a  misdemeanor, the court may
not commit the defendant to the custody of the superintendent of a state mental hospital or  director
of a facility designated by the Oregon Health Authority if the defendant is at least  18 years of age,
or to the  custody of the director of a secure intensive community inpatient facility designated by
the authority if the defendant is under 18 years of age, unless the court:
(A)(i) Receives a recommendation from a certified evaluator that the defendant requires a  hos-
pital level of care due to the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental disorder; and
(ii) Receives a recommendation from a community mental health program director,  or director’s
designee, that the appropriate community restoration services are not present and available in  the
community; or
(B) Determines that the defendant requires a hospital level of care after making  all of the fol-
lowing written findings:
(i) The defendant needs a hospital level of care due to the acuity of  the symptoms of the
defendant’s qualifying mental disorder;
(ii) There are public safety concerns; and
(iii) The appropriate community restoration services are not present  and available in the com-
munity.
(b) If at the time of determining the  appropriate action for the case, the court is considering
commitment under paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection and:
(A) Has not received a recommendation from a  certified evaluator as to whether the defendant
requires a hospital level of care due to the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying mental
disorder, the court shall order a certified evaluator to make such a recommendation.
(B) Has not  received a recommendation from the community mental health program director or
designee concerning whether appropriate  community restoration services are present and available
in the community, the court shall order the director or designee to make such a recommendation.
(c) If the  court does not order the commitment of the defendant under this subsection, the court
shall proceed in accordance with subsection (2)(c) of this section to determine  and order an appro-
priate action other than commitment.
(d) If the defendant is committed under  this subsection, the community mental health program
director,  or  director’s designee, shall at regular intervals, during any period of commitment, review
available community restoration services and maintain communication with the defendant and  the
superintendent of the state mental hospital or director  of the facility in order to facilitate an effi-
cient transition to treatment in the community when ordered.
(5) If the most serious offense in the charging  instrument is a violation, the court may not
commit the defendant to  the custody of the superintendent of a state mental hospital or director of
a facility designated by the Oregon Health Authority if the defendant is at least 18 years  of age,
or to the  custody of the director of a secure intensive community inpatient facility designated by
the authority if the defendant is under 18 years of age.
[5]
SB 129
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6)(a) If  the court does not order the commitment of the defendant under subsection (3) or (4)
of this section,  if commitment is precluded under subsection (5) of this section or if the court de-
termines that care other than commitment would better serve the defendant and the community, the
court shall release the defendant, pursuant  to an order that the defendant engage in community
restoration services, until the defendant has gained or regained  fitness to proceed, or until the court
finds there is no substantial probability that the defendant will, within  the foreseeable future, gain
or regain fitness to proceed. The court may not order the defendant  to engage in community resto-
ration services in another county without permission from the other county.
(b) The court may order a community mental health  program director coordinating the
defendant’s treatment in the community to provide the court with status reports on  the defendant’s
progress in gaining or regaining fitness to proceed. The director shall  provide a status report if the
defendant is not complying with court-ordered restoration services.
(c) A community mental health program director coordinating the defendant’s treatment in the
community shall notify  the court if the defendant gains or regains fitness to proceed. The notice
shall be filed with the court and may be filed electronically. The clerk of  the court shall cause
copies of the notice to be delivered to both the district attorney and the counsel for the defendant.
(d) When a defendant is  ordered to engage in community restoration services under this sub-
section, the court  may place conditions that the court deems appropriate on the release, including
the requirement that the defendant regularly report  to a state mental hospital or a certified evalu-
ator for examination to determine if the defendant has gained or regained fitness to proceed.
(7) The Oregon Health Authority  shall establish by rule standards for the recommendation pro-
vided to the court described in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 161.371 is amended to read:
161.371. (1) The superintendent of a  state mental hospital or director of a facility to which the
defendant is committed under ORS 161.370 shall  cause the defendant to be evaluated within 60 days
from the defendant’s delivery into the superintendent’s or director’s custody,  for the purpose of de-
termining whether there is a substantial probability that,  in the foreseeable future, the defendant
will have fitness to proceed. In addition, the superintendent or director shall:
(a) Immediately notify the committing court if the  defendant, at any time, gains or regains fit-
ness to proceed  or if there is no substantial probability that, within the foreseeable future, the de-
fendant will gain or regain fitness to proceed.
(b) Within 90 days of the defendant’s delivery into the superintendent’s or  director’s custody,
notify the committing court that:
(A) The defendant has present fitness to proceed;
(B) There is no substantial probability that, in the foreseeable future,  the defendant will gain
or regain fitness to proceed; or
(C) There is a substantial probability that,  in the foreseeable future, the defendant will gain or
regain fitness  to proceed. If the probability exists, the superintendent or director shall give the court
an estimate  of the time in which the defendant, with appropriate treatment, is expected to gain or
regain fitness to proceed.
(c) Notify the court if court-ordered involuntary medication is necessary for  the defendant to
gain or regain  fitness to proceed and, if appropriate, submit a report to the court under ORS 161.372.
(2)(a) If  the superintendent of the state mental hospital or director of the facility to which the
defendant is committed  determines that there is a substantial probability that, in the foreseeable
future, the defendant will gain or regain fitness to proceed, unless the  court otherwise orders, the
[6]
SB 129
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
defendant shall  remain in the superintendent’s or director’s custody where the defendant shall re-
ceive treatment designed for the purpose of enabling the defendant to gain or regain fitness to pro-
ceed. In keeping with the notice requirement under  subsection (1)(b) of this section, the
superintendent or  director shall, for the duration of the defendant’s period of commitment, submit
a progress report to the committing court, concerning  the defendant’s fitness to proceed, at least
once every 180 days as  measured from the date of the defendant’s delivery into the superintendent’s
or director’s custody.
(b) A progress report described in paragraph (a) of this subsection may consist of an update  to:
(A) The original examination report conducted under ORS 161.365; or
(B) An evaluation conducted under subsection (1)  of this section, if the defendant did not receive
an examination under ORS 161.365.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this  section, if the most serious offense in the charging
instrument is  a felony, and the superintendent of the state mental hospital or director of the facility
to which the defendant is committed determines that a hospital level of  care is no longer necessary
due to present public safety concerns and the acuity of symptoms of the  defendant’s qualifying
mental disorder, the superintendent or director may file notice of the determination with the court.
Upon receipt of the notice, the court shall  order that a community mental health program director
or the director’s designee, within five judicial days:
(A) Consult with the defendant and with any  local entity that would be responsible for providing
community restoration services, if the defendant were to be released in  the community, to determine
whether community restoration services are present and available in the community; and
(B) Provide the court and the parties with recommendations from the consultation.
(b) Notwithstanding  subsection (2) of this section, if the most serious offense in the charging
instrument is a felony, and the community mental health program  director determines that commu-
nity restoration  services that would mitigate any risk posed by the defendant are present and
available in the  community, the community mental health program director may file notice of the
determination with the court. Upon receipt of the notice, the court shall  order that the superinten-
dent of the state mental hospital or director of the facility to which the defendant  is committed,
within five judicial days:
(A) Evaluate the defendant to determine  whether a hospital level of care is no longer necessary
due to present public safety concerns, or no longer necessary due to the acuity  of symptoms of the
defendant’s qualifying mental disorder; and
(B) Provide the court and the parties with recommendations from the evaluation.
(c) Within 10 judicial days of receiving the recommendations  described in paragraph (a) or (b)
of this subsection, the court shall hold a hearing to determine  an appropriate action in accordance
with ORS 161.370 (2)(c) as follows:
(A) If, after consideration of the factors and possible actions described in ORS 161.370 (2)(c) and
any recommendations  received under paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection, the court determines
that a hospital level of care is necessary due to  public safety concerns or the acuity of symptoms
of the defendant’s qualifying  mental disorder, and that based on the consultation or evaluation de-
scribed in paragraph (a) or (b) of  this subsection, any information provided by community-based
mental health providers or any other sources, primary and secondary  release criteria as defined in
ORS 135.230, and  any other information the court finds to be trustworthy and reliable, the appro-
priate community restoration services  are not present and available in the community, the court
may continue the commitment of the defendant.
[7]
SB 129
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) If the  court does not make the determination described in subparagraph (A) of this para-
graph, the court shall terminate the commitment and shall set a review hearing seven days  from the
date of the commitment termination for any defendant remaining in  custody. At the review hearing,
the court shall consider all  relevant information, determine an appropriate action in the case as
described in ORS 161.370 (2)(c) and enter an order in accordance with the defendant’s constitutional
rights to due process.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, if the most  serious offense in the charging
instrument is a misdemeanor, and the superintendent of the state mental hospital or director of  the
facility to which the defendant is committed  determines that the defendant no longer needs a hos-
pital level of care due to the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s qualifying  mental disorder or
there are not present public safety concerns, the superintendent or director shall  file notice of the
determination with the court, along  with recommendations regarding the necessary community res-
toration  services  that would mitigate any risk presented by the defendant. Upon receipt of the no-
tice, the court shall order that a community  mental health program director or the director’s
designee, within five judicial days:
(A) Consult with the defendant and with any  local entity that would be responsible for providing
community restoration services, if the defendant were to be released in  the community, to determine
whether appropriate community restoration services are  present and available in the community;
and
(B) Provide the court and the parties with recommendations from the consultation.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, if the most serious offense in the  charging
instrument is a misdemeanor, and the community  mental health program director determines that
the community restoration  services that would mitigate any risk posed by the defendant are present
and available in the community, the community mental health program director  may file notice of
the determination with the court. Upon receipt of the notice, the court shall order  that the super-
intendent of the state mental  hospital or director of the facility to which the defendant is committed,
within five judicial days:
(A) Evaluate the defendant to determine  whether a hospital level of care is no longer necessary
due to present public safety  concerns, or no longer necessary due to the acuity of symptoms of the
defendant’s qualifying mental disorder; and
(B) Provide the court and the parties with recommendations from the evaluation.
(c) Within 10 judicial days of receiving  the recommendations described in paragraph (a) or (b)
of this subsection, the court shall  hold a hearing to determine an appropriate action in accordance
with ORS 161.370 (2)(c) as follows:
(A) After consideration of the factors and possible actions described  in ORS 161.370 (2)(c), the
consultation or evaluation and any recommendations described in paragraph (a) or  (b) of this sub-
section, and any other information the court finds to be trustworthy and reliable, the  court may
continue the commitment of the defendant if the court makes written findings  that a hospital level
of care is necessary due to public safety  concerns and the acuity of symptoms of the defendant’s
qualifying mental disorder, and that appropriate community restoration services are not present  and
available in the community.
(B) If the court does not  make the findings described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the
court shall terminate the commitment and shall set a review hearing seven days from the  date of
the commitment  termination for any defendant remaining in custody. At the review hearing, the
court shall consider all relevant information, determine an appropriate action  in the case as de-
[8]
SB 129
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
scribed in ORS 161.370 (2)(c) and enter an order in  accordance with the defendant’s constitutional
rights to due process.
(5)(a) If a defendant remains committed under this section, the court shall determine within a
reasonable period of time whether there  is a substantial probability that, in the foreseeable future,
the defendant will gain or regain fitness to proceed. However,  regardless of the number of charges
with which the defendant is accused, in  no event shall the defendant be committed for longer than
whichever of the following, measured from the defendant’s initial custody date, is shorter:
(A) Three years; or
(B) A period of time equal to the maximum sentence the  court could have imposed if the de-
fendant had been convicted.
(b) For purposes of calculating the  maximum period of commitment described in paragraph (a)
of this subsection:
(A) The initial custody date is the date on which the  defendant is first committed under this
section on any charge alleged in the accusatory instrument; and
(B) The defendant shall be given credit against each  charge alleged in the accusatory instru-
ment:
(i) For  each day the defendant is committed under this section, whether the days are consecutive
or are interrupted by a period of time during which the defendant has  gained or regained fitness to
proceed;  and
(ii) Unless  the defendant is charged on any charging instrument with aggravated murder or a
crime listed in ORS 137.700 (2), for each day  the defendant is held in jail before and after the date
the defendant is first committed,  whether the days are consecutive or are interrupted by a period
of time during which the defendant lacks fitness to proceed.
(c) The superintendent of the state mental hospital or  director of the facility to which the de-
fendant is committed shall  notify the committing court of the defendant’s impending discharge 30
days before the date on which the  superintendent or director is required to discharge the defendant
under this subsection.
(6)(a) All notices required under this section shall  be filed with the court and may be filed
electronically. The clerk of the court shall cause copies of the notices  to be delivered to both the
district attorney and the counsel for the defendant.
(b) When the committing court receives a notice from the superintendent or director  under
subsection (1) of this section concerning the defendant’s progress or lack  thereof, or under sub-
section (5) of this section  concerning the defendant’s impending discharge, the committing court
shall determine, after a hearing if a hearing is requested,  whether the defendant presently has fit-
ness to proceed.
(7) If at any time the court determines that the  defendant lacks fitness to proceed, the court
shall further determine whether the defendant  is entitled to discharge under subsection (5) of this
section. If the court determines that the defendant is entitled  to discharge under subsection (5) of
this section,  the court shall dismiss, without prejudice and in accordance with ORS 161.367 (6), all
charges against the defendant and:
(a) Order that the defendant be discharged; or
(b) Initiate commitment proceedings under ORS 426.070[ ,] or  426.701 [ or 427.235 to 427.292 ].
SECTION 8.
 ORS 166.273 is amended to read:
166.273. (1) A person barred from transporting, shipping,  possessing or receiving a firearm may
file a petition with the Psychiatric Security Review Board for relief from the bar if:
[9]
SB 129
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The person is barred from possessing a firearm under ORS 166.250 (1)(c)(D) or (E);
(b) The person is barred from receiving a  firearm under ORS 166.470 (1)(e) or (f) or, if the person
has been found guilty except for  insanity of a misdemeanor involving violence, ORS 166.470 (1)(g);
or
(c) The person is barred from possessing, receiving, shipping or  transporting a firearm under 18
U.S.C. 922(d)(4) or (g)(4) as the result of a state mental health determination.
(2) The petitioner shall serve a copy of the petition on:
(a) The [ Department of Human Services and the ] Oregon Health Authority; and
(b) The district attorney in each county in which:
(A) The person was committed by a  court to the Oregon Health Authority, or adjudicated by a
court as a person with mental illness, under ORS 426.130;
[(B) The person was committed  by a court to the Department of Human Services, or adjudicated
by a court as in need of commitment for residential care, treatment and training, under  ORS
427.290;]
[(C)] (B)  The person was found guilty except for insanity under ORS 161.295;
[(D)] (C) The person was found responsible except for insanity under ORS 419C.411; or
[(E)] (D)  The person was found by a court to lack fitness to proceed under ORS 161.370.
(3) Following receipt of the petition, the board shall conduct a contested case hearing, make
written findings of fact and conclusions  of law on the issues before the board and issue a final order.
Board members from the adult panel,  the juvenile panel or a combination of both panels of the board
may conduct the hearings described in this section.
(4) The state and any person or entity described in  subsection (2) of this section may appear and
object to and present evidence relevant to the relief sought by the petitioner.
(5) The board shall grant the relief requested in  the petition if the petitioner demonstrates,
based on  the petitioner’s reputation, the petitioner’s record, the circumstances surrounding the
firearm disability and any other evidence in the record, that the petitioner will not be likely to act
in a manner that is dangerous to public safety and  that granting the relief would not be contrary
to the public interest.
(6) If the board  grants the relief requested in the petition, the board shall provide to the De-
partment of State Police the minimum information necessary, as defined  in ORS 181A.290, to enable
the department to:
(a) Maintain the information and transmit the information to  the federal government as required
under federal law; and
(b) Maintain a record of the  person’s relief from the disqualification to possess or receive a
firearm under ORS 166.250 (1)(c)(D) or (E) or 166.470 (1)(e), (f) or (g).
(7) The petitioner may petition for judicial review of a final order of the  board. The petition
shall be  filed in the circuit court of a county described in subsection (2)(b) of this section. The re-
view shall be conducted de novo and without a jury.
(8) A petitioner may take an appeal from the circuit court to the Court of  Appeals. Review by
the Court of Appeals shall be conducted in accordance with ORS 183.500.
(9) A person may file a petition for relief under this section no more than once every two  years.
(10) The board shall adopt procedural rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
(11) As used in this section, “state mental health determination” means:
(a) A finding by a court that a person lacks fitness to proceed under ORS 161.370;
(b) A finding that a person  is guilty except for insanity of a crime under ORS 161.295 or re-
[10]
SB 129
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sponsible except for insanity of an act under  ORS 419C.411 or any determination by the Psychiatric
Security Review Board thereafter;  or
(c) A commitment by a court to the Oregon  Health Authority, or an adjudication by a court that
a person is a person with mental illness, under ORS 426.130 .[; or ]
[(d) A commitment by a court to  the Department of Human Services, or an adjudication by a court
that a person is in  need  of commitment for residential care, treatment and training, under  ORS
427.290.]
SECTION 9.
 ORS 179.325 is amended to read:
179.325. [(1) The Department of Human Services may order the change,  in all or part, of the pur-
pose and use of any state institution being used as  an institution for the care and treatment of persons
with developmental disabilities in  order to care for persons committed to its custody whenever the de-
partment determines that a change in purpose and use will better enable this  state to meet its respon-
sibilities to persons with developmental disabilities. In determining  whether to order the change, the
department shall consider changes in the number and source of the admissions  of persons with devel-
opmental disabilities. ]
[(2)] The Oregon Health Authority may order the change, in all or part, of the purpose and  use
of any state institution being used as an institution for the care and treatment of  persons with
mental illness in  order to care for persons committed to its custody whenever the authority deter-
mines that a  change in purpose and use will better enable this state to meet its responsibilities to
persons with mental illness. In determining  whether to order the change, the authority shall con-
sider changes in the number and source of the admissions of persons with mental illness.
SECTION 10.  ORS 179.471 is amended to read:
179.471. As used in ORS 179.473 [ and 179.478], unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Adjudicated youth” has the meaning given that term in ORS 419A.004.
(2) “Youth correction facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 420.005.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 179.485 is amended to read:
179.485. Persons transferred to a state institution for persons with  mental illness [ or intellectual
disabilities] under ORS 179.473[ , 179.478] and 420.505 shall be entitled  to the same legal rights as
any other persons admitted to those institutions.
SECTION 12.  ORS 179.492 is amended to read:
179.492. (1) The Department of Corrections[ , the Department of Human Services ] or the Oregon
Health Authority shall dispense as written a prescription for a brand-name mental  health drug pre-
scribed for a person while the person is in the  custody of an institution described in ORS 179.321
[or who has been committed pursuant to ORS 427.235 to 427.292, ] if the prescription  specifies “dis-
pense as written” or contains the notation “D.A.W.” or other words of similar meaning.
(2) If, at the  time of commitment to the custody of an institution described in ORS 179.321 [ or
to the custody of the Department of Human Services under ORS 427.290 ], a person has a prescription
for a specified brand-name mental health drug and the  prescription specifies “dispense as written”
or contains the notation “D.A.W.” or other words  of similar meaning, the Department of
Corrections[ , the Department of Human Services ] or the Oregon Health Authority shall  ensure that
the person is prescribed the specified brand-name  drug until a licensed health professional with
prescriptive privileges evaluates  the person and becomes responsible for the treatment of the person.
SECTION 13.  ORS 181A.290 is amended to read:
181A.290. (1) The [ Department of Human Services,  the] Oregon Health Authority, the Psychiatric
Security Review Board and the Judicial Department shall provide the Department  of State Police
[11]
SB 129
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
with the minimum information necessary to identify persons who:
(a) Have been committed by a court to  the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 426.130, based
on a finding that the person is dangerous to self or others;
(b) Are subject to a court order under ORS 426.130 or  426.133 prohibiting the person from pur-
chasing or possessing a firearm;
[(c) Have been committed by a court to the Department of Human Services under  ORS 427.290,
based on a finding that the person is dangerous to self or others; ]
[(d)] (c)  Have been found by a court to lack fitness to proceed under ORS 161.370;
[(e)] (d) Have been found guilty except for insanity of a crime under ORS 161.290 to 161.373;
[(f)] (e)  Have been found responsible except for insanity for an act under ORS 419C.411;
[(g)] (f)  Have been placed under the jurisdiction of the Psychiatric  Security Review Board under
ORS 161.315 to 161.351; or
[(h)] (g)  Have been committed to a state hospital  or facility under ORS 161.315 to 161.351 or
419C.529 to 419C.544.
(2) Upon receipt of  the information described in this section, the Department of State Police
shall access and maintain  the information and transmit the information to the federal government
as required under federal law.
(3) The [ Department of Human Services, the ] Oregon Health Authority,  the Psychiatric Security
Review Board and the Judicial Department shall enter into agreements with the Department of State
Police describing the access to information provided under this section.
(4) The Department of State Police shall adopt rules:
(a) After consulting with the [ Department of Human Services, the ] Oregon Health Authority,  the
Psychiatric Security Review Board and the Judicial Department, describing the  type of information
provided to the Department of State Police under this section; and
(b) Describing the method and manner of maintaining the information described in this  section
and transmitting the information to the federal government.
(5) As used in this section, “minimum  information necessary” means data elements or nominal
information that is necessary or  required under federal law to accurately identify a person described
in this section and includes the person’s name, date of birth, gender and reference information that
identifies the originating agency or court and enables the originating agency  or court to locate an
underlying record or  file of a person described in this section. “Minimum information necessary”
does not include any medical, psychiatric or psychological information, case histories  or files of a
person described in this section or any record or file of an originating agency or court.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 426.005 is amended to read:
426.005. (1) As used in ORS 426.005 to 426.390, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) “Community  mental health program director” means the director of an entity that provides
the services described in ORS 430.630 (3) to (5).
(b) “Director of the facility” means a superintendent of a state mental  hospital, the chief of
psychiatric services in a community hospital or the person in charge of treatment  and rehabilitation
programs at other treatment facilities.
(c) “Facility” means a state  mental hospital, community hospital, residential facility,
detoxification center, day treatment facility or such other facility as  the authority determines suit-
able that provides diagnosis and evaluation, medical  care, detoxification, social services or rehabil-
itation to persons who are in custody during a prehearing period of detention or  who have been
committed to the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 426.130.
[12]
SB 129
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) “Licensed independent practitioner” means:
(A) A physician, as defined in ORS 677.010;
(B) A nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 and  authorized to write prescriptions under
ORS 678.390; or
(C) A naturopathic physician licensed under ORS chapter 685.
(e) “Nonhospital facility” means any facility, other than  a hospital, that is approved by the au-
thority to provide adequate security, psychiatric, nursing and other services  to persons under ORS
426.232 or 426.233.
(f) “Person with mental illness” means a  person who, because of a mental disorder, is one or
more of the following:
(A) Dangerous to self or others.
(B) Unable to provide  for basic personal needs that are necessary to avoid serious physical harm
in the near future, and is not receiving such care as is necessary to avoid such harm.
(C) A person:
(i) With a chronic mental illness, as defined in ORS 426.495;
(ii) Who, within  the previous three years, has twice been placed in a hospital or approved in-
patient facility by the authority [ or the Department of Human Services ] under ORS 426.060;
(iii) Who is exhibiting symptoms or behavior substantially similar to  those that preceded and led
to one or more of the hospitalizations or inpatient placements referred to  in sub-subparagraph (ii)
of this subparagraph; and
(iv) Who, unless treated, will continue, to a reasonable  medical probability, to physically or
mentally deteriorate so that  the person will become a person described under either subparagraph
(A) or (B) of this paragraph or both.
(g) “Prehearing period of detention” means a period of time calculated from  the initiation of
custody during which a person may be detained under ORS 426.228, 426.231, 426.232 or 426.233.
(2) Whenever a  community mental health program director, director of the facility, superinten-
dent of a state hospital or administrator  of a facility is referred to  in ORS 426.005 to 426.390 , the
reference includes any designee such person has designated to act on the person’s behalf in the ex-
ercise of duties.
(3) A person with mental illness may be a person with a mental illness who also has  an
intellectual or developmental disability, but an intellectual or developmental  disability is not
a mental disorder as used in subsection (1)(f) of this section.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 427.101 is amended to read:
427.101. As used in this section and ORS 427.115, 427.121, 427.154, [ 427.215,] 430.662 and 430.664:
(1) “Community living setting” means:
(a) A residential setting;
(b) An individual’s home or the home of the individual’s family; or
(c) Other nonresidential setting.
(2) “Developmental disability  services” means the following services as provided for individuals
with intellectual or developmental disabilities:
(a) Services designed to develop or maintain the individual’s skills in the following areas:
(A) Eating, bathing, dressing, personal hygiene, mobility and other personal needs;
(B) Self-awareness and self-control, social responsiveness,  social amenities, interpersonal skills,
interpersonal relationships and social connections;
(C) Community participation, recreation and the ability to use available community services,
[13]
SB 129
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
facilities or businesses;
(D) Expressive and receptive skills in verbal and  nonverbal language, the functional application
of acquired reading and writing skills and other communication needs; and
(E) Planning and preparing meals, budgeting, laundering, housecleaning and other  personal en-
vironmental needs;
(b) Case management;
(c) Services described in ORS 430.215;
(d) Employment services;
(e) Environmental accessibility adaptations;
(f) Specialized supports; and
(g) Specialized medical equipment and supplies.
(3) “Employment services” means services provided to develop  or maintain the skills necessary
for an individual to obtain and retain employment, including  job assessment, job exploration, job
development, job training, job coaching, work skills, and ongoing supports.
(4) “Environmental accessibility adaptations” means physical modifications  to an individual’s
home that are necessary  to ensure the health, welfare and safety of the individual in the home, or
that enable the individual to function with greater independence in the home.
(5) “Individualized service plan” means  a plan described in ORS 427.107 (2)(i), (j) and (k) that
identifies the resources,  services and purchases necessary for an individual with a developmental
disability to achieve identified personal goals and maximize self-determination.
(6) “Person-centered  planning” means an informal or formal process for gathering and organizing
information that helps an individual to:
(a) Enhance self-determination by choosing personal goals and lifestyle preferences;
(b) Design strategies and networks of support to achieve personal goals and a  preferred lifestyle
using individual strengths, relationships and resources; and
(c) Identify, use and strengthen naturally occurring opportunities for support in  the home and
in the community.
(7) “Residential setting” means one of the following community living settings licensed or  regu-
lated by the Department of Human Services:
(a) Residential facilities licensed under ORS 443.400 to 443.455;
(b) Licensed adult foster homes, as defined in ORS 443.705;
(c) Developmental disability child foster homes certified under ORS 443.835;
(d) Group homes; and
(e) Supported living programs.
(8) “Self-determination” means empowering individuals to:
(a) Make their own choices and decisions;
(b) Select and plan, together with freely chosen  family members and friends, the developmental
disability services  that are necessary for an individual to live, work and recreate in the setting that
the individual chooses and in the community;
(c) Control, or have input regarding,  the manner in which resources are used to obtain needed
services and supports, with the help of a social support network if needed;
(d) Live an autonomous life in the community, rich in community affiliations, through  formal or
informal arrangements of resources  and personnel and contribute to their community in the ways
they choose;
(e) Have a valued role in the community through  competitive employment, organizational affil-
[14]
SB 129
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
iations, personal development and general  caring for others in the community, and to be accountable
for spending public dollars in ways that are life-enhancing for the individual; and
(f) Speak or act on their own behalf or on behalf of others,  including participating in policy-
making and legislative processes.
(9) “Service provider” means any person  who is paid a service rate by the department to provide
one or  more of the services identified in the individualized service plan of an individual with an
intellectual or developmental disability regardless of where the service is provided.
(10) “Service rate” means the amount of reimbursement paid to a  service provider to care for
an individual with an intellectual or developmental disability.
(11)(a) “Specialized medical equipment and supplies” means:
(A) Devices, aids, controls, supplies or appliances that enable individuals:
(i) To increase their ability to perform activities of daily living; or
(ii) To perceive, control or communicate with the environment in which they live;
(B) Items necessary for life support, including ancillary supplies and equipment necessary to the
proper functioning of these items; and
(C) Medical equipment not available in the medical assistance program.
(b) “Specialized  medical equipment and supplies” does not include items that have no direct
medical or remedial benefit to the individual.
(12) “Specialized supports” means treatment, training, consultation or  other unique services that
are not available through the medical  assistance program but are necessary to achieve the goals
identified in the  individualized service plan, or other developmental disability services prescribed
by the department by rule.
(13) “Support service  brokerage” means an entity that contracts with the department to provide
or to arrange for developmental disability services.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 428.210 is amended to read:
428.210. As used in ORS 428.210 to 428.270:
(1) “Authority” means the Oregon Health Authority.
[(2) “Department” means the Department of Human Services. ]
[(3) “Facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 427.005. ]
[(4)] (2)  “Foreign hospital” means an institution in any other state that corresponds to a  state
hospital.
[(5)] (3) “Nonresident” means any person who is not a resident of this state.
[(6)] (4)  “Other state” includes all the states, territories, possessions, commonwealths and
agencies of the United States and the District of Columbia, with the exception of  the State of
Oregon.
[(7)] (5)  “Patient” means any person who has been  committed by a court of competent jurisdic-
tion to a [ facility pursuant  to ORS 427.235 to 427.292 or to a ] state hospital, except a person com-
mitted to a state hospital pursuant to ORS 161.341 or 161.370.
[(8)] (6)  “Resident of this state” means a person who resides in this state and who has not  ac-
quired legal residence in  any other state. However, a service man or woman on active duty in the
Armed Forces of the United States who was domiciled in  Oregon upon entry into active duty and
who has acquired no other domicile shall be entitled to have his or her child considered  a resident
of this state so long as no other domicile is acquired by the service man or woman.
[(9)] (7) “State hospital” means any institution listed in ORS 426.010.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 428.220 is amended to read:
[15]
SB 129
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
428.220. (1) In  determining whether or not any person committed by a court of competent juris-
diction to a state hospital[ ,] or  foreign hospital [ or facility ] is a resident of this state:
(a) The time spent in a state hospital or foreign hospital or on parole from a state hospital or
foreign hospital[ , or in  a facility ] shall not be counted in determining the residence of such person
in this or any other state.
(b) The residence of such  person at the time of commitment shall remain the residence of the
person for the duration of the commitment of the person.
[(2) The Department of Human Services may give written authorization  for the admission to a fa-
cility whenever: ]
[(a) The residence of any person cannot be established after reasonable and diligent  investigation
and effort.]
[(b) The peculiar circumstances of a case,  in the judgment of the department, provide a sufficient
reason for the suspension of the residence requirement provided by ORS 428.210 (8). ]
[(3)] (2)  The Oregon Health Authority may give written authorization for  the admission to the
Oregon State Hospital whenever:
(a) The residence of any person cannot  be established after reasonable and diligent investigation
and effort.
(b) The peculiar circumstances of a case, in the judgment of the authority,  provide a sufficient
reason for the suspension of the residence requirement provided by ORS 428.210 [ (8)] (6).
SECTION 18.
 ORS 428.230 is amended to read:
428.230. (1) Except as provided in ORS 428.205, 428.220 and 428.330, the [ Department of Human
Services and the ] Oregon Health Authority shall return nonresident patients to any other state  in
which they may have legal residence.
[(2) The department may give written  authorization for the return to a facility of a resident of
Oregon who has been committed by a court of competent jurisdiction to a foreign hospital. ]
[(3) The facility  shall admit and care for any person eligible for admission pursuant to subsection
(2) of this section or ORS 428.220 (2) upon receipt of a certified copy of the commitment papers and  the
written authorization of the department. ]
[(4)] (2)  The authority may give written authorization for the  return to the Oregon State Hos-
pital of a resident of Oregon who has  been committed by a court of competent jurisdiction to a
foreign hospital.
[(5)] (3)  The  superintendent of the Oregon State Hospital shall admit and care for any person
eligible for admission pursuant to subsection [ (4)] (2)  of this section or ORS 428.220  [ (3)] (2) upon
receipt of a certified copy of the commitment papers and  the written authorization of the authority.
SECTION 19.  ORS 428.240 is amended to read:
428.240. [ (1) For the purpose of facilitating the return of nonresident patients, the Department of
Human Services may enter into a reciprocal agreement with any other  state for the mutual exchange
of persons committed by a court  of competent jurisdiction to a facility pursuant to ORS 427.235 to
427.292 or to a foreign hospital, whose legal residence is in the other’s jurisdiction. ]
[(2)] (1)  For the purpose of facilitating the return of  nonresident patients, the Oregon Health
Authority may enter into a reciprocal agreement with  any other state for the mutual exchange of
persons committed by a court of competent jurisdiction to the Oregon State Hospital  or a foreign
hospital, whose legal residence is in the other’s jurisdiction.
[(3)] (2) In such agreements, the [ department or ] authority may:
(a) Only for purposes of mutual exchange with the other state,  vary the period of residence re-
[16]
SB 129
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
quired by ORS 428.210 [ (8)] (6).
(b) Provide for the arbitration of disputes arising out of the mutual exchange of such  persons
between this state and any other state.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 428.260 is amended to read:
428.260. (1) For the purpose of carrying out the  provisions of ORS 428.210 to 428.270, the [ De-
partment of Human Services or the ] Oregon Health Authority may employ all  help necessary in ar-
ranging for and transporting nonresident patients.
(2) The cost and expense of providing such  assistance and all expenses incurred in effecting the
transportation of such patients shall  be paid from funds appropriated for that purpose upon vouchers
approved by the [ department, the] authority or the superintendent of the Oregon State Hospital.
SECTION 21.  ORS 428.270 is amended to read:
428.270. (1) Any person, except an officer, agent or employee of a common carrier acting in  the
line of duty, who  brings or in any way aids in bringing into this state any patient without the
written authorization of the [ Department of Human Services  or the ] Oregon Health Authority[ ,] shall
be liable  to this state for all expenses incurred in the care of such patient and in the transportation
of such patient to the other state where the patient legally resides.
(2) Hospitals, other than state hospitals, that  care for and treat persons with mental illness shall
be responsible for the return  of those persons to their places of residence or domicile outside the
state if they are brought into this  state for treatment and care and are discharged from such insti-
tutions without being fully recovered.
(3) Failure to comply with the provisions of subsection (2)  of this section shall render the person
operating the hospital liable to reimburse the state for all  expenses incurred in the care, mainte-
nance and return of the persons with mental illness to their places of residence  or domicile outside
the state.
SECTION 22.  ORS 480.225 is amended to read:
480.225. (1) A person is eligible for a certificate of possession under ORS 480.235 if:
(a) The person has not been convicted, or  found guilty except for insanity under ORS 161.295,
of a misdemeanor involving violence, as defined in ORS 166.470,  within the previous four years. A
person who has been so convicted  is eligible under this subsection following the expiration of seven
years after  the date of final and unconditional discharge from all imprisonment, probation and parole
resulting from the conviction.
(b) The person has not been convicted, or  found guilty except for insanity under ORS 161.295,
of, and is not under indictment for, any felony.
(c) The person is not a fugitive from justice,  has no outstanding warrants for arrest and is not
free on any  form of pretrial release for any offenses listed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this sub-
section.
(d) The person has not been determined to be a person with mental  illness under ORS 426.130
[or to have an intellectual disability under ORS 427.290 ]. A person who previously has been  so de-
termined is eligible under this  subsection if, at the time of application for such a certificate, the
person produces  a certified copy of a full discharge from the proper state hospital. The Oregon
Health Authority shall provide the State Fire Marshal with direct electronic access to  the
authority’s database of information identifying persons meeting the criteria of this section  who were
committed or subject to an order under ORS  426.130. The State Fire Marshal and the authority shall
enter into an agreement describing the access to information under this subsection.
(e) The person is at least 21 years of age.
[17]
SB 129
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) The person does  not use a fictitious name or make a material misrepresentation in applica-
tion for such a certificate.
(g)(A) The person has not been convicted of, and is not under indictment  for, a criminal offense
involving a controlled substance as defined in ORS 475.005, other than the  offense of driving under
the influence of intoxicants.
(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, a person who has had a  certificate
denied or revoked due to conviction of a criminal offense  involving a controlled substance is eligible
under this section  following the expiration of seven years after the date of final and unconditional
discharge from all imprisonment, probation and parole resulting from the conviction.
(h) The person has  been discharged from the jurisdiction of the juvenile court for more than four
years for an  act that, if committed by an adult, would constitute a felony or a misdemeanor involv-
ing violence, as defined in ORS 166.470.
(i) The person is not  the subject of a restraining order that alleges the person’s possession of
explosives presents a credible threat to another person.
(j) The person  has passed an examination administered by the State Fire Marshal that assesses
the person’s knowledge of safety in the transportation and storage of explosives as required  under
federal and state laws and regulations pertaining to explosives. The State Fire Marshal  shall ex-
amine each applicant prior to issuance of a certificate of possession to the applicant. The State  Fire
Marshal may by rule establish and collect an examination fee in an amount necessary  to cover the
cost of administering the examination.
(k) The person certifies on  the application for a certificate of possession that all explosives in
the person’s possession  will be used, stored and transported in accordance with federal, state and
local requirements.
(L) The person certifies that all explosives will be possessed, used, stored  and transported in
accordance with federal, state and local requirements.
(2) Subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section does not apply to a conviction or indictment that  has
been expunged from a person’s record under  the laws of this state or equivalent laws of another
jurisdiction.
SECTION 23.
No later than December 15,  2025, the Department of Human Services shall
report to the  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to human services, in
the manner provided in ORS 192.245:
(1) The department’s progress in  planning for the elimination of civil commitment of in-
dividuals based on intellectual disabilities; and
(2) Recommendations for budget or policy actions necessary to ensure that  individuals
with intellectual disabilities who have exceptionally high needs are  ensured continued access
to appropriate services and supports.
SECTION 24. The amendments to ORS 181A.290 by section 13 of this 2025 Act do not ap-
ply to an individual whose information was, prior to the operative date specified in section
26 of this 2025 Act, transmitted to the Department of State Police  as a result of the indi-
vidual being committed by a court to the custody of the Department of Human Services  un-
der ORS 427.290, as in effect prior to the operative date specified in section 26 of this  2025
Act, based on a finding that the individual was dangerous to self or others.
SECTION 25.
Section 23 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 26. (1) Section 2 of this 2025 Act, the amendments to statutes by sections  3 to
22 of this 2025 Act and  the repeal of statutes by section 1 of this 2025 Act become operative
[18]
SB 129
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Department of Human Services may take any action before the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the department  to carry
out section 23 of this 2025 Act and to exercise, on  and after the operative date specified in
subsection (1) of  this section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the de-
partment by the amendments to statutes by sections 3 to 22 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 27.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[19]