Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to  the Department of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $7,200,000, which  may be expended by distributing $200,000 to each
district attorney to pay  expenses related to review of body camera footage, including estab-
lishing positions for deputy district attorneys and support staff.
SECTION 2. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 933