Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 737.310 is amended to read:
737.310. The following standards shall apply to the making and use of rates:
(1) Rates shall not be excessive, inadequate or unfairly discriminatory.
(2) As to all classes of insurance, other than workers’ compensation and title insurance:
(a) No rate shall be held to be excessive unless:
(A) Such rate is unreasonably high for the insurance provided; and
(B) A reasonable degree of competition does not exist in the area with respect to  the classi-
fication to which such rate is applicable.
(b) No rate shall be held  inadequate unless such rate is unreasonably low for the insurance
provided and:
(A) Use or continued use of such rate endangers the solvency of the insurer; or
(B) The use  of such rate by the insurer has, or if continued will have, the effect of destroying
competition or creating a monopoly.
(3) Except as provided in  subsection (6)(b) of this section,  rates for each classification of
coverage [ shall] must  be based on the claims experience of insurers within Oregon on that classi-
fication of coverage unless that experience  provides an insufficient base for actuarially sound rates.
(4) Due consideration shall  be given to past and prospective loss experience within this state,
to the hazards of conflagration and catastrophe, to a reasonable margin for profit and to contin-
gencies, to dividends, savings or unabsorbed premium deposits allowed or  returned by insurers to
their policyholders, members or subscribers, to  past and prospective expenses specially applicable
to this state, and to all other relevant factors, including  judgment factors deemed relevant, within
this state.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1546
SB 340
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) In addition to  subsection (4) of this section, rates for home protection insurance may include
provision for unreimbursed costs of risk inspection and for loss costs under policies  which are ter-
minated without premium because the related home sale is not made.
(6)(a) In the case of fire insurance  rates, consideration may be given to the experience of the
fire insurance business during the  most recent five-year period for which such experience is avail-
able.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  an insurer may not increase an
insured’s premium for fire insurance more than  three percent in each year in which the fire
insurance policy is in effect for the insured if the fire insurance covers:
(A) Property located in the wildland-urban interface, as defined in ORS 477.015; or
(B) Property of an insured that is  engaged in farming or resource extraction as the
insured’s primary employment or economic or business  activity. The Department of Con-
sumer and Business Services by rule shall determine how  and by what measure an insured’s
employment or economic or business activity would qualify the insured for the  limitation on
premium increases set forth in this paragraph.
(7) The  systems of expense provisions included in the rates for use by any insurer or group of
insurers may differ from those of other insurers or groups of insurers  to reflect the requirements
of the operating methods of any such  insurer or group of insurers with respect to any class of in-
surance, or with respect to  any subdivision or combination thereof for which subdivision or combi-
nation separate expenses are applicable.
(8) Risks may be grouped  by classifications for the establishment of rates and minimum premi-
ums. Classification rates for  casualty, surety or inland marine risks may be modified to produce
rates for individual risks in accordance with  rating plans which establish standards for measuring
variations in hazards or expense provisions or both.  Such standards may measure any differences
among risks that can be demonstrated to have a probable effect upon losses or expenses.
(9) Due consideration shall be given, in the making and use of rates for all insurance, to  in-
vestment income  earned by the insurer, to insurer profits and to accumulated reserves for vocational
rehabilitation services and for claim costs related to orders or awards made pursuant  to ORS
656.278.
(10) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services, by  rule, shall prescribe
the conditions under which a division of payroll between different manual  classifications is permit-
ted for purposes of computing workers’ compensation premiums.
(11)(a) The director shall not approve any workers’ compensation rating  system that does not
include a plan for rewarding employers, however small, that  have good loss experience or programs
likely to improve accident prevention. However, this paragraph is not  intended to require that all
employers be experience rated.
(b) The director shall not approve  any workers’ compensation rating system that does not allow
the insurer to include potential third party recovery as one of the  variables in the claims reserving
process.
(12) At the time an insurer issues  a workers’ compensation insurance policy to an insured for
the first time, the insurer shall give written notice to the insured of  the rating classifications to
which the insured’s employees are  to be assigned and shall provide an adequate description of work
activities  in  each classification. In the event an insurer recommences coverage following its termi-
nation, the notice required under this subsection must be given only if the gap  in coverage exceeds
six months.
[2]
SB 340
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(13) If an insurer determines the workers’ compensation insurance  policy of an insured needs
reclassification, the insurer:
(a) May bill an additional  premium for the revised classification after the insurer has provided
the insured at least 60 days’ written notice of the reclassification.
(b) Shall bill retroactively to policy inception  or date of change in insured’s operations for any
reclassification that results in a net reduction of premium.
(c) May, notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, retroactively bill an insured for  re-
classification during the policy year without  prior notice of reclassification if the insurer shows by
a preponderance of the evidence that:
(A) The insured knew that  the employees were misclassified, or the insured was adequately in-
formed by the insurer of the proper classification for the insured’s employees;
(B) The insured provided improper or inaccurate information concerning its operations; or
(C) The  insured’s operations changed after the date information on the employees was obtained
from the insured.
(14) In consultation with system participants, the  director shall analyze the rating classification
system to investigate changes that simplify the system and reduce costs for employers and  insurers
while preserving rate equity and minimizing the potential for abuse.  The director shall give partic-
ular emphasis to the method of allocating  payroll to rating classifications and to alternatives to
methods that  require verifiable payroll records. Upon completion of this analysis, the director shall
implement appropriate changes to the system.
(15) The director shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section and  may by rule
specify procedures relating to rating and ratemaking by workers’ compensation insurers.
(16) A rate increase based solely upon an insured’s attaining or exceeding 65  years of age shall
be presumed  to be unfairly discriminatory unless the increase is clearly based on sound actuarial
principles or is related to actual or reasonably anticipated experience.
(17) An insurer offering homeowner insurance, as defined in ORS 746.600, in this state shall:
(a) Make information on whether and how wildfire risk  mitigation actions, as defined in ORS
742.277, may  impact the insurer’s underwriting and rates publicly available on the insurer’s website.
(b) Reflect in the insurer’s underwriting guidelines and rate plans how the insurer addresses  or
considers wildfire risk mitigation actions, as defined in ORS 742.277.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 742.224 is amended to read:
742.224. (1) A fire insurance policy shall contain a  provision as follows: “This policy shall be
canceled at any time at the request of the insured, in which case this  company shall, upon demand
and surrender of this policy, refund  the excess of paid premium above the customary short rates for
the expired time.”
(2) The fire insurance policy also shall provide:
(a) That , except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section,  the insurer may can-
cel the policy at any time by giving 10 days’ written  notice of cancellation to the insured in the
event of nonpayment of  premium or 30 days’ written notice for any other reason. However, when fire
insurance coverage is part of a  package policy including commercial liability insurance, cancellation
of the policy is governed by the provisions of ORS 742.702.
(b) That cancellation by the insurer may be made with or without tender of  the excess of paid
premium above the pro rata premium for the expired  time, and that the excess, if not tendered with
the cancellation, will be refunded on demand.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 742.202, an insurer  may not cancel a fire insurance policy
[3]
SB 340
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
without the consent of the insured unless within  the previous three years the insurer has
received a claim from the insured for which the insurer paid out  more than 75 percent of the
coverage limit for the policy and:
(a) The insured’s covered  property is located in the wildland-urban interface, as defined
in ORS 477.015; or
(b) The insured is engaged in farming or resource extraction as the insured’s  primary
employment or economic or  business activity. The Department of Consumer and Business
Services by rule shall  determine how and by what measure an insured’s employment or
economic or  business activity would qualify the insured for the limitation on cancellation set
forth in this subsection.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 742.202, an insurer may not  cancel a fire insurance policy
without the consent of the insured  if the reason for the cancellation is the insurer’s claims
experience with other insureds within the municipality, county or region of this  state where
the insured’s covered property is located and:
(a) The insured’s covered  property is located in the wildland-urban interface, as defined
in ORS 477.015; or
(b) The insured is engaged in farming or resource extraction as the insured’s  primary
employment or economic or business activity. The department  by rule shall determine how
and by what measure an insured’s employment  or economic or business activity would
qualify the insured for the limitation on cancellation set forth in this subsection.
[(3)] (5) When an insurer  gives notice of cancellation, the notice shall state that the excess of
paid premium above the pro rata premium for the  expired time, if not tendered with the notice, will
be refunded on demand.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 737.310 and 742.224 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025
Act apply to contracts of insurance that  an insurer issues or renews on or after the opera-
tive date set forth in section 4 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) The amendments to ORS 737.310 and  742.224 by sections 1 and 2 of this
2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Department of  Consumer and Business Services may adopt rules and take any
other action before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section that is nec-
essary to enable the department, on and after the operative date specified in  subsection (1)
of this  section, to undertake and exercise the duties, functions and powers conferred on the
department by the amendments to  ORS 737.310 and 742.224 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]