Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Electronic monitoring device” means a camera or other device that  captures, re-
cords or broadcasts audio, video or both.
(b) “Facility” means a long term care facility licensed under ORS 441.025.
(2) A resident of a facility has a right to use an electronic monitoring device in  the
resident’s room or private living unit. A long term care  facility shall inform residents of the
right to use an electronic monitoring device and make available  the consent form described
in subsection (5) of this section.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subsection (6)  of this section, before an electronic monitoring
device may be used in a resident’s room  or private living unit, the resident must provide
written consent on the consent form described in subsection (5) of this section.
(b) If the resident lacks  capacity to provide consent, the resident’s representative may
provide consent on the resident’s behalf, unless the resident affirmatively  objects. A resident
affirmatively objects when the  resident orally, visually or through the use of auxiliary aids
or services declines the use of an electronic monitoring device.
(4)(a) If a  resident shares a room or living unit, the resident’s roommate must also pro-
vide written  consent on the consent form described in subsection (5) of this section before
an electronic monitoring device may be used in the shared room or living unit.
(b) If the resident’s roommate lacks capacity  to provide consent, the roommate’s repre-
sentative may provide consent  on the roommate’s behalf in the manner provided in sub-
section (3) of this section.
(c) If the resident’s roommate declines the use  of an electronic monitoring device, the
facility shall make reasonable efforts to accommodate the resident’s desire to use  an elec-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2041
SB 134
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tronic monitoring device, including by offering to move the resident to  another shared room
or shared living unit or to a private room or  living unit. If the facility is unable to accom-
modate the resident’s request due to lack of space, the facility shall reevaluate the request
every two weeks until the request is fulfilled. A facility is not required to provide a private
room or living unit to a resident who is unable to pay.
(5) A consent form for  the use of an electronic monitoring device under this section must
include, at a minimum, the following information:
(a)(A) The signed consent of the resident and, if applicable, the resident’s roommate; or
(B) If the resident’s or roommate’s representative is providing consent on the  resident’s
or roommate’s behalf:
(i) The representative’s signed consent;
(ii) An acknowledgement that the resident or roommate  did not affirmatively object; and
(iii) A statement of the source of authority allowing the representative to sign the con-
sent form on the resident’s or roommate’s behalf;
(b) The type of electronic monitoring device to be used;
(c) A list of conditions or restrictions that the  resident or roommate may elect to place
on the use of the electronic monitoring device, including:
(A) Prohibiting audio recording;
(B) Prohibiting video recording;
(C) Prohibiting broadcasting of audio or video;
(D) Turning off the electronic monitoring device or blocking the visual  recording com-
ponent of the electronic monitoring device during an  examination or procedure by a health
care professional;
(E) Turning off the electronic monitoring device or blocking the visual recording  com-
ponent of the electronic monitoring device while dressing or bathing is being performed;
(F) Turning off the electronic monitoring device during a visit with  a spiritual adviser,
ombudsman, attorney, financial planner, intimate partner or other visitor; and
(G) Any other condition or restriction elected by the resident or roommate;
(d) A statement of the circumstances under which  a recording may be disseminated un-
der subsection (10) or (11) of this section; and
(e) A signature  box for documenting a withdrawal of consent by the resident or
roommate.
(6) A resident may begin using an electronic monitoring device in  the resident’s room or
private living unit for up to 14 days without  submitting the consent form described in sub-
section (5) of this section if:
(a) Suspected maltreatment of the resident has occurred;
(b) The resident or the resident’s representative reasonably fears  retaliation against the
resident by the  facility if the resident requests the use of an electronic monitoring device;
or
(c) The facility has not timely responded to a written communication  from the resident
or the resident’s representative about a health, safety or welfare concern.
(7) A resident who chooses to use an  electronic monitoring device under this section is
responsible for the costs of the device, including purchase, installation, maintenance and
removal.
(8) A facility shall post a sign at each facility entrance  accessible to visitors that states
[2]
SB 134
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
that electronic monitoring devices, including  security cameras and audio devices, may be
present to record persons and activities.
(9) A facility may not:
(a) Refuse to admit a potential resident because the  facility disagrees with the decision
of the potential resident or the  potential resident’s representative regarding the use of an
electronic monitoring device;
(b) Move a resident because the facility disagrees with the decision of the resident or the
resident’s representative regarding the use of an electronic monitoring device;
(c) Retaliate or discriminate against a resident for consenting or refusing to consent to
the use of an electronic monitoring device; or
(d) Prevent or obstruct the use of an electronic monitoring  device by a resident who has
submitted the consent form described in subsection (5) of this section.
(10) Except as provided in subsection (11) of this section, a video or audio recording  cre-
ated by an electronic monitoring device used by a resident under this section:
(a) May not be:
(A) Accessed without the written consent of the resident or the resident’s representative;
or
(B) Disseminated, except for the purposes  of addressing health, safety or welfare con-
cerns of a resident.
(b) Subject to applicable rules of evidence and procedure,  may be admitted into evidence
in a civil, criminal or administrative proceeding.
(11)(a) An employee of a facility or an employee of  a contractor providing services at a
facility who is  the subject of a proposed disciplinary action based on evidence obtained by a
resident’s electronic monitoring device shall be given access to the evidence for the purpose
of defending against the proposed disciplinary action.
(b) An employee  who obtains a recording under this subsection shall preserve the
confidentiality of the recording and may not disseminate the  recording to any other person.
The employee shall return the recording to the facility or the resident when the recording
is no longer needed for the purpose of defending against a proposed disciplinary action.
SECTION 2.
Section 3 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 443.400 to
443.455.
SECTION 3. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Electronic monitoring device” means a camera or other device that  captures, re-
cords or broadcasts audio, video or both.
(b) “Facility” means a residential care facility.
(2) A resident of a facility has a right to use an electronic monitoring device in  the
resident’s room or private living unit. A long term care  facility shall inform residents of the
right to use an electronic monitoring device and make available  the consent form described
in subsection (5) of this section.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subsection (6)  of this section, before an electronic monitoring
device may be used in a resident’s room  or private living unit, the resident must provide
written consent on the consent form described in subsection (5) of this section.
(b) If the resident lacks  capacity to provide consent, the resident’s representative may
provide consent on the resident’s behalf, unless the resident affirmatively  objects. A resident
affirmatively objects when the  resident orally, visually or through the use of auxiliary aids
[3]
SB 134
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or services declines the use of an electronic monitoring device.
(4)(a) If a  resident shares a room or living unit, the resident’s roommate must also pro-
vide written  consent on the consent form described in subsection (5) of this section before
an electronic monitoring device may be used in the shared room or living unit.
(b) If the resident’s roommate lacks capacity  to provide consent, the roommate’s repre-
sentative may provide consent  on the roommate’s behalf in the manner provided in sub-
section (3) of this section.
(c) If the resident’s roommate declines the use  of an electronic monitoring device, the
facility shall make reasonable efforts to accommodate the resident’s desire to use  an elec-
tronic monitoring device, including by offering to move the resident to  another shared room
or shared living unit or to a private room or  living unit. If the facility is unable to accom-
modate the resident’s request due to lack of space, the facility shall reevaluate the request
every two weeks until the request is fulfilled. A facility is not required to provide a private
room or living unit to a resident who is unable to pay.
(5) A consent form for  the use of an electronic monitoring device under this section must
include, at a minimum, the following information:
(a)(A) The signed consent of the resident and, if applicable, the resident’s roommate; or
(B) If the resident’s or roommate’s representative is providing consent on the  resident’s
or roommate’s behalf:
(i) The representative’s signed consent;
(ii) An acknowledgement that the resident or roommate  did not affirmatively object; and
(iii) A statement of the source of authority allowing the representative to sign the con-
sent form on the resident’s or roommate’s behalf;
(b) The type of electronic monitoring device to be used;
(c) A list of conditions or restrictions that  the resident or roommate may elect to place
on the use of the electronic monitoring device, including:
(A) Prohibiting audio recording;
(B) Prohibiting video recording;
(C) Prohibiting broadcasting of audio or video;
(D) Turning off  the electronic monitoring device or blocking the visual recording com-
ponent of the electronic monitoring device during  an examination or procedure by a health
care professional;
(E) Turning off the electronic monitoring device or blocking the visual recording com-
ponent of the electronic monitoring device while dressing or bathing is being performed;
(F) Turning off the  electronic monitoring device during a visit with a spiritual adviser,
ombudsman, attorney, financial planner, intimate partner or other visitor; and
(G) Any other condition or restriction elected by the resident or roommate;
(d) A statement of the circumstances under  which a recording may be disseminated un-
der subsection (10) or (11) of this section; and
(e) A signature box for documenting a withdrawal of consent by the  resident or
roommate.
(6) A resident may begin using an electronic monitoring device in  the resident’s room or
private living unit for up to 14 days  without submitting the consent form described in sub-
section (5) of this section if:
(a) Suspected maltreatment of the resident has occurred;
[4]
SB 134
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The resident or  the resident’s representative reasonably fears retaliation against the
resident by the facility if the resident requests the use of an electronic  monitoring device;
or
(c) The facility has  not timely responded to a written communication from the resident
or the resident’s representative about a health, safety or welfare concern.
(7) A resident who chooses to use an  electronic monitoring device under this section is
responsible for the costs of the device, including purchase, installation, maintenance and
removal.
(8) A facility shall post a  sign at each facility entrance accessible to visitors that states
that electronic monitoring devices, including security cameras and  audio devices, may be
present to record persons and activities.
(9) A facility may not:
(a) Refuse to admit a potential  resident because the facility disagrees with the decision
of the potential resident or the potential resident’s representative  regarding the use of an
electronic monitoring device;
(b) Move a resident because the facility disagrees with the decision of the resident or the
resident’s representative regarding the use of an electronic monitoring device;
(c) Retaliate or discriminate against a resident for consenting or refusing to consent to
the use of an electronic monitoring device; or
(d) Prevent or obstruct the use of an electronic monitoring  device by a resident who has
submitted the consent form described in subsection (5) of this section.
(10) Except as provided in subsection (11) of this section, a video or audio recording  cre-
ated by an electronic monitoring device used by a resident under this section:
(a) May not be:
(A) Accessed without the written consent of the resident or the resident’s representative;
or
(B) Disseminated, except for the purposes  of addressing health, safety or welfare con-
cerns of a resident.
(b) Subject to applicable rules of evidence and procedure,  may be admitted into evidence
in a civil, criminal or administrative proceeding.
(11)(a) An employee of a facility or an employee of  a contractor providing services at a
facility who is  the subject of a proposed disciplinary action based on evidence obtained by a
resident’s electronic monitoring device shall be given access to the evidence for the purpose
of defending against the proposed disciplinary action.
(b) An employee  who obtains a recording under this subsection shall preserve the
confidentiality of the recording and may not disseminate the  recording to any other person.
The employee shall return the recording to the facility or the resident when the recording
is no longer needed for the purpose of defending against a proposed disciplinary action.
SECTION 4.
Section 5 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 443.705 to
443.825.
SECTION 5. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Electronic monitoring device” means a camera or other device that  captures, re-
cords or broadcasts audio, video or both.
(b) “Facility” means an adult foster home.
(2) A resident of a facility has a right to use an electronic monitoring device in  the
[5]
SB 134
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
resident’s room or private living unit. A long term care  facility shall inform residents of the
right to use an electronic monitoring device and make available  the consent form described
in subsection (5) of this section.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subsection (6)  of this section, before an electronic monitoring
device may be used in a resident’s room  or private living unit, the resident must provide
written consent on the consent form described in subsection (5) of this section.
(b) If the resident lacks  capacity to provide consent, the resident’s representative may
provide consent on the resident’s behalf, unless the resident affirmatively  objects. A resident
affirmatively objects when the  resident orally, visually or through the use of auxiliary aids
or services declines the use of an electronic monitoring device.
(4)(a) If a  resident shares a room or living unit, the resident’s roommate must also pro-
vide written  consent on the consent form described in subsection (5) of this section before
an electronic monitoring device may be used in the shared room or living unit.
(b) If the resident’s roommate lacks capacity  to provide consent, the roommate’s repre-
sentative may provide consent  on the roommate’s behalf in the manner provided in sub-
section (3) of this section.
(c) If the resident’s roommate declines the use  of an electronic monitoring device, the
facility shall make reasonable efforts to accommodate the resident’s desire to use  an elec-
tronic monitoring device, including by offering to move the resident to  another shared room
or shared living unit or to a private room or  living unit. If the facility is unable to accom-
modate the resident’s request due to lack of space, the facility shall reevaluate the request
every two weeks until the request is fulfilled. A facility is not required to provide a private
room or living unit to a resident who is unable to pay.
(5) A consent form for  the use of an electronic monitoring device under this section must
include, at a minimum, the following information:
(a)(A) The signed consent of the resident and, if applicable, the resident’s roommate; or
(B) If the resident’s or roommate’s representative is providing consent on the  resident’s
or roommate’s behalf:
(i) The representative’s signed consent;
(ii) An acknowledgement that the resident or roommate  did not affirmatively object; and
(iii) A statement of the source of authority allowing the representative to sign the con-
sent form on the resident’s or roommate’s behalf;
(b) The type of electronic monitoring device to be used;
(c) A list of conditions or restrictions that  the resident or roommate may elect to place
on the use of the electronic monitoring device, including:
(A) Prohibiting audio recording;
(B) Prohibiting video recording;
(C) Prohibiting broadcasting of audio or video;
(D) Turning off  the electronic monitoring device or blocking the visual recording com-
ponent of the electronic monitoring device during  an examination or procedure by a health
care professional;
(E) Turning off the electronic monitoring device or blocking the visual recording com-
ponent of the electronic monitoring device while dressing or bathing is being performed;
(F) Turning off the  electronic monitoring device during a visit with a spiritual adviser,
ombudsman, attorney, financial planner, intimate partner or other visitor; and
[6]
SB 134
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(G) Any other condition or restriction elected by the resident or roommate;
(d) A statement of the circumstances under  which a recording may be disseminated un-
der subsection (10) or (11) of this section; and
(e) A signature box for documenting a withdrawal of consent by the  resident or
roommate.
(6) A resident may begin using an electronic monitoring device in  the resident’s room or
private living unit for up to 14 days  without submitting the consent form described in sub-
section (5) of this section if:
(a) Suspected maltreatment of the resident has occurred;
(b) The resident or  the resident’s representative reasonably fears retaliation against the
resident by the facility if the resident requests the use of an electronic  monitoring device;
or
(c) The facility has  not timely responded to a written communication from the resident
or the resident’s representative about a health, safety or welfare concern.
(7) A resident who chooses to use an  electronic monitoring device under this section is
responsible for the costs of the device, including purchase, installation, maintenance and
removal.
(8) A facility shall post a  sign at each facility entrance accessible to visitors that states
that electronic monitoring devices, including security cameras and  audio devices, may be
present to record persons and activities.
(9) A facility may not:
(a) Refuse to admit a potential  resident because the facility disagrees with the decision
of the potential resident or the potential resident’s representative  regarding the use of an
electronic monitoring device;
(b) Move a resident because the facility disagrees with the decision of the resident or the
resident’s representative regarding the use of an electronic monitoring device;
(c) Retaliate or discriminate against a resident for consenting or refusing to consent to
the use of an electronic monitoring device; or
(d) Prevent or obstruct the use of an electronic monitoring  device by a resident who has
submitted the consent form described in subsection (5) of this section.
(10) Except  as provided in subsection (11) of this section, a video or audio recording cre-
ated by an electronic monitoring device used by a resident under this section:
(a) May not be:
(A) Accessed without the written consent of the resident or the resident’s representative;
or
(B) Disseminated, except for the purposes of addressing  health, safety or welfare con-
cerns of a resident.
(b) Subject to applicable rules of  evidence and procedure, may be admitted into evidence
in a civil, criminal or administrative proceeding.
(11)(a) An employee of a facility or  an employee of a contractor providing services at a
facility who is the subject of a proposed disciplinary action based on evidence obtained  by a
resident’s electronic monitoring device shall be given access to the evidence for the purpose
of defending against the proposed disciplinary action.
(b) An employee who obtains a recording under this subsection shall  preserve the
confidentiality of the recording and may  not disseminate the recording to any other person.
[7]
SB 134
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
The employee shall return the recording to the facility or the resident when the recording
is no longer needed for the purpose of defending against a proposed disciplinary action.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 441.710 is amended to read:
441.710. (1)(a) In addition to any  other liability or penalty provided by law, the Director of Hu-
man Services may impose a civil penalty on a person pursuant to ORS 441.731 for any of the fol-
lowing:
(A) Violation of any of the terms or conditions of a license issued under ORS 441.015 to  441.119,
441.525 to 441.595, 441.815, 441.820, 441.990, 441.993, 442.342, 442.344 and 442.400 to 442.463 for a
long term care facility, as defined in ORS 442.015.
(B) Violation of ORS 441.630 to 441.680.
(C) Violation of any rule or general order of  the Department of Human Services that pertains
to a long term care facility.
(D) Violation of any final order of the director that pertains specifically to the long term  care
facility owned or operated by the person incurring the penalty.
(E) Violation of ORS 441.605 or of rules required to be adopted under ORS 441.610.
(F) Violation of ORS 443.880 or 443.881 if the facility is a residential care facility.
(G) Violation of section 1 or 3 of this 2025 Act.
(b) In addition to any  other liability or penalty provided by law, the director may impose a civil
penalty on a  residential training facility or residential training home for violation of ORS 443.880
or 443.881. The director shall prescribe a reasonable time for elimination of a violation by  a resi-
dential training facility or residential training home:
(A) Not to exceed 30 days after first notice of a violation; or
(B) In cases where the violation requires more than 30 days to correct, such time as is specified
in a plan of correction found acceptable by the director.
(2) In addition to any other  liability or penalty provided by law, the Director of the Oregon
Health Authority may impose a civil penalty on  a person for a violation of ORS 443.880 or 443.881
if the facility is a residential treatment facility or a residential treatment home.
(3) The Director of Human Services may not impose a penalty under subsection  (1) of this sec-
tion for violations other  than those involving direct patient care or feeding, an adequate staff to
patient ratio, sanitation involving direct patient care or a violation  of ORS 441.605 or 443.880 or
443.881 or of the rules required to be adopted by ORS 441.610 unless a violation  is found on two
consecutive surveys of a long term care facility.
(4) The Director of the Oregon Health Authority  may not impose a penalty under subsection (2)
of this section for violations other than those  involving direct patient care or feeding, an adequate
staff to patient ratio, sanitation involving direct patient care  or a violation of ORS 443.880 or
443.881. The director in every case shall prescribe a reasonable time for elimination of a violation:
(a) Not to exceed 30 days after first notice of a violation; or
(b) In cases where the violation  requires more than 30 days to correct, such time as is specified
in a plan of correction found acceptable by the director.
SECTION 7.
(1) Sections 1, 3 and 5 of this 2025 Act  and the amendments to ORS 441.710
by section 6 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) A long term care facility, residential care facility or adult foster  home may take any
action before the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary
to enable the long term care  facility, residential care facility or adult foster home to exer-
cise, on and  after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the du-
[8]
SB 134
1
2
3
4
5
6
ties, functions and powers conferred on the long term  care facility, residential care facility
or adult foster home by  sections 1, 3 and 5 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS
441.710 by section 6 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[9]