Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 195.505 is amended to read:
195.505. [(1) A policy developed pursuant to ORS 195.500 shall  conform, but is not limited, to the
following provisions. ]
[(2) As used in this section, “personal property” means any  item that can reasonably be identified
as belonging to an individual and that has apparent value or utility. ]
[(3) Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, at least 72 hours before removing  homeless
individuals from an established camping site,  law enforcement officials shall post a written notice, in
English and Spanish, at all  entrances to the camping site to the extent that the entrances can reason-
ably be identified. ]
[(4)(a) When a 72-hour notice is posted, law enforcement officials shall inform the local agency that
delivers social services to homeless individuals as to where the notice has been posted. ]
[(b) The local agency may arrange for outreach workers to visit the camping site  that is subject to
the notice to assess the need for social service assistance in arranging shelter and other assistance. ]
[(5)(a) All personal property at the camping site  that remains unclaimed after removal shall be
given to a law enforcement official,  a local agency that delivers social services to homeless individuals,
an outreach worker,  a local agency official or a person authorized to issue a citation described in
subsection (10) of this section, whether notice is required under subsection (3) of this section or not. ]
[(b) The unclaimed personal property must be stored: ]
[(A) For property removed from camping sites in counties other than Multnomah  County, in a fa-
cility located in the same community as the camping site from which it was removed. ]
[(B) For property removed from camping  sites in Multnomah County, in a facility located within
six blocks of a public transit station. ]
[(c) Items that have no apparent value or utility or are in  an insanitary condition may be imme-
diately discarded upon removal of the homeless individuals from the camping site. ]
[(d) Weapons, controlled  substances other than prescription medication and items that appear to
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 658
HB 2445
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
be either stolen or evidence of a crime shall be given to or retained by law enforcement officials. ]
[(6) The written notice required under subsection (3) of this section must state, at a minimum: ]
[(a) Where unclaimed personal property will be stored; ]
[(b) A phone number that individuals may call to find out where the property will be stored; or ]
[(c) If a permanent storage location has not yet been determined, the address and  phone number
of an agency that will have the information when available. ]
[(7)(a) The unclaimed personal property shall be  stored in an orderly fashion, keeping items that
belong to an individual together to the extent that ownership can reasonably be determined. ]
[(b) The property shall be stored for a minimum of 30 days during which it  shall be reasonably
available to any individual claiming ownership. Any personal property that  remains unclaimed after
30 days may be disposed of  or donated to a corporation described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code as amended and in effect on December 31, 2020. ]
[(8) Following the removal of homeless individuals from a camping site on public property, the law
enforcement officials, local  agency officials and outreach workers may meet to assess the notice and
removal policy, to discuss whether  the removals are occurring in a humane and just manner and to
determine if any changes are needed in the policy. ]
[(9)(a) The 72-hour notice requirement under subsection (3) of this section does not apply: ]
[(A) When there are grounds for law enforcement officials to believe that illegal activities  other
than camping are occurring at an established camping site. ]
[(B) In the event of an exceptional emergency at an  established camping site, including, but not
limited to, possible site contamination by hazardous materials,  a public health emergency or other im-
mediate danger to human life or safety. ]
[(b) If a funeral service is scheduled with less than 72 hours’ notice at  a cemetery at which there
is a camping site, or a camping site is established at the cemetery less than  72 hours before the
scheduled service, the written notice required under subsection (3) of this section may  be posted at least
24 hours before removing homeless individuals from the camping site. ]
[(10) A person authorized to issue a citation for unlawful camping under  state law, administrative
rule or city  or county ordinance may not issue the citation if the citation would be issued within 200
feet of a notice required under subsection (3) of this section and within two hours  before or after the
notice was posted. ]
[(11) Any law or policy of a city or county that is more  specific or offers greater protections to
homeless individuals subject to removal from an  established camping site preempts contrary provisions
of this section. ]
(1) A policy developed pursuant  to ORS 195.500 shall include, but is not limited to, the
following:
(a) Prior to  removing homeless individuals from an established camping site, law
enforcement officials shall post a notice, written in English and Spanish, 24 hours in advance.
(b) At the time that a 24-hour notice is posted, law enforcement officials  shall inform the
local agency that delivers social services to homeless individuals where the notice has  been
posted.
(c) The local agency may arrange for  outreach workers to visit the camping site where
a notice has been  posted to assess the need for social service assistance in arranging shelter
and other assistance.
(d)(A) All unclaimed personal property shall be  given to law enforcement officials
whether 24-hour notice is required or not.
[2]
HB 2445
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) The property shall be stored for a minimum of 30 days during which it will  be rea-
sonably available to any individual claiming ownership. Any  personal property that remains
unclaimed for 30 days may be disposed of.
(C) For purposes of this paragraph, “personal property” means any item that  is reason-
ably recognizable as belonging to a person and that has apparent utility. Items that have  no
apparent utility or are in an insanitary condition may be immediately discarded upon removal
of the homeless individuals from the camping site.
(D) Weapons, drug  paraphernalia and items that appear to be either stolen or evidence
of a crime shall be given to law enforcement officials.
(e) Following the removal of homeless individuals from  a camping site on public property,
the law enforcement officials, local agency officials and outreach workers may meet to as-
sess the notice and removal policy, to discuss whether the removals are occurring  in a hu-
mane and just manner and to determine if any changes are needed in the policy.
(2) The 24-hour notice required under subsection (1) of this section shall not apply:
(a) When there are grounds for law enforcement officials  to believe that illegal activities
other than camping are occurring.
(b) In the event of an exceptional emergency such  as possible site contamination by
hazardous materials or when there is immediate danger to human life or safety.
(3) A person  authorized to issue a citation for unlawful camping under state law, ad-
ministrative rule or  city or county ordinance may not issue the citation if the citation would
be issued within 200 feet of the notice described in  this section and within two hours before
or after the notice was posted.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 195.515 is amended to read:
195.515. (1) The  Department of Transportation may enter into an intergovernmental agreement
with a city that has a population of 500,000 or more  for the removal, storage and disposition of
personal property deposited, left or displayed on property that is owned by the department. The  city
shall prioritize removal of personal property that is within the right of way  of a highway under the
jurisdiction of the department as a road authority pursuant to ORS 810.010.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 377.650, 377.653 and 377.655, an  intergovernmental agreement entered
into under this section may provide alternative provisions related to the  removal, storage and dis-
position of personal property if the alternative provisions conform  with the requirements for local
government policy for removal of homeless individuals and personal property under ORS 195.505.
(3) In addition to the requirements described in subsection (2) of  this section, an intergovern-
mental agreement entered into under this section must include the following:
(a) Requirements for posting notice before the  removal of personal property, including but not
limited to the following:
(A) That the notice is created using durable materials and securely posted  within 30 feet of the
personal property to be removed;
(B) That the notice must provide the date the notice  begins and the date upon which the city
or department may begin removing personal property; and
(C) That the notice must provide a description of:
(i) How an individual may access personal property that is removed and stored; and
(ii) The length of time the city or department will store personal property  before the city or
department disposes of it.
(b) A requirement that the notice expires 10 days after the city or department posts  the notice.
[3]
HB 2445
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
(c) A severe  weather protocol regarding the weather conditions under which the city or de-
partment will not remove personal property.
(d) Provisions related to inventorying and storing the personal property to be removed.
(e) Provisions related to the city or department relinquishing unclaimed  personal property after
the storage period to the city’s or department’s designated agent.
(f) Provisions related to when the city will provide impact reduction services, including but  not
limited to trash collection.
(g) A provision providing that if  the department requests city services under the intergovern-
mental agreement,  but the city is unable or unwilling to provide services as requested, the depart-
ment or the department’s contractor may perform the requested services consistent with  the terms
of the agreement, including but not limited to posting notice.
(4) The [ 72-hour] 24-hour notice under ORS 195.505 required under subsection (2) of this section
does not apply:
(a) When there are grounds for law  enforcement officials to believe that illegal activities other
than camping are occurring;
(b) Where there is an exceptional emergency, such as  possible site contamination by hazardous
materials; or
(c) When there is immediate danger to human life or safety.
(5) Before the city adopts an intergovernmental agreement under this section or  changes to the
agreement, the city shall invite public comment on the proposed agreement or the proposed changes
to the agreement.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]