Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A public body, as defined in ORS 174.109, may  not discriminate against
or grant  preferential treatment to any individual or group on the basis of race, sex, color,
ethnicity or national origin  in the operation of public employment, public education or public
contracting.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as prohibiting bona  fide qualifications or
other considerations based on sex that are reasonably  necessary to the normal operation of
public employment, public education or public contracting.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as invalidating any court order or  consent
decree that is in force as of the effective date of this section.
(4) Nothing in  this section shall be interpreted as prohibiting action that must be taken
to establish or  maintain eligibility for any federal program, where ineligibility would result
in a loss of federal funds to this state.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 612