Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 1, chapter 481, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1)  The Department of Corrections, in cooperation with the Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission, shall establish a pilot program to provide legal services that  assist [ women] adults in
custody who are [ incarcerated] serving sentences  at  the Coffee Creek Correctional Facility to re-
enter and reintegrate into local communities, to reduce  [ the womens’ ] vulnerability to domestic vi-
olence and to obtain employment, housing services and other benefits  for the adults in custody .
(2) The commission shall carry out the purposes of subsection (1) of this section  by granting to
the Oregon Justice Resource Center an amount sufficient for the center to employ three  attorneys
and to provide necessary support for the attorneys’ work.
(3) The commission and the Oregon Justice Resource Center shall evaluate the operations  and
success of the pilot program and report  the results of the department’s evaluation to an interim
committee of the Legislative Assembly related to corrections not later than September 15, 2021.
SECTION 2.  Section 3, chapter 481, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  Section 1 , [ of this 2019 Act ] chapter 481, Oregon Laws  2019, is repealed on December
31, [2021] 2024.
SECTION 3. There is  appropriated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the
biennium beginning July 1,  2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $800,000 for the
purpose of making a grant to the Oregon Justice Resource Center to fund the legal  services
program described in section 1, chapter 481, Oregon Laws 2019.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1415