Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Infrastructure” includes tracks, switches, sidings, roadbeds, railroad bridges  and
industrial leads owned by a short line railroad.
(b) “Short line railroad” means a class II  or class III railroad as defined in 49 C.F.R. 1201.
(c) “Short line railroad infrastructure  project” means a project that involves the con-
struction, maintenance, reconstruction or replacement of infrastructure.
(2) The Short Line Railroad Fund is established separate and distinct from  the General
Fund. Earnings on moneys in the Short Line Railroad Fund shall be deposited into  the fund.
Moneys in the Short Line Railroad Fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Busi-
ness Development Department for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this section.
(3) There is created within the department the Short Line Railroad  Resiliency Program.
The program’s  purpose is to fund short line railroad infrastructure projects. As part of the
program, the department shall use moneys  in the Short Line Railroad Fund to finance grants
to support short line railroad infrastructure projects.
(4) The department shall convene  a short line railroad advisory group. The advisory
group shall consist of three representatives of short  line railroads. The Director of the
Oregon Business Development Department shall select members that:
(a) Represent short line railroads that operate in this state.
(b) Have extensive involvement in the short line railroad industry.
(c) Have extensive experience  participating in successful public-private partnerships with
state and federal government agencies.
(5) The advisory group shall assist the department in  developing the criteria for use by
the department in selecting short line railroad  infrastructure projects to be awarded grants
under this section.
(6) After consulting with the short  line railroad advisory group, the department shall
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3647
HB 3392
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
adopt rules specifying the process by which a short line railroad may apply for a  grant under
this section and prescribing the terms and conditions of grants. An  applicant receiving a
grant shall be required to provide 25 percent of the moneys required  for the short line rail-
road infrastructure project.
(7) The  department, in collaboration with the short line railroad advisory group, shall
select the short line railroad infrastructure projects to be funded with  moneys in the Short
Line Railroad Fund.
(8) In selecting short line railroad infrastructure projects,  the department shall prioritize
projects that:
(a) Enhance Oregon’s short line rail network capacity;
(b) Improve Oregon’s integration  of the short line rail network with the national rail
network;
(c) Decrease the environmental impact associated with transportation of  freight in
Oregon by transporting more freight by rail;
(d) Improve the resilience of short line railroads in Oregon; and
(e) Provide a positive economic impact in Oregon by improving  the capacity of short line
railroads.
SECTION 2.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at the request  of the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue  lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $5  million in net proceeds
and interest earnings for the purposes described in subsection  (2) of this section, plus an
additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be  necessary to pay bond-related
costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this  section in an amount sufficient to
provide $5 million in net proceeds and interest earnings must be  transferred to the Oregon
Business Development Department  for deposit in the Short Line Railroad Fund established
under section 1 of this 2021 Act, to finance grants for  short line railroad infrastructure
projects as provided in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
(3) Lottery bonds authorized  under this section must be issued no later than June 30,
2022.
(4) The Legislative Assembly finds that short line railroads are a  vital component of the
state’s transportation infrastructure and play an essential role in furthering economic  de-
velopment. The Legislative Assembly thereby finds that the use  of lottery bonds for the
purposes described in subsection (2)  of this section is an appropriate use of state lottery
funds under Article XV, section 4, of the Oregon Constitution, and ORS 461.510.
SECTION 3. (1) In collaboration with  the short line railroad advisory group convened
under section 1 of  this 2021 Act, the Oregon Business Development Department shall conduct
a study and make recommendations for legislation that is necessary to provide a long-term
revenue source, other than  lottery bonds, for financing short line railroad infrastructure
grants provided under section 1 of this 2021 Act.
(2) The department shall submit reports on its  findings and any proposed legislation un-
der this section to the  appropriate committee or committees of the Legislative Assembly in
the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than September 15, 2022.
SECTION 4.
Section 3 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 5. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
[2]
HB 3392
1
2
3
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
[3]