Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 5,  chapter 605, Oregon Laws 1987, as amended by section 4, chapter 887,
Oregon Laws 1989,  section 28, chapter 746, Oregon Laws 1995, and section 3, chapter 359, Oregon
Laws 2001, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  [ No] A tax credit [ shall be ] is not  allowed under ORS 315.104 based upon reforestation
project costs [ if] unless the preliminary certificate is [ not] issued :
(1) On or before December 31, 2011 ; or
(2) After December 31, 2025, and before December 31, 2031 .
SECTION 2. Section 9, chapter 883, Oregon Laws 2007, is repealed.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1584