Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 98.302 to 98.436.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “local government” has the meaning given that
term in ORS 174.116.
(2) The governing body of a local government  may adopt an ordinance establishing that
an owner of intangible property of a value equal to or less than $10 forfeits any rights  to and
interest in the intangible property if the local government has  held the intangible property
for more than two years and the owner has not  claimed the intangible property during that
period.
(3) Intangible property subject to forfeiture under an ordinance  adopted under subsection
(2) of this section is not presumed abandoned.
(4) A local government that holds intangible property forfeited  under an ordinance
adopted under subsection (2) of this section may assume ownership of the intangible property
and place the monetary  value of the intangible property in the general fund of the local
government to be used for the payment of the  general operating expense of the local gov-
ernment.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4150