Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall study infrastructure
financing in Oregon.
(2) The study shall consider and evaluate:
(a) Currently and potentially available tools the State of Oregon may use to have a posi-
tive effect on  infrastructure and housing costs in this state, including, but not limited to,
tools such as:
(A) Changes to law;
(B) New state mechanisms or authorities;
(C) Finance and bonding authority at both the state and local levels;
(D) Participatory loans  and other lending models and methodologies with the potential
to facilitate homeownership for Oregonians who currently experience  obstacles in securing
mortgage loans;
(E) Models for partial or full state financing of all large local  infrastructure projects; and
(F) Any current or  potential grant and loan programs suited to achieve the goals of
having a positive effect on infrastructure and housing costs in this state.
(b) Interest rates and fees for state and local bonds related  to infrastructure develop-
ment, including, but  not limited to, infrastructure needed for housing development. To the
greatest extent possible, the study  should include the average costs of interest and fees as
a percentage of total project cost in 2022, broken down by infrastructure type.
(3) The department may request and receive documents and testimony from any  public
or private source.
(4) The department may enter into an agreement with HR&A for the provision of re-
search services related to the  study, or, if such an agreement is not entered into, with an-
other entity of comparable expertise and capacity.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 242
HB 4155
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
(5) All agencies of  state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist the
department in the performance of the department’s duties under this section and, to  the
extent permitted by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and  advice that
the department considers necessary for the conduct of the study.
(6) No later than September 15,  2024, the department shall, in the manner provided by
ORS 192.245, submit  a report on the findings of the study to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to infrastructure  financing. The department may include rec-
ommendations for legislation with the report.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on December 31, 2025.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $250,000  to be
used by the department for purposes of section 1 (4) of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]