Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
AMENDMENTS TO OIL OR HAZARDOUS MATERIAL SPILLAGE STATUTES
SECTION 1.
 ORS 468B.300 is amended to read:
468B.300. As used in ORS 468.020, 468.095, 468.140 (3) and 468B.300 to 468B.500:
(1) “Bulk” means material stored or transported in loose, unpackaged  liquid, powder or granular
form capable of being conveyed by a pipe, bucket, chute or belt system.
(2) “Cargo vessel” means a self-propelled ship in commerce, other than  a tank vessel, of 300
gross tons  or more. “Cargo vessel” does not include a vessel used solely for commercial fish har-
vesting.
(3) “Commercial fish harvesting” means taking food fish with any gear unlawful for angling  un-
der ORS 506.006, or taking food  fish in excess of the limits permitted for personal use, or taking food
fish with the intent of disposing of such food fish or parts  thereof for profit, or by sale, barter or
trade, in commercial channels.
(4) “Contingency plan” means an oil spill prevention and emergency response plan required  un-
der ORS 468B.345.
(5) “Covered vessel” means a tank vessel, cargo vessel, passenger vessel or dredge vessel.
(6) “Damages” includes damages, costs, losses, penalties or  attorney fees of any kind for which
liability may exist under the laws of this state resulting from, arising  out of or related to the dis-
charge or threatened discharge of oil.
(7) “Discharge” means any emission other  than natural seepage of oil, whether intentional or
unintentional. “Discharge” includes but is not limited to spilling,  leaking, pumping, pouring, emit-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 126
HB 4004
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ting, emptying or dumping oil.
(8) “Dredge vessel” means a self-propelled vessel of 300 or more gross tons that is equipped for
regularly engaging in dredging of submerged and submersible lands.
(9) “Exploration facility” means a platform,  vessel or other offshore facility used to explore for
oil in the navigable waters of the state. “Exploration facility” does not include  platforms or vessels
used for  stratigraphic drilling or other operations that are not authorized or intended to drill to a
producing  formation.
(10) “Facility” means a pipeline , a railroad  car or any structure, group of structures, equipment
or device, other than  a vessel that transfers oil over navigable waters of the state, that is used for
producing, storing, handling, transferring, processing or transporting oil in bulk and  that is capable
of storing or transporting 10,000 or more gallons of oil. “Facility” does not include:
(a) A [ railroad car, ] motor vehicle or [ other] rolling stock  other than a  railroad car  while
transporting oil over the highways [ or rail lines ] of this state;
(b) An underground storage tank regulated  by the Department of Environmental Quality or a
local government under ORS 466.706 to 466.882 and 466.994; or
(c) A marina, or  a public fueling station, that is engaged exclusively in the direct sale of fuel,
or any other product used for propulsion, to a final user of the fuel or other product.
(11) “Federal  on-scene coordinator” means the federal official predesignated by the United
States Environmental Protection Agency or the  United States Coast Guard to coordinate and direct
federal responses or the official designated by the lead  agency to coordinate and direct removal
under the National Contingency Plan.
(12) “Hazardous material” has the meaning given that term in ORS 466.605.
(13) “High hazard train route” means a section of rail lines in this state:
(a) That abuts or travels  over navigable waters of the state, an inland watershed or a
drinking water intake; and
(b) Over  which trains that consist of 25 or more tanker railroad cars transporting oil as
cargo operate.
(14) “Listed sensitive area” means an area or  location listed as an area of special eco-
nomic or environmental importance in an Area Contingency Plan or  Sub-Area Contingency
Plan prepared and published pursuant to section 311(j) of the Federal Water Pollution Control
Act, 33 U.S.C. 1321(j), as amended by the Oil Pollution Act of 1990, P.L. 101-380.
[(13)] (15) “Maritime association” means an association or cooperative of  marine terminals, fa-
cilities, vessel owners, vessel  operators, vessel agents or other maritime industry groups, that pro-
vides oil spill response planning and spill related communications services within the state.
[(14)] (16) “Maximum probable spill” means  the maximum probable spill for a vessel operating
in the navigable waters of the state considering the history of  spills of vessels of the same class
operating on the west coast of the United States.
(17) “National Contingency Plan” means the  plan prepared and published under section
311(d) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act,  33 U.S.C. 1321(d), as amended by the Oil
Pollution Act of 1990 (P.L. 101-380).
[(15)] (18) “Navigable waters” means the Columbia River, the Willamette River  up to Willamette
Falls, the Pacific Ocean and estuaries to the head of tidewater.
[(16) “National Contingency Plan” means the plan prepared and published under section 311(d) of
the Federal  Water Pollution Control Act, 33 U.S.C. 1321(d), as amended by the Oil Pollution Act of
1990 (P.L. 101-380).]
[2]
HB 4004
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(17)] (19)  “Offshore facility” means any facility located in, on or under any  of the navigable
waters of the state.
[(18)] (20) “Oils” or “oil” means :
(a) Oil, including gasoline, crude oil,  bitumen, synthetic crude oil, natural gas well
condensate, fuel  oil, diesel oil, lubricating oil, sludge, oil refuse and any other petroleum related
product ; and
(b) Liquefied natural gas.
[(19)] (21) “Onshore facility”  means any facility located in, on or under any land of the state,
other than submerged  land, that, because of its location, could reasonably be expected to cause
substantial harm to the environment by discharging oil into or on the  navigable waters of the state
or adjoining shorelines.
[(20)] (22)  “Passenger vessel” means a ship of 300 or more gross tons carrying passengers for
compensation.
[(21)] (23) “Person” has the meaning given the term in ORS 468.005.
[(22)] (24)  “Person having control over oil” includes but is not  limited to any person using,
storing or transporting oil immediately prior to entry of such oil into  the navigable waters of the
state, and shall specifically include carriers and bailees of such oil.
[(23)] (25) “Pipeline” means a facility, including piping, compressors, pump  stations and storage
tanks, used to transport oil between facilities or between facilities and tank vessels.
[(24)] (26) “Region  of operation” with respect to the holder of a contingency plan means the area
where the operations of the holder that require a contingency plan are located.
[(25)] (27)  “Removal costs” means the  costs of removal that are incurred after a discharge of
oil has occurred or, in any case in which there is a  substantial threat of a discharge of oil, the costs
to prevent, minimize or mitigate oil pollution from the incident.
[(26)] (28)  “Responsible party” has the  meaning given under section 1001 of the Oil Pollution
Act of 1990 (P.L. 101-380).
[(27)] (29) “Ship” means any boat, ship, vessel, barge or other floating craft of any kind.
[(28)(a)] (30)(a)  “State on-scene coordinator” means the state official appointed by  the Depart-
ment of Environmental Quality to represent the department and the State of Oregon in response to
an oil or hazardous material spill or release or threatened spill  or release and to coordinate cleanup
response with state and local agencies.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(A) “Spill or release” means the discharge, deposit, injection, dumping, spilling,  emitting, re-
leasing, leaking or placing of any  oil or hazardous material into the air or into or on any land or
waters of this state except as authorized by a permit issued  under ORS chapter 454, 459, 459A, 468,
468A, 468B or 469 or ORS  466.005 to 466.385, 466.990 (1) and (2) or 466.992 or federal law, or except
when being stored or used for its intended purpose.
(B) “Threatened spill or release” means oil or hazardous material is likely to  escape or be car-
ried into the air or into or on any land or waters of the state, including from a ship as  defined in
this section that is in imminent danger of sinking.
[(29)] (31)  “Tank  vessel” means a ship that is constructed or adapted to carry oil in bulk as
cargo or cargo residue. “Tank vessel” does not include:
(a) A vessel carrying oil in drums, barrels or other packages;
(b) A vessel carrying oil as fuel or stores for that vessel; or
(c) An oil spill response barge or vessel.
[3]
HB 4004
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(30)] (32) “Worst case spill” means:
(a) In the case of a vessel, a spill of the entire cargo and fuel of the tank  vessel complicated
by adverse weather conditions; [ and]
(b) In the case of an onshore or offshore facility,  the largest foreseeable spill in adverse weather
conditions[ .]; and
(c) In the case  of a high hazard train route, a spill of the entire capacity, measured in
barrels of oil, of a train that consists of the largest number of tanker railroad cars  trans-
porting oil as cargo that may be operated on the high hazard train route in a  given period,
in adverse weather conditions.
SECTION 2.  ORS 468B.340 is amended to read:
468B.340. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(a) Oil spills present a serious danger to the fragile natural environment of the state.
(b) Commercial vessel activity on the navigable waters of  the state is vital to the economic in-
terests of the people of the state.
(c) Recent studies conducted in the wake  of disastrous oil spills have identified the following
problems in the transport and storage of oil:
(A) Gaps in regulatory oversight;
(B) Incomplete cost recovery by states;
(C) Despite research in spill cleanup technology, it is unlikely that a large percentage of  oil can
be recovered from a catastrophic spill;
(D) Because response efforts cannot effectively reduce the impact of oil  spills, prevention is the
most effective approach to oil spill management; and
(E) Comprehensive oil spill prevention demands participation  by industry, citizens, environ-
mental organizations and local, state, federal and international governments.
(2) Therefore, the Legislative Assembly declares it is the intent of ORS 468B.345  to 468B.415 to
establish a program to promote:
(a) The prevention of oil spills especially on the large, navigable waters of the Columbia  River,
the Willamette River and the Oregon coast;
(b) The prevention  of oil spills into inland rivers and streams serving as essential habitat
for salmon and other wildlife or as a source  of water for consumption, irrigation or other
public uses of local concern;
(c) The prevention of spills from railroad cars transporting oil as cargo;
(d) The prevention of spills along high hazard train routes;
[(b)] (e)  Oil spill response preparedness,  including the identification of actions and content re-
quired for an effective contingency plan;
[(c)] (f)  A consistent west coast approach to oil spill prevention and response;
[(d)] (g)  The establishment, coordination  and duties of safety committees as provided in ORS
468B.415; and
[(e)] (h)  To the maximum extent possible,  coordination of state programs with the programs and
regulations of the United States Coast Guard and adjacent states.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2018 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 468B.345 to
468B.415.
SECTION 4.  Notwithstanding ORS 468B.300, as used in  ORS 468B.345 to 468B.415,
“facility” has the meaning given that term in  ORS 468B.300, except that “facility” does not
include railroad cars.
[4]
HB 4004
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 5.  ORS 468B.345 is amended to read:
468B.345. (1)(a) Unless an oil spill prevention and emergency response plan has  been approved
by the Department of Environmental Quality and has been properly implemented, no person shall:
[(a)] (A)  Cause or permit the operation of an onshore facility in the state;
[(b)] (B)  Cause or permit the operation of an offshore facility in the state; or
[(c)] (C)  Cause or permit the operation of  a covered vessel within the navigable waters of the
state.
[(2)] (b)  It  is not a defense to an action brought for a violation of this subsection [ (1) of this
section] that the person charged believed that a  current contingency plan had been approved by the
department.
[(3)] (c)  A contingency plan shall be renewed at least once every five years.
[(4) This section shall not apply to the operation of a cargo or passenger  vessel on Yaquina Bay
or on the navigable waters of  the state in the Pacific Ocean used by cargo or passenger vessels entering
or leaving Yaquina Bay until January 1, 1998. ]
(2)(a) A railroad that owns or operates a high hazard train route in this  state shall have
an oil spill prevention and emergency response plan that has been approved by the  depart-
ment.
(b) It is not a defense to an action brought for a violation of this subsection that  the
person charged believed that  a current contingency plan had been approved by the depart-
ment.
(c) A contingency  plan for a high hazard train route shall be renewed at least once every
five years.
(d) Failure by an owner or operator of a high hazard train route to  comply with this
subsection or to be  in compliance with a contingency plan submitted under this subsection
does not preclude the owner or operator from operating the high hazard train route.
SECTION 6. Section 7 of this 2018 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 468B.345  to
468B.415.
SECTION 7. (1) The Environmental Quality Commission, after consultation and in coor-
dination with the State Fire Marshal, shall adopt rules defining:
(a) Standards for the preparation of contingency plans for high hazard train routes; and
(b) Oil spill response zones  along high hazard train routes and the amount of equipment
identified in a contingency plan that is required to be regularly located in the zones.
(2) The rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section shall:
(a) To the extent feasible and appropriate, define standards for the preparation  of con-
tingency plans for high hazard train routes that are  equivalent to standards for the prepa-
ration of contingency plans for facilities adopted under ORS 468B.350; and
(b) Require the owners and operators of high hazard train routes to demonstrate  an
ability to meet the requirements of subsection (3) of this section.
(3) A railroad that owns or operates a high hazard train route in this state shall:
(a) Offer training  at least once every three years to each fire department, including each
tribal fire  department, having jurisdiction along the high hazard train routes owned or op-
erated by the railroad. Training provided under this paragraph must be coordinated by the
State Fire Marshal and meet any requirements for ongoing training adopted  by the State
Fire Marshal by rule under ORS 453.392.
(b) Following confirmation of a discharge  from a train along a high hazard train route,
[5]
HB 4004
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
deliver and deploy  sufficient equipment and trained personnel to contain and recover dis-
charged oil or hazardous materials and to protect life, safety, property and the environment.
(c) Within a certain time period after confirmation of a discharge as set forth  in rule by
the commission, be capable of delivering and deploying containment booms, boats,  oil recov-
ery equipment, trained staff and all other materials needed to provide:
(A) On-site containment and recovery of a volume of oil equal to  a percentage of the
calculated worst case spill as required by the commission by rule  at any location along the
route; and
(B) Protection of the listed sensitive areas and potable water intakes that are within  a
distance as specified by the commission  by rule from a discharge site and within eight hours
of water travel time downstream in any river or stream that the high hazard  train route
abuts.
(d) Conduct at  least one oil containment, recovery and listed sensitive area protection
drill every three years, at a location and time chosen by  the Department of Environmental
Quality.
(4) A railroad may arrange with a contractor or  other qualified public or private entity
to supply containment booms under subsection (3) of this section. Any arrangement  entered
into under this subsection must be tested by drill at least once every five years.
SECTION 8.  ORS 468B.355 is amended to read:
468B.355. (1) A contingency plan for a facility or  covered vessel shall be submitted to the De-
partment of Environmental  Quality within 12 months after the Environmental Quality Commission
adopts rules under ORS 468B.350. The department may adopt a schedule for  submission of an oil
contingency plan within the  12-month period. The schedule for the Columbia River shall be coordi-
nated with the State of Washington. The department  may adopt an alternative schedule for the
Oregon coast and the Willamette River.
(2) A contingency plan  for a high hazard train route shall be submitted to the department
within 12  months after the commission adopts rules under section 7 of this 2018 Act. The
department may adopt a schedule for  submission of a contingency plan within the 12-month
period.
[(2)] (3) The contingency plan for a  facility shall be submitted by the owner or operator of the
facility or by a qualified oil spill response cooperative in which  the facility owner or operator is a
participating member.
[(3)] (4) The contingency plan for a tank vessel shall be submitted by:
(a) The owner or operator of the tank vessel;
(b) The owner or operator of the facility at which the vessel will be  loading or unloading its
cargo; or
(c) A qualified oil spill response  cooperative in which the tank vessel owner or operator is a
participating member.
[(4)] (5) Subject to conditions imposed  by the department, the contingency plan for a tank vessel,
if submitted by the owner or operator of a facility, may be submitted as a single  plan for all tank
vessels of a particular class that will be loading or unloading cargo at the facility.
[(5)] (6)  The contingency plan for a cargo vessel  or passenger vessel may be submitted by the
owner or operator  of the vessel, or the agent for the vessel resident in this state. Subject to con-
ditions imposed by the department, the owner, operator, agent or a maritime  association may submit
a single contingency plan for cargo vessels or passenger vessels of a particular class.
[6]
HB 4004
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(7) The contingency plan for a high hazard train  route shall be submitted by the railroad
that owns or operates the high hazard train route.
[(6)] (8)  A  person that has contracted with a facility , [ or] covered vessel  or railroad that op-
erates a high hazard train route  to provide containment and cleanup  services and that meets the
standards established by the commission under ORS 468B.350  or section 7 of  this 2018 Act  may
submit the contingency plan for any facility , [ or] covered vessel  or high hazard train route  for
which the person is contractually  obligated to provide services. Subject to conditions imposed by the
department, the person may submit a single plan for more than one covered vessel.
[(7)] (9)  The requirements of submitting a contingency plan under this section  may be satisfied
by a covered vessel  by submission of proof of assessment participation by the vessel in a maritime
association. Subject to conditions imposed by the department, the association may  submit a single
plan for more than one facility  or covered vessel or may submit a single plan providing contingen-
cies to respond for different classes of covered vessels.
[(8)] (10) A contingency plan prepared for an agency of the federal government or an adjacent
state that satisfies the requirements of ORS 468B.345 to  468B.360 and the rules adopted by the
[Environmental Quality] commission may be accepted as a  plan under ORS 468B.345. The commission
shall [ assure] ensure that , to the greatest extent  possible, requirements for a contingency plan un-
der ORS 468B.345 to 468B.360 are consistent with requirements for a plan under federal law.
[(9)] (11) Covered vessels may satisfy the requirements of submitting a contingency plan under
this section through  proof of current assessment participation in an approved plan maintained with
the department by a maritime association.
[(10)] (12) A maritime association may submit a  contingency plan for a cooperative group of
covered vessels. Covered vessels that have not previously obtained approval of a plan  may enter the
navigable waters of the state if, upon entering such waters, the vessel pays the  established assess-
ment for participation in the approved plan maintained by the association.
[(11)] (13) A maritime association  shall have a lien on the responsible vessel if the vessel owner
or operator  fails to remit any regular operating assessments and shall further have a lien for the
recovery for any direct costs provided to or for the vessel by the  maritime association for oil spill
response or spill related communications services. The lien shall be enforced  in accordance with
applicable law.
[(12)] (14)  Obligations incurred by a maritime association and any other liabilities or claims
against the association shall be enforced only against the assets of the association,  and no liability
for the  debts or action of the association exists against either the State of Oregon or any other
subdivision or instrumentality thereof, or against any member, officer, employee or  agent of the as-
sociation in an individual or representative capacity.
[(13)] (15) Except  as otherwise provided in ORS chapters 468, 468A and 468B, neither the mem-
bers of the association, its officers, agents or employees, nor the business entities by whom  the
members are regularly employed, may be  held individually responsible for errors in judgment, mis-
takes or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, person or employee,  save
for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime.
[(14)] (16)  Assessment participation in a maritime association does not constitute a  defense to
liability imposed under ORS 468B.345 to 468B.415 or other state or federal law. Such assessment
participation  shall  not relieve a covered vessel from complying with those portions of the approved
maritime association contingency plan that may require vessel specific  oil spill response equipment,
training or capabilities for that vessel.
[7]
HB 4004
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(15)] (17)  A person providing a contingency plan for a cargo or  passenger vessel under this
section shall be exempt from liability as provided under ORS 468B.425 for any action taken  or
omitted in the course of providing contingency planning service.
SECTION 9.  ORS 468B.360 is amended to read:
468B.360. In reviewing the  contingency plan required by ORS 468B.345, the Department of En-
vironmental Quality shall consider at least the following factors:
(1) The adequacy of containment and cleanup equipment, personnel, communications  equipment,
notification procedures and  call-down lists, response time and logistical arrangements for coordi-
nation and implementation of response efforts to remove oil spills promptly and properly and  to
protect the environment;
(2) The nature and amount of vessel  or high hazard train  route traffic within the area covered
by the plan;
(3) The volume and type of oil being transported within the area covered by the plan;
(4) The existence of navigational hazards within the area covered by the plan;
(5) The history and circumstances surrounding prior spills of  oil within the area covered by the
plan;
(6) The sensitivity of fisheries and wildlife and other natural resources within the area covered
by the plan;
(7) Relevant information on previous spills contained in on-scene coordinator reports  covered
by the plan;
(8) The  extent to which reasonable, cost-effective measures to reduce the likelihood that a spill
will occur have been incorporated into the plan;
(9) The number of covered vessels calling in , and high hazard train routes  and [ the] facilities
located in , the geographic area  and the resulting ability of local agencies and industry groups to
develop, finance and maintain a contingency plan  and spill response system for those vessels , high
hazard train routes  and facilities; and
(10) The spill  response equipment and resources available to a person providing a contingency
plan for cargo and passenger vessels under contingency plans filed by the person under  state or
federal law for other covered vessels or facilities owned or operated by that person.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 468B.365 is amended to read:
468B.365. (1) The Department of Environmental Quality shall  approve a contingency plan only
if it determines that :
(a)(A) The plan  for a covered vessel or facility  meets the requirements of ORS 468B.345 to
468B.360 and[:]
[(a)] the covered vessel or facility  demonstrates evidence of compliance with ORS 468B.390;
[and] or
(B) The plan for a high hazard train route meets the requirements  of ORS 468B.345 to
468B.360; and
(b) If implemented, the plan is capable, to  the maximum extent practicable in terms of personnel,
materials and equipment, of removing oil promptly and properly  and minimizing any damage to the
environment.
(2) An owner or  operator of a covered vessel , high hazard train route  or facility shall notify
the department in writing immediately of any significant  change affecting the contingency plan, in-
cluding changes in any factor set forth in this section or in rules adopted by the Environmental
Quality Commission. The department may require the  owner or operator to update a contingency
[8]
HB 4004
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
plan as a result of these changes.
(3) A holder of an approved contingency plan does not violate the terms of the  contingency plan
by furnishing to another plan holder, after  notifying the department, equipment, materials or per-
sonnel to assist the other plan holder in a response to an oil discharge.  The plan holder shall re-
place or return the transferred equipment, materials and personnel as soon as feasible.
(4) The department may attach  any reasonable term or condition to its approval or modification
of a contingency plan that the department  determines is necessary to [ insure] ensure  that the ap-
plicant:
(a) Has access to sufficient  resources to protect environmentally sensitive areas and to prevent,
contain, clean up and mitigate  potential oil discharges from the facility or tank vessel  or along the
high hazard train route ;
(b) Maintains personnel levels sufficient to carry out emergency operations; and
(c) Complies with the contingency plan.
(5) The contingency plan must provide for the use by  the applicant of the best technology
available at the time the contingency plan was submitted or renewed.
(6) The department may require an applicant or  a holder of an approved contingency plan to
take steps necessary to demonstrate its ability to carry out the contingency plan, including:
(a) Periodic training;
(b) Response team exercises; and
(c) Verification of access to inventories of equipment, supplies and personnel identified as
available in the approved contingency plan.
(7) The department may consider evidence that oil discharge  prevention measures such as dou-
ble hulls or double bottoms on vessels or barges, secondary  containment systems, hydrostatic test-
ing, enhanced vessel traffic systems or enhanced crew  or staffing levels have been implemented and
in its discretion, may make exceptions to the requirements of this section to  reflect the reduced risk
of oil discharges from the facility or tank vessel , or  along the high hazard train route,  for which
the plan is submitted or being modified.
(8)(a) Before the department approves or modifies a  contingency plan required under ORS
468B.345, the department shall provide a copy of the  contingency plan to the State Department of
Fish and Wildlife, the office of the  State Fire Marshal and the Department of Land Conservation
and Development for review.
(b) In addition to providing copies to the agencies listed in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section, before  approving or modifying a contingency plan for a high hazard train route, the
Department of Environmental Quality shall provide a copy of the  contingency plan to feder-
ally recognized Indian tribes.
(c) [ The] Agencies  and tribes that receive copies of a  contingency plan under this sub-
section shall review the plan according to procedures and time limits established by rule  of the
Environmental Quality Commission.
(9) Upon  approval of a contingency plan, the department shall issue to the plan holder a certif-
icate stating that  the plan has been approved. The certificate shall include the name of the
facility , high hazard train route  or tank vessel for which the certificate  is issued, the effective
date of the plan and the date by which the plan must be submitted for renewal.
(10) The  approval of a contingency plan by the department does not constitute an express as-
surance regarding the adequacy of the plan or constitute a defense to  liability imposed under ORS
chapters 468, 468A and 468B or any other state law.
[9]
HB 4004
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 11.  ORS 468B.385 is amended to read:
468B.385. (1) Upon request of a plan holder or on the initiative  of the Department of Environ-
mental Quality, the department, after notice and opportunity for hearing, may modify  its approval
of a contingency plan if the department determines  that a change has occurred in the operation of
the facility , high hazard train route  or  tank vessel necessitating an amended or supplemental plan,
or that the operator’s discharge experience demonstrates a necessity for modification.
(2) The department,  after notice and opportunity for hearing, may revoke its approval of a con-
tingency plan if the department determines that:
(a) Approval was obtained by fraud or misrepresentation;
(b) The operator does not have access to the quality or quantity of  resources identified in the
plan;
(c) A term or condition of approval or modification has been violated; or
(d) The plan holder is not in compliance with the plan and the deficiency materially affects the
plan holder’s response capability.
(3) Failure of a holder  of an approved or modified contingency plan to comply with the plan or
to have access to the quality or quantity of resources identified in the  plan or to respond with those
resources within the shortest possible time in the event of a spill is a violation of ORS 468B.345  to
468B.415 for purposes of ORS 466.992, 468.140, 468.943 and any other applicable law.
(4) If the  holder of an approved or modified contingency plan fails to respond to and conduct
cleanup operations of an unpermitted discharge of oil with the quality and quantity  of resources
identified in the plan and in a manner required under the plan, the  holder is strictly liable, jointly
and severally, for the civil penalty assessed under ORS 466.992 and 468.140.
(5) In order to be considered in compliance with a contingency plan, the plan holder must:
(a) Establish and carry out procedures identified in the  plan as being the responsibility of the
holder of the plan;
(b) Have access to and have on hand the quantity and quality of  equipment, personnel and other
resources identified as being accessible or on hand in the plan;
(c) Fulfill the assurances espoused in the plan in the manner described in the plan;
(d) Comply with terms and conditions attached to the plan by  the department under ORS
468B.345 to 468B.380; and
(e) Successfully demonstrate the ability to carry out the plan when  required by the department
under ORS 468B.370.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 468B.410 is amended to read:
468B.410. (1) The Oil Spill Prevention  Fund is established separate and distinct from the General
Fund in the State Treasury. Interest earned on the fund shall be credited  to the fund. Moneys re-
ceived by the Department of Environmental  Quality for the purpose of oil and hazardous material
spill prevention and the fees collected under ORS  468B.405 shall be paid into the State Treasury and
credited to the fund.
(2) The State Treasurer shall invest and reinvest moneys in the Oil Spill Prevention Fund  in the
manner prescribed by law.
(3) The moneys in the Oil Spill Prevention Fund are appropriated continuously to  the Depart-
ment of Environmental Quality to be used in the manner described in subsection (4) of  this section.
(4) The Oil Spill Prevention Fund may be used by the department [ of Environmental Quality ] to:
(a) Pay all costs of the department incurred to:
(A) Review the contingency plans submitted under ORS 468B.360;
[10]
HB 4004
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Conduct training, response exercises, inspection and tests in order to verify equipment in-
ventories and ability to prevent and respond to oil release emergencies  and to undertake other ac-
tivities intended to verify or establish the preparedness of the state, a municipality  or a party
required by ORS  468B.345 to 468B.415 to have an approved contingency plan to act in accordance
with that plan; and
(C) Verify or establish proof of financial responsibility required by ORS 468B.390.
(b) Review and revise the oil spill response plan required by ORS 468B.495 and 468B.500.
(5) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of subsection  (4) of this section, moneys in
the Oil Spill Prevention Fund may not be used to pay the  costs of the department that may
be paid with moneys deposited in the High Hazard Train Route Oil Spill Prevention Fund
established under section 14 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 13.
Section 14 of this 2018 Act is added to and made a part of  ORS 468B.345 to
468B.415.
SECTION 14. (1) The High  Hazard Train Route Oil Spill Prevention Fund is established
in the State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the
High Hazard Train Route Oil Spill Prevention Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The fund shall consist of:
(a) All moneys placed in the fund as provided by law; and
(b) Any gifts, grants, donations, endowments or bequests from any public  or private
source.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the  Department of Environ-
mental Quality to be used only to pay the costs of the department incurred to:
(a) Review, under ORS 468B.360, contingency plans for high hazard train routes;
(b) Conduct training, response  exercises, inspection and tests in order to verify equip-
ment inventories  and ability to prevent and respond to oil release emergencies related to
high hazard train routes and to undertake other activities intended to verify or establish the
preparedness of the state, a municipality or an owner or operator of a high  hazard train
route required by ORS 468B.345 to 468B.415 to have an  approved contingency plan to act in
accordance with that plan; and
(c) Develop, review and revise the portions of the  oil spill response plan required by ORS
468B.495 and 468B.500 that relate to listed sensitive areas along high hazard train routes.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 468B.495 is amended to read:
468B.495. (1) The Department of Environmental Quality shall develop an integrated, interagency
response  plan  for oil or hazardous material spills in the Columbia River, the Willamette River up
to Willamette Falls and the coastal waters and  estuaries of the state  and listed sensitive areas
along high hazard train routes . In developing the response plan, the  department shall work with
all affected  local, state and federal agencies and with any volunteer group interested in participating
in oil or hazardous material spill response.
(2) The  plan developed under subsection (1) of this section shall be consistent to the extent
practicable with the plan for a statewide hazardous material emergency response system  established
by the State Fire Marshal under ORS 453.374.
RAILROAD FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY STATEMENTS
SECTION 16. Section 17 of this 2018 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 468B.300 to
[11]
HB 4004
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
468B.500.
SECTION 17. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Cost to clean up a worst case  spill” means a dollar amount equal to the worst case
spill calculated under paragraph (b) of this subsection multiplied by $16,800.
(b) “Worst  case spill” means a spill of an amount of barrels of oil calculated as required
by rule by the Environmental Quality Commission.
(2) A railroad that owns or operates a high hazard train  route shall annually submit to
the Department of Environmental Quality a statement that:
(a) Describes all insurance carried by the railroad that  covers any losses resulting from
a worst case spill, as well as the coverage amounts, limitations and other conditions  of the
insurance;
(b) Identifies the capacity, measured in barrels of oil, of trains consisting of the average
and the  largest number of tanker railroad cars transporting oil as cargo that were operated
on high hazard train routes by the railroad in the previous calendar year; and
(c) Includes additional information sufficient to demonstrate the railroad’s ability to  pay
the cost to clean up a worst case spill.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 18. (1) Sections 3, 4, 6, 7, 13, 14, 16 and 17 of this 2018 Act and the amendments
to statutes by sections 1,  2, 5, 8 to 12 and 15 of this 2018 Act become operative on January
1, 2019.
(2) The Environmental Quality  Commission, the Department of Environmental Quality,
the Department of Transportation and the State Fire Marshal  may take any action before
the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary for the com-
mission, the departments or the State Fire  Marshal to exercise, on and after the operative
date specified in subsection (1) of this section, any of the duties, functions and powers con-
ferred on  the commission, the departments and the State Fire Marshal by sections 3, 4, 6,
7, 13, 14, 16 and 17 of this 2018 Act and the amendments  to statutes by sections 1, 2, 5, 8 to
12 and 15 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 19. The unit captions used in this 2018 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 20. This 2018 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2018
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[12]