Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at the request  of the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue  lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $10 million in net proceeds
and interest earnings for the purposes described in subsection  (2) of this section, plus an
additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be  necessary to pay bond-related
costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this  section in an amount sufficient to
provide $10 million in net proceeds and interest earnings must be transferred to  the Oregon
Business Development Department for deposit  in the Levee Project Grant Fund established
under ORS 285B.421, to be used for any purpose for which  funds in the Levee Project Grant
Fund may be used, including, but not limited to, grants for  investigating the adequacy of
levees and improving levees so they may be certified and accredited.
(3) Lottery bonds authorized under this section must be issued no later  than June 30,
2022.
(4) The Legislative Assembly finds that levees are  a vital component of the state’s
infrastructure and play an essential role in providing public safety and reducing the  risk of
flooding while furthering economic development and protecting  parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife within Oregon. The Legislative Assembly  thereby finds that the
use of lottery bonds for the purposes described  in subsection (2) of this section is an appro-
priate use of state lottery funds under Article XV, section 4, of the  Oregon Constitution, and
ORS 461.510.
SECTION 2.  ORS 285B.421 is amended to read:
285B.421. (1) The Levee Project Grant Fund is established in the State Treasury,  separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Levee Project  Grant Fund must be credited
to the fund. The Levee Project Grant Fund consists of moneys deposited in the fund  under section
33, chapter 671, Oregon Laws  2019, and section 1 of this 2021 Act,  and may include moneys ap-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1221
HB 2885
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
propriated, allocated, deposited or transferred to the fund by the  Legislative Assembly or otherwise
and interest earned on moneys in the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously  appropriated to the Oregon Business Development De-
partment for the Oregon Infrastructure Finance Authority to provide  grants under ORS 285B.420 for
levee projects as defined in ORS 285B.410.
(3) Grants from the fund for  planning projects are limited to a maximum of $2 million per ap-
plicant per biennium.
(4) Grants from the fund for  construction or capital improvement projects may not exceed an
amount equal to 80 percent of the total cost of the project.
(5) A grant may not be awarded from the fund unless  the applicant pledges matching funds to
the project of at least 20 percent of the amount of the grant.
(6) At least 60 percent of the dollar value of grants awarded from  the fund in any
biennium shall be used to provide assistance with levee projects to rural or distressed  areas
as those terms are defined in ORS 285A.010.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 285B.410 is amended to read:
285B.410. As used in ORS 285B.410 to 285B.482, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Airport” means:
(a) A runway, taxiway, aircraft parking apron, ramp, auto parking area, access  road, safety area
or runway protection zone;
(b) An airport-related facility, including a hangar, terminal, air traffic control  tower or other
building;
(c) A signal, navigational aid or traffic control system; or
(d) A fuel tank or other physical airport improvement.
(2)(a) “Community development project” means a project that involves strategic planning,
training or  other technical assistance as defined by the Oregon Business Development Department
by rule, and that is  aimed at strengthening the economic development, community development or
infrastructure priority setting of a municipality or region.
(b) “Community development project” includes the following activities:
(A) Developing and managing short-term and long-term projects;
(B) Developing priorities for infrastructure projects;
(C) Strategic planning related to furthering economic or community development; or
(D) Training related to  economic or community development, including training to improve
leadership skills, technical skills or analytical skills, particularly in rural and distressed areas.
(c) “Community development project” includes projects that  may encompass a municipality or
any part of a municipality and may be undertaken in cooperation with another municipality.
(3) “Development project” means a project  for the acquisition, improvement, construction, dem-
olition, or redevelopment of municipally owned utilities, buildings, land, transportation facilities  or
other facilities that assist  the economic and community development of the municipality, including
planning project activities that are necessary or useful as determined by the  Oregon Infrastructure
Finance Authority.
(4) “Direct project management costs” means expenses directly related to a project that are in-
curred by a municipality solely to  support or manage a project eligible for assistance under ORS
285B.410 to 285B.482. “Direct project  management costs” does not include routine or ongoing ex-
penses of the municipality.
(5) “Emergency project” means a development project resulting from an emergency as  defined
[2]
HB 2885
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in ORS 401.025, to which federal disaster relief has been committed.
(6) “Energy system”  means a facility necessary for the distribution, transmission or generation
of energy, including but  not limited to facilities powered by wind, solar energy or biofuel and facil-
ities for the collection, storage, transmission  or distribution of a fuel, including natural gas, methane
or hydrogen.
(7) “Levee project”  means a community development project, development project, planning
project or other project that is  associated with [ levee] the construction, capital improvement,
inspection, accreditation, certification or repair of levees, flood control  embankments or flood
control facilities.
(8) “Marine facility” means:
(a) A wharf, dock, freight handling or passenger facility;
(b) A navigation channel or structure, including a project funded under ORS 777.267; or
(c) Any other physical marine facility improvement.
(9) “Municipality” means an Oregon city or county, the Port of Portland created by ORS 778.010,
a county service district organized under ORS chapter 451, a district as defined in ORS  198.010, a
drainage district organized under ORS chapter 547, a tribal  council of a federally recognized Indian
tribe in this state or an airport district organized under ORS chapter 838.
(10) “Planning project” means:
(a) A project related to a potential development  project for preliminary, final or construction
engineering;
(b) A survey, site investigation or environmental action;
(c) A financial, technical or other feasibility report, study or plan; or
(d) An activity that the authority determines to be necessary or useful in  planning for a poten-
tial development project.
(11) “Project” means a development,  community development, planning, levee or emergency
project.
(12) “Railroad” means:
(a) A main line, siding, yard, connecting or auxiliary track, right of way or easement;
(b) An industrial spur or related facility, including  a depot, shop, maintenance building or other
building;
(c) A signal or traffic control system;
(d) A bridge or tunnel;
(e) A dock, pit, conveyor, bin, crane, piping system, tank or pavement for  unloading, loading or
transfer of freight, trailers or containers; or
(f) Any other physical railroad improvement.
(13) “Road” means a  street, highway or thruway or a road-related structure that provides for
continuity of a right  of way, including a bridge, tunnel, culvert or similar structure or other physical
road-related improvement.
(14) “Rural area” has the meaning given that term in ORS 285A.010.
(15) “Solid waste disposal site” has the meaning given the term “disposal site” in ORS 459.005.
(16) “Telecommunications system” means equipment or a  facility for the electronic transmission
of voice, data, text, image or video.
(17) “Transportation” means a system for movement of freight or passengers.
(18) “Utilities” means a solid waste disposal site or a water, sewage,  storm water drainage, en-
ergy or telecommunications system.
[3]
HB 2885
1
2
3
4
SECTION 4.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]