Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) If a state agency lends or grants moneys to a  private entity to be used
for capital costs of a research  center, the state agency shall, before lending or granting the
moneys, enter into an agreement with the private entity that grants the  Oregon Department
of Administrative Services a  right to receive some or all of the revenues derived from any
patents obtained as a result of work performed at or enabled by the research center.
(2) The agreement may use any commercially  reasonable method of allocating revenues.
In negotiating the agreement, the state agency shall consider at least the following goals:
(a) Maximization of the total revenue granted to the state under the agreement; and
(b) Promotion of technological innovation.
(3) The state agency shall consult with the Department of Justice when  negotiating the
agreement. The state agency may not execute the agreement  unless the agreement is first
approved by the Department of Justice.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Private entity” means any entity that  is not a public body as defined in ORS 174.109.
(b) “Research center” means any facility designed, in whole or in part, for research  or
development of technology or other innovations, but does not include a facility that is owned
by a public university.
(c) “State agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 276A.230.
SECTION 2.
(1) When the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, pursuant to
an agreement under section 1 of this 2018 Act, receives revenues derived from a  patent, the
department shall deposit the revenues in the Patent Revenue  Account established under
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 74
HB 4039
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
subsection (2) of this section and shall distribute the revenues as follows:
(a) The department shall  deposit 10 percent of the revenues in the Critical Priority
Resiliency Grant Fund established under section 4 of this 2018 Act.
(b) The  department shall deposit 25 percent of the revenues in the Critical Priority In-
novation Grant Fund established under section 6 of this 2018 Act.
(c) The department shall deposit  25 percent of the revenues in the Critical Technology
Capitalization Fund established under section 8 of this 2018 Act.
(d) The department shall, in consultation with the  Regional Solutions Program estab-
lished under ORS 284.754, distribute 25 percent of the revenues for purposes that  will further
innovation in the geographic region or regions in which the patent originated.
(e) The department may expend up to five percent of the  revenues for necessary costs
of administration of this section and section 1 of this 2018 Act.
(f) The department shall transfer the remaining  portion of the revenues to the General
Fund to be used for general governmental purposes. It is  the intent of the Legislative As-
sembly that moneys described  in this paragraph be expended for capital costs related to
emergency preparedness.
(2) The Patent Revenue Account is established in  the State Treasury, separate and dis-
tinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Patent Revenue Account must be
credited to  the account. The account consists of moneys deposited in the account under
subsection (1) of this section and may include moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or
transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or  otherwise and interest earned on
moneys in the account. The moneys  in the account are continuously appropriated to the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services for the purposes specified  in subsection (1)
of this section.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Office of Emergency  Management shall, by rule, develop and ad-
minister a grant program to distribute preparedness equipment,  or moneys to purchase
preparedness equipment, to applicants throughout this state.
(2) Pursuant to the grant program:
(a) Any entity with responsibility for or  expertise in emergency preparedness, including
local governments and private entities, may apply to receive a grant.  Applicants must dem-
onstrate a need for the specific preparedness equipment requested.
(b) In consultation with the Oregon Homeland Security Council, the  office shall deter-
mine which requests from applicants, if fulfilled, will maximize the state’s ability to  respond
in case of emergency, taking into account considerations including but not limited  to the
following:
(A) The level  of need for the requested preparedness equipment demonstrated by the
applicant;
(B) The types  of emergencies most likely to occur in the region where the applicant is
located; and
(C) Whether the applicant has alternative means  of acquiring the requested preparedness
equipment.
(c) The office  shall issue grants to the applicants identified under paragraph (b) of this
subsection. The office may either  purchase the requested preparedness equipment for dis-
tribution to the recipient or  issue cash to the recipient to purchase the requested
preparedness equipment.
[2]
HB 4039
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) The office may impose  reasonable conditions on grant recipients, including conditions
under which grants must be repaid.
(3) The office may adopt rules to administer this section.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Emergency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 401.025.
(b) “Preparedness equipment” means equipment, tools, vehicles,  fixtures or improve-
ments upon real property, or other property that may be  used to decrease the risk to life
and property resulting from an emergency.
SECTION 4.
The Critical Priority Resiliency Grant  Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and  distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Critical Pri-
ority Resiliency Grant Fund must be  credited to the fund. The fund consists of moneys de-
posited in the fund under section 2 of this 2018 Act and may include  moneys appropriated,
allocated, deposited or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or  otherwise and
interest earned on moneys in the account. The moneys in the account are continuously  ap-
propriated to  the Office of Emergency Management for the purposes of making grants under
section 3 of this 2018 Act and to pay the  administrative costs associated with the fund and
with making grants from the fund.
SECTION 5. (1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall, by rule, develop and
administer a grant program to fund proposals that are intended to promote innovation-based
economic development in this state.
(2) Pursuant to the grant program:
(a) Any individual or public or private entity may apply  to receive a grant. An applicant
for a grant must submit a proposal to the department that describes the proposed use of the
grant moneys and includes any additional information required by the department by rule.
(b) The department may impose reasonable conditions on grant recipients,  including
conditions under which grants must be repaid.
(3) The department may adopt rules to administer this section.
SECTION 6.
The Critical Priority Innovation Grant Fund  is established in the State
Treasury, separate and  distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Critical Pri-
ority Innovation Grant Fund must be credited to the fund.  The fund consists of moneys de-
posited in the fund under section 2 of this 2018 Act and may include  moneys appropriated,
allocated, deposited or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or  otherwise and
interest earned on moneys in the account. The moneys in the account are continuously  ap-
propriated to the Oregon  Business Development Department for the purposes of making
grants under section 5 of this  2018 Act and to pay the administrative costs associated with
the fund and with making grants from the fund.
SECTION 7. (1) The Department of Education shall, by rule adopted by the State  Board
of Education, develop and administer a grant  program to fund proposals that are intended
to promote research and development of energy-related technologies.
(2) Pursuant to the grant program:
(a) Any individual or public or private  entity may apply to receive a grant. An applicant
for a grant must submit a proposal to the department that describes the proposed use of the
grant moneys and includes any additional information required by the department by rule.
(b) The  department may impose reasonable conditions on grant recipients, including
conditions under which grants must be repaid.
[3]
HB 4039
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
(3) The board may adopt rules to administer this section.
SECTION 8.
The Critical  Technology Capitalization Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Critical
Technology Capitalization Fund must be credited to the fund. The fund consists of  moneys
deposited in the fund under section 2 of this 2018 Act and may  include moneys appropriated,
allocated, deposited or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or  otherwise and
interest earned on moneys in the account. The moneys in the account are continuously  ap-
propriated to the Department of Education for the purposes of making grants under section
7 of this 2018 Act and to pay the administrative costs associated with the fund  and with
making grants from the fund.
SECTION 9.
Section 1 of this 2018 Act applies to grants or loans that are first  authorized
on or after the effective date of this 2018 Act.
[4]