Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 477.993 is amended to read:
477.993. (1) Violation of any of the provisions of ORS 477.510, 477.515, 477.535 to 477.550, 477.565,
477.615, 477.625, 477.635 to 477.670[ ,] or  477.695[, 477.710, 477.720 or 477.740 ], or any rule or order
adopted pursuant thereto, is a violation punishable as follows:
(a) For the first offense, as a Class D violation.
(b) For the second offense, as a Class C violation.
(c) For the third offense, as a Class A violation.
(2) Violation of any of the provisions of ORS 477.710, 477.720 or 477.740,  or any rule or
order adopted pursuant thereto, is a violation punishable as follows:
(a) For the first offense, as a Class C misdemeanor.
(b) For the second offense, as a Class B misdemeanor.
(c) For the third offense, as a Class A misdemeanor.
[(2)] (3)  Multiple violations of any single requirement of this chapter, or of any  rule or order
adopted pursuant thereto, in an operation area shall be  considered a single violation. However, each
day a violation continues shall be considered a separate violation.
[(3)] (4)  Notwithstanding [ subsection (1) ] subsections (1) and (2)  of this section, violations of
any of the statutes listed in [ subsection (1) ] subsection (1) or (2)  of this section  which proximately
cause human injury, loss of human life or property damage of $10,000 or  more, and unauthorized
entry into a fire scene secured under the authority of ORS 477.365 (1)(f),  may be punishable as a
Class A misdemeanor.
[(4)] (5) Violations and punishments set forth in this section and ORS  477.740 are in addition to
and not in lieu of the provisions of ORS 164.305 to 164.335.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 477.993  by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to vio-
lations that occur on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1417