Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Grants awarded  to school-based health centers by the Oregon Health
Authority under ORS 413.225 (4)(a)  must be for a minimum annual amount of $66,000, ad-
justed under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) To account for effects  of inflation, the authority shall, by rule, annually adjust the
dollar amount specified in subsection (1) of this section based on the  Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as  published by the Bureau of Labor
Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $570,000 to carry out the provisions of section  1 of this 2024
Act.
SECTION 3. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “School-based health center” has the meaning given that term in ORS 413.225.
(b) “School mental  health model” means a model for providing school-based mental
health services that is in accord with guidance from the Oregon Health Authority and is  in
alignment with other school health service models used by the authority.
(c) “School nurse  model” means a model for providing school-based health services that
is in accord with guidance from the division  of the authority that addresses adolescent
health.
(2) The authority, in consultation with the Department  of Education, shall select 10
school districts or education  service districts to receive planning grants for district planning
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 11
HB 4070
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and technical assistance. Each district receiving a grant, beginning on  or after January 1,
2025, and concluding before July 1, 2027, shall:
(a) Evaluate the need for school-based health services in the community of the district;
and
(b) Develop a  school-based health services plan that addresses the need identified in
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(3) The authority shall contract with a nonprofit organization with experience in  facili-
tating school  health planning initiatives and supporting school-based health centers in order
to facilitate and oversee the planning process and to provide technical assistance  to grantees
to reduce costs and ensure better coordination  and continuity statewide. To the greatest
extent practicable, the nonprofit organization shall engage with  culturally specific organiza-
tions in the  grantees’ communities that have experience providing culturally and linguis-
tically specific services in schools or after-school programs.
(4) Each grantee shall solicit community participation  in the planning process, including,
without limitation, the participation  of the local public health authority, any federally quali-
fied health centers located in the district, a regional health equity  coalition, if any, serving
the district and every coordinated care organization with members residing in the district.
(5) At the conclusion of  the planning process, the authority shall issue additional grants
to appropriate recipients to operate a school-based health  center, school nurse model or
school mental health model in each respective grantee  school district or education service
district.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,100,000 to carry out the provisions of section 3 of  this 2024
Act.
SECTION 5. The Oregon Health  Authority shall develop and implement a grant program
to issue grants to school districts, education  service districts and entities that provide
physical or behavioral health services to be used to increase and improve school-based men-
tal health services. The authority shall ensure that grants are made for the  benefit of
schools both with and without school-based health centers, as defined in ORS 413.225.
SECTION 6.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $7,850,000 to carry out the provisions of section 5 of  this 2024
Act.
SECTION 7. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall study methods for providing or in-
creasing reimbursement for mental health services delivered through school-based health
centers, as defined in ORS 413.225, under medical assistance programs administered  by the
authority.
(2) The authority may make written recommendations to the Legislative Assembly in  the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, which may include recommendations for legislation.
(3) The authority may adopt rules to  support reimbursements described in subsection (1)
of this section.
SECTION 8.
(1) For the biennium ending June 30, 2025, at  the request of the Oregon
Health Authority, the State Treasurer is authorized  to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $10 million in net proceeds for the purposes
[2]
HB 4070
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated  by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred  to the
authority for:
(a) Construction and renovation of school-based health centers;
(b) Equipment needs of school-based health centers;
(c) Construction of modular school-based health centers  for provision to school districts
or education service districts; and
(d) Provision of  grants to school districts, education service districts or school-based
health center medical sponsors for school-based health center purposes.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will create  jobs,
further economic development, finance public  education or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding that
improving access  to school-based health resources will improve educational outcomes and
create jobs.
[3]