Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The provisions of the Nurse Licensure Compact are as follows:
Nurse Licensure Compact
Approved by the May 4, 2015, Special Delegate Assembly
ARTICLE I
Findings and Declaration of Purpose
a. The party states find that:
1. The health and safety of the public  are affected by the degree of compliance with and
the effectiveness of enforcement activities related to state nurse licensure laws;
2. Violations of nurse licensure and other laws regulating the practice of nursing may
result in injury or harm to the public;
3. The  expanded mobility of nurses and the use of advanced communication technologies
as part of our nation’s health care delivery system require greater coordination and cooper-
ation among states in the areas of nurse licensure and regulation;
4. New practice modalities and technology make compliance with individual state nurse
licensure laws difficult and complex;
5. The current system  of duplicative licensure for nurses practicing in multiple states is
cumbersome and redundant for both nurses and states; and
6. Uniformity of nurse licensure requirements throughout  the states promotes public
safety and public health benefits.
b. The general purposes of this Compact are to:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2937
SB 966
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
1. Facilitate the states’ responsibility to protect the public’s health and safety;
2. Ensure and encourage the cooperation of party states in the  areas of nurse licensure
and regulation;
3. Facilitate the exchange of information between party  states in the areas of nurse
regulation, investigation and adverse actions;
4. Promote compliance with the laws governing the practice of nursing in each  jurisdic-
tion;
5. Invest all  party states with the authority to hold a nurse accountable for meeting all
state practice laws in the state in which the patient is located at the time care  is rendered
through the mutual recognition of party state licenses;
6. Decrease redundancies in the consideration and issuance of nurse licenses; and
7. Provide opportunities for interstate practice by nurses who meet uniform licensure
requirements.
ARTICLE II
Definitions
As used in this Compact:
a. “Adverse action” means any administrative, civil, equitable or criminal  action per-
mitted by a state’s laws which is imposed by a licensing board or other authority against  a
nurse, including actions against an individual’s license or multistate licensure  privilege such
as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring  of the licensee, limitation on the licensee’s
practice or any other  encumbrance on licensure affecting a nurse’s authorization to practice,
including issuance of a cease and desist action.
b. “Alternative program” means a nondisciplinary monitoring program approved by  a li-
censing board.
c. “Coordinated licensure information system” means an integrated process for collect-
ing, storing and sharing information on nurse licensure  and enforcement activities related
to nurse licensure laws that  is administered by a nonprofit organization composed of and
controlled by licensing boards.
d. “Current significant investigative information” means:
1. Investigative information that a licensing board,  after a preliminary inquiry that in-
cludes notification and an opportunity for the  nurse to respond, if required by state law, has
reason to  believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate more than a minor
infraction; or
2. Investigative information that  indicates that the nurse represents an immediate threat
to public health and safety regardless of whether the nurse  has been notified and had an
opportunity to respond.
e. “Encumbrance” means a revocation or suspension of,  or any limitation on, the full and
unrestricted practice of nursing imposed by a licensing board.
f. “Home state” means the party state which is the nurse’s primary state of residence.
g. “Licensing board” means a party state’s regulatory body responsible for  issuing nurse
licenses.
h. “Multistate license” means a license to practice as a registered or a  licensed
practical/vocational nurse (LPN/VN) issued by a home state licensing board that  authorizes
the licensed nurse to practice in all party states under a multistate licensure privilege.
i. “Multistate licensure privilege” means a legal authorization associated with a  multi-
[2]
SB 966
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
state license permitting the practice of nursing as either a registered nurse (RN) or  LPN/VN
in a remote state.
j. “Nurse” means RN or LPN/VN, as those terms are  defined by each party state’s
practice laws.
k. “Party state” means any state that has adopted this Compact.
l. “Remote state” means a party state other than the home state.
m. “Single-state license”  means a nurse license issued by a party state that authorizes
practice only within the issuing state and  does not include a multistate licensure privilege
to practice in any other party state.
n. “State” means a state, territory or possession of the United  States and the District
of Columbia.
o. 1. “State practice laws” means a party state’s laws, rules and regulations that  govern
the practice  of nursing, define the scope of nursing practice and create the methods and
grounds for imposing discipline.
2. “State  practice laws” does not include requirements necessary to obtain and retain a
license, except for qualifications or requirements of the home state.
ARTICLE III
General Provisions and Jurisdiction
a. A multistate license  to practice registered or licensed practical/vocational nursing is-
sued by a home state to a  resident in that state will be recognized by each party state as
authorizing a nurse to practice as  a registered nurse (RN) or as a licensed
practical/vocational nurse (LPN/VN), under a multistate licensure privilege, in each party
state.
b. A state must  implement procedures for considering the criminal history records of
applicants for initial multistate license or licensure by endorsement. Such  procedures shall
include the  submission of fingerprints or other biometric information by applicants for the
purpose of obtaining an applicant’s criminal history record information from the Federal
Bureau of Investigation and  the agency responsible for retaining that state’s criminal re-
cords.
c. Each party state shall require the following for an applicant to obtain  or retain a
multistate license in the home state:
1. Meets the home state’s qualifications for licensure  or renewal of licensure, as well as
all other applicable state laws;
2. i. Has graduated or is eligible to graduate from  a licensing board-approved RN or
LPN/VN prelicensure education program; or
ii. Has graduated from a foreign RN or LPN/VN prelicensure education program  that (a)
has been approved by the authorized accrediting body in  the applicable country and (b) has
been verified by an independent credentials review agency to be comparable to a licensing
board-approved prelicensure education program;
3. Has, if a graduate of a foreign  prelicensure education program not taught in English
or if English is not the individual’s native language, successfully passed an  English profi-
ciency examination that includes the components  of reading, speaking, writing and listening;
4. Has successfully  passed an NCLEX-RN or NCLEX-PN Examination or its recognized
predecessor, as applicable;
5. Is eligible for or holds an active, unencumbered license;
[3]
SB 966
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
6. Has submitted, in connection with an application for initial licensure or licensure by
endorsement, fingerprints or other biometric data for the purpose of obtaining  criminal his-
tory record information from the Federal Bureau  of Investigation and the agency responsible
for retaining that state’s criminal records;
7. Has not been convicted or found guilty, or has entered into  an agreed disposition, of
a felony offense under applicable state or federal criminal law;
8. Has not been convicted or found guilty, or has entered into  an agreed disposition, of
a misdemeanor  offense related to the practice of nursing as determined on a case-by-case
basis;
9. Is not currently enrolled in an alternative program;
10. Is  subject to self-disclosure requirements regarding current participation in an al-
ternative program; and
11. Has a valid United States Social Security number.
d. All  party states shall be authorized, in accordance with existing state due process law,
to take adverse action against a nurse’s multistate licensure privilege, such  as revocation,
suspension, probation or any other action that affects a nurse’s  authorization to practice
under a multistate licensure privilege, including  cease and desist actions. If a party state
takes such action,  it shall promptly notify the administrator of the coordinated licensure
information system. The administrator of the coordinated licensure  information system shall
promptly notify the home state of any such actions by remote states.
e. A nurse practicing in a party state must comply with the state practice  laws of the
state in which the client is located at the  time service is provided. The practice of nursing
is not limited to  patient care, but shall include all nursing practice as defined by the state
practice laws of the party state in which the client  is located. The practice of nursing in a
party state under a multistate licensure privilege will subject  a nurse to the jurisdiction of
the licensing board, the courts and the laws of the party state in which the client is located
at the time service is provided.
f. Individuals not  residing in a party state shall continue to be able to apply for a party
state’s single-state license  as provided under the laws of each party state. However, the
single-state license granted to these individuals will not be  recognized as granting the privi-
lege to practice nursing  in any other party state. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the
requirements established by a party state for the issuance of a single-state license.
g. Any nurse holding a home state multistate license on the effective date of  this Com-
pact may retain and renew the multistate license issued by the nurse’s  then-current home
state, provided that:
1. A  nurse who changes primary state of residence after this Compact’s effective date
must meet all applicable requirements in Article III.c. of this  Compact to obtain a multistate
license from a new home state.
2. A nurse who  fails to satisfy the multistate licensure requirements in Article III.c. of
this Compact due to a disqualifying event occurring after this Compact’s effective  date shall
be ineligible to retain or renew a multistate license, and the nurse’s  multistate license shall
be revoked or deactivated in  accordance with applicable rules adopted by the Interstate
Commission of Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators.
ARTICLE IV
Applications for Licensure in a Party State
[4]
SB 966
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a. Upon application for a multistate license, the licensing board in the  issuing party state
shall ascertain, through the coordinated licensure information  system, whether the applicant
has ever held, or is the holder of, a license  issued by any other state, whether there are any
encumbrances on any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the applicant, whether
any adverse action has been taken against  any license or multistate licensure privilege held
by the applicant and whether the applicant is currently participating in  an alternative pro-
gram.
b. A  nurse may hold a multistate license, issued by the home state, in only one party
state at a time.
c. If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving between  two party states, the
nurse must apply for  licensure in the new home state, and the multistate license issued by
the prior home state will be deactivated in accordance  with applicable rules adopted by the
Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators.
1. The nurse may  apply for licensure in advance of a change in primary state of resi-
dence.
2. A multistate license shall not be issued  by the new home state until the nurse provides
satisfactory evidence of  a change in primary state of residence to the new home state and
satisfies all applicable requirements to obtain a multistate license from the new  home state.
d. If a  nurse changes primary state of residence by moving from a party state to a non-
party state, the multistate license issued by the prior  home state will convert to a single-
state license, valid only in the former home state.
ARTICLE V
Additional Authorities Invested in Party State Licensing Boards
a. In addition to the other powers conferred  by state law, a licensing board shall have the
authority to:
1. Take adverse action against a nurse’s multistate licensure privilege to practice  within
that party state.
i. Only the home state shall have the power to take adverse action against a nurse’s  li-
cense issued by the home state.
ii. For  purposes of taking adverse action, the home state licensing board shall give the
same priority and effect to reported conduct received from a  remote state as it would if such
conduct had occurred within the home state. In so doing,  the home state shall apply its own
state laws to determine appropriate action.
2. Issue cease and desist orders or impose an encumbrance on a nurse’s  authority to
practice within that party state.
3. Complete any pending investigations of a nurse who changes primary state of residence
during the course of such investigations. The licensing board shall also  have the authority
to take appropriate actions  and shall promptly report the conclusions of such investigations
to the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system.  The administrator of
the coordinated licensure information system shall promptly notify the new home  state of
any such actions.
4. Issue subpoenas for both  hearings and investigations that require the attendance and
testimony of witnesses, as well as the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a licensing
board in a party state for the attendance and  testimony of witnesses or the production of
evidence from  another party state shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of
[5]
SB 966
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
competent jurisdiction, according to the  practice and procedure of that court applicable to
subpoenas issued in proceedings  pending before it. The issuing authority shall pay any wit-
ness fees, travel expenses, mileage and other fees required by the  service statutes of the
state in which the witnesses or evidence are located.
5. Obtain and submit, for each nurse licensure applicant,  fingerprint or other biometric
information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for criminal background  checks, receive
the results of the Federal Bureau  of Investigation record search on criminal background
checks and use the results in making licensure decisions.
6. If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from the  affected nurse the costs of in-
vestigations and disposition of cases resulting from any adverse action taken  against that
nurse.
7. Take adverse action based on the factual findings of the remote state, provided that
the licensing board follows its own procedures for taking such adverse action.
b. If adverse action is taken  by the home state against a nurse’s multistate license, the
nurse’s multistate licensure privilege  to practice in all other party states shall be deactivated
until all encumbrances have been removed from the multistate license.  All home state dis-
ciplinary orders that impose  adverse action against a nurse’s multistate license shall include
a statement that the nurse’s  multistate licensure privilege is deactivated in all party states
during the pendency of the order.
c. Nothing in this Compact shall override a party state’s decision that participation  in
an alternative program may be used in  lieu of adverse action. The home state licensing board
shall deactivate the multistate licensure privilege under the multistate license of any nurse
for the duration of the nurse’s participation in an alternative program.
ARTICLE VI
Coordinated Licensure Information System
and Exchange of Information
a. All party  states shall participate in a coordinated licensure information system of all
licensed registered nurses (RNs) and  licensed practical/vocational nurses (LPNs/VNs). This
system will include information on the  licensure and disciplinary history of each nurse, as
submitted by party states, to assist in the coordination of nurse licensure and enforcement
efforts.
b. The  Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators, in consulta-
tion with the administrator of  the coordinated licensure information system, shall formulate
necessary and proper procedures for the  identification, collection and exchange of informa-
tion under this Compact.
c. All licensing boards shall promptly report to the  coordinated licensure information
system any adverse action,  any current significant investigative information, denials of ap-
plications (with the reasons for such denials)  and nurse participation in alternative programs
known to the licensing board regardless of whether such participation is deemed  nonpublic
or confidential under state law.
d. Current significant investigative information and  participation in nonpublic or confi-
dential alternative programs shall  be transmitted through the coordinated licensure infor-
mation system only to party state licensing boards.
e. Notwithstanding any other provision of  law, all party state licensing boards contrib-
uting information to the coordinated licensure  information system may designate informa-
[6]
SB 966
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tion that may not be shared with nonparty states or disclosed to other  entities or individuals
without the express permission of the contributing state.
f. Any  personally identifiable information obtained from the coordinated licensure infor-
mation system by a party state licensing board shall not be shared with nonparty states or
disclosed to other entities or individuals except to the extent permitted by the  laws of the
party state contributing the information.
g. Any information contributed to the coordinated licensure information  system that is
subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the party state contributing that infor-
mation shall also be expunged from the coordinated licensure information system.
h. The Compact administrator of each party state shall furnish a uniform data set to the
Compact administrator of each other party state, which shall include, at a minimum:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Information related to alternative program participation; and
4. Other information that may  facilitate the administration of this Compact, as deter-
mined by Commission rules.
i. The Compact  administrator of a party state shall provide all investigative documents
and information requested by another party state.
ARTICLE VII
Establishment of the Interstate Commission of
Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators
a. The party  states hereby create and establish a joint public entity known as the Inter-
state Commission of Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators.
1. The Commission is an instrumentality of the party states.
2. Venue is proper, and judicial  proceedings by or against the Commission shall be
brought solely and exclusively, in a court of competent jurisdiction where the  principal office
of the Commission  is located. The Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses
to the  extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution pro-
ceedings.
3. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity.
b. Membership, Voting and Meetings
1. Each party state shall have and  be limited to one administrator. The head of the state
licensing board or designee shall be the administrator of this  Compact for each party state.
Any administrator may be removed or  suspended from office as provided by the law of the
state from which the administrator is appointed. Any vacancy occurring  in the Commission
shall be filled in accordance with the laws of the party state in which the vacancy exists.
2. Each administrator shall be entitled  to one vote with regard to the promulgation of
rules and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have an  opportunity to participate in the
business and affairs of the Commission. An administrator shall vote in person or  by such
other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for an  administrator’s par-
ticipation in meetings by telephone or other means of communication.
3. The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar  year. Additional
meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws or rules of the commission.
4. All meetings shall be open to  the public, and public notice of meetings shall be given
in the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in Article VIII  of this
[7]
SB 966
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Compact.
5. The Commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting  if the Commission must
discuss:
i. Noncompliance of a party state with its obligations under this Compact;
ii. The employment, compensation, discipline  or other personnel matters, practices or
procedures related to specific employees or other matters related  to the Commission’s
internal personnel practices and procedures;
iii. Current, threatened or reasonably anticipated litigation;
iv. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase or sale of goods, services or real estate;
v. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
vi. Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or  financial information that is privileged
or confidential;
vii. Disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure  would constitute a
clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
viii. Disclosure of investigatory records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
ix. Disclosure of information related to any reports prepared by or on behalf of the
Commission for the purpose of investigation of compliance with this Compact; or
x. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or state statute.
6. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is  closed pursuant to this provision, the
Commission’s legal counsel or designee  shall certify that the meeting may be closed and shall
reference each  relevant exempting provision. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully
and clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and  accurate
summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefor, including a description of the  views
expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action shall be  identified in such
minutes. All minutes  and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to
release by a majority vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
c. The Commission shall, by a majority vote of the administrators, prescribe bylaws  or
rules to govern its conduct as may be necessary or  appropriate to carry out the purposes
and exercise the powers of this Compact, including but not limited to:
1. Establishing the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Providing reasonable standards and procedures:
i. For the establishment and meetings of other committees; and
ii. Governing any general or specific delegation of any authority or function of the  Com-
mission;
3. Providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meetings of the Commis-
sion, ensuring reasonable advance notice of  all meetings and providing an opportunity for
attendance of such meetings by interested parties, with  enumerated exceptions designed to
protect the public’s interest,  the privacy of individuals and proprietary information, including
trade secrets. The Commission may meet in  closed session only after a majority of the ad-
ministrators vote to close a meeting in whole or in part. As soon as practicable,  the Com-
mission must make public a copy of the vote to close  the meeting revealing the vote of each
administrator, with no proxy votes allowed;
4. Establishing the titles, duties and authority and reasonable procedures for  the election
of the officers of the Commission;
5. Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the establishment of the personnel
[8]
SB 966
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
policies and programs of the Commission. Notwithstanding any civil service or other similar
laws of any party state, the  bylaws shall exclusively govern the personnel policies and pro-
grams of the Commission; and
6. Providing a mechanism for winding up  the operations of the Commission and the eq-
uitable disposition of any surplus funds that may exist after the termination of this Compact
after the payment or reserving of all of its debts and obligations.
d. The Commission shall publish its bylaws and rules, and  any amendments thereto, in
a convenient form on the website of the Commission.
e. The Commission shall maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws.
f. The Commission shall meet and  take such actions as are consistent with the provisions
of this Compact and the bylaws.
g.1.i. The Commission  shall have the powers to promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and
coordinate implementation and administration of this Compact. The rules shall  have the
force and effect of law and shall be binding in all party states.
ii. Notwithstanding Article VII g.1.i.  of this Compact, the Oregon State Board of Nursing
shall review the rules of the Commission. The board may approve and  adopt the rules of the
Commission as rules of  the board. The State of Oregon is subject to a rule of the Commission
only if the rule of the Commission is adopted by the board;
2. To  bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the Commission,
provided that the standing of any licensing board to sue or be  sued under applicable law shall
not be affected;
3. To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
4. To borrow, accept or contract  for services of personnel, including, but not limited to,
employees of a party state or nonprofit organizations;
5. To cooperate with other organizations that administer state compacts related to the
regulation of nursing, including, but not  limited to, sharing administrative or staff expenses,
office space or other resources;
6. To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such
individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of this Compact, and establish
the Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, quali-
fications of personnel and other related personnel matters;
7. To accept any and all appropriate  donations, grants and gifts of money, equipment,
supplies, materials and services, and to receive, utilize and dispose of the same, provided that
at all times the Commission shall avoid any appearance  of impropriety or conflict of interest;
8. To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or otherwise to own, hold,
improve or use, any property, whether real, personal or mixed, provided that at all  times the
Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety;
9. To sell, convey, mortgage,  pledge, lease, exchange, abandon or otherwise dispose of any
property, whether real, personal or mixed;
10. To establish a budget and make expenditures;
11. To borrow money;
12. To appoint  committees, including advisory committees comprised of administrators,
state nursing regulators, state legislators  or their representatives, consumer representatives
and other such interested persons;
13. To provide and receive  information from, and to cooperate with, law enforcement
[9]
SB 966
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
agencies;
14. To adopt and use an official seal; and
15. To perform such other functions  as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the
purposes of this  Compact consistent with the state regulation of nurse licensure and prac-
tice.
h. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission  shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of
its establishment, organization and ongoing activities.
2.i. The Commission may also levy on and collect an annual assessment from each  party
state to cover  the cost of its operations, activities and staff in its annual budget as approved
each year. The aggregate annual assessment amount, if any, shall be allocated based upon a
formula to be determined  by the Commission, which shall promulgate a rule that is binding
upon all party states.
ii. An assessment levied, or any other financial obligation  imposed, under this Compact
is effective against the State of Oregon only to the extent  that moneys necessary to pay the
assessment or meet the financial obligation have been deposited in the  Oregon State Board
of Nursing Account established under ORS 678.170.
3. The Commission shall not incur obligations of  any kind prior to securing the funds
adequate to meet the same, nor shall the Commission pledge the credit of any  of the party
states, except by, and with the authority of, such party state.
4. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all  receipts and disbursements. The
receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be  subject to the audit and accounting
procedures established under  its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds
handled by the Commission shall be audited yearly by  a certified or licensed public account-
ant, and the  report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report
of the Commission.
i. Qualified Immunity, Defense and Indemnification
1. The administrators, officers,  executive director, employees and representatives of the
Commission shall be  immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official ca-
pacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil li-
ability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred,
or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis  for believing oc-
curred, within the  scope of Commission employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that
nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person from  suit or liability
for any damage, loss, injury or liability  caused by the intentional, willful or wanton miscon-
duct of that person.
2. The Commission shall defend  any administrator, officer, executive director, employee
or representative of the Commission in any civil action  seeking to impose liability arising out
of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is made
had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission  employment,
duties or responsibilities, provided that nothing  herein shall be construed to prohibit that
person from retaining his or her own counsel,  and provided further that the actual or alleged
act, error or omission did not result from that person’s intentional, willful  or wanton mis-
conduct.
[10]
SB 966
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any administrator, officer, execu-
tive director, employee or representative of the Commission for the  amount of any settle-
ment or judgment obtained against that person arising out  of any actual or alleged act, error
or omission that occurred within the scope of  Commission employment, duties or responsi-
bilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within  the scope
of Commission employment, duties  or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act,
error or omission did not result from  the intentional, willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.
ARTICLE VIII
Rulemaking
a. The Interstate Commission of  Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators shall exercise
its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth in this  Article and the rules adopted
thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified  in each rule
or amendment and shall have the same force and effect as provisions of this Compact.
b. Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at  a regular or special meeting of
the Commission.
c. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the Commission,  and at
least 60 days in advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered  and voted upon,
the Commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission; and
2. On the website of each licensing  board or the publication in which each state would
otherwise publish proposed rules.
d. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
1. The proposed time, date and location of the meeting in which the rule will be consid-
ered and voted upon;
2. The text of the proposed rule or amendment and the reason for the proposed rule;
3. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and
4. The manner in which interested persons may submit  notice to the Commission of their
intention to attend the public hearing and any written comments.
e. Prior to adoption of  a proposed rule, the Commission shall allow persons to submit
written data, facts, opinions and arguments, which shall be made available to the public.
f. The Commission shall grant an opportunity  for a public hearing before it adopts a rule
or amendment.
g. The Commission shall publish the place, time and date of the scheduled  public hearing.
1. Hearings shall be conducted in a  manner providing each person who wishes to com-
ment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing. All  hearings will be
recorded, and a copy will be made available upon request.
2. Nothing in this section  shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule.
Rules may be grouped  for the convenience of the Commission at hearings required by this
section.
h. If no one  appears at the public hearing, the Commission may proceed with
promulgation of the proposed rule.
i. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by  the close of business on the scheduled
hearing date if the hearing was not held, the Commission shall consider all written  and oral
comments received.
[11]
SB 966
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
j. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all administrators, take final  action on the
proposed rule and shall determine the effective date of the rule, if  any, based on the
rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.
k. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission  may consider and
adopt an emergency  rule without prior notice, opportunity for comment or hearing, provided
that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in this Compact and in  this section shall be
retroactively applied to  the rule as soon as reasonably possible, but in no event later than
90 days after the effective date  of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency
rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or party state funds; or
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative  rule that is required by
federal law or rule.
l. The Commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or  amendment for
purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in  consistency or
grammatical errors. Public notice  of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the
Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of  30 days
after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that  the revision results in a
material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in writing,  and delivered to the Com-
mission, prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will  take
effect without further action.  If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect
without the approval of the Commission.
ARTICLE IX
Oversight, Dispute Resolution and Enforcement
a. Oversight
1. Each party state shall enforce  this Compact and take all actions necessary and ap-
propriate to effectuate this Compact’s purposes and intent.
2. The Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators  shall be enti-
tled to receive service of process in any  proceeding that may affect the powers, responsibil-
ities or actions of the Commission, and shall have standing to intervene in  such a proceeding
for all purposes. Failure to provide service of process in such proceeding to the  Commission
shall render a judgment or order void as to the Commission, this Compact or  promulgated
rules.
b. Default, Technical Assistance and Termination
1. If the Commission determines that a party state has defaulted in the performance  of
its obligations or responsibilities under  this Compact or the promulgated rules, the Com-
mission shall:
i. Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other party states  of the nature of
the default, the proposed means of curing the default or  any other action to be taken by the
Commission; and
ii. Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.
2. If a state in default fails to  cure the default, the defaulting state’s membership in this
Compact may be terminated upon an affirmative vote of a majority  of the administrators,
and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred  by this Compact may be terminated on the
effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve  the offending state of
[12]
SB 966
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
3. Termination of membership in this Compact shall be imposed only after all  other
means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend  or terminate
shall be given by the Commission to the  governor of the defaulting state and to the head of
the defaulting state’s licensing board and each of the party states.
4. A state whose membership in this Compact  has been terminated is responsible for all
assessments, obligations and liabilities incurred through the  effective date of termination,
including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.
5. The Commission  shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in de-
fault or  whose membership in this Compact has been terminated unless agreed upon in
writing between the Commission and the defaulting state.
6. The defaulting  state may appeal the action of the Commission by petitioning the U.S.
District Court for the District of Columbia  or the federal district in which the Commission
has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of  such litigation,
including reasonable attorney fees.
c. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a party state, the Commission shall attempt to resolve disputes re-
lated to the Compact that arise among party states and between party and nonparty states.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for  both mediation and binding
dispute resolution for disputes, as appropriate.
3. In the event the Commission cannot resolve disputes among  party states arising under
this Compact:
i. The party states may submit the issues in  dispute to an arbitration panel, which will
be comprised of individuals appointed  by the Compact administrator in each of the affected
party states and an individual mutually agreed upon by the Compact administrators of all the
party states involved in the dispute.
ii. The decision of a majority of the arbitrators shall be final and binding.
d. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable  exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the pro-
visions and rules of this Compact.
2. By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal action in the  U.S. District Court
for the District of  Columbia or the federal district in which the Commission has its principal
offices against a party state that is in  default to enforce compliance with the provisions of
this Compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may  include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event  judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing
party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney fees.
3. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the  Commission. The
Commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law.
ARTICLE X
Effective Date, Withdrawal and Amendment
a. This Compact shall become effective and binding on the earlier of the date of legisla-
tive enactment of this Compact into law by  no less than 26 states or December 31, 2018. All
party states to this Compact that also were  parties to the prior Nurse Licensure Compact,
superseded by this Compact (Prior  Compact), shall be deemed to have withdrawn from said
Prior Compact within six months after the effective date of this Compact.
[13]
SB 966
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
b. Each party state to this Compact shall continue to recognize a nurse’s multistate
licensure privilege to practice in that party state issued under the Prior Compact  until such
party state has withdrawn from the Prior Compact.
c. Any party state may  withdraw from this Compact by enacting a statute repealing the
same. A party state’s withdrawal  shall not take effect until 6 months after enactment of the
repealing statute.
d. A party state’s withdrawal or termination shall not affect the  continuing requirement
of the withdrawing or terminated state’s  licensing board to report adverse actions and sig-
nificant investigations occurring prior to the effective date of such withdrawal or termi-
nation.
e. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed  to invalidate or prevent any
nurse licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a party state  and a
nonparty state that is made in accordance with the other provisions of this Compact.
f. This Compact may be amended by the party states. No amendment to  this Compact
shall become effective and binding upon the party states  unless and until it is enacted into
the laws of all party states.
g. Representatives  of nonparty states to this Compact shall be invited to participate in
the activities of the Interstate Commission  of Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators, on
a nonvoting basis, prior to the adoption of this Compact by all states.
ARTICLE XI
Construction and Severability
This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the  purposes thereof. The
provisions of this Compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision
of this Compact is declared to be  contrary to the Constitution of any party state or of the
United States, or if the applicability thereof to any government, agency,  person or circum-
stance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and  the applicability
thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If
this Compact  shall be held to be contrary to the Constitution of any party state, this Com-
pact shall remain in full force and effect  as to the remaining party states and in full force
and effect as to the party state affected as to all severable matters.
SECTION 2. The Legislative Assembly of the State of Oregon  hereby ratifies the Nurse
Licensure Compact set forth in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.  ORS 676.177 is amended to read:
676.177. (1) Notwithstanding any  other provision of ORS 676.165 to 676.180 and except as pro-
vided in subsection (5) of this section, a health professional regulatory board, upon a determination
by the board that it possesses otherwise confidential information that reasonably  relates to the
regulatory or enforcement function  of another public entity, may disclose that information to the
other public entity.
(2) Any public entity that receives information pursuant to subsection (1) of this  section shall
agree to take  all reasonable steps to maintain the confidentiality of the information, except that the
public entity may use or disclose  the information to the extent necessary to carry out the regulatory
or enforcement functions of the public entity.
(3) For purposes of this section, “public entity” means:
[14]
SB 966
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) A board or agency  of this state, or a board or agency of another state with regulatory or
enforcement functions similar to the  functions of a health professional regulatory board of this state;
(b) A district attorney;
(c) The Department of Justice;
(d) A state or  local public body of this state that licenses, franchises or provides emergency
medical services; or
(e) A law enforcement agency of this state, another state or the federal government.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (3) of this section[ ,]:
(a) The Oregon Board of Physical Therapy may disclose information described in  subsection (1)
of this section to the Physical Therapy Compact Commission established in ORS 688.240.
(b) The Oregon State Board of Nursing may disclose information described in subsection
(1) of this section to  the Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators
described in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(5) A health professional regulatory board may not disclose the information  described in sub-
section (1) of this section to another public entity if the information relates  to the provision of or
referral for reproductive or gender-affirming health care services.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 678.021 is amended to read:
678.021. (1) Except as provided in ORS 676.347, it is unlawful for any person to practice nursing
or offer to  practice nursing in this state or to use any title or abbreviation, sign, card or device to
indicate the person is practicing either practical or registered nursing  unless the person is licensed
under ORS 678.010 to 678.410 at the  level for which the indication of practice is made and the li-
cense is valid and in effect.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to an individual who is authorized to work
as a nurse by multistate licensure privilege as defined in section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.  ORS 678.170 is amended to read:
678.170. (1) All  money received by the Oregon State Board of Nursing under ORS 678.010 to
678.448 shall be paid into the General  Fund in the State Treasury and placed to the credit of the
Oregon State Board of Nursing Account. Such  moneys are appropriated continuously to the board
and shall be  used only for the administration and enforcement of ORS 676.850, 676.860 and 678.010
to 678.448 and for the purpose  of meeting the financial obligations imposed on the State of
Oregon as a result of this state’s participation in the Nurse Licensure Compact described  in
section 1 of this 2025 Act .
(2) The board shall keep  a record of all moneys deposited in the Oregon State Board of Nursing
Account. This record shall indicate by separate cumulative accounts  the source from which the
moneys are derived and the individual activity or program against  which each withdrawal is
charged.
(3) The  board may maintain a petty cash fund in compliance with ORS 293.180 in the amount
of $1,000.
SECTION 6. (1) The amendments to ORS 676.177 by  section 3 of this 2025 Act apply to
information disclosed on and after the operative date specified in section 7 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 687.021 by section 4 of this 2025 Act apply to individuals au-
thorized to work as nurses by multistate  licensure privilege on and after the operative date
specified in section 7 of this 2025 Act.
(3) The amendments to ORS 678.170 by section 5 of this 2025 Act apply to moneys received
by the Oregon State Board of Nursing on and after the operative  date specified in section 7
[15]
SB 966
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7.
(1) Sections 1 and 2 of this  2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 676.177,
678.021 and 678.170 by sections 3 to 5 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The  Oregon State Board of Nursing may take any action before the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section  that is necessary to enable the board to exercise,
on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of  the duties,
functions and powers  conferred on the board by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act and the
amendments to ORS 676.177, 678.021 and 678.170 by sections 3 to 5 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[16]