Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Agricultural Housing  Repair Fund is established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The Agricultural Housing Repair Fund consists of moneys  appropriated, allocated,
deposited or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated  to the Housing and Community
Services Department to award  and administer grants to owners of land on which is sited
agriculture workforce housing, as defined in ORS 315.163, to:
(a) Repair the housing or the infrastructure or amenities supporting the housing; or
(b) Replace the  housing with a small home, as defined in ORS 455.616 or section 2, chap-
ter 401, Oregon Laws 2019, or a prefabricated structure, as defined in ORS 197.286.
(4) Grants made under this section:
(a) May not exceed more than $10,000 per unit;
(b) May not exceed 60 percent of the repair or replacement costs; and
(c) Require that the owner bring all agriculture workforce housing on  the tract into
compliance with all applicable building codes and occupational safety codes.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this  2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 456.548 to
456.725.
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section, “community housing supporting agricultural
employees” means a housing development that:
(a) Is within an urban growth boundary;
(b) Is within 20 miles of significant agricultural employment as identified  by the Housing
and Community Services Department;
(c) Is promoted for residential use by agricultural employees and developed  with amen-
ities suitable for agricultural employees and their families;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3187
HB 3555
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
(d) Consists of a multifamily dwelling or a cluster of  buildings, including manufactured
housing; and
(e)(A) Is subject to an affordable housing  covenant requiring that the units are main-
tained for a period of no less than 99 years as affordable to rent for low income  households,
as described in ORS 456.270 to 456.295;
(B) Is operated as a consumer housing cooperative; or
(C) Is operated under a model approved by  the department designed to preserve
affordability or control of the property by its residents.
(2) The Housing and Community Services  Department shall provide one or more grants
to qualified housing sponsors for  the purposes of developing community housing supporting
agricultural employees.
(3) In awarding grants under this section, the department may prioritize applications:
(a) From a developer that is a nonprofit housing corporation;
(b) From a developer that is a nonprofit that promotes  housing for agricultural employ-
ees or  other needs of agricultural employees, or from a developer that has entered into a
partnership with such a nonprofit for the purposes of developing the community housing;
(c) Where other funding for the housing  development has been dedicated or can be lev-
eraged by the grant;
(d) Where the housing development will be located close to significant agricultural  em-
ployment; or
(e) Where the housing development will include or will be near  specific characteristics
or amenities designed to support or attract agricultural employees and their families.
(4) Grants  awarded under this section may be used for any project costs for the devel-
opment or predevelopment of the community housing supporting agricultural employees.
(5) A qualified housing sponsor receiving grants under  this section shall agree to provide
information to the department to report  to an appropriate interim committee of the Legis-
lative Assembly, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, on the use of the grant on or before
September 15, 2027.
SECTION 5.
Section 4 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 6. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for  the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund:
(1) The amount of $5,000,000  for deposit into the Agricultural Housing Repair Fund es-
tablished under section 1 of this 2023 Act; and
(2) The amount of $20,000,000, to  award and administer grants under section 4 of this 2023
Act.
SECTION 7. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
[2]