Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) To ensure that members  of coordinated care organizations have a choice
of providers who provide culturally appropriate care as required by  ORS 414.625 (2)(k)(G), the
Oregon Health Authority shall provide grants, using moneys described in  section 1 (4)(c),
chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2013, to  culturally specific health care facilities in partnership with
regional health care entities designated by the authority.  Grants may be used for start-up
costs, construction and operating costs of the facilities.
(2) The authority shall adopt by rule criteria for the  award of grants under subsection
(1) of  this section, with the goal of addressing racial, ethnic and culturally specific health
care disparities by increasing access to health services for vulnerable communities.
SECTION 2.  Section  1, chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2013, as amended by section 6, chapter 16,
Oregon Laws 2015, and section 13, chapter 389, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Coordinated care organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(b) “Hospital” means a hospital that is subject to  the assessment imposed under section 2,
chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003.
(c) “Metrics and scoring subcommittee” means the subcommittee created in ORS 414.638.
(2) In consultation with the President of the Senate and the Speaker  of the House of Represen-
tatives, the Director of the Oregon Health Authority shall  appoint a hospital performance metrics
advisory committee consisting of nine members, including:
(a) Four members who represent hospitals;
(b) Three members who have expertise in measuring health outcomes; and
(c) Two members who represent coordinated care organizations.
(3) The hospital performance metrics advisory committee shall  recommend three to five per-
formance standards that are consistent with state and national quality standards.
(4) The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt by rule the  procedures for distributing [to
hospitals] the moneys  described in section 9 (2)(d), chapter 736, Oregon Laws 2003, [ to ensure that
such moneys are distributed ] as follows:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2623
HB 3042
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
(a) [ The authority shall distribute ] 50 percent of the moneys  to hospitals based upon  each
hospital’s:
(A) Compliance with data submission requirements; and
(B) Achievement  of the performance standards recommended by the hospital performance met-
rics advisory committee under subsection (3) of this section.
(b) [ The authority shall annually distribute the remainder ] 46 percent  of the  moneys to coordi-
nated care organizations based upon recommendations made by the metrics and scoring  subcommit-
tee.
(c) Four percent of the moneys to  culturally specific health care facilities in accordance
with section 1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3.
 Section 15, chapter 389, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 15. (1) Section 1 of this 2017 Act is repealed on September 30, 2019.
(2) Section 1, chapter  608, Oregon Laws 2013, as amended by section 6, chapter 16, Oregon Laws
2015, [ and] section 13 , [ of this 2015 Act ] chapter 389, Oregon Laws 2015, and section 2 of this
2017 Act, is repealed on September 30, 2019.
SECTION 4. Section 1 of this 2017 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2018.
SECTION 5. The Oregon Health Authority shall take any action  before the operative date
specified in section 4 of this 2017 Act that  is necessary to enable the authority to carry out
the provisions of section 1 of this 2017  Act on or after the operative date specified in section
4 of this 2017 Act.
[2]