Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 342.175 to
342.180.
SECTION 2. (1) In addition to any other  action authorized under ORS 342.143 or 342.175,
the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission may:
(a) Impose a civil penalty.
(b) Order payment of the commission’s costs of the disciplinary proceeding taken against
a person.
(2) The commission shall adopt  rules establishing the civil penalties that may be imposed
under this section. The maximum penalty for a single violation may not exceed $1,000.
(3) Civil penalties under this section shall be  imposed in the manner provided by ORS
183.745.
(4) All moneys recovered under this  section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to
the credit of the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission Account.
(5) The commission may adopt any rules necessary for the administration and enforce-
ment of this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 342.177 is amended to read:
342.177. (1)(a) Hearings under ORS 339.390 and 342.176 shall be conducted by an  administrative
law judge assigned from the Office of Administrative Hearings established under ORS 183.605.
(b) Any hearing conducted under this  section shall be private unless the person against whom
the charge is made requests a public hearing. Students attending school in  the employing district
may not attend any hearing except as witnesses duly subpoenaed  to testify with respect to the
charges made. Students attending a public charter  school that employs the person may not attend
any hearing except  as witnesses duly subpoenaed to testify with respect to the charges made. The
person charged shall have the right  to be represented by counsel and to present evidence and ar-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 312
SB 804
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
gument. The evidence must be confined to the charges.
(2) The Teacher  Standards and Practices Commission or the person charged may have subpoenas
issued to compel attendance at the hearing. The person charged may have subpoenas issued by an
attorney of record subscribed by the signature of  the attorney or by the executive director of the
Teacher Standards and  Practices Commission. Witnesses appearing pursuant to subpoena, other than
the parties or officers or employees of the commission, shall receive fees and mileage as prescribed
by law for witnesses in ORS 44.415 (2). The  commission or the person charged shall have the right
to compel the attendance and obedience of witnesses in the same manner as  provided under ORS
183.440 (2).
(3) [ The commission shall render its decision at its next regular meeting following the hearing. ] If
the decision of the commission is that the charge  described in ORS 342.175 (1) has been proven, the
commission  may  [take] impose any or all of the following [ disciplinary action ] sanctions against the
person charged:
(a) Issue a public reprimand.
(b) Place the person on probation for a period not to exceed  four years and subject to such
conditions as the commission considers necessary.
(c) Suspend the license or registration of the teacher or  administrator for a period not to exceed
one year.
(d) Revoke the license or registration of the teacher or administrator.
(e) Revoke the right to apply for a license or registration.
(f) Impose a civil penalty pursuant to section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(g) Order payment of the commission’s  costs of the disciplinary proceeding pursuant to
section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(4) If the decision of the commission is that  the charge is not proven, the commission shall order
the charges dismissed.
(5) The commission shall notify in writing the person charged and the employing district  or
public charter school of the decision.
[2]