Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 455.417 is amended to read:
455.417. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Electric vehicle charging station” means a device or facility for delivering  electricity for
motor vehicles that use electricity for propulsion.
(b) “Municipality” has the meaning given that term in ORS 455.010.
(c) “Provisions for electrical service capacity” means:
(A)(i) Building electrical service, sized for the anticipated load of electric vehicle charging
stations, that has overcurrent devices necessary for electric vehicle charging stations or  has ade-
quate space to add the overcurrent devices;
(ii) Designated space within a building  to add electrical service with capacity for electric vehi-
cle charging stations; or
(iii) A designated location on building property, in or adjacent to a landscaped area, for in-
stalling remote service for electric vehicle charging stations; and
(B) A conduit system installed from  building electrical service, or from the dedicated spaces or
locations described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, to parking spaces that  can support, at a
minimum, electrical wiring for  installation of level 2 electric vehicle charging stations and, if the
conduit is for future installation of  electric vehicle charging stations, that labels both ends of the
conduit to mark the conduit as provided for future electric vehicle charging stations.
(d) “Townhouse” has the meaning given that term in ORS 197A.420.
(2)(a) The Director of the Department  of Consumer and Business Services shall adopt amend-
ments to the state  building code to require newly constructed buildings [ described in subsection (3)(a)
of this section ] to include provisions for electrical service capacity for charging electric vehicles.
The code must require that :
(A) Each  commercial  building  in private ownership  include, at a minimum, provisions for
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 826
HB 2961
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
electrical service capacity at no less than 20 percent of the vehicle parking spaces in the  garage
or parking area for the building.
(B) Each  multifamily residential building or mixed-use building with five or more resi-
dential dwelling units include:
(i) Provisions for electrical service capacity  at no less than 50 percent of the vehicle
parking spaces in the garage or parking area for the building; or
(ii) Electrical service capacity  for charging electric vehicles in 20 percent of the vehicle
parking spaces in the garage or parking area for the building, one  quarter of which per-
centage, but not less than one parking space, must consist of vehicle parking  spaces with
level 2 or level 3 electric vehicle charging stations installed and ready for use.
(b) Fractional numbers derived from a calculation of the vehicle parking spaces must be rounded
up to the nearest whole number.
[(3)(a) The director shall make code requirements under subsection (2) of this section  applicable
only to:]
[(A) Commercial buildings under private ownership; ]
[(B) Multifamily residential buildings with five or more residential dwelling units; and ]
[(C) Mixed-use buildings consisting of privately owned  commercial space and five or more resi-
dential dwelling units. ]
[(b)] (3)  The director may not make code  requirements under subsection (2) of this section ap-
plicable to townhouses.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS  455.040, a municipality may, by process concerning land use, require
that each newly constructed building described  in subsection [ (3)(a)] (2) of this section include pro-
visions for electrical service capacity to accommodate more than [ 20 percent  of ] the percentages
specified in subsection (2) of this section for  vehicle parking spaces in the garage or  parking
area for the building.
SECTION 2.
The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services shall
ensure that the initial amendments to the state building code required under the  amend-
ments to ORS 455.417 by section 1 of this 2025 Act:
(1) Take effect on July 1, 2026; and
(2) Apply to new construction for which a person first applies  for a building permit on
or after July 1, 2026.
[2]