Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
STATEWIDE GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REDUCTION GOALS
SECTION 1.
 ORS 468A.205 is amended to read:
468A.205. (1) The Legislative Assembly declares that it is  the [ policy] goal  of this state to
achieve a reduction in greenhouse  gas emissions levels in Oregon:  [ reduce greenhouse gas
emissions in Oregon pursuant to the following greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals: ]
[(a) By 2010, arrest the growth of Oregon’s greenhouse gas emissions  and begin to reduce
greenhouse gas emissions. ]
[(b) By 2020, achieve greenhouse gas levels that are 10 percent below 1990 levels. ]
[(c) By 2050, achieve greenhouse gas levels that are at least 75 percent below 1990 levels. ]
(a) To at least 45 percent below 1990 emissions levels by 2035; and
(b) To at least 80 percent below 1990 emissions levels by 2050.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 894
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The Legislative Assembly declares that it is the  policy of this state for state and local gov-
ernments, businesses, nonprofit organizations  and individual residents to prepare for the effects of
global warming and by doing so, prevent and reduce the  social, economic and environmental effects
of global warming.
(3) This section does not create any additional regulatory authority for an agency of the  exec-
utive department as defined in ORS 174.112.
JOINT COMMITTEE ON CLIMATE ACTION
SECTION 2. (1) There is established the Joint Committee on Climate Action.
(2) The joint committee consists of members of the Senate appointed by  the President
of the Senate and members of the House of Representatives  appointed by the Speaker of the
House of Representatives.
(3) The President of the Senate and  the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall
each appoint one cochair for the joint committee  with the duties and powers necessary for
the performance of the functions of the offices as the President and the Speaker determine.
(4) The joint committee has a continuing  existence and may meet, act and conduct its
business during sessions of the  Legislative Assembly or any recess thereof and in the interim
between sessions.
(5) The term of a member shall expire upon the date of the convening of  the odd-
numbered year regular session of the Legislative Assembly next following the commence-
ment of the member’s term.
(6)(a) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing  authority shall make an ap-
pointment to become immediately effective.
(b) When a vacancy occurs in the membership of the  joint committee in the interim be-
tween odd-numbered year regular sessions, until the vacancy is filled:
(A) The membership of the  joint committee shall be considered not to include the vacant
position for the purpose of determining whether a quorum is present; and
(B) A majority of the remaining members constitutes a quorum.
(7)(a) Members of the joint committee shall receive an amount equal to that authorized
under ORS 171.072 from funds appropriated to the Legislative Assembly for each day spent
in the performance of their duties as members  of the joint committee or any subcommittee
of the joint committee in lieu of reimbursement for in-state travel expenses.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, when engaged in out-of-state travel,
members shall be entitled to receive their actual and necessary  expenses in lieu of the
amount authorized by this  subsection. Payment shall be made from funds appropriated to the
Legislative Assembly.
(8) The joint  committee may not transact business unless a quorum is present. Except
as provided in subsection (6)(b)(B) of this section, a quorum consists of a majority of joint
committee members from the House of Representatives and  a majority of joint committee
members from the Senate.
(9) Action by the joint committee requires the affirmative vote  of a majority of joint
committee members from the House of Representatives and  a majority of joint committee
members from the Senate.
(10) The joint committee may adopt rules  necessary for the operation of the joint com-
[2]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mittee.
(11) The Legislative Policy and Research Director may employ persons necessary for the
performance of the functions of the joint committee. The director shall fix the  duties and
amounts of compensation of the employees. The joint committee  shall use the services of
continuing legislative staff, without employing additional  persons, to the greatest extent
practicable.
(12) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the joint committee in the performance of the duties of the  joint committee and, to the ex-
tent permitted by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the
members of the joint committee consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Joint Committee on Climate Action shall:
(a) Provide general legislative oversight of policy related to climate, including  but not
limited to the Oregon Climate  Action Program established under sections 8 to 26 of this 2019
Act;
(b) Examine and prioritize expenditures  and investments of state proceeds from auctions
conducted under section 21 of this 2019 Act; and
(c) Make recommendations related to the expenditures  and investments of state proceeds
from auctions conducted  under section 21 of this 2019 Act to the Joint Committee on Ways
and Means.
(2) In developing  recommendations under subsection (1)(c) of this section, the Joint
Committee on Climate Action shall consider the recommendations for the expenditures  and
investments of state proceeds from auctions conducted under section 21  of this 2019 Act that
are contained in:
(a) The biennial expenditure reports and  audit report required by sections 38 and 39 of
this 2019 Act;
(b) The  biennial climate action investment plan required by section 40 of this 2019 Act;
and
(c) The recommendations  of the Environmental Justice Task Force required by section
41 of this 2019 Act.
CARBON POLICY OFFICE ESTABLISHED
SECTION 4. Carbon Policy Office.  (1) The Carbon Policy Office is established within  the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(2) The office shall:
(a) Coordinate state actions toward achieving  reductions in greenhouse gas emissions in
accordance with ORS 468A.205 and other statutes, rules  and policies that govern the state’s
or state agencies’ actions to reduce greenhouse gas emissions; and
(b) Carry out the duties, functions and powers committed to the office under sections  8
to 26 and 38 to 40 of this 2019 Act and ORS 468A.280 and other  statutes, rules or policies that
commit functions to the Carbon Policy Office.
(3) The office  may advise, consult and cooperate with other agencies of the state, political
subdivisions, other states or the federal government, with respect  to any proceedings and
all matters pertaining to the reduction of greenhouse gas emissions levels in Oregon.
(4) The office may employ personnel, including specialists and consultants, purchase
[3]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
materials and supplies and enter into contracts necessary to carry out the purposes set forth
in sections 8 to 26 and 38 to 40 of this 2019 Act and ORS 468A.280.
SECTION 5. Director. (1) The Carbon Policy Office is under the supervision  and control
of a director, who is responsible for the performance of the duties,  functions and powers of
the office.
(2) The Governor shall appoint the Director of the Carbon Policy Office, subject to  con-
firmation by the  Senate in the manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565. The director
holds office at the pleasure of the Governor.
(3) The director  may adopt rules in accordance with ORS chapter 183 to exercise and
carry out the duties, functions and powers committed to the Carbon Policy  Office under
sections 8 to 26 and 38  to 40 of this 2019 Act and ORS 468A.280 and other statutes, rules or
policies that commit functions to the Carbon Policy Office.
(4) The director shall be paid a salary as  provided by law or, if not so provided, as pre-
scribed by the Governor.
(5) Subject to the approval of  the Governor, the director may organize and reorganize the
administrative structure of the office  as the director considers appropriate to properly con-
duct the work of the office.
(6) The director may divide the functions of the  office into administrative divisions.
Subject to the approval of  the Governor, the director may appoint an individual to administer
each division. The administrator of each division serves at the  pleasure of the director and
is not subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 240. Each individual appointed under  this
subsection must be well qualified by technical training and experience in the functions to  be
performed by the individual.
(7) Subject to any applicable provisions of ORS chapter 240, the director shall  appoint all
subordinate officers and employees of the office, prescribe their  duties and fix their com-
pensation.
SECTION 6. Civil penalties. (1) In addition to any other liability or  penalty provided by
law, the Director of the Carbon Policy  Office may impose a civil penalty not to exceed
$  on a person for any of the following:
(a) A violation of any provision of sections 8 to 26 of this 2019 Act.
(b) A violation of any rule adopted by the director under sections 8 to 26 of this 2019  Act.
(2) Civil penalties under this section must be imposed in the manner provided by  ORS
183.745.
(3) All civil penalties recovered under this section must be paid into the State  Treasury
and credited to the  Oregon Climate Action Program Operating Fund and may be used only
pursuant to section 26 (3) of this 2019 Act.
OREGON CLIMATE ACTION PROGRAM
(Statement of Purpose)
SECTION 7.
(1) The Legislative Assembly  finds and declares that the purposes of sections
7 to 41 of this 2019 Act are:
(a) To achieve a reduction in total  levels of regulated emissions under sections 8 to 26
of this 2019 Act to at least  45 percent below 1990 emissions levels by 2035 and to achieve a
reduction in total regulated emissions levels to at least 80 percent below 1990 emissions levels
[4]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
by 2050;
(b) To promote greenhouse gas emissions sequestration and mitigation;
(c) To  promote adaptation and resilience by natural and working lands, fish and wildlife
resources, communities  and the economy in the face of climate change and ocean
acidification; and
(d) To provide assistance to households,  businesses and workers impacted by the transi-
tion in this state to  an economic system that allows for the State of Oregon to achieve the
greenhouse gas reduction goals set forth in ORS 468A.205.
(2) Sections 7 to 41 of this 2019 Act and the rules adopted pursuant to sections 7 to  41
of this 2019 Act:
(a) May not be interpreted to limit the authority of any state agency  to adopt and im-
plement measures to reduce greenhouse gas emissions; and
(b) Shall be interpreted in a manner consistent with federal law.
(Greenhouse Gas Cap and Market-Based Compliance Mechanism)
SECTION 8.
Definitions. As used in sections 8 to 26 of this 2019 Act:
(1) “Aggregation” means an  approach for qualifying and quantifying offset projects that
allows for the grouping together of two  or more geographically or temporally separate ac-
tivities that result in reductions or removals of greenhouse gases in a similar manner.
(2) “Allowance” means a tradable authorization to emit one metric ton  of carbon dioxide
equivalent.
(3) “Annual allowance budget”  means the number of allowances available to be allocated
during one year of the Oregon Climate Action Program.
(4) “Carbon dioxide equivalent” means the  amount of carbon dioxide by weight that would
produce the same global warming impact as a given weight of another greenhouse gas, based
on considerations including but not limited to the best available science,  including informa-
tion from the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change.
(5) “Compliance instrument” means  one allowance or one offset credit that may be used
to fulfill a compliance obligation.
(6) “Compliance obligation” means the  quantity of regulated emissions for which a cov-
ered entity  must submit compliance instruments to the Carbon Policy Office during a com-
pliance period.
(7) “Consumer-owned utility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.270.
(8) “Covered entity” means a person that is designated by the office as  subject to the
Oregon Climate Action Program.
(9) “Direct environmental benefits in this state” means:
(a) A reduction in or avoidance of emissions of any  air contaminant in this state other
than a greenhouse gas;
(b) A reduction in or avoidance of pollution of any of the waters of the state, as the
terms “pollution” and “the waters of the state” are defined in ORS 468B.005; or
(c) An improvement in the health of natural and working lands in this state.
(10) “Electric company” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(11) “Electricity service supplier” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(12) “Electric system manager” includes any entity that, as needed, operates  or markets
[5]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
electricity generating facilities, or purchases  wholesale electricity to manage the load for
wholesale or retail electricity customers  within a balancing authority area that is at least
partially located in Oregon, including but not limited to the following types of entities:
(a) Electric companies.
(b) Electricity service suppliers.
(c) Consumer-owned utilities.
(d) The Bonneville Power Administration.
(e) Electric generation and transmission cooperatives.
(13) “General market participant” means a person that:
(a) Is a registered entity;
(b) Is not a covered entity or an opt-in entity; and
(c) Intends to purchase, hold, sell or voluntarily surrender compliance instruments.
(14) “Greenhouse gas” includes, but is not limited  to, carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous
oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons, sulfur hexafluoride and nitrogen trifluoride.
(15) “Impacted community” means a community most at  risk of being disproportionately
impacted by climate change as designated by the office under section 20 of this 2019 Act.
(16) “Indian trust lands” means lands within the State of  Oregon held in trust by the
United States for the benefit of an Indian tribe of individual Indians.
(17) “Natural and working lands” means:
(a) Land that is actively used by an agricultural  owner or operator for an agricultural
operation that includes, but need not  be limited to, active engagement in farming or ranch-
ing;
(b) Land producing forest products;
(c) Lands consisting of forests, grasslands, deserts, freshwater  and riparian systems,
wetlands, coastal and estuarine areas, watersheds, wildlands or wildlife habitat;
(d) Lands used for recreational  purposes such as parks, urban and community forests,
trails, greenbelts and other similar open space land; or
(e) Indian trust lands.
(18) “Natural gas utility” means a natural gas utility regulated by the  Public Utility
Commission under ORS chapter 757.
(19) “Offset credit” means a tradable credit generated through an  offset project that re-
presents a greenhouse gas emissions reduction or removal of  one metric ton of carbon
dioxide equivalent.
(20) “Offset project” means a project that reduces or removes greenhouse  gas emissions
that are not regulated emissions.
(21) “Opt-in  entity” means a person that is not designated as a covered entity by the of-
fice and that voluntarily chooses  to participate in the Oregon Climate Action Program as if
the entity were a covered entity.
(22) “Oregon Climate Action Program” means  the program adopted by rule by the Di-
rector of the Carbon Policy Office under section 9 (1) of this 2019 Act.
(23) “Person” includes individuals, corporations, associations, firms,  partnerships, joint
stock companies, public and municipal corporations, political subdivisions, the state and any
agencies thereof and the federal government and any agencies thereof.
(24) “Registered entity” means a  covered entity, opt-in entity or general market partic-
ipant that has successfully registered to participate in the Oregon Climate Action Program.
[6]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(25) “Regulated emissions”  means the verified greenhouse gas emissions reported by or
assigned to a covered entity or opt-in entity under ORS 468A.280 that the office  determines
by rule are greenhouse gas emissions regulated under sections 8 to 26 of this 2019 Act.
(26) “Surrender” means to transfer a compliance instrument to the office:
(a) To satisfy a compliance obligation or an adjusted compliance obligation; or
(b) On a voluntary basis.
SECTION 9.
Adoption of program; general provisions.  (1)(a) The Director of the Carbon
Policy Office shall adopt an  Oregon Climate Action Program by rule in accordance with the
provisions of sections 8 to 26 of this 2019 Act. The program shall:
(A) Place a cap on the total anthropogenic greenhouse gas emissions that  are regulated
emissions through setting annual allowance budgets for 2021 to 2050; and
(B) Provide a market-based mechanism for covered entities  to demonstrate compliance
with the program.
(b)(A) The annual allowance budget for 2021 shall be a number  of allowances equal to
baseline emissions as calculated under paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(B) Beginning in 2022 and for  each following year until and including 2035, the amount
of allowances available  in each annual allowance budget shall decline by a constant amount
as necessary to accomplish a reduction in total regulated emissions levels to at least  45
percent below 1990 emissions levels by 2035.
(C) Beginning in 2036 and for each following year until and including  2050, the amount
of allowances available in each annual allowance budget shall decline by a  constant amount
as necessary  to accomplish a reduction in total regulated emissions levels to at least 80
percent below 1990 emissions levels by 2050.
(c) The office shall calculate baseline emissions  to be equal to the three-year average of
the total,  expressed in tons of carbon dioxide equivalent, anthropogenic greenhouse gas
emissions attributable to all persons that the office designates to be  covered entities under
the program, using greenhouse gas emissions information from the three most recent years
prior to 2021 for which greenhouse gas  emissions information is available and verified by the
office. The office may exclude  from the calculation of baseline emissions those greenhouse
gas emissions during the three most recent years prior to  2021 that would not have been
regulated emissions if the Oregon  Climate Action Program had been in effect during the time
that the greenhouse gas emissions occurred.
(2) Subject to section 10 of this 2019 Act,  the office shall designate persons as covered
entities as follows:
(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the  office shall designate a
person in control  of one or more air contamination sources for which a permit is issued
pursuant to ORS 468.065, 468A.040 or 468A.155  as a covered entity if the annual regulated
emissions attributable to the air contamination sources meet or  exceed 25,000 metric tons
of carbon dioxide equivalent.
(b) For the purpose of regulating anthropogenic emissions of  greenhouse gasses attrib-
utable to the generation of electricity in this state, the office shall  designate a person in
control of one or more air contamination sources  for which a permit is issued pursuant to
ORS 468.065, 468A.040 or 468A.155  as a covered entity if the industry description and code
under the North  American Industry Classification System that is listed in the permit for the
air contamination sources is fossil fuel electric power generation,  regardless of whether the
[7]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
annual regulated emissions attributable to the air contamination sources meet  or exceed
25,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent.
(c) The office shall designate an electric system  manager as a covered entity for the
purpose of addressing annual regulated  emissions from outside this state that are attribut-
able to the generation of electricity that the electric system manager  schedules for delivery
and consumption in  this state, including wholesale market purchases for which the energy
source for the electricity is not known, and accounting for transmission  and distribution line
losses.
(d) The office shall designate a natural gas marketer as a covered  entity for the purpose
of addressing annual regulated emissions that are  attributable to the combustion of natural
gas that is sold by the natural gas marketer for use in  this state by persons that are not
designated as covered entities under paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(e) The office shall designate a natural  gas utility as a covered entity for the purpose of
addressing annual regulated emissions that are attributable to the  combustion of natural gas
that the natural gas utility imports, sells or distributes for use in this state and that  are not
emissions accounted for through the regulation of air contamination  sources under para-
graph (a) or (b) of this subsection or natural gas marketers under paragraph  (d) of this
subsection.
(f) The office shall designate as covered  entities persons not described in paragraphs (d)
and (e) of this subsection  that produce in Oregon, or import into Oregon, fuel that is sold
or distributed for use in this state, as necessary to address regulated emissions that are at-
tributable to the combustion of the fuel.
(3) The director shall adopt rules  for the market-based compliance mechanism required
by subsection (1) of this section that include, but need not be limited to:
(a) Criteria for the allocation of allowances pursuant to sections 14 to 18  of this 2019 Act;
(b) Standards, pursuant to section 19 of this 2019  Act, for offset projects and for covered
entities and opt-in entities to use offset credits;
(c) Rules for the administration of auctions of allowances pursuant to section  21 of this
2019 Act;
(d) Rules allowing for the trading of compliance instruments;
(e) Rules allowing registered entities to bank and carry forward allowances;
(f) Rules prohibiting the borrowing of allowances from future annual allowance budgets;
(g) Rules allowing opt-in entities and general market participants to participate in  the
market-based compliance mechanism; and
(h) Compliance periods, standards for calculating compliance obligations and procedures
for covered entities to demonstrate compliance with their compliance obligations.
(4)(a) The office shall require a covered entity or opt-in entity to surrender to  the office
a quantity of compliance instruments equal to the covered entity’s  or opt-in entity’s com-
pliance obligation no later than the surrender date specified by the director by rule or order.
(b) For purposes of determining the compliance obligation  for a covered entity that is an
electric system  manager, electricity scheduled by the electric system manager that is gen-
erated from  a renewable energy resource and acquired without acquiring the renewable en-
ergy certificate associated with the electricity shall  be considered to have the emissions
attributes of the underlying renewable energy resource.
(c) In addition to  any penalty provided by law, rules adopted by the director shall require
[8]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a covered entity or opt-in entity  that fails to timely surrender to the office a sufficient
quantity of compliance instruments to meet a compliance obligation to surrender to the of-
fice a number of compliance instruments that is in addition to the entity’s  compliance obli-
gation.
(5)(a) All covered entities, opt-in entities and general market participants must register
as registered entities to participate in the Oregon Climate Action Program.
(b) The director shall adopt by rule registration requirements and  any additional re-
quirements necessary for registered  entities to participate in auctions administered pursuant
to section 21 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 10.  Exemptions and exclusions.  (1) The  Carbon Policy Office shall exempt from
regulation as a covered entity under sections 8 to 26 of this 2019 Act:
(a) A  land disposal site, if the land disposal site was closed before the effective date of
this 2019 Act and is closed and maintained in compliance with ORS 459.268.
(b) A cogeneration facility, as defined in ORS 758.505, that is owned or operated by  a
public university listed in ORS 352.002 or  by the Oregon Health and Science University es-
tablished under ORS 353.020.
(2) The office shall exclude from regulated emissions under sections 8 to  26 of this 2019
Act:
(a) Methane emissions from a landfill that are  demonstrated to have been recaptured and
used for  the generation of renewable energy including but not limited to electricity, trans-
portation fuels or heat.
(b) Greenhouse gas emissions from the direct  combustion of municipal solid waste to
generate renewable energy including but not limited  to electricity, transportation fuels or
heat.
(c) Greenhouse gas emissions attributable to an air contamination  source described in
section 9 (2)(b) of this 2019 Act that are attributable to the generation  in this state of elec-
tricity that is:
(A) Delivered to and consumed in another state, accounting for transmission and dis-
tribution line losses; and
(B) For  which the capital and fuel costs associated with the generation are included in
the rates of a multistate jurisdictional electric  company that are charged to the electricity
customers in a state other than Oregon.
(d) Greenhouse gas emissions from the combustion of fuel  that is demonstrated to have
been used as aviation fuel or as fuel in watercraft or railroad locomotives.
(e) Greenhouse gas emissions attributable to a consumer-owned utility if the three-year
average of the annual greenhouse gas emissions attributable to electricity  that is scheduled,
by the consumer-owned utility or by an electric generation and transmission  cooperative, for
the consumer-owned utility to deliver for consumption in this state is  less than 25,000 metric
tons of carbon dioxide equivalent.
(3) For purposes of section 9 (2)(f) of  this 2019 Act, the office may exempt from desig-
nation as a covered entity any person that imports in a calendar year less than a de minimis
amount of  gasoline and diesel fuel, in total, as determined by the office by rule. Gasoline and
diesel fuel imported by persons that  are related or share common ownership or control shall
be aggregated in determining whether a person may be exempted  under this subsection. The
emissions attributable to a person that is exempt from designation as a covered entity  under
[9]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
this section shall be excluded from regulated  emissions under sections 8 to 26 of this 2019
Act.
SECTION 11. Temporary exclusion for certain emissions.  (1) Annual verified greenhouse
gas emissions reported  or assigned under ORS 468A.280 that are emissions of
hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons, sulfur hexafluoride, nitrogen trifluoride or  other
fluorinated greenhouse gases generated during semiconductor and related device  manufac-
turing are excluded from regulated emissions.
(2)(a) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to exclude from regulated emissions the
greenhouse gas emissions other than the emissions described  in subsection (1) of this section
from covered entities engaged in processes identified by  industry description and code in the
North American Industry Classification System as  Semiconductor and Related Device Man-
ufacturing, code 334413.
(b) Nothing in this section may  be interpreted to prevent a covered entity engaged in
processes identified by industry description and code  in the North American Industry Clas-
sification System as  Semiconductor and Related Device Manufacturing, code 334413, from
receiving allowances by direct distribution at no cost pursuant to sections 14 and 18 of  this
2019 Act for  the manufacture of goods through emissions-intensive, trade-exposed processes.
SECTION 12. Repeal of temporary exclusion.  Section 11 of  this 2019 Act is repealed on
January 2, 2026.
SECTION 13. Report on temporary  exclusion.  No later than September 15, 2024, the
Carbon Policy Office shall conduct research and submit a report, in the manner provided by
ORS 192.245, to the Joint Committee on Climate Action regarding  the exclusion provided in
section 11 of this 2019 Act.  The purpose of the report is to provide recommendations, which
may include recommendations for legislation, on the anticipated effects of the January 2,
2026, repeal of section 11 of this 2019  Act and on whether to modify the January 2, 2026, re-
peal date provided in section 12 of this 2019 Act. In carrying out the provisions  of this sec-
tion, the office shall research and report on:
(1) Whether the semiconductor and related device manufacturing industry  in Oregon is
reducing greenhouse gas  emissions through the implementation of best practices based on
guidance for semiconductor  perfluoro-compound emission reduction issued by the World
Semiconductor Council;
(2) The number of jurisdictions where large semiconductor  manufacturers are located
that have adopted a carbon pricing mechanism and the number  of those jurisdictions that
require semiconductor manufacturers to comply with the carbon pricing mechanism;
(3) The trade exposure of semiconductor manufacturers worldwide;
(4) The cost and economic  impacts of repealing the exclusion provided under section 11
of this 2019 Act; and
(5) The environmental impacts of repealing the exclusion provided under  section 11 of
this 2019 Act.
SECTION 14.
Allocation of allowances, generally. (1) The Carbon Policy Office shall allo-
cate a percentage of allowances from each annual allowance budget to be distributed  directly
into an allowance price containment reserve.
(2) The office may  allocate a percentage of allowances from each annual allowance budget
to be distributed directly  into a voluntary renewable electricity generation reserve. The Di-
rector of the Carbon Policy  Office shall adopt rules for the distribution of allowances from
[10]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the reserve for voluntary renewable electricity generated by generating facilities that begin
operations on or after January 1, 2021.
(3) The office shall allocate allowances for direct distribution at  no cost to covered enti-
ties that are electric companies subject to rules adopted under section 15 of this 2019 Act.
(4) The office shall allocate allowances  for direct distribution at no cost to covered enti-
ties that are electric system managers pursuant to section 16 of this 2019 Act.
(5) The office shall allocate a percentage of allowances from  each annual allowance
budget to be  distributed directly into an electricity price containment reserve. Allowances
may be distributed from the electricity price containment reserve only when the distribution
is necessary to protect electricity ratepayers from cost increases associated  with unexpected
increases in regulated emissions attributable to  an electric system manager that are outside
of the  control of the electric system manager, including but not limited to unexpected in-
creases in regulated  emissions due to hydroelectric power generation variability. The direc-
tor shall adopt by rule a process for electric  system managers to apply for direct distribution
at no cost of allowances from the electricity price containment reserve.
(6) The office shall allocate allowances  for direct distribution at no cost to covered enti-
ties that are natural gas utilities subject to rules adopted under section 17 of this 2019 Act.
(7) In order to mitigate leakage and pursuant  to section 18 of this 2019 Act, the office
shall allocate allowances for direct distribution at no cost  to covered entities and opt-in en-
tities that are engaged in emissions-intensive, trade-exposed processes.
(8) The office shall allocate a percentage of allowances from  each annual allowance
budget to be distributed directly into an emissions-intensive, trade-exposed  process reserve
account. Allowances in the emissions-intensive, trade-exposed process reserve account may
be distributed only to covered entities and opt-in  entities described in, and pursuant to rules
adopted by the director under, section 18 (6) and (7) of this 2019 Act.
(9) After making all  allocations provided for in subsections (1) to (8) of this section, the
office shall:
(a) Allocate all remaining allowances in the annual allowance budget to be distributed  to
an auction holding account for auction pursuant to section 21 of this 2019 Act; and
(b) Distribute the annual allowance budget pursuant to  the allocations made under this
section.
SECTION 15.
Direct distribution of allowances for electric companies.  The Director of the
Carbon Policy Office shall adopt rules for allocating allowances for direct distribution at no
cost to covered  entities that are electric companies. Rules adopted under this section must
allow for an electric  company to use allowances directly distributed under this section to
meet compliance obligations associated with generation of electricity to serve the load of the
electric company’s retail  electricity consumers in Oregon, subject to the approval of the
Public Utility Commission. The rules must include provisions  necessary to implement direct
distributions of allowances to electric companies as follows:
(1) For the  purpose of aligning the effects of sections 8 to 26 of this 2019 Act with the
trajectory of emissions reductions by electric companies resulting from  the requirements of
ORS 469A.005 to 469A.210 and 757.518, the direct  distribution to an electric company during
calendar year 2021 and for each calendar year until  and including 2030 must represent an
amount equal to 100 percent of the electric company’s  forecast emissions associated with the
generation of electricity to serve the load of  the electric company’s retail electricity con-
[11]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sumers in Oregon for the calendar year for which the allowances  are directly distributed.
For purposes of this subsection,  forecast emissions must be based on information contained
in the most recent integrated resource plan filed by the electric  company and acknowledged
by order by the Public Utility Commission or in any updates to the integrated resource plan
filed by the electric company with the commission, as of January 1, 2021.
(2) Beginning in 2031 and  for each following year until and including 2050, the direct dis-
tribution to an electric company under  this section must decline from the amount of allow-
ances allocated to the electric company in 2030 by a constant amount proportionate to  the
decline in the amount of allowances available in  annual allowance budgets pursuant to sec-
tion 9 (1)(b) of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 16.
Direct distribution of allowances for certain electric system managers.  (1)
The Carbon Policy Office shall allocate allowances for direct  distribution at no cost to cov-
ered entities that are electric system managers other than electric companies as follows:
(a) The direct distribution to an electric system manager  under this subsection during
calendar year 2021 shall  represent an amount equal to 100 percent of the covered emissions
that are:
(A) Forecast for 2021,  based on representative years, to be attributable to electricity
scheduled by the electric system manager for final delivery by consumer-owned utilities for
consumption in this state; and
(B) Not exempt from regulation under section 10 (2)(e) of this 2019 Act.
(b) Beginning in 2022 and for each subsequent calendar  year until and including 2050, the
direct distribution received by an electric system manager for  emissions described in para-
graph (a) of this subsection shall decline annually by a constant amount proportionate  to the
decline in the amount of allowances available in  annual allowance budgets pursuant to sec-
tion 9 (1)(b) of this 2019 Act.
(2) Proceeds from  the sale by a consumer-owned utility of allowances distributed at no
cost under this section must be used by the consumer-owned utility  for the benefit of
ratepayers, consistent  with the purposes stated in section 7 of this 2019 Act and as further
required by the governing body of the consumer-owned utility.
(3) The governing body of a consumer-owned utility that  receives or sells directly dis-
tributed allowances under this section shall, no later  than September 15 of each even-
numbered year,  submit a report to the Joint Committee on Climate Action on the use by the
consumer-owned utility of the directly distributed allowances. The report  must include, but
not be limited to, a description of the uses by the consumer-owned utility of proceeds from
the sale of allowances distributed to the consumer-owned utility under this section.
SECTION 17.
Direct distribution of allowances for natural gas utilities.  (1) The Director
of the  Carbon Policy Office shall adopt rules for allocating allowances for direct distribution
at no cost to covered entities that are  natural gas utilities. Rules adopted under this section
must allow for a natural gas utility to be directly distributed allowances  at no cost in an
amount equal to  the covered emissions attributable to the provision of natural gas service
to the natural gas utility’s low-income residential customers. By January 1  of the first year
of each compliance period, the Carbon  Policy Office shall determine, after consultation with
the Public Utility Commission, the quantity of allowances to allocate directly to a  natural
utility over the course of the compliance period.
(2) Rules adopted under this section must allow for natural gas utilities  to, subject to the
[12]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
approval of the office, use allowances directly distributed under this section to  minimize the
impacts of sections 8 to 26 of this 2019 Act on low-income residential customers through
actions that may include, but need not be limited to,  meeting compliance obligations associ-
ated with serving the load of the natural gas utility’s retail customers in Oregon.
SECTION 18.
Direct distribution of allowances for  covered entities and opt-in entities
engaged in emissions-intensive, trade-exposed processes.  (1) The Carbon Policy Office shall
allocate allowances for direct distribution at no  cost to a covered entity or an opt-in entity,
if the covered entity or opt-in entity is  a person in control of one or more air contamination
sources designated as a covered  entity under section 9 of this 2019 Act and engaged in the
manufacture of goods through one or more of the following emissions-intensive,  trade-
exposed processes, as identified by industry description  and code in the North American In-
dustry Classification System:
(a) Cement Manufacturing, code 327310.
(b) Other Crushed and Broken Stone Mining and Quarrying, code 212319.
(c) Frozen Fruit, Juice and Vegetable Manufacturing, code 311411.
(d) Frozen Specialty Food Manufacturing, code 311412.
(e) Dried and Dehydrated Food Manufacturing, code 311423.
(f) Iron and Steel Mills and Ferroalloy Manufacturing, code 331110.
(g) Other Basic Inorganic Chemical Manufacturing, code 325180.
(h) All Other Plastics Product Manufacturing, code 326199.
(i) Mineral Wool Manufacturing, code 327993.
(j) Polystyrene Foam Product Manufacturing, code 326140.
(k) Glass Container Manufacturing, code 327213.
(L) Ethyl Alcohol Manufacturing, code 325193.
(m) Reconstituted Wood Product Manufacturing, code 321219.
(n) Gypsum Product Manufacturing, code 327420.
(o) Pulp Mills, code 322110.
(p) Paper (Except Newsprint) Mills, code 322121.
(q) Paperboard Mills, code 322130.
(r) Semiconductor and Related Device Manufacturing, code 334413.
(2) A covered entity or opt-in entity that is a fossil  fuel distribution and storage facility
or infrastructure, or an electric  generating unit, may not receive allowances at no cost un-
der this section and section 14 of this 2019 Act.
(3) The annual allocation of allowances for direct distribution at no cost  to a covered
entity or opt-in entity described in subsection (1) of this section shall be  a number of allow-
ances equal to the sum  total of the annual good-specific emissions calculations for the goods
manufactured by the covered entity or opt-in entity, multiplied by:
(a) During calendar year 2021, 100 percent; and
(b) Beginning in 2022 and for each following year until and  including 2050, a percentage
that is adjusted annually, as set  forth in a schedule adopted by the Director of the Carbon
Policy Office by  rule. The schedule required by this subsection shall result in the amount of
annual allowance allocations  that a covered entity or opt-in entity may receive under this
section and section 14 of this 2019 Act in each year  declining annually by a constant amount
proportionate to the decline in the amount of  allowances available in annual allowance
budgets pursuant to section 9 (1)(b) of this 2019 Act.
[13]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) The annual good-specific emissions calculation for a good manufactured by  a covered
entity or opt-in entity shall be the product of:
(a) The benchmark for the good, as calculated pursuant to subsection (5)  of this section;
and
(b) The covered entity’s or opt-in entity’s output of the good during  the calendar year
prior to the calendar year in which  the annual allocation of allowances will be directly dis-
tributed.
(5)(a) The office shall  calculate either a sector benchmark or a facility benchmark, as
applicable pursuant to this subsection, for each good manufactured  in this state by a covered
entity or opt-in entity through an  emissions-intensive, trade-exposed process described in
subsection (1) of this subsection in which the covered entity  or opt-in entity was engaged on
or before the operative date of sections  8 to 26 of this 2019 Act. In order to implement the
requirements of this section, the director shall adopt by rule:
(A) A means for attributing a covered entity’s or opt-in entity’s greenhouse gas emis-
sions to the manufacture of individual goods; and
(B) Requirements for covered  entities and opt-in entities to provide any pertinent records
necessary for the office to  verify the output data used to calculate benchmarks pursuant to
this paragraph.
(b) For a  good manufactured in this state through an emissions-intensive, trade-exposed
process by three or more covered entities and opt-in entities, the  office shall calculate a
sector benchmark for the good by:
(A) Calculating the sum total of  the three-year averages of the totals, expressed in tons
of carbon dioxide equivalent, of greenhouse gas emissions attributable to manufacture of the
good in this state by each of the covered  entities and opt-in entities in this state that man-
ufactures the good, using greenhouse gas emissions information from the  three most recent
years prior to 2021 for  which verified greenhouse gas emissions information is available for
the covered entities and opt-in entities and verified by the office; and
(B) Dividing the number calculated under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph by the  sum
total of the three-year averages of the totals of the annual output of the good in this state
by each covered entity or opt-in entity in this state that manufactures the good, using output
data for the covered entities and opt-in entities from the three most recent years prior to
2021.
(c) For a good manufactured in this state by one or two covered entities and  opt-in en-
tities, the office shall calculate a separate, facility benchmark for the good for each covered
entity or opt-in entity that manufactures the good by:
(A) Calculating the three-year average of the total, expressed in tons of carbon  dioxide
equivalent, of greenhouse gas emissions attributable to manufacture of  the good in this state
each year by the covered entity or opt-in entity, using greenhouse gas emissions  information
from the three most recent years  prior to 2021 for which verified greenhouse gas emissions
information is available and verified by the office; and
(B) Dividing the number calculated under  subparagraph (A) of this paragraph by the
three-year average of the total annual output of the good in this state by  the covered entity
or opt-in entity, using output data from the three most recent years prior to 2021.
(6)(a) The director shall  adopt by rule a process for covered entities and opt-in entities
described in this section to  apply to the office for an adjustment to the allocation of allow-
[14]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ances for direct distribution at no cost that the covered entity or opt-in entity  may receive.
The office may grant an adjustment based only on either:
(A) A significant  change in the greenhouse gas emissions attributable to the manufacture
of an individual good or goods in this state by a covered entity or opt-in entity  based on a
finding by the office  that an adjustment is necessary to accommodate for changes to the
manufacturing process that have a material impact on emissions; or
(B) Significant changes to a covered entity’s or opt-in entity’s external competitive en-
vironment that result in a significant increase in leakage risk.
(b) Rules adopted under this subsection:
(A) May provide for the director to contract with an external third-party expert to assist
the office  in making individual adjustment determinations on applications received from
covered entities and opt-in entities; and
(B) May not allow for a covered  entity or opt-in entity to apply for an adjustment based
on paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection  until one year prior to the close of the second com-
pliance period for which the covered entity or opt-in  entity must meet a compliance obli-
gation.
(c) The office may use only one of the following methods  for adjusting the allocation of
allowances for direct distribution at no cost to a covered entity  or opt-in entity under this
subsection:
(A) Temporarily continuing to apply in the  calculation conducted for the covered entity
or opt-in entity under subsection (3) of this section,  for a period of years to be determined
by the office, the  scheduled percentage under subsection (3)(b) of this section that was ap-
plicable during the year prior to the year in which the covered entity or opt-in entity applied
for the adjustment, such that the annual allowance  allocation received by the covered entity
or opt-in entity does not decline during the adjustment period; or
(B) Temporarily modifying from the  schedule required under subsection (3)(b) of this
section, in each year for a period of years  to be determined by the office, the annual per-
centage to be applied  in the calculation conducted for the covered entity or opt-in entity
under subsection (3) of this section,  such that the annual allowance allocation received by
the covered entity or opt-in entity  during the adjustment period annually declines at rate
that is less than the rate by which  the allocation would have declined pursuant to the
schedule.
(7)(a) The director  shall adopt by rule a process for determining whether allowances may
be allocated for direct distribution at no cost to mitigate leakage to a covered entity or opt-in
entity that:
(A) Begins  manufacturing a good or goods in this state after the operative date of
sections 8 to 26 of this 2019 Act; and
(B) Manufactures the good  or goods through an emissions-intensive, trade-exposed pro-
cess that is not listed in subsection (1) of this section.
(b) The director shall hire  or contract with a third-party organization to assist the office
in gathering data and conducting analyses as necessary  to make determinations under this
subsection.
(c) Rules adopted under this subsection:
(A) May allow for the office to assign a good manufactured by a covered entity or  opt-in
entity described in this  subsection a temporary benchmark and to adjust the temporary
[15]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
benchmark after the  close of the first compliance period for which the covered entity or
opt-in entity must meet a compliance obligation;
(B) Must be consistent with the process  for calculating benchmarks under subsection (5)
of this section; and
(C) May allow for a covered entity or opt-in entity that  manufactures goods through a
process that is not listed in subsection (1) of this section to receive an  allocation of allow-
ances for direct distribution at no cost to mitigate leakage, if the office  finds that the pro-
cess is an emissions-intensive, trade-exposed process.
(8) No later than November 1 of the year following the end  of every second compliance
period, the office shall provide a report to the Joint Committee on Climate Action, in  the
manner provided in ORS 192.245,  on the benchmarks established pursuant to subsections (5)
and (7) of this section. The report may include recommendations for legislation. The report
shall assess:
(a) The emissions intensity and trade exposure of  the industries listed in subsection (1)
of this section and any  other industries allocated allowances for direct distribution at no cost
under subsection (7) of this section;
(b) The emissions reduction opportunities available  to the industries described in para-
graph (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Whether the conclusions of the assessments required under paragraphs (a) and (b)
of this subsection warrant an adjustment to the benchmarks developed pursuant to sub-
sections (5) and (7)  of this section, and thus an adjustment to the allocation of allowances
calculated using the benchmarks.
SECTION 19.
Offset projects. (1) Offset projects:
(a) Must be located in the United States  or in a jurisdiction with which the State of
Oregon has entered into a linkage agreement pursuant to section 24 of this 2019 Act;
(b) Must not be otherwise required by law; and
(c) Must result in greenhouse gas emissions reductions or removals that:
(A) Are real, permanent, quantifiable, verifiable and enforceable; and
(B) Are in addition to greenhouse gas emissions reductions or  removals otherwise re-
quired by law and any other greenhouse gas emissions reductions or  removals that would
otherwise occur.
(2)(a) A total of no more than eight  percent of a covered entity’s compliance obligation
may be met by surrendering offset credits. A total of no  more than four percent of a covered
entity’s compliance obligation may be met by surrendering offset credits that  are sourced
from offset projects that do not provide direct environmental benefits in this state.
(b) The Director of the Carbon Policy Office may by rule  adopt additional restrictions on
the number of offset credits that may be surrendered by  a covered entity that is an air
contamination source that is geographically located in an impacted community if:
(A) The geographic area within which the air contamination source is located is  also a
nonattainment area or an attainment area projected by the Department of Environmental
Quality to exceed air quality standards within five years  and the air contamination source
substantially contributes to or causes  the nonattainment or projected nonattainment of air
quality standards; or
(B) The air contamination source is in  violation of the terms or conditions of any permit
required or authorized under ORS chapter 468A and issued by the Department  of Environ-
[16]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mental Quality or a regional air quality control authority formed under ORS 468A.105.
(3) In adopting rules governing offset projects and covered entities’ use of offset  credits,
the director shall:
(a) Take into consideration standards, rules or protocols  for offset projects and offset
credits established by other states,  provinces and countries with programs comparable to the
Oregon Climate Action Program;
(b) Encourage opportunities for the development of offset  projects in this state by
adopting offset protocols that may include, but need not be limited to:
(A) Protocols that make use  of aggregation or other mechanisms to reduce transaction
costs related to the development of offset projects; and
(B) Protocols for the development of offset projects that result  in the reduction of
methane emissions related to agricultural operations;
(c) Consult with and consider the  recommendations of the State Department of Agricul-
ture, the State Board of Forestry,  the Environmental Justice Task Force, the Oregon
Watershed Enhancement Board and other relevant state agencies;
(d) Adopt by rule a process for the  Carbon Policy Office to investigate and invalidate is-
sued offset credits as necessary to uphold the environmental integrity of the Oregon  Climate
Action Program; and
(e) Adopt by rule provisions for the  office to withhold up to three percent of the offset
credits issued for each offset project and deposit the withheld offset credits in an offset in-
tegrity account. Offset credits deposited in the offset  integrity account established by rule
under this paragraph may be used to replace offset credits that are  invalidated pursuant to
rules adopted under paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(4) The director  shall appoint a compliance offsets protocol advisory committee to aid and
advise the office in adopting and updating rules governing offset projects and covered
entities’ use of offset credits. The advisory committee shall provide guidance  to the office in
developing and updating offset protocols for the purposes of increasing offset  projects with
direct environmental benefits in this state while prioritizing offset projects that benefit im-
pacted communities, Indian tribes and natural and working lands. The  director shall appoint
at least one member to the advisory committee from each of the following groups:
(a) Scientists;
(b) Public health experts;
(c) Carbon market experts;
(d) Representatives of Indian tribes;
(e) Environmental justice advocates;
(f) Labor and workforce representatives;
(g) Forestry experts;
(h) Agriculture experts;
(i) Environmental advocates;
(j) Conservation advocates; and
(k) Dairy experts.
SECTION 20.
Methodology for designating impacted communities. (1) The Director of the
Carbon Policy Office,  by rule and in consultation with the Portland State University Popu-
lation Research Center,  the Oregon Health Authority and other relevant state agencies and
local agencies and officials, shall designate  impacted communities by census tract. The Car-
[17]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
bon Policy Office shall  designate impacted communities based on a methodology that takes
into consideration geographic, socioeconomic, historic disadvantage,  public health and envi-
ronmental hazard criteria. The  office may designate as impacted communities areas that
include, but are not limited to:
(a) Areas with above average concentrations of low-income households,  historically dis-
advantaged households, high unemployment, high linguistic isolation,  low levels of
homeownership, high rent burden, sensitive populations or residents with low levels of edu-
cational attainment.
(b) Areas disproportionately affected by environmental pollution and  other hazards that
can lead to negative public health effects, exposure or environmental degradation.
(2) The methodology  required by this section must give greater weight to those criteria
that the office determines are the  most accurate predictors of vulnerability to the impacts
of climate change and ocean acidification.
(3) The office shall review  and update the methodology required by this section and the
designation of impacted communities a minimum of once every five years.
SECTION 21.
Auctions. (1) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this  section, auctions
of allowances are open to registered entities.
(2) The Carbon Policy Office shall hold auctions at least annually.
(3) The office may engage:
(a) A qualified, independent auction administrator to administer auctions; or
(b) A qualified financial services administrator to conduct financial  transactions related
to the auction.
(4) The office shall issue notice for an upcoming auction prior to the auction.
(5) The office shall:
(a) Set  an auction floor price for 2021 and a schedule for the floor price to increase by a
fixed percentage over inflation each calendar year.
(b) Set an allowance price containment reserve floor price for 2021  and a schedule for the
allowance price containment reserve floor price to increase by a fixed percentage over in-
flation each calendar year.
(c) Set a hard price ceiling for  2021 and a schedule for the hard price ceiling to increase
by a fixed percentage over inflation  each calendar year, and adopt rules for making an un-
limited amount  of allowances available for auction upon exceedance of the hard price ceiling.
(d) Take actions to minimize the potential for market  manipulation and to guard against
bidder collusion, including but not limited  to specifying as holding limits the maximum
number of allowances that may be held for use or trade by a registered entity at any time.
(6) In setting the auction floor price, allowance price containment reserve  floor price and
hard price ceiling and adopting rules as required by  subsection (5) of this section, the office
shall consider:
(a) Prevailing prices for carbon in other jurisdictions; and
(b) Setting price requirements in a manner that enables the  state to pursue linkage
agreements pursuant to section 24 of this 2019 Act with other jurisdictions.
(7) Reserve auctions of allowances from the allowance price containment reserve shall
be conducted separately from the auction of other allowances for the  purpose of addressing
high costs of compliance instruments. Allowances unsold at  a reserve auction must be made
available again at future reserve auctions. General market participants may not participate
[18]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in reserve auctions.
(8) The proceeds of an auction shall be transferred  to the State Treasurer to be deposited
in the Auction Proceeds Distribution Fund established under section 22 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 22.  Auction Proceeds Distribution Fund.  (1) The Auction Proceeds Distribution
Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The Auction Proceeds Distribution Fund shall consist of  moneys transferred to the
fund under section 21 of this 2019 Act. Interest earned by the fund shall be credited to the
fund.
(3) The Carbon Policy Office shall certify the amount of moneys available for distribution
in the Auction Proceeds Distribution Fund and distribute the moneys as follows:
(a) All moneys that constitute revenues described in  Article IX, section 3a, of the Oregon
Constitution, must be transferred to the Transportation Decarbonization Investments Ac-
count established in section 32 of this 2019 Act;
(b) All moneys that constitute revenues described in Article VIII, section 2 (1)(g), of  the
Oregon Constitution, must be transferred to the Common School Fund; and
(c) Moneys remaining after the transfers under paragraphs (a) and  (b) of this subsection
shall be transferred to the Climate Investments Fund established in section 30 of this  2019
Act.
SECTION 23.
Market activity reports.  The Carbon Policy Office shall, no later than six
months after the  close of each compliance period, submit a report in the manner provided
by ORS 192.245 to the Joint Committee on Climate Action  detailing activity during the com-
pliance period under the market-based compliance mechanism adopted by the Director  of the
Carbon Policy Office by rule under section 9 of this 2019 Act. A market activity report  re-
quired by this section must include, but need not be limited to,  aggregated information on
the following for the compliance period:
(1) The number of allowances bought and sold at each  auction held and all auction prices,
including the floor and ceiling prices, for the allowances bought and sold at each auction;
(2) The beginning and ending balances of all allowance reserves  held by the office, in-
cluding but not limited to auction holding accounts and the allowance price containment  re-
serve;
(3) The regulated emissions reductions achieved during the compliance  period and
progress made toward achieving  a reduction in total regulated emissions levels to at least
45 percent below 1990 levels by 2035 and a reduction in total regulated emissions levels to at
least 80 percent below 1990 emissions levels by 2050; and
(4) The estimated impacts of the Oregon Climate  Action Program on fuel, electricity and
natural gas prices in Oregon.
SECTION 24.
Linkage with market-based compliance mechanisms in other jurisdictions.
(1) In adopting and implementing  rules under sections 8 to 26 of this 2019 Act, the Director
of the Carbon Policy Office shall:
(a) Consider market-based compliance  mechanisms designed to reduce greenhouse gas
emissions in other jurisdictions; and
(b) Provide for implementation of the Oregon Climate Action  Program in a manner that:
(A) Avoids double counting of emissions or emissions reductions; and
(B) Enables the state to pursue linkage agreements pursuant to this section  with other
jurisdictions.
[19]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The State of Oregon may not link the market-based compliance mechanism  estab-
lished pursuant to sections 8 to 26 of this 2019 Act  and rules adopted under sections 8 to 26
of this 2019 Act with the market-based compliance mechanism of any other jurisdiction  un-
less the director notifies the Governor that the director  intends to link the market-based
compliance mechanism and the Governor makes the following findings:
(a) The jurisdiction  with which the director proposes to enter an agreement to link has
adopted program requirements for greenhouse gas  reductions that are equivalent to or
stricter than those required by sections 8 to 26 of this 2019 Act;
(b) Under the proposed linkage agreement, the State of Oregon is able to enforce sections
8 to 26 of this 2019 Act against any person subject to regulation  under sections 8 to 26 of this
2019 Act and against any person located within the linking jurisdiction to the  maximum ex-
tent permitted under the United States and Oregon Constitutions;
(c) The proposed linkage agreement provides for  enforcement of applicable laws by the
Carbon Policy Office or by the linking jurisdiction of program requirements  that are equiv-
alent to or stricter than those required by sections 8 to 26 of this 2019 Act; and
(d) The proposed linkage agreement and any  related engagement by the State of Oregon
of an independent organization to provide administrative or technical services to support the
implementation of sections 8 to 26 of this 2019 Act  will not impose any significant liability
on the state or any state agency for any failure associated with the linkage.
(3) The  Governor shall issue findings pursuant to subsection (2) of this section within 45
days of receiving a notice from the director that the director intends to link  the market-
based compliance mechanism and shall  provide the findings to the Legislative Assembly. The
Governor, in making the  findings, shall consider the advice of the Attorney General. Findings
issued pursuant to subsection (2) of this section are not subject to judicial review.
SECTION 25.
 Rulemaking advisory committee. The Governor  shall appoint a nine-
member advisory committee to advise the Director of the Carbon Policy Office in adopting
rules under sections 8 to 26 of this 2019 Act. The advisory committee  shall consist of persons
impacted by or otherwise interested in the Oregon Climate Action Program.
SECTION 26.
Operating fund. (1) The Oregon Climate Action  Program Operating Fund is
established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the  General Fund. Moneys in
the Oregon Climate Action Program Operating  Fund are continuously appropriated to the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services for  use by the Carbon Policy Office in the
performance of functions  the office is statutorily required or authorized to perform under
sections 8 to 26 and 38 to 40 of this 2019 Act and ORS 468A.280.
(2) The Oregon Climate Action Program Operating Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative  Assem-
bly; and
(b) Other moneys deposited in the fund from any source.
(3) Civil penalties deposited in the fund under section 6 of this 2019 Act  shall be deposited
in a separate subaccount created in the Oregon Climate Action Program  Operating Fund and
must be used only for:
(a) Administering the  enforcement of sections 8 to 26 of this 2019 Act or rules adopted
under sections 8 to 26 of this 2019 Act; or
(b) Providing technical assistance to covered entities and opt-in entities.
[20]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
INVESTMENT OF STATE PROCEEDS FROM OREGON
CLIMATE ACTION PROGRAM AUCTIONS
(General Provisions)
SECTION 27. Definitions. As used in sections 27 to 41 of this 2019 Act:
(1) “Impacted  community” has the meaning given that term in section 8 of this 2019 Act.
(2) “Metropolitan planning  organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 197.629.
(3) “Natural and working lands” has the meaning given  that term in section 8 of this 2019
Act.
(4) “Regional transportation plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 184.899.
SECTION 28.
Severability. If an allocation of moneys for a particular purpose by  the
Legislative Assembly under sections 27 to 41 of this 2019 Act is determined  by a court to be
inconsistent with law, the allocation is hereby declared independent and severable  and the
invalidity, if any, of  any part or feature of the allocation shall not affect or render the re-
mainder of the allocations by the Legislative Assembly under sections 27 to 41 of this 2019
Act invalid or inoperative.
(Climate Investments Fund;
Transportation Decarbonization Investments Account)
SECTION 29.
Moneys deposited  in Climate Investments Fund and Transportation
Decarbonization Investments Account; general directives.  (1) Moneys deposited in the  Cli-
mate Investments Fund and moneys deposited in  the Transportation Decarbonization In-
vestments Account shall be allocated in a manner consistent with:
(a) The purposes set forth in section 7 of this 2019 Act; and
(b) The requirements of the Oregon Constitution.
(2) In  addition to meeting the requirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section,
allocations from the Climate Investments Fund and the Transportation Decarbonization  In-
vestments Account shall, to the maximum extent  feasible, cost-effective and consistent with
law:
(a) Prioritize projects that benefit impacted communities.
(b) Complement efforts to achieve and maintain local air quality.
(c) Provide opportunities for Indian tribes, members of impacted communities and busi-
nesses owned by women or members of minority groups to participate in and  benefit from
statewide efforts to reduce greenhouse gas emissions,  including technical assistance for mi-
nority or women  owned businesses, nonprofit organizations and other community insti-
tutions that serve or represent most impacted communities or low income households.
(d) Make use of domestically produced products.
(e) Promote low carbon economic  development opportunities and the creation of jobs that
sustain living wages.
(f) Provide assistance to  help households, businesses and workers transition to an eco-
nomic system that allows for the State of  Oregon to achieve the greenhouse gas emissions
reduction goals set forth in ORS 468A.205.
SECTION 30.
Climate Investments Fund.  (1) The Climate Investments Fund is established
in the State  Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. The Climate Invest-
[21]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ments Fund shall consist of moneys deposited in  the fund under section 22 of this 2019 Act.
Interest earned by the fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the  Climate Investments Fund may be used only for projects, programs and
activities that further the purposes set forth in section 7 of this 2019 Act.
(3) The Legislative Assembly shall allocate the moneys deposited in the fund subject  to
sections 29 and 31 of this 2019 Act. Of the moneys deposited in the fund each biennium:
(a) Ten percent shall be allocated for projects, programs or activities that  benefit Indian
tribes;
(b) A percentage that may not exceed  percent shall be allocated for  deposit
in the Oregon Climate Action Program Operating Fund established in section 26 of  this 2019
Act;  and
(c) No less than $  shall be allocated for  deposit in the Just Transition Fund
established in section 35 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 31. Uses of Climate Investments  Fund. Moneys may be allocated from the Cli-
mate Investments Fund for investments that may include, but need  not be limited to, any
of the following:
(1) Funding to reduce greenhouse gas emissions  or promote adaptation or resiliency
through energy efficiency and energy conservation in buildings, low-income weatherization
and support of affordable housing that is transit oriented  or located near employment cen-
ters.
(2) Funding to reduce greenhouse gas emissions through electrical grid decarbonization
efforts, including but not limited to investments in energy generation from  renewable re-
sources, distributed energy resources, transmission and storage  projects for renewable en-
ergy, demand response, community solar projects  and other community-scale renewable
energy projects.
(3) Funding to reduce greenhouse gas emissions associated  with transportation, including
but not limited to investments in transportation electrification,  transit, fuel and energy ef-
ficiency in vessels powered  by marine engines and roadside landscape management efforts
that promote carbon sequestration.
(4) Funding to support planning or implementation of planning by  local governments and
metropolitan planning organizations  for reducing greenhouse gas emissions or promoting
carbon sequestration, adaptation or resilience.
(5) Funding to reduce greenhouse gas emissions,  support greenhouse gas sequestration
or support adaptation or resiliency through investments in natural and working  lands, in-
cluding but not limited to investments in  agricultural or forestry practices, or the manu-
facture of forest products, that serve to reduce greenhouse gas emissions  or promote carbon
sequestration, restoration of tidal marsh or intertidal areas of  estuaries, irrigation efficiency
projects, riparian  zone restoration projects, methane emissions reduction or recovery
projects and biomass pyrolysis projects.
(6) Funding to facilitate the development in  Oregon of clean energy infrastructure or
technologies, low carbon infrastructure or  technologies, carbon capture and storage or
carbon-free infrastructure and technologies.
(7) Funding for air contamination sources for  which a permit is issued pursuant to ORS
468.065, 468A.040 or 468A.155 to reduce greenhouse gas emissions.
(8) Funding to  assist Oregon businesses and industries in reducing greenhouse gas
[22]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
emissions through the adoption of more emissions-efficient equipment and processes.
(9) Funding to strengthen  the resilience of fish, wildlife and ecosystems in the face of
climate change through  investments in projects, including but not limited to projects in-
volving instream flow acquisition and protection, fish barrier removal,  habitat restoration
and enhancement and protection of  wildlife corridors, coldwater refugia areas and species
strongholds.
SECTION 32. Transportation Decarbonization Investments Account.  (1) The Transporta-
tion Decarbonization Investments Account is established as a separate account within the
State Highway  Fund. Interest earned by the Transportation Decarbonization Investments
Account shall be credited to the account. Moneys in the account must  be distributed by the
Department of Transportation as provided in this section.
(2) The account shall consist of moneys deposited  in the account under section 22 of this
2019 Act.
(3) Moneys deposited in the account may be used only:
(a) As authorized by Article IX, section 3a, of the Oregon Constitution; and
(b) For activities that further the purposes set forth in section 7 of this 2019 Act.
(4) The Legislative Assembly shall  allocate the moneys deposited in the account subject
to sections 29 and 33 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 33.
Uses of Transportation Decarbonization Investments Account.  (1) In allo-
cating moneys from the Transportation Decarbonization Investments Account,  the Legisla-
tive Assembly shall, to the extent feasible and consistent with law, seek to invest in:
(a) Programs, projects or activities by state  agencies, local governments or metropolitan
planning organizations that are consistent  with, or that complement, investments described
in section 31 of this 2019 Act;
(b) The implementation  of land use and transportation scenarios required to be adopted
by metropolitan service districts under section 37, chapter 865, Oregon Laws  2009, and that
have been approved by the Land Conservation and Development Commission; and
(c) The planning, development and  implementation of land use and transportation sce-
narios by local governments and metropolitan planning  organizations in accordance with the
guidelines established by the Department of Transportation and  the Department of Land
Conservation and Development under ORS 184.893.
(2) Improvements  funded by moneys deposited in the Transportation Decarbonization
Investments Account shall, to  the greatest extent practicable, serve to conserve, restore,
preserve and enhance  natural resources adjacent to the improvements through the pro-
curement and installation of Oregon and native nursery stock.  The requirements of this
subsection shall be implemented in a  manner designed to minimize soil erosion, reduce storm
water runoff  volume and velocity, and to promote water conservation and natural ecosystem
resiliency in the face of climate change.
(3) A project, program or activity that is eligible to be funded by moneys deposited in the
Transportation Decarbonization Investments Account may also  be eligible to receive funding
through the allocation of moneys deposited in  the Climate Investments Fund for those
portions of the project, program or activity that may not be constitutionally funded by re-
venues described in Article IX, section 3a (1), of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 34.
Construction projects funded by certain auction  proceeds; requirements.  (1)
If a  construction project is funded in whole or in part by moneys allocated by the Legislative
[23]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Assembly from the  Climate Investments Fund or the Transportation Decarbonization In-
vestments Account, the primary contractor participating in the construction project:
(a) Shall participate in an apprenticeship program registered with the State Apprentice-
ship and Training Council;
(b) May not be a contractor listed by the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and In-
dustries under ORS 279C.860 as ineligible to receive a contract or subcontract for public
works;
(c) Must demonstrate a  history of compliance with the rules and other requirements of
the Construction Contractors Board and of the Workers’ Compensation Division, the Build-
ing Codes Division and the Occupational Safety and Health  Division of the Department of
Consumer and Business Services; and
(d) Must demonstrate a history of compliance with federal and state wage and  hour laws.
(2) A farm labor  contractor, as defined in ORS 658.405, may not receive moneys allocated
by the Legislative Assembly from the  Climate Investments Fund or the Transportation
Decarbonization Investments Account unless  the farm labor contractor is in compliance with
all licensing and any other requirements or regulations imposed upon farm  labor contractors
pursuant to ORS 658.405 to 658.503.
(3)(a) The Oregon Department of Administrative  Services shall adopt model rules that
specify labor, workforce  and contracting procedures for all state agencies to use in admin-
istering funds for projects that are funded in  whole or in part by moneys allocated by the
Legislative Assembly from  the Climate Investments Fund or the Transportation
Decarbonization Investments Account. The department shall adopt the  rules in accordance
with ORS chapter 183.
(b) Model rules adopted under this subsection shall require the use of a project labor
agreement for large construction projects funded as  described in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section. For all other construction projects funded as  described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection, the model rules shall establish measurable, enforceable  goals for the training and
hiring of persons who are members  of impacted communities and for contracting with busi-
nesses that are owned or operated by members of impacted communities.
(c) The model rules shall promote best practices in procurement and contracting.
(d)(A) The model rules shall  require that, in each contract awarded for a construction
project funded as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection,  steel, iron, coatings for steel
and iron and manufactured products that the  contractor purchases for the project and that
become part of a permanent structure be produced in the United States.
(B) The requirement in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall not  apply if the admin-
istering agency finds that:
(i) The requirement is inconsistent with the public interest;
(ii) Steel, iron, coatings for steel and  iron and manufactured products required for the
project are not produced in the United States in sufficient and reasonably available quantities
and with satisfactory quality; or
(iii) The requirement set  forth in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph will increase the
costs of the project, exclusive of  labor costs involved in final assembly for manufactured
products, by 25 percent or more.
(C) Notwithstanding a finding by the administering agency under paragraph (d)(B) of this
subsection, a contractor shall spend at least 75  percent of the total amount the contractor
[24]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
spends in connection with the construction project on steel, iron,  coatings for steel and iron
and manufactured products that become part of a permanent structure to purchase steel,
iron, coatings for steel and iron and manufactured products that are  produced in the United
States.
(e) Before adopting or amending a rule under this  subsection, the department shall con-
sult with representatives of labor and workforce equity and contractor  equity, and other
knowledgeable persons.
(4) A state agency charged with administering funds for construction  projects that are
funded in whole or in part by  moneys deposited in the Climate Investments Fund or the
Transportation Decarbonization Investments Account may  not adopt the administering
agency’s own rules for labor, workforce and contracting  procedures related to administering
funds allocated from  the Climate Investments Fund or the Transportation Decarbonization
Investments Account.
(Just Transition)
SECTION 35.
(1) The Just Transition Fund is established  in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Just Transition Fund  shall be
credited to the fund. Moneys  in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission to be  distributed pursuant to the Just Transition Program
established under section 36 of this 2019 Act.
(2) The Just Transition Fund shall consist of  moneys deposited in the fund under section
30 of this 2019 Act.
(3)(a) Of the moneys  deposited in the fund each biennium, the commission shall set aside
50 percent of the funds in a reserve account.
(b) The commission shall continue to credit the reserve  account in the manner required
under this subsection until the balance in the reserve account is the lesser of:
(A) An amount that, in the commission’s determination, is adequate for the purposes
specified in paragraph (c) of this subsection; or
(B) $ .
(c) The reserve account shall be maintained and used by the  commission only to fund
programs or activities that provide financial support  for workers dislocated or adversely af-
fected by climate change or climate change policies.
SECTION 36. (1) The Higher  Education Coordinating Commission, in consultation with
the Employment Department and other interested state agencies, shall establish a Just
Transition Program for  the purpose of distributing moneys deposited in the Just Transition
Fund.
(2) Moneys distributed through the Just Transition Program shall be distributed to:
(a) Support economic  diversification, job creation, job training and other employment
services;
(b) Provide financial support for workers  dislocated or adversely affected by climate
change or climate change policies;
(c) Provide mental health services  for workers dislocated or adversely affected by climate
change or climate change policies; or
(d) Consistent with the purposes set forth in  section 7 of this 2019 Act, provide other
[25]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
related workforce support to  communities in this state that are adversely affected by climate
change or climate change policies.
(3) The commission shall seek to develop and implement the Just Transition  Program in
a manner that  is consistent with and complementary to other local, state and federal pro-
grams, policies and incentives that serve to carry out the activities described  in subsection
(2) of this section, including but not limited to activities undertaken  by the commission un-
der ORS 660.318. The Just Transition Program may include,  but need not be limited to, a
competitive grant program.
(4) The commission  may adopt rules necessary for the administration of the Just Tran-
sition Program, including but not limited to rules that set standards for awarding grants.
(5) A grant program adopted under this section may:
(a) Encourage, but not require, a grant applicant to provide matching funds for  com-
pletion of the project, program or activity for which a grant is awarded; and
(b) Allow a grant applicant to appeal to the commission for reevaluation of any determi-
nation of grant funding.
(6) The commission may perform  activities necessary to ensure that recipients of moneys
distributed from the Just Transition Fund  comply with applicable requirements. If the com-
mission determines that a recipient has not complied with  applicable requirements, the
commission may order the recipient to refund all moneys distributed  from the fund. Moneys
refunded pursuant to this subsection shall be credited to the fund.
(Common School Fund)
SECTION 37.
Moneys deposited in the Common School Fund under section 22 of this 2019
Act are continuously appropriated to the Department of  State Lands to be used in a manner
that:
(1) Is consistent with the requirements of the Oregon Constitution; and
(2) Carries out the purposes set forth in section 7 of this 2019 Act.
(Distribution of Auction Proceeds; Reporting; Recommendations)
SECTION 38.
Biennial expenditure reporting; audit.  (1) All agencies of the executive de-
partment as defined in ORS 174.112, counties, cities  and all other public and private entities
receiving moneys allocated from the Climate Investments Fund shall  annually report to the
Carbon Policy  Office on the expenditure of the moneys received and the results of the
expenditures. No later  than January 1 of each even-numbered year, the office shall deliver
a biennial report, in the manner provided in ORS  192.245, to the Governor and the Joint
Committee on Climate Action describing investments from the Climate Investments  Fund
and the results of  those investments in carrying out the purposes set forth in section 7 of
this 2019 Act.
(2) All agencies of the executive department,  counties, cities and all other public and
private entities receiving moneys allocated from the Transportation Decarbonization  Invest-
ments Account shall annually report to the  Department of Transportation on expenditure
of the moneys received and the results of the expenditures. No later than January 1  of each
even-numbered year, the department shall deliver  a biennial report, in the manner provided
[26]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in ORS 192.245, to the Governor and the Joint Committee on Climate Action describing in-
vestments from the Transportation Decarbonization Investments Account and  the results
of those investments in carrying out the purposes set forth in section 7 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 39.
Biennial expenditure audit. (1) The Carbon Policy Office and the Depart-
ment of Transportation  jointly shall select an independent third-party organization to pre-
pare a biennial audit of:
(a) All programs, projects or activities funded by moneys from  the Climate Investments
Fund; and
(b) All programs, projects or activities funded by moneys from  the Transportation
Decarbonization Investments Account.
(2) The Carbon  Policy Office and the Department of Transportation shall provide for the
audit report  prepared by the third-party organization under this section to be transmitted,
together with the reports required under section 38 of this 2019 Act, to the  Governor and to
the Joint Committee on Climate Action.
SECTION 40. Biennial climate action investment plan; preparation.  (1) No later than June
1 of each even-numbered year and in the manner provided  in ORS 192.245, the Carbon Policy
Office shall  deliver a biennial climate action investment plan to the Environmental Justice
Task Force, the Governor and the Joint Committee on Climate Action. The purpose of the
plan is to  present recommendations, including recommendations for legislation, on the best
opportunities available to  the state during the next biennial budget period to make expen-
ditures and investments of state proceeds from auctions conducted under section 21 of this
2019 Act that:
(a) Are consistent with the requirements of the Oregon Constitution;
(b) Carry out the purposes set forth in section 7 of this 2019 Act; and
(c) Are consistent with the provisions of sections 29, 30, 31, 32 and 33 of this 2019 Act.
(2) The recommendations contained in the plan required  by this section must be based
on consideration of the best scientific and economic information available at the time  of the
preparation of the plan.
(3) In preparing the plan, the office shall consult with:
(a) The Department of Transportation, the Public Utility  Commission, the Environmental
Justice Task Force and  any other relevant agencies of the executive department as defined
in ORS 174.112;
(b) Representatives of Indian tribes; and
(c) The citizens’ advisory committee required by subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The Director of  the Carbon Policy Office shall convene a citizens’ advisory committee
to assist the  office in developing the biennial climate action investment plan required by this
section. The members of the committee must reflect the  geographic, socioeconomic, racial
and cultural diversity of the State of Oregon.
SECTION 41.
Environmental Justice Task  Force review of biennial climate action in-
vestment plan; report.  The Environmental Justice Task Force shall review and develop rec-
ommendations in  response to the biennial climate action investment plan required under
section 40 of this 2019 Act and shall, no later than August 1 of each even-numbered year and
in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, deliver a report on the  task force’s recommendations
to the Governor and the Joint Committee on Climate Action.
[27]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
PROVISIONS RELATED TO THE PUBLIC UTILITY COMMISSION
SECTION 42. Sections 43 and 44 of this 2019 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 757.
SECTION 43. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Electric company” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(b) “Natural gas utility” means a natural gas utility regulated by the Public  Utility
Commission under this chapter.
(2) The Public Utility  Commission shall require proceeds received by an electric company
or natural gas  utility from the sale of allowances directly distributed at no cost under
sections 14, 15 and 17 of this 2019 Act:
(a) To be spent by the electric company or natural gas utility  within the service territory
of the electric company or natural gas utility; and
(b) To be used only for activities that serve to reduce greenhouse gas  emissions or pro-
vide energy assistance to the  electric company’s or natural gas utility’s retail customers,
consistent with the purposes of sections 7 to 41 of this 2019 Act as set forth  in section 7 of
this 2019 Act.
(3) Subject to subsection  (2) of this section, an electric company or natural gas utility
shall prioritize the use of auction proceeds for energy assistance programs, including:
(a) Rate design based solutions;
(b) Bill assistance, weatherization, energy  efficiency, transportation electrification
measures and grid modernization; and
(c) Participation by low-income residential customers in  conservation programs that
further reduce the out-of-pocket costs for energy efficiency measures.
(4) The Public Utility Commission  shall, pursuant to ORS 756.040 and after consultation
with the Housing and Community Services Department, adopt rules  for the implementation
and enforcement of this section.
SECTION 44.
The Public Utility Commission  may, in such manner as the commission
considers proper, allow a rate or  rate schedule of a public utility to include differential rates
or to reflect amounts for programs that enable  the public utility to assist low-income resi-
dential customers. Rates or  rate schedules allowed under this section must minimize the
shifting of costs to ratepayers that do not qualify for low-income assistance.
BIENNIAL STATEWIDE ENERGY BURDEN REPORT
SECTION 45. No later  than November 1 of every even-numbered year, the Housing and
Community Services  Department and the State Department of Energy shall jointly transmit
to the Governor and the Legislative Assembly  a biennial statewide energy burden report. The
Housing and Community Services Department and the State Department of Energy  shall
jointly adopt rules  for gathering data necessary to prepare the report. In adopting rules un-
der this section, the Housing and Community Services Department and the State Department
of Energy shall consult with consumer-owned utilities as defined in ORS 757.600.
GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS REGISTRATION AND REPORTING
(Transfer of Duties Related to Greenhouse Gas Reporting Program)
[28]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 46.  Transfer.  The duties, functions  and powers of the Environmental Quality
Commission and the Department of Environmental  Quality relating to ORS 468A.280 and
rules adopted pursuant to  ORS 468A.280 are imposed upon, transferred to and vested in the
Carbon Policy Office.
SECTION 47. Records, property, employees.  (1) The Director of the Department of Envi-
ronmental Quality shall:
(a) Deliver to  the Carbon Policy Office all records and property within the jurisdiction
of the director that relate to the duties, functions and powers transferred by section 46  of
this 2019 Act; and
(b) Transfer to the  Carbon Policy Office those employees engaged primarily in the exer-
cise of the duties, functions and powers transferred by section 46 of this 2019 Act.
(2) The Director of the Carbon Policy  Office shall take possession of the records and
property, and shall take charge of  the employees and employ them in the exercise of the
duties, functions and powers  transferred by section 46 of this 2019 Act, without reduction
of compensation but subject  to change or termination of employment or compensation as
provided by law.
(3) The Governor shall resolve any dispute between the Department  of Environmental
Quality and the Carbon Policy Office  relating to transfers of records, property and employees
under this section, and the Governor’s decision is final.
SECTION 48. Unexpended revenues. (1) The unexpended balances of amounts authorized
to be expended by the Environmental Quality Commission or the  Department of Environ-
mental Quality for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019, from revenues dedicated, contin-
uously appropriated, appropriated or  otherwise made available for the purpose of
administering and enforcing the duties,  functions and powers transferred by section 46 of
this 2019 Act are transferred to and are available for expenditure  by the Carbon Policy Office
for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, for the purpose of administering and enforcing the
duties, functions and powers transferred by section 46 of this 2019 Act.
(2) The expenditure classifications, if any, established by Acts authorizing or limiting
expenditures by the Department of Environmental  Quality remain applicable to expenditures
by the Carbon Policy Office under this section.
SECTION 49. Action, proceeding,  prosecution.  The transfer of duties, functions and
powers to the Carbon Policy Office by section 46 of this 2019 Act does not affect  any action,
proceeding or prosecution involving  or with respect to the duties, functions and powers be-
gun before and pending at the time of the transfer, except that  the Carbon Policy Office is
substituted for the Environmental Quality Commission or the  Department of Environmental
Quality, as appropriate, in the action, proceeding or prosecution.
SECTION 50. Liability, duty, obligation. (1) Nothing in sections 46 to 52 of this 2019 Act
relieves a person of a liability, duty or obligation accruing under or with respect to the du-
ties, functions and powers transferred by section 46 of this 2019  Act. The Carbon Policy Of-
fice may undertake the collection or enforcement of any such liability, duty or obligation.
(2) The rights and obligations of  the Environmental Quality Commission or the Depart-
ment of Environmental Quality legally incurred under contracts, leases and business trans-
actions executed, entered into or  begun before the operative date of section 46 of this 2019
Act accruing under or with  respect to the duties, functions and powers transferred by sec-
tion 46 of this 2019 Act are transferred to the Carbon Policy  Office. For the purpose of suc-
[29]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cession to these rights and obligations, the Carbon  Policy Office is a continuation of the
Environmental Quality Commission or the Department of Environmental Quality,  as appro-
priate, and not a new authority.
SECTION 51. Rules. (1) Notwithstanding the transfer of duties, functions  and powers by
section 46 of this 2019 Act, the rules of the Environmental Quality Commission with  respect
to such  duties, functions or powers that are in effect on the operative date of section 46 of
this 2019 Act continue in effect  until superseded or repealed by rules of the Carbon Policy
Office. References in the rules of the  Environmental Quality Commission to the Environ-
mental Quality Commission are considered to be references to the Director of the  Carbon
Policy Office. References in the  rules of the Environmental Quality Commission to the De-
partment of Environmental Quality or an officer or employee  of the Department of Envi-
ronmental Quality are considered to be references to the Carbon Policy Office or an officer
or employee of the Carbon Policy Office.
(2) Whenever, in  any uncodified law or resolution of the Legislative Assembly or in any
rule, document, record or proceeding authorized by the Legislative Assembly, in the  context
of the duties, functions and powers transferred by section 46 of this 2019 Act, reference  is
made to the Environmental Quality Commission, with relation to the duties, functions  or
powers transferred by  section 46 of this 2019 Act, the reference is considered to be a refer-
ence to the  Director of the Carbon Policy Office for purposes of being charged by the terms
of this 2019 Act with carrying out the duties, functions and powers.
(3) Whenever, in any uncodified law or resolution of the Legislative Assembly or  in any
rule, document, record or proceeding authorized by the Legislative Assembly, in the  context
of the  duties, functions and powers transferred by section 46 of this 2019 Act, reference is
made to the Department of Environmental Quality, or an officer of employee  of the Depart-
ment of Environmental Quality, whose duties, functions  or powers are transferred by section
46 of this 2019 Act, the reference is considered to be a reference to the  Carbon Policy Office
or an officer or employee of the Carbon Policy Office who  by this 2019 Act is charged with
carrying out the duties, functions and powers.
(Housekeeping in ORS)
SECTION 52. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, ORS 468A.280 shall not be
considered to have been added to or made a part of ORS chapter 468A for the purpose of
statutory compilation or for the application of definitions, penalties or administrative pro-
visions applicable to statute sections in that series.
(Amendments to Statutes)
SECTION 53.
 ORS 468A.280 is amended to read:
468A.280. (1) [ In addition to any registration and reporting that may be required under ORS
468A.050, the Environmental Quality Commission by rule may require registration and  reporting by: ]
As used in this section:
(a) “Air contamination source” has the meaning given that term in ORS 468A.005.
(b) “Greenhouse gas” has the meaning given that term in section 8 of this 2019 Act.
(2) The Director  of the Carbon Policy Office by rule may require registration and re-
[30]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
porting of information necessary to determine greenhouse gas emissions by:
(a) A person in control of an air contamination source  of any class for which registration
and reporting is required under ORS 468A.050.
[(a)] (b)  [ Any ] A  person who imports, sells, allocates or distributes  electricity  for  use in this
state [ electricity, the generation of which emits greenhouse gases ].
[(b)] (c)  [ Any ] A  person who imports, sells or distributes for use in  this state fossil fuel that
generates greenhouse gases when combusted.
(3) A person required to  register and report under subsection (2) of this section shall
register with the Carbon  Policy Office and make reports containing information that the di-
rector by  rule may require that is relevant to determining and verifying greenhouse gas
emissions. The director may by  rule require the person to provide an audit by an independent
and disinterested party to verify that the greenhouse gas emissions information reported by
the person is true and accurate.
[(2)] (4)  Rules adopted by the [ commission] director  under this section for electricity that is
imported, sold, allocated  or distributed for use in this state may require reporting of information
necessary to determine greenhouse gas emissions from generating facilities used to  produce the
electricity and related electricity transmission line losses.
[(3)(a)] (5)(a)  The [ commission] director shall allow  consumer-owned utilities, as defined in ORS
757.270, to comply with reporting requirements imposed under this section by the submission of  a
report  prepared  by a third party. A report submitted under this paragraph may include information
for more than one consumer-owned utility, but must include all  information required by the [ com-
mission] director for each individual utility.
(b) For the purpose of  determining greenhouse gas emissions related to electricity purchased
from the Bonneville  Power Administration by a consumer-owned utility, as defined in ORS 757.270,
the [ commission] director may require only that the utility report:
(A) The number of megawatt-hours  of electricity purchased by the utility from the Bonneville
Power Administration, segregated by the types of contracts entered into  by the utility with the
Bonneville Power Administration; and
(B) The percentage of each fuel  or energy type used to produce electricity purchased under each
type of contract.
[(4)(a)] (6)(a)  Rules adopted by  the [ commission] director pursuant to this section for electricity
that is purchased, imported, sold, allocated or distributed for use  in this state by an electric com-
pany, as defined in ORS 757.600, must be limited to the reporting of:
(A) The generating facility fuel type and  greenhouse gas emissions emitted from generating
facilities owned or operated by the electric company;
(B) The megawatt-hours of electricity generated by the electric company for  use in this
state;
[(B)] (C) Greenhouse gas emissions  emitted from transmission equipment owned or operated by
the electric company;
[(C)] (D)  The number of megawatt-hours of electricity  purchased by the electric company for use
in this state, including information, if known, on:
(i) The seller of the electricity to the electric company; and
(ii) The original generating facility fuel type or types; and
[(D)] (E)  An estimate of the amount of  greenhouse gas emissions[ , using default greenhouse gas
emissions factors established by the commission by rule, ] attributable to:
[31]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) Electricity purchases made by a particular seller to the electric company;
(ii) Electricity purchases from an unknown origin or from a seller who is unable  to identify the
original generating facility fuel type or types;
(iii) Electricity purchases for which  a renewable energy certificate under ORS 469A.130 has
been issued but subsequently transferred or sold to a person other than the electric company;
(iv) Electricity transmitted for others by the electric company; and
(v) Total energy losses from electricity transmission and distribution  equipment owned or oper-
ated by the electric company.
(b) Pursuant to paragraph  (a) of this subsection, a multijurisdictional electric company may rely
upon a cost allocation methodology approved  by the Public Utility Commission for reporting emis-
sions allocated in this state.
[(5)] (7)  Rules adopted by the [ commission] director  under this  section for [ fossil] fuel that is
imported, sold  or distributed for use in this state may require reporting of the type and quantity of
the fuel and any additional information necessary to determine the [ carbon content ] greenhouse gas
emissions associated with the use  or combustion  of the fuel. [ For the purpose of determining
greenhouse gas emissions  related to liquefied petroleum gas, the commission shall allow reporting using
publications or submission of data by the  American Petroleum Institute but may require reporting of
such other information necessary  to achieve the purposes of the rules adopted by the commission under
this section. ]
[(6)] (8) To an extent that  is consistent with the purposes of the rules adopted by the [ commis-
sion] director  under this section, the [ commission] director  shall minimize the burden of the re-
porting required under this section by:
(a) Allowing concurrent reporting of information that is also reported to another state agency;
(b) Allowing electronic reporting;
(c) Allowing use of good engineering practice calculations in  reports, or of emission factors
published by the United States Environmental Protection Agency;
(d) Establishing thresholds for the amount of specific greenhouse gases that  may be emitted or
generated without reporting;
(e) Requiring reporting by the fewest number of persons in a fuel distribution system that  will
allow the [ commission] director to acquire the information needed by the [ commission] director; or
(f) Other appropriate means and procedures determined by the [ commission] director.
[(7) As used in this section, “greenhouse gas” has  the meaning given that term in ORS
468A.210.]
(9) The office may require a person for which registration and reporting is required under
subsection (2) of this section to provide any  pertinent records related to verification of
greenhouse gas emissions in order to determine compliance with and to enforce this section
and rules adopted pursuant to this section.
(10) If a person required to register and report under subsection (2) of  this section fails
to submit a report under this section, the office may  develop an assigned emissions level for
the person if necessary for the purpose of regulating persons under sections 8 to 26  of this
2019 Act.
(11)(a) By rule the director may establish a schedule of fees for registration and reporting
under this  section. Before establishing fees pursuant to this subsection, the director shall
consider the total fees for each  person subject to registration and reporting under this sec-
tion.
[32]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The director  shall limit the fees established under this subsection to the anticipated
cost of developing, implementing and analyzing data collected  under greenhouse gas emis-
sions registration and reporting programs.
ENERGY FACILITY CARBON DIOXIDE EMISSIONS STANDARDS
(Repeal of Carbon Dioxide Emissions Standards)
SECTION 54.  ORS 469.503 is amended to read:
469.503. In order to issue a site  certificate, the Energy Facility Siting Council shall determine
that the preponderance of the evidence on the record supports the following conclusions:
(1) The facility complies with the applicable standards adopted by the  council pursuant to ORS
469.501 or  the overall public benefits of the facility outweigh any adverse effects on a resource or
interest protected by the applicable standards the facility does not meet.
[(2) If  the energy facility is a fossil-fueled power plant, the energy facility complies with any ap-
plicable carbon dioxide  emissions standard adopted by the council or enacted by statute. Base load
gas plants shall comply  with the standard set forth in subsection (2)(a) of this section. Other fossil-
fueled power plants shall comply with any applicable standard adopted by the  council by rule pursuant
to subsection (2)(b) of this section. Subsections (2)(c)  and (d) of this section prescribe the means by
which an applicant may comply with the applicable standard. ]
[(a) The net carbon dioxide  emissions rate of the proposed base load gas plant shall not exceed 0.70
pounds of carbon dioxide  emissions per kilowatt hour of net electric power output, with carbon dioxide
emissions and net electric power output measured on a new and clean basis. Notwithstanding the
foregoing, the council may  by rule modify the carbon dioxide emissions standard for base load gas
plants if the council finds that the most efficient stand-alone combined cycle, combustion  turbine, na-
tural gas-fired energy facility that is commercially demonstrated and  operating in the United States has
a net heat rate of less than 7,200 Btu  per kilowatt hour higher heating value adjusted to ISO condi-
tions. In modifying the carbon  dioxide emission standard, the council shall determine the rate of carbon
dioxide emissions per kilowatt hour of net electric output of such energy  facility, adjusted to ISO con-
ditions, and reset the carbon dioxide emissions standard at 17 percent below this rate. ]
[(b) The council  shall adopt carbon dioxide emissions standards for other types of fossil-fueled
power plants. Such carbon dioxide emissions standards shall be promulgated by rule. In adopting or
amending such carbon dioxide emissions standards, the  council shall consider and balance at least the
following principles, the findings on which shall be contained in the rulemaking record: ]
[(A) Promote facility fuel efficiency; ]
[(B) Promote efficiency in the resource mix; ]
[(C) Reduce net carbon dioxide emissions; ]
[(D) Promote cogeneration that reduces net carbon dioxide emissions; ]
[(E) Promote innovative technologies and creative approaches to mitigating,  reducing or avoiding
carbon dioxide emissions; ]
[(F) Minimize transaction costs; ]
[(G) Include an alternative process that separates decisions on the form  and implementation of
offsets from the final decision on granting a site certificate; ]
[(H) Allow either the applicant or third parties to implement offsets; ]
[(I) Be attainable and economically achievable for various types of power plants; ]
[(J) Promote public participation in the selection and review of offsets; ]
[33]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(K) Promote prompt implementation of offset projects; ]
[(L) Provide for monitoring and evaluation of the performance of offsets; and ]
[(M) Promote reliability of the regional electric system. ]
[(c) The council shall determine  whether the applicable carbon dioxide emissions standard is met
by first determining the gross carbon dioxide emissions that are reasonably likely to result  from the
operation of the proposed energy facility. Such determination shall be based on the proposed  design of
the energy facility. The council shall  adopt site certificate conditions to ensure that the predicted carbon
dioxide emissions are not exceeded on a new and clean  basis. For any remaining emissions reduction
necessary to meet the applicable standard, the applicant may elect to  use any of subparagraphs (A) to
(D) of this paragraph, or any combination thereof.  The council shall determine the amount of carbon
dioxide or other greenhouse gas emissions reduction that is reasonably likely to result from  the
applicant’s offsets and whether the resulting  net carbon dioxide emissions meet the applicable carbon
dioxide emissions standard. For purposes of determining the net carbon dioxide emissions, the  council
shall by rule establish the  global warming potential of each greenhouse gas based on a generally ac-
cepted scientific  method, and convert any greenhouse gas emissions to a carbon dioxide equivalent.
Unless otherwise  provided by the council by rule, the global warming potential of methane is 23 times
that of carbon dioxide, and the global warming potential of nitrous oxide is 296 times that  of carbon
dioxide. If the council or a court on judicial review concludes that the applicant has not  demonstrated
compliance with the applicable carbon dioxide emissions standard under subparagraphs (A),  (B) or (D)
of this paragraph, or any combination thereof, and the applicant has agreed to meet the  requirements
of subparagraph (C) of this paragraph for any deficiency, the council or a court  shall find compliance
based on such agreement. ]
[(A) The facility will sequentially produce  electrical and thermal energy from the same fuel source,
and the thermal energy will be  used to displace another source of carbon dioxide emissions that would
have otherwise continued to occur, in which case the council shall adopt  site certificate conditions en-
suring that the carbon dioxide emissions reduction will be achieved. ]
[(B) The applicant or a third party will implement particular offsets,  in which case the council may
adopt site certificate conditions ensuring that the  proposed offsets are implemented but shall not require
that predicted levels  of avoidance, displacement or sequestration of greenhouse gas emissions be
achieved. The council shall determine the quantity of  greenhouse gas emissions reduction that is rea-
sonably likely  to result from each of the proposed offsets based on the criteria in sub-subparagraphs
(i) to (iii) of this subparagraph. In making this determination,  the council shall not allow credit for
offsets that have already been allocated  or awarded credit for greenhouse gas emissions reduction in
another regulatory setting. In  addition, the fact that an applicant or other parties involved with an
offset may derive benefits from the offset other than the reduction of greenhouse gas emissions is not,
by itself, a basis for withholding credit for an offset. ]
[(i) The degree of certainty that the predicted quantity of greenhouse  gas emissions reduction will
be achieved by the offset; ]
[(ii) The ability of the council to  determine the actual quantity of greenhouse gas emissions re-
duction resulting from the offset, taking into consideration any proposed measurement, monitoring  and
evaluation of mitigation measure performance; and ]
[(iii) The extent to which the reduction of greenhouse gas emissions would occur in the absence  of
the offsets. ]
[(C) The applicant or a third party agrees to provide funds in an amount deemed  sufficient to
produce the reduction  in greenhouse gas emissions necessary to meet the applicable carbon dioxide
[34]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
emissions standard, in which case the funds shall be used as specified in paragraph (d) of this sub-
section. Unless modified by the council as provided below, the payment of 57  cents shall be deemed to
result in a reduction of one  ton of carbon dioxide emissions. The council shall determine the offset
funds using the monetary  offset rate and the level of emissions reduction required to meet the applicable
standard. If  a site certificate is approved based on this subparagraph, the council may not adjust the
amount of such offset funds based on the  actual performance of offsets. After three years from June
26, 1997, the council may by rule increase or decrease the monetary offset rate of  57 cents per ton of
carbon dioxide emissions. Any change to the monetary offset rate shall be  based on empirical evidence
of the cost of offsets  and the council’s finding that the standard will be economically achievable with
the modified rate for natural gas-fired power plants. Following the initial three-year period, the council
may increase or decrease the monetary offset rate no more than 50 percent in any two-year period. ]
[(D) Any other means that the council adopts  by rule for demonstrating compliance with any ap-
plicable carbon dioxide emissions standard. ]
[(d) If the applicant elects to meet  the applicable carbon dioxide emissions standard in whole or in
part under paragraph (c)(C) of this subsection, the applicant shall identify  the qualified organization.
The applicant may  identify an organization that has applied for, but has not received, an exemption
from federal income  taxation, but the council may not find that the organization is a qualified organ-
ization unless  the organization is exempt from federal taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code as amended and in effect  on December 31, 1996. The site certificate holder shall provide
a bond or comparable security in a form reasonably acceptable to the council to ensure the  payment
of the offset funds and the amount required under subparagraph (A)(ii) of  this paragraph. Such secu-
rity shall be provided by the  date specified in the site certificate, which shall be no later than the
commencement of construction of  the facility. The site certificate shall require that the offset funds be
disbursed as specified in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, unless  the council finds that no qualified
organization exists, in which case the site certificate shall require that the  offset funds be disbursed
as specified in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph. ]
[(A) The site certificate holder shall disburse the offset  funds and any other funds required by
sub-subparagraph (ii) of this subparagraph to the qualified organization as follows: ]
[(i) When the site certificate holder  receives written notice from the qualified organization certifying
that the qualified organization is contractually obligated  to pay any funds to implement offsets using
the offset funds, the site certificate holder shall make the requested  amount available to the qualified
organization unless the total of the amount requested and any amounts  previously requested exceeds
the offset funds, in which case only the  remaining amount of the offset funds shall be made available.
The qualified organization shall use at least 80 percent of the offset funds for  contracts to implement
offsets. The qualified organization  shall assess offsets for their potential to qualify in, generate credits
in or reduce obligations in other  regulatory settings. The qualified organization may use up to 20
percent of the offset funds for monitoring, evaluation, administration and enforcement of  contracts to
implement offsets.]
[(ii) At the request of  the qualified organization and in addition to the offset funds, the site certif-
icate holder shall pay the qualified organization an amount equal to 10 percent of the first  $500,000
of the offset funds  and 4.286 percent of any offset funds in excess of $500,000. This amount shall not
be less than $50,000 unless a lesser amount is specified in the site certificate. This amount compensates
the qualified organization for its costs of selecting offsets and contracting for the implementation  of
offsets.]
[(iii) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, a site certificate holder subject to this sub-
[35]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
paragraph shall have no obligation with regard to  offsets, the offset funds or the funds required by
sub-subparagraph (ii) of this subparagraph other than to make available  to the qualified organization
the total amount required under paragraph (c) of this subsection and sub-subparagraph (ii)  of this
subparagraph, nor shall any nonperformance, negligence or misconduct  on the part of the qualified
organization be a basis for revocation of the site certificate  or any other enforcement action by the
council with respect to the site certificate holder. ]
[(B) If the council finds  there is no qualified organization, the site certificate holder shall select
one or more offsets to  be implemented pursuant to criteria established by the council. The site certificate
holder shall give written notice of its selections to the council and to any person requesting  notice. On
petition by the State Department of Energy, or by any person adversely affected or aggrieved by  the
site certificate holder’s  selection of offsets, or on the council’s own motion, the council may review such
selection. The petition must be received by  the council within 30 days of the date the notice of selection
is placed in the United States mail, with first-class postage prepaid. The council shall  approve the site
certificate holder’s selection unless it finds that  the selection is not consistent with criteria established
by the council. The site certificate holder shall contract to implement the selected offsets  within 18
months after commencing  construction of the facility unless good cause is shown requiring additional
time. The contracts  shall obligate the expenditure of at least 85 percent of the offset funds for the im-
plementation of offsets. No more than 15 percent of the  offset funds may be spent on monitoring, eval-
uation and enforcement of the contract to implement the selected offsets. The  council’s criteria for
selection of offsets shall be based on the criteria set forth in paragraphs  (b)(C) and (c)(B) of this sub-
section and may  also consider the costs of particular types of offsets in relation to the expected benefits
of such offsets. The council’s criteria shall not require the site certificate holder to select particular
offsets, and shall allow the site certificate holder a reasonable  range of choices in selecting offsets. In
addition, notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the site  certificate holder’s financial li-
ability for implementation, monitoring, evaluation and  enforcement of offsets pursuant to this subsection
shall be limited to  the amount of any offset funds not already contractually obligated. Nonperformance,
negligence or misconduct by the entity  or entities implementing, monitoring or evaluating the selected
offset shall not be a basis for revocation of the site certificate or any other enforcement  action by the
council with respect to the site certificate holder. ]
[(C) Every qualified organization that has received funds under this paragraph shall, at five-year
intervals beginning on the date of receipt of such funds,  provide the council with the information the
council requests  about the qualified organization’s performance. The council shall evaluate the infor-
mation requested and, based on such information, shall make any recommendations to  the Legislative
Assembly that the council deems appropriate. ]
[(e) As used in this subsection: ]
[(A) “Adjusted to ISO conditions” means carbon dioxide  emissions and net electric power output
as determined at 59 degrees Fahrenheit, 14.7 pounds per square inch atmospheric pressure and 60
percent humidity.]
[(B) “Base load gas plant” means a generating facility that is fueled by natural  gas, except for
periods during which an alternative fuel may be used and when such alternative fuel use shall not
exceed  10  percent of expected fuel use in Btu, higher heating value, on an average annual basis, and
where the applicant requests and the council adopts no condition in the site certificate for the  generat-
ing facility that would  limit hours of operation other than restrictions on the use of alternative fuel.
The council shall assume a  100 percent capacity factor for such plants and a 30-year life for the plants
for purposes of determining gross carbon dioxide emissions. ]
[36]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(C) “Carbon  dioxide equivalent” means the global warming potential of a greenhouse gas reflected
in units of carbon dioxide. ]
[(D) “Fossil-fueled power plant” means a generating  facility that produces electric power from na-
tural gas, petroleum, coal or any form of solid, liquid or gaseous fuel derived from such material. ]
[(E) “Generating facility” means those energy facilities that are defined in ORS 469.300 (11)(a)(A),
(B) and (D). ]
[(F) “Global warming potential” means the determination of the atmospheric warming  resulting
from the release of a unit mass of a particular greenhouse gas in relation to the warming resulting from
the release of the equivalent mass of carbon dioxide. ]
[(G) “Greenhouse gas” means carbon dioxide, methane and nitrous oxide. ]
[(H) “Gross carbon dioxide emissions” means  the predicted carbon dioxide emissions of the pro-
posed energy facility measured on a new and clean basis. ]
[(I) “Net carbon dioxide emissions” means gross carbon dioxide emissions of  the proposed energy
facility, less carbon dioxide or  other greenhouse gas emissions avoided, displaced or sequestered by any
combination of cogeneration or offsets. ]
[(J) “New and clean basis” means the average carbon  dioxide emissions rate per hour and net
electric power output of the energy facility, without degradation, as determined by a 100-hour test  at
full power completed  during the first 12 months of commercial operation of the energy facility, with the
results adjusted  for the average annual site condition for temperature, barometric pressure and relative
humidity and use of alternative fuels, and using a rate of 117 pounds  of carbon dioxide per million
Btu of natural  gas fuel and a rate of 161 pounds of carbon dioxide per million Btu of distillate fuel,
if such fuel use is proposed by the  applicant. The council may by rule adjust the rate of pounds of
carbon dioxide per million Btu for natural gas  or distillate fuel. The council may by rule set carbon
dioxide emissions rates for other fuels. ]
[(K) “Nongenerating facility” means those  energy facilities that are defined in ORS 469.300
(11)(a)(C) and (E) to (I). ]
[(L) “Offset” means an action  that will be implemented by the applicant, a third party or through
the qualified organization to avoid, sequester or displace emissions. ]
[(M) “Offset funds” means the amount  of funds determined by the council to satisfy the applicable
carbon dioxide emissions standard pursuant to paragraph (c)(C) of this subsection. ]
[(N) “Qualified organization” means an entity that: ]
[(i) Is exempt from federal taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code as
amended and in effect on December 31, 1996; ]
[(ii) Either is incorporated in the State of Oregon or is a  foreign corporation authorized to do
business in the State of Oregon; ]
[(iii) Has in effect articles of incorporation  that require that offset funds received pursuant to this
section are used for offsets that require that decisions on the use of  the offset funds are made by a
decision-making body composed of seven voting members of which three are appointed by the council,
three are Oregon  residents appointed by the Bullitt Foundation or an alternative environmental
nonprofit organization named by the body, and one is appointed by the applicants for site certificates
that are subject to paragraph (d) of  this subsection and the holders of such site certificates, and that
require nonvoting membership on the body for holders of site certificates that have provided funds not
yet disbursed under paragraph (d)(A) of this subsection; ]
[(iv) Has made available on  an annual basis, beginning after the first year of operation, a signed
opinion of an independent certified public accountant stating  that the qualified organization’s use of
[37]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
funds pursuant to  this statute conforms with generally accepted accounting procedures except that the
qualified organization shall have one year to conform with generally accepted accounting  principles in
the event of a nonconforming audit; ]
[(v) Has to the extent applicable, except for good cause, entered into  contracts obligating at least
60 percent of the offset funds to implement offsets within two years after the  commencement of con-
struction of the facility; and ]
[(vi) Has to the extent applicable, except for good  cause, complied with paragraph (d)(A)(i) of this
subsection.]
[(3)] (2) Except as provided  in ORS 469.504 for land use compliance and except for those statutes
and rules for which the decision on  compliance has been delegated by the federal government to a
state agency  other than the council, the facility complies with all other Oregon statutes and ad-
ministrative rules identified in the project order,  as amended, as applicable to the issuance of a site
certificate for the proposed facility. If  compliance with applicable Oregon statutes and administra-
tive rules, other than those  involving federally delegated programs, would result in conflicting con-
ditions in the site certificate, the council may resolve the conflict consistent with the public interest.
A resolution may not result in the waiver of any applicable state statute.
[(4)] (3)  The facility  complies with the statewide planning goals adopted by the Land Conserva-
tion and Development Commission.
SECTION 55.
 ORS 469.501 is amended to read:
469.501. (1) The Energy Facility Siting Council shall  adopt standards for the siting, construction,
operation and retirement of facilities. The standards may address but need  not be limited to the
following subjects:
(a) The organizational, managerial and technical  expertise of the applicant to construct and
operate the proposed facility.
(b) Seismic hazards.
(c) Areas designated for protection by the state or federal government, including but not  limited
to monuments, wilderness areas, wildlife refuges, scenic waterways and similar areas.
(d) The financial ability and qualifications of the applicant.
(e) Effects of the facility, taking into account mitigation, on fish and wildlife, including  threat-
ened and endangered fish, wildlife or plant species.
(f) Impacts of the facility on  historic, cultural or archaeological resources listed on, or deter-
mined by the State Historic Preservation Officer to be eligible for  listing on, the National Register
of Historic Places or the Oregon State Register of Historic Properties.
(g) Protection of public health and safety, including necessary safety devices and procedures.
(h) The accumulation, storage, disposal and transportation of nuclear waste.
(i) Impacts of the facility on recreation, scenic and aesthetic values.
(j) Reduction of solid waste and wastewater generation to the extent reasonably practicable.
(k) Ability of the communities in the affected area to provide sewers  and sewage treatment,
water, storm water drainage, solid waste  management, housing, traffic safety, police and fire pro-
tection, health care and schools.
(L) The need for proposed nongenerating facilities [ as defined in ORS 469.503 ], consistent with
the state energy policy set forth in ORS 469.010 and 469.310. The council  may consider least-cost
plans when adopting a need standard or in determining whether  an applicable need standard has
been met. The council  shall not adopt a standard requiring a showing of need or cost-effectiveness
for generating facilities [ as defined in ORS 469.503 ].
[38]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(m) Compliance with the statewide planning goals  adopted by the Land Conservation and De-
velopment Commission as specified by ORS 469.503.
(n) Soil protection.
[(o) For energy  facilities that emit carbon dioxide, the impacts of those emissions on climate change.
For fossil-fueled power plants, as defined in ORS 469.503, the council shall apply a standard as  pro-
vided for by ORS 469.503 (2). ]
(2) The council may adopt exemptions  from any need standard adopted under subsection (1)(L)
of this section if the exemption is consistent with the state’s  energy policy set forth in ORS 469.010
and 469.310.
(3)(a) The council may issue a site certificate for a facility that does  not meet one or more of
the applicable standards adopted under subsection (1) of this section  if the council determines that
the overall public benefits of the facility outweigh  any adverse effects on a resource or interest
protected by the applicable standards the facility does not meet.
(b) The council by  rule shall specify the criteria by which the council makes the determination
described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the council  may not impose any standard de-
veloped under subsection (1)(b), (f), (j) or (k) of this section to approve or deny an  application for
an energy facility producing power from wind, solar or geothermal energy.  However, the council
may, to the extent it determines appropriate, apply any standards adopted  under subsection (1)(b),
(f), (j) or (k) of this section  to impose conditions on any site certificate issued for any energy facility.
(Transitional Provisions)
SECTION 56. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 469.401 (2), any conditions in a site certificate  or
amended site certificate issued  before January 1, 2021, that are conditions related to any
carbon dioxide emissions standard applicable pursuant to ORS 469.501 (o) (2017 Edition) or
469.503 (2017 Edition) or to rules adopted by the  Energy Facility Siting Council pursuant to
ORS 469.501 (o) (2017 Edition) or 469.503 (2017 Edition) cease to be enforceable on January 1,
2021.
(2) Any provision in a site certificate  or amended site certificate for a generating facility
issued before January 1, 2021, requiring the holder  to demonstrate the need for the facility
shall cease to be enforceable on January 1, 2021.
(3) Any  site certificate amendment approved by the council on or after January 1, 2021,
shall remove from the site certificate being amended all conditions and provisions  rendered
unenforceable by subsections (1) and (2) of this section. Notwithstanding ORS 469.405 or any
council rule, the contested case hearing on a site certificate  amendment subject to this
subsection may not include hearing on amendments  necessary to comply with this sub-
section. The provisions of the council’s order relevant  to compliance with this subsection
is not subject to judicial review.
SECTION 57.
The Energy Facility Siting  Council shall, no later than January 1, 2022,
complete rulemaking to amend or repeal any rules adopted by the  council relating to the
application of a carbon dioxide emissions  standard to generating facilities or nongenerating
facilities as necessary to bring the rules of the council  into compliance with the amendments
to ORS 469.501 (o) and 469.503 by sections 54  and 55 of this 2019 Act and the provisions of
section 56 of this 2019 Act.
[39]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 58. (1) As used in this section and section 59 of this 2019 Act, “qualified or-
ganization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 469.503 (2)(e)(N) (2017 Edition).
(2) On or after the operative date of this section and the amendments to ORS 469.503 by
section 54 of this 2019 Act and in accordance with the provisions of ORS  469.503 (2)(d) (2017
Edition), a qualified organization that, before the operative date of this  section and the
amendments to ORS 469.503 by section 54 of this  2019 Act, received payment of offset funds
pursuant to ORS 469.503 (2)(c)(C) (2017 Edition):
(a) Shall use at least 80 percent  of the offset funds for contracts to implement offsets
and assess offsets for their potential to qualify in, generate credits in or reduce obligations
in other regulatory settings;
(b) May use up to 20 percent of the  offset funds for monitoring, evaluating, administering
and enforcing contracts to implement offsets; and
(c) Shall, at five-year intervals beginning on the date of the receipt  of the offset funds
and ending the year after the year that  the qualified organization in no longer involved in
the investment of offset funds received pursuant to ORS 469.503 (2)(c)(C)  (2017 Edition),
provide the Energy  Facility Siting Council with the information the council requests about
the qualified organization’s performance. The  council shall evaluate the information re-
quested and, based on the information, shall make  any recommendations to the Legislative
Assembly that the council deems appropriate.
SECTION 59.
Section 58 of this 2019 Act is repealed on the date that  the Legislative
Counsel receives written notice from the Energy Facility Siting Council that  the council has
confirmed that all qualified organizations that  received payment of offset funds pursuant to
ORS 469.503 (2)(c)(C) (2017 Edition) have ceased to be involved in the investment  of the offset
funds.
(Repeal)
SECTION 60. ORS 469.409 is repealed.
(Conforming Amendments)
SECTION 61.  ORS 469.300 is amended to read:
469.300. As used in ORS 469.300 to 469.563, 469.590 to  469.619, 469.930 and 469.992, unless the
context requires otherwise:
(1) “Applicant” means  any person who makes application for a site certificate in the manner
provided in ORS 469.300 to 469.563, 469.590 to 469.619, 469.930 and 469.992.
(2) “Application”  means a request for approval of a particular site or sites for the construction
and operation of an energy facility or the  construction and operation of an additional energy facility
upon a site for which a certificate has already been issued, filed  in accordance with the procedures
established pursuant to ORS 469.300 to 469.563, 469.590 to 469.619, 469.930 and 469.992.
(3) “Associated transmission lines” means new transmission lines constructed to connect an en-
ergy facility to the first point of junction of such transmission line or lines with  either a power
distribution  system  or an interconnected primary transmission system or both or to the Northwest
Power  Grid.
(4) “Average electric generating capacity”  means the peak generating capacity of the facility
[40]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
divided by one of the following factors:
(a) For wind facilities, 3.00;
(b) For geothermal energy facilities, 1.11; or
(c) For all other energy facilities, 1.00.
(5) “Combustion turbine power plant” means a thermal power plant consisting of  one or more
fuel-fired combustion turbines and any associated waste heat combined cycle generators.
(6) “Construction” means work performed on a site, excluding surveying, exploration  or other
activities to define or characterize the site, the cost of which exceeds $250,000.
(7) “Council” means the Energy Facility Siting Council established under ORS 469.450.
(8) “Department” means the State Department of Energy created under ORS 469.030.
(9) “Director” means the Director of the State Department of Energy appointed  under ORS
469.040.
(10) “Electric utility” means persons, regulated electrical companies, people’s utility districts,
joint operating agencies, electric cooperatives, municipalities or any combination thereof, engaged
in or authorized to engage in the  business of generating, supplying, transmitting or distributing
electric energy.
(11)(a) “Energy facility” means any of the following:
(A) An electric power generating plant with a nominal electric generating capacity of 25 mega-
watts or more, including but not limited to:
(i) Thermal power;
(ii) Combustion turbine power plant; or
(iii) Solar thermal power plant.
(B) A nuclear installation as defined in this section.
(C) A high voltage  transmission line of more than 10 miles in length with a capacity of 230,000
volts or more to be constructed in more than one city or county in this state, but excluding:
(i) Lines proposed for construction entirely within 500 feet of an existing corridor occupied by
high voltage transmission lines with a capacity of 230,000 volts or more; and
(ii) Lines of 57,000 volts  or more that are rebuilt and upgraded to 230,000 volts along the same
right of way.
(D) A solar photovoltaic power generation facility using more than:
(i) 100 acres located on high-value farmland as defined in ORS 195.300;
(ii) 100 acres located on  land that is predominantly cultivated or that, if not cultivated, is pre-
dominantly composed of soils that are in  capability classes I to IV, as specified by the National
Cooperative Soil Survey  operated by the Natural Resources Conservation Service of the United
States Department of Agriculture; or
(iii) 320 acres located on any other land.
(E) A pipeline that is:
(i) At least six inches in diameter, and five or more miles in length, used  for the transportation
of crude petroleum or a derivative thereof, liquefied natural  gas, a geothermal energy form in a
liquid state or other  fossil energy resource, excluding a pipeline conveying natural or synthetic gas;
(ii) At least 16 inches in diameter, and five or more miles in length,  used for the transportation
of natural or synthetic gas, but excluding:
(I) A pipeline proposed  for construction of which less than five miles of the pipeline is more than
50 feet from a public road, as defined in ORS 368.001; or
(II) A parallel or upgraded pipeline up to 24 inches in diameter  that is constructed within the
[41]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
same right of way as an existing 16-inch or larger pipeline that  has a site certificate, if all studies
and necessary mitigation conducted for the existing site certificate  meet or are updated to meet
current site certificate standards; or
(iii) At least 16 inches in diameter and five or more miles in length used to carry a  geothermal
energy form in a gaseous state but excluding a pipeline used  to distribute heat within a geothermal
heating district established under ORS chapter 523.
(F) A synthetic fuel plant which converts a natural resource  including, but not limited to, coal
or oil to a gas, liquid or solid product intended to be used as a fuel and capable  of being burned to
produce the equivalent of two billion Btu of heat a day.
(G) A plant which converts biomass  to a gas, liquid or solid product, or combination of such
products, intended to be used as a fuel and if any one of such products is  capable of being burned
to produce the equivalent of six billion Btu of heat a day.
(H) A storage  facility for liquefied natural gas constructed after September 29, 1991, that is de-
signed to hold at least 70,000 gallons.
(I) A surface facility related to  an underground gas storage reservoir that, at design injection
or withdrawal rates, will receive or deliver more than 50 million  cubic feet of natural or synthetic
gas per day, or  require more than 4,000 horsepower of natural gas compression to operate, but ex-
cluding:
(i) The underground storage reservoir;
(ii) The injection, withdrawal or monitoring wells and individual wellhead equipment; and
(iii) An underground gas storage reservoir into which gas is injected  solely for testing or res-
ervoir maintenance purposes or to facilitate the secondary recovery of oil or other hydrocarbons.
(J) An electric power generating plant  with an average electric generating capacity of 35
megawatts or more  if the power is produced from geothermal or wind energy at a single energy fa-
cility or within a single energy generation area.
(b) “Energy  facility” does not include a hydroelectric facility or an energy facility under para-
graph (a)(A)(iii) or (D) of this subsection that is established on the site of a decommissioned  United
States Air Force facility that has adequate transmission capacity to serve the energy facility.
(12) “Energy generation area” means an area within  which the effects of two or more small
generating plants may accumulate so the small generating  plants have effects of a magnitude similar
to a single generating plant of 35 megawatts average electric generating capacity or more. An “en-
ergy generation area” for facilities using a geothermal resource and  covered by a unit agreement,
as provided in ORS 522.405 to  522.545 or by federal law, shall be defined in that unit agreement. If
no such unit agreement exists, an energy generation area for facilities using a  geothermal resource
shall be the  area that is within two miles, measured from the electrical generating equipment of the
facility, of an existing or  proposed geothermal electric power generating plant, not including the site
of any other such plant not owned or controlled by the same person.
(13) “Extraordinary nuclear occurrence” means any event  causing a discharge or dispersal of
source material, special nuclear material or by-product material  as those terms are defined in ORS
453.605, from its intended place  of confinement off-site, or causing radiation levels off-site, that the
United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission or its successor determines to be  substantial and to
have resulted in or to be likely to result in substantial damages to persons or property off-site.
(14) “Facility” means an energy facility together with any related or supporting facilities.
(15) “Generating facility” means  those energy facilities that are defined in subsection
(11)(a)(A), (B) and (D) of this section.
[42]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(15)] (16) “Geothermal reservoir”  means an aquifer or aquifers containing a common geothermal
fluid.
[(16)] (17) “Local government” means a city or county.
[(17)] (18) “Nominal electric generating capacity” means the maximum  net electric power output
of an energy facility  based on the average temperature, barometric pressure and relative humidity
at the site during the times of the year when the facility is intended to operate.
(19) “Nongenerating facility” means those energy facilities that  are defined in subsection
(11)(a)(C) and (E) to (I) of this section.
[(18)] (20) “Nuclear incident” means any occurrence,  including an extraordinary nuclear occur-
rence, that results in bodily injury,  sickness, disease, death, loss of or damage to property or loss
of use of property due to the radioactive, toxic, explosive or  other hazardous properties of source
material, special nuclear material or  by-product material as those terms are defined in ORS 453.605.
[(19)] (21)  “Nuclear installation” means  any power reactor, nuclear fuel fabrication plant, nu-
clear fuel reprocessing plant, waste disposal  facility for radioactive waste, and any facility handling
that quantity of fissionable materials sufficient to form a critical mass.  “Nuclear installation” does
not include any such facilities that are part of a thermal power plant.
[(20)] (22) “Nuclear power plant” means an  electrical or any other facility using nuclear energy
with a nominal  electric generating capacity of 25 megawatts or more, for generation and distribution
of electricity, and associated transmission lines.
[(21)] (23)  “Person” means an  individual, partnership, joint venture, private or public corpo-
ration, association, firm, public service company,  political subdivision, municipal corporation, gov-
ernment agency, people’s utility district, or any other entity, public or private, however organized.
[(22)] (24) “Project order” means the  order, including any amendments, issued by the State De-
partment of Energy under ORS 469.330.
[(23)(a)] (25)(a) “Radioactive waste” means all material which is discarded, unwanted or has  no
present lawful economic use, and contains mined  or refined naturally occurring isotopes, accelerator
produced isotopes and by-product material, source material or special  nuclear material as those
terms are  defined in ORS 453.605. The term does not include those radioactive materials identified
in OAR 345-50-020, 345-50-025 and 345-50-035, adopted by the  council on December 12, 1978, and re-
vised periodically for the purpose of adding additional isotopes which are not referred to in  OAR
345-50 as presenting no significant danger to the public health and safety.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, “radioactive waste” does  not include ura-
nium mine overburden or uranium  mill tailings, mill wastes or mill by-product materials as those
terms are defined in Title 42, United States Code, section 2014, on June 25, 1979.
[(24)] (26) “Related or supporting facilities” means any  structure, proposed by the applicant, to
be constructed or substantially modified in  connection with the construction of an energy facility,
including associated transmission lines, reservoirs, storage facilities, intake  structures, road and rail
access, pipelines, barge basins, office or  public buildings, and commercial and industrial structures.
“Related or supporting facilities” does not include  geothermal or underground gas storage reser-
voirs, production, injection or monitoring wells or wellhead equipment or pumps.
[(25)] (27)  “Site” means any proposed  location of an energy facility and related or supporting
facilities.
[(26)] (28) “Site certificate” means the binding  agreement between the State of Oregon and the
applicant, authorizing the applicant to construct and  operate a facility on an approved site, incor-
porating all conditions imposed by the council on the applicant.
[43]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(27)] (29) “Thermal  power plant” means an electrical facility using any source of thermal en-
ergy with a  nominal electric generating capacity of 25 megawatts or more, for generation and dis-
tribution of electricity, and  associated transmission lines, including but not limited to a
nuclear-fueled, geothermal-fueled or fossil-fueled power plant, but not including a portable power
plant the principal use of which is to supply  power in emergencies. “Thermal power plant” includes
a nuclear-fueled thermal power plant that has ceased to operate.
[(28)] (30)  “Transportation” means the transport within the borders  of the State of Oregon of
radioactive material destined for or derived from any location.
[(29)] (31)  “Underground gas storage reservoir”  means any subsurface sand, strata, formation,
aquifer, cavern or void,  whether natural or artificially created, suitable for the injection, storage
and withdrawal of natural gas or other gaseous substances. “Underground  gas storage reservoir”
includes a pool as defined in ORS 520.005.
[(30)] (32) “Utility” includes:
(a) A person, a regulated electrical company, a people’s utility district,  a joint operating agency,
an electric cooperative, municipality or  any combination thereof, engaged in or authorized to engage
in the business of generating, transmitting or distributing electric energy;
(b) A person or  public agency generating electric energy from an energy facility for its own
consumption; and
(c) A person engaged in this state in  the transmission or distribution of natural or synthetic gas.
[(31)] (33)  “Waste disposal facility”  means a geographical site in or upon which radioactive
waste is  held or placed but does not include a site at which radioactive waste used or generated
pursuant to a license granted under ORS 453.635 is stored temporarily, a site of a thermal power
plant used for the temporary storage  of radioactive waste from that plant for which a site certificate
has been issued pursuant to this chapter or a site used for  temporary storage of radioactive waste
from a reactor operated by a college, university or graduate center  for research purposes and not
connected to the Northwest Power Grid. As used in  this subsection, “temporary storage” includes
storage of radioactive waste on the site of  a nuclear-fueled thermal power plant for which a site
certificate has been issued until a permanent storage site is available by the federal government.
SECTION 62.
 ORS 469.310 is amended to read:
469.310. In the interests  of the public health and the welfare of the people of this state, it is the
declared public policy of this  state that the siting, construction and operation of energy facilities
shall be accomplished in a manner consistent with protection of the  public health and safety and in
compliance with the energy policy and air, water, solid waste, land use and other  environmental
protection policies of this state. It is, therefore, the purpose of ORS 469.300  to 469.563, 469.590 to
469.619, 469.930 and 469.992 to exercise the jurisdiction of the State  of Oregon to the maximum ex-
tent permitted by the United States Constitution and to  establish in cooperation with the federal
government a comprehensive system for the siting,  monitoring and regulating of the location, con-
struction and operation of all energy facilities in this state.  It is furthermore the policy of this state,
notwithstanding  ORS  469.010 (2)(f) and the definition of cost-effective in ORS 469.020, that the need
for new generating facilities[ , as defined  in ORS 469.503, ] is sufficiently addressed by reliance on
competition in the market rather than by consideration of cost-effectiveness and shall not be  a
matter requiring determination by the Energy Facility Siting Council  in the siting of a generating
facility[ , as defined in ORS 469.503 ].
SECTION 63.  ORS 469.373 is amended to read:
469.373. (1) Notwithstanding the expedited review  process established pursuant to ORS 469.370,
[44]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
an applicant may apply under the provisions of this section for expedited  review of an application
for a site certificate for an energy facility if the energy facility:
(a) Is a combustion turbine energy facility fueled by natural gas  or is a reciprocating engine
fueled by natural  gas, including an energy facility that uses petroleum distillate fuels for backup
power generation;
(b) Is a permitted  or conditional use allowed under an applicable local acknowledged compre-
hensive plan, land use regulation or federal land use plan, and is located:
(A) At or adjacent to an existing energy facility; or
(B)(i) At, adjacent to or in close proximity to an existing industrial use; and
(ii) In an area currently zoned or designated for industrial use;
(c)(A) Requires no more than three miles of associated transmission lines or three miles of new
natural gas pipelines outside of existing  rights of way for transmission lines or natural gas pipelines;
or
(B) Imposes, in the determination of the  Energy Facility Siting Council, no significant impact in
the locating of associated transmission lines or new natural  gas pipelines outside of existing rights
of way;
(d) Requires no new water right or water right transfer;  and
[(e) Provides funds to a qualified organization in an amount determined by the council to be suf-
ficient to produce any required reduction in emissions as specified in ORS 469.503 (2)(c)(C) and in rules
adopted under ORS 469.503 for the total carbon  dioxide emissions produced by the energy facility for
the life of the energy facility; and ]
[(f)(A)] (e)(A)  Discharges process wastewater to a wastewater treatment facility that  has an
existing National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit, can obtain an industrial  pretreat-
ment permit, if needed, within the expedited review process  time frame and has written confirmation
from the  wastewater facility permit holder that the additional wastewater load will be accommo-
dated by the facility without resulting in a significant  thermal increase in the facility effluent or
without requiring any changes to the wastewater  facility National Pollutant Discharge Elimination
System permit;
(B) Plans to discharge  process wastewater to a wastewater treatment facility owned by a mu-
nicipal corporation that will  accommodate the wastewater from the energy facility and supplies ev-
idence from the municipal corporation that:
(i) The municipal corporation has included, or intends to  include, the process wastewater load
from the  energy facility in an application for a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System
permit; and
(ii) All conditions required of the energy facility to allow the discharge  of process wastewater
from the energy facility will be satisfied; or
(C) Obtains a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System or water pollution  control fa-
cility permit for process  wastewater disposal, supplies evidence to support a finding that the dis-
charge  can  likely be permitted within the expedited review process time frame and that the
discharge will not require:
(i) A new National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit, except  for a storm water
general permit for construction activities; or
(ii) A change in any effluent limit or discharge  location under an existing National Pollutant
Discharge Elimination System or water pollution control facility permit.
(2) An applicant seeking expedited review under this section shall submit documentation  to the
[45]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
State Department of  Energy, prior to the submission of an application for a site certificate, that
demonstrates that the energy facility  meets the qualifications set forth in subsection (1) of this
section.  The  department shall determine, within 14 days of receipt of the documentation, on a pre-
liminary, nonbinding basis, whether the energy facility qualifies for expedited review.
(3) If the department determines  that the energy facility preliminarily qualifies for expedited
review, the applicant may submit an application for expedited  review. Within 30 days after the date
that the application for expedited review is submitted, the department  shall determine whether the
application is complete. If the department determines that the application is complete, the  applica-
tion shall be deemed filed on the date  that the department sends the applicant notice of its deter-
mination. If the department determines that the  application is not complete, the department shall
notify the  applicant of the deficiencies in the application and shall deem the application filed on the
date that the  department determines that the application is complete. The department or the
council may request additional information from the applicant at any time.
(4) The State Department of Energy shall send a copy of a filed  application to the Department
of Environmental Quality, the Water Resources Department, the State Department of Fish  and
Wildlife, the State  Department of Geology and Mineral Industries, the State Department of Agri-
culture, the Department of Land Conservation and Development, the Public Utility  Commission and
any other state agency,  city, county or political subdivision of the state that has regulatory or ad-
visory responsibility with respect to the proposed energy facility. The State Department of Energy
shall send with the copy of the filed application a notice specifying that:
(a) In the event the council issues a site certificate  for the energy facility, the site certificate
will bind the state and all counties,  cities and political subdivisions in the state as to the approval
of the site, the construction of the energy facility and the operation of the energy  facility, and that
after the  issuance of a site certificate, all permits, licenses and certificates addressed in the site
certificate must be issued as required by ORS 469.401 (3); and
(b) The comments and recommendations of state agencies, counties, cities  and political subdi-
visions concerning whether the  proposed energy facility complies with any statute, rule or local
ordinance that the  state agency, county, city or political subdivision would normally administer in
determining whether a permit,  license or certificate required for the construction or operation of the
energy facility should be approved  will be considered only if the comments and recommendations
are received by the department  within a reasonable time after the date the application and notice
of the application are sent by the department.
(5) Within 90 days after  the date that the application was filed, the department shall issue a
draft proposed order setting forth:
(a) A description of the proposed energy facility;
(b) A list of the permits, licenses and certificates that  are addressed in the application and that
are required for the construction or operation of the proposed energy facility;
(c) A list of the statutes, rules and local ordinances that  are the standards and criteria for ap-
proval of any permit, license or certificate addressed  in the application and that are required for the
construction or operation of the proposed energy facility; and
(d) Proposed findings specifying how  the proposed energy facility complies with the applicable
standards and criteria for approval of a site certificate.
(6) The council  shall review the application for site certification in the manner set forth in
subsections (7) to (10) of this section and shall issue a  site certificate for the facility if the council
determines that the facility, with any required conditions to the site certificate, will comply with:
[46]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The requirements for expedited review as specified in this section;
(b) The standards  adopted by the council pursuant to ORS 469.501 (1)(a), (c) to (e), (g), (h) and
(L) to [ (o)] (n) ;
(c) The requirements of ORS 469.503 [ (3)] (2); and
(d) The requirements of ORS 469.504 (1)(b).
(7) Following submission of an application for a site certificate, the council shall  hold a public
informational meeting on the application. Following the issuance of the proposed order, the  council
shall hold at least one public hearing on the application. The public hearing shall be held in the area
affected by the energy facility. The council shall mail notice of  the hearing at least 20 days prior
to the hearing. The notice shall comply with the notice  requirements of ORS 197.763 (2) and shall
include, but need not be limited to, the following:
(a) A description of the energy facility and the general location of the energy facility;
(b) The name of a department representative to contact and the telephone number at  which
people may obtain additional information;
(c) A  statement that copies of the application and proposed order are available for inspection
at no cost and will be provided at reasonable cost; and
(d) A statement that the record  for public comment on the application will close at the conclu-
sion of the hearing and that failure to raise an issue  in person or in writing prior to the close of
the record, with  sufficient specificity to afford the decision maker an opportunity to respond to the
issue, will preclude consideration of the issue, by the council or by a court on judicial review of the
council’s  decision.
(8) Prior to the conclusion of the hearing,  the applicant may request an opportunity to present
additional written evidence, arguments or testimony regarding the application. In  the alternative,
prior to the conclusion of the hearing, the  applicant may request a contested case hearing on the
application. If the applicant requests an opportunity to  present written evidence, arguments or tes-
timony, the council shall leave the record open for that purpose only for a  period not to exceed 14
days after the date of the hearing. Following the close of the record,  the department shall prepare
a draft final order for the council. If the applicant requests a contested case hearing, the council
may grant the request if the applicant has shown good cause for a contested  case hearing. If a re-
quest for a contested case hearing is granted, subsections (9) to (11) of this section do  not apply,
and the application shall be considered under the same contested  case procedures used for a non-
expedited application for a site certificate.
(9) The council shall make its decision based on the record  and the draft final order prepared
by the department. The council shall, within six months of the date that the application  is deemed
filed:
(a) Grant the application;
(b) Grant the application with conditions;
(c) Deny the application; or
(d) Return the application to the site certification process required by ORS 469.320.
(10) If the application is granted,  the council shall issue a site certificate pursuant to ORS
469.401 and 469.402. Notwithstanding subsection (6) of this section, the council may impose condi-
tions based on standards adopted under  ORS 469.501 (1)(b), (f) and (i) to (k), but may not deny an
application based on those standards.
(11) Judicial review of the approval or  rejection of a site certificate by the council under this
section shall be as provided in ORS 469.403.
[47]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 64.  ORS 469.405 is amended to read:
469.405. (1) A site certificate may be  amended with the approval of the Energy Facility Siting
Council. The council may establish by rule  the type of amendment that must be considered in a
contested case proceeding. Judicial review of  an amendment to a site certificate shall be as provided
in ORS 469.403.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 34.020 or 197.825, or  any other provision of law, the land use approval
by an  affected local government of a proposed amendment to a facility and the recommendation of
the special advisory group of applicable substantive criteria shall be subject to  judicial review only
as provided in  ORS 469.403. If the applicant elects to show compliance with the statewide planning
goals by demonstrating that the facility has received local land use approval, the provisions  of this
section shall apply only to  proposed projects for which the land use approval by the local govern-
ment occurs after  the date an application for amendment is submitted to the State Department of
Energy.
(3) An amendment to a site certificate is not  required for a pipeline less than 16 inches in di-
ameter and less than five miles in length that is proposed  to be constructed to test or maintain an
underground gas  storage reservoir. If the proposed pipeline will connect to a council certified sur-
face facility  related to an underground gas storage reservoir or to a council certified gas pipeline,
whether the proposed  pipeline is to be located inside or outside the site of a council certified facil-
ity, the certificate holder must obtain, prior to construction, the approval of  the department for the
construction, operation and retirement of the proposed pipeline. The department shall  approve such
a proposed pipeline if  the pipeline meets applicable council substantive standards. Notwithstanding
ORS 469.503  [ (3)] (2) , the department may not review the proposed pipeline for compliance with
other state standards. Notwithstanding  ORS 469.503 [ (4)] (3) , or any council rule addressing com-
pliance with land use  standards, the department shall not review such a proposed pipeline for com-
pliance  with  land use requirements. Notwithstanding ORS 469.401 (3), the approval by the
department of  such pipeline shall not bind any state or local agency. The council may adopt appro-
priate procedural rules  for the department review. The department shall issue an order approving
or rejecting the proposed pipeline. Judicial  review of a department order under this section shall
be as provided in ORS 469.403.
SECTION 65.  ORS 469.407 is amended to read:
469.407. (1) A recipient may by  amendment of its application for a site certificate or by amend-
ment of its site certificate increase the capacity of the facility if  the Energy Facility Siting Council
finds that:
(a) The facility will satisfy the conditions of the 500-megawatt exemption, unless modified  by the
council;
(b) The enlarged facility does not  exceed 500 megawatts and meets the applicable carbon dioxide
standard provided for in ORS 469.503 (2)  (2017 Edition)  for any increase in capacity  beyond the
capacity of the 500-megawatt exemption; and
(c) The enlarged facility meets all other applicable council standards.
(2) A recipient is deemed to meet any  applicable need standard and carbon dioxide emissions
standard for the nominal generating capacity  of the 500-megawatt exemption provided that the re-
cipient satisfies the conditions of the 500-megawatt exemption, unless the council  modifies the con-
ditions.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Recipient” means any base load  gas plant, as defined in ORS 469.503  (2017 Edition) , de-
[48]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
termined by the council to have the lowest  net monetized air emissions among the applicants par-
ticipating in a contested case proceeding.
(b) “500-megawatt exemption” means the council order in which a recipient was determined  to
have the lowest net monetized air emissions.
SECTION 66.  ORS 469.504 is amended to read:
469.504. (1)  A proposed facility shall be found in compliance with the statewide planning goals
under ORS 469.503 [ (4)] (3) if:
(a) The  facility has received local land use approval under the acknowledged comprehensive
plan and land use regulations of the affected local government; or
(b) The Energy Facility Siting Council determines that:
(A) The facility complies with applicable  substantive criteria from the affected local
government’s acknowledged comprehensive plan and  land use regulations that are required by the
statewide planning goals and in effect on the date the application  is submitted, and with any Land
Conservation and Development Commission administrative rules and goals  and any land use statutes
that apply directly to the facility under ORS 197.646;
(B) For an energy facility or a related or supporting facility that  must be evaluated against the
applicable substantive criteria pursuant to subsection (5) of this section,  that the proposed facility
does not comply with one or more  of the applicable substantive criteria but does otherwise comply
with the applicable statewide planning goals, or that an exception to any applicable statewide
planning goal is justified under subsection (2) of this section; or
(C) For a facility that the council  elects to evaluate against the statewide planning goals pur-
suant to subsection (5) of this section, that the proposed facility complies with the applicable state-
wide planning goals or that an exception to any  applicable statewide planning goal is justified under
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The council may find goal compliance for  a facility that does not otherwise comply with one
or more statewide planning  goals by taking an exception to the applicable goal. Notwithstanding
the requirements of ORS 197.732, the  statewide planning goal pertaining to the exception process
or any rules of the Land Conservation and Development Commission pertaining to  an exception
process goal, the council may take an exception to a goal if the council finds:
(a) The land subject to the exception  is physically developed to the extent that the land is no
longer available for uses allowed by the applicable goal;
(b) The land subject to the exception is  irrevocably committed as described by the rules of the
Land Conservation and Development Commission to uses not allowed by  the applicable goal because
existing adjacent uses and other relevant factors  make uses allowed by the applicable goal imprac-
ticable; or
(c) The following standards are met:
(A) Reasons justify why the state policy embodied in the applicable goal should not apply;
(B) The significant environmental, economic,  social and energy consequences anticipated as a
result of the proposed facility have been identified and adverse impacts will be mitigated in ac-
cordance with rules of the council applicable to the siting of the proposed facility; and
(C) The proposed facility  is compatible with other adjacent uses or will be made compatible
through measures designed to reduce adverse impacts.
(3) If compliance with applicable  substantive local criteria and applicable statutes and state
administrative rules would result in conflicting conditions in  the site certificate or amended site
certificate,  the  council shall resolve the conflict consistent with the public interest. A resolution
[49]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
may not result in a waiver of any applicable state statute.
(4) An applicant for a site certificate shall elect whether to demonstrate  compliance with the
statewide planning goals under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section. The applicant shall make  the
election on or before the date specified by the council by rule.
(5) Upon  request by the State Department of Energy, the special advisory group established
under ORS 469.480 shall recommend to the council, within the time stated in the request,  the ap-
plicable substantive criteria under subsection (1)(b)(A) of  this section. If the special advisory group
does not recommend applicable substantive criteria within  the time established in the department’s
request, the council may either determine and  apply the applicable substantive criteria under sub-
section  (1)(b)  of this section or determine compliance with the statewide planning goals under sub-
section (1)(b)(B) or (C) of this section. If the special advisory group recommends  applicable
substantive criteria for an energy facility described in ORS 469.300 or a related or  supporting fa-
cility that does not pass through more than one local government jurisdiction  or more than three
zones in any one jurisdiction, the council shall apply the criteria recommended by the  special advi-
sory group. If the special advisory group recommends applicable substantive criteria for  an energy
facility as defined in ORS 469.300 (11)(a)(C) to (E) or a related or supporting facility that  passes
through more than one jurisdiction or more than three  zones in any one jurisdiction, the council
shall review the recommended criteria and determine whether to evaluate  the proposed facility
against the applicable substantive criteria recommended by the special advisory group,  against the
statewide planning goals or against a combination of the  applicable substantive criteria and state-
wide planning goals. In making its determination, the council shall consult with the  special advisory
group and shall consider:
(a) The number of jurisdictions and zones in question;
(b) The degree to which the applicable  substantive criteria reflect local government consider-
ation of energy facilities in the planning process; and
(c) The level of  consistency of the applicable substantive criteria from the various zones and
jurisdictions.
(6) The council is not subject to ORS 197.180 and a state  agency may not require an applicant
for a site certificate to comply with any rules or programs adopted under ORS 197.180.
(7) On or before its next periodic review, each affected local  government shall amend its com-
prehensive plan and land use  regulations as necessary to reflect the decision of the council per-
taining to a site certificate or amended site certificate.
(8) Notwithstanding ORS 34.020 or 197.825 or  any other provision of law, the affected local
government’s land use approval of a proposed facility  under subsection (1)(a) of this section and the
special advisory group’s recommendation  of applicable substantive criteria under subsection (5) of
this section shall be subject to judicial review only as provided in ORS  469.403. If the applicant
elects to comply with subsection (1)(a) of this section, the provisions of this subsection shall apply
only to proposed projects for which the land use approval of the local  government occurs after the
date a notice of intent or an application for expedited  processing is submitted to the State Depart-
ment of Energy.
(9) The State Department of Energy, in cooperation with other  state agencies, shall provide, to
the extent possible,  technical assistance and information about the siting process to local govern-
ments that request such assistance or that anticipate having a  facility proposed in their jurisdiction.
SECTION 67.
 ORS 469.505 is amended to read:
469.505. (1) In making a  determination regarding compliance with statutes, rules and ordinances
[50]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
administered by  another agency or compliance with requirements of ORS 469.300 to 469.563 and
469.590 to 469.619 where another  agency has special expertise, consultation with the other agency
shall occur during the  notice of intent and site certificate application process. Any permit applica-
tion for which the permitting decision  has been delegated by the federal government to a state
agency other than the Energy Facility Siting Council shall be reviewed, whenever  feasible, simul-
taneously with the council’s review  of the site certificate application. Any hearings required on such
permit applications shall be  consolidated, whenever feasible, with hearings under ORS 469.300 to
469.563 and 469.590 to 469.619.
(2) Before resolving any conflicting conditions in  site certificates or amended site certificates
under ORS 469.503 [ (3)] (2)  and 469.504, the council shall notify and consult with the  agencies and
local governments responsible for administering the statutes, administrative rules or substantive lo-
cal criteria that result in the conflicting conditions regarding potential conflict resolution.
SECTION 68.
 ORS 526.786 is amended to read:
526.786. (1) The State Board of Forestry may develop administrative rules  that define principles
and standards relating to the creation, measurement, accounting,  marketing, verifying, registering,
transferring and selling of forestry carbon offsets from nonfederal forestlands.
(2) Rules adopted by the board under this section shall set standards to ensure that in  order to
be marketed, registered, transferred or sold, a forestry carbon offset must be  created as a result of
forest management activities that:
(a) Have the effect of increasing carbon storage on  forestlands as measured by a forestry carbon
offset accounting system;
(b) Would not otherwise occur but for the carbon storage objective; and
(c) Provide environmental, social and economic benefits  for Oregon and its citizens, including
but not limited to, protection or enhancement  of long term timber supplies, native fish and wildlife
habitat and water quality.
(3) Rules adopted by the board under this section shall establish  principles to ensure that the
forestry carbon offset accounting system shall:
(a) Account for relevant sources of carbon dioxide emission debits and credits for carbon storage
or sequestration;
(b) Account  for the duration and permanence of the carbon dioxide storage or emission re-
ductions;
(c) Include provisions for establishing the appropriate baseline  for projects, practices, rotation
ages, harvest schedules and ownership from  which measured carbon dioxide emission debits, and
credits for carbon storage or sequestration are made;
(d) Account for other relevant and measurable greenhouse gas consequences,  specifically credits
and debits expressed as a  carbon dioxide emissions equivalent, when establishing baselines or oth-
erwise as appropriate;
(e) Account for the specific forest management practices used on-site  and include provisions for
monitoring carbon dioxide emission debits and credits for carbon storage  or sequestration, from the
implementation of specific practices;
(f) Account for continuing carbon dioxide emission debits, and credits for  carbon storage or
sequestration, based on the end product use of harvested biomass;
(g) Account for environmental, social and economic benefits of forestry carbon offsets and  en-
sure that practices with unsustainable, long term consequences are not used to create forestry  car-
bon offsets;
[51]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(h) Allow for public access to information in monitoring reports; and
(i) Encourage third-party verification of forestry carbon offsets.
(4) Rules adopted by the board under this section may address qualifications for  persons and
agencies that provide third-party verification and registration of forestry carbon offsets.
(5) Rules adopted by the board under this section shall be developed with the assistance of an
advisory committee appointed by  the board. The advisory committee shall consist of at least nine
persons and shall contain:
(a) Persons from businesses, governmental agencies and nongovernmental organizations  with
knowledge and experience in the accounting of greenhouse  gas emissions, sequestration and storage;
(b) At least one person from a nongovernmental forestry conservation organization;
(c) At least one  nonindustrial private forest landowner or a representative of an organization
that represents nonindustrial private forest landowners;
(d) One representative of the State Department of Energy;
(e) One representative of the State Department of Fish  and Wildlife, or a designee of the State
Department of Fish and Wildlife;
(f) One representative of the Department  of Environmental Quality, or a designee of the De-
partment of Environmental Quality;
(g) At least one representative from [ a qualified organization, as defined in ORS 469.503 ] a
nonprofit organization that sells voluntary and compliance offsets from greenhouse  gas re-
duction projects; and
(h) At least one representative  from the State Forestry Department who shall serve as the sec-
retary to the advisory committee.
EXPEDITED JUDICIAL REVIEW TO SUPREME COURT;
EXPIRATION
SECTION 69.
(1) It is the intent of  the Legislative Assembly that the provisions of this
2019 Act  relating to the receipt of moneys by the state through the sale of allowances by
auction under section 21  of this 2019 Act do not render this 2019 Act a bill for raising revenue
subject to the provisions of Article IV, sections 18 and 25 (2), of the Oregon Constitution.
(2) Original jurisdiction is conferred  on the Supreme Court to determine whether this
2019 Act is a bill for raising revenue subject to  the provisions of Article IV, sections 18 and
25 (2), of the Oregon Constitution.
(3) Any person adversely affected or aggrieved by the provisions of section 21 this 2019
Act may institute a proceeding for review by filing  with the Supreme Court a petition that
meets the following requirements:
(a) The petition must be filed on or before January 1, 2020.
(b) The petition must include the following:
(A) A statement of the basis of the challenge; and
(B) A statement and supporting affidavit showing how the petitioner is or will  be ad-
versely affected or aggrieved.
(4) The petitioner shall serve  a copy of the petition by registered or certified mail upon
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the Oregon Director of the Carbon Policy
Office, the Attorney General and the Governor.
(5) Proceedings for review under this section shall be given  priority over all other mat-
[52]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ters before the Supreme Court.
(6) In the event that the Supreme Court determines  that there are factual issues in the
petition, the Supreme  Court may appoint a special master to hear evidence and to prepare
recommended findings of fact.
SECTION 70. (1) It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly  that certain revenue from
the auctions conducted under section 21 of this 2019 Act is subject to  the provisions of Ar-
ticle IX, section 3a, of the Oregon Constitution.
(2) Original  jurisdiction is conferred on the Supreme Court to determine whether auc-
tions conducted under section 21 of this 2019 Act impose:
(a) A tax levied on,  with respect to, or measured by the storage, withdrawal, use, sale,
distribution, importation or receipt  of motor vehicle fuel or any other product used for the
propulsion of motor vehicles; or
(b) A tax or excise levied on the ownership, operation or use of motor vehicles.
(3) A person that is or that will be adversely affected by  the provisions of section 21 of
this 2019 Act  may institute a proceeding for review by filing with the Supreme Court a peti-
tion that meets the following requirements:
(a) The petition must be filed on or before January 1, 2020.
(b) The petition must include the following:
(A) A statement of the basis of the challenge; and
(B) A statement and supporting affidavit showing how the petitioner is or will  be ad-
versely affected.
(4) The petitioner shall serve  a copy of the petition by registered or certified mail upon
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the Director of the Carbon Policy Office,
the Attorney General and the Governor.
(5) Proceedings for review under this section shall be given  priority over all other mat-
ters before the Supreme Court.
(6) In the event that the Supreme Court determines  that there are factual issues in the
petition, the Supreme  Court may appoint a special master to hear evidence and to prepare
recommended findings of fact.
APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 71.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $  for use  by the Carbon
Policy Office in the development and implementation of the Oregon Climate  Action Program
pursuant to sections 8 to 26 of this 2019 Act and for  the implementation of sections 7, 38 to
40 and 46 to 52 of this 2019 Act and the amendments  to ORS 468A.280 by section 53 of this
2019 Act.
SECTION 72. In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Environmental Justice Task Force, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2019,
out of the General  Fund, the amount of $ , which may be expended for compen-
sation and expenses incurred by members of the task force who are not members of the
Legislative Assembly in the manner  and amounts provided for in ORS 292.495, and for pro-
vision by the Governor of clerical and administrative staff support to the task force.
[53]
HB 2020
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
OPERATIVE DATE
SECTION 73. (1) Sections 4 to 52 and 56 to 59 of  this 2019 Act, the amendments to stat-
utes by sections 53, 54, 55 and 61 to 68 of this 2019 Act  and the repeal of ORS 469.409 by
section 60 of this 2019 Act become operative on January 1, 2021.
(2) The Director of the Carbon  Policy Office, the Carbon Policy Office, the Public Utility
Commission, the Housing and Community Services Department, the State Department  of
Energy, the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  the Environmental Quality
Commission, the Department  of Environmental Quality and the Governor may adopt rules
or take any actions before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section that
are necessary to enable the  Director of the Carbon Policy Office, the Carbon Policy Office,
the Public Utility Commission, the Housing and Community Services  Department, the State
Department of Energy,  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the Environ-
mental Quality  Commission, the Department of Environmental Quality and the Governor,
on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, to carry  out the
provisions of sections 4 to 52 and 56 to 59 of  this 2019 Act, the amendments to statutes by
sections 53, 54, 55 and 61 to 68 of this 2019 Act and the repeal  of ORS 469.409 by section 60
of this 2019 Act.
REPORTS AND REVIEWS
SECTION 74. On or before September 15, 2020, the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services shall report  on the actions being taken to prepare for implementation of sections 8
to 26 of this 2019 Act to the Joint Committee on Climate Action.
SECTION 75. On or before September 15, 2031, the Carbon Policy Office  shall conduct a
review and provide a report to the Joint Committee on Climate Action in the manner pro-
vided by ORS 192.245 on the implementation of section 19 of this  2019 Act and rules adopted
under section 19 of this 2019 Act. The report may include recommendations  for legislation.
The review and report must:
(1) Assess the implementation of laws, policies and protocols for offset projects and  the
use of offset credits by covered entities; and
(2) Make determinations and recommendations regarding whether changes  to laws, poli-
cies or protocols are necessary or advisable to address any  negative impacts or to best align
the laws, policies or protocols with the purposes set forth in section 7 of this 2019 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 76.
The unit and section captions used in this 2019 Act are provided  only for
the convenience of the reader and  do not become part of the statutory law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2019 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 77. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
[54]
HB 2020
1
2
on its passage.
[55]