Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this  2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 527.610 to
527.770.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Industrial use” has the meaning given that term in ORS 197.716.
(b) “Public industrial park” means public land that is  located within a planned and zoned
area that is suitable for industrial use.
(c) “Public land” means land that is owned or managed by state or local government.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  Oregon Forest Practices Act does not
apply to the following public lands:
(a) Public road rights-of-way;
(b) State and local parks;
(c) Public industrial parks; and
(d) Any other public land that is not considered forestland.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2337