Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
UTILITIES
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that:
(1) Utilities’ occupancy of the streets, highways and other public property within the
cities of this state is a matter of statewide concern;
(2) Consistency in regulating utilities’ occupancy of the streets, highways and other
public property within the cities of this state ensures that ratepayers are treated fairly;
(3) Consistency in regulating utilities’ occupancy of the streets, highways and other
public property within the cities of this state is necessary to achieve  this state’s economic
development goals;
(4) Sections 1 to 5 of this 2017 Act provide appropriate compensation for the cities of  this
state for costs associated with regulating utilities’  occupancy of the streets, highways and
other public property of the cities of this state; and
(5) Sections 1 to 5 of  this 2017 Act serve to recognize utilities’ rights to occupy the
streets, highways and other public property of the cities of this state.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 1 to 5 of this 2017 Act:
(1) “Actual cost” means:
(a) Expenses associated with oversight  of a utility’s activities, inspection of a utility’s
occupancy or maintenance or  repair of a street, highway or other public property, including
city facilities, for reasons related to a utility’s activities; and
(b) Administrative expenses associated  with the expenses described in paragraph (a) of
this subsection.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1154
SB 840
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) “Heating company” means a person that furnishes heat, but not electricity or  natural
gas, to the person’s customers.
(3) “Local government” has the meaning given that term in ORS 174.116.
(4) “Public utility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.005.
(5) “Utility” means:
(a) A public utility;
(b) A heating company;
(c) An electric cooperative organized under ORS chapter 62;
(d) A people’s utility district organized under ORS chapter 261; and
(e) Any entity against which a privilege tax may be levied under ORS 221.450.
SECTION 3.
(1)(a) This section is intended to  establish the authority of a city to deter-
mine by contract, or to  prescribe by ordinance or otherwise, the payment of charges and fees
under ORS 221.420 (2)(a), and the authority of a city  to levy and collect a privilege tax under
ORS 221.450.
(b) Except as expressly authorized by subsection (2) of this section, a city may  not de-
termine by contract, or prescribe by ordinance or otherwise,  the payment of charges or fees
for purposes described in ORS 221.420 (2)(a).
(c) Except as expressly authorized under subsection (3) of this section,  a city may not
levy and collect a privilege tax for purposes described in ORS 221.450.
(d) A city may not impose and collect a charge or a fee  from any person that uses a fa-
cility of a utility to provide services to customers of the utility for a purpose that is related
to the use.
(2) For purposes of ORS 221.420 (2)(a), a city may determine by  contract, or prescribe by
ordinance or otherwise, a franchise fee, upon  the payment of which a utility may occupy the
streets, highways and other public property of the  city, in an amount that does not exceed
five percent of the gross revenue earned by the utility within the city.
(3) For purposes of ORS 221.450, a city may levy  and collect a privilege tax from a utility
described in ORS 221.450, upon the payment of which a utility may occupy the streets, high-
ways and other public property of the city, in an amount that  does not exceed five percent
of the gross revenue earned by the utility within the city.
(4) For purposes of subsections (2) and (3) of this  section, “gross revenue” does not in-
clude any gross revenue derived from  interstate commerce or business of the federal gov-
ernment of the United States.
SECTION 4.
 (1) If a utility is  a unit of local government, or an intergovernmental body
formed by two or more units of local government, then a city may  charge the utility,
whether as a fee, tax or other type  of payment, only the actual cost of occupying a street,
highway or other public property, provided  that the actual cost is not based on calculations
that are more than three years old.
(2) A city may not charge a utility that is a unit of local  government, or that is an
intergovernmental body formed by two or more units of local  government, under this section
if the city has entered into a franchise agreement  with the utility pursuant to ORS 221.420
(2)(a) or has levied a privilege tax against the utility pursuant to ORS 221.450.
SECTION 5. (1) If a city has entered into a franchise agreement with a  utility pursuant
to ORS 221.420 (2)(a), or levied a privilege  tax against a utility pursuant to ORS 221.450, the
city and the utility shall bear the costs of relocating a facility of the utility as follows:
[2]
SB 840
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) The utility shall bear the relocation costs to the  extent that the relocation is required
to accommodate a capital project or other development funded by the city, the  primary
purpose of which is to address a matter of public health and safety.
(b) The city shall bear the relocation costs to the extent that the relocation is  required
to accommodate a capital project or other development funded by the city, the  primary
purpose of which is to promote education, recreation or beautification of the city;
(c) To the extent that the relocation is required to accommodate a  capital project or
other development funded by a third party, the utility has the right to  recover the relocation
costs from the third party. To provide for the  recovery of relocation costs, the city shall
incorporate the cost of  reimbursing the utility into the conditions and requirements of the
applicable city permits issued to the third party  for purposes of the project or other devel-
opment.
(2) If a city  has entered into a franchise agreement with a utility pursuant to ORS 221.420
(2)(a), or levied a privilege tax against a utility pursuant  to ORS 221.450, the city may not
assess a separate permit fee against the utility  for construction and repairs of a facility of
the utility or for any activity of the utility that requires a street  opening, except that the
city may assess a separate permit  fee against the utility for any construction or repairs of
a facility of the utility or for  any activity of the utility that requires a street opening if,
during the calendar year that the city assesses the permit fee, the  aggregate of actual costs
for administrative,  engineering and inspection expenses of the city that are associated with
the construction or repairs of facilities of the utility or with activities of the utility that re-
quire a street opening exceed 50 percent of  the amount that the city receives from the utility
during that calendar year under the franchise agreement or pursuant to the privilege tax.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 221.420 is amended to read:
221.420. [(1) As used in this section: ]
[(a) “Public utility” has the meaning for that term provided in ORS 757.005. ]
[(b) “Commission” means the Public Utility Commission of Oregon. ]
[(c) “Council” means the common council, city council, commission or any other governing  body of
any municipality wherein the property of the public utility is located. ]
[(d) “Municipality”  means any town, city or other municipal government wherein property of the
public utility is located. ]
[(e) “Service” is used  in its broadest and most inclusive sense and includes equipment and
facilities.]
[(f) “Heating  company” means any person furnishing heat but not electricity or natural gas to its
customers.]
(1) For purposes of this section, “service” is intended to be used in its broadest and  most
inclusive sense, and includes the equipment and facilities of a utility.
(2) Subject to ORS 758.025 and section 3 of this 2017 Act , a city may:
(a) Determine by contract , or prescribe by ordinance or otherwise, the terms and conditions,
including the payment of charges and fees, upon which [ any public  utility, electric cooperative,
people’s utility district or heating company, or  Oregon Community Power, ] a utility may be permitted
to occupy the streets, highways or other public property within [ such] the city [ and].
(b) Exclude or eject [ any] a public utility or heating company [ therefrom.] from the city.
[(b)] (c) Require [ any] a public utility, by ordinance  or otherwise, to make [ such] modifications,
additions and extensions to [ its] the physical  equipment, facilities or [ plant or service ] plants or
[3]
SB 840
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
services of the utility that are located or offered  within [ such] the city as [ shall be ] are rea-
sonable or necessary in the interest  of the public, and designate the location and nature of [ all] the
additions and extensions, the time within which  [ they] the additions and extensions  must be com-
pleted, and [ all] the conditions under which [ they] the additions and extensions  must be con-
structed.
[(c)] (d) Fix by contract, prescribe by ordinance[ ,] or  provide for  in any other lawful manner,
the rates, charges or tolls to be paid to, or that may be collected by, [ any] a public utility , or the
quality and character of each kind of product  or service to be furnished or rendered by [ any] a
public utility  [ furnishing any product or service within such city ]. [ No] A schedule of rates, charges
or tolls, fixed in the manner provided [ in] by this paragraph,  [ shall be so ] may not be  fixed for a
[longer] period [ than] exceeding five years. [ Whenever it is proposed by any city to enter into any
contract, or to enact any ordinance,  or other municipal law or regulation concerning the matters spec-
ified in this paragraph, ] Before a city  enters into a contract, enacts an ordinance or otherwise
acts pursuant to this paragraph, the city must file a copy of [ such] the proposed contract, or-
dinance or other municipal law or resolution [ shall be filed ] with the Public Utility Commission [ of
Oregon] before  the [ same] contract, ordinance or other municipal law or resolution  may be
lawfully signed or enacted[ , as the  case may be, and ]. The commission [ shall thereafter have ] has 90
days from the date of the  filing within which to examine [ into] the terms [ thereof] of the contract,
ordinance or other municipal law or resolution . If the commission is  of the opinion that [ in any
respect] the provisions of the proposed contract, ordinance or other municipal law or  resolution are
not in  the public interest, the commission shall file, in writing, with the [ clerk or other ] city officer
who has [ the] custody of the files and records of the city[ ,] the commission’s reasons  [ therefor] that
the provisions of the proposed contract, ordinance or other municipal law or resolution are
not in the public interest . If the objections  are filed within [ said period of 90 days, no ] the 90-day
period, the proposed contract, ordinance or other municipal law or  [ regulation shall be valid or go
into effect until it ] resolution may not become effective until the proposed contract,  ordinance
or other municipal law or resolution has been  [ submitted to or ] ratified by [ the] a vote of the
electors of the city. Unless and until a city exercises [ its] the city’s powers as provided in this
paragraph, the commission is vested with all  powers with respect to the matters specified in this
paragraph. If the schedule of rates, charges and tolls or the quality  and character of [ each kind of ]
a product or service is fixed by contract, ordinance or other municipal  law or regulation [ and] in
the manner provided [ in] by this paragraph,  the commission has no power or jurisdiction to interfere
with, modify or change [ it] the schedule of rates,  charges and tolls or the quality and character
of each kind of product or service  during  the [ period fixed thereby ] term of the contract, ordi-
nance or other municipal law or resolution . Upon the expiration  of [ said period such powers shall
again be ] the term, all powers with respect to matters specified  in this paragraph are  vested
in the commission, to be exercised by the  commission unless [ and until ] a new schedule of rates ,
charges or tolls  or the quality and character [ for such service or  product ] of a product or service
is fixed [ or prescribed ] by contract[ ,] or ordinance or [ other municipal law or regulation in the manner
provided in this paragraph ] provided for in any other lawful manner .
[(d)] (e) Provide for a penalty for noncompliance  with the provisions of any charter provision,
ordinance or resolution adopted by the city in  furtherance of the powers specified in this subsection.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 221.450 is amended to read:
221.450. Except as provided in ORS 221.655, and subject to section 3 of  this 2017 Act,  the city
council or other governing body of [ every] an incorporated city may levy a privilege tax  against,
[4]
SB 840
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and collect a privilege tax from , Oregon Community Power  and [ from every ] an electric cooperative
organized under ORS chapter 62 , people’s utility district organized under ORS chapter 261 ,
privately  owned  public utility, telecommunications carrier as defined in ORS 133.721 or heating
company. The privilege tax may  be levied and collected only if the entity is operating for a period
of 30 days or more  within the city  and occupying the streets, highways and other  public
property of the city  without a franchise from the  city . [ and actually using the streets, alleys or
highways, or all of them, in such city for other than travel on such streets or highways.  The privilege
tax shall be for the use of  those public streets, alleys or highways, or all of them, in such city in an
amount not exceeding five percent of the gross revenues of  the cooperative, utility, district or company
currently earned within the  boundary of the city. However, the gross revenues earned in interstate
commerce or on the business of the United States Government shall be exempt from  the provisions of
this section. The privilege tax authorized in this  section shall be for each year, or part of each year,
such utility, cooperative, district or company, or Oregon Community  Power, operates without a fran-
chise.] The privilege tax may be levied and collected during each year, or  during each part
of a year, that the entity occupies the streets, highways  and other public property of the city
without a franchise from the city.
COMMUNICATIONS SERVICE PROVIDERS
SECTION 8.  ORS 221.505 is amended to read:
221.505. The Legislative Assembly recognizes that significant changes have occurred  in the
regulation, technology and marketing of [ telecommunications carriers as defined  in ORS 133.721 over
the past decade ] communications services . It is the intent of the Legislative  Assembly in adopting
the privilege tax authorized by  ORS 221.505 to 221.515 and 759.219 to respond to these changes by
establishing a uniform base for municipal  charges for street use by [ telecommunications carriers ]
communications service providers .
SECTION 9.  ORS 221.510 is amended to read:
221.510. (1) As used in [ this section ] ORS 221.505 to 221.515 :
[(a) “Telecommunications carrier” has the meaning given that term in ORS 133.721. ]
[(b) “Commission” means the Public Utility Commission of Oregon. ]
(a) “Communications service provider” means:
(A) A competitive telecommunications provider as defined in ORS 759.005;
(B) A telecommunications utility as defined in ORS 759.005;
(C) An  unincorporated association or cooperative corporation providing intrastate tele-
communications service; or
(D) A provider of interconnected Voice over Internet Protocol service.
[(c)] (b) “Council” means the common council, city  council, commission or any other governing
body of any municipality [ wherein the property of the telecommunications carrier is located ].
(c) “Gross revenues” means the revenues derived from the  provision of telecommuni-
cations service or from interconnected Voice  over Internet Protocol service provided to
customers in a municipality but does not include:
(A) Net uncollectibles from the revenues;
(B) Any amount billed as a separate tax or  surcharge for amounts payable to any federal,
state or local government authority, whether imposed on  the customer or on the communi-
cations service provider, including any privilege tax imposed under this section or  ORS
[5]
SB 840
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
221.515;
(C) Any amount billed for Internet access as defined in ORS 305.822; or
(D) Any amount billed for communications equipment or other property.
(d) “Interconnected Voice over Internet Protocol service” means a service that:
(A) Enables real-time, two-way voice communications;
(B) Requires a broadband connection from the user’s location;
(C) Requires Internet protocol-compatible customer premises equipment; and
(D) Permits users to receive calls that originate on, and to  terminate calls to, the public
switched telephone network.
[(d)] (e) “Municipality” means any town[ , municipality] or  other municipal government [ wherein
property of the telecommunications carrier is located ].
[(e) “Service” is used in its broadest and most inclusive sense and  includes equipment and
facilities.]
(f) “Privilege tax”  means any tax, fee or assessment of any kind, imposed or collected
by the council of a municipality on or from a communications service provider  for the use
of the public streets, alleys or highways in the municipality, including but not limited to:
(A) Franchise fees;
(B) License fees; or
(C) Nonmonetary consideration, such as the construction or free use of  telecommuni-
cations service or interconnected Voice over Internet  Protocol service facilities and equip-
ment.
(g) “Telecommunications service” has the meaning given that term in ORS  759.005.
“Telecommunications service” does not include Internet access as defined in ORS 305.822.
(2) Every municipality may , solely on a competitively neutral and nondiscriminatory basis :
(a) Determine by contract  or franchise agreement , or prescribe by ordinance  or otherwise, the
terms and conditions, including payment of a privilege tax to the extent authorized by ORS  221.515
[and other charges and fees ], upon which [ any telecommunications carrier ] a communications ser-
vice provider may be permitted to occupy the public streets, alleys, highways or other public
property within [ such] the municipality [ and exclude or eject any telecommunications carrier
therefrom].
(b)(A) Require [ any telecommunications carrier ], by ordinance or otherwise, [ to] that, in the  in-
terest of the public, a communications service provider  make [ such] reasonable or necessary
modifications, additions and extensions to [ its] the physical equipment, facilities or plant  [ or
service] used by the communications  service provider to provide communications services
within [ such] the municipality [ as shall be reasonable or necessary in the interest of the public, ]; and
(B) Designate the location and nature of [ all] the modifications, additions  and extensions, the
time within which they must be completed and all conditions under which they must  be constructed.
(c) Provide for a penalty  for noncompliance with the provisions of any charter provision, ordi-
nance or resolution  adopted by the municipality in furtherance of the powers specified in this sub-
section.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 221.515 is amended to read:
221.515. (1) The council  of every municipality in this state may [ levy] impose and collect from
every [ telecommunications carrier operating within the  municipality and actually using the streets, al-
leys or highways, or all of them, in such municipality for other than travel, a privilege tax  for the use
of those streets,  alleys or highways, or all of them, in such ] communications service provider pro-
[6]
SB 840
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
viding communications services to customers within the municipality  a privilege tax for the
privilege of using the  public rights of way to provide communications services in the  munici-
pality [ in an amount which ].
(2) Except  as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the amount of a privilege tax
imposed under this section  may not exceed [ seven] five percent of the gross revenues of the
[telecommunications carrier ] communications service provider  currently earned within the bound-
aries of the municipality. The privilege tax [ authorized in this section ] shall be for  each year, or part
of [ each] a year, that [ such telecommunications  carrier ] the communications service provider  op-
erates within the municipality.
[(2) As used in  this section, “gross revenues” means those revenues derived from exchange access
services, as defined in ORS 403.105, less net uncollectibles from such revenues. ]
(3)(a) This subsection applies to a municipality that  decreases the municipality’s privilege
tax rate to five percent under subsection (2) of this section for the  one-year period beginning
on January 1, 2018.
(b) If revenue from the privilege tax imposed as described in  paragraph (a) of this sub-
section is less than 95 percent of the privilege tax  revenue actually collected by the munici-
pality for the one-year period beginning on January 1, 2016, the municipality may, no later
than December 31, 2019, adopt an ordinance or resolution imposing  the privilege tax at a rate
that is not greater than the lesser of:
(A) The rate that would have made the privilege tax revenue actually collected by the
municipality for the one-year period beginning on January 1, 2018, equal 95 percent of  the
privilege tax  revenue actually collected by the municipality for the one-year period beginning
on January 1, 2016; or
(B) Seven percent.
(c) In any judicial proceeding  challenging the rate imposed pursuant to this subsection,
the municipality shall bear the burden of demonstrating that the increase is  consistent with
this subsection.
[(3)] (4)(a)  A [ telecommunications carrier ] communications service provider  paying the privi-
lege tax authorized by this section [ shall] may not be required  to pay any additional fee, compen-
sation or other consideration[ , including the free use or construction of telecommunications facilities
and equipment,] to the municipality for [ its] use by the communications service provider  of the
public streets, alleys[ ,] or highways[ , or all of them, ] and [ shall] may not be required to pay  any
additional tax or fee on the gross revenues  that are the measure of the privilege tax. [ As used in
this subsection,  “use” includes, but is not limited to, street openings, construction and maintenance of
fixtures or facilities by telecommunications carriers. ]
(b) [ As used in this subsection, “additional fee, compensation or consideration” does not  include
commissions paid for siting  public telephones on municipal property. ] Notwithstanding paragraph
(a) of this subsection, in  addition to a privilege tax imposed under this section, a municipality
may charge a communications service provider:
(A) A commission for siting public telephones on municipal property;
(B) Separate fees for street openings,  construction and inspection or maintenance of
fixtures and facilities; and
(C) Separate fees  for the privilege of providing communications services in the munici-
pality.
(c)(A) [To the extent that  separate fees are imposed by the municipality on telecommunications
[7]
SB 840
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
carriers for street openings, construction, inspection or maintenance  of fixtures or facilities, such fees
may be deducted from the privilege tax authorized by this  section. However, telecommunications carri-
ers shall not deduct charges and penalties  imposed by the municipality for noncompliance with charter
provisions, ordinances, resolutions or permit conditions from the  privilege tax authorized by this sec-
tion.] A communications service provider may deduct separate fees  imposed by the munici-
pality under paragraph (b)(C) of this subsection from  any privilege tax imposed by the
municipality under this section.
(B) A communications service provider may deduct any  privilege tax imposed by the
municipality under this section from any separate  fees imposed under paragraph (b)(C) of
this subsection.
(d) The total  amount of a privilege tax imposed under this section and fees imposed under
paragraph (b) of this subsection may not exceed five percent of the gross  revenues of the
communications service provider earned within the boundaries of  the municipality for the
tax period.
[(4)] (5) [ For purposes of this section, “telecommunications carrier”  has the meaning given that
term in ORS 133.721. ] A  municipality may not restrict a communications service provider from
recovering the amounts payable by the communications  service provider as a privilege tax
under this section from the communications service provider’s customers receiving services
subject to the privilege tax.
(6) A  cable operator as defined in ORS 30.192 paying a franchise fee as defined in 47 U.S.C.
542, as in effect on January 1, 2016, to a municipality under a franchise as defined in 47 U.S.C.
522, as in effect on January 1, 2016, may not  be required to pay additional taxes or fees on
the gross revenues that are the measure of  the franchise fee paid under the cable franchise.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 759.219 is amended to read:
759.219. The privilege  tax authorized by ORS 221.515, or other similar exactions imposed by any
municipality in this state upon telecommunications utilities for use and occupancy of streets,  alleys
or highways,  or all of them, shall be allowed as an operating expense of the affected telecommuni-
cations utilities operating in the municipality for rate-making purposes by the Public  Utility Com-
mission. [The cost of such privilege tax or other similar exactions shall be charged pro rata to the users
of such telecommunications  utility within the municipality unless the Public Utility Commission deter-
mines on a statewide basis that such pro rata charges would be inequitable, in whole  or in part, to city
ratepayers or should  otherwise be borne as a statewide operating expense by the telecommunications
utility.]
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 12. ORS 221.415 is repealed.
SECTION 13. ORS 221.420 and 221.450 are added to and made  a part of sections 1 to 5 of
this 2017 Act.
SECTION 14. Section 3 of this 2017 Act and the amendments to ORS  221.420 by section
6 of this 2017 Act apply to franchise agreements entered into or renewed on  or after the ef-
fective date of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 15. Section 3 of this 2017 Act and the amendments to ORS  221.450 by section
7 of this 2017 Act apply to privilege taxes levied on  or after the effective date of this 2017
Act.
[8]
SB 840
1
2
3
4
SECTION 16. The unit captions used in this 2017 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
[9]