Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 742.450 is amended to read:
742.450. (1) Every motor vehicle liability insurance policy issued  for delivery in this state shall
state the name and address of the named insured, the coverage afforded by the  policy, the premium
charged therefor, the policy period and the limits of liability.
(2) Every motor vehicle liability insurance policy issued for delivery in  this state shall contain
an agreement or indorsement stating that, as  respects bodily injury and death or property damage,
or both, the insurance provides either:
(a) The coverage described in ORS 806.070 and 806.080; or
(b) The coverage described in ORS 806.270.
(3) The agreement or indorsement required  by subsection (2) of this section shall also state that
the insurance provided is subject to all the provisions of  the Oregon Vehicle Code relating to fi-
nancial responsibility  requirements as defined in ORS 801.280 or future responsibility filings as de-
fined in ORS 801.290, as appropriate.
(4) Every motor vehicle liability insurance policy issued for delivery in  this state shall provide
liability coverage to at least the limits specified in ORS 806.070.
(5) Every motor vehicle liability  insurance policy issued for delivery in this state shall provide
liability  coverage,  up to the limits of coverage under the policy for a vehicle owned by the named
insured, for the operation by  the named insured of a motor vehicle provided to the named insured,
without regard to whether the named insured is charged for the use of the motor vehicle, if:
(a) The motor vehicle is provided to the named  insured by a person engaged in the business of
repairing or servicing motor vehicles; and
(b) The motor vehicle is provided to the named insured as a temporary replacement  vehicle
while the named insured’s vehicle is being repaired or serviced.
(6) A motor vehicle  liability insurance policy issued for delivery in this state may exclude by
name from coverage required by subsection (2)(a) of this section any person  other than the named
insured, for any of the reasons stated in subsection (7) of  this section. When an insurer excludes a
person as provided by this subsection, the insurer  shall obtain a statement or indorsement, signed
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 5
HB 4047
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
by each  of the named insureds, that the policy will not provide any coverage required by subsection
(2)(a) of this section when the motor vehicle is driven by any named excluded person.
(7) A person may be excluded from coverage under a  motor vehicle liability insurance policy as
provided in subsection (6) of this section:
(a) Because of the driving record of the person. The Director of the Department of  Consumer
and Business Services by rule may establish restrictions on the use of the driving record  in addition
to other restrictions established by law.
(b) Because of any reason or set of criteria established by the director by rule.
(8) Every motor vehicle liability insurance policy issued for delivery in  this state shall contain
a provision that provides liability coverage for each family member of the insured residing in the
same household as the insured in an amount  equal to the amount of liability coverage purchased
by the insured.
(9) Every motor vehicle liability insurance policy issued for delivery in this state  shall
contain a provision that provides liability coverage  for towing expenses related to a motor
vehicle accident.
SECTION 2.
The amendments  to ORS 742.450 by section 1 of this 2024 Act apply to con-
tracts issued, renewed or extended on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
[2]