Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 321.015 is amended to read:
321.015. (1) [ For the calendar years beginning January 1,  2018, and January 1, 2019, ] There is
levied a privilege tax of 90.00 cents per  thousand feet, board measure, upon taxpayers for the priv-
ilege of  harvesting of all merchantable forest products harvested on forestlands. Subject to ORS
321.145, the  proceeds of the tax shall be transferred as provided in ORS 321.152 (2) to the Forest
Research  and  Experiment Account for use for the forest resource research, experimentation and
studies described in  ORS 526.215 and for the Forest Research Laboratory established under ORS
526.225.
(2) Except as provided in  ORS 477.760, in addition to the tax levied by subsection (1) of this
section, there is levied a forest products harvest tax upon taxpayers of [ 62.5] 142 cents per thousand
feet, board measure,  for the privilege of harvesting all merchantable forest products harvested on
forestlands for the payment of benefits related to fire suppression as provided in ORS 321.005  to
321.185, 321.560 to 321.600 and 477.440 to 477.460.
(3) [ For the calendar years beginning January  1, 2018, and January 1, 2019, ] In addition to the
taxes levied under  subsections (1) and (2) of this section, there is levied a privilege tax upon tax-
payers for the privilege of harvesting  all merchantable forest products harvested on forestlands in
the amount of 156.61 cents per thousand feet, board measure, for  the purpose of administering the
Oregon  Forest  Practices Act in an amount not to exceed 40 percent of the total expenditures ap-
proved by  the Legislative Assembly for this purpose, including salary adjustments approved by the
Legislative Assembly [ for fiscal years 2018 and 2019 ].
(4) [ For the calendar years beginning January  1, 2018, and January 1, 2019, ] In addition to the
taxes levied by subsections (1) to (3) of this section, there is levied a privilege tax of 10 cents  per
thousand feet, board measure, upon taxpayers for the privilege of harvesting all merchantable forest
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2522
HB 2495
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
products harvested on forestlands. Subject to ORS 321.145, the proceeds of the tax shall  be trans-
ferred as provided in ORS 321.152 (5) to the subaccount established pursuant to ORS 350.520 for use
by Oregon State University for the purpose of making  investments in professional forestry education
at the College of Forestry.
(5) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, the  taxes shall be measured by and be applicable to
each per thousand feet, board measure,  on the total quantity of forest products harvested in this
state measured by use of any log scale which is or may  be in general use in the logging industry
and which is designed to measure total volume of merchantable forest products in board feet.  How-
ever, if the Department of Revenue finds that the scale used  by any taxpayer in computing the taxes
due under ORS 321.005 to 321.185 and 321.560 to 321.600 does not accurately reflect the  total
quantity of merchantable forest products harvested by the taxpayer, it may require the  taxpayer to
adopt another log scale  in general use in the industry which in the department’s opinion will accu-
rately reflect merchantable harvest in board feet.
(6) The  first 25,000 feet, board measure, of forest products harvested annually by any taxpayer
during each calendar year shall be excluded from the total quantity of harvested forest products that
constitutes the measure of the taxes under ORS 321.005 to 321.185 and 321.560 to 321.600.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 321.015 by  section 1 of this 2019 Act apply to cal-
endar years beginning on or after January 1, 2020.
SECTION 3. The Wildfire Suppression Fund is created in the State Treasury,  separate
and distinct from  the General Fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to
the State Forester for:
(1) Paying, or contributing to the payment of, emergency fire suppression costs.
(2) Providing funds for the purchase of emergency  fire suppression costs insurance under
ORS 477.775.
(3) Acquiring and placing centrally managed fire suppression resources  for statewide use.
(4) Acquiring fast-mobilizing, short-term contingency resources to be used based on pre-
dictions of severe fire weather, widespread lightning events or serious resource shortage  due
to a heavy fire season in this state,  in the western region of the United States or nationally.
(5) Enhancing forest protection district resources in cases where  land productivity or
other economic factors seriously limit the ability of the State Forester to perform fire  pro-
tection responsibilities.
(6) Mitigating forest patrol assessment rates in cases  where land productivity or other
economic factors seriously limit the ability of the owners of forestlands in the  forest pro-
tection district to comply with ORS 477.210 (1).
SECTION 4.
 ORS 321.152 is amended to read:
321.152. (1) Subject to ORS 321.145 (2), moneys remaining in  the Department of Revenue’s sus-
pense account referred to in ORS 321.145 on February 10, May 10, August 10 and November 10 of
each year shall be transferred to the respective appropriation accounts described in subsections  (2)
to (5) of this section.
(2) That part of the moneys derived from taxes levied by ORS 321.015 (1) shall be  transferred
to the Forest Research and Experiment Account described in ORS 321.185.
(3) That  part of the moneys derived from taxes levied by ORS 321.015 (3) shall be transferred
to the State Forestry Department  Account referred to in ORS 526.060. Notwithstanding ORS 291.238,
the moneys transferred to the State Forestry Department Account under this section are  appropri-
ated continuously for and shall be used by the State Forester, under the supervision and  direction
[2]
HB 2495
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of the State Board of Forestry,  for the purposes of administering the Oregon Forest Practices Act
and the forest practices monitoring program.
(4)(a) Fifty-six percent of  that part of the moneys derived from taxes levied by ORS 321.015
(2) shall be transferred to the Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund described in ORS 477.750.
(b) Forty-four percent of that part of the moneys derived from taxes  levied by ORS
321.015 (2) shall be transferred to the Wildfire Suppression Fund  created in section 3 of this
2019 Act.
(5) That part of the moneys derived from taxes levied by ORS 321.015 (4) shall be  transferred
to the subaccount established pursuant to ORS 350.520.
SECTION 5.  ORS 477.760 is amended to read:
477.760. (1) The reserve base of the Oregon Forest Land Protection  Fund is $22.5 million. On
or about the  last day of February of each year the Emergency Fire Cost Committee shall meet and
determine the unencumbered balance of the fund as of the preceding February 16.
(2) In order to maintain the reserve base of the fund at $22.5  million, the Emergency Fire Cost
Committee may request and the State Treasurer may approve transfers to the fund in  accordance
with ORS 293.205 to 293.225, if the moneys in this fund fall below the reserve base,  whether or not
there are sufficient moneys in the fund to  pay the obligations of the fund. Repayment of any such
transfers shall be made from moneys paid into  the fund pursuant to ORS 321.015 (2), 477.277 and
477.880 and from such other moneys as may be credited to the fund therefor.
(3) If the committee determines that the moneys in the fund exceed:
(a) The reserve base, and that no repayment obligations are outstanding  from transfers made
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section,  then the Department of Revenue shall reduce the portion
of the  taxes described in ORS  321.015 (2) that are levied for purposes of transfer to the fund
by 50 percent for the following calendar year and the surcharge for each improved  lot or parcel
described in ORS 477.277 and the assessments described in ORS 477.880  shall be reduced by 50
percent for the following fiscal year.
(b) $30 million, and that no repayment obligations are outstanding from transfers made  pursuant
to subsection (2)  of this section, then the Department of Revenue may not collect the taxes described
in ORS 321.015 (2) for the following calendar year and  the surcharge for each improved lot or parcel
described in ORS 477.277 and the assessments described in ORS 477.880  may not be collected until
the calendar year  or fiscal year following the determination of the committee that the unencumbered
balance in the fund is less than or equal to $22.5 million.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the funds referred to in subsection (2) of
this section  are inadequate to cover repayment of transfers from the State Treasurer or from other
sources, the State Forester shall  increase the following taxes, assessments and charges in an amount
adequate to ensure repayment of the  transfers, and any interest accrued thereon, allowing for con-
tingencies in valuation, assessment and collection:
(A) The harvest tax referred to in ORS 321.015 (2).
(B) The surcharge on developed lots referred to in ORS 477.277.
(C) The minimum assessment referred to in ORS 477.295.
(D) The acreage assessments referred to in ORS 477.880 (2).
(b) The increases to taxes, assessments and charges shall be apportioned based  upon the
proportionate levels of revenues received from each  source by the Oregon Forest Land Protection
Fund. Any such increases shall be computed on or before January  1 of each year, and shall be based
upon revenues  received during the previous four quarters. Any such increases shall be made in the
[3]
HB 2495
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
appropriate calendar or fiscal  year following that in which the requested transfers from the State
Treasurer or from other sources are made. Notwithstanding ORS 321.152 (4), the full amount
derived from an increase in the harvest tax referred to  in ORS 321.015 (2) pursuant to this
subsection shall  be transferred to the Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund created under
ORS 477.750.
SECTION 6.  ORS 477.777 is amended to read:
477.777. (1) As part of the preparation of  the agency request budget submitted to the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services pursuant to ORS 291.208 for the State Forestry  Department,
the State Forester shall prepare, in addition to any amounts budgeted  for forest protection districts
pursuant to ORS 477.205 to 477.281, a request for a General Fund appropriation for  the following
purposes:
(a) Providing funds for the purchase  of emergency fire suppression costs insurance under ORS
477.775.
(b) Acquiring and placing centrally managed fire suppression resources for statewide use.
(c) Acquiring fast-mobilizing, short-term contingency resources to be used based on  predictions
of severe fire weather, widespread  lightning events or serious resource shortage due to a heavy fire
season in this state, in the western region of the United States or nationally.
(d) Enhancing forest protection district resources in cases where land  productivity or other
economic factors seriously limit the ability of the forester to perform fire protection  responsibilities.
(e) Mitigating forest patrol assessment rates in cases where land productivity  or other economic
factors seriously limit the ability of the owners of forestlands in the forest protection  district to
comply with ORS 477.210 (1).
(2) The State Forester  [ shall utilize critical discretion in the expenditure of the ] may expend
funds provided to the State Forestry Department pursuant to the separate request required under
subsection (1) of this section only if, and  to the extent that, available moneys in the Wildfire
Suppression Fund created under section 3 of this 2019 Act are insufficient for  the
expenditure.
(3) The State Forester shall  report to the Emergency Board, each year, after the close of the fire
season, on:
(a) The nature and severity of the fire season;
(b) The moneys expended on fire suppression;
(c) The balance remaining from the biennial appropriation; and
(d) Any matters arising  out of the fire season that may require attention or warrant future
consideration by the board or the Legislative Assembly.
(4) When reporting the nature and severity of the fire season under subsection (3) of this section,
for each fire consuming 1,000 or more acres, the State Forester shall provide  information regarding
the resulting losses on private lands of timber,  buildings, fencing and livestock and of grazing land
capacity if the land is expected to be unavailable for two or more grazing seasons.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 477.281 is amended to read:
477.281. (1) The obligation of an owner of timberland or  grazing land for payment of assessments
and taxes for fire protection of forestland is limited to:
(a) The payment of  moneys pursuant to ORS 321.015 (2), 477.277, 477.295, 477.760 (4) and 477.880
to maintain the Oregon Forest Land Protection Fund created under ORS 477.750 and the Wildfire
Suppression Fund created under section 3 of this 2019 Act ; and
(b) The payment of forest protection  district assessments pursuant to ORS 477.060 and 477.205
[4]
HB 2495
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
to 477.281.
(2) As used in this section, “obligation of an owner of  timberland or grazing land for payment
of assessments and taxes for  fire protection of forestland” does not include the duties or obligations
of the  owner under ORS 477.066, 477.068 or 477.120 or the obligations of an owner of land included
in a rural fire protection district pursuant to ORS 478.010.
SECTION 8. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[5]