Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 396.135 is amended to read:
396.135. (1) When the militia of the state or any part  thereof is called forth under the Consti-
tution and laws of the United States, the Governor shall order out for service the organized  militia
or such part thereof as may be necessary, and if the number available is  insufficient the Governor
may call for and  accept from the unorganized militia as many volunteers as are required for service
in the organized militia or the Governor may direct the  members of the unorganized militia or such
of them as the Governor may deem necessary to be drafted into the organized militia.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section,  the Governor may not order out for
service the militia of the state or any part thereof if  the service is for the participation in
or support of an armed conflict or the conduct of war unless the United States Congress:
(a) Passes a declaration of war under Article I, section 8, clause 11,  of the United States
Constitution; or
(b) Takes official action to explicitly call forth the militia of the state or  any part thereof
for the purpose of executing the laws of the United States,  suppressing an insurrection or
repelling an invasion under Article I, section 8, clause 15, of the United States Constitution.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1805