Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
For the 2025-2027 biennium and in addition to and not in lieu of any appro-
priation, the Department of Education shall  expend the amount of $500,000 from the State-
wide Education Initiatives Account for the purpose of awarding to school districts grants to
develop and provide educational activities during recess, lunch or after school at  schools of
the school districts that are considered high poverty under Title  I of the federal Elementary
and Secondary Act of 1965 and that serve students in any  grade from kindergarten through
grade six.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4429