Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 315.
SECTION 2. (1) A credit against taxes that are otherwise due under  ORS chapter 316
shall be allowed to a taxpayer who invests more than $20,000 in one or more community food
resources in a tax year.  The credit allowed is calculated by subtracting $20,000 from the
amount invested and multiplying the result by 30 percent.
(2) Beginning January 1, 2027, the Department of Revenue  shall annually adjust the ex-
clusion amount in subsection (1) of  this section according to the cost-of-living adjustment for
the calendar year. The department shall make this adjustment by multiplying  $20,000 by the
percentage, if any, by which the monthly  averaged U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index
for the 12 consecutive months ending August 31 of the prior calendar year  exceeds the
monthly averaged  U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index for the 12 consecutive months
ending August 31, 2024.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Community food resource” means  a community garden or a food bank or other
charitable organization.
(b) “Community  garden” means a parcel of public or private land located in this state
that is available to the general public for the  noncommercial production of vegetables, fruits,
herbs, flowers, nuts, poultry or honey.
(c) “Food bank or  other charitable organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS
315.154.
(4) For each tax year for which a credit is claimed under this  section, the taxpayer shall
maintain records sufficient to prove  the taxpayer’s eligibility for the credit allowed under
this section. A taxpayer shall maintain  the records required under this subsection for at
least three years.
(5) The amount of the credit available under  this section may not exceed the tax liability
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1737
HB 2907
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
of the taxpayer under ORS chapter 316 for the tax year.
(6) A nonresident taxpayer shall be allowed the credit under this section. The  credit shall
be computed in the same  manner and be subject to the same limitations as the credit
granted to a resident taxpayer. However,  the credit shall be prorated using the proportion
provided in ORS 316.117.
(7) If a change in the taxable year of the taxpayer occurs  as described in ORS 314.085,
or if the Department of Revenue terminates the taxpayer’s  taxable year under ORS 314.440,
the credit allowed by  this section shall be prorated or computed in a manner consistent with
ORS 314.085.
(8) If a change in the status of a taxpayer from resident to nonresident  or from nonres-
ident to resident occurs, the credit allowed by this section shall  be determined in a manner
consistent with ORS 316.117.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025  Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2025.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]