Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $
, which shall be allocated to community mental health
programs for residential  facility oversight activities under ORS 430.630 and for conducting
investigations of abuse in residential facilities under ORS 430.735 to 430.765.
SECTION 2. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3504