Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Department  of Agriculture shall establish by rule a grant
program for the purpose of facilitating the  eradication of gorse for wildfire mitigation in
southwest Oregon.
(2) In administering the program, the department:
(a) Shall develop criteria for receiving a grant and a process for applying for  a grant; and
(b) May require a recipient  of a grant to report to the department on the use of the grant
funds.
(3) The department shall review the grant program on a biennial basis to assess to  what
extent the  purpose described in subsection (1) of this section is being achieved. The depart-
ment shall modify the process for awarding grants as necessary to better achieve  the pur-
pose described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the
General Fund, the Southwest Oregon Gorse Wildfire Risk Reduction Fund.  Interest earned
by the Southwest Oregon Gorse Wildfire Risk Reduction  Fund shall be credited to the fund.
All moneys in  the Southwest Oregon Gorse Wildfire Risk Reduction Fund are continuously
appropriated to the State Department of Agriculture to carry  out the purposes described in
section 1 of this 2023 Act.
(2) The Southwest Oregon Gorse Wildfire Risk Reduction Fund shall consist of all moneys
credited to the fund, including  moneys appropriated or transferred to the fund by the Leg-
islative Assembly.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to the State Department of Agriculture,  for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000 for deposit
into the Southwest Oregon Gorse Wildfire Risk Reduction Fund  established in section 2 of
this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4. (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this 2023 Act are repealed on December 31, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1845
HB 3292
1
2
3
4
5
(2) Any moneys remaining in the Southwest Oregon Gorse Wildfire  Risk Reduction Fund
that are unexpended and unobligated on December 31, 2027, shall revert  to the General Fund.
SECTION 5.
This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]