Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Department of  Administrative Services shall distribute $___ to
Klamath County. Moneys distributed under this section must be used to acquire and install
stream gauges in the Klamath Basin. The stream  gauges must be designed and installed in
a manner that will allow accurate calculation of the flow of the stream being measured.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $___, to carry out the provisions of  section
1 of this 2019 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2674