Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 144.649 is amended to read:
144.649. (1) Upon  such conditions and with such restrictions and limitations as the Governor
thinks proper, the Governor may grant reprieves, commutations and pardons, after convictions,  for
all crimes and may remit, after judgment therefor, all penalties and forfeitures.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 181A.820 and 181A.822 to 181A.829, the Governor may:
(a) Consult and coordinate  with the Department of Corrections and any federal immi-
gration authority as defined  in section 2 of this 2025 Act to identify persons subject to re-
moval and facilitate removal proceedings.
(b) If doing so is in the interests of  the residents of this state, commute the sentence
of a person incarcerated in a Department  of Corrections facility in order to facilitate or ex-
pedite the removal of the person.
SECTION 2.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 181A.820 and 181A.822 to 181A.829, the  Department
of Corrections shall:
(a) Consult and cooperate with federal immigration authorities to  identify persons in the
custody of the department who are subject to removal.
(b) Ensure that persons  in the custody of the department are able to participate in re-
moval proceedings while serving terms of incarceration in order to  allow for expedited re-
moval upon release from custody.
(c) Share information with the office of the Governor in  order to facilitate removal, in-
cluding but not limited to information concerning persons in  the custody of the department
who are subject to removal.
(d) Coordinate with the Governor and federal immigration  authorities so that a person
whose sentence has  been commuted to facilitate removal is transferred directly into the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4394
HB 3689
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
custody of a federal immigration authority upon release.
(2) As used in this section, “federal immigration authority” means the United  States
Department of Homeland Security,  the United States Immigration and Customs Enforce-
ment, the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, the United States  Customs
and Border Protection or a successor agency, any other  federal immigration agency or offi-
cial or any other entity to which a federal immigration agency delegates or assigns the  au-
thority to detect, investigate or enforce violations of immigration law.
[2]