Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Education  and the Higher Education Coordinating Com-
mission shall jointly study issues related to the state’s implementation  of new federal regu-
lations issued under Title IX of the Education Amendments Act of 1972, 20 U.S.C.  1681 to
1688, as in effect on the effective date of  this 2021 Act, and present the results of the study
and recommendations for changes to state law in a report to an appropriate committee or
interim committee of  the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245
on or before September 1, 2021.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2022.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1272