Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
ORS 414.769 and 743A.325 and sections 21 and 22, chapter  228, Oregon Laws
2023, are repealed.
SECTION 2.  ORS 243.144, as amended by section 9, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2024, is  amended
to read:
243.144. Benefit plans offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board that reimburse the  cost
of medical and other health services and supplies must comply with  the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810; and
[(10) ORS 743A.325; and ]
[(11)] (10) ORS 743A.051 (2)(c).
SECTION 3.
 ORS  243.144, as amended by sections 9 and 10, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
243.144. Benefit  plans offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board that reimburse the cost
of medical and other health  services and supplies must comply with the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4398
HB 3692
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;  and
(9) ORS 743B.810[ ; and ]
[(10) ORS 743A.325 ].
SECTION 4.
 ORS 243.877, as amended by section 11, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
243.877. Benefit  plans offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board that reimburse the cost
of medical and other health  services and supplies must comply with the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810; and
[(10) ORS 743A.325; and ]
[(11)] (10) ORS 743A.051 (2)(c).
SECTION 5.
 ORS 243.877, as amended by sections 11 and 12, chapter 17, Oregon Laws  2024, is
amended to read:
243.877. Benefit  plans offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board that reimburse the cost
of medical and other health  services and supplies must comply with the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;  and
(9) ORS 743B.810[ ; and ]
[(10) ORS 743A.325 ].
SECTION 6.
 Section 59, chapter 228, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 59.  [(1) Section 20 of this 2023 Act applies to  health benefit plans issued, renewed or extended
on or after January 1, 2024. ]
[(2) Section 24 of this 2023 Act applies  to medical assistance provided and to contracts with coor-
dinated care organizations for periods beginning on or after January 1, 2024. ]
[(3) The amendments to ORS 243.144 and 243.877 by sections 25 and 26 of this  2023 Act apply to
[2]
HB 3692
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
health benefit plans  offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board or the Oregon Educators Benefit
Board that are issued, renewed or extended on or after January 1, 2024, and for self-insured  health
benefit plans in effect for periods beginning on or after January 1, 2024. ]
[(4)] (1) [ Sections 31 and 35 of this 2023 Act ] ORS 676.313 and 678.138  and the amendments to
ORS 675.070, 675.540, 675.745, 677.190, 677.225, 677.320, 678.111, 685.110 and 689.405  by sections 31a
to 33, 36 to 38 and 51 , chapter 228, Oregon Laws 2023,  [of this 2023  Act ] apply to reproductive and
gender-affirming health care services provided on or after [ the effective date of this  2023 Act ] July
13, 2023.
[(5)] (2) The  amendments to ORS 659A.029 by section 47 , chapter 228, Oregon Laws 2023, [of
this 2023 Act ] apply to unlawful employment discrimination occurring before, on or after [ the effective
date of this 2023 Act ] July 13, 2023 .
[3]