Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 332.075 is amended to read:
332.075. (1) Any district school board may:
(a) Fix the days of the year and the hours of the day when schools shall be in session.
(b) Adopt textbooks and other instructional materials as provided in ORS  337.120 and 337.141
and courses of study for the use of such schools as provided in ORS 336.035.
(c) Authorize the use of the  schools for purposes of training students of an approved educator
preparation provider, as defined in ORS 342.120, and for such purposes  may enter into contracts
with the  approved educator preparation provider on such terms as may be agreed upon. Such con-
tracts as they  relate to student teachers shall have the same effect and be subject to the same
regulations as a contract between a licensed teacher and a district school board.
(d) Develop and operate with other  school districts or community college districts secondary
career and technical education programs for  pupils of more than one district and fix by agreement
the duration  of the district’s obligation to continue such activity, subject to the availability of funds
therefor.
(e) Authorize the  school district to be a member of and pay fees, if any, to any voluntary or-
ganization that administers interscholastic activities or that  facilitates the scheduling and pro-
gramming of interscholastic activities only if the organization:
(A) Implements policies that address the use of derogatory or  inappropriate names, insults,
verbal assaults, profanity or ridicule that occurs at an interscholastic activity,  including by specta-
tors of the interscholastic activity;
(B) Maintains a transparent complaint process that:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1590
SB 238
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(i) Has  a reporting system to allow participants of interscholastic activities or members of the
public to make complaints about student, coach or spectator behavior;
(ii) Responds to a complaint made under sub-subparagraph (i)  of this subparagraph within 48
hours of the complaint being received; and
(iii) Strives to resolve a complaint received  under sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph
within 30 days of the complaint being received;
(C) Develops and implements a system of sanctions against schools, students, coaches and spec-
tators if a complaint made under subparagraph (B) of this paragraph is verified; and
(D) Performs an annual survey of students and their parents to understand and  respond to po-
tential violations of policies adopted under subparagraph (A) of  this paragraph or violations of ORS
659.850.
(f) Accept money or property donated for the use or  benefit of the school district and, consistent
with the laws of this state, use such money or property for the purpose for which it was donated.
(g) Enter into an approved  written agreement with the governing body of a federally recognized
Native American tribe in Oregon to allow the use of a mascot that represents, is  associated with
or is significant to  the Native American tribe entering into the agreement. An agreement entered
into under this paragraph must:
(A) Describe the acceptable uses of the mascot;
(B) Comply with rules adopted by the State Board of Education that:
(i) Are  adopted after consultation with the federally recognized tribes in Oregon pursuant to
ORS 182.164 (3); and
(ii) Prescribe the requirements for approval; and
(C) Be approved by the State Board of Education, which the board must provide if the agreement
meets the requirements of this paragraph and the rules adopted under this paragraph.
(2) All contracts of the school district must be  approved by the district school board before an
order can be drawn for payment. If a contract is made without the authority of  the district school
board, the individual making such contract shall be personally liable.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, a  district school board may, by resolution or
policy,  authorize  its superintendent or the superintendent’s designee to enter into and approve pay-
ment on contracts for products, materials, supplies, capital  outlay, equipment and services that are
within appropriations made by the district school board  pursuant to ORS 294.456. A district school
board may not authorize its  superintendent or the superintendent’s designee under this subsection
to enter into and approve  payment on contracts that are collective bargaining agreements or service
contracts that include the provision of labor performed by employees of the school district.
(4) A district school board may not:
(a) Approve a contract or other agreement that provides for members of  a law enforce-
ment agency to be assigned to the schools of the school district;
(b) Authorize its  superintendent or the superintendent’s designee to enter into a contract
or other agreement that provides for members of a law enforcement  agency to be assigned
to the schools of the school district; or
(c) Establish a law enforcement agency or employ law enforcement personnel.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 133.402 is amended to read:
133.402. (1)(a) A custodial interview inside  a law enforcement facility that is conducted by a
peace officer[ , a school resource officer ] or a special campus security  officer shall be electronically
recorded if the custodial interview is conducted with  a person under 18 years of age in connection
[2]
SB 238
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
with an investigation into a misdemeanor  or a felony, or an allegation that the person being inter-
viewed committed an act that, if  committed by an adult, would constitute a misdemeanor or a felony.
(b) A custodial interview anywhere outside of a law enforcement facility that is  conducted by
a peace officer[ , a school resource officer ] or a special campus security officer shall be electronically
recorded  if:
(A) The custodial interview is conducted with a person under  18 years of age in connection with
an investigation into a misdemeanor or a felony, or an allegation that  the person being interviewed
committed an act that, if committed by an adult, would constitute a misdemeanor or a felony; and
(B) A video camera is worn upon the officer’s person.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) A statement made before a grand jury;
(b) A statement made on the record in open court;
(c) A custodial interview conducted in another state in compliance with the laws of that state;
(d) A custodial interview  conducted by a federal law enforcement officer in compliance with the
laws of the United States;
(e) A statement that was spontaneously volunteered and did not result from a custodial  inter-
view;
(f) A statement made during custody processing in response to a routine question;
(g) A law enforcement agency that employs five or fewer peace officers;
(h) A custodial interview conducted in connection with an investigation carried  out by a youth
corrections officer or a staff member  of the Oregon State Hospital in the performance of the officer’s
or staff  member’s official duties of treatment, custody, control or supervision of individuals commit-
ted to or confined in a place of incarceration or detention;
(i) A custodial interview for  which the state demonstrates good cause for the failure to elec-
tronically record the custodial interview; or
(j) A custodial interview if the  defendant’s or youth’s age was unknown to the officer or would
not have been objectively apparent to a reasonable officer.
(3)(a) If the state offers an unrecorded statement made under  the circumstances described in
subsection (1) of this section in a criminal proceeding alleging the commission of a misdemeanor  or
a felony, or an allegation that a person being interviewed committed an act  that, if committed by
an adult, would constitute a misdemeanor or a felony, and the state  is unable to demonstrate, by a
preponderance of the evidence, that an exception described in subsection (2) of this section  applies,
upon the request of the defendant, the court shall instruct the jury regarding  the legal requirement
described in subsection (1) of this section and the superior reliability of electronic recordings  when
compared with testimony about what was said and done.
(b) The court may not exclude  the defendant’s statement or dismiss criminal charges as a result
of a violation of this section.
(c) If each of the statements made by the defendant that the state offers  into evidence is re-
corded, the court may not give a cautionary jury instruction  regarding the content of the
defendant’s statements.
(4) If the state offers an unrecorded statement made under the  circumstances described in sub-
section (1) of this section in a juvenile delinquency  proceeding alleging the commission of an act
that, if committed by an adult would constitute a misdemeanor  or a felony, and the state is unable
to demonstrate, by  a preponderance of the evidence, that an exception described in subsection (2)
of this section applies, the court shall consider the superior  reliability of electronic recordings when
[3]
SB 238
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
compared with testimony about what was  said and done when determining the evidentiary value of
the statement.
(5) A law enforcement agency that creates an electronic recording of a custodial  interview shall
preserve the recording until the  defendant’s conviction or youth’s adjudication for the offense is
final and all direct, post-conviction relief and habeas corpus appeals are exhausted, or until the
prosecution of the offense is barred by law.
(6) The state shall provide an electronic copy of a defendant’s or youth’s custodial interview to
a defendant or youth in accordance with ORS 135.805  to 135.873. Providing an electronic copy of the
custodial interview to the defendant or youth constitutes compliance with ORS 135.815  (1)(b), and
the state is not required to  provide the defendant or youth with a transcript of the contents of the
custodial interview. Unless the court orders otherwise, the defendant’s or youth’s attorney may  not
copy, disseminate or republish the electronic copy  of the custodial interview, except to provide a
copy to an agent of the defendant’s or youth’s attorney for the limited purpose of case preparation.
(7) An electronic recording of a custodial interview, and any transcription of the  recording, that
is certified as containing a complete recording, or a complete transcription, of the entirety  of the
custodial interview, from the advisement of constitutional rights to the conclusion of  the custodial
interview, is admissible in any preadjudication or post-adjudication  hearing for the purpose of es-
tablishing the contents of a statement made in the recording and the identity of the person who
made the statement, if the statement is  otherwise admissible. A certification that complies with this
subsection satisfies the requirements of  ORS 40.505 and 132.320 for the recording or transcription.
This subsection does not prohibit a party  from calling a witness to testify regarding the custodial
interview.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) “Custodial interview” means an interview in which  the person questioned is in custody and
is required to be advised of the person’s constitutional rights.
(b) “Good cause” includes, but is not limited to, situations in which:
(A) The defendant or youth refused, or  expressed an unwillingness, to have the custodial inter-
view electronically recorded;
(B) The failure to electronically record the custodial interview was the  result of equipment
failure and a replacement device was not immediately available;
(C) The person operating the recording  equipment believed, in good faith, that the equipment
was recording the custodial interview;
(D) Electronically recording the custodial interview would jeopardize the safety  of any person
or the identity of a confidential informant;
(E) Exigent circumstances prevented the recording of the custodial interview; or
(F) The person conducting the custodial interview did not possess a  wearable video camera to
electronically record the custodial interview outside of a law enforcement facility.
(c) “Law enforcement facility” means a courthouse,  building or premises that is a place of op-
eration for a municipal police department,  county sheriff’s office or other law enforcement agency
at which persons may be detained in connection with a juvenile delinquency petition  or criminal
charge.
(d) “Peace officer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 133.005.
[(e) “School resource officer” means a peace officer who is assigned to a school. ]
[(f)] (e) “Special campus security officer” means a special  campus security officer described in
ORS 352.118.
[4]
SB 238
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 3.
 ORS 238.005 is amended to read:
238.005. For purposes of this chapter:
(1) “Active  member” means a member who is presently employed by a participating public em-
ployer in a qualifying position and who has completed  the six-month period of service required by
ORS 238.015.
(2) “Annuity” means payments for life derived from  contributions made by a member as provided
in this chapter.
(3) “Board” means the Public Employees Retirement Board.
(4) “Calendar year” means 12  calendar months commencing on January 1 and ending on De-
cember 31 following.
(5) “Continuous service” means service not interrupted for more than five  years, except that
such continuous service shall be computed without regard to interruptions in the case of:
(a) An employee who had returned to the service of  the employer as of January 1, 1945, and
who remained in that employment until  having established membership in the Public Employees
Retirement System.
(b) An employee who was in  the armed services on January 1, 1945, and returned to the service
of the employer within  one year of the date of being otherwise than dishonorably discharged and
remained in that employment until having established membership in  the Public Employees Retire-
ment System.
(6) “Creditable  service” means any period of time during which an active member is being paid
a salary by a participating public employer and for  which benefits under this chapter are funded by
employer contributions and  earnings on the fund. For purposes of computing years of “creditable
service,” full months and major fractions of a month shall be considered to  be one-twelfth of a year
and shall be added to all full years. “Creditable service” includes all retirement credit  received by
a member.
(7) “Earliest service retirement  age” means the age attained by a member when the member
could first make application for retirement under the provisions of ORS 238.280.
(8) “Employee” includes, in addition to employees, public officers, but does not include:
(a) Persons engaged as independent contractors.
(b) Seasonal, emergency  or casual workers whose periods of employment with any public em-
ployer or public employers do not total 600 hours in any calendar year.
(c) Persons provided sheltered  employment or made-work by a public employer in an employment
or industries program maintained for the benefit of such persons.
(d) Persons employed and paid  from federal funds received under a federal program intended
primarily to alleviate  unemployment. However, any such person shall be considered an “employee”
if not otherwise excluded by  paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection and the public employer elects
to have the person so considered by an irrevocable written notice to the board.
(e) Persons who are employees of a railroad, as defined in  ORS 824.020, and who, as such em-
ployees, are included in a retirement plan under  federal railroad retirement statutes. This paragraph
shall be deemed to have been in effect since the inception of the system.
(f) Persons employed in positions classified as post-doctoral scholar positions  by a public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002, or by the Oregon Health and Science University, under ORS 350.370.
(9) “Final average salary” means whichever of the following is greater:
(a) The average salary per calendar year paid by one or  more participating public employers to
an employee who is an active member of the system in three of the  calendar years of membership
[5]
SB 238
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
before the effective date of retirement of the employee,  in which three years the employee was paid
the highest salary. The three calendar years in which the  employee was paid the largest total salary
may include calendar years in which the employee was employed for less than a full calendar  year.
If the number of calendar years  of active membership before the effective date of retirement of the
employee is three or fewer, the final average salary for the employee is the average salary per cal-
endar year paid by one or more participating public employers to the employee in  all of those years,
without regard to whether the employee was employed for the full calendar year.
(b) One-third of the total salary paid by a  participating public employer to an employee who is
an active member of the system in the  last 36 calendar months of active membership before the ef-
fective date of retirement of the employee.
(10) “Firefighter” does not include a volunteer firefighter, but does include:
(a) The State Fire Marshal, the chief deputy fire marshal and deputy state fire marshals;
(b) An employee of the State Forestry Department who is certified  by the State Forester as a
professional wildland firefighter and whose  primary duties include the abatement of uncontrolled
fires as described in ORS 477.064; and
(c) An employee of  the Oregon Military Department whose primary duties include fighting
structural, aircraft, wildland or other fires.
(11) “Fiscal year” means 12 calendar months commencing on July 1  and ending on June 30 fol-
lowing.
(12) “Fund” means the Public Employees Retirement Fund.
(13) “Inactive member” means a member who is not employed  in a qualifying position, whose
membership has not been terminated in the manner described by ORS  238.095 and who is not retired
for service or disability.
(14) “Institution of higher education” means a public university  listed in ORS 352.002, the
Oregon Health and Science University and a community college, as defined in ORS 341.005.
(15) “Member” means a person who  has established membership in the system and whose mem-
bership has not been terminated as described in  ORS 238.095. “Member” includes active, inactive
and retired members.
(16) “Member account” means the regular account and the variable account.
(17) “Normal retirement age” means:
(a) For a person who establishes membership  in the system before January 1, 1996, as described
in ORS 238.430, 55  years of age if the employee retires at that age as a police officer or firefighter
or 58 years of age if the employee retires at that age as other than a police officer or firefighter.
(b) For  a person who establishes membership in the system on or after January 1, 1996, as de-
scribed in ORS 238.430, 55 years of age if  the employee retires at that age as a police officer or
firefighter or 60 years of  age if the employee retires at that age as other than a police officer or
firefighter.
(18) “Pension” means  annual payments for life derived from contributions by one or more public
employers.
(19) “Police officer” includes:
(a) Employees of institutions defined in  ORS 421.005 as Department of Corrections institutions
whose duties, as assigned by the Director of the Department  of Corrections, include the custody of
persons committed to the  custody of or transferred to the Department of Corrections and employees
of the Department of Corrections who were classified as police officers on or before July  27, 1989,
whether or not such classification was authorized by law.
[6]
SB 238
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Employees of the Department of  State Police who are classified as police officers by the
Superintendent of State Police.
(c) Employees of the Oregon Liquor Control Commission who are classified as regulatory  spe-
cialists by the administrator of the commission.
(d) Sheriffs and those deputy sheriffs or other employees of a  sheriff whose duties, as classified
by the sheriff, are the regular duties of police officers or corrections officers.
(e) Police chiefs  and police personnel of a city who are classified as police officers by the
council or other governing body of the city.
(f) Police officers who are commissioned by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125 and who
are classified as police officers by the university.
(g) Parole and probation officers employed by the  Department of Corrections, parole and pro-
bation officers who are transferred to county employment under ORS 423.549 and adult  parole and
probation officers, as defined in ORS  181A.355, who are classified as police officers for the purposes
of this chapter by the county governing body. If a county classifies adult  parole and probation offi-
cers as police  officers for the purposes of this chapter, and the employees so classified are repres-
ented by a labor organization, any proposal by the county to change  that classification or to cease
to classify adult parole  and probation officers as police officers for the purposes of this chapter is
a mandatory subject of bargaining.
(h) Police officers appointed under ORS 276.021 or 276.023.
(i) Employees of the  Port of Portland who are classified as airport police by the Board of Com-
missioners of the Port of Portland.
(j) Employees of the State Department of Agriculture who are classified as  livestock police of-
ficers by the Director of Agriculture.
(k) Employees of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training who are classified  by
the department as other than secretarial or clerical personnel.
(L) Investigators of the Criminal Justice Division of the Department of Justice.
(m) Corrections officers as defined in ORS 181A.355.
(n) Employees of the Oregon State Lottery Commission who are classified by the  Director of the
Oregon State Lottery as enforcement agents pursuant to ORS 461.110.
(o) The Director of the Department of Corrections.
(p) An employee who for seven  consecutive years has been classified as a police officer as de-
fined by this section, and who is employed or transferred by  the Department of Corrections to fill
a position designated by the Director of the Department of Corrections as being eligible  for police
officer status.
(q) An employee  of the Department of Corrections classified as a police officer on or prior to
July 27, 1989, whether or not that classification was authorized by law, as long as the  employee
remains in the position held on July 27, 1989. The initial classification of an  employee under a sys-
tem implemented pursuant to ORS 240.190 does not affect police officer status.
[(r) Employees of a school district who are  appointed and duly sworn members of a law enforce-
ment agency of the district  as provided in ORS 332.531 or otherwise employed full-time as police offi-
cers commissioned by the district. ]
[(s)] (r) Employees at youth correction facilities and  juvenile detention facilities under ORS
419A.050, 419A.052 and 420.005  to 420.915 who are required to hold valid Oregon teaching licenses
and who have supervisory, control  or teaching responsibilities over juveniles committed to the cus-
tody of the Department of Corrections or the Oregon Youth Authority.
[7]
SB 238
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(t)] (s) Employees at youth correction facilities as defined in ORS 420.005 whose  primary job
description involves the custody, control, treatment, investigation or supervision  of juveniles placed
in such facilities.
[(u)] (t) Employees of the Oregon Youth Authority  who are classified as juvenile parole and
probation officers.
[(v)] (u) Employees of the Department of Human Services who are prohibited from striking under
ORS 243.726 and whose duties include  the care of residents of residential facilities, as defined in
ORS 443.400, that house individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities.
(20) “Prior service credit” means credit provided under ORS  238.442 or under ORS 238.225 (2)
to (6) (1999 Edition).
(21) “Public employer” means the state, one of its agencies, any city, county,  or municipal or
public corporation, any political subdivision of the state or any instrumentality thereof, or an agency
created by one or more such governmental organizations to provide governmental services. For
purposes of this chapter, such agency created by one or more governmental  organizations is a gov-
ernmental instrumentality and a legal entity with power to enter  into contracts, hold property and
sue and be sued.
(22) “Qualifying position”  means one or more jobs with one or more participating public em-
ployers in which  an employee performs 600 or more hours of service in a calendar year, excluding
any service in a job for which a participating  public employer does not provide benefits under this
chapter pursuant to an application made under ORS 238.035.
(23) “Regular account” means the account established  for each active and inactive member un-
der ORS 238.250.
(24) “Retired member” means a member who is retired for service or disability.
(25) “Retirement credit” means a period of time that is  treated as creditable service for the
purposes of this chapter.
(26)(a) “Salary”  means the remuneration paid an employee in cash out of the funds of a public
employer  in  return for services to the employer, plus the monetary value, as determined by the
Public Employees Retirement Board,  of whatever living quarters, board, lodging, fuel, laundry and
other advantages the employer furnishes the employee in return for services.
(b) “Salary” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Payments of employee and employer money into a deferred compensation  plan, which are
deemed salary paid in each month of deferral;
(B) The  amount of participation in a tax-sheltered or deferred annuity, which is deemed salary
paid in each month of participation;
(C) Retroactive payments described in ORS 238.008; and
(D) Wages of a deceased  member paid to a surviving spouse or dependent children under ORS
652.190.
(c) “Salary” or “other advantages” does not include:
(A) Travel or  any other expenses incidental to employer’s business which is reimbursed by the
employer;
(B) Payments  for insurance coverage by an employer on behalf of employee or employee and
dependents, for which the employee has no cash option;
(C) Payments made on account of an employee’s death;
(D) Any lump sum payment for accumulated unused sick leave;
(E) Any accelerated payment of an employment contract for a future period or an advance
[8]
SB 238
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
against future wages;
(F) Any retirement incentive, retirement severance pay, retirement bonus or retirement
gratuitous payment;
(G) Payments for  periods of leave of absence after the date the employer and employee have
agreed that no future services qualifying pursuant to ORS  238.015 (3) will be performed, except for
sick leave and vacation;
(H) Payments for instructional services rendered to public universities listed in  ORS 352.002 or
the Oregon  Health and Science University when such services are in excess of full-time employment
subject to this chapter. A person employed under a contract  for less than 12 months is subject to
this subparagraph only for the months to which the contract pertains;
(I) Payments made by an employer for insurance coverage provided to a domestic partner  of an
employee;
(J) Compensation described and authorized  under ORS 341.556 that is not paid by the community
college employing the faculty member;
(K) Compensation described and authorized under ORS 352.232 that is not  paid by the public
university employing the officer or employee;
(L) Compensation described and authorized under ORS 353.270 that is not paid by Oregon Health
and Science University; or
(M) For years beginning on or after  January 1, 2020, any amount in excess of $195,000 for a
calendar  year.  If any period over which salary is determined is less than 12 months, the $195,000
limitation for that period shall be multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number
of months  in the determination period and the denominator of which is 12. On January 1 of each
year, the  board shall adjust the dollar limit provided by this subparagraph to reflect any percentage
changes in the Consumer Price Index for  All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as pub-
lished by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(27) “School year” means the period beginning July 1 and ending June 30 next following.
(28) “System” means the Public Employees Retirement System.
(29) “Variable account”  means the account established for a member who participates in the
Variable Annuity Account under ORS 238.260.
(30) “Vested” means being an active member of the system in each of five calendar years.
(31) “Volunteer firefighter” means a firefighter whose position normally  requires less than 600
hours of service per year.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 339.250 is amended to read:
339.250. (1)  Public school students shall comply with rules for the government of such schools,
pursue the prescribed course of study, use the prescribed textbooks and submit to the teachers’  au-
thority.
(2) Each district school board shall adopt written policies for the  discipline, suspension or ex-
pulsion of any refractory student. The policies:
(a) May allow discipline, suspension or expulsion for conduct that includes, but is  not limited
to:
(A) Willful disobedience;
(B) Open defiance of the authority of a school employee;
(C) Possession or distribution of tobacco, alcohol, drugs or other controlled substances;
(D) Use or display of profane or obscene language;
(E) Willful damage or injury to school property;
[9]
SB 238
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(F) Use of threats, intimidation,  harassment or coercion against a student or a school employee;
(G) Assault of a school employee or another student; or
(H) Intentional attempts,  by word or conduct, to place a school employee or another student in
fear of imminent serious physical injury.
(b) Must require consideration of the age of a student and the past pattern of behavior of  a
student prior to imposing the suspension or expulsion of a student.
(c) Must limit the use of expulsion to the following circumstances:
(A) For conduct that poses a threat to the health or safety of students or school employees;
(B) When other strategies to change student conduct have been ineffective,  except that expul-
sion may not be used to address truancy; or
(C) When the expulsion is required by law.
(d) In addition to any limitations imposed by paragraph  (c) of this subsection, for a student who
is in fifth grade or lower, must limit the use of out-of-school suspension or  of expulsion to the fol-
lowing circumstances:
(A) For nonaccidental conduct causing serious physical harm to a student or school employee;
(B) When a school administrator determines, based  upon the administrator’s observation or upon
a report from a school  employee, that the student’s conduct poses a direct threat to the health or
safety of students or school employees; or
(C) When the suspension or expulsion is required by law.
(e) When an out-of-school suspension is imposed as provided under paragraph (d)  of this sub-
section, must require the school district to take steps to prevent  the recurrence of the behavior that
led to the out-of-school suspension and return the student to a classroom setting so  that the dis-
ruption of the student’s academic instruction is minimized.
(f) Must be limited so that:
(A) The duration of an expulsion may not be more than one calendar year.
(B) The duration of a suspension may not be more than 10 school days.
(g) Must limit  the situations for which a law enforcement agency is contacted to inci-
dents that  place a school employee or another student in fear of imminent serious physical
injury or to incidents that may constitute a crime.
[(g)] (h) Notwithstanding ORS 336.010, may require  a student to attend school during nonschool
hours as an alternative to suspension if the  total number of hours does not exceed the equivalent
of 10 school days.
(3) Pursuant  to the policies adopted as provided by subsection (2) of this section, each school
district shall develop a student handbook, code of conduct or other document that:
(a) Defines and helps create a learning environment that students respect;
(b) Defines acceptable  norms of behavior for students and the types of behavior that are subject
to discipline;
(c) Establishes procedures  to address behavior or circumstances that pose a threat to the safety
of students or employees of the school;
(d) Establishes  a system of consequences that are designed to correct student misconduct and
promote behavior within acceptable norms; and
(e) Makes  the system of consequences known to the school community through the dissemination
of information to students, parents, legal guardians and school district employees.
(4) Each district school board shall adopt written policies  on managing students who threaten
violence  or  harm in public schools. The policies adopted by a district school board under this section
[10]
SB 238
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
shall include all of the following:
(a) Staff reporting methods.
(b) Provisions that allow an administrator to consider  and implement any of the following
options:
(A) Immediately removing from  the classroom setting any student who has threatened to injure
another person or to severely damage school property.
(B) Placing the student in a setting where the  behavior will receive immediate attention, in-
cluding, but not limited to, the office of the school  principal, vice principal, assistant principal,
counselor or a school psychologist licensed by the Teacher Standards and  Practices Commission or
the office of any licensed mental health professional.
(C) Requiring that  a school obtain an evaluation of a student by a licensed mental health pro-
fessional before allowing the student to  return to the classroom setting. A student who is removed
from the classroom setting for  an evaluation may not be removed for more than 10 school days un-
less the administrator is able to show good  cause that an evaluation could not be completed in that
time period. The policy must describe the circumstances under which the district school board may
enter into contracts with licensed mental health professionals to perform  any evaluations required
under this subparagraph.
(c) The requirement that an administrator provide to the parent or legal  guardian of the student
notification that describes the student’s behavior and the school’s response.
(d) A provision for the allocation of any funds necessary for the school  district to implement the
policies described in this subsection.
(5) In establishing  and enforcing discipline, suspension and expulsion policies, a district school
board shall ensure that the policy is designed to:
(a) Protect students and school employees from harm;
(b) Provide opportunities for students to learn from their mistakes;
(c) Foster positive learning communities;
(d) Keep students in school and attending class;
(e) Impose disciplinary sanctions without bias  against students from a protected class, as defined
in ORS 339.351;
(f) Implement a graduated  set of age-appropriate responses to misconduct that are fair,
nondiscriminatory and proportionate in relation to each student’s individual conduct;
(g) Employ a range of strategies  for prevention, intervention and discipline that take into ac-
count a student’s developmental  capacities and that are proportionate to the degree and severity
of the student’s misbehavior;
(h) Propose, prior to  a student’s expulsion or leaving school, alternative programs of instruction
or instruction combined with counseling for the student that are appropriate and accessible to  the
student in the following circumstances:
(A) Following a second or subsequent occurrence within any three-year period of a severe  dis-
ciplinary problem with the student; or
(B) When a parent or legal guardian applies for the student’s exemption from compulsory  at-
tendance on a semiannual basis as provided in ORS 339.030 (2);
(i) To the extent practicable, use  approaches that are shown through research to be effective in
reducing student misbehavior and promoting safe and productive social behavior; and
(j) Ensure that school conduct and discipline codes  comply with all state and federal laws con-
cerning the education of students with disabilities.
[11]
SB 238
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(6) Except for policies  adopted under subsection (7) of this section, any policies adopted under
this section must provide for the dissemination  of information about alternative programs of in-
struction  or  instruction combined with counseling, as described in subsection (5)(h) of this section,
in writing to the student and the parent, legal guardian or person in parental relationship with the
student at least once  every six months, unless the information has changed because of the avail-
ability of new programs.
(7) Each district school board shall adopt  a written policy involving firearms, as defined in 18
U.S.C. 921. The policy shall:
(a) Require expulsion from  school for a period of not less than one year of any student who is
determined to have:
(A) Brought a firearm  to a school, to school property under the jurisdiction of the school district
or to an activity under the jurisdiction of the school district;
(B) Possessed, concealed or used a firearm in a school, on  school property under the jurisdiction
of the school district or at an activity under the jurisdiction of the school district; or
(C) Brought  to or possessed, concealed or used a firearm at an interscholastic activity adminis-
tered by a voluntary organization.
(b) Allow exceptions:
(A) For courses, programs and activities approved  by the school district that are conducted on
school property, including, but not  limited to, hunter safety courses, Reserve Officer Training Corps
programs, firearm-related sports or firearm-related vocational courses; and
(B) Identified by and adopted by the State Board of Education by rule.
(c) Allow a superintendent of a school district to:
(A) Modify the expulsion requirement for a student on a case-by-case basis.
(B) Propose  alternative programs of instruction or instruction combined with counseling for a
student that are  appropriate and accessible to the student. If alternative programs are appropriate
for a student,  the superintendent shall ensure that information about programs of instruction or in-
struction combined with counseling is provided  in writing to the student and the parent, legal
guardian or person in parental  relationship with the student at least once every six months, or at
any time the information changes because of the availability of new programs.
(d) Require  a referral to the appropriate law enforcement agency of any student who is expelled
under this subsection.
(e) Require an annual reporting to the Department of Education of the name of  each school that
had an expulsion under this subsection and the number of students expelled from each school.
(8) Each district school board shall adopt and disseminate written policies for the use of physical
force upon a student. The policies must allow an individual who  is a teacher, administrator, school
employee or school volunteer to use reasonable physical force upon a student when and to  the ex-
tent the application of force is consistent with ORS 339.285 to 339.303.
(9)(a) The authority to discipline a student  does not authorize the infliction of corporal punish-
ment. Every resolution, bylaw, rule, ordinance or other act of a district school board, a public
charter school or the Department of Education that permits or authorizes the  infliction of corporal
punishment upon a student is void and unenforceable.
(b) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Corporal punishment”  means the willful infliction of, or willfully causing the infliction of,
physical pain on a student.
(B) “Corporal punishment” does not include:
[12]
SB 238
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
(i) The use of physical force authorized by ORS 161.205 for the reasons specified therein; or
(ii) Physical pain or  discomfort resulting from or caused by participation in athletic competition
or other such recreational activity, voluntarily engaged in by a student.
(10) For purposes of this section,  calculations of the number of school days that a student is
removed from a classroom setting shall be as follows:
(a) As a half day  if the student is out of school for half, or less than half, of the scheduled school
day; and
(b) As a full day if the student is out of school for more than half of the scheduled school day.
SECTION 5.
Any school district that, on the effective date of this 2021 Act, has  a law
enforcement agency or employs law enforcement personnel, as authorized by  ORS 332.531,
must dissolve the law enforcement agency and cease to  employ law enforcement agency
personnel.
SECTION 6. (1) Any school district that, on the  effective date of this 2021 Act, had a law
enforcement agency,  employed law enforcement personnel or otherwise had a contract or
other agreement  with a law enforcement agency to assign members of a law enforcement
agency to the schools of the school  district must redistribute moneys that had been budgeted
for those purposes to community outreach and  to meeting students’ mental and behavioral
health needs.
(2) This section is repealed on June 30, 2023.
SECTION 7.
ORS 332.531 is repealed.
[13]