Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education, in cooperation with the Oregon  Health
Authority, shall conduct a study to  determine and recommend appropriate health standards
to govern student use of computers, mobile digital devices and other  electronic media in the
classroom. The study, at  a minimum, must involve a review of relevant medical and other
literature that examines  the effects on children of excessive use of computers, mobile digital
devices and other electronic media.
(2) The department shall adopt by rule appropriate guidelines for:
(a) Limiting student use of computers, mobile  digital devices and other electronic media
in the classroom  in accordance with health and safety guidelines the department develops
following the study described in subsection (1) of this section.  In adopting the rules, the de-
partment shall consider guidelines and recommendations from reputable medical sources,
such as the American Academy of Pediatrics, and  shall take into account a child’s overall
use of computers, mobile digital devices and other electronic media  throughout the day and
not only in the classroom.
(b) Allowing a parent to give or  deny consent for the parent’s child to participate in
curricula that involve extensive work with computers, mobile digital  devices or electronic
media and offering the parent alternative curricula that involve less exposure  to computers,
mobile digital devices or electronic media.
(c) Encouraging more physical activity during the school day outside the classroom.
(3) The department shall develop materials to inform parents  of the hazards of excessive
use of computers, mobile digital devices and electronic media  and shall make the materials
available to schools, school employees and parents of students in public and private  schools
in this state.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1413
SB 282
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
(4) The department shall collect, store and use, and specify guidelines for schools to col-
lect, store and use, only the minimal amount of  data about students that is necessary to
implement educational programs.
SECTION 2. (1) Section 1 of this 2019 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2020.
(2) The Department of Education  may adopt rules and take any other action before the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section  that is necessary to enable the de-
partment, on  and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, to ex-
ercise all of the duties, functions and  powers conferred on the department by section 1 of
this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]