Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Human  Services shall study necessary improvements to
the regulation of community-based care, including  but not limited to residential care facili-
ties and adult foster homes. The department  shall report on the results of the study to an
appropriate committee or interim committee of  the Legislative Assembly no later than Sep-
tember 1, 2018.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2017 Act is repealed on January 2, 2019.
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1918