Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A small forestland owner, as defined in ORS 477.748, that planted  one or
more trees on or before the effective date of this 2025 Act to comply with reforestation re-
quirements under ORS 527.610 to 527.770 may, notwithstanding any contrary  provision of
reforestation requirements for the forestland, harvest the trees.
(2) The reforestation requirements under ORS 527.610 to 527.770  apply to the forestland
after the trees have been harvested under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The State Board of Forestry may adopt rules necessary to implement the provisions
of this section.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3942