Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2023 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 456.548
to 456.725.
SECTION 2. (1) The emergency veterans housing program is established within the
Housing and Community Services Department.
(2) Under the program, the department,  in coordination with the Department of
Veterans’ Affairs and the advisory board described in section 3 of this 2023 Act,  shall award
grants to a qualified housing sponsor to pay for the project costs of developing  and operating
a residential housing development  for persons of lower income who are service-disabled vet-
erans, as defined in ORS 200.005, and their families.
(3) Grants awarded under this section:
(a) May be used to develop housing  only within a city with a population of at least 5,000
and not more than 55,000.
(b) Must be in amounts of at least $2,000,000 and not more than $10,000,000.
(c) Must be approved by the advisory board.
SECTION 3.
(1) In  developing the grant application for the emergency veterans housing
program described in  section 2 of this 2023 Act and in scoring and awarding grants, the
Housing and Community Services Department shall consult with an advisory board.
(2) The advisory board consists of five individuals, appointed as follows:
(a) The Director of Veterans’ Affairs shall appoint:
(A) One person to represent the Department of Veterans’ Affairs; and
(B) One person to represent the disabled veterans community.
(b) The Director of the Housing and Community Services Department shall appoint:
(A) One member to represent the Housing and Community Services Department;
(B) One member to represent the housing construction industry; and
(C) One person to represent the housing rental industry.
(3) The Housing and Community Services Department shall staff the meetings of the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4037
HB 3209
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
advisory board. The advisory board shall meet at times established by the department.
(4) Members of the advisory board are not entitled to compensation for  service as a
member.
(5) If there is  a vacancy on the advisory board for any cause, the appointing authority
shall appoint a replacement.
(6) A majority of the members of the advisory board constitutes a quorum.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Housing and  Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $75,000,000, for the purposes of carrying out
sections 2 and 3 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2023 Act are repealed on January 2, 2028.
[2]