Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) Incentives offered by the  health care provider incentive program created
in ORS 676.454 include the Doctor Alan  Bates Legacy Scholarship program, which shall pro-
vide scholarships to students at institutions of higher education  based in this state who are
enrolled in health professional training programs  leading to a doctor of osteopathic medicine
or doctor of dentistry or a license as a nurse practitioner,  physician assistant or certified
registered nurse anesthetist.
(2) The funds  allocated to the Doctor Alan Bates Legacy Scholarship program shall be
distributed equitably among schools offering the training programs,  based on the percentage
of Oregon students attending those schools.
(3) The maximum scholarship for each student may not  exceed the highest resident tui-
tion rate at the publicly funded health professional training programs in this state.
SECTION 2. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds that the Doctor Alan Bates Legacy
Scholarship program will further the economic  development of rural and medically under-
served areas of this state.
(2) There is allocated for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, from  the Administrative
Services Economic Development Fund, to the Health Care Provider  Incentive Fund estab-
lished in ORS 676.450, the amount of $1.5 million for the Doctor  Alan Bates Legacy Scholar-
ship program.
SECTION 3.  ORS 676.454 is amended to read:
676.454. (1) There is created in the Oregon Health Authority a health care provider  incentive
program for the purpose of assisting qualified health care providers who commit to serving  medical
assistance and Medicare enrollees in rural or medically underserved  areas of this state. The au-
thority shall prescribe by rule:
(a) Participant eligibility criteria, including the  types of qualified health care providers who may
participate in the program;
(b) The terms and conditions of participation  in the program, including the duration of the term
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 12
HB 4072
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of any service agreement, which must be at least 12 months;
(c) The types of incentives that may be provided, including but not limited to:
(A) Loan repayment subsidies;
(B) Stipends;
(C) Medical malpractice insurance premium subsidies;
(D) Scholarships for  students in health professional training programs ; and [at the Oregon Health
and Science University; ]
[(E) Scholarships for students at institutions of higher education based in this state who are en-
rolled in health professional  training programs leading to a doctor of osteopathic medicine or doctor
of dentistry or a license as a  nurse practitioner, physician assistant or certified registered nurse
anesthetist, if:]
[(i) The  scholarship funds are distributed equitably among schools offering the training programs,
based on the percentage of Oregon students attending those schools; and ]
[(ii) The maximum scholarship for each student does not exceed the highest  resident tuition rate
at the publicly funded health professional training programs in this state; and ]
[(F)] (E)  Paying the  moving expenses of providers not located in rural or medically underserved
areas who commit to relocate to such areas;
(d) If the funds allocated  to the program from the Health Care Provider Incentive Fund estab-
lished under ORS 676.450 are insufficient to provide assistance to all of  the applicants who are eli-
gible to participate in the program, the priority for the distribution of funds; and
(e) The financial penalties imposed on an individual who fails to comply with terms and  condi-
tions of participation.
(2) Eligibility requirements adopted for the program:
(a) Must allow providers to qualify for multiple health care provider incentives, to the  extent
permitted by federal law.
(b) Must allow providers to qualify for an incentive for multiyear periods.
(c) Must give preference to applicants willing to:
(A) Commit to extended periods of service in rural or medically underserved areas; or
(B) Serve patients enrolled in Medicare and the state medical assistance program in at  least the
same proportion to the provider’s total number of patients as the Medicare  and medical assistance
patient populations represent in relation to the total  number of persons determined by the Office
of Rural Health to be in need of health care in the area served by the practice.
(3) The authority may use funds allocated to the program from the Health Care Provider In-
centive Fund to administer or provide funding to a locum tenens program for health care providers
practicing in rural areas of this state.
(4) The authority may enter into contracts with one or  more public or private entities to ad-
minister the health care provider incentive program or parts of the program.
(5) The authority shall decide no later than September 1 of  each academic year the distribution
of funds for scholarships that will be provided in the next academic year.
(6) The authority may  receive gifts, grants or contributions from any source, whether public or
private, to carry out the provisions of  this section. Moneys received under this subsection shall be
deposited in the Health Care Provider Incentive Fund established under ORS 676.450.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 676.463 is amended to read:
676.463. (1) As used  in this section, “financial incentive programs” includes but is not limited
to the:
[2]
HB 4072
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Rural health care provider tax credit available under ORS 315.613;
(b) Scholars for a Healthy Oregon Initiative created by ORS 348.303; and
(c) Incentives [ provided] offered by the health care provider incentive program  created by ORS
676.454.
(2) In order to evaluate the effectiveness  of state financial incentive programs in recruiting
health care providers to practice in  rural and medically underserved areas and retaining health care
providers in rural  and medically underserved areas, the Oregon Health Policy Board shall collect
information about financial incentive program participants, which may include:
(a) The month and year of entry into the program;
(b) The locations of service and duration of service in each location;
(c) The main services provided, discipline, specialty and hours of direct patient care;
(d) The percentage of services provided through telemedicine; and
(e) Other demographic information that the board and the Office of Rural Health  determine to
be useful in the evaluation.
(3) To collect the data described in subsection (2) of this section, the board  shall use unique
provider identifiers and link the identifiers to the provider data reported under ORS 442.466.
(4) The board shall compile and analyze  the data collected under this section and report its
findings and analysis to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to health every
two years.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 676.467 is amended to read:
676.467. (1) On the basis of the assessment and the evaluation conducted under ORS 676.459  and
676.463, the Oregon Health Policy Board shall determine the  best allocation of moneys in the Health
Care Provider Incentive Fund established under ORS 676.450 toward providing:
(a) Incentives [ through] offered by  the health  care provider incentive program created by ORS
676.454.
(b) Loans or grants to support communities’ plans for addressing the unmet health care
workforce needs in each community, including but not limited to:
(A) Funding start-up costs for new health care professional training programs that:
(i) Are designed to expand the racial and ethnic diversity of Oregon’s health care workforce;
(ii) Are designed to expand the health care workforce in medically underserved areas;
(iii) Provide financial incentives to faculty members in health care professional  training pro-
grams and clinical preceptors;
(iv) Ensure that individuals enrolled in the programs are adequately compensated; and
(v) Include technical assistance; and
(B) Supplementing Medicare funding paid to hospitals for graduate medical education.
(2) With respect to the loans and grants provided under subsection (1)(b) of  this section, the
board shall:
(a) Prescribe the process and procedures for communities to apply  for loans or grants and for
the board to award loans and grants.
(b) Establish criteria to ensure that the moneys support community plans that:
(A) Include a substantial financial investment by the  community, as determined by the board,
and may include financial or in-kind support;
(B) Are designed to improve the access  to health care by medical assistance recipients and
Medicare  enrollees  to the same extent that each plan improves access to health care by the general
population of the community; and
[3]
HB 4072
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
(C) Are sustainable over the long term.
(c) Conduct  outreach to communities to solicit ideas and applications for new training programs
and other incentive programs.
(d) Collaborate with community colleges and public universities in this state.
(3) The board shall enter into an agreement with the  Oregon Health and Science University to
administer this section under the board’s direction.
[4]