Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The  Task Force on Secure Pipelines and Associated Storage Units and
Terminals is established, consisting of  17 members. One of the members must be the State
Resilience Officer  or the State Resilience Officer’s designee. One of the members must be
the State Fire Marshal or the State Fire Marshal’s designee. The remaining members  must
be appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint one nonvoting member from  among mem-
bers of the Senate.
(b) The  Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one nonvoting member
from among members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint:
(A) One member from the Department of Environmental Quality;
(B) One member from the Department of Transportation;
(C) One member from the Oregon Department of Emergency Management;
(D) One member from the Oregon Military Department;
(E) One member from the Public Utility Commission;
(F) One member from the State Department of Agriculture;
(G) One member from the State Department of Energy;
(H) One member who represents counties or federally recognized  Indian tribes and who
is knowledgeable about emergency management;
(I) One  member who represents cities and who is knowledgeable about emergency man-
agement;
(J) Two members who represent petroleum suppliers  and who are knowledgeable about
laws and regulations regarding pipeline infrastructure and safety administered by the  federal
Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1635
HB 2914
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(K) Two members who represent the natural gas industry and  who are knowledgeable
about laws and regulations  regarding pipeline infrastructure and safety administered by the
federal Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration.
(2) The task force shall study and make a report on:
(a) State and federal safety standards for pipelines, associated  storage units and termi-
nals and other associated facilities;
(b) Technologies  and processes that provide for the safe transportation of petroleum,
natural gas and other flammable substances through pipelines;
(c) Technologies and processes that provide for the safekeeping  of petroleum, natural gas
and other flammable substances in storage units and terminals associated with pipelines;
(d) The degree  to which technologies and processes studied under paragraphs (b) and (c)
of this subsection will mitigate potential  dangers posed by seismic activity and other natural
catastrophes to pipelines,  associated storage units and terminals and other associated facil-
ities;
(e) The costs associated with using technologies and processes studied under  paragraphs
(b) and (c) of this subsection when constructing new pipelines, associated storage  units and
terminals and other associated facilities;
(f) The costs that would be incurred by using those technologies  and processes studied
under paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection to retrofit existing  pipelines, associated
storage units and terminals and other associated facilities;
(g) Mandates that may be  imposed to require using technologies and processes studied
under paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection to construct or retrofit  intrastate pipelines,
associated storage units and terminals and other associated facilities;
(h) Incentives that may be used to encourage using technologies  and processes studied
under paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection to construct or retrofit  interstate and
intrastate pipelines, associated storage units and terminals and other associated facilities;
(i) Recommendations related  to conducting seismic vulnerability assessments of pipe-
lines, associated storage units and terminals and other associated facilities;
(j) Recommendations related to developing and implementing mitigation plans  in the
event that seismic activity or another natural catastrophe damages a  pipeline, associated
storage unit or terminal or other associated facility;
(k) Recommendations related to designating  an oversight authority in the event that
seismic activity or another natural catastrophe  damages a pipeline, associated storage unit
or terminal or other associated facility; and
(L) Recommendations related to creating a culture of preparedness with respect to  the
occurrence of a pipeline, associated  storage unit or terminal or other associated facility be-
ing damaged as a result of seismic activity or another natural catastrophe.
(3) A  majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(4) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority  of the voting
members of the task force.
(5) The task force shall elect one of its voting members to serve as chairperson.
(6) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(7) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
[2]
HB 2914
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(8) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(9) The task force shall  submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may
include recommendations for legislation,  to an interim committee of the Legislative Assem-
bly related to emergency preparedness no later than December 15, 2026.
(10) The Oregon Military Department shall provide staff support to the task force.
(11) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(12) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of its duties and, to the extent permitted  by laws relating
to confidentiality, to furnish such information and advice as the members of the task force
consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]