Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 163.125 is amended to read:
163.125. (1) Criminal homicide constitutes manslaughter in the second degree when:
(a) It is committed recklessly;
(b) A person intentionally causes or aids another person to commit suicide; [ or]
(c) A person, with criminal negligence, causes the death of a child under 14 years  of age or a
dependent person, as defined in ORS 163.205, and:
(A) The person has previously engaged in a pattern or practice of assault or torture of the vic-
tim or another child under 14 years of age or a dependent person; or
(B) The person causes the death by neglect or maltreatment, as defined in ORS 163.115[ .]; or
(d) A person knowingly delivers a controlled substance in Schedule  I or Schedule II to
another person on two or more occasions, and the delivery results in the death of the other
person from the use of the controlled substance.
(2) Manslaughter in the second degree is a Class B felony.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 125