Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 215.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Accessory dwelling unit” has the meaning given that term in ORS 215.501.
(b) “Area zoned for rural residential use” has the meaning  given that term in ORS
215.501.
(c) “Single-family dwelling” has the meaning given that term in ORS 215.501.
(d) “Vacation occupancy” has the meaning given that term in ORS 90.100.
(2) Consistent with its comprehensive plan, a county may allow  an owner of a lot or
parcel within an area zoned for rural  residential use to construct one accessory dwelling unit
on the lot or parcel, provided:
(a) The lot or parcel is not located within an area designated as an urban reserve  as de-
fined in ORS 195.137;
(b) The lot or parcel is at least two acres in size;
(c) One single-family dwelling is sited on the lot or parcel;
(d) The existing single-family dwelling or the lot or parcel is  not subject to an order de-
claring it a nuisance or subject to any pending action under ORS 105.550 to 105.600;
(e) The accessory dwelling unit will comply with  all applicable laws and regulations re-
lating to sanitation and wastewater disposal and treatment;
(f) The accessory dwelling unit will not include more than 900  square feet of useable floor
area;
(g) The accessory dwelling unit will be located no farther than 100  feet from the existing
single-family dwelling;
(h) If the water supply source for the accessory dwelling unit or associated lands  or
gardens will be a well using water under ORS 537.545 (1)(b) or (d), no portion of the lot or
parcel is within an area in which new or existing ground water uses under ORS 537.545 (1)(b)
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3097
SB 695
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or (d) have been restricted by the Water Resources Commission;
(i) No portion of the lot or parcel is within a designated area of critical state concern;
(j) The lot or parcel  is within a rural fire protection district organized under ORS chapter
478;
(k) The lot  or parcel and accessory dwelling unit comply with rules of the State Board
of Forestry under ORS 477.015 to 477.061; and
(L) The accessory dwelling unit complies with the Oregon residential specialty code  re-
lating to wildfire hazard mitigation.
(3)(a) A county may not permit both the  existing single-family dwelling and the accessory
dwelling unit allowed under this section to be used simultaneously for vacation occupancy:
(A) During more than one week per year; and
(B) Unless the county has been notified in advance.
(b) If a county allows the use of an accessory dwelling unit for vacation occupancy, the
county may impose conditions including:
(A) Requiring the owner to  use the existing single-family dwelling as a primary residence.
(B) Requiring neighbor notification.
(C) Requiring a local point of contact for vacation occupants and neighbors.
(D) Registration with the county.
(4) A  county that allows construction of an accessory dwelling unit under this section
may not approve:
(a) A subdivision, partition or other  division of the lot or parcel so that the existing
single-family dwelling is situated on a different lot or parcel than the accessory dwelling unit.
(b) Construction of an additional accessory dwelling unit on the same lot or parcel.
(5) A county may require that an accessory dwelling unit constructed under this section
be served by the same water supply source or water supply  system as the existing single-
family dwelling. If the accessory  dwelling unit is served by a well, the construction of the
accessory dwelling unit shall maintain all  setbacks from the well required by the Water Re-
sources Commission or Water Resources Department.
(6) An existing single-family  dwelling and an accessory dwelling unit allowed under this
section are considered a single unit for  the purposes of calculating exemptions under ORS
537.545 (1).
(7) Nothing in this section requires a county to allow any accessory dwelling units in
areas zoned for rural residential use or prohibits a county  from imposing any additional re-
strictions on accessory dwelling units in areas zoned for rural residential use, including  re-
strictions on the construction of  garages and outbuildings that support an accessory dwelling
unit.
SECTION 3.
Section 4 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 455.
SECTION 4. (1) The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall develop and
maintain statewide maps identifying categories of wildfire risk.
(2) In  developing and maintaining the maps required under this section, the department
shall engage the Oregon State  University College of Forestry. Engagement under this sub-
section is not subject to ORS 291.047.
(3) The department shall update the  state building code to require appropriate fire pro-
tection standards for accessory dwelling units  based on the fire risk identified by the maps
developed and maintained under this section.
[2]
SB 695
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 5.
 Section 2 of this 2021 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Accessory dwelling unit” has the meaning given that term in ORS 215.501.
(b) “Area zoned for rural residential use” has the meaning given that term in ORS 215.501.
(c) “Single-family dwelling” has the meaning given that term in ORS 215.501.
(d) “Vacation occupancy” has the meaning given that term in ORS 90.100.
(2) Consistent with its comprehensive plan,  a county may allow an owner of a lot or parcel
within an area zoned for rural residential use to construct  one accessory dwelling unit on the lot
or parcel, provided:
(a) The lot or parcel is not located within an area designated  as an urban reserve as defined in
ORS 195.137;
(b) The lot or parcel is at least two acres in size;
(c) One single-family dwelling is sited on the lot or parcel;
(d) The existing  single-family dwelling or the lot or parcel is not subject to an order declaring
it a nuisance or subject to any pending action under ORS 105.550 to 105.600;
(e) The accessory dwelling unit will comply with all applicable laws and regulations relating  to
sanitation and wastewater disposal and treatment;
(f) The accessory dwelling unit will not  include more than 900 square feet of useable floor area;
(g) The  accessory dwelling unit will be located no farther than 100 feet from the existing
single-family dwelling;
(h) If the water supply source for  the accessory dwelling unit or associated lands or gardens
will be a well using water under ORS  537.545 (1)(b) or (d), no portion of the lot or parcel is within
an area in which new or existing ground water uses under ORS 537.545 (1)(b) or (d) have been  re-
stricted by the Water Resources Commission;
(i) No portion of the lot or parcel is within a designated area of critical state concern;
(j) The lot or parcel is within a rural fire protection district organized under ORS chapter 478;
(k) The lot or parcel and accessory  dwelling unit comply with rules of the State Board of
Forestry under ORS 477.015 to 477.061; and
(L) The accessory dwelling unit complies with the [ Oregon residential  specialty code relating to
wildfire hazard  mitigation ] state building code for fire protection standards based on the fire
risk identified by maps produced by the Department of Consumer and Business Services un-
der section 4 of this 2021 Act .
(3)(a) A county  may not permit both the existing single-family dwelling and the accessory
dwelling unit allowed under this section to be used simultaneously for vacation occupancy:
(A) During more than one week per year; and
(B) Unless the county has been notified in advance.
(b) If a county allows the use of an accessory dwelling unit for vacation occupancy, the county
may impose conditions including:
(A) Requiring the owner to use the existing single-family dwelling as a primary residence.
(B) Requiring neighbor notification.
(C) Requiring a local point of contact for vacation occupants and neighbors.
(D) Registration with the county.
(4) A county that allows construction  of an accessory dwelling unit under this section may not
approve:
(a) A subdivision, partition or other division of the lot or parcel so that the existing single-family
[3]
SB 695
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
dwelling is situated on a different lot or parcel than the accessory dwelling unit.
(b) Construction of an additional accessory dwelling unit on the same lot or parcel.
(5) A county may require that an accessory dwelling unit constructed under this  section be
served by the same water supply  source or water supply system as the existing single-family dwell-
ing. If the accessory  dwelling unit is served by a well, the construction of the accessory dwelling
unit shall maintain  all setbacks from the well required by the Water Resources Commission or Wa-
ter Resources Department.
(6) An existing single-family dwelling and an accessory dwelling unit  allowed under this section
are considered a single unit for the purposes of calculating exemptions under ORS 537.545 (1).
(7) Nothing in this section requires a county to  allow any accessory dwelling units in areas
zoned for rural residential use or prohibits a county from imposing  any additional restrictions on
accessory dwelling units in areas zoned for rural residential use, including  restrictions on the con-
struction of garages and outbuildings that support an accessory dwelling unit.
SECTION 6.
No later than September 15, 2022, the Department of Consumer and Business
Services and the Oregon State  University College of Forestry shall report to an appropriate
interim committee of  the Legislative Assembly in the manner provided under ORS 192.245
on the  maps and updates to the state building code required under section 4 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 7. The amendments to section 2 of this 2021 Act by section 5 of this 2021  Act
become operative on January 1, 2023.
[4]