Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 327.511 is amended to read:
327.511. (1) The State Board of Education shall adopt  by rule a uniform budget and accounting
system for school districts and education service districts.
(2) The uniform budget and accounting system shall include uniform definitions for a chart  of
accounts  that  shall allow for valid comparisons of expenditures among schools and among districts.
The uniform definitions for the chart of accounts  shall be developed by the Department of Education
in consultation with the Legislative Revenue Officer, the Legislative Fiscal Officer, the  Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services and appropriate organizations that  represent kindergarten
through grade 12 educational interests.
(3) The uniform budget and accounting system shall allow for the  gathering of data on separate
functions and programs, including but not limited to:
(a) Individual school;
(b) Grade level;
(c) Curriculum area;
(d) Class size; and
(e) Extracurricular activities.
(4) The Department of  Education shall place data gathered from the uniform budget and ac-
counting  system  in a database that includes information that is accessible by the public through the
[Internet, a personal computer or other similar technology. ] website of the Department of Educa-
tion.
(5) A school  district shall make the data described in subsection (3) of this section
available at the school district’s office and on the website of the school district.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 614