Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $1,190,000, for distribution to the Oregon
Coast Visitors Association to be expended in accordance with section 2 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 2. Moneys distributed to the Oregon Coast Visitors Association  by the Oregon
Department of  Administrative Services under section 1 of this 2023 Act shall be expended in
the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) $190,000 to develop a geographic information  systems tool for food systems with blue
economy layers. The tool shall be developed to  connect food producers and food technology
businesses to suitable  sites for start-up or expansion with the goal of capturing more value
from Oregon’s natural resources and agricultural and seafood industries.
(2) $700,000 to fill gaps in regional food system aggregation and production infrastructure
and leverage existing regional food system coordination capacity in such a  way as to imme-
diately benefit Oregon businesses. Improvements funded under this subsection shall be:
(a) The development  of coastal ports mariculture and a coculture facility in partnership
with the Oregon Kelp Alliance;
(b) The installation of a  shared-use certified commercial kitchen, processing center and
cold storage at the  Newport Seafood Analytical Lab of the Coastal Oregon Marine Exper-
iment Station; and
(c) The development of a mobile processing unit to  be shared across multiple port dis-
tricts that will support multiple seafood producers.
(3) $300,000 to support existing  businesses connected to the projects funded under sub-
sections (1) and (2) of this section and those businesses identified in a  technical assistance
survey for rural seafood businesses that is currently being  conducted and coproduced by the
Oregon Coast Visitors Association, the Oregon State University Food Innovation  Center and
the Oregon State University Seafood Research and Education Center,  each of which will ad-
minister the technical assistance provided under this subsection.
SECTION 3. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1453
HB 2909
1
2
3
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]