Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for allocation to Oregon State Uni-
versity through the Oregon Veterinary  Diagnostic Laboratory, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $_______, which may be expended for the
following purposes related to monitoring, preventing and responding to zoonotic disease:
(1) $______ for personnel to address public health needs.
(2) $500,000 for equipment.
(3) $500,000 to establish a chronic wasting disease testing program,  in consultation with
the State Department of Fish and Wildlife.
(4) $900,000 for a feasibility study and the design of a new veterinary diagnostic lab.
SECTION 2.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4149