Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 4 of this 2023 Act:
(1) “As is” means a disclaimer of all implied warranties of merchantability or  implied
warranties of fitness that would otherwise apply to a sale or lease of consumer products.
(2) “Buyer” means a resident  individual who purchases or leases consumer products from
a supplier.
(3) “Conspicuous notice” means:
(a) A written statement in a larger typeface than surrounding text or  in a contrasting
typeface, font or color, set off from other text in a manner that  clearly calls attention to the
statement; or
(b) An audio  statement with a volume and cadence that is readily audible and under-
standable and that is distinguishable from surrounding audio.
(4)(a) “Consumer  product” means any new product or component of a new product that
a resident individual bought or leased from a retail seller or lessor and used in this state
primarily for personal, family or household purposes,  including devices that assist individuals
with disabilities to treat or mitigate a disease or replace the structure  or function of the
individual’s body.
(b) “Consumer product” does not include clothing  or products that an individual uses for
personal care that are consumed or expended in the course of the use.
(5) “Distributor” means a person that  engages in the business of purchasing or receiving
on consignment from a manufacturer,  or from another person that purchases or receives
from a manufacturer, consumer products that the person sells or offers on consignment to
a retail seller.
(6) “Express warranty” means:
(a) A written statement a supplier makes in connection with the sale or lease of a con-
sumer product in which  the supplier promises to preserve the utility or performance of the
consumer product for a specified time or to  provide compensation, repairs, replacements or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4352
HB 3611
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
other services related to the consumer product if the consumer product does  not retain the
promised utility or performance during the specified time; and
(b) A promise that a consumer product conforms to any sample  or model of the con-
sumer product that the supplier provides or makes available for inspection or use.
(7)(a) “Implied warranty of fitness” means:
(A) A supplier has  reason to know that a resident individual has a particular use or
purpose for purchasing or using a consumer product;
(B) The resident individual relies on the supplier’s skill and judgment to select and  pro-
vide a suitable consumer product for the resident individual’s particular  use or purpose; and
(C) The consumer product the supplier provides to the resident individual is fit for  the
resident individual’s use or purpose.
(b) “Implied warranty of  fitness” as applied to a device that a resident individual pur-
chases at retail to assist the resident individual  with a disability, to treat or mitigate a dis-
ease, or to replace the structure or function of the resident individual’s body means that the
device is fit for the resident individual’s particular needs, purposes or uses.
(8) “Implied warranty of merchantability” means that a consumer product:
(a) Passes without objection in the trade under the contract description;
(b) Is fit for the ordinary purposes for which the consumer product is used;
(c) Is adequately contained, packaged and labeled; and
(d) Conforms to the promises or affirmations of fact that appear on the container or label
for the consumer product.
(9) “Manufacturer”  means a person that engages in the business of manufacturing, as-
sembling, producing or otherwise originating consumer products.
(10) “Resident individual” means a natural person who resides in this state.
(11) “Retail seller” means  a person that engages in the business of selling or leasing
consumer products to resident individuals.
(12) “Supplier” means a manufacturer, distributor or retail seller.
SECTION 2.
(1) A  supplier manufactures or distributes consumer products in this state
or sells or leases consumer products at retail in  this state subject to an implied warranty
of merchantability, unless  the supplier disclaims the warranty as provided in subsection
(3)(b) of this  section. A retail seller may seek contribution or indemnity from a manufacturer
for the amount of any liability the retail seller has under this subsection.
(2) A retail seller sells or leases consumer products at retail in this  state subject to an
implied warranty of fitness if the  retail seller has reason to know at the time of the sale or
lease that a buyer requires a consumer product  for a particular purpose and is relying on
the retail seller’s skill or judgment to select or provide a  consumer product that is suitable
for the particular purpose.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a  supplier or a buyer may
not disclaim or waive an implied warranty of merchantability or, if applicable, an  implied
warranty of fitness. A buyer’s purported waiver  of an implied warranty described in this
paragraph is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable.
(b) A supplier is not subject to and disclaims  a warranty described in paragraph (a) of
this subsection if the supplier sells a consumer product  as is and in strict compliance with
subsection (4) of this section.
(4) A supplier that sells or leases a consumer product as is must  attach to or provide
[2]
HB 3611
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
with the consumer  product, or with any advertisement of or offer for the consumer product,
a conspicuous notice that in simple and concise language tells the buyer that:
(a) The supplier is selling or leasing the consumer product as is, with all faults;
(b) The entire risk as to the quality or performance of the  consumer product is with the
buyer; and
(c) The buyer assumes the entire  cost of all necessary servicing, repair or replacement
of the consumer product if the consumer product is defective.
SECTION 3.
(1)(a) Except as provided in this section, sections 1 to 4 of this  2023 Act do
not affect a supplier’s  right to make express warranties with respect to consumer products
the supplier sells or leases in this state.
(b) An express warranty for a consumer product is subject to the requirements of  this
section and is in addition to, and not in lieu of, an applicable implied warranty  described in
section 2 of this 2023 Act.
(2) A supplier that makes an express  warranty for a consumer product shall write the
warranty in simple and readily understood language that clearly identifies the party  that is
making the express warranty and otherwise conforms  to the federal standards for disclosing
warranty terms and conditions specified in the federal  Magnuson-Moss Warranty Federal
Trade Commission Improvement Act, 15  U.S.C. 2301 et seq., and regulations the Federal
Trade Commission adopts under the Act, both as in effect on the effective date of  this 2023
Act.
(3) A  supplier may provide a product registration card or form or an electronic product
registration form for a consumer product, but the supplier’s express warranty is valid and
enforceable even if  a resident individual does not register the product. A registration form
or card may not include a  label or language indicating that the card or form is a warranty
registration or warranty confirmation and must display a  conspicuous notice that states
that:
(a) The card or form is for product registration; and
(b) A failure to complete and submit the card or form does not  diminish a resident
individual’s warranty rights.
(4)(a) A person that performs warranty repairs or service on  a consumer product in this
state must provide the buyer with a  copy of the work order or invoice for the warranty re-
pairs or service. The face or reverse of the work order or invoice, or an attachment to  the
work order or invoice, must incorporate in 10-point  boldfaced type a conspicuous notice that
reads in substance:
A buyer of this product in Oregon has the right to have this product  serviced or repaired
during the warranty period. The warranty period must be extended for the number of whole
days that  the product has been out of the buyer’s hands for warranty repairs. If a defect
exists within the warranty period,  the warranty will not expire until the defect has been
fixed. The warranty period must also be extended if the warranty repairs are  not performed
because of delays caused by circumstances beyond the control of the buyer or if the warranty
repairs do not remedy the defect and the buyer  notifies the seller or manufacturer within
60 days after the completion of the repair that the repairs did not remedy the  defect. If after
a reasonable number of attempts, warranty repairs or  service has not fixed the defect, the
[3]
HB 3611
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
buyer may  return this product for a replacement or refund, less a reasonable charge for
usage. The warranty time extension described in this notice does not affect the  protections
or remedies the buyer has under other laws.
(b) If the  notice described in paragraph (a) of this subsection appears on the reverse side
of a work order or invoice for a warranty repair, the  face of the work order or invoice must
include a conspicuous notice in 10-point  boldface type that reads: “Notice to consumer:
Please read important information on back.”
(5) If a supplier maintains  repair and service facilities in this state, the supplier shall,
at the time  the supplier sells or leases a consumer product in this state, provide the buyer
with:
(a) The name, address and telephone number of each service and  repair facility in this
state;
(b) The name, address and telephone number of a central directory for  repair and service
facilities within this state that, at the buyer’s request, must provide the buyer with  the
name, address and  telephone number of the repair or service center that is nearest to the
buyer’s location; or
(c) Access  to, on the retail seller’s premises or on the supplier’s website, a current listing
of the supplier’s authorized repair and service facilities, or of retail sellers  to which the
buyer can return the consumer product for repair or service, each of  which must, at the
buyer’s request, provide the buyer with the name, address and telephone number of  the re-
pair and service facility that is nearest to the buyer’s location.
SECTION 4. (1) If a manufacturer makes an express warranty  for a consumer product
sold or leased in this state, the manufacturer shall:
(a) Maintain in  this state, or authorize other persons to maintain, adequate repair and
service facilities that are located reasonably close  to locations in which retail sellers sell or
lease the manufacturer’s consumer product; or
(b) Provide the buyer with:
(A) Prepaid postage in an  amount that is sufficient to enable the buyer to send the con-
sumer product to a repair and service facility located  outside this state or outside a rea-
sonable distance from the buyer’s location; and
(B) A container for shipment that can accommodate and adequately protect  the con-
sumer product.
(2) If a manufacturer does not comply with subsection (1) of this section, a buyer  may
return a defective consumer  product to the retail seller from which the buyer purchased the
consumer product or to any retail seller within this state that  sells or leases the
manufacturer’s consumer products. The retail seller shall:
(a) Service or repair the consumer  product so that the consumer product conforms to
the manufacturer’s express warranty;
(b) Direct the  buyer to a reasonably close independent service or repair facility that is
willing to provide service for or repairs to the consumer product;
(c) Replace the defective consumer product with a consumer product that is identical  or
reasonably equivalent to the consumer product; or
(d) Refund the buyer’s purchase price for the consumer product.
[4]
HB 3611
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
(3) A manufacturer that does not comply with subsection (1) of this  section is liable to
a retail seller of the manufacturer’s consumer products in an  amount that is equivalent to
the actual cost the retail seller incurs in providing:
(a) A replacement of the consumer product to the buyer, including costs in transporting
the replacement consumer product and a reasonable handling charge;
(b) Service or repair of the consumer product to buyers who are not entitled  to warranty
protections, including costs of transporting  parts or components or replacement consumer
products, plus a reasonable profit; or
(c) A refund to the buyer of the purchase price of the  consumer product, plus a reason-
able handling charge.
(4) A person that provides service and  repair for a manufacturer’s consumer products in
this state shall begin  the service or repair within a commercially reasonable time, which
must be within 30 days unless the buyer agrees otherwise in writing or unless a delay  occurs
that is beyond the control of the manufacturer  or the person that provides the service or
repair.
(5)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this  subsection, a buyer shall deliver a
consumer product for which the buyer seeks service  or repair to the manufacturer’s service
and repair facility within this state or to an authorized service and repair facility.
(b)(A) If a buyer  cannot deliver a consumer product to a service and repair facility be-
cause of the size and weight of the  consumer product or because a method of attachment
or installation or the nature of the defect makes delivery impractical or unreasonable,  the
buyer may notify the manufacturer in writing and the manufacturer or a person that  pro-
vides service and repair on the manufacturer’s  behalf shall, at the manufacturer’s or the
person’s option:
(i) Service or repair the consumer  product at the buyer’s residence or other location
where the buyer holds the consumer product; or
(ii) Pick up or arrange for transporting the consumer product to the service and  repair
facility.
(B) Costs associated with transporting  a consumer product under subparagraph (A) of
this paragraph from the buyer’s residence  or other location to a service and repair facility
and from the service and repair facility to the buyer’s  residence or other location are the
responsibility of the manufacturer or the person that provides service and repair.
(6) If a manufacturer  or person that provides service and repair for the manufacturer’s
consumer products cannot conform the  consumer product to the express warranty after a
reasonable number of  attempts, the manufacturer shall either replace the consumer product
with a consumer product of like capability and quality or refund to  the buyer the purchase
price the buyer paid for the consumer product, less a reasonable amount that is directly at-
tributable to the buyer’s use of the consumer product before discovering a defect.
SECTION 5.
Sections 1 to 4 of this 2023 Act  apply to transactions in consumer products
that occur on and after the effective date of this 2023 Act.
[5]