Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 336.211 is amended to read:
336.211. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Education provider” means:
(A) An entity that offers  a program that is recognized as an Oregon prekindergarten program
under ORS 329.170 to 329.200.
(B) A school district board.
(b) “Eye examination” means an eye examination that:
(A) Is conducted by a person licensed by the Oregon Board of Optometry under  ORS 683.010 to
683.340 or a person licensed by the Oregon Medical Board under ORS chapter 677  and trained in
eye surgery and eye disease; and
(B) Involves any diagnosis of the eye and any measurement or assistance  of the powers or range
of vision of the eye.
(c) “Vision screening” means an  eye screening test to identify potential vision health problems
that is conducted by  a person who is :
(A) [ A person ] Licensed by the Oregon Board of Optometry under ORS 683.010 to 683.340;
(B) [A person ] Licensed by the Oregon Medical Board under  ORS chapter 677 and trained in eye
surgery and eye disease;
(C) A health  care practitioner acting in accordance with rules adopted by the State Board of
Education; or
(D) A school nurse, an employee of an education provider or  a person or nonprofit entity des-
ignated by the Department of Education to provide vision screening to  students who is acting in
accordance with rules adopted by the State Board of Education.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, each education  provider shall require
a student who is seven years of age or younger and who is beginning  an educational program with
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1864
SB 152
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the education provider for the first time to submit certification that the student received:
(A) A vision screening or an eye examination; and
(B) Any further examinations or necessary treatments of the eye or  assistance of the powers or
range of vision of the eye.
(b) The certification required by this subsection must be provided no later than 120 days after
the student begins the educational program.
(3) A student is  not required to submit certification as required under subsection (2) of this
section if the student provides a statement from the parent or guardian of the student that:
(a) The student submitted certification to a prior education provider; or
(b) The vision screening or eye examination is contrary to the religious beliefs of  the student
or the parent or guardian of the student.
(4) Each education provider shall:
(a) Ensure that the  requirements of this section are met. Failure by a student to meet the re-
quirements of this section may not result in a program’s  or school’s prohibiting the student from
attending the program or school, but may result in withholding report cards or similar actions.
(b) File in the student’s vision health record  any certifications and any results of a vision
screening or an eye examination known by the education provider.
(c) Provide the parent or guardian of each  student with information about the vision screenings
and eye examinations, and information about further examinations or necessary treatments.
(5)(a) Upon application of [ an education provider ] a person  that provides  students with vision
screenings, the Department of Education shall  reimburse the [ education provider ] person for any
necessary expenses incurred by the [ education provider ] person in the provision of the  vision
screenings[ , including any expenses related to contracting with a person or nonprofit entity ].
(b) [ An education provider ] A person  may receive reimbursement under this subsection for  the
provision of a vision screening to any student of [ the] an education provider, regardless  of whether
the student has complied with subsection (2) or (3) of this section. Nothing in this  paragraph re-
moves the requirement that a student must comply with subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(c) Reimbursements made under this subsection:
(A) May not exceed $3.20 per vision screening per student per school year.
(B) Must be paid from the Vision Health Account established under ORS 336.212.
(C) May not exceed amounts available in the Vision Health Account.
(6)(a) The State Board of Education,  in consultation with the Oregon Health Policy Board, shall
adopt by rule any standards for the implementation of this section.
(b) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules that:
(A) Prescribe the process by which a person or nonprofit  entity is designated by the Department
of Education to provide vision screenings; and
(B) Establish the process for providing reimbursements under subsection (5) of this  section, in-
cluding the prioritization of [ education providers ] persons to receive a reimbursement if the total
amount available for reimbursements exceeds the total amount requested for reimbursements.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 336.212 is amended to read:
336.212. (1) The  Vision Health Account is established in the State Treasury, separate and dis-
tinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the account shall be credited to the account.
(2) Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the Department  of Education to
make reimbursements [ to education providers ] for  expenses incurred for the provision of vision
screenings, as described in ORS 336.211 (5).
[2]
SB 152
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
(3) The department, on behalf of the State of Oregon, may solicit and  accept gifts, grants and
donations from public  and private sources for the provision of vision screenings. Moneys received
under this subsection shall be deposited into the account.
(4) From the  moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly to the account each biennium,
the department may retain no more than a total of 10  percent of the moneys for administrative ex-
penses incurred by the department in making reimbursements [ to education providers ].
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 336.211 by section 1 of this 2019 Act apply to ex-
penses incurred for vision  screenings provided on or after the effective date of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000, to be deposited in the Vision  Health Account estab-
lished under ORS 336.212.
SECTION 5. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
[3]