Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Policy and Research Director shall study legislation affecting
local governments. The director shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees  of the
Legislative Assembly related to rules no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4239