Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Secretary of State shall conduct a fiscal audit of the Department of
Transportation. The Secretary of State shall complete the audit no later than June 30, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 124