Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 5 of this 2020 Act:
(1) “Genetic counseling” means the practice of assisting patients in understanding  and
adapting to the medical, psychological and  familial implications of genetic conditions, in-
cluding:
(a) Obtaining and evaluating individual and family medical histories to determine risk for
genetic and medical conditions and diseases of a patient and the patient’s family members;
(b) Discussing the features, natural history, means of diagnosis, genetic  and environ-
mental factors and risk management for genetic and medical conditions and diseases;
(c) Identifying, ordering  and coordinating genetic laboratory tests and other diagnostic
studies appropriate for genetic assessment;
(d) Integrating test and study  results with the patient’s personal and family history to
assess and communicate risk factors for genetic and medical conditions and diseases;
(e) Explaining the clinical  implications of tests and studies and their results and evalu-
ating the patient’s, and patient’s  family’s responses, to the results and the risk of any re-
currence of conditions and diseases, and providing patient-centered  counseling and
anticipatory guidance;
(f) Identifying and using any community  resources to provide educational, financial,
medical and psychosocial support and advocacy; and
(g) Providing written documentation of medical, genetic and counseling information  for
families and health care providers.
(2) “Licensed genetic counselor” means a person licensed to practice genetic counseling.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Health Licensing Office may  issue a license to practice genetic
counseling to an applicant who:
(a) Is at least 18 years of age;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 20
HB 4074
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Is certified by a national certification organization for genetic  counselors approved
by the office by rule;
(c) Pays a licensure fee; and
(d) Meets other requirements established by the office by rule.
(2) The office may adopt rules establishing a  process for issuing a temporary license to
practice genetic counseling, including but not limited to rules establishing qualifications and
fees for temporary licensure.
SECTION 3.
(1) A person may  not practice genetic counseling or assume any title, words
or abbreviations,  including but not limited to the title or designation “licensed genetic
counselor,” that indicate that the person  is authorized to practice genetic counseling, unless
the person is licensed under section 2 of this 2020 Act.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit:
(a) A person authorized by a health  regulatory board to provide a health care service
other than genetic counseling  from practicing genetic counseling as part of the person’s
provision of the health care service; or
(b) A student from practicing genetic counseling while the  student is participating in an
educational program for genetic counseling and under the  direct supervision of a licensed
genetic counselor who is assigned to oversee the student,  on duty and available to assist the
student.
SECTION 4.
In the manner described in ORS chapter  183 for contested cases, the Health
Licensing Office may impose a form of  discipline listed in ORS 676.612 against a person for
any violation of section 3 of this 2020 Act and for any violation of a  rule adopted under
sections 1 to 5 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 5. (1) The Health Licensing Office shall adopt rules to establish:
(a) A process for issuing licenses to practice genetic counseling;
(b) A process for renewing licenses to practice genetic counseling;
(c) Fees for issuing and renewing licenses to practice genetic counseling; and
(d) Qualifications for applicants for initial licensure and licensure renewal.
(2) The office may adopt:
(a) Rules to approve certification issued by a national certification organization  for ge-
netic counselors; and
(b) Other rules necessary to carry out sections 1 to 5 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 676.565 is amended to read:
676.565. Pursuant to ORS 676.568, the Health Licensing Office  shall provide administrative and
regulatory oversight and centralized service for the following boards, councils and programs:
(1) Board of Athletic Trainers, as provided in ORS 688.701 to 688.734;
(2) Board of Cosmetology, as provided in ORS 690.005 to 690.225;
(3) State Board of Denture Technology, as provided in ORS 680.500 to 680.565;
(4) State Board of Direct Entry Midwifery, as provided in ORS 687.405 to 687.495;
(5) Respiratory Therapist and Polysomnographic Technologist Licensing  Board, as provided in
ORS 688.800 to 688.840;
(6) Environmental Health Registration Board, as provided in ORS chapter 700;
(7) Board of Electrologists and Body Art Practitioners, as provided in ORS 690.350 to 690.410;
(8) Advisory Council on Hearing Aids, as provided in ORS 694.015 to 694.170;
(9) Sexual Offense Treatment Board, as provided in ORS 675.365 to 675.410;
[2]
HB 4074
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(10) Long Term Care Administrators Board, as provided in ORS 678.710 to 678.820;
(11) Board of Licensed Dietitians, as provided in ORS 691.405 to 691.485;
(12) Behavior Analysis Regulatory Board, as provided in ORS 676.806;
(13) Board of Certified Advanced Estheticians, as provided in ORS 676.630 to 676.660;
(14) Art therapy, as provided in ORS 681.740 to 681.758;
(15) Lactation consultation, as provided in ORS 676.665 to 676.689; [ and]
(16) Music therapy, as provided in ORS 681.700 to 681.730 ; and
(17) Genetic counseling, as provided in sections 1 to 5 of this 2020 Act .
SECTION 7.
 ORS 676.579 is amended to read:
676.579. (1)(a) The Health Licensing  Office is under the supervision and control of a director,
who is responsible for the performance of the duties, functions and powers and  for the organization
of the office.
(b) The Director of the Oregon Health Authority shall establish the qualifications for  and ap-
point the  Director of the Health Licensing Office, who holds office at the pleasure of the Director
of the Oregon Health Authority.
(c) The Director of the Health Licensing Office shall receive  a salary as provided by law or, if
not so provided, as prescribed by the Director of the Oregon Health Authority.
(d) The Director of the Health Licensing Office is in the unclassified service.
(2) The Director of the Health Licensing Office shall  provide the boards, councils and programs
administered by the office  with any services and employees as the office requires to carry out the
office’s duties. Subject to any applicable provisions of the  State Personnel Relations Law, the Di-
rector of the Health Licensing Office shall appoint all subordinate officers and employees of the of-
fice, prescribe their duties and fix their compensation.
(3) The Director of the Health  Licensing Office is responsible for carrying out the duties, func-
tions and powers under ORS 675.365  to 675.410, 676.560 to 676.625, 676.665 to 676.689, 676.810,
676.815, 676.825, 676.992, 678.710 to 678.820, 680.500 to 680.565, 681.700 to  681.730, 681.740 to 681.758,
687.405 to 687.495, 687.895,  688.701 to 688.734, 688.800 to 688.840, 690.005 to 690.225, 690.350 to
690.410, 691.405 to 691.485 and 694.015 to 694.170 and ORS chapter 700 and sections 1  to 5 of this
2020 Act .
(4) The enumeration of duties, functions and powers in  subsection (3) of this section is not in-
tended to be exclusive or to limit the duties,  functions and powers imposed on or vested in the office
by other statutes.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 676.590 is amended to read:
676.590. (1) Information obtained by the Health Licensing Office as part of an  investigation
conducted under the  following laws and any reports issued by an investigator are exempt from
public disclosure:
(a) ORS 676.630 to 676.660, 676.665 to 676.689, 681.700 to 681.730, 681.740  to 681.758, 690.005 to
690.225, 690.350 to 690.410 or 694.015 to 694.170.
(b) ORS 676.560 to 676.625 if the investigation is related to the regulation of:
(A) Advanced nonablative esthetics under ORS 676.630 to 676.660;
(B) Lactation consultation under ORS 676.665 to 676.689;
(C) Music therapy under ORS 681.700 to 681.730;
(D) Art therapy under ORS 681.740 to 681.758;
(E) Barbering, hair design, esthetics, nail technology or natural hair care  under ORS 690.005 to
690.225;
[3]
HB 4074
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(F) Electrologists and body art practitioners under ORS 690.350 to 690.410; [ or]
(G) Dealing in hearing aids under ORS 694.015 to 694.170 ; or
(H) Genetic counseling under sections 1 to 5 of this 2020 Act .
(2) The office shall disclose information obtained as part of an investigation described  in sub-
section (1) of this section to a person who demonstrates  by clear and convincing evidence that the
public interest in disclosure outweighs other interests in nondisclosure, including the  public interest
in nondisclosure.
(3) A  complaint that forms the basis for an investigation described in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion shall not  be considered information obtained as part of an investigation and is not exempt from
public disclosure.
(4) Upon request, the office shall disclose to a  person against whom disciplinary action is sought
any information obtained as part of an investigation  described in section (1) of this section, if the
information is not otherwise privileged or confidential under state or federal law.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 676.612 is amended to read:
676.612. (1) Subject to ORS 676.616 and 687.445,  and in the manner prescribed in ORS chapter
183 for contested cases and as specified in  ORS 675.385, 676.685, 676.825, 678.780, 680.535, 681.733,
681.755, 687.445, 688.734, 688.836, 690.167, 690.407, 691.477, 694.147 and 700.111 and section 4 of this
2020 Act, the Health Licensing Office may refuse to issue or renew,  may suspend or revoke or may
otherwise condition or limit an authorization or may discipline or  place on probation an authori-
zation holder for commission of the prohibited acts listed in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) A person subject  to the authority of a board, council or program listed in ORS 676.565
commits a prohibited act if the person engages in:
(a) Fraud, misrepresentation, concealment of material facts  or deception in applying for or ob-
taining an authorization to practice in this state, or in any written or oral communication to  the
office concerning the issuance or retention of the authorization.
(b) Using, causing  or promoting the use of any advertising matter, promotional literature, testi-
monial, guarantee, warranty, label, insignia or  any other representation, however disseminated or
published, that is false, misleading or deceptive.
(c) Making a representation that  the authorization holder knew or should have known is false
or misleading  regarding skill or the efficacy or value of treatment or remedy administered by the
authorization holder.
(d) Practicing under a false, misleading or deceptive name, or impersonating  another authori-
zation holder.
(e) Permitting a person other than the authorization holder to use the authorization.
(f) Practicing with a physical or mental condition that presents an unreasonable risk  of harm
to the authorization holder or to the  person or property of others in the course of performing the
authorization holder’s duties.
(g) Practicing while under the influence of alcohol, cannabis,  controlled substances or other
skill-impairing substances, or engaging in the illegal  use of controlled substances or other skill-
impairing substances so as to create a risk of  harm to the person or property of others in the course
of performing the duties of an authorization holder.
(h) Failing to properly and reasonably accept responsibility for the actions of employees.
(i) Employing, directly or indirectly, any suspended, uncertified, unlicensed or  unregistered per-
son to practice a regulated occupation  or profession subject to the authority of the boards, councils
and programs listed in ORS 676.565.
[4]
HB 4074
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(j) Unprofessional conduct, negligence, incompetence, repeated violations or  any departure from
or failure to conform to standards of  practice in performing services or practicing in a regulated
occupation or profession subject to the authority of the boards, councils  and programs listed under
ORS 676.565.
(k) Conviction of any criminal offense, subject to ORS 670.280.  A copy of the record of con-
viction, certified by the clerk of the court entering the  conviction, is conclusive evidence of the
conviction. A plea  of no contest or an admission of guilt is a conviction for purposes of this para-
graph.
(L) Failing to report  any adverse action, as required by statute or rule, taken against the au-
thorization holder by another regulatory jurisdiction or any peer  review body, health care institu-
tion, professional association, governmental agency, law enforcement agency or  court for acts or
conduct similar to acts or conduct  that would constitute grounds for disciplinary action as described
in this section.
(m) Violation of a statute regulating an occupation or profession  subject to the authority of the
boards, councils and programs listed in ORS 676.565.
(n) Violation of any rule regulating an occupation or profession  subject to the authority of the
boards, councils and programs listed in ORS 676.565.
(o) Failing to cooperate with the office in any investigation, inspection or  request for informa-
tion.
(p) Selling or fraudulently obtaining or furnishing an authorization to  practice in a regulated
occupation or profession subject to the authority of the boards, councils and programs  listed in ORS
676.565, or aiding or abetting such an act.
(q) Selling or fraudulently obtaining or furnishing any record related to practice  in a regulated
occupation or profession subject to the authority of the boards, councils and programs  listed in ORS
676.565, or aiding or abetting such an act.
(r) Failing to pay an outstanding civil penalty or fee that is due or failing to meet the terms of
any order issued by the office that has become final.
(3) For the purpose of requesting a  state or nationwide criminal records check under ORS
181A.195, the office may require the fingerprints of a person who is:
(a) Applying for an authorization;
(b) Applying for renewal of an authorization; or
(c) Under investigation by the office.
(4) If the office places an authorization holder on probation  under subsection (1) of this section,
the office, in consultation with the appropriate  board, council or program, may determine and at any
time modify the conditions of the probation.
(5) If an authorization is suspended,  the authorization holder may not practice during the term
of suspension. Upon the expiration of the term of suspension, the authorization may be  reinstated
by the office if the conditions  of suspension no longer exist and the authorization holder has satis-
fied all requirements in the relevant statutes or administrative rules for issuance, renewal or  rein-
statement.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 676.613 is amended to read:
676.613. (1) In addition to all other remedies, when it appears to the Health Licensing Office that
a person is engaged in, has engaged in or is about to engage in  any act, practice or transaction that
violates any provision of ORS 675.365 to 675.410, 676.665 to  676.689, 676.810, 676.815, 678.710 to
678.820, 680.500 to 680.565,  681.700 to 681.730, 681.740 to 681.758, 687.405 to 687.495, 688.701 to
[5]
HB 4074
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
688.734, 688.800 to 688.840, 690.005 to 690.225, 690.350 to  690.410, 691.405 to 691.485 or 694.015 to
694.170 or ORS chapter 700 or sections 1 to 5 of this 2020 Act , the office may, through  the At-
torney General or the district attorney of the county in which the act, practice  or transaction oc-
curs or will  occur, apply to the court for an injunction restraining the person from the act, practice
or transaction.
(2) A court may issue an injunction under this section without  proof of actual damages. An in-
junction issued under this section does not relieve a person from any  other prosecution or enforce-
ment action taken for violation of statutes listed in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 676.622 is amended to read:
676.622. (1) A transaction conducted through a state or  local system or network that provides
electronic  access  to the Health Licensing Office information and services is exempt from any re-
quirement under ORS 675.365 to 675.410, 676.560 to  676.625, 676.665 to 676.689, 676.810, 676.815,
676.992, 680.500 to 680.565, 681.700 to 681.730, 681.740 to 681.758, 687.405 to  687.495, 688.701 to
688.734, 688.800 to 688.840, 690.005 to 690.225, 690.350 to 690.410, 691.405 to 691.485 and 694.015 to
694.170 and ORS chapter 700 and sections 1 to 5 of this 2020 Act , and rules adopted thereunder,
requiring an original signature or the submission of handwritten materials.
(2) Electronic signatures subject to ORS 84.001 to 84.061  and facsimile signatures are acceptable
and have the same force as original signatures.
SECTION 12.  ORS 676.992 is amended to read:
676.992. (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, and in  addition to any other
penalty or remedy provided by law, the Health Licensing Office may impose a  civil penalty not to
exceed $5,000 for each violation of  the following statutes and any rule adopted under the following
statutes:
(a) ORS 688.701 to 688.734 (athletic training);
(b) ORS 690.005 to 690.225 (cosmetology);
(c) ORS 680.500 to 680.565 (denture technology);
(d) Subject to ORS 676.616 and 687.445, ORS 687.405 to 687.495 (direct entry midwifery);
(e) ORS 690.350  to 690.410 (tattooing, electrolysis, body piercing, earlobe piercing, dermal im-
planting and scarification);
(f) ORS 694.015 to 694.170 (dealing in hearing aids);
(g) ORS 688.800 to 688.840 (respiratory therapy and polysomnography);
(h) ORS chapter 700 (environmental sanitation);
(i) ORS 675.365 to 675.410 (sexual abuse specific treatment);
(j) ORS  678.710 to 678.820 (nursing home administrators and residential care facility adminis-
trators);
(k) ORS 691.405 to 691.485 (dietitians);
(L) ORS 676.612 (prohibited acts);
(m) ORS 676.810 and 676.815 (applied behavior analysis);
(n) ORS 681.700 to 681.730 (music therapy);
(o) ORS 676.630 to 676.660 (advanced nonablative esthetics procedure);
(p) ORS 681.740 to 681.758 (art therapy); [ and]
(q) ORS 676.665 to 676.689 (lactation consultation) ; and
(r) Sections 1 to 5 of this 2020 Act (genetic counseling) .
(2) The office may take any other disciplinary action that it finds proper,  including but not
limited to  assessment of costs of disciplinary proceedings, not to exceed $5,000, for violation of any
[6]
HB 4074
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
statute listed in subsection (1) of this section or any  rule adopted under any statute listed in sub-
section (1) of this section.
(3) Subsection  (1) of this section does not limit the amount of the civil penalty resulting from a
violation of ORS 694.042.
(4) In imposing a civil penalty under this section,  the office shall consider the following factors:
(a) The immediacy and extent to which the violation threatens the public health or safety;
(b) Any prior violations of statutes, rules or orders;
(c) The history of the person incurring a penalty in taking all feasible steps to correct any vio-
lation; and
(d) Any other aggravating or mitigating factors.
(5) Civil penalties under this section shall be imposed as provided in ORS 183.745.
(6) The moneys received by the office  from civil penalties under this section shall be deposited
in the Health Licensing Office Account and are continuously appropriated to the office for the  ad-
ministration and enforcement of the laws the office is  charged with administering and enforcing that
govern the person against whom the penalty was imposed.
SECTION 13.
(1) Sections 1 to 5 of this 2020 Act and the amendments to ORS 676.565,
676.579, 676.590, 676.612, 676.613, 676.622 and 676.992 by sections 6 to 12 of this 2020 Act become
operative on January 1, 2021.
(2) The Health Licensing Office may take  any action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that  is necessary to enable the office to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the office by sections 1 to 5 of this  2020 Act and the amendments
to ORS 676.565, 676.579, 676.590, 676.612,  676.613, 676.622 and 676.992 by sections 6 to 12 of this
2020 Act.
SECTION 14. This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[7]