Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 338.165 is amended to read:
338.165. (1)(a) The school district  in which a public charter school is located shall identify, lo-
cate and evaluate students enrolled in  the public charter school to determine which students may
be in need of special education and related services.
(b) The school district in which a public charter school is located:
(A) Shall receive funding from the State School Fund as provided by this section for students
who are eligible for special education and related services  and who are enrolled in the public
charter school; and
(B) Is eligible to receive high cost disabilities grants as provided by  ORS 327.348 for students
who are enrolled in the public charter school.
(c) Students who are eligible for special education and related services shall  be considered stu-
dents of the school district in which the public charter school  is located for purposes of data col-
lection and reporting.
(2) If a student is enrolled in a  public charter school and is eligible for special education and
related services, an additional amount shall be added to the ADM of the  public charter school as
described in ORS  327.013 (1)(c)(A)(i). The payment per ADMw in the public charter school that is
attributable to the student who is eligible for  special education and related services shall equal an
amount that is at least equal to[ :]
[(a) 40] 80 percent of the amount of the General Purpose Grant per ADMw for the school district
in which the public charter school is located, as calculated under ORS 327.013[ , for students who are
enrolled in kindergarten through grade eight; and ]
[(b) 47.5 percent of the amount of the General Purpose Grant per ADMw for the school district  in
which the public charter school is located, as calculated under ORS  327.013, for students who are en-
rolled in grades 9 through 12 ].
(3) If the State Board of Education is the sponsor of a public charter  school, the school district
in which the public charter school is located, for each ADMw that is attributable to a  student en-
rolled in a public charter school who is eligible for special  education and related services, shall
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2337
SB 534
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
transfer five percent of the amount of the school district’s General  Purpose Grant per ADMw as
calculated under ORS 327.013 to the State Board of Education.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (2)  of this section, a school district and a public charter school
may negotiate  on a case-by-case basis for an alternative distribution of funds other than the dis-
tribution prescribed by subsection (2) of this section.
(5) Payments under this  section must be made within 10 days after a school district receives
payment from the State School Fund pursuant to ORS 327.095.
SECTION 2.  ORS 340.073 is amended to read:
340.073. (1) A public charter school may elect to participate in the Expanded  Options Program
by amending its charter under ORS 338.065.
(2) Actual instructional costs associated with participating eligible students  shall be negotiated
and paid directly to the eligible post-secondary institution by the public charter school.
(3) The participating  public charter school may not require funding from the sponsor of the
school for payment of Expanded Options Program costs that is in  addition to funding that already
has been contractually established pursuant to ORS 338.155 (2)(b) or (3)(b) or 338.165 (2)[ (b)].
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 338.165 by section 1 of this 2017  Act first apply to
the 2017-2018 school year.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
[2]