Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
It is the policy of this state that:
(1) The state is responsible for fighting wildfires on unprotected lands;
(2) The State Fire Marshal  is the appropriate party to recommend to the Governor the
resources that can best assist local personnel in fighting wildfires  on unprotected lands; and
(3) The Governor should, to the  extent practicable, dispatch any resources recommended
by the State Fire Marshal for fighting wildfires on unprotected lands.
SECTION 2.
(1) The State Fire Marshal  may enter into agreements with state and federal
agencies and other public or  private sources for the availability, as needed, of equipment that
can be utilized for fighting wildfires. The equipment may include, but  need not be limited to,
aircraft and earthmoving equipment.
(2) The State Fire  Marshal may order the dispatching of any equipment described in an
agreement under subsection (1)  of this section that the State Fire Marshal deems appropri-
ate for use in assisting local  personnel who are fighting a wildfire on unprotected land. In
addition to any authority of the Governor under ORS 476.510 to 476.610 and 477.190  and
477.200, upon recommendation  by the State Fire Marshal, the Governor may dispatch avail-
able public or private resources of any type to assist local personnel who are  fighting a
wildfire on unprotected land.
SECTION 3. The Wildfire Resource Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Wildfire Resource Fund shall
be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated to the State Fire
Marshal for the purpose of dispatching equipment or firefighters as  the State Fire Marshal
deems appropriate to assist local personnel in the fighting of wildfires on unprotected  lands.
SECTION 4. Any federal funding that is received  by state government as assistance in
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2248
SB 292
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
dealing with a wildfire and not otherwise restricted to use  for a designated purpose shall be
deposited to the credit of the Wildfire Resource Fund.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out  of the General Fund, the amount of
$5,000,000 for deposit into the Wildfire Resource Fund.
SECTION 6. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
[2]