Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 5, chapter 109, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  No later than November 1, 2018, the Department of Education shall:
(1) Provide a report to the interim legislative committees on education that includes:
(a) The amount of moneys received by school districts  from the State School Fund under ORS
327.013 for post-graduate scholars participating in a program  established under section 2 [ of this
2016 Act ], chapter 109, Oregon Laws 2016 .
(b) Subject to data available to the department, the number of post-graduate scholars  for whom
school districts received moneys from the State School Fund under ORS 327.013 for  each of the
preceding school years.
(2) Make recommendations for legislation to establish an equitable, sustainable and appropriate
permanent funding mechanism for post-graduate scholar programs  that are not  funded by moneys
distributed from the State School  Fund under ORS 327.013. The recommendations must consider:
(a) Input from school districts that have implemented, are implementing or are planning to im-
plement a post-graduate scholar program.
(b) Input from the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(c) The amount of moneys received  by all school districts from the State School Fund under ORS
327.013 for post-graduate scholars participating in a program  established under section 2 [ of this
2016 Act ], chapter 109, Oregon Laws 2016 .
[(d) The appropriate amount, if any, to be  calculated for each post-graduate scholar participating
in a program established  under section 2 of this 2016 Act for purposes of calculating weighted average
daily membership for State School Fund distributions under ORS 327.013. ]
[(e)] (d) Consideration of  appropriate funding sources that are separate from the State School
Fund for post-graduate scholar programs. The consideration must include:
(A) Methods by which funds would be distributed to school districts;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1712
SB 136
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
(B) The stability and sustainability of funding sources that would be used to support at-risk
students who are not eligible for the Oregon  Promise program established under ORS 341.522 be-
cause of failure to earn the minimum cumulative grade point average; and
(C) The estimated cost required to establish and administer alternative funding sources.
(3) Provide a report to each school district that established a program under section 2 [ of this
2016 Act ], chapter 109, Oregon Laws 2016 . The report shall include the following information  for
the 2016-2017 and 2017-2018 school years:
(a) The number of post-graduate scholars enrolled at the school district who  participated in the
program;
(b) The number of post-graduate scholars enrolled at  the school district who completed a full
year in the program; and
(c) The percentage of post-graduate scholars enrolled  at the school district who participated in
the program and enrolled in a second school year at a post-secondary institution of education  after
completing the program.
SECTION 2.
 Section 9, chapter 109, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  Section 2 [ of this 2016 Act ], chapter 109, Oregon  Laws 2016,  is repealed on June 30,
[2021] 2019.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 327.006 to
327.133.
SECTION 4. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Community college costs”  means costs incurred for a course at a community college,
including tuition, fees or books for the course.
(b) “Post-graduate scholar” means a student who:
(A) Has been in grades 9 through 12 for more than a total of four school years; and
(B) Has satisfied the requirements for a high school diploma as provided in ORS  329.451
(2).
(2) A school district may not receive or expend moneys distributed from the  State School
Fund under ORS 327.013 to pay for community  college costs incurred by, or on the behalf of,
a post-graduate scholar.
SECTION 5.
(1) Section 4 of this 2017 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2021.
(2) Section 4 of this 2017 Act applies to State School Fund distributions commencing  with
the 2021-2022 distributions.
SECTION 6. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]