Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1)(a) The State  Parks and Recreation Department shall exercise good-faith
efforts to enter into an agreement with the United States Department  of the Interior’s Bu-
reau of Reclamation and Bureau of Land Management for the purpose of establishing  and
implementing an access fee for use of Owyhee Lake Road.
(b) Moneys received from  the access fee shall be used for the purposes of supporting
ongoing road maintenance, enhanced visitation infrastructure and essential road improve-
ments, including surface repairs and safety upgrades.
(2) The agreement described in subsection (1) of this section, at a minimum, must:
(a) Establish a committee consisting of representatives of:
(A) The State Parks and Recreation Department.
(B) The Bureau of Reclamation.
(C) The Bureau of Land Management.
(D) Malheur County.
(E) The road district, as described in ORS 371.055, in which  Owyhee Lake Road is located.
(b) Authorize the committee to set and adjust the access  fee and allocate moneys re-
ceived from the access fee for the purposes described in subsection (1) of this section.
(c) Require the committee to evaluate visitor data to assist  in setting or adjusting the
access fee, planning for future infrastructure needs  and ensuring continued road safety and
environmental stewardship.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2083