Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $14,000,000
to be distributed in two annual installments of $7,000,000  to the City of Salem for the purpose
of funding the  provision of fire response, emergency medical and law enforcement and public
safety services by the city.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3498