Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
NURSE LICENSURE COMPACT
SECTION 1.
The provisions of the Nurse Licensure Compact are as follows:
Nurse Licensure Compact
ARTICLE I
Findings and Declaration of Purpose
a. The party states find that:
1. The health and safety of the public  are affected by the degree of compliance with and
the effectiveness of enforcement activities related to state nurse licensure laws;
2. Violations of nurse licensure and other laws regulating the practice of nursing may
result in injury or harm to the public;
3. The  expanded mobility of nurses and the use of advanced communication technologies
as part of our nation’s health care delivery system require greater coordination and cooper-
ation among states in the areas of nurse licensure and regulation;
4. New practice modalities and technology make compliance with individual state nurse
licensure laws difficult and complex;
5. The current system  of duplicative licensure for nurses practicing in multiple states is
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2767
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cumbersome and redundant for both nurses and states; and
6. Uniformity of nurse licensure requirements throughout  the states promotes public
safety and public health benefits.
b. The general purposes of this Compact are to:
1. Facilitate the states’ responsibility to protect the public’s health and safety;
2. Ensure and encourage the cooperation of party states in the  areas of nurse licensure
and regulation;
3. Facilitate the exchange of information between party  states in the areas of nurse
regulation, investigation and adverse actions;
4. Promote compliance with the laws governing the practice of nursing in each  jurisdic-
tion;
5. Invest all  party states with the authority to hold a nurse accountable for meeting all
state practice laws in the state in which the patient is located at the time care  is rendered
through the mutual recognition of party state licenses;
6. Decrease redundancies in the consideration and issuance of nurse licenses; and
7. Provide opportunities for interstate practice by nurses who meet uniform licensure
requirements.
ARTICLE II
Definitions
As used in this Compact:
a. “Adverse action” means any administrative, civil, equitable or criminal  action per-
mitted by a state’s laws which is imposed by a licensing board or other authority against  a
nurse, including actions against an individual’s license or multistate licensure  privilege such
as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring  of the licensee, limitation on the licensee’s
practice, or any other encumbrance on licensure affecting a nurse’s authorization to  prac-
tice, including issuance of a cease and desist action.
b. “Alternative program” means a nondisciplinary monitoring program approved by  a li-
censing board.
c. “Coordinated licensure information system” means an integrated process for collect-
ing, storing and sharing information on nurse licensure  and enforcement activities related
to nurse licensure laws that  is administered by a nonprofit organization composed of and
controlled by licensing boards.
d. “Current significant investigative information” means:
1. Investigative information that a licensing board,  after a preliminary inquiry that in-
cludes notification and an opportunity for the  nurse to respond, if required by state law, has
reason to  believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate more than a minor
infraction; or
2. Investigative information that  indicates that the nurse represents an immediate threat
to public health and safety regardless of whether the nurse  has been notified and had an
opportunity to respond.
e. “Encumbrance” means a revocation or suspension of,  or any limitation on, the full and
unrestricted practice of nursing imposed by a licensing board.
f. “Home state” means the party state which is the nurse’s primary state of residence.
g. “Licensing board” means a party state’s regulatory body responsible for  issuing nurse
licenses.
[2]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
h. “Multistate license” means a license to practice as a registered or a  licensed
practical/vocational nurse (LPN/VN) issued by a home state licensing board that  authorizes
the licensed nurse to practice in all party states under a multistate licensure privilege.
i. “Multistate licensure privilege” means a legal authorization associated with a  multi-
state license permitting the practice of nursing as either a registered nurse (RN) or  LPN/VN
in a remote state.
j. “Nurse” means RN or LPN/VN, as those terms are  defined by each party state’s
practice laws.
k. “Party state” means any state that has adopted this Compact.
l. “Remote state” means a party state, other than the home state.
m. “Single-state license”  means a nurse license issued by a party state that authorizes
practice only within the issuing state and  does not include a multistate licensure privilege
to practice in any other party state.
n. “State” means a state, territory or possession of the United  States and the District
of Columbia.
o. “State practice laws” means a party state’s laws, rules and regulations that  govern
the practice of nursing, define the scope of nursing practice,  and create the methods and
grounds for  imposing discipline. “State practice laws” do not include requirements necessary
to obtain and retain a license, except for qualifications or requirements of the home state.
ARTICLE III
General Provisions and Jurisdiction
a. A multistate license to practice registered or licensed  practical/vocational nursing is-
sued by a home state to a resident in that state will be  recognized by each party state as
authorizing a nurse to practice as a registered nurse  (RN) or as a licensed
practical/vocational nurse (LPN/VN), under a multistate licensure privilege, in each party
state.
b. A state must implement procedures for considering the criminal  history records of
applicants for initial multistate license or licensure by endorsement. Such procedures shall
include the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information by applicants  for
the purpose of obtaining  an applicant’s criminal history record information from the Federal
Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that  state’s criminal re-
cords.
c. Each party state  shall require the following for an applicant to obtain or retain a
multistate license in the home state:
1. Meets the home state’s qualifications for licensure or renewal of licensure,  as well as,
all other applicable state laws;
2. i. Has graduated or is eligible to graduate from  a licensing board-approved RN or
LPN/VN prelicensure education program; or
ii. Has graduated from a foreign RN or LPN/VN prelicensure education program  that (a)
has been approved by the authorized accrediting body in  the applicable country and (b) has
been verified by an independent credentials review agency to be comparable to a licensing
board-approved prelicensure education program;
3. Has, if a graduate of a foreign  prelicensure education program not taught in English
or if English is not the individual’s native language, successfully passed an  English profi-
ciency examination that includes the components  of reading, speaking, writing and listening;
[3]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
4. Has successfully passed an NCLEX-RN or  NCLEX-PN Examination or recognized
predecessor, as applicable;
5. Is eligible for or holds an active, unencumbered license;
6. Has submitted, in connection with an application for initial licensure or licensure by
endorsement, fingerprints or other biometric data for the purpose of obtaining  criminal his-
tory record information from the Federal Bureau  of Investigation and the agency responsible
for retaining that state’s criminal records;
7. Has not been convicted or found guilty, or has entered into  an agreed disposition, of
a felony offense under applicable state or federal criminal law;
8. Has not been convicted  or found guilty, or has entered into an agreed disposition, of
a misdemeanor offense related to the practice of nursing as determined on a  case-by-case
basis;
9. Is not currently enrolled in an alternative program;
10. Is subject to self-disclosure requirements regarding current participation in an  al-
ternative program; and
11. Has a valid United States Social Security number.
d. All  party states shall be authorized, in accordance with existing state due process law,
to take adverse action against a nurse’s multistate licensure privilege such as revocation,
suspension, probation or any  other action that affects a nurse’s authorization to practice
under a multistate licensure privilege, including cease and desist  actions. If a party state
takes such action, it shall promptly notify the administrator of the  coordinated licensure
information system. The administrator of the coordinated licensure  information system shall
promptly notify the home state of any such actions by remote states.
e. A nurse practicing  in a party state must comply with the state practice laws of the
state in which the client is located at the  time service is provided. The practice of nursing
is not limited to patient care, but shall include all nursing practice as defined  by the state
practice laws of the party state in which the  client is located. The practice of nursing in a
party state under a multistate licensure privilege  will subject a nurse to the jurisdiction of
the licensing board, the courts and the laws of the party state in which the client is  located
at the time service is provided.
f. Individuals not residing in a party state shall continue to be able to apply for  a party
state’s single-state license as provided under the laws of each party state.  However, the
single-state license granted to these individuals  will not be recognized as granting the privi-
lege to practice nursing in any other party state. Nothing in this Compact  shall affect the
requirements established by a party state for the issuance of a single-state license.
g. Any nurse holding a home state multistate  license, on the effective date of this Com-
pact, may retain and renew the multistate license issued by the nurse’s then-current  home
state, provided that:
1. A nurse, who changes primary  state of residence after this Compact’s effective date,
must meet all applicable Article III.c. requirements to obtain a multistate license from a
new home state.
2. A nurse who fails to satisfy  the multistate licensure requirements in Article III.c. due
to a disqualifying event occurring  after this Compact’s effective date shall be ineligible to
retain or renew a multistate license, and the nurse’s multistate license shall  be revoked or
deactivated in accordance with applicable rules adopted by  the Interstate Commission of
[4]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators (“Commission”).
ARTICLE IV
Applications for Licensure in a Party State
a. Upon application for a multistate license, the licensing board in the  issuing party state
shall ascertain, through the coordinated licensure information  system, whether the applicant
has ever held, or is the holder of, a license  issued by any other state, whether there are any
encumbrances on any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the applicant, whether
any adverse action has been taken against  any license or multistate licensure privilege held
by the applicant and whether the applicant is currently participating in  an alternative pro-
gram.
b. A nurse may hold a multistate license, issued by the home state, in only one  party
state at a time.
c. If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving between  two party states, the
nurse must apply for licensure in the new home state, and the multistate  license issued by
the prior home state will be deactivated  in accordance with applicable rules adopted by the
Commission.
1. The nurse may apply for licensure in advance of a change in primary  state of resi-
dence.
2. A multistate license shall not be issued  by the new home state until the nurse provides
satisfactory evidence of a change in primary state of residence to the new home  state and
satisfies all applicable requirements to obtain a multistate license from the new  home state.
d. If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving from a party state to  a non-
party state, the multistate license issued by the  prior home state will convert to a single-
state license, valid only in the former home state.
ARTICLE V
Additional Authorities Invested in Party State Licensing Boards
a. In addition to the other powers conferred  by state law, a licensing board shall have the
authority to:
1. Take adverse action against a nurse’s multistate licensure privilege to practice  within
that party state.
i. Only the home state shall have the power to take adverse action against a nurse’s li-
cense issued by the home state.
ii. For purposes of taking adverse action, the home state licensing board shall give  the
same priority and effect to reported conduct received from a  remote state as it would if such
conduct had occurred within the home state. In so doing,  the home state shall apply its own
state laws to determine appropriate action.
2. Issue cease  and desist orders or impose an encumbrance on a nurse’s authority to
practice within that party state.
3. Complete any pending investigations of a nurse who changes primary state of residence
during the course of  such investigations. The licensing board shall also have the authority
to take appropriate action(s)  and shall promptly report the conclusions of such investigations
to the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system.  The administrator of
the coordinated licensure information system shall promptly notify the new home  state of
any such actions.
4. Issue subpoenas for both  hearings and investigations that require the attendance and
[5]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
testimony of witnesses, as well as, the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by  a li-
censing board in a party state  for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the pro-
duction of evidence from another party state shall be enforced in the latter  state by any
court of competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of that court appli-
cable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it. The issuing authority  shall pay
any witness fees,  travel expenses, mileage and other fees required by the service statutes
of the state in which the witnesses or evidence are located.
5. Obtain and submit, for  each nurse licensure applicant, fingerprint or other biometric-
based information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for criminal background  checks,
receive the results  of the Federal Bureau of Investigation record search on criminal back-
ground checks and use the results in making licensure decisions.
6. If otherwise permitted by state law,  recover from the affected nurse the costs of in-
vestigations and disposition  of cases resulting from any adverse action taken against that
nurse.
7. Take adverse action based on the factual findings of the remote state, provided that
the licensing board follows its own procedures for taking such adverse action.
b. If adverse action is taken by the home state against  a nurse’s multistate license, the
nurse’s multistate licensure privilege  to practice in all other party states shall be deactivated
until all encumbrances have been  removed from the multistate license. All home state dis-
ciplinary orders that impose  adverse action against a nurse’s multistate license shall include
a statement that the nurse’s multistate licensure privilege is deactivated  in all party states
during the pendency of the order.
c. Nothing  in this Compact shall override a party state’s decision that participation in
an alternative program may be used in  lieu of adverse action. The home state licensing board
shall deactivate the multistate licensure privilege under the multistate license of any  nurse
for the duration of the nurse’s participation in an alternative program.
ARTICLE VI
Coordinated Licensure Information System and Exchange of Information
a. All party states shall participate in a coordinated licensure information system  of all
licensed registered nurses (RNs) and licensed  practical/vocational nurses (LPNs/VNs). This
system will include information on the licensure and disciplinary  history of each nurse, as
submitted by party states, to assist in the coordination of nurse licensure and enforcement
efforts.
b. The Commission, in  consultation with the administrator of the coordinated licensure
information system, shall  formulate necessary and proper procedures for the identification,
collection and exchange of information under this Compact.
c. All licensing boards  shall promptly report to the coordinated licensure information
system any adverse action, any current significant investigative information,  denials of ap-
plications (with the reasons for such denials)  and nurse participation in alternative programs
known to  the licensing board regardless of whether such participation is deemed nonpublic
or confidential under state law.
d. Current significant investigative information and  participation in nonpublic or confi-
dential alternative programs shall be transmitted through the  coordinated licensure infor-
mation system only to party state licensing boards.
e. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all  party state licensing boards contrib-
[6]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
uting information to the coordinated licensure  information system may designate informa-
tion that may not be shared with nonparty states or disclosed to other  entities or individuals
without the express permission of the contributing state.
f. Any personally identifiable information obtained from the coordinated licensure  infor-
mation system by a party state licensing board shall not be shared with nonparty states or
disclosed to other entities  or individuals except to the extent permitted by the laws of the
party state contributing the information.
g. Any information contributed  to the coordinated licensure information system that is
subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the party state contributing that infor-
mation shall also be expunged from the coordinated licensure information system.
h. The Compact administrator of each party state shall furnish a uniform data set to the
Compact administrator of each other party state, which shall include, at a minimum:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Information related to alternative program participation; and
4. Other information that may  facilitate the administration of this Compact, as deter-
mined by Commission rules.
i. The Compact  administrator of a party state shall provide all investigative documents
and information requested by another party state.
ARTICLE VII
Establishment of the Interstate Commission of Nurse  Licensure Compact Administrators
a. The party  states hereby create and establish a joint public entity known as the Inter-
state Commission of Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators.
1. The Commission is an instrumentality of the party states.
2. Venue is proper, and judicial  proceedings by or against the Commission shall be
brought solely and exclusively, in a court of competent jurisdiction where the  principal office
of the Commission  is located. The Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses
to the  extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution pro-
ceedings.
3. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity.
b. Membership, Voting and Meetings
1. Each party state shall have and  be limited to one administrator. The head of the state
licensing board or designee shall be the administrator of this  Compact for each party state.
Any administrator may be removed or  suspended from office as provided by the law of the
state from which  the Administrator is appointed. Any vacancy occurring in the Commission
shall be filled in accordance with the laws of the party state in which the vacancy exists.
2. Each administrator shall be entitled  to one vote with regard to the promulgation of
rules and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have an  opportunity to participate in the
business and affairs of the Commission. An administrator shall vote in person or  by such
other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for an  administrator’s par-
ticipation in meetings by telephone or other means of communication.
3. The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar  year. Additional
meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws or rules of the commission.
4. All meetings shall be open to  the public, and public notice of meetings shall be given
in the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in Article VIII.
[7]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
5. The Commission may convene  in a closed, nonpublic meeting if the Commission must
discuss:
i. Noncompliance of a party state with its obligations under this Compact;
ii. The employment, compensation, discipline  or other personnel matters, practices or
procedures related to specific employees or other matters related  to the Commission’s
internal personnel practices and procedures;
iii. Current, threatened or reasonably anticipated litigation;
iv. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase or sale of goods, services or real estate;
v. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
vi. Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or  financial information that is privileged
or confidential;
vii. Disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure  would constitute a
clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
viii. Disclosure of investigatory records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
ix. Disclosure of information related to any reports prepared by or on behalf of the
Commission for the purpose of investigation of compliance with this Compact; or
x. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or state statute.
6. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is  closed pursuant to this provision, the
Commission’s legal counsel or designee  shall certify that the meeting may be closed and shall
reference each  relevant exempting provision. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully
and clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and  accurate
summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefor, including a description of the  views
expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action shall be  identified in such
minutes. All minutes  and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to
release by a majority vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
c. The Commission shall, by a majority vote of the administrators, prescribe bylaws  or
rules to govern its conduct as may be necessary or  appropriate to carry out the purposes
and exercise the powers of this Compact, including but not limited to:
1. Establishing the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Providing reasonable standards and procedures:
i. For the establishment and meetings of other committees; and
ii. Governing any general or specific delegation of any authority or function of the  Com-
mission;
3. Providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meetings of the Commis-
sion, ensuring reasonable advance notice of  all meetings and providing an opportunity for
attendance of such meetings by interested parties, with  enumerated exceptions designed to
protect the public’s interest, the  privacy of individuals, and proprietary information, includ-
ing trade secrets. The Commission may meet in closed session  only after a majority of the
administrators vote  to close a meeting in whole or in part. As soon as practicable, the
Commission must make public a copy of the vote  to close the meeting revealing the vote of
each administrator, with no proxy votes allowed;
4. Establishing the titles, duties and authority and reasonable procedures for  the election
of the officers of the Commission;
5. Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the establishment of the personnel
policies and programs of the Commission. Notwithstanding any civil service or other similar
[8]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
laws of any party state, the  bylaws shall exclusively govern the personnel policies and pro-
grams of the Commission; and
6. Providing a mechanism for winding up  the operations of the Commission and the eq-
uitable disposition of any surplus funds that may exist after the termination of this Compact
after the payment or reserving of all of its debts and obligations;
d. The Commission shall publish its bylaws and rules, and  any amendments thereto, in
a convenient form on the website of the Commission.
e. The Commission shall maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws.
f. The Commission shall meet and  take such actions as are consistent with the provisions
of this Compact and the bylaws.
g. The Commission shall have the following powers:
1. To  promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and coordinate implementation and admin-
istration of this Compact. The rules shall  have the force and effect of law and shall be
binding in all party states, except that only the rules  adopted by the Oregon State Board of
Nursing shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding on the State of Oregon;
2. To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the  Commission,
provided that the standing of any licensing board to sue or be  sued under applicable law shall
not be affected;
3. To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
4. To borrow, accept or contract for services of personnel,  including, but not limited to,
employees of a party state or nonprofit organizations;
5. To cooperate with other organizations that administer state compacts related to the
regulation of nursing, including but not limited to sharing administrative or staff  expenses,
office space or other resources;
6. To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such
individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of this Compact, and to establish
the Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, quali-
fications of personnel and other related personnel matters;
7. To accept any and all appropriate  donations, grants and gifts of money, equipment,
supplies, materials and services, and to receive, utilize and dispose of the same; provided that
at all times the Commission shall avoid any appearance  of impropriety or conflict of interest;
8. To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or otherwise to own, hold,
improve or use, any property, whether real, personal or mixed; provided that at all  times the
Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety;
9. To sell, convey, mortgage,  pledge, lease, exchange, abandon or otherwise dispose of any
property, whether real, personal or mixed;
10. To establish a budget and make expenditures;
11. To borrow money;
12. To appoint  committees, including advisory committees comprised of administrators,
state nursing regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and  consumer represen-
tatives, and other such interested persons;
13. To provide and receive information from, and to  cooperate with, law enforcement
agencies;
14. To adopt and use an official seal; and
15. To perform such other functions as may be necessary  or appropriate to achieve the
[9]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
purposes of this Compact consistent with the state regulation of nurse licensure  and prac-
tice.
h. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable  expenses of
its establishment, organization and ongoing activities.
2. The Commission may also levy  on and collect an annual assessment from each party
state to cover  the cost of its operations, activities and staff in its annual budget as approved
each year. The aggregate annual assessment amount, if any, shall be allocated based upon a
formula to be determined  by the Commission, which shall promulgate a rule that is binding
upon all party states.
3. The Commission shall not incur obligations of  any kind prior to securing the funds
adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Commission pledge the credit of any  of the party
states, except by, and with the authority of, such party state.
4. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all  receipts and disbursements. The
receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be  subject to the audit and accounting
procedures established under  its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds
handled by the Commission shall be audited yearly by  a certified or licensed public account-
ant, and the  report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report
of the Commission.
5. An assessment levied, or any other financial obligation imposed, under this Compact
is effective against the State of Oregon only to the extent  that moneys necessary to pay the
assessment or meet the financial obligations have been  deposited in an account established
by the Oregon State Board of Nursing pursuant to ORS 678.170.
i. Qualified Immunity, Defense and Indemnification
1. The administrators, officers,  executive director, employees and representatives of the
Commission shall be  immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official ca-
pacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil li-
ability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred,
or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis  for believing oc-
curred, within the  scope of Commission employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that
nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person from  suit or liability
for any damage, loss, injury or liability  caused by the intentional, willful or wanton miscon-
duct of that person.
2. The Commission shall defend  any administrator, officer, executive director, employee
or representative of the Commission in any civil action  seeking to impose liability arising out
of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is made
had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission  employment,
duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing  herein shall be construed to prohibit that
person from retaining his or her own counsel;  and provided further that the actual or alleged
act, error or omission did not result from that person’s intentional, willful  or wanton mis-
conduct.
3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any administrator, officer, execu-
tive director, employee or representative of the Commission for the  amount of any settle-
ment or judgment obtained against that person arising out  of any actual or alleged act, error
[10]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or omission that occurred within the scope of  Commission employment, duties or responsi-
bilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within  the scope
of Commission employment, duties  or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act,
error or omission did not result from  the intentional, willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.
ARTICLE VIII
Rulemaking
a. A. The Commission shall exercise  its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set
forth in this Article and the rules adopted  thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become
binding as of the date specified in each rule  or amendment and shall have the same force and
effect as provisions of this Compact.
B. Notwithstanding Article VIII a.A., the Oregon State Board of  Nursing shall review the
rules of the Commission. The board may approve and adopt the rules of  the Commission as
rules of the board.  The State of Oregon is subject to a rule of the Commission only if the rule
of the Commission is adopted by the board.
b. Rules or amendments to the rules  shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of
the Commission.
c. Prior to  promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the Commission, and at
least 60 days in advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered  and voted upon,
the Commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission; and
2. On the website of each licensing board or the  publication in which each state would
otherwise publish proposed rules.
d. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
1. The proposed time, date and location of the meeting in which the rule will be  consid-
ered and voted upon;
2. The text of the proposed rule or amendment, and the reason for the proposed rule;
3. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and
4. The manner in which interested persons may submit  notice to the Commission of their
intention to attend the public hearing and any written comments.
e. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission shall  allow persons to submit
written data, facts, opinions and arguments, which shall be made available to the public.
f. The Commission shall grant an opportunity  for a public hearing before it adopts a rule
or amendment.
g. The Commission shall publish the place, time and date of the scheduled  public hearing.
1. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing  each person who wishes to com-
ment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing. All  hearings will be
recorded, and a copy will be made available upon request.
2. Nothing in this section  shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule.
Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Commission at hearings  required by this
section.
h. If no one appears at the public hearing, the Commission  may proceed with
promulgation of the proposed rule.
i. Following the scheduled hearing date, or by  the close of business on the scheduled
hearing date if  the hearing was not held, the Commission shall consider all written and oral
[11]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
comments received.
j. The Commission shall,  by majority vote of all administrators, take final action on the
proposed rule and shall determine  the effective date of the rule, if any, based on the
rulemaking record and the full text of the rule.
k. Upon determination that  an emergency exists, the Commission may consider and
adopt an emergency  rule without prior notice, opportunity for comment or hearing, provided
that the usual rulemaking procedures  provided in this Compact and in this section shall be
retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than 90 days
after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency  rule is
one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or party state funds; or
3. Meet a deadline for the  promulgation of an administrative rule that is required by
federal law or rule.
l. The Commission  may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or amendment for
purposes of correcting  typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency or
grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the  website of the
Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of  30 days
after posting. The revision may be  challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a
material change to a rule. A  challenge shall be made in writing, and delivered to the Com-
mission, prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will  take
effect without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may  not take effect
without the approval of the Commission.
ARTICLE IX
Oversight, Dispute Resolution and Enforcement
a. Oversight
1. Each party state shall enforce  this Compact and take all actions necessary and ap-
propriate to effectuate this Compact’s  purposes and intent. The provisions of this Compact
and the rules promulgated hereunder and  adopted by the Oregon State Board of Nursing
shall have standing as statutory law.
2. The Commission shall be  entitled to receive service of process in any proceeding that
may affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the Commission,  and shall have standing
to intervene in such  a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide service of process in
such proceeding to the Commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the Com-
mission, this Compact or promulgated rules.
b. Default, Technical Assistance and Termination
1. If  the Commission determines that a party state has defaulted in the performance of
its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or the  promulgated rules, the Com-
mission shall:
i. Provide written notice to  the defaulting state and other party states of the nature of
the default, the proposed means of curing the default or  any other action to be taken by the
Commission; and
ii. Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.
2. If a state in default fails to  cure the default, the defaulting state’s membership in this
Compact may be terminated  upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the administrators,
[12]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this  Compact may be terminated on the
effective date of termination. A  cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of
obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
3. Termination  of membership in this Compact shall be imposed only after all other
means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend  or terminate
shall be given by the Commission to the  governor of the defaulting state and to the executive
officer of the defaulting state’s licensing board and each of the party states.
4. A state whose membership in this Compact  has been terminated is responsible for all
assessments, obligations and liabilities incurred through the  effective date of termination,
including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.
5. The Commission  shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in de-
fault or  whose membership in this Compact has been terminated unless agreed upon in
writing between the Commission and the defaulting state.
6. The defaulting  state may appeal the action of the Commission by petitioning the U.S.
District Court for the District of Columbia  or the federal district in which the Commission
has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of  such litigation,
including reasonable attorneys’ fees.
c. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a party state, the Commission shall attempt to resolve disputes re-
lated to the Compact that arise among party states and between party and nonparty states.
2. The Commission shall promulgate  a rule providing for both mediation and binding
dispute resolution for disputes, as appropriate.
3. In the event the Commission cannot resolve disputes among  party states arising under
this Compact:
i. The party states may submit the issues  in dispute to an arbitration panel, which will
be comprised of individuals appointed by the Compact administrator in  each of the affected
party states and an individual mutually agreed upon by the Compact administrators of all the
party states involved in the dispute.
ii. The decision of a majority of the arbitrators shall be final and binding.
d. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its  discretion, shall enforce the pro-
visions and rules of this Compact.
2. By majority vote,  the Commission may initiate legal action in the U.S. District Court
for the District of  Columbia or the federal district in which the Commission has its principal
offices against a party state that is in default  to enforce compliance with the provisions of
this Compact and  its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event  judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing
party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorneys’ fees.
3. The remedies  herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission. The
Commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law.
ARTICLE X
Effective Date, Withdrawal and Amendment
a. This Compact shall become effective and binding on the date of legislative  enactment
of this Compact into law by no less  than 26 states. All party states to this Compact, that also
were parties to the prior  Nurse Licensure Compact, superseded by this Compact, (“Prior
[13]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Compact”), shall be deemed to have withdrawn from  said Prior Compact within six months
after the effective date of this Compact.
b. Each party state to this Compact shall continue to recognize a nurse’s multistate
licensure privilege to practice in that party state issued under the Prior Compact  until such
party state has withdrawn from the Prior Compact.
c. Any party state may  withdraw from this Compact by enacting a statute repealing the
same. A party state’s  withdrawal shall not take effect until six months after enactment of
the repealing statute.
d. A party state’s withdrawal or termination shall not affect the  continuing requirement
of the withdrawing or terminated state’s licensing board to  report adverse actions and sig-
nificant investigations occurring prior to the effective date of such withdrawal or termi-
nation.
e. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed  to invalidate or prevent any
nurse licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a party state  and a
nonparty state that is made in accordance with the other provisions of this Compact.
f. This Compact may be amended by the party states. No amendment to  this Compact
shall become effective and binding upon the party states  unless and until it is enacted into
the laws of all party states.
g. Representatives  of nonparty states to this Compact shall be invited to participate in
the activities of  the Commission, on a nonvoting basis, prior to the adoption of this Compact
by all states.
ARTICLE XI
Construction and Severability
This Compact shall be  liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. The
provisions of this Compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision
of this Compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party state or of  the
United States, or if  the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circum-
stance is held  invalid, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability
thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If
this Compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution  of any party state, this Com-
pact shall remain in full force and effect as to the  remaining party states and in full force
and effect as to the party state affected as to all severable matters.
SECTION 2. The Legislative Assembly of Oregon hereby ratifies the  Nurse Licensure
Compact set forth in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
AMENDMENTS
SECTION 3.  ORS 678.021 is amended to read:
678.021. (1) It shall be unlawful for any person to practice  nursing or offer to practice nursing
in this state or to use any title or abbreviation, sign, card or device to indicate the person  is prac-
ticing either practical or registered nursing  unless the person is licensed under ORS 678.010 to
678.410 at the level for which the indication of practice is made and the license is valid and in effect.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to an individual who is authorized to
[14]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
practice as a nurse by multistate licensure privilege as defined in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 678.023 is amended to read:
678.023. (1)(a) An individual may not use the title “nurse” unless the individual:
[(1)] (A) Has earned a nursing degree or a nursing certificate from a nursing education  program
that is:
[(a)] (i) Approved by the Oregon State Board of Nursing; or
[(b)] (ii) Accredited or approved  by another state or United States territory as described under
ORS 678.010 and approved by the board; and
[(2)] (b) Is licensed by a health professional regulatory board as defined in ORS 676.160 to
practice the particular health care  profession in which the individual’s nursing degree or nursing
certificate was earned.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to an individual who is authorized to
practice as a nurse by multistate licensure privilege as defined in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 5.  ORS 678.170 is amended to read:
678.170. (1) All  money received by the Oregon State Board of Nursing under ORS 678.010 to
678.448 shall be paid into the General  Fund in the State Treasury and placed to the credit of the
Oregon State Board of Nursing Account. The board may establish an additional account for the
purpose of meeting financial obligations imposed on the State  of Oregon as a result of this
state’s participation in the Nurse  Licensure Compact established under section 1 of this 2021
Act.
(2) [ Such moneys are appropriated continuously and shall ] The moneys paid into the accounts
described in subsection (1) of  this section are continuously appropriated to the board and
may be used only for the administration and enforcement of  ORS 676.850, 676.860 and 678.010 to
678.448 and for the purpose of meeting financial obligations imposed on the State of Oregon
as a result of this state’s participation in the Nurse Licensure Compact established  under
section 1 of this 2021 Act .
[(2)] (3) The board shall keep a record of  all moneys deposited in the Oregon State Board of
Nursing Account. This record shall indicate by separate cumulative accounts the source from which
the moneys are derived and the individual activity or program against which each withdrawal  is
charged.
[(3)] (4) The  board may maintain a petty cash fund in compliance with ORS 293.180 in the
amount of $1,000.
SECTION 6.
(1) The amendments to ORS 678.021 and  678.023 by sections 3 and 4 of this
2021 Act apply to individuals authorized to practice nursing by multistate licensure privilege
on or after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 678.170 by section 5 of this 2021 Act apply to moneys received
by the Oregon State Board of Nursing on or after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
INTERSTATE MEDICAL LICENSURE COMPACT
SECTION 7.
The provisions of the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact are as follows:
INTERSTATE MEDICAL LICENSURE COMPACT
SECTION 1. PURPOSE
[15]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
In order to strengthen access to health  care, and in recognition of the advances in the
delivery of health care, the member states  of the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact have
allied in common purpose to develop a comprehensive process that complements the existing
licensing and  regulatory authority of state medical boards, provides a streamlined process
that allows physicians to  become licensed in multiple states, thereby enhancing the porta-
bility of a medical  license and ensuring the safety of patients. The Compact creates another
pathway for  licensure and does not otherwise change a state’s existing Medical Practice Act.
The Compact also adopts the prevailing standard for licensure and  affirms that the practice
of medicine occurs where the patient is  located at the time of the physician-patient en-
counter, and therefore, requires the physician to be under the jurisdiction of the state med-
ical board where the  patient is located. State medical boards that participate in the Compact
retain the jurisdiction to impose  an adverse action against a license to practice medicine in
that state issued to a physician through the procedures in the Compact.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
In this compact:
(a) “Bylaws” means those  bylaws established by the Interstate Commission pursuant to
Section 11.
(b) “Commissioner” means  the voting representative appointed by each member board
pursuant to Section 11.
(c) “Conviction” means a finding by a court that an individual is  guilty of a criminal of-
fense through adjudication, or entry of a plea of guilt or no contest to the  charge by the
offender. Evidence of an entry of a conviction of  a criminal offense by the court shall be
considered final for purposes of disciplinary action by a member board.
(d) “Expedited License” means a full  and unrestricted medical license granted by a
member state to an eligible physician through the process set forth in the Compact.
(e) “Interstate Commission” means the interstate  commission created pursuant to Sec-
tion 11.
(f) “License” means authorization by a member state for a physician to engage in  the
practice of medicine, which would be unlawful without authorization.
(g) “Medical Practice Act” means laws and regulations  governing the practice of
allopathic and osteopathic medicine within a member state.
(h) “Member Board” means a state agency in a member state that acts in  the sovereign
interests of the state by protecting the public through licensure, regulation, and education
of physicians as directed by the state government.
(i) “Member State” means a state that has enacted the Compact.
(j) “Practice of Medicine”  means that clinical prevention, diagnosis, or treatment of hu-
man disease, injury, or condition requiring a  physician to obtain and maintain a license in
compliance with the Medical Practice Act of a member state. The “practice of  medicine” is
also as described in ORS 677.085.
(k) “Physician” means any person who:
1) Is a graduate of a medical school  accredited by the Liaison Committee on Medical
Education, the  Commission on Osteopathic College Accreditation, or a medical school listed
in the International Medical Education Directory or its equivalent;
2) Passed each component of  the United State Medical Licensing Examination (USMLE)
or the Comprehensive Osteopathic Medical Licensing Examination  (COMLEX-USA) within
[16]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
three attempts, or any of its predecessor examinations accepted by a state  medical board as
an equivalent examination for licensure purposes;
3) Successfully completed graduate medical education approved by  the Accreditation
Council for Graduate Medical Education or the American Osteopathic Association;
4) Holds specialty certification or  a time-unlimited specialty certificate recognized by the
American Board of  Medical Specialties or the American Osteopathic Association’s Bureau
of Osteopathic Specialists;
5) Possesses a full and unrestricted license to engage in the practice of medicine issued
by a member board;
6) Has never been convicted, received adjudication,  deferred adjudication, community
supervision, or deferred disposition for any offense by a court of appropriate jurisdiction;
7) Has never held a license authorizing the practice  of medicine subjected to discipline
by a licensing agency  in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, excluding any action re-
lated to nonpayment of fees related to a license;
8) Has  never had a controlled substance license or permit suspended or revoked by a
state or the United States Drug Enforcement Administration; and
9) Is not under active investigation by  a licensing agency or law enforcement authority
in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction.
(l) “Offense” means a felony, gross misdemeanor, or crime of moral turpitude.
(m) “Rule”  means a written statement by the Interstate Commission promulgated pur-
suant to Section 12 of the Compact that is of general applicability,  implements, interprets,
or prescribes a policy or provision  of the Compact, or an organizational, procedural, or
practice requirement of the Interstate Commission, and has the force and  effect of statutory
law in a member state, and includes the  amendment, repeal, or suspension of an existing
rule.
(n) “State” means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United States.
(o) “State of Principal License” means a member state where a  physician holds a license
to practice medicine and which has been  designated as such by the physician for purposes
of registration and participation in the Compact.
SECTION 3. ELIGIBILITY
(a) A physician must meet the eligibility requirements as defined in Section 2(k)  to re-
ceive an expedited license under the terms and provisions of the Compact.
(b) A physician who does not meet the  requirements of Section 2(k) may obtain a license
to practice medicine in a member state if the individual complies with all laws  and require-
ments, other than the Compact, relating to the issuance of a license to practice medicine in
that state.
SECTION 4. DESIGNATION OF STATE OF PRINCIPAL LICENSE
(a) A  physician shall designate a member state as the state of principal license for pur-
poses of registration  for expedited licensure through the Compact if the physician possesses
a full and unrestricted license to practice medicine in that state, and the state is:
1) The state of principal residence for the physician, or
2) The state where at least 25 percent of the practice of medicine occurs, or
3) The location of the physician’s employer, or
4) If no state qualifies under subsection (1), subsection (2),  or subsection (3), the state
designated as state of residence for purpose of federal income tax.
[17]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) A physician may redesignate a member state as state of principal license at  any time,
as long as the state meets the requirements of subsection (a).
(c) The  Interstate Commission is authorized to develop rules to facilitate redesignation
of another member state as the state of principal license.
SECTION 5. APPLICATION AND ISSUANCE OF EXPEDITED LICENSURE
(a) A physician seeking licensure through the  Compact shall file an application for an
expedited license with the member board of the state selected by the  physician as the state
of principal license.
(b) Upon receipt of an application for an expedited license, the member board  within the
state selected as the state of principal license shall evaluate whether the physician is eligible
for expedited licensure and issue a letter of  qualification, verifying or denying the physician’s
eligibility, to the Interstate Commission.
1) Static qualifications, which  include verification of medical education, graduate medical
education, results of any  medical or licensing examination, and other qualifications as de-
termined by the Interstate Commission through rule, shall not  be subject to additional pri-
mary source verification where already primary source verified  by the state of principal
license.
2) The member board within the state selected as the state of principal license shall, in
the course of verifying eligibility, perform a criminal  background check of an applicant, in-
cluding the use of the results of fingerprint or  other biometric data checks compliant with
the requirements of the Federal  Bureau of Investigation, with the exception of federal em-
ployees who have suitability determination in accordance with 5 C.F.R. §731.202.
3) Appeal on the determination of eligibility shall  be made to the member state where the
application was filed and shall be subject to the law of that state.
(c) Upon verification in subsection (b),  physicians eligible for an expedited license shall
complete the registration  process established by the Interstate Commission to receive a li-
cense in a member state selected pursuant to subsection (a),  including the payment of any
applicable fees.
(d) After receiving verification of eligibility under subsection (b)  and any fees under
subsection (c),  a member board shall issue an expedited license to the physician. This license
shall authorize  the physician to practice medicine in the issuing state consistent with the
Medical Practice Act and all applicable laws  and regulations of the issuing member board and
member state.
(e) An expedited license shall be valid for a period consistent  with the licensure period
in the  member state and in the same manner as required for other physicians holding a full
and unrestricted license within the member state.
(f) An expedited license obtained through the Compact shall be terminated if a  physician
fails to maintain a license in the state of principal  licensure for a nondisciplinary reason,
without redesignation of a new state of principal licensure.
(g) The Interstate Commission is authorized to develop rules regarding the application
process, including payment of any applicable fees, and the issuance of an expedited license.
SECTION 6. FEES FOR EXPEDITED LICENSURE
(a) A member state issuing an expedited license authorizing  the practice of medicine in
that state may impose a fee for a license issued or renewed through the Compact.
(b) The Interstate Commission is authorized to develop rules regarding fees for  expedited
[18]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
licenses.
SECTION 7. RENEWAL AND CONTINUED PARTICIPATION
(a) A physician seeking to renew an expedited license granted  in a member state shall
complete a renewal process with the Interstate Commission if the physician:
1) Maintains a full and unrestricted license in a state of principal license;
2) Has not been convicted, received adjudication,  deferred adjudication, community
supervision, or deferred disposition for any offense by a court of appropriate jurisdiction;
3) Has not had a  license authorizing the practice of medicine subject to discipline by a
licensing agency in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction,  excluding any action related to
nonpayment of fees related to a license; and
4) Has  not had a controlled substance license or permit suspended or revoked by a state
or the United States Drug Enforcement Administration.
(b) Physicians shall comply with all  continuing professional development or continuing
medical education requirements for renewal of a license issued by a member state.
(c) The Interstate Commission shall collect any renewal fees charged  for the renewal of
a license and distribute the fees to the applicable member board.
(d) Upon receipt of any renewal fees collected in subsection (c), a member board shall
renew the physician’s license.
(e) Physician  information collected by the Interstate Commission during the renewal
process will be distributed to all member boards.
(f) The Interstate  Commission is authorized to develop rules to address renewal of li-
censes obtained through the Compact.
SECTION 8. COORDINATED INFORMATION SYSTEM
(a) The Interstate Commission shall establish a database of all  physicians licensed, or
who have applied for licensure, under Section 5.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, member boards shall report to the
Interstate Commission any  public action or complaints against a licensed physician who has
applied or received an expedited license through the Compact.
(c) Member boards shall report disciplinary  or investigatory information determined as
necessary and proper by rule of the Interstate Commission.
(d) Member boards may report any nonpublic complaint,  disciplinary, or investigatory
information not required by subsection (c) to the Interstate Commission.
(e) Member boards shall share complaint or disciplinary information about a  physician
upon request of another member board.
(f) All information provided to the Interstate Commission or distributed  by member
boards shall be confidential, filed under seal, and used only for investigatory or  disciplinary
matters.
(g) The Interstate Commission is authorized to  develop rules for mandated or discre-
tionary sharing of information by member boards.
SECTION 9. JOINT INVESTIGATIONS
(a) Licensure and disciplinary records of physicians are deemed investigative.
(b) In addition to the authority granted to a  member board by its respective Medical
Practice Act or other applicable state law, a  member board may participate with other
member boards in joint investigations of physicians licensed by the member boards.
(c) A subpoena issued by a member state shall be enforceable in other member states.
[19]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Member boards may share any investigative, litigation, or compliance materials in
furtherance of any joint or individual investigation initiated under the Compact.
(e) Any member state may investigate actual or alleged violations of the statutes  au-
thorizing the practice of medicine in any other member state in which a physician holds  a
license to practice medicine.
SECTION 10. DISCIPLINARY ACTIONS
(a) Any disciplinary action taken by any member board  against a physician licensed
through the  Compact shall be deemed unprofessional conduct which may be subject to dis-
cipline by other member  boards, in addition to any violation of the Medical Practice Act or
regulations in that state.
(b) If a license granted to a physician by  the member board in the state of principal li-
cense is revoked,  surrendered or relinquished in lieu of discipline, or suspended, then all li-
censes issued to the physician by member boards shall automatically be placed,  without
further action necessary by any member board, on the same status. If the member board  in
the state of principal license subsequently reinstates the  physician’s license, a license issued
to the physician by any other member board shall remain encumbered until that respective
member board takes action to reinstate the license in a manner consistent  with the Medical
Practice Act of that state.
(c) If disciplinary action is taken against a  physician by a member board not in the state
of principal license, any other member board may deem the  action conclusive as to matter
of law and fact decided, and:
1) Impose the same or lesser sanction(s) against the physician so long as  such sanctions
are consistent with the Medical Practice Act of that state; or
2) Pursue separate disciplinary action against the physician under  its respective Medical
Practice Act, regardless of the action taken in other member states.
(d) If  a license granted to a physician by a member board is revoked, surrendered or re-
linquished in lieu of  discipline, or suspended, then any license(s) issued to the physician by
any other member board(s) shall be suspended,  automatically and immediately without fur-
ther action necessary by the other member board(s), for 90 days upon entry  of the order by
the disciplining board, to permit the member board(s) to investigate the basis for the action
under the Medical Practice Act of  that state. A member board may terminate the automatic
suspension of the license it issued prior to the completion of  the 90 day suspension period in
a manner consistent with the Medical Practice Act of that state.
SECTION 11. INTERSTATE MEDICAL LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION
(a) The member states hereby create the “Interstate  Medical Licensure Compact Com-
mission”.
(b) The purpose of the Interstate Commission is the administration of the  Interstate
Medical Licensure Compact, which is a discretionary state function.
(c) The Interstate Commission shall be a  body corporate and joint agency of the member
states and shall have  all the responsibilities, powers, and duties set forth in the Compact,
and such additional powers  as may be conferred upon it by a subsequent concurrent action
of the respective legislatures of the member states in accordance with the terms of  the
Compact.
(d) The Interstate Commission  shall consist of two voting representatives appointed by
each member state who shall serve as Commissioners. In states where allopathic and
[20]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
osteopathic physicians are regulated by separate member boards, or if the licensing and dis-
ciplinary authority is split between separate member  boards, or if the licensing and discipli-
nary authority is split between multiple member boards within  a member state, the member
state shall appoint one representative from each member  board. A Commissioner shall be
a(n):
1) Allopathic or osteopathic physician appointed to a member board;
2) Executive director, executive secretary, or similar executive of a member board; or
3) Member of the public appointed to a member board.
(e) The Interstate Commission  shall meet at least once each calendar year. A portion of
this meeting shall be a business meeting to address such matters as  may properly come be-
fore the Commission, including  the election of officers. The chairperson may call additional
meetings and shall call for a meeting upon the request of a majority of the member states.
(f) The bylaws may provide for meetings of the Interstate Commission to be  conducted
by telecommunication or electronic communication.
(g) Each Commissioner participating at a meeting of the Interstate Commission is  enti-
tled to one vote. A majority of Commissioners shall constitute  a quorum for the transaction
of business, unless a larger quorum is required by the bylaws of the Interstate Commission.
A Commission shall not delegate a vote to  another Commissioner. In the absence of its
Commissioner, a member state may delegate voting authority for  a specified meeting to an-
other person from that state who shall meet the requirements of subsection (d).
(h) The Interstate Commission shall provide public notice of all meetings and all meetings
shall be open to  the public. The Interstate Commission may close a meeting, in full or in
portion, where it determines by a two-thirds vote of the  Commissioners present that an open
meeting would be likely to:
1) Relate solely to the internal personnel  practice and procedures of the Interstate
Commission;
2) Discuss matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal statute;
3) Discuss trade secrets, commercial, or  financial information that is privileged or con-
fidential;
4) Involve accusing a person of a crime, or formally censuring a person;
5) Discuss information of a personal nature where disclosure  would constitute a clearly
unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
6) Discuss investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes; or
7) Specifically relate to the participation in a civil action or other legal proceeding.
(i) The Interstate Commission shall keep minutes which shall  fully describe all matters
discussed in a meeting and shall provide a  full and accurate summary of actions taken, in-
cluding record of any roll call votes.
(j) The Interstate  Commission shall make its information and official records, to the ex-
tent not otherwise designated in the Compact or by its rules, available to the public  for in-
spection.
(k) The Interstate Commission shall establish an executive  committee, which shall in-
clude officers, members, and others as determined by the  bylaws. The executive committee
shall have the power to act on behalf of the  Interstate Commission, with the exception of
rulemaking, during periods when the Interstate Commission  is not in session. When acting
on behalf of the Interstate Commission, the  executive committee shall oversee the adminis-
[21]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tration of the Compact including enforcement and compliance with the  provisions of the
Compact, its bylaws and rules, and other such duties as necessary.
(l) The Interstate  Commission shall establish other committees for governance and ad-
ministration of the Compact.
SECTION 12. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION
(a) Oversee and maintain the administration of the Compact;
(b) Promulgate rules which shall be binding to the extent and in the manner provided for
in the Compact;
(c) Issue, upon the request of a member state or member board, advisory opinions  con-
cerning the meaning or interpretation of the Compact, its bylaws, rules, and actions;
(d) Enforce compliance with Compact provisions, the rules promulgated  by the Interstate
Commission, and the bylaws, using all necessary and proper means, including but not  limited
to the use of judicial process;
(e) Establish and appoint  committees including, but not limited to, an executive com-
mittee as required by Section 11, which shall have the  power to act on behalf of the Inter-
state Commission in carrying out its powers and duties;
(f) Pay, or provide for the payment of the  expenses related to the establishment, organ-
ization, and ongoing activities of the Interstate Commission;
(g) Establish and maintain one or more offices;
(h) Borrow, accept, hire, or contract for services of personnel;
(i) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
(j) Employ an executive director who shall have such powers to employ, select or appoint
employees, agents, or consultants, and to  determine their qualifications, define their duties,
and fix their compensation;
(k) Establish personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, rates of
compensation, and qualifications of personnel;
(l) Accept donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials,  and services
and to receive, utilize, and dispose of it  in a manner consistent with the conflict of interest
policies established by the Interstate Commission;
(m) Lease, purchase, accept contributions  or donations of, or otherwise to own, hold,
improve or use, any property, real, personal, or mixed;
(n) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of  any
property, real, personal, or mixed;
(o) Establish a budget and make expenditures;
(p) Adopt a seal and  bylaws governing the management and operation of the Interstate
Commission;
(q) Report annually  to the legislatures and governors of the member states concerning
the activities of the Interstate Commission during the preceding year. Such reports shall also
include reports of financial audits and any recommendations that may have been  adopted by
the Interstate Commission;
(r) Coordinate education, training, and public awareness regarding  the Compact, its im-
plementation, and its operation;
(s) Maintain records in accordance with the bylaws;
(t) Seek and obtain trademarks, copyrights, and patents; and
(u) Perform such  functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purpose
[22]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of the Compact.
SECTION 13. FINANCE POWERS
(a) The Interstate Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment  from each
member state to cover the cost of the operations  and activities of the Interstate Commission
and its staff. The total assessment must be sufficient to  cover the annual budget approved
each year for which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate  annual assess-
ment amount  shall be allocated upon a formula to be determined by the Interstate Commis-
sion, which shall promulgate a rule binding upon all member states.
(b) The Interstate Commission  shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing
the funds adequate to meet the same.
(c) The Interstate Commission shall not pledge the  credit of any of the member states,
except by, and with the authority of, the member state.
(d) The Interstate Commission shall  be subject to a yearly financial audit conducted by
a certified or licensed accountant and the report of the audit shall  be included in the annual
report of the Interstate Commission.
(e) An assessment levied, or any other financial obligation imposed,  under this Compact
is effective against the State of Oregon only to the extent  that moneys necessary to pay the
assessment or meet the financial obligations  have been deposited in an account established
by the Oregon Medical Board pursuant to ORS 677.290.
SECTION 14. ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION
(a) The Interstate  Commission shall, by a majority of Commissioners present and voting,
adopt bylaws to govern its conduct as  may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the
purposes of the Compact within 12 months of the first Interstate Commission meeting.
(b) The Interstate  Commission shall elect or appoint annually from among its Commis-
sioners a chairperson, a vice-chairperson, and a treasurer, each  of whom shall have such
authority and duties as may be  specified in the bylaws. The chairperson, or in the
chairperson’s absence or disability,  the vice-chairperson, shall preside at all meetings of the
Interstate Commission.
(c) Officers selected in subsection (b) shall  serve without remuneration for the Interstate
Commission.
(d) The officers and employees of the Interstate Commission shall be immune from suit
and liability, either personally  or in their official property or personal injury or other civil
liability caused or arising out of, or relating to, an actual or alleged act, error, or omission
that occurred, or  that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred, within the
scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties,  or responsibilities; provided that such
person shall not be protected from  suit or liability for damage, loss, injury, or liability caused
by the intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of such person.
(e) The liability of the executive director and employees of  the Interstate Commission or
representatives of  the Interstate Commission, acting within the scope of such person’s em-
ployment or duties for acts,  errors, or omissions occurring within such person’s state, may
not exceed the limits of liability  set forth under the constitution and laws of that state for
state officials, employees, and agents. The Interstate Commission  is considered to be an
instrumentality of the states for the purpose of any  such action. Nothing in this subsection
shall be construed to protect such  person from suit or liability for damage, loss, injury, or
liability caused by the intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of such person.
[23]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(f) The Interstate Commission shall defend the executive director, its employees,  and
subject to the approval of the  attorney general or other appropriate legal counsel of the
member state represented by an Interstate Commission  representative, shall defend such
Interstate Commission representative in any civil action seeking  to impose liability arising
out of an actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of Interstate
Commission employment,  duties or responsibilities, or that the defendant had a reasonable
basis for believing occurred within the scope of Interstate Commission  employment, duties,
or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result
from intentional or willful and wanton misconduct on the part of such person.
(g) To the extent not covered by the state involved,  member state, or the Interstate
Commission, the representatives  or employees of the Interstate Commission shall be held
harmless in the amount  of a settlement or judgement, including attorney’s fees and costs,
obtained against such persons arising out of an actual or alleged act, error, or omission that
occurred within the scope of the Interstate Commission employment, duties, or responsibil-
ities, or that such persons had  a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
Interstate Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the  actual or
alleged act, error, or  omission did not result from intentional or willful and wanton miscon-
duct on the part of such person.
SECTION 15. RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION
(a) 1) The Interstate Commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order to effectively
and efficiently achieve the purpose of  the Compact. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the
event the Interstate Commission exercises its  rulemaking authority in a manner that is be-
yond the scope of the purposes of the Compact, or the  powers granted hereunder, then such
an action by the Interstate Commission shall be invalid and have no force or effect.
2) Notwithstanding subsection (1), the Oregon Medical  Board shall review the rules of the
Interstate Commission. The board may approve and  adopt the rules of the Interstate Com-
mission as  rules of the board. The State of Oregon is subject to a rule of the Interstate
Commission only if the rule of the Interstate Commission is adopted by the board.
(b) Rules  deemed appropriate for the operations of the Interstate Commission shall be
made pursuant  to a rulemaking process that substantially conforms to the “Model State
Administrative Procedure Act” of 2010, and subsequent amendments thereto.
(c) Not later than 30 days after a rule is promulgated, any person may file a petition for
judicial review of the rule in the United States District Court for  the District of Columbia
or the federal district where the Interstate Commission has  its principal offices, provided
that the filing of such a petition shall not stay or otherwise prevent  the rule from becoming
effective unless the court finds that the petitioner has a substantial likelihood of success.
The court shall give deference to the actions of  the Interstate Commission consistent with
applicable law and shall not find the rule to be unlawful if the rule represents  a reasonable
exercise of the authority granted to the Interstate Commission.
SECTION 16. OVERSIGHT OF INTERSTATE COMPACT
(a) The executive, legislative, and judicial branches of state government in each  member
state shall  enforce the Compact and shall take all actions necessary and appropriate to
effectuate the Compact’s purposes and intent. The provisions of the Compact  and the rules
promulgated hereunder shall have standing as statutory law  but shall not override existing
state authority to regulate the practice of medicine. The provisions of this Compact and  the
[24]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
rules promulgated hereunder and adopted by the Oregon Medical Board shall  have standing
as statutory law.
(b) All courts shall  take judicial notice of the Compact and the rules in any judicial or
administrative proceeding in a member state pertaining to the subject matter of the Compact
which may affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the Interstate Commission.
(c) The Interstate Commission shall be entitled to receive all services of process  in any
such proceeding, and shall have standing to  intervene in the proceeding for all purposes.
Failure to provide service of process to the Interstate Commission shall  render a judgment
or order void as to the Interstate Commission, the Compact, or promulgated rules.
SECTION 17. ENFORCEMENT OF INTERSTATE COMPACT
(a) The Interstate Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall  enforce
the provisions and rules of the Compact.
(b) The Interstate Commission may, by majority vote of  the Commissioners, initiate legal
action in the United States Court for the District of Columbia, or, at the discretion of the
Interstate Commission, in the federal district  where the Interstate Commission has its
principal offices, to enforce  compliance with the provisions of the Compact, and its
promulgated rules and bylaws, against a member  state in default. The relief sought may in-
cluding both injunctive relief and damages.  In the event judicial enforcement is necessary,
the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation including reasonable
attorney’s fees.
(c) The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies  of the Interstate Commis-
sion. The Interstate Commission  may avail itself of any other remedies available under state
law or regulation of a profession.
SECTION 18. DEFAULT PROCEDURES
(a) The grounds for default  include, but are not limited to, failure of a member state to
perform such obligations or responsibilities imposed  upon it by the Compact, or the rules and
bylaws of the Interstate Commission promulgated under the Compact.
(b) If the Interstate Commission determines that a member state has defaulted  in the
performance of its obligations or responsibilities under  the Compact, or the bylaws or
promulgated rules, the Interstate Commission shall:
1) Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other member states, of the nature
of the default, the means of curing the default, and any action taken  by the Interstate
Commission. The Interstate Commission shall specify the conditions by  which the defaulting
state must cure its default; and
2) Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.
(c) If the defaulting state fails to cure  the default, the defaulting state shall be termi-
nated from the Compact upon an  affirmative vote of a majority of the Commissioners and
all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred by the Compact shall terminate on the  effective
date of termination. A cure of  the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations
or liabilities incurred during the period of the default.
(d) Termination of membership in the Compact  shall be imposed only after all other
means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent  to terminate shall be
given by  the Interstate Commission to the governor, the majority and minority leaders of
the defaulting state’s legislature, and each of the member states.
(e) The Interstate Commission shall establish rules and procedures to address  licenses
[25]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and physicians that are materially impacted by the  termination of a member state, or the
withdrawal of a member state.
(f) The member state which has been terminated is responsible for  all dues, obligations,
and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination including  obligations, the
performance of which extends beyond the effective date of termination.
(g) The Interstate Commission  shall not bear any costs relating to any state that has
been found to be in default or which  has been terminated from the Compact, unless other-
wise mutually agreed upon in writing between the Interstate Commission and the defaulting
state.
(h) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the  Interstate Commission by peti-
tioning the United States District Court for the District of  Columbia or the federal district
where the Interstate Commission has its principal  offices. The prevailing party shall be
awarded all costs of such litigation including reasonable attorney’s fees.
SECTION 19. DISPUTE RESOLUTION
(a) The Interstate Commission shall attempt, upon the request of a  member state, to
resolve disputes which are subject to the  Compact and which may arise among member
states or member boards.
(b) The Interstate Commission shall promulgate rules providing for both mediation  and
binding dispute resolution as appropriate.
SECTION 20. MEMBER STATES, EFFECTIVE DATE, AND AMENDMENT
(a) Any state is eligible to become a member of the Compact.
(b) The Compact shall become effective and binding upon legislative enactment of  the
Compact into law by no less than seven states.  Thereafter, it shall become effective and
binding on a state upon enactment of the Compact into law by that state.
(c) The governors of nonmember states, or their designees, shall be invited  to participate
in the  activities of the Interstate Commission on a nonvoting basis prior to adoption of the
Compact by all states.
(d) The Interstate Commission may propose amendments  to the Compact for enactment
by the member states. No amendment shall become effective  and binding upon the Interstate
Commission and  the member states unless and until it is enacted into law by unanimous
consent of the member states.
SECTION 21. WITHDRAWAL
(a) Once effective, the Compact shall continue in force  and remain binding upon each and
every member state; provided that a member state  may withdraw from the Compact by
specifically repealing the statute which enacted the Compact into law.
(b) Withdrawal from the Compact shall be by the enactment of a statute  repealing the
same, but shall not take effect until one year after the effective date of such  statute and
until written notice of the  withdrawal has been given by the withdrawing state to the gov-
ernor of each other member state.
(c) The withdrawing  state shall immediately notify the chairperson of the Interstate
Commission in writing upon the introduction of legislation  repealing the Compact in the
withdrawing state.
(d) The  Interstate Commission shall notify the other member states of the withdrawing
state’s intent to withdraw within  60 days of its receipt of notice provided under subsection
(c).
[26]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(e) The withdrawing state is responsible for all dues, obligations, and liabilities  incurred
through the effective date of withdrawal,  including obligations, the performance of which
extend beyond the effective date of withdrawal.
(f) Reinstatement following withdrawal of a member state shall occur  upon the with-
drawing date reenacting the Compact or upon such  later date as determined by the Inter-
state Commission.
(g) The Interstate Commission is authorized  to develop rules to address the impact of the
withdrawal of a member state on  licenses granted in other member states to physicians who
designated the withdrawing member state as the state of principal license.
SECTION 22. DISSOLUTION
(a) The Compact shall dissolve effective upon the date of the withdrawal or default  of the
member state which reduces the membership of the Compact to one member state.
(b) Upon the dissolution of the Compact, the  Compact becomes null and void and shall
be of no further force or  effect, and the business and affairs of the Interstate Commission
shall be concluded, and surplus funds shall be distributed in accordance with the bylaws.
SECTION 23. SEVERABILITY AND CONSTRUCTION
(a) The provisions  of the Compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence,
or provision is deemed unenforceable, the remaining provisions of the Compact shall be en-
forceable.
(b) The provisions of the Compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.
(c) Nothing in the Compact shall be construed to prohibit the applicability of other
interstate compacts to which the member states are members.
SECTION 24. BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS
(a) Nothing herein  prevents the enforcement of any other law of a member state that is
not inconsistent with the Compact.
(b) All laws in a member  state in conflict with the Compact are superseded to the extent
of the conflict.
(c) All lawful actions of the Interstate Commission, including all rules and bylaws
promulgated by the Commission, are binding upon the member states.
(d) All agreements between the Interstate Commission  and the member states are bind-
ing in accordance with their terms.
(e) In the event any provision of the Compact exceeds the constitutional limits  imposed
on the legislature of any member state, such provision shall  be ineffective to the extent of
the conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that member state.
SECTION 8. The Legislative Assembly of Oregon hereby  ratifies the Interstate Medical
Licensure Compact set forth in section 7 of this 2021 Act.
AMENDMENTS
SECTION 9.  ORS 677.080 is amended to read:
677.080. [No person shall ] A person may not :
(1) Knowingly make any false statement or representation on a matter, or willfully conceal  any
fact material to the  right of the person to practice medicine or to obtain a license under this
[27]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
chapter.
(2) Sell or fraudulently obtain or furnish any medical and surgical diploma,  license, record or
registration, or aid or abet in the same.
(3) Impersonate anyone to whom a license has been granted by the Oregon Medical Board.
(4) Except as provided in ORS 677.060, practice medicine in this  state without a license required
by this chapter.
(5) Subsection (4) of this section does not apply to an individual who is authorized to
practice medicine under an expedited license as defined in section 7 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 677.290 is amended to read:
677.290. (1) All moneys received by  the Oregon Medical Board under this chapter shall be paid
into the General Fund in the State Treasury and placed to the credit of the Oregon Medical  Board
Account which is established. The board may establish an additional account  for the purpose
of meeting financial obligations imposed  on the State of Oregon as a result of this state’s
participation in the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact established under section 7 of  this
2021 Act. [Such moneys are appropriated continuously and shall ] The moneys paid into the ac-
counts described in this subsection are continuously appropriated to the board and may  be
used only for the administration and enforcement of  this chapter and ORS 676.850 and 676.860 and
for the purpose of meeting financial obligations imposed on the State of Oregon as a  result
of this  state’s participation in the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact established under
section 7 of this 2021 Act .
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the board may maintain a revolving account
in a sum not to exceed $50,000 for the purpose of  receiving and paying pass-through moneys relating
to peer review pursuant to its duties under ORS 441.055 (4) and (5) and in administering  programs
pursuant to its duties under this chapter relating to  the education and rehabilitation of licensees in
the areas of chemical substance abuse, inappropriate prescribing  and medical competence. The cre-
ation of and disbursement of moneys from  the revolving account shall not require an allotment or
allocation of moneys pursuant to ORS 291.234 to 291.260. All moneys in the account are continuously
appropriated for purposes set forth in this subsection.
(3) Each year $10 shall be paid to the Oregon Health and Science University  for each in-state
physician licensed under this chapter, which amount is continuously appropriated to the  Oregon
Health and Science University to be used in maintaining a circulating library of medical and surgi-
cal books and publications for the use of practitioners of medicine in  this state, and when not so in
use to be kept at the library  of the School of Medicine and accessible to its students. The balance
of the money received by the  board is appropriated continuously and shall be used only for the ad-
ministration and enforcement of this chapter, but any part of the  balance may, upon the order of the
board, be paid into the circulating library fund.
SECTION 11.
(1) The amendments to ORS 677.080 by  section 9 of this 2021 Act apply to
individuals authorized to practice medicine under an expedited license  as defined in section
7 of this 2021 Act on or after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 677.290 by section 10 of this  2021 Act apply to moneys re-
ceived by the Oregon Medical Board on or after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
OTHER AMENDMENTS
SECTION 12.  ORS 676.177 is amended to read:
[28]
HB 2335
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
676.177. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS  676.165 to 676.180, a health professional
regulatory board, upon a determination by the board that it possesses otherwise confidential  infor-
mation that reasonably relates to  the regulatory or enforcement function of another public entity,
may disclose that information to the other public entity.
(2) Any public entity that receives information pursuant to subsection (1) of this  section shall
agree to take  all reasonable steps to maintain the confidentiality of the information, except that the
public entity may use or disclose  the information to the extent necessary to carry out the regulatory
or enforcement functions of the public entity.
(3) For purposes of this section, “public entity” means:
(a) A board or agency  of this state, or a board or agency of another state with regulatory or
enforcement functions similar to the  functions of a health professional regulatory board of this state;
(b) A district attorney;
(c) The Department of Justice;
(d) A state or  local public body of this state that licenses, franchises or provides emergency
medical services; or
(e) A law enforcement agency of this state, another state or the federal government.
(4) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (3) of this section[ ,]:
(a) The Oregon Board of Physical Therapy may disclose information described in  subsection (1)
of this section to the Physical Therapy Compact Commission established in ORS 688.240.
(b) The Oregon State Board of Nursing may disclose information described in subsection
(1) of this section to  the Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators
established in section 1 of this 2021 Act.
(c) The Oregon  Medical Board may disclose information described in subsection (1) of this
section to the Interstate Medical Licensure  Compact Commission established in section 7 of
this 2021 Act.
SECTION 13.
The amendments to ORS 676.177 by section 12 this 2021 Act  apply to infor-
mation disclosed on or after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 14. The unit captions used in this 2021 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 15. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[29]