Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Bureau of Labor and  Industries shall study matters relating to penalties
for violating laws prohibiting places of  public accommodation from refusing to accept coins
or cash as  currency. The bureau shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and may  include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to business and labor no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3438