Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,500,000, for deposit  in the Universal
Representation Fund established under section 1, chapter 88, Oregon Laws 2022, and  dis-
bursement to  Oregon Worker Relief as the fiscal agent under section 1, chapter 88, Oregon
Laws 2022.
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropriated to the
Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,  out of the General Fund, the
amount of $4,500,000, for  the purposes of implementing section 2 (4), chapter 88, Oregon Laws
2022.
SECTION 2. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2660