Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Human Services shall  study improvements to the Oregon
Eligibility (ONE) system. The department shall submit a report in the  manner provided by
ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for  legislation, to the interim committees
of the Legislative Assembly related to human services no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1802