Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section and section 2 of this 2025 Act:
(a) “Law enforcement unit” has the meaning given that term in ORS 181A.355.
(b) “Police officer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 181A.355.
(2) A law enforcement  unit may not take disciplinary action or any other adverse em-
ployment action against a police officer solely because:
(a) The officer’s name has been placed on a list maintained  by a prosecutor’s office of
recurring witnesses for whom there is known potential impeachment information; or
(b) The officer’s name may otherwise be  subject to disclosure pursuant to Brady v.
Maryland, 373 U.S. 83 (1963).
(3) This section does not prohibit a law enforcement unit from taking disciplinary  action
or any other adverse employment action against a police officer based  on the underlying acts
or omissions for which the officer’s name was  placed on a list maintained by a prosecutor’s
office of recurring witnesses for whom there is known potential impeachment information,
or for  which the officer’s name is otherwise subject to disclosure pursuant to Brady v.
Maryland, 373 U.S. 83  (1963), if the actions taken by the law enforcement unit otherwise
conform to the rules  and procedures adopted by the law enforcement unit as determined
through collective bargaining.
SECTION 2.
(1) Each district  attorney shall develop and adopt a written protocol ad-
dressing potential impeachment disclosures pursuant to Brady  v. Maryland, 373 U.S. 83
(1963), and subsequent case  law. The protocol must provide guidance including, but not lim-
ited to:
(a) The  types of conduct that should be recognized as potentially exculpatory or as cre-
ating potential impeachment material;
(b) Provisions for written notice to a police officer when the district attorney proposes
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3664
HB 2645
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
to place the officer on a list of potential impeachment disclosures and an opportunity for the
officer to respond in person or in writing;
(c) Provisions for written notice to  the officer of the district attorney’s final decision to
place the officer on a list of potential impeachment disclosures;
(d) How information about an officer or an officer’s conduct should be shared  and main-
tained; and
(e) Under what circumstances an officer’s information or name may  be removed from a
list of potential impeachment disclosures.
(2) A district  attorney shall consult with agencies representing police officers and local
law enforcement units that will be impacted in developing the protocol under this section.
[2]