Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
WILDLIFE DISEASE PROGRAMS
SECTION 1.
(1) In partnership with Oregon State  University and the Oregon Veterinary
Diagnostic Laboratory,  the State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall expand programs
related to wildlife disease to improve the state’s coordination,  monitoring, prevention and
response related to zoonotic diseases and other wildlife diseases of concern.
(2) To implement subsection (1) of this section, the department and the university  shall
consult with the Invasive Species Council and may  consult with other entities or experts as
needed.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
INVASIVE SPECIES COUNCIL
SECTION 3. (1) The Invasive Species Council  shall review programs and activities under
ORS 570.755, including but not limited to the operation and capacity of the council, intera-
gency coordination, outreach and education and emergency response, to identify and prior-
itize actions that would improve the state’s ability to prevent:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 198
HB 4148
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Negative impacts from invasive species; and
(b) The establishment of invasive species in this state.
(2) Subject to available funding, the  council shall implement actions identified under
subsection (1) of  this section, in a manner consistent with the provisions of ORS 570.750,
570.755, 570.770, 570.775, 570.780, 570.790, 570.800, 570.810 and 570.815.
(3) On or before  December 15, 2025, the council shall report, in the manner provided by
ORS 192.245, to the House Committee on Agriculture, Land Use,  Natural Resources, and
Water on the status of the requirements described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) The report described in subsection (3) of this section may be provided as part  of the
report required by ORS 570.815.
SECTION 4.
Section 3 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
WILDLIFE COEXISTENCE
SECTION 5. (1) The State Department  of Fish and Wildlife shall establish and maintain
a wildlife coexistence program that aims to reduce  conflicts and promote coexistence be-
tween humans and wildlife consistent with the wildlife policy described in ORS 496.012.
(2) Subject to available funding, program activities may include, but need not be  limited
to:
(a) Human-wildlife conflict resolution, outreach, education and training.
(b) Support or  grants for wildlife rehabilitation centers, operating under valid permits
issued by the State Fish and Wildlife Commission pursuant to rules  adopted under ORS
497.308, that treat injured or orphaned wildlife.
(c) Other work related to wildlife stewardship and compatibility  living with wildlife in
areas of high potential conflict between humans and wildlife.
WILDLIFE CORRIDORS
SECTION 6.
 ORS 366.161 is amended to read:
366.161. (1) The Department of Transportation shall establish a program  to reduce wildlife-
vehicle collisions in areas where wildlife corridors identified in the Wildlife Corridor  Action Plan
by the State Department of Fish and Wildlife intersect with proposed or existing public roads.
(2) The program shall include, but need not be limited to[ ,]:
(a) Feasibility studies;
(b) Plans  for creating or modifying road infrastructure in a manner that reduces wildlife-vehicle
collisions and promotes public safety[ .]; and
(c) Updates to the guidance, standards and specifications of  highways that are necessary
for incorporating wildlife corridor features  into the design, construction and modification of
highways.
(3) The [ plans] program  may include , but need not be limited to , the use of wildlife crossing
structures and roadway fencing.
[(2)] (4) To the extent  practicable, the Department of Transportation shall coordinate with local
governments,  as defined in ORS 174.116, and the tribal governments for tribes and bands listed under
ORS 172.110, to achieve the goals of the program described in this section.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 366.162 is amended to read:
[2]
HB 4148
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
366.162. [ (1) The Department of Transportation shall establish the program required under ORS
366.161 no later than December 31, 2023. ]
[(2) Until the Department of Transportation establishes  the program, the Department of Transpor-
tation and the State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall coordinate efforts to reduce wildlife-vehicle
collisions based on the data gathered under ORS 496.272. The Department of Transportation  shall
consider the benefit of including a wildlife crossing as part of a project  if the data suggests that such
a crossing could significantly reduce wildlife-vehicle collisions. ]
[(3)] (1)  The Department of Transportation shall report biennially regarding the  status of the
program required under ORS 366.161 to interim or regular Senate  and House committees relating
to natural resources in the manner provided by ORS 192.245.
(2) The report [ shall] must  include, but not be limited to[ ,]:
(a) Information concerning the number and types of  wildlife corridor infrastructure projects
that have been  established , studied or planned [ and];
(b) A description of a timeline for  implementing the wildlife corridor infrastructure
projects;
(c) An estimate of the costs and funding sources for  the wildlife corridor infrastructure
projects;
(d) A description of all actions the department has taken to secure funding for  the pro-
gram;
(e) Recommendations for a  strategy for ongoing funding for the program, including, but
not limited to, how to:
(A) Ensure the existence  of one or more dedicated funding sources that meet program
needs; and
(B) Secure federal competitive grants; and
(f) A description of  the realized or expected [ effect] effects  of established , studied or planned
wildlife corridor infrastructure projects on the number of wildlife-vehicle collisions.
SECTION 8.
Contingent on available funding, the State Department of Fish and Wildlife
shall undertake, or provide assistance to partners that undertake or plan to undertake
projects to support wildlife mobility and habitat  connectivity within priority corridors iden-
tified in the Oregon Connectivity Assessment  and Mapping Project, if the projects are con-
sistent with the activities described in ORS 496.252 (2).
APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 9.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the State  Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the following amounts:
(1) $1,177,000, for purposes described in section 1  of this 2024 Act, including expanding the
capacity of the Wildlife  Health Laboratory and expanding sample collection related to chronic
wasting disease.
(2) $1,468,830, for purposes related to the wildlife coexistence program described  in sec-
tion 5 of this 2024 Act.
(3) $300,000, for awarding grants to wildlife  rehabilitation centers, as described in section
5 (2)(b) of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 10. In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
[3]
HB 4148
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission,  for distribution to Oregon State
University for the Oregon  Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory, for the biennium ending June
30, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts:
(1) $1,250,00 for increasing personnel and supplies related to zoonotic diseases, as  de-
scribed in section 1 of this 2024 Act.
(2) $330,000, for additional equipment related to  zoonotic diseases, as described in section
1 of this 2024 Act.
(3) $455,000, for increasing personnel and supplies related to chronic wasting  disease, as
described in section 1 of this 2024 Act.
(4) $245,000, for  additional equipment related to chronic wasting disease, as described in
section 1 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 11.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other  appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Invasive Species Council, for the biennium ending June 30,  2025, out of the
General Fund, the following amounts:
(1) $220,000, for purposes described in section 3 of this 2024 Act.
(2) $500,000, for  deposit in the Invasive Species Council Account established under ORS
570.800, for supporting outreach  and education to implement the provisions of section 3 of
this 2024 Act.
(3) $750,000, for deposit in the Invasive Species Control Account established under ORS
570.810, for funding activities to implement the provisions of section 3 of this 2024 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 12.
The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 13. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[4]