Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Oregon Business Development Department shall  conduct a study of
signature research centers established pursuant to ORS 284.740. The department shall submit
a report of its findings to the interim committees of  the Legislative Assembly related to
economic development in the  manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than September
15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3184