Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $  for  distribution to Coos County for
the purpose of providing transportation services  to the Roseburg Veterans Affairs Medical
Center for veterans residing in Coos County.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $  for distribution to Curry County
for the purpose of providing transportation services to the Roseburg Veterans Affairs Med-
ical Center for veterans residing in Curry County.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1740