Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 137.225, as amended by section 55, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
137.225. (1)(a) At any time after the person becomes  eligible as described in paragraph (b) of this
subsection, any person convicted of an offense , or found  in contempt of court,  who has fully
complied with and performed the sentence  of the court for the offense  or contempt finding , and
whose conviction  or finding  is described in subsection (5) of this  section, by motion may apply to
the court where the conviction  or finding  was entered for  entry of an order setting aside the con-
viction  or finding. A person who is still under supervision  or who has  outstanding compensatory
fines or restitution  as part of the sentence for the offense that is the subject of the motion  has
not fully complied with or  performed the sentence of the court. The fact that a person has out-
standing financial obligations, other than  compensatory fines and restitution, that are part
of the sentence for the offense or finding that is the  subject of the motion may not be con-
sidered when determining whether the person has fully  complied with or performed the
sentence of the court.
(b) A person is eligible to file a motion under paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) For  a Class B felony, seven years from the date of conviction or the release of the person
from imprisonment for the conviction sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(B) For a Class  C felony  or a finding of a person in contempt of court for violating an order
related to abuse or a person crime , five years from the date of conviction  or finding  or  the re-
lease of the person from imprisonment for the conviction  or finding  sought to  be set aside, which-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3538
HB 2639
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ever is later.
(C) For a  Class A misdemeanor, three years from the date of conviction or the release of the
person from imprisonment for the conviction sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(D) For a Class B or Class C misdemeanor, a violation or [ the] a finding of a  person in contempt
of court  not described in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph , one year from  the date of con-
viction  or  finding or the release of the person from imprisonment for the conviction or finding
sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
(c) If no accusatory instrument is filed, at any time after 60 days from the  date the prosecuting
attorney indicates that the state has elected not to proceed with a prosecution or contempt pro-
ceeding, an arrested, cited or charged person may  apply to the court in the county in which the
person was arrested, cited or charged, for entry of an order setting aside the record of the  arrest,
citation or charge.
(d) At any time after an acquittal or  a dismissal other than a dismissal described in paragraph
(c) of this subsection, an  arrested, cited or charged person may apply to the court in the county in
which the person was arrested, cited or charged, for entry  of an order setting aside the record of
the arrest, citation or charge.
(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection, a person whose sentence of probation  was
revoked may not  apply to the court for entry of an order setting aside the conviction  or finding for
which the person was sentenced to probation for a period of three years from the  date of revocation
or until the person becomes eligible  as described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, whichever oc-
curs later.
(f) If the offense classification of a conviction has been reduced by the court, the  appli-
cable time period under paragraph (b) of this subsection is the time  period associated with
the reduced offense classification, calculated from the date of conviction or the release of
the person from imprisonment for the conviction sought to be set aside, whichever is later.
[(f)] (g)  A person filing a  motion under this section is not required to pay the filing fee estab-
lished under ORS 21.135.
(2)(a) A copy of  the motion shall be served upon the office of the prosecuting attorney who
prosecuted the offense  or charge of contempt , or who had authority to prosecute the charge if
there was no accusatory  instrument filed. The prosecuting attorney may [ object] file an objection
to a motion filed under subsection (1)(a)  of this section [ and shall notify the court and the person of
the objection ] within 120 days of the date the motion was  filed with the court.  The prosecuting
attorney shall notify the court and the person of  the objection upon filing, and shall indicate
in the objection whether the objection is based on the  circumstances and behavior of the
person. If the objection is not based on the circumstances and behavior of the person,  the
prosecuting attorney shall further notify  the person that the person has 33 calendar days
from the date of the filing of the objection to request a hearing.
(b) When a prosecuting attorney is served with a copy of a motion to set aside a  conviction  or
finding under subsection (1)(a) of this  section, the prosecuting attorney shall provide a copy of the
motion and notice of the hearing date to the victim, if any, [ of the offense ] by mailing a copy of the
motion and notice to the victim’s last-known address.  If the prosecuting attorney filed an ob-
jection under paragraph (a) of this subsection that is not based on  the circumstances and
behavior of the person,  the prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim that the victim has
33 calendar days from the date of the filing of the objection to request a hearing.
(c) When a person makes  a motion under this section, the person shall forward to the Depart-
[2]
HB 2639
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ment of State Police a full set of the person’s fingerprints on a fingerprint card or in  any other
manner specified by the department.
(d) When a person makes a motion under subsection (1)(a) of this section,  the person must pay
a fee to the Department  of State Police for the purpose of the department performing a criminal
record check. The department shall establish a fee in an amount not to exceed the actual  cost of
performing the criminal record check. If the department  is required to perform only one criminal
record check for the person, the department may only charge one fee, regardless of the number of
counties in which the  person is filing a motion to set aside a conviction,  finding arrest, charge or
citation under this section. The department shall  provide a copy of the results of the criminal record
check to the prosecuting attorney.
(e) The  prosecuting attorney may not charge the person a fee for performing the requirements
described in this section.
(3)(a) If an  objection  based on the circumstances or behavior of the person  is received to
a motion filed under subsection (1)(a) of this section , or upon the  request of the person or the
victim, the court shall hold a hearing, and may require the filing of such affidavits and may require
the taking of such proofs as the court deems proper. The  court shall allow the victim to make a
statement at the hearing. If the person is otherwise eligible for relief under this section,  the court
shall [ grant the motion and enter an order as described in paragraph  (b) ] proceed to a financial
obligation waiver determination under paragraph  (d) of this subsection or, if there are no
outstanding financial obligations on the offense or finding,  proceed to paragraph (e)  of this
subsection unless the court makes written findings, by clear and convincing evidence, that  the cir-
cumstances and behavior of  the person, from the date of the conviction  or finding  the person is
seeking to  set aside to the date of the hearing on the motion, do not warrant granting the motion
due to the circumstances  and behavior creating a risk to public safety. When determining whether
the person’s circumstances and behavior create a risk to public safety, the  court may only consider
criminal behavior, or  violations of regulatory law or administrative rule enforced by civil penalty
or other administrative sanction that relate to the character of the conviction  or finding sought to
be set aside. The court may not consider nonpunitive  civil liability, monetary obligations and motor
vehicle violations. [ Upon granting the  motion, the court shall enter an appropriate order containing the
original arrest or citation charge, the conviction charge, if different from the original, the date of
charge, the submitting agency and the disposition of the charge.  Upon the entry of the order, the person
for purposes of the law shall be deemed not to  have been previously convicted, and the court shall issue
an order sealing the  record of conviction and other official records in the case, including the records
of arrest, citation or charge. ]
(b) If the court  receives an objection to a motion filed under subsection (1)(a) of this
section that is not based on the  circumstances and behavior of the person and no request
for a hearing is received, the court shall deny the motion.
(c) If no objection to a motion filed under subsection (1)(a) of this  section is received, the
court shall proceed to a financial obligation waiver determination under  paragraph (d) of this
subsection or, if there  are no outstanding financial obligations on the offense or finding,
proceed to paragraph (e) of this subsection.
(d) When conducting a financial obligation  waiver determination under this subsection,
the court shall proceed as follows:
(A) The court  may waive any remaining financial obligations owed by the person on the
offense or finding, other than compensatory fines or restitution.
[3]
HB 2639
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) The court shall waive any  remaining financial obligations owed by the person on the
offense or finding, other than compensatory fines or restitution, if the date of the conviction
or finding occurred more than 10 years prior to the filing  of the motion and the court is
setting aside all convictions, findings, arrests, citations or charges within the case.
(C) If the person has  outstanding compensatory fines or restitution on the offense, or the
court decides not to waive any other remaining financial obligations owed by the person on
the offense, the court shall deny the motion.
(e) If the court waives  financial obligations under paragraph (d)(A) or (B) of this sub-
section, or if there are  no outstanding financial obligations on the offense or finding, the
court shall  grant the motion and shall, within 120 days after the date of the hearing, or if
no objection was received, within 120 days after the conclusion of the time period  during
which the prosecuting attorney  may object under subsection (2)(a) of this section, enter an
appropriate order containing the original arrest or citation charge,  the conviction or con-
tempt charge, if different from the original, the date of charge, the  submitting agency and
the disposition of the charge. Upon the entry of the  order, the person for purposes of the law
shall be deemed not  to have been previously convicted, and the court shall issue an order
sealing the  record of conviction or contempt finding and other official records in the case,
including the records of arrest, citation or charge.
[(b)] (f)  The court shall grant a motion filed under subsection  (1)(c) or (d) of this section[ , or
under subsection (1)(a) of this section if no objection to  the motion is received, ] and shall , within 120
days after the date the motion was filed  with the court,  enter an appropriate order containing
the original arrest or citation charge,  [ the conviction charge, if applicable and different from the ori-
ginal,] the date of charge, the submitting agency and  the disposition of the charge. Upon the entry
of the order, the person for purposes of the law shall be deemed not to have been previously  [ con-
victed,] arrested,  cited or charged, and the court shall issue an order sealing all official records in
the case, including the records of arrest, citation or charge, whether or not the arrest, citation or
charge resulted in a further criminal proceeding.
(4) The  clerk of the court shall forward a certified copy of the order to such agencies as directed
by the court. A certified copy must be sent to the Department of Corrections when the order  con-
cerns a conviction. Upon entry of the  order, the conviction, arrest, citation, charge or other pro-
ceeding shall be deemed  not to have occurred, and the person may answer accordingly any questions
relating to its occurrence.
(5) The provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this section apply to [ a conviction for ] the following
convictions and findings:
(a) A Class B felony, except for a violation of ORS 166.429 or any  crime classified as a person
felony as defined in the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(b) Any misdemeanor,  Class C felony or felony punishable as a misdemeanor pursuant to ORS
161.705.
(c) An offense constituting a violation under state law or local ordinance.
(d) An  offense committed before January 1, 1972, that, if committed after that date, would qualify
for an order under this section.
(e) The finding of a person in contempt of court.
(6) Notwithstanding subsection (5) of this section, the provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this sec-
tion do not apply to a conviction for:
(a) Criminal mistreatment  in the second degree under ORS 163.200 if the victim at the time of
[4]
HB 2639
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the crime was 65 years of age or older.
(b) Criminal mistreatment in the first degree under ORS 163.205 if the victim at the  time of the
crime was  65 years of age or older, or when the offense constitutes child abuse as defined in ORS
419B.005.
(c) Endangering the welfare of a minor under ORS 163.575  (1)(a), when the offense constitutes
child abuse as defined in ORS 419B.005.
(d) Criminally negligent homicide under ORS 163.145, when  that offense was punishable as a
Class C felony.
(e) Assault in the third degree under ORS 163.165 (1)(h).
(f) Any sex crime, unless:
(A) The sex crime is listed in ORS 163A.140 (1)(a) and:
(i) The person has been relieved of the obligation  to report as a sex offender pursuant to a court
order entered under ORS 163A.145 or 163A.150; and
(ii) The person has not been  convicted of, found guilty except for insanity of or found to be
within the jurisdiction of the juvenile  court based on a crime for which the court is prohibited from
setting aside the conviction under this section; or
(B) The sex crime constitutes a Class C felony and:
(i) The person was under 16 years of age at the time of the offense;
(ii) The person is:
(I) Less than two years and 180 days older than the victim; or
(II) At least two years and 180 days older, but  less than three years and 180 days older, than
the victim and the court finds that setting  aside the conviction is in the interests of justice and of
benefit to the person and the community;
(iii) The victim’s  lack of consent was due solely to incapacity to consent by reason of being less
than a specified age;
(iv) The victim was at least 12 years of age at the time of the offense;
(v) The person has not been convicted of, found  guilty except for insanity of or found to be
within the jurisdiction of the juvenile  court based on a crime for which the court is prohibited from
setting aside the conviction under this section; and
(vi) Each conviction or finding described in this subparagraph involved the same victim.
(7)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (5) of this section,  the provisions of subsection (1) (a) of this
section do not apply to:
[(a)] (A)  A conviction for a state or municipal traffic offense.
[(b)] (B)  A person convicted[ , within the following applicable time period immediately  preceding
the filing of the motion pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, ] of any other offense, excluding mo-
tor vehicle violations  and unlawful possession of a controlled substance constituting a drug
enforcement misdemeanor as described in section 35, chapter 70,  Oregon Laws 2024, or found in
contempt of court  for violating an order related to abuse or a person crime, within the fol-
lowing applicable time  period immediately preceding the filing of the motion pursuant to
subsection (1)(a) of this  section,  whether or not the other conviction is for conduct associated
with the same criminal episode that caused the [ arrest, citation, charge  or ] conviction , or with the
same course of conduct that caused the finding,  that is sought to be set aside:
[(A)] (i) For a motion concerning a Class B felony, seven years.
[(B)] (ii) For a motion concerning a Class C felony or a finding of a person in contempt of
court for violating an order related to abuse or a person crime , five years.
[5]
HB 2639
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(C)] (iii) For a motion concerning a Class A misdemeanor, three years.
[(D)] (iv)  For a motion concerning a Class B or Class  C misdemeanor a violation or a finding
of contempt of court  not described in sub-subparagraph (ii) of this subparagraph , one year.
(C) A person who  at the time the motion described in this section is pending before the
court is under charge  of commission of any crime or contempt of court for violating an order
related to abuse or a person crime.
[(c)] (b) A single violation, other than a motor vehicle violation, within the time  period specified
in paragraph [ (b)] (a)(B)  of this subsection is not a conviction under  this subsection.
Notwithstanding  subsection  (1) of this section, a conviction that has been set aside under this sec-
tion shall be considered for the  purpose of determining whether paragraph [ (b)] (a)(B)  of this sub-
section is applicable.
[(d) A person who at the time the motion authorized by subsection (1) of this section is  pending
before the court is under charge of commission of any crime. ]
(8) The provisions of subsection (1)(c) or (d) of this section do not apply to :
(a) An arrest or citation for driving while  under the influence of intoxicants if the charge is
dismissed as  a result of the person’s successful completion of a diversion agreement described in
ORS 813.200.
(b) The dismissal of a citation for a traffic violation.
(c) A person  who at the time the motion described in this section is pending before the
court is under charge  of commission of any crime or contempt of court for violating an order
related to abuse or a person crime.
(d) For a  motion concerning an arrest, citation or charge for a crime constituting do-
mestic violence, a sex crime or any other person felony or  person Class A misdemeanor, as
those terms are defined in the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission, a person
convicted of any other offense, excluding motor vehicle violations, or found in  contempt of
court for violating an order related to abuse or a  person crime, within the three years im-
mediately preceding the filing of the motion pursuant to subsection (1)(c) or  (d) of this sec-
tion, whether or not the other conviction or finding is for conduct associated with the  same
criminal episode that caused the arrest, citation or charge that is sought to be set aside.
(9) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section apply to convictions,  findings, arrests, cita-
tions and charges that occurred before, as well as those that  occurred after, September 9, 1971.
There is no time limit for making an application.
(10) For purposes of any civil action in  which truth is an element of a claim for relief or affir-
mative defense, the  provisions of subsection (3) of this section providing that the conviction,  finding,
arrest, citation, charge or other proceeding  be deemed not to have occurred do not apply and a
party may apply to the court for an order requiring disclosure of the official records in  the case as
may be necessary in the interest of justice.
(11)(a) Upon motion of any prosecutor or defendant  in a case involving records sealed under this
section, supported by affidavit  showing good cause, the court with jurisdiction may order the reo-
pening and disclosure of any records sealed  under this section for the limited purpose of assisting
the investigation of the movant. However, such an order has no  other effect on the orders setting
aside the conviction  or finding,  or the arrest, citation or charge record.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, when  an arrest, citation or charge de-
scribed in subsection (1)(c) of this section is set  aside, a prosecuting attorney may, for the purpose
of initiating a criminal proceeding within the statute  of limitations, unseal the records sealed under
[6]
HB 2639
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
this section by notifying the court with jurisdiction  over the charge, record of arrest or citation.
The prosecuting attorney shall notify the person who is the subject  of the records of the unsealing
under this paragraph by sending written notification to the person’s last known address.
(12) The State Court Administrator shall create forms to be used throughout the state  for
motions and proposed orders described in this section.
(13) As used in this section:
(a) “Affidavit” includes a declaration under penalty of perjury.
(b) “Domestic violence” has the meaning given that term in ORS 135.230.
(c) “Order related to abuse or a person crime” means:
(A) A  court order issued under ORS 107.095 (1)(c) or (d), 107.700 to 107.735, 124.005 to
124.040, 133.035, 135.247 or 163.760 to 163.777; or
(B) A court order arising from a criminal case involving a crime constituting domestic
violence, a  sex crime or any other person felony or person Class A misdemeanor, as those
terms are defined in the rules of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
[(b)] (d) “Sex crime” has the meaning given that term in ORS 163A.005.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 137.223 is amended to read:
137.223. (1) A person who has been  found guilty except for insanity of an offense for which, if
convicted, the person could apply for entry of an order setting  aside the conviction pursuant to ORS
137.225, may by  motion apply to the court for entry of an order setting aside the judgment finding
the person guilty except for insanity of the offense.
(2)(a) A person described in subsection (1)  of this section may file the motion to set aside a
judgment of guilty except for insanity any time after the following time periods:
(A) For a judgment of guilty except for insanity on a Class B felony, seven years from the  date
of entry of the judgment or the date the  person is no longer under the jurisdiction of the Psychiatric
Security Review Board, whichever is later.
(B) For a judgment of guilty except for  insanity on a Class C felony, five years from the date
of entry of the judgment or the date the person is  no longer under the jurisdiction of the board,
whichever is later.
(C) For a judgment of guilty except for insanity on a Class A  misdemeanor, three years from the
date of entry of the judgment or the date the  person is no longer under the jurisdiction of the board,
whichever is later.
(D) For a judgment of  guilty except for insanity on a Class B or Class C misdemeanor, one year
from the  date of entry of the judgment or the date the person is no longer under the jurisdiction
of the board, whichever is later.
(b) A person is eligible to have a judgment of guilty except for insanity set aside under  this
section if the person has no  other findings of guilty except for insanity and no convictions for of-
fenses other than motor vehicle violations within the following time periods prior to filing the  mo-
tion:
(A) For a motion concerning a  judgment of guilty except for insanity on a Class B felony, seven
years.
(B) For a motion concerning a judgment of guilty except for insanity on a Class C felony,  five
years.
(C) For a motion concerning a judgment of guilty except for insanity on a  Class A misdemeanor,
three years.
(D) For a motion concerning  a judgment of guilty except for insanity on a Class B or Class C
[7]
HB 2639
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
misdemeanor, one year.
(3)(a) A copy of  the motion shall be served upon the office of the prosecuting attorney who
prosecuted the offense. The prosecuting  attorney may [ object] file an objection  to the motion [ filed
and shall notify the court and the person of the objection ] within 120 days of [ receiving the motion ]
the date the  motion was filed with the court . The prosecuting attorney shall notify the court
and the person of the objection upon filing, and shall indicate in the  objection whether the
objection is  based on the circumstances and behavior of the person. If the objection is not
based on the circumstances  and behavior of the person, the prosecuting attorney shall fur-
ther notify the person that the person has 33 calendar days from the date of the filing of the
objection to request a hearing.
(b) When a prosecuting attorney is served with a copy  of a motion to set aside a judgment of
guilty except for insanity under this section, the prosecuting attorney shall provide a copy of the
motion and notice of the hearing date to the victim, if  any, of the offense by mailing a copy of the
motion and notice to the victim’s last-known address. If the prosecuting attorney filed an ob-
jection under paragraph (a) of this subsection that is not based on  the circumstances and
behavior of the person,  the prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim that the victim has
33 calendar days from the date of the filing of the objection to request a hearing.
(c) When a person files a motion under this section, the person must pay a fee to the Department
of State Police for the purpose of the department performing a  criminal record check, and shall
forward to the  department a full set of the person’s fingerprints on a fingerprint card or in any other
manner specified by the department. The department shall establish  a fee in an amount not to ex-
ceed the actual cost of performing the criminal record check. If the department is  required to per-
form only one criminal  record check for the person, the department may only charge one fee,
regardless of the number of counties in which the person is filing a  motion to set aside a conviction,
arrest, charge or citation under this section. The department shall provide  a copy of the results of
the criminal record check to the prosecuting attorney.
(d) A person filing  a motion under this section is not required to pay the filing fee established
under ORS 21.135.
(4)(a) If an objection based on the circumstances or behavior of the person  is  received to
a motion filed under this  section , or upon the request of the person or the victim , the court shall
hold a hearing, and may require the filing of such affidavits and may require the taking of such
proofs as the court  deems proper. The court shall allow the victim to make a statement at the
hearing. If the person is otherwise eligible for relief  under this section, the court shall grant the
motion and , within 120 days after the date of the hearing,  enter an order as described in para-
graph [ (b)] (d) of this subsection unless the  court makes written findings, by clear and convincing
evidence, that the circumstances and behavior of the person, from the date of the judgment  the
person is seeking to set  aside to the date of the hearing on the motion, do not warrant granting the
motion due to the circumstances and behavior creating a risk to public safety.  When determining
whether the person’s circumstances and behavior create a risk to public safety, the court may only
consider criminal behavior, or violations of regulatory law or administrative rule enforced by civil
penalty or other administrative sanction that relate to the character of the conviction sought  to be
set aside. The court may not consider nonpunitive civil liability, monetary obligations and motor
vehicle violations.
(b) If no objection to the motion filed under this section is  received, the court shall grant
the motion and, within 120 days after the conclusion  of the time period during which the
[8]
HB 2639
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
prosecuting attorney may object under subsection (3)(a) of this section, enter an order  as
described in paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(c) If the court receives an  objection that is not based on the circumstances and behavior
of the person and no request for a hearing is received, the court shall deny the motion.
[(b)] (d)  An order entered under this subsection shall state the original  arrest charge and the
charge for which the person was found guilty except for  insanity. The order shall further state that
positive identification has been established by the Department of State  Police and further identified
as to Department of State Police number or submitting agency number.
(5)(a) Upon the entry of an order under subsection (4) of this section:
(A) The person, for purposes of  the law, shall be deemed not to have been previously found
guilty except for insanity, and the court shall issue an order sealing the records of the case, in-
cluding the records of arrest, whether or not the arrest resulted in a further criminal proceeding.
(B) The court shall inform the person that the  person’s right to possess, purchase or otherwise
acquire a firearm remains prohibited under federal law.
(b) For  purposes of this subsection, records of the case do not include medical records that are
in the possession of the Psychiatric Security Review Board, including medical evaluations and  re-
ports submitted from other agencies concerning the status or compliance of the person.
(6) The clerk of the court shall forward a certified copy of the order entered under  subsection
(5) of this section to such agencies as  directed by the court. A certified copy shall be sent to the
Psychiatric Security Review Board. Upon entry of the order, the judgment of  guilty except for in-
sanity shall be deemed not to have been  entered, and the person may answer accordingly any
questions relating to its occurrence.
(7) For purposes of any civil action in which truth  is an element of a claim for relief or affir-
mative defense, the provisions of subsection (6) of this section  providing that the judgment of guilty
except for insanity be deemed not to have been entered do not apply and a  party may apply to the
court for an order requiring disclosure of the official records in the case as may  be necessary in the
interests of justice.
(8) Upon motion of any prosecutor or defendant in a case involving records sealed under this
section, supported by affidavit  showing good cause, the court with jurisdiction may order the reo-
pening and disclosure of any records sealed  under this section for the limited purpose of assisting
the investigation of the movant. However, such an order has no  other effect on the orders setting
aside the judgment of guilty except for insanity.
(9) A prosecuting attorney may not condition an agreement not  to object to the entry of a
judgment of guilty except for  insanity on an agreement by a person to waive the ability to set aside
the judgment under this section.
(10) As used in this section, “affidavit” includes a declaration under penalty of perjury.
SECTION 3.
No later than January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the  Judicial Depart-
ment shall submit a report to the interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly related
to the judiciary, in the manner described in ORS 192.245, concerning the setting  aside of ar-
rests,  citations,  charges, convictions and contempt of court findings under ORS 137.225 and
judgments of guilty except for insanity  under ORS 137.223. The report may include a de-
scription of additional resources the department requires in  order to fulfill the department’s
duties under ORS 137.223 and 137.225.
SECTION 4. The amendments to ORS 137.223 and 137.225 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025
Act apply to motions filed on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[9]
HB 2639
1
[10]