Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 536.
SECTION 2. (1) Prior to the transfer of  a state agency interest in real property under
subsection (2) of this section to a commercial water bottler or the issuance of a water  right
under subsection (3) of this section to a commercial water bottler, the state and  the bottler
shall enter  into an agreement providing for the state to receive not less than 75 percent of
the gross amount that the bottler receives from the sale of water made available for  use by
the bottler as a result of the transfer of interest or issuance of the water right.
(2) A state agency  and a commercial water bottler shall enter into an agreement as
provided under subsection (1) of this section in connection with any direct or  indirect
transfer of a state  agency interest in real property that would allow the bottler to use water
under a water right appurtenant to the property in a commercial water bottling process.
(3) A state agency  and a commercial water bottler shall enter into an agreement as
provided under subsection (1) of this section before the Water Resources Department  issues
a water right that would allow the bottler to  use water in a commercial water bottling pro-
cess if, at any time prior to the issuance of the water right, the water was:
(a) Withdrawn from appropriation under an order described in ORS 536.410;
(b) Reserved under ORS 537.356 at the request of  a state agency for the purpose of future
economic development;
(c) Allocated to a state agency under ORS 537.470 and  is reserved for future out-of-
stream use or is otherwise used or disposed of under ORS 537.490; or
(d) Purchased or received as a gift by a state agency under ORS 537.495.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3806
HB 3205
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
(4)(a) The department  may not issue a water right to, or for any party acting on behalf
of, a commercial water bottler if, at any time  prior to the issuance of the water right, the
water was included in an in-stream water right reserved under ORS 537.336.
(b) A state agency may not consent to an exchange under ORS 540.537 that would injure
an in-stream water right if the proposed exchange would benefit rights held by, or  on behalf
of, a commercial water bottler.
(5) The use of water by  a commercial water bottler in violation of this section is not a
beneficial use of the water for purposes of ORS 540.610 to  540.650. For purposes of this sub-
section, there is a rebuttable presumption that:
(a) The transfer of a state agency interest in real property was subject to subsection  (1)
of this section if the commercial water bottler uses water under a  water appurtenant to the
property less than one year after the state  agency transfers the state agency interest in the
property.
(b) The issuance of a water right in water described in subsection (3) of  this section was
subject to subsection (1) of this section if the commercial  water bottler uses water under the
water right less than one year after the issuance of the water right.
(c) A water right described in subsection (4) of this section was issued  to, or on behalf
of, a commercial water bottler if the bottler uses water under the water right less than  one
year after the issuance of the water right by the department.
(d) An  exchange described in subsection (4) of this section benefitted a water right held
by, or on behalf of, a commercial water bottler if the bottler  uses water under the exchange
less than one year after the first injury to an in-stream water right.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2017 Act applies to:
(1) State  agency transfers of interests in real property finalized on or after the effective
date of this 2017 Act;
(2) Water rights that  the Water Resources Department issues on or after the effective
date of this 2017 Act; and
(3) Water right exchanges to which a state agency agrees on or after the effective date
of this 2017 Act.
[2]