Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Education shall enter into a contract with  a training
provider experienced in online educator training to develop and offer annually online profes-
sional development modules for all substitute teachers in Oregon. The modules must  address
but need not be limited to:
(a) Technology and educational tools.
(b) Classroom and behavior management.
(c) Special education.
(d) Equity, diversity and inclusion.
(e) Trauma-informed practices.
(2) The modules must  be designed to provide tailored professional development for sub-
stitute teachers in Oregon with different levels of experience, including but not limited to:
(a) Zero to three years of classroom experience.
(b) Four to eight years of classroom experience.
(c) Nine or more years of classroom experience.
(3) The department shall reimburse substitute teachers for the  cost of participating in
any professional development module offered under this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Department of Education shall submit a report on the successes and
challenges of implementing section 1 of this 2025 Act in the manner provided by ORS  192.245,
and may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legisla-
tive Assembly related to education no later than September 15, 2026.
(2) The report must address but need not be limited to:
(a) The number of substitute teachers who have completed a professional  development
module offered under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(b) A quality assessment  of the modules by substitute teachers who have completed the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2297
SB 320
1
2
3
modules.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
[2]