Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $50,000,000 for distribution to Trillium Family
Services for construction of facilities  on its Portland campus for the Oregon Center for
Child, Family and Community Health.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2054