Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall review statewide
economic development plans and strategies implemented in the other  states. The department
shall submit a report to the  interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to eco-
nomic development in the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later than  September 15,
2026. The report shall include  recommendations for the creation of a statewide economic
development plan for Oregon.
(2) In conducting the study, the department shall consult  with stakeholders, including,
but not limited to, representatives of:
(a) The business community in Oregon;
(b) Economic development districts;
(c) Local economic development organizations;
(d) Labor organizations;
(e) Philanthropic organizations; and
(f) Any other stakeholders in this state that the department  considers appropriate and
useful to achieve the goals of the study.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2455