Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 350.287 is amended to read:
350.287. (1) A public  university listed in ORS 352.002 or a community college shall charge
an enrolled student who is not a resident  of this state and who is attending classes as an
undergraduate or graduate student  on a public university or community college campus in
this state tuition and fees no greater than the resident rate if the student:
(a) Is an active member of the Armed Forces of the United States;
(b) Is the spouse of an active member of the Armed Forces of the United States; or
(c) Is the dependent child of an active member of the Armed  Forces of the United States.
[(1)] (2) Spouses or dependent children of  active members of the Armed Forces of the United
States who, at the time of their acceptance to a community  college or public university listed in
ORS 352.002, are considered residents for the  purpose of admission or for the purpose of determining
fees and tuition to be paid while attending the community college  or public university, shall con-
tinue to  be considered residents for as long as the spouses or dependent children remain contin-
uously enrolled at the community college or public university.
[(2)] (3) As used in this section, “active member of the Armed Forces of  the United States” and
“dependent children” have the meaning given those terms in ORS 352.313.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3156