Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1)(a) A law enforcement  unit may sponsor a reserve officer of the law
enforcement unit under this section for training  as a police officer under ORS 181A.355 to
181A.670.
(b)(A) Notwithstanding  ORS 181A.425, the Department of Public Safety Standards and
Training shall increase class sizes  as necessary to train reserve officers sponsored under this
section.
(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A)  of this paragraph, class sizes may not be increased
by an amount greater than 25 percent of class sizes as of the effective  date of this 2017 Act.
(2)(a) A reserve  officer sponsored under this section may pay for the costs of courses
required for training as a police officer with, in any combination, cash and any state financial
aid as provided in ORS 408.010 to 408.090 to which the reserve officer is entitled.
(b) Upon request, the Department of  Veterans’ Affairs shall provide assistance to reserve
officers in obtaining reimbursement for the costs  of courses required for training under this
section.
(3) When a reserve officer sponsored  under this section has completed the courses re-
quired for training as a police officer, the reserve officer:
(a) Shall be designated by the reserve officer’s law enforcement unit as a certified re-
serve officer; and
(b) May be employed by any law enforcement unit in this state as a police officer.
(4)(a) A reserve officer sponsored under this section who has completed the courses re-
quired for certification as a police officer must remain with a law enforcement agency as  a
certified reserve officer or a police officer for at least three years  after the reserve officer’s
date of certification.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2768
HB 2846
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The certification of a reserve officer who  does not comply with paragraph (a) of this
subsection may be  suspended or revoked pursuant to ORS 181A.630, 181A.640 and 181A.650 if
the reserve officer fails to comply without  good cause, as defined by the department by rule.
SECTION 2. (1) Beginning on the date that is four years after the effective date of this
2017 Act, the Department of Public Safety  Standards and Training shall conduct a study of
the impact of this 2017 Act on:
(a) The budgets of law enforcement units and the department;
(b) The recruitment of reserve officers, certified reserve officers and police officers; and
(c) The maintenance of public safety.
(2) The department shall submit a report in the manner provided  in ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation,  to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to public safety no later than September 15, 2022.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 181A.640 is amended to read:
181A.640. (1) The Department  of Public Safety Standards and Training may deny the application
for training, or deny, suspend or revoke the certification,  of any public safety officer or instructor,
except a youth correction  officer or fire service professional, after written notice and hearing con-
sistent with the provisions of ORS 181A.630, based upon a finding that:
(a) The public safety officer or instructor falsified any information submitted on the  application
for certification or on any documents submitted to the Board  on Public Safety Standards and
Training or the department.
(b) The public safety officer or instructor  has been convicted of a crime or violation in this state
or any other jurisdiction.
(c) The public safety officer or instructor does not meet the applicable minimum standards,
minimum training or the terms and conditions established under ORS 181A.410 (1)(a) to (d).
(d) The public safety officer failed to comply with ORS 181A.790 (3)(b) or section 1 (4)(a) of this
2017 Act.
(2) The department shall deny, suspend or  revoke the certification of a fire service professional,
after written notice  and hearing consistent with the provisions of ORS 181A.630, based upon a
finding that the fire service professional has been convicted in this state  of a crime listed in ORS
137.700 or in any other jurisdiction of a crime that, if committed in this  state, would constitute a
crime listed in ORS 137.700.
(3) The department may  deny, suspend or revoke the certification of any fire service professional
after written notice and hearing consistent with the provisions of ORS 181A.630, based  upon a
finding:
(a) That the  fire service professional falsified any information submitted on the application for
certification or on any documents submitted to the board or the department; or
(b) Consistent with ORS 670.280, that the fire service professional is not fit  to receive or hold
the certification as a result of  conviction of a crime in this state, or in any other jurisdiction, other
than a crime described in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The department shall deny, suspend or revoke the certification of any  public safety officer
or instructor,  except a youth correction officer, after written notice and hearing consistent with the
provisions of ORS 181A.630, based upon a finding that the public safety officer or instructor has
been discharged for cause from employment as a public safety officer.
(5) The department, in consultation with the  board, shall adopt rules specifying those crimes and
violations for which a conviction requires the denial, suspension  or revocation of the certification
[2]
HB 2846
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of a public safety officer or instructor.
(6) Notwithstanding the lapse, suspension, revocation or surrender of the certification of a  pub-
lic safety officer or instructor, the department may:
(a) Proceed with  any investigation of, or any action or disciplinary proceedings against, the
public safety officer or instructor; or
(b) Revise or render void an order suspending or revoking the certification.
(7) The department shall deny, suspend or revoke the accreditation of a training  or educational
program or any  course, subject, facility or instruction thereof if the program, course, subject, facility
or instruction is not in compliance with  rules adopted or conditions prescribed under ORS 181A.410
(1)(g) or 181A.590 (3).
(8) When the department completes an  investigation relating to a person’s qualifications for
employment, training or certification under this section, the department shall issue a report.
(9) In cases involving a proposed denial of  training or certification of a public safety officer or
instructor by the department, the department  has jurisdiction to proceed with any action against the
public safety officer  or instructor notwithstanding a subsequent change in the employment status
of the officer or instructor, if:
(a) The department has issued a notice of intent to deny training or certification; and
(b) The officer or instructor has requested a hearing.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 181A.640, as amended by section 3 of this 2017 Act, is amended to read:
181A.640. (1) The Department  of Public Safety Standards and Training may deny the application
for training, or deny, suspend or revoke the certification,  of any public safety officer or instructor,
except a youth correction  officer or fire service professional, after written notice and hearing con-
sistent with the provisions of ORS 181A.630, based upon a finding that:
(a) The public safety officer or instructor falsified any information submitted on the  application
for certification or on any documents submitted to the Board  on Public Safety Standards and
Training or the department.
(b) The public safety officer or instructor  has been convicted of a crime or violation in this state
or any other jurisdiction.
(c) The public safety officer or instructor does not meet the applicable minimum standards,
minimum training or the terms and conditions established under ORS 181A.410 (1)(a) to (d).
(d) The public safety officer failed to comply with ORS 181A.790 (3)(b) [ or section 1  (4)(a) of this
2017 Act ].
(2) The department shall deny, suspend or  revoke the certification of a fire service professional,
after written notice  and hearing consistent with the provisions of ORS 181A.630, based upon a
finding that the fire service professional has been convicted in this state  of a crime listed in ORS
137.700 or in any other jurisdiction of a crime that, if committed in this  state, would constitute a
crime listed in ORS 137.700.
(3) The department may  deny, suspend or revoke the certification of any fire service professional
after written notice and hearing consistent with the provisions of ORS 181A.630, based  upon a
finding:
(a) That the  fire service professional falsified any information submitted on the application for
certification or on any documents submitted to the board or the department; or
(b) Consistent with ORS 670.280, that the fire service professional is not fit  to receive or hold
the certification as a result of  conviction of a crime in this state, or in any other jurisdiction, other
than a crime described in subsection (2) of this section.
[3]
HB 2846
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) The department shall deny, suspend or revoke the certification of any  public safety officer
or instructor,  except a youth correction officer, after written notice and hearing consistent with the
provisions of ORS 181A.630, based upon a finding that the public safety officer or instructor has
been discharged for cause from employment as a public safety officer.
(5) The department, in consultation with the  board, shall adopt rules specifying those crimes and
violations for which a conviction requires the denial, suspension  or revocation of the certification
of a public safety officer or instructor.
(6) Notwithstanding the lapse, suspension, revocation or surrender of the certification of a  pub-
lic safety officer or instructor, the department may:
(a) Proceed with  any investigation of, or any action or disciplinary proceedings against, the
public safety officer or instructor; or
(b) Revise or render void an order suspending or revoking the certification.
(7) The department shall deny, suspend or revoke the accreditation of a training  or educational
program or any  course, subject, facility or instruction thereof if the program, course, subject, facility
or instruction is not in compliance with  rules adopted or conditions prescribed under ORS 181A.410
(1)(g) or 181A.590 (3).
(8) When the department completes an  investigation relating to a person’s qualifications for
employment, training or certification under this section, the department shall issue a report.
(9) In cases involving a proposed denial of  training or certification of a public safety officer or
instructor by the department, the department  has jurisdiction to proceed with any action against the
public safety officer  or instructor notwithstanding a subsequent change in the employment status
of the officer or instructor, if:
(a) The department has issued a notice of intent to deny training or certification; and
(b) The officer or instructor has requested a hearing.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 408.020 is amended to read:
408.020. (1) The Department  of Veterans’ Affairs may provide financial aid to beneficiaries who
desire to pursue an approved course of study or professional training , including training as a po-
lice officer under ORS 181A.355 to 181A.670  pursuant to section 1 of this 2017 Act,  in or in
connection with any accredited state or other public school or accredited private school  or accred-
ited college consistent with ORS 408.010 to 408.090.
(2) Financial aid under this section may not  exceed $150 per month for each month of full-time
study or training or $100 per month for each month of part-time study or training.
(3) The total number of monthly payments under subsection (2) of this  section may not exceed
the total number  of months served in the Armed Forces of the United States or 36, whichever is less.
(4) The Director of Veterans’ Affairs may permit  a beneficiary to attend a school or college
outside of this state upon a satisfactory showing that the training required is not available in  an
accredited institution within this state.
(5) A  beneficiary may not receive payments or benefits under ORS 408.010 to 408.090 at the same
time that the beneficiary  is receiving educational aid under any federal Act based upon prior service
in the Armed Forces. Time spent by a  person who applies for benefits under ORS 408.010 to 408.090
in the  army specialized training program, the Navy V-12 program or other like training program
may not be counted as service in the Armed Forces within the purview of ORS 408.010.
SECTION 6.  ORS 408.020, as amended by section 5 of this 2017 Act, is amended to read:
408.020. (1) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs may provide financial aid  to beneficiaries who
desire to pursue an approved course  of study or professional training[ , including training as a police
[4]
HB 2846
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
officer under ORS  181A.355 to 181A.670 pursuant to section 1 of this 2017 Act, ] in or in connection
with any accredited state  or other public school or accredited private school or accredited college
consistent with ORS 408.010 to 408.090.
(2) Financial aid under this section may not  exceed $150 per month for each month of full-time
study or training or $100 per month for each month of part-time study or training.
(3) The total number of monthly payments under subsection (2) of this  section may not exceed
the total number  of months served in the Armed Forces of the United States or 36, whichever is less.
(4) The Director of Veterans’ Affairs may permit  a beneficiary to attend a school or college
outside of this state upon a satisfactory showing that the training required is not available in  an
accredited institution within this state.
(5) A  beneficiary may not receive payments or benefits under ORS 408.010 to 408.090 at the same
time that the beneficiary  is receiving educational aid under any federal Act based upon prior service
in the Armed Forces. Time spent by a  person who applies for benefits under ORS 408.010 to 408.090
in the  army specialized training program, the Navy V-12 program or other like training program
may not be counted as service in the Armed Forces within the purview of ORS 408.010.
SECTION 7. (1) Section 1 of this 2017 Act is repealed on January 2, 2024.
(2) The amendments to ORS 181A.640 and 408.020 by sections  4 and 6 of this 2017 Act
become operative on January 2, 2024.
(3) Section 2 of this 2017 Act is repealed on December 31, 2022.
[5]