Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
BATTERY PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATIONS
SECTION 1.
Sections added to chapter.  Sections 2 to 17 of this 2025 Act are added to and
made a part of ORS chapter 459A.
SECTION 2. Definitions. As used in sections 2 to 17 of this 2025 Act:
(1)(a) “Battery-containing product” means a product that contains or  is packaged with
a covered battery.
(b) “Battery-containing product” does not include a covered electronic device as defined
in ORS 459A.305.
(2) “Battery producer responsibility organization” means a nonprofit organization desig-
nated by a covered producer or group of covered producers to act as an agent of the covered
producer or group of covered producers to develop and implement a battery producer re-
sponsibility program on behalf of the covered producer or group of covered producers.
(3) “Battery producer responsibility program” means a statewide program for  the re-
sponsible management of covered batteries that is implemented  by a battery producer re-
sponsibility organization pursuant to a plan approved by  the department under section 5 of
this 2025 Act.
(4) “Brand” means any  mark, word, name, symbol, design, device or graphical element,
or a combination thereof, including a registered  or unregistered trademark, that identifies
a product and distinguishes the product from other products.
(5)(a) “Covered battery” means  a portable battery, a primary battery or a medium format
battery.
(b) “Covered battery” does not include:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3674
HB 2062
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) A battery contained within a medical device that is  not designed and marketed for
sale or resale principally to consumers for personal use and that:
(i) Is a device, as defined in 21 U.S.C. 321(h)  as in effect on the effective date of this 2025
Act;  or
(ii) Satisfies other criteria established by the Environmental Quality  Commission by rule
to maintain consistency with federal laws concerning medical devices.
(B) A battery that contains an electrolyte as a free liquid.
(C) A lead acid battery weighing greater than 11 pounds.
(D) A battery contained within a product,  if the battery is not intended or designed to
be easily removable from the product.
(6) “Covered entity” means:
(a) A resident of this state;
(b) A business entity located in this state;
(c) A public or private institution of learning;
(d) A local government, as defined in ORS 174.116; or
(e) A nonprofit organization located in this state.
(7)(a) “Covered producer” means any person:
(A) That manufactures covered products under a  brand that the manufacturer owns or
is licensed to use;
(B) That sells, irrespective of the selling technique  used, covered products manufactured
by others under a brand that the seller owns;
(C) That manufactures covered products without affixing a brand;
(D) That manufactures covered products to which it affixes a brand that it does  not own;
or
(E) On whose account  covered products manufactured outside the United States are im-
ported into the United States.
(b) “Covered producer” does not include a person:
(A) With a license to manufacture covered products for delivery exclusively  to or at the
order of the licenser.
(B) Described as the  covered producer of a covered product under paragraph (a) of this
subsection, if another  person has accepted responsibility as the covered producer of the
covered product and has joined a  battery producer responsibility organization as the covered
producer for that covered product.
(C) Described as the covered producer of a battery-containing  product under paragraph
(a) of this subsection, if the only batteries used by the battery-containing product are easily
removable and supplied by a  covered producer that has joined a battery producer responsi-
bility organization as the producer for that covered battery under sections 2 to 17 of this 2025
Act.
(8) “Covered product” means a covered battery or a battery-containing product.
(9) “Damaged  or defective battery” means a battery that has been damaged or identified
by the manufacturer as  being defective for safety reasons and must be transported and
packaged as required by rules adopted by the federal Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety
Administration.
(10) “Easily removable” means designed by a manufacturer to  be removable without the
use of tools or removable with the use of only common household tools.
[2]
HB 2062
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(11) “Environmentally sound management  practices” means practices, in compliance with
section 8 of this 2025 Act and all other applicable laws, to ensure continuous  improvement
in environmental outcomes, reduction of  environmental impacts and protection of health,
safety and data privacy in the management of covered batteries for final disposition.
(12) “Medium format battery” means:
(a) A rechargeable battery that:
(A)(i) Weighs more than 11 pounds; or
(ii) Has a rating of more than 300 watt-hours; and
(B)(i) Weighs 25 pounds or less; and
(ii) Has a rating of 3,000 watt-hours or less.
(b) A  primary battery that weighs more than 4.4 pounds but less than or equal to 25
pounds.
(13) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization  or group of organizations described
in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that is exempt  from income tax under
section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(14) “Portable battery” means:
(a) A rechargeable battery that  weighs 11 pounds or less and has a rating of 300 watt-
hours or less; or
(b) A primary battery that weighs 4.4 pounds or less.
(15) “Primary battery” means a battery that is not capable of being recharged.
(16) “Processor” means a facility that processes covered batteries  after collection and
prepares covered batteries for recycling or management through the final destination of  the
collected covered battery material.
(17) “Rechargeable  battery” means a battery that contains one or more voltaic or
galvanic cells, electrically connected to produce  electric energy, and that is designed to be
recharged.
(18) “Responsible end market” means a materials market in which the  recycling or re-
covery of materials or the disposal of contaminants is conducted in a way that  benefits the
environment and minimizes risks to public health and worker health and safety.
SECTION 3.
Requirement to participate in a battery  producer responsibility organization.
(1) A covered  producer may not sell, offer for sale or distribute in or into this state a covered
product unless the covered producer satisfies the requirements of sections 2 to 17 of this 2025
Act by participating in a battery producer  responsibility organization that successfully im-
plements a battery producer responsibility program.
(2) The failure of a battery producer responsibility organization  to satisfy any of the re-
sponsibilities delegated to it by a covered producer for developing and implementing a battery
producer responsibility program does not relieve the covered producer of  the covered
producer’s responsibility to satisfy the requirements of sections 2 to 17 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
Plans for battery producer responsibility programs.  (1) In the form  and
manner prescribed by the Department of Environmental Quality, a  battery producer re-
sponsibility organization must submit to the department a plan  for implementing a battery
producer responsibility program as provided in this section.
(2) A battery producer responsibility program  plan must describe how the battery pro-
ducer responsibility organization  will implement a battery producer responsibility program
that satisfies the requirements of sections 2 to 17 of this 2025 Act. The plan must include:
[3]
HB 2062
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) A list of all covered producers  participating in the battery producer responsibility
organization and a list of each  brand sold, offered for sale or distributed in or into this state
by each participating covered producer.
(b) A description of how the battery producer responsibility organization will:
(A) Provide for  the responsible management of covered batteries consistent with envi-
ronmentally sound management practices and the polices set forth in ORS 459.015 (2).
(B) Provide for convenient and equitable service as required by section 7 of  this 2025 Act,
including a list  of all service providers and processors the battery producer responsibility
organization will contract with or use to provide  services required by sections 2 to 17 of this
2025 Act.
(C) Provide for education and public awareness as required by section 9 of this 2025 Act,
including a description of the biennial survey to measure public awareness required by sec-
tion 9 of this 2025 Act.
(D) Establish a schedule of membership fees  sufficient to meet the financial obligations
of the battery producer responsibility organization as described in  section 11 of this 2025 Act.
(E) Ensure  continuous improvement of the battery producer responsibility program by
establishing and working to achieve  measurable performance goals for the program. Per-
formance goals must include the date by which the goal will  be met. Performance goals must
include annual goals for:
(i) Collection rates;
(ii) Recycling efficiency; and
(ii) Achieving and maintaining high public awareness of the program, including awareness
in low-income, rural and other historically underserved communities.
(F) Coordinate with other battery producer responsibility organizations, if applicable.
(c) A program budget that describes how the  battery producer responsibility organization
will finance the battery producer responsibility program,  including the costs to carry out a
program that satisfies the requirements of sections 2 to 17 of  this 2025 Act apportioned
among each covered producer participating in the battery producer responsibility  organiza-
tion, as required by section 11 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
Approval of battery producer  responsibility program plans.  (1) The Depart-
ment of Environmental Quality shall approve a  battery producer responsibility program plan
submitted to the department  under section 4 of this 2025 Act if the department determines
that the plan meets the requirements of section 4 of this 2025 Act and that the battery pro-
ducer responsibility organization will successfully implement the program in accordance with
the plan.
(2) Not later than 90 days after receiving a plan  under section 4 of this 2025 Act, the
department shall either approve, approve with conditions or  reject the plan. If the depart-
ment rejects the plan the  department shall provide the reason or reasons for the rejection
to the battery producer responsibility organization  in writing. A battery producer responsi-
bility organization must submit a revised plan to the department no later  than 60 days after
the date of the rejection.
(3) No later than 60 days after receiving a revised plan under subsection (2) of this sec-
tion, the  department shall either approve, approve with conditions or reject the revised plan.
If the department rejects the  revised plan, the department shall provide the reason or rea-
sons for the rejection to the battery  producer responsibility organization in writing. A bat-
[4]
HB 2062
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tery producer responsibility organization must submit a second revised plan  to the
department no later than 45 days after the date of the rejection.
(4)(a) No later than 45 days after receiving a second revised plan under subsection  (3) of
this section, the department shall either approve the second revised plan or make such
modifications to the plan as necessary for approval.
(b) If, after receiving a second revised plan, the department determines that the  battery
producer responsibility organization will be unable to successfully implement a battery pro-
ducer responsibility program in accordance with a proposed or modified plan, the department
shall specify the date on which the battery producer  responsibility organization must cease
to operate a battery producer responsibility program in this state. The  department may
consider the past performance  of a battery producer responsibility organization when making
a determination under this paragraph.
(5)(a) A plan approved by  the department under this section is valid for three years. No
less than 180 days before a plan approved under this section  expires, a battery producer re-
sponsibility organization shall submit an updated plan to be approved under this section for
an additional three years. An updated plan must satisfy the requirements of section 4 of this
2025 Act and describe any substantive changes from the previously approved plan.
(b) The department’s rejection of a  plan does not relieve a battery producer responsibility
organization from continuing to implement a  battery producer responsibility program in
compliance with a previously approved plan pending a final action by  the department on the
updated plan.
(6) Subject to section 16 of this 2025 Act, the  department may make available to the
public battery producer responsibility program plans, and any revisions thereto.
(7) Beginning no later than 90 days after a plan is  approved under this section, a battery
producer responsibility organization must implement a  battery producer responsibility pro-
gram as described in the approved plan.
SECTION 6.
Changes to battery producer responsibility programs.  (1) In a form and
manner prescribed by the Department of Environmental Quality, a  battery producer re-
sponsibility organization must request preapproval from  the department for any change to
a battery producer responsibility program plan that  substantively alters the program. Except
as provided in subsection (3) of this section,  a battery producer responsibility organization
must make a request under  this subsection not later than 60 days before the change is to
occur. For purposes of this subsection, changes that substantively  alter a battery producer
responsibility program include, but are not limited to:
(a) Changes involving the methods used to collect covered batteries;
(b) Changes involving methods used to dispose of covered batteries;
(c) Changes to the policies and procedures  for handling and disposing of covered bat-
teries;
(d) Changes involving methods used to foster public awareness  of the battery producer
responsibility program; and
(e) Changes to the location of a collection site.
(2) The department shall approve  or reject a request submitted pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section within 60 days  of receiving the request. If the department does not approve
or reject the request, and provide written notice to the battery  producer responsibility or-
ganization of the department’s decision within 60 days of the  date on which the department
[5]
HB 2062
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
received the request, the proposed change shall be considered approved.
(3) If a battery producer responsibility  organization intends to make a proposed change
to a battery producer responsibility program but, for  good cause as determined by the de-
partment, is unable to make a request 60 days before the proposed  change is to occur as
required under subsection (1) of this  section, the battery producer responsibility organization
shall notify the department of the  proposed change as far in advance of the proposed change
as practicable. Upon receipt of notice described in this subsection, the department  shall
consult with the  battery producer responsibility organization regarding the proposed change.
Not later than seven business days after receiving the  notice, the department may tempo-
rarily approve the proposed change.
(4) The department may require a battery producer responsibility organization  to modify
a battery producer responsibility  program plan and submit to the department changes for
approval as  described in subsections (1) to (3) of this section if the department determines
that the battery producer responsibility  organization is not meeting program goals described
in an approved battery producer responsibility program plan.
(5) In a form and manner prescribed  by the department, a battery producer responsibility
organization must notify the department:
(a) Not later than 30 days after the change occurs, of any  change to the contact infor-
mation for the battery producer responsibility organization.
(b) Not later than 60 days after the change occurs, of any change involving:
(A) Which covered producers are participating  in the battery producer responsibility or-
ganization;
(B) The contact information  for a covered producer participating in the battery producer
responsibility organization; or
(C) The ownership of a covered producer participating in the battery producer responsi-
bility organization.
SECTION 7.
Convenient and equitable service.  (1) A battery producer responsibility or-
ganization must provide convenient and equitable service  throughout this state as provided
in this section, including to rural areas and  lower-income and other historically underserved
populations.
(2) Convenient and equitable service must include a  network of collection sites distrib-
uted to ensure that 95 percent of the residents of this state are within 15 miles of a collection
site, and must also include:
(a) At least one collection site in each county;
(b) At least one collection site  in each city with a population of at least 4,000 but less
than 10,000;
(c) In each city  with a population of at least 10,000 but less than 200,000, at least one
collection site, plus  one additional collection site for every additional 20,000 residents of the
city over 10,000; and
(d) In each city with a  population of 200,000 or greater, at least 10 collection sites, plus
one additional collection site for every additional 50,000 residents of the city over 200,000.
(3)(a) A collection site for a county may be the  same as a collection site for a city in the
county.
(b) For purposes of calculating the population  of a city within a metropolitan service
district established under ORS chapter  268, the population of any adjacent unincorporated
[6]
HB 2062
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
area of a county that is  within the metropolitan service district shall be included in the
population of the city.
(c) Collection sites shall be staffed and open to the public at a  frequency adequate to
meet the needs of the area being served.
(d) A battery  producer responsibility organization may provide collection service jointly
with another battery producer responsibility organization.
(4) The department may waive the  requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of this section
with respect to a county or  city if a proposed battery producer responsibility program plan
demonstrates to  the department’s satisfaction that alternative collection methods would
provide substantially equivalent collection convenience.
(5) A collection site described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section must:
(a) Accept each brand and type of covered battery, other than medium format batteries,
at no cost to covered entities;
(b) Provide appropriate containers for the collection of covered batteries;
(c) Be staffed by adequately trained employees;
(d) Display signs  or other visual aids to inform covered entities and staff on how to
properly and safely collect and handle discarded covered batteries; and
(e) Make educational materials about the battery producer responsibility program avail-
able to covered entities.
(6) A battery producer responsibility organization shall:
(a) Provide fair financial compensation to collection sites  calculated to cover the costs
of collecting, storing, managing and transporting covered batteries; and
(b) Enter into agreements with all willing transfer stations, landfills and material recov-
ery facilities that are covered under a solid waste disposal permit issued by  the Department
of Environmental Quality to collect covered batteries in accordance with all applicable laws
and the approved battery producer responsibility program plan.
(7)(a) In addition to the collection sites required by  subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
a battery producer responsibility organization must provide for collection of  medium format
and damaged or defective batteries by providing at no  charge to covered entities, in each
county of this state:
(A) Collection by trained individuals at one  or more household hazardous waste collection
sites; or
(B) Collection by trained individuals at  one or more collection events held in the county
each year.
(b) A battery producer responsibility organization is responsible for  all costs associated
with the collection of medium format and damaged or defective batteries, including  the costs
of providing containers at collection sites.
(8) A battery producer responsibility organization may contract with willing collection
service providers to provide on-route collection of covered batteries and transfer  collected
batteries to the battery producer responsibility program for further management.
SECTION 8.
Environmentally sound management practices.  (1) A battery producer re-
sponsibility organization must employ environmentally  sound management practices while
collecting, transporting, processing and recycling or otherwise managing  covered batteries
as provided in this section. A battery producer responsibility organization must, in  compli-
ance with all applicable laws, ensure responsible management and continuous improvement
[7]
HB 2062
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in environmental outcomes, reduction of  environmental impacts and protection of health,
safety and data privacy in the management of covered batteries by employing practices  that
include, but are not limited to:
(a) Adequate record keeping;
(b) Tracking the fate of materials from covered batteries;
(c) Conducting performance audits and inspections;
(d) Developing opportunities for reuse and refurbishment;
(e) Complying with worker health and safety requirements;
(f) Ensuring that covered batteries are delivered to responsible end markets;
(g) Maintaining liability insurance and other financial assurances; and
(h) Carrying out other practices as may be adopted by rule by the  Environmental Quality
Commission.
(2) A battery producer responsibility organization must ensure that  all collection sites
and processors not directly  controlled by the battery producer responsibility organization use
environmentally sound management practices with respect to covered batteries.
SECTION 9.
Public education and awareness.  (1) A battery producer responsibility or-
ganization must develop educational resources and conduct public  awareness activities
across multiple  types of media to advertise and promote, on a regular basis, recycling of
covered batteries and collection opportunities statewide. In addition, a battery  producer re-
sponsibility organization must:
(a) Establish a toll-free telephone number and a website address that a covered entity
may use to contact the battery producer  responsibility organization to provide feedback
about the battery producer responsibility program and to obtain information about  the pro-
gram, including:
(A) The location of collection sites;
(B) The time and location of collection events; and
(C) Other collection services.
(b)(A) Develop educational materials, including educational web-based content, press  re-
leases, advertisements and promotional materials.
(B) Educational materials must:
(i) Be provided at sites  that sell covered products, collection sites and sites that accept
damaged or defective batteries; and
(ii) Include materials that are targeted to overburdened or vulnerable communities.
(c) Conduct a  biennial survey to measure public awareness, using questions and meth-
odology that have been approved by the Department of Environmental Quality.
(2) A battery producer responsibility  organization shall coordinate with other battery
producer responsibility organizations under this section to ensure that program users can
easily identify, understand and  access the services provided by all battery producer respon-
sibility programs that are operational  in this state. At a minimum, all of the battery pro-
ducer responsibility programs that are operational in this state must provide a single
toll-free telephone number and a single website  address that a covered entity may use to
contact battery producer responsibility organizations  and to acquire information about bat-
tery producer responsibility programs.
SECTION 10.
Annual report.  (1) A battery producer responsibility organization must
submit to the Department of Environmental  Quality, in a form and manner prescribed by the
[8]
HB 2062
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
department, an annual report on the development, implementation and  operation of the
battery producer responsibility program. The annual report must include:
(a) A list of covered producers participating in the  battery producer responsibility pro-
gram, the brands associated with each covered producer and the date the covered  producer
began participating in the organization.
(b) The amount, by weight, chemistry and method of collection, of covered batteries col-
lected under the program.
(c) The amount, by weight and chemistry, of covered batteries collected at  each col-
lection site.
(d) An assessment of whether  the battery producer responsibility organization imple-
mented the program in accordance with the plan approved under section 5 of this 2025 Act.
(e) A summary of the  environmentally sound management practices employed in the
program and an attestation that all  covered batteries were managed according to environ-
mentally sound management practices.
(f) A  list of collection sites, processors, transporters and responsible end markets used
by the program during the preceding program year.
(g) A summary of public awareness and education activities performed by the  battery
producer responsibility organization, alone or in coordination with  one or more battery pro-
ducer responsibility organizations, sufficient to demonstrate to the department that the  or-
ganization has satisfied the requirements of section 9 of this 2025 Act.
(h) The results of the most recent biennial survey  conducted under section 9 of this 2025
Act.
(i)(A) An analysis of whether the battery  producer responsibility organization met per-
formance goals  proposed by the battery producer responsibility program plan or adopted by
the Environmental Quality Commission; and
(B) If the battery producer responsibility organization did not  meet performance goals,
a description of actions the battery producer  responsibility organization will take to meet
those goals.
(j) A summary financial  statement documenting the financing of the battery producer
responsibility organization’s program and an analysis of  program costs and expenditures in-
curred in this  state, including an analysis of the program’s expenses, such as collection,
transportation, recycling, education and administrative overhead.
(2) The department shall review and  approve a report submitted under this section if the
department determines that the report satisfies the requirements of this section. If  the de-
partment does not approve a report, the  department shall provide the battery producer re-
sponsibility organization with written notice of the reasons for the rejection.
(3) Subject to  section 16 of this 2025 Act, the department may make reports submitted
under this section available to the public.
(4) Upon the request of the department, a battery producer responsibility  organization
must provide to the department:
(a) A description of each type of material sent to each processor;
(b) The method of processing used by each processor; and
(c) The responsible end market for each material managed under the program.
SECTION 11.
Membership fees. (1)(a) A battery producer responsibility organization  shall
establish a schedule of membership fees to be paid by covered  producers participating in the
[9]
HB 2062
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
organization. Membership fees established pursuant to this section  must be sufficient to
meet the financial obligations of the organization under sections 2 to 17 of this 2025 Act.
(b) A battery producer responsibility organization and any service provider that contracts
with a battery producer responsibility organization may not charge a fee to  a covered entity
for any services necessary to satisfy the battery producer responsibility organization’s obli-
gations under sections 2 to 17 of this  2025 Act. A covered producer may not charge a fee to
a consumer at the point of sale to cover the cost of meeting the covered  producer’s obli-
gations under sections 2 to 17 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The schedule of membership  fees must incentivize covered producers to continually
reduce the environmental and human health impacts of covered products. A  fee schedule
that satisfies the requirements of this section may include a fee structure that:
(a) Encourages designs intended to facilitate reuse and recycling of covered batteries;
(b) Encourages the use of recycled content in covered batteries;
(c) Discourages the use of materials that increase system costs  of managing covered
batteries; or
(d) Encourages other design attributes that reduce the environmental  impacts of covered
batteries.
SECTION 12.
Enforcement.  (1) The Department of Environmental Quality shall have the
power to enter upon and inspect, at any reasonable time, any public or  private property,
premises or place for the purpose of investigating either an  actual or suspected violation of
sections 2 to 17 of this 2025 Act or rules adopted under sections 2 to 17 of this 2025 Act.
(2) A battery producer responsibility organization  shall retain all records related to the
implementation and administration of a battery producer responsibility program for  not less
than three years from the time the record was created  and make the records available for
inspection by the department upon request.
(3) In accordance with the applicable provisions of  ORS chapter 183 relating to contested
case proceedings, the department may  issue an order requiring compliance with the pro-
visions of sections 2 to 17 of this 2025 Act.
(4) In accordance with the applicable provisions of  ORS chapter 183 relating to contested
case proceedings, and in accordance  with ORS 468.130 and rules adopted pursuant to ORS
468.130, the department may issue civil penalties for violations of the provisions  of sections
2 to 17 of this 2025 Act and rules adopted under  sections 2 to 17 of this 2025 Act. All penalties
recovered for violations of sections 2 to 17 of this 2025 Act and rules  adopted under sections
2 to 17 of  this 2025 Act shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to the Battery
Producer Responsibility Fund established under section 14 of this 2025 Act.
(5) The department may issue an order under subsection (3)  of this section to suspend
or revoke a battery producer responsibility program  plan if the department determines that:
(a) A violation or repeated violations of sections 2 to 17 of this  2025 Act present a risk
to the environment or public health; or
(b) A violation has had a material impact on the implementation and administration  of
the battery producer responsibility program plan.
SECTION 13. Fees. (1) The Environmental Quality Commission shall establish the fol-
lowing fees for the purpose of paying the costs of administering sections 2 to 17  of this 2025
Act:
(a) A plan review fee for reviewing a battery producer  responsibility program plan sub-
[10]
HB 2062
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
mitted under section 4 of this 2025 Act.
(b) An annual fee for expenses associated with the ongoing costs of administering
sections 2 to 17 this 2025 Act.
(2) Each battery producer responsibility organization that  operates a battery producer
responsibility program  in this state is responsible for paying the fees established by this
section. If more than one textile  producer responsibility organization operates a battery
producer responsibility program in this  state, the fee established under subsection (1)(b) of
this section  shall be paid in equal parts by each battery producer responsibility organization
operating in this state.
(3) Fees established under subsection (1) of this section must be reasonably calculated
to cover the costs of administering sections 2 to 17 of this 2025 Act.
(4) The department shall deposit fee moneys collected pursuant to this  section into the
Battery Producer Responsibility Fund established under section 14 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 14.
Battery Producer Responsibility Fund.  (1) The  Battery Producer Responsi-
bility Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
Interest earned by the Battery Producer Responsibility Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The Battery Producer Responsibility Fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts  deposited in the fund by the Department of Environmental Quality under
section 13 of this 2025 Act;
(b) Amounts credited to the fund under section 12 of this 2025 Act;
(c) Amounts appropriated or  otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative As-
sembly; and
(d) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any other source.
(3) Moneys in the Battery Producer  Responsibility Fund are continuously appropriated
to the Department of Environmental Quality for the  purpose of carrying out sections 2 to
17 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 15.
Antitrust immunity.  The Legislative Assembly declares that the collab-
oration of covered producers through battery producer  responsibility organizations to de-
velop and implement battery producer responsibility program plans is in  the best interests
of the public. Therefore, the Legislative Assembly declares its intent that participating in  a
battery producer responsibility organization to implement a battery producer  responsibility
program plan as required by sections 2 to 17 of this  2025 Act shall be exempt from state
antitrust laws. The Legislative Assembly further declares its intent to provide immunity for
participating in a  battery producer responsibility organization to implement a battery pro-
ducer responsibility program plan as required by sections 2 to 17 of this 2025 Act from federal
antitrust laws. This  section does not authorize any person to engage in activities or to
conspire to engage in activities that constitute per se violations of state  or federal antitrust
laws that are not authorized under sections 2 to 17 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 16.
Confidentiality. A covered producer or battery  producer responsibility or-
ganization that submits information or records to  the Department of Environmental Quality
under sections 2 to 17 of this 2025 Act may request  that the information or records be made
available only for the  confidential use of the department. The department shall consider the
request and weigh the harm suffered by  the person making the request against the public
interest in disclosure. Information  or records for which the department grants a request
under this section are confidential and not subject to public disclosure under ORS 192.311  to
[11]
HB 2062
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
192.478, except that the department  may disclose summarized information or aggregated data
if the information or data does not directly or indirectly identify the  confidential information
of a specific covered producer or battery producer responsibility organization.
SECTION 17.
Rules. The Environmental Quality Commission may adopt any rules neces-
sary for the effective administration of sections 2 to 17 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 18. ORS 459.995, as amended by section 6, chapter 73, Oregon Laws 2023,  is amended
to read:
459.995. Civil penalties. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,  in addition to
any other penalty provided by law:
(a) Any person who violates ORS 459.205, 459.270, 459.272, 459.386 to 459.405, 459.485, 459.705
to 459.790, 459A.005 to 459A.620, 459A.310 to  459A.335, 459A.860 to 459A.975 or 646A.080, or any
rule or  order of the Environmental Quality Commission pertaining to the disposal, collection, stor-
age or reuse or recycling of solid wastes, as defined by ORS 459.005, or any  rule or order pertaining
to the disposal, storage or transportation  of waste tires, as defined by ORS 459.705, or any rule or
order pertaining to  the sale of novelty items that contain encapsulated liquid mercury or any rule
or order pertaining to compact fluorescent lamps or linear fluorescent lamps,  as defined by ORS
459.485, incurs a civil penalty not to exceed $25,000 per day for each day of the violation.
(b) Any person  who violates the provisions of ORS 459.420 to 459.426 incurs a civil penalty not
to exceed $500  for each violation. Each battery that is disposed of improperly is a separate violation.
Each day an establishment fails to post the notice  required under ORS 459.426 is a separate vio-
lation.
(c) For each day a city,  county or metropolitan service district fails to provide the opportunity
to recycle as required under ORS 459A.005, the  city, county or metropolitan service district incurs
a civil penalty not to exceed $500 for each violation.
(d) Any person who violates the provisions of ORS  459.247 (1)(f) incurs a civil penalty not to
exceed $500 for each violation.  Each covered electronic device that is disposed of improperly is a
separate violation.
(e) Any  retailer that violates the provisions of ORS 459A.156 or 459A.825 (1) or (2)(b) incurs a
civil penalty not to exceed $100 per day for each day of the violation.
(f) Any producer or renovator that violates the provisions of ORS 459A.156 or  459A.825 (1) in-
curs a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000 per day for each day of the violation.
(g) Any stewardship organization that  violates the provisions of ORS 459A.150 to 459A.189,
459A.825 (2)(a), 459A.827, 459A.830 to 459A.837 or 459A.842 incurs a civil penalty not  to exceed
$1,000 per day for each day of the violation.
(h) Any food vendor that violates ORS 459.468 incurs a civil penalty not to  exceed $100 for each
day of the violation.
(i) Any person that violates ORS  459.471 or 459.474 incurs a civil penalty not to exceed $500
per day for each day of the violation.
(j)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, a covered  producer or
battery producer responsibility organization that violates  sections 2 to 17 of this 2025 Act
incurs a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000 per day for each day of the violation.
(B) A  covered producer that fails to satisfy the requirement to join a battery producer
responsibility organization under section 2 of this  2025 Act incurs a civil penalty not to ex-
ceed $10,000 for each day that covered products that the covered producer is responsible  for
are sold in this state.
[12]
HB 2062
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(k) Any  person that violates section 20 of this 2025 Act incurs a civil penalty not to ex-
ceed $500 for each violation.  Each removable lithium-ion battery that is disposed of improp-
erly is a separate violation.
(2) Any product manufacturer or package manufacturer who violates ORS 459A.650  to 459A.665
or any rule adopted under  ORS 459A.650 to 459A.665 incurs a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000 per
day for each day of the violation. A violation of  ORS 459A.650 to 459A.665 is not subject to addi-
tional penalties under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Any  civil penalty authorized by subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be imposed in the
manner provided by ORS 468.135.
SECTION 19.
Section 20 of this 2025 Act is added  to and made a part of ORS 459.205 to
459.385.
SECTION 20. (1) A person may not knowingly dispose of a removable  lithium-ion battery
in mixed municipal solid waste.
(2) A  person may not dispose of a removable lithium-ion battery except by delivery to a
battery producer responsibility program, as defined in section 2 of  this 2025 Act, or a person
accepting batteries on behalf of a battery producer responsibility program.
(3) The owner or operator of a disposal site is not in violation of this section if the dis-
posal site has posted  in a conspicuous location a sign stating that removable lithium-ion
batteries must be managed through  collection sites established by a battery producer re-
sponsibility organization and are not accepted for disposal at the facility.
TEMPORARY PROVISIONS
SECTION 21. Required date for initial plan.  (1) A  battery producer responsibility organ-
ization shall first submit a battery producer responsibility program plan to the Department
of Environmental  Quality for approval under section 4 of this 2025 Act no later than Sep-
tember 1, 2027.
(2) A battery producer responsibility program plan described in  this section must be op-
erational by July 1, 2028.
SECTION 22.
Report. (1) The Department of Environmental Quality shall review and
evaluate studies or  assessments regarding whether products or batteries that are not cur-
rently covered by a  state’s battery extended producer responsibility law should be covered
at a later date.
(2) The department shall review and evaluate studies or assessments described  in sub-
section (1) of this section carried out by Illinois, Vermont  and Washington. The department
may review similar studies or assessments carried out by any other state or person.
(3) No later than May 30, 2028,  the department shall submit a report to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to the environment, in the  manner provided
by ORS 192.245. The report must include the findings and recommendations of any  study or
assessment reviewed by the department  under this section. The report may include recom-
mendations for legislation based on the department’s evaluation of  the studies or assess-
ments reviewed by the department.
UNIT AND SECTION CAPTIONS
[13]
HB 2062
1
2
3
4
SECTION 23.
Unit and section captions.  The unit and section captions used in this 2025
Act are provided only for the convenience of the reader and do not become part of the stat-
utory law of this state or express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
[14]