Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The  School Support Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the School Support  Fund shall be
credited to  the fund. The School Support Fund shall consist of moneys transferred from the
Oregon Marijuana Account established under ORS 475B.759. Moneys in the fund are  contin-
uously appropriated to the Department of Education for  the purposes described in subsection
(2) of this section.
(2) The Department of Education shall use the moneys in the fund to:
(a) Develop  programming designed to prevent bullying, substance abuse, violence in
schools and suicide;
(b) Work collaboratively with community partners engaged in the  prevention of bullying,
substance abuse, violence in schools and suicide;
(c) Support any existing programming designed  to prevent bullying, substance abuse, vi-
olence in schools and suicide;
(d) Develop and implement an age-appropriate health education curriculum that focuses
on the prevention of bullying, substance abuse, violence in schools and suicide;
(e) Provide  training and resources for school personnel on the implementation of
evidence-based programming designed to encourage healthy school culture; and
(f) Create a community marijuana resource officer position in each school district.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 475B.759, as amended by section  1, chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2018, is amended
to read:
475B.759. (1) There is established the Oregon Marijuana Account, separate  and distinct from the
General Fund.
(2) The account shall consist of moneys transferred to the account under ORS 475B.760.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly the amount of moneys available  in the
Oregon Marijuana Account.
(b) Subject  to subsection (4) of this section, the department shall transfer quarterly 20 percent
of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account as follows:
(A) Ten percent of the moneys  in the account must be transferred to the cities of this state in
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3657
HB 3235
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10 percent  must be transferred in shares that reflect the popu-
lation of each city of this state that is  not exempt from this paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)
of this section compared to the population of all cities of this  state that are not exempt from this
paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section, as determined by  Portland State University
under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately preceding the date of the transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the  number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business  day
of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located in each city compared
to the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100  and 475B.105 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten  percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the following
shares:
(i) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the total  commer-
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant
to ORS 475B.070 on the last business day of  the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer
for all premises located in  each county compared to the total commercially available area of all
grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent of  the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number of li-
censes held pursuant to ORS  475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business day of the cal-
endar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located  in each county compared to
the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
(c) Eighty percent of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account must be used as follows:
(A) [ Forty] Thirty-five percent  of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes
for which moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used;
(B) Twenty percent of the moneys in the  account must be used solely for mental health treat-
ment or for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment;
(C) Fifteen percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for  purposes for which
moneys in the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020 may be used; [ and]
(D) Five percent of the  moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes related to al-
cohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services ; and
(E) Five percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred  to the School Support
Fund established in section 1 of this 2019  Act and must be used solely for the purposes for
which moneys in the fund may be used .
(4)(a) A city that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment  of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is  required is not eligible to
receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section.
(b) A  county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.070  is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
subsection (3)(b)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 or  475B.105 is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B)(ii) of this section.
[2]
HB 3235
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) In a form  and manner prescribed by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission, each city and
county in this state shall certify with the commission whether the  city or county has an ordinance
prohibiting the establishment of a premises for  which issuance of a license under ORS 475B.070,
475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required. If a city fails to comply with this subsection, the city  is
not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section.  If a county fails
to comply with this subsection, the county is not eligible to receive  transfers of moneys under sub-
section (3)(b)(B) of this section.
SECTION 3.  ORS 475B.759, as amended by sections 1  and 2, chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2018, is
amended to read:
475B.759. (1) There is established the Oregon Marijuana Account, separate  and distinct from the
General Fund.
(2) The account shall consist of moneys transferred to the account under ORS 475B.760.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly the amount of moneys available  in the
Oregon Marijuana Account.
(b) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, the department shall transfer quarterly 20  percent
of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account as follows:
(A) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to the  cities of this state in
the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred  in shares that reflect the popu-
lation of each city of this state that is  not exempt from this paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)
of this section compared to the population of  all cities of this state that are not exempt from this
paragraph pursuant to subsection  (4)(a) of this section, as determined by Portland State University
under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately preceding the date of the transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five  percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business  day
of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located in each city compared
to the number of licenses  held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten  percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the following
shares:
(i) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the total  commer-
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant
to ORS 475B.070 on the last business day of  the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer
for all premises located in  each county compared to the total commercially available area of all
grow canopies associated with marijuana  producer licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent of  the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number of li-
censes held pursuant to ORS  475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business day of the cal-
endar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises located  in each county compared to
the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
(c) Eighty percent of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account must be used as follows:
(A) [ Forty] Thirty-five percent  of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes
for which moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used;
(B) Twenty percent of the moneys in the account must  be used solely for purposes for which
[3]
HB 3235
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
moneys in the  Mental Health Alcoholism and Drug Services Account established under ORS 430.380
may be used;
(C) Fifteen percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for  purposes for which
moneys in the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020 may be used; [ and]
(D) Five percent of the  moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes related to al-
cohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services ; and
(E) Five percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred  to the School Support
Fund established in section 1 of this 2019  Act and must be used solely for the purposes for
which moneys in the fund may be used .
(4)(a) A city that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment  of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is  required is not eligible to
receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section.
(b) A  county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.070  is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
subsection (3)(b)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 or  475B.105 is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B)(ii) of this section.
(5) In a form  and manner prescribed by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission, each city and
county in this state shall certify with the commission whether the  city or county has an ordinance
prohibiting the establishment of a premises for  which issuance of a license under ORS 475B.070,
475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required. If a city fails to comply with this subsection, the city  is
not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section.  If a county fails
to comply with this subsection, the county is not eligible to receive  transfers of moneys under sub-
section (3)(b)(B) of this section.
[4]