Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 328.542 is amended to read:
328.542. (1) Subject to  the Local Budget Law (ORS 294.305 to 294.565) , [ and] to sections 11 and
11b, Article XI, Oregon Constitution, and to subsection (3) of  this section,  each school district
board shall  prepare annually or biennially the budget of the school district and shall certify ad
valorem property taxes to the assessor as provided by law.
(2) In addition to the requirements prescribed by ORS 294.305 to 294.565, a school district  must
include at least one member of  the educational equity advisory committee of the school district on
the budget committee.
(3)(a) A school district board shall ensure that at least 50 percent of the expenditures of
the school district are paid as compensation to teachers  who spend 75 percent or more of the
school day teaching core academic subjects or manual skills.
(b) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Compensation” includes salary, health care and retirement benefits.
(B) “Core academic subjects” includes  mathematics, science, language arts, history, ge-
ography, economics, civics, the arts and world languages.
(C) “Expenditures” means amounts paid from the general purpose grant distributed from
the State School Fund.
(D) “Manual skills” includes welding, woodworking and other related practical skills.
SECTION 2.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3362