Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 334.
SECTION 2. (1) Each education service district may establish a regional career  center
to provide regionally appropriate career and  technical education opportunities for students
of component school districts. A regional career center may be jointly established by two or
more education service districts.
(2) The purposes of a regional career center are to:
(a) Provide  coordinated planning and deployment of funding to meet the career and
technical needs of component school districts; and
(b) As needed, develop, construct or remodel  facilities, including mobile facilities, to in-
crease the number and  capacity of advanced career development opportunities or regionally
appropriate career learning opportunities.
(3) The purposes of a regional  career center shall be met through a funding plan devel-
oped by the education service district, or, as appropriate,  education service districts, after
consultation with representatives of:
(a) Component school districts;
(b) Local workforce development boards, as defined in ORS 660.300, that  serve the area
of the education service district;
(c) Community colleges that serve the students of the education service district;
(d) Local and regional industries of the education service district; and
(e) City and county governments within the boundaries of the education service district.
(4) A funding plan developed for a regional career center:
(a) Must be based on an assessment of the  career and technical education needs for the
area served by the education service district and an identification of any  deficiencies in
funding or services to meet those needs.
(b) Must demonstrate how the use of funds supports providing students with:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3961
HB 3552
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Pathways that lead to high wage and high demand jobs; and
(B) Work-based learning opportunities that can lead to a  relevant, industry-recognized
credential by the time the student receives a high school diploma.
(c) Must demonstrate how  students will receive high-quality career navigation and ad-
vising services to identify potential careers and  relevant pathways to those potential careers.
(d) Must show how the proposed uses of funds are appropriate to the  needs of the area
served by the education service district and its  students and how the center’s services will
operate across the area being served.
(5) Based on rules adopted by the State Board of Education and funding plans  submitted
by education service districts, the Department of Education shall award grants to education
service districts for regional career centers from moneys  available for regional career cen-
ters.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 334.175 is amended to read:
334.175. (1) An education service district shall provide  regionalized core services to component
school districts. The goals of these services are to:
(a) Assist component school districts in meeting the requirements of state and federal law;
(b) Improve student learning;
(c) Enhance the quality of instruction provided to students;
(d) Enable component school districts and the students who attend  schools in those districts to
have equitable access to resources; and
(e) Maximize operational and fiscal efficiencies for component school districts.
(2) The services provided by  an education service district shall be provided according to a local
service plan developed by the education service district and component school districts. The educa-
tion service district and component school districts shall develop the local service plan  to meet the
goals specified in subsection (1) of this section. The local  service plan must include services in at
least the following areas:
(a) Programs for children with special needs, including but not limited to special education ser-
vices and services for at-risk students.
(b) Technology support for component school districts and the  individual technology plans of
those districts, including but not limited  to technology infrastructure services, data services, in-
structional technology services and distance learning.
(c) School improvement services for component school districts, including but not limited to:
(A) Services designed to support component school  districts in meeting the requirements of state
and federal law;
(B) Services designed to allow the education service district  to participate in and facilitate a
review of the state and federal standards related to  the provision of a quality education by compo-
nent school districts;
(C) Services designed to support and facilitate continuous school improvement planning;
(D) Services designed to address schoolwide behavior and climate issues; and
(E) Services designed to  support career and technical education , including providing a re-
gional career center as described in section 2 of this 2025 Act .
(d) Administrative  and support services for component school districts, including but not limited
to services  designed to consolidate component school district business functions, liaison services
between the Department of Education and component school districts and registration  of children
being taught by private teachers, parents or legal guardians pursuant to ORS 339.035.
[2]
HB 3552
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
(e) Other services that an education service district is required to provide  by state or federal
law, including but not limited to services required under ORS 339.005 to 339.090.
(3) In addition to the services specified in subsection (2) of this section,  a local service plan may
include other services that are designed to meet regional needs.
(4) A local  service plan shall also contain annual performance measures for the education ser-
vice  district.
(5) A local service plan must:
(a) Be adopted by the board of the education service district.
(b) After being adopted by the board of the education service district,  be approved on or before
March 1 by resolution of two-thirds of the component school districts  that are a part of the educa-
tion service district and that  have at least a majority of the pupils included in the average daily
membership of the education service district, as determined by the reports of such  school districts
for the preceding year, enrolled in the schools of the school districts.
(6) Notwithstanding the process for approval and adoption required by subsection (5) of  this
section, if the component school districts approve an amendment to a local  service plan pursuant
to subsection (5)(b) of this section, the board of an education service district may amend a local
service plan that has been previously adopted by  the board and approved by the component school
districts. An amendment to a local service plan may be done at any time.
(7) If  a component school district determines that a local service plan, or the provision of ser-
vices under a local service  plan, does not meet the service needs of the component school district,
the component school district may contract with a public entity for the provision of services.
(8) An education  service district may provide the services required by the local service plan
directly through the staff of the district. In addition, an education  service district may provide ser-
vices required by the local  service plan through the operation of a public school, a public charter
school pursuant to ORS chapter 338, an alternative school or a preschool.
(9) An education service district may provide the services required by the local  service plan in
cooperation with another  education service district or with a school district. In addition, an educa-
tion service district may contract with a public or private entity for the provision of services.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $156,400,000, which may be expended for the purpose of sup-
porting regional career centers and distributing grants to education service districts  as
provided by section 2 (5) of this 2025 Act.
[3]