Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 286A.796 to
286A.806.
SECTION 2. A school district located in  a high seismic risk area, as defined in section 4
of this 2025 Act, may not receive a grant under  ORS 286A.801 for a new building, as defined
in section 4 of this 2025 Act, of the school district unless the school district  complies with
the requirements of section 4 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.  ORS 286A.801 is amended to read:
286A.801. (1) The Department  of Education shall administer a grant program that is financed
with the net proceeds of Article XI-P bonds and  that provides matching fund grants to school dis-
tricts for capital costs of the school districts.  Any construction, improvement, remodel, equipment,
maintenance or repair of  a building of a school district that is financed with a grant received under
this section is not required to meet the standards specified in ORS 286A.810.
(2) A school district that seeks a grant under this section must prepare and  submit a facilities
assessment and a long-range facilities plan to the department with the application for the grant.
(3) A school district is eligible to receive a grant under this section if:
(a) The school district  complies with the requirements of this section and rules adopted pursuant
to this section; [ and]
(b) Moneys are available to the school district pursuant to subsection (6) of this section[ .]; and
(c) The school district complies with the  requirements of section 4 of this 2025 Act if
required under section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(4) A school district that receives a grant under this  section must provide matching funds that
meet or exceed the amount of the grant. The matching  funds must be from general obligation bonds
approved by the voters of the school district to finance capital costs of the school district.
(5) Grants awarded under this section shall be calculated as follows, subject to subsection  (8)
of this section:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4014
HB 3707
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) For a  school district that provides matching funds in any amount up to $6 million, a match-
ing ratio for state to local funds of one to one.
(b) For a school district that provides matching funds in any amount greater  than $6 million, a
matching ratio for  state to local funds that is based on the funding formula developed as provided
in subsection (7)(c) of this section. Grants awarded under this paragraph shall be  for a minimum of
$6 million per grant and a maximum of $12 million per grant.
(6)(a) The department shall award grants to school districts as follows:
(A) Sixty-six percent of funds available for grants shall be based on the priority list  established
under subsection (7)(b) of this section; and
(B) Thirty-four percent of funds available for grants shall be provided to school  districts based
on the order in which the Department of Education receives  the completed applications for the
grants.
(b) To the extent that moneys are  available, a school district that receives moneys as provided
by paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection also may receive moneys as provided by paragraph (a)(B)  of
this subsection. The total amount the school district receives may not exceed the  maximum amount
allowed under subsection (5) of this section.
(7)(a) For the purpose of awarding grants  under this section, the department shall develop a
priority list and a funding formula that are based on factors that may include:
(A) The total assessed value of all tangible property located in the school district;
(B) The percentage  of poverty families within the school district, as calculated under ORS
327.013 (1)(c)(A)(v)(I);
(C) The number of students in average daily membership for the school district, as calculated
under ORS 327.061; and
(D) Other factors adopted by the State Board of Education by rule.
(b) The priority  list developed under this subsection shall be used to rank the order in which
school districts may qualify to receive a grant under subsection (6)(a)(A) of this section.
(c) The funding formula developed under  this subsection shall be used to determine the matching
ratio for  state to local funds. The funding formula must comply with the limits described in sub-
section (5) of this section.
(8) To account  for effects of inflation, the State Board of Education shall, by rule, biennially
adjust the dollar amounts specified in subsection (5)  of this section based on the Consumer Price
Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as published  by the Bureau of Labor Sta-
tistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(9) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the administration of  this
section.
SECTION 4.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “High seismic risk  area” means: Clatsop, Columbia, Tillamook, Washington,
Multnomah, Yamhill, Clackamas, Polk, Marion, Lincoln, Benton, Linn, Lane, Douglas,  Coos,
Curry, Josephine, Jackson and Klamath Counties.
(b) “Large room”  means a room of at least 2,500 square feet of gross area, except for
general classrooms and rooms with fixed features such as auditoriums and laboratories.
(c) “New building” means  a building for which a contract for construction is executed
on or after January 1, 2026.
(d) “Risk Category IV” has the meaning given  that term in the Oregon Structural Spe-
cialty Code.
[2]
HB 3707
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
(e) “Shelter room” means a large room in a new building.
(f) “Stub-out” means a short length of pipe that  is installed during construction and to
which fixtures and drains may later be installed.
(2) In order to be eligible to receive a grant under ORS 286A.801, a school district  located
in a high seismic risk area must ensure that the following standards are met:
(a) Structural systems in  new buildings must be designed to Risk Category IV standards.
(b) Natural gas lines supplying new buildings must  be installed with earthquake-actuated
automatic gas shutoff devices in accordance with current standards.
(c) Restrained pipe joints must be used for new water and sewer lines constructed within
the owner’s property that are intended to serve new buildings.
(d) Shelter rooms must be supported by a  built-in emergency electricity generator with
an automatic transfer switch that activates after an earthquake event and provides electrical
service to shelter rooms and any adjacent  kitchens. The transfer switch must be capable of
being connected to solar photovoltaic power sources.
(e) Electrical wiring in new  buildings must be designed to support shelter rooms in iso-
lation from other building spaces and must  support ventilation, lighting and outlets in the
shelter rooms, plus equipment in any adjacent kitchens.
(f) New buildings must maintain an  on-site fuel supply sufficient for at least 96 hours of
generator run time.
(g) New buildings must include at least one stub-out with  a manual transfer valve at the
building exterior to allow for the connection of a temporary portable water source and pump
after an earthquake event or other disruption of utility service.
(h) Interior piping for potable water in new buildings must be designed to  allow isolation
of water service  to shelter rooms, including to any adjacent bathrooms, drinking fountains
and kitchens.
(i) Equipment and components that support shelter rooms must be designed  to Risk
Category IV standards.
(3) The Department of Consumer and  Business Services shall develop and implement a
program to monitor and certify compliance  with this section. The department may adopt
rules necessary for the implementation of this section.
SECTION 5.
(1) The  State Resilience Officer shall convene an advisory committee that
includes representatives of  the Department of Education, the Oregon Department of Emer-
gency Management, school districts  in high seismic risk areas, local governments, the
American Red  Cross and other stakeholders. The advisory committee shall recommend op-
erational leadership and management responsibilities relating to shelter rooms. The advisory
committee shall develop a model  memorandum of understanding to be executed by school
districts and appropriate emergency agencies.
(2) Members of the advisory committee shall receive no  compensation, but may receive
payment for their actual and necessary travel and  other expenses while engaged in the per-
formance of their official duties.
(3) As used in this section, “high seismic  risk area” and “shelter room” have the
meanings given those terms in section 4 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6. Section 5 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
[3]