Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “Oregon relocation area” means the  total area
of those Oregon counties that  have taken nonbinding votes to secede from the State of
Oregon and to join the State of Idaho and that,  as of January 1, 2025, consist of Baker,
Crook, Grant,  Harney, Jefferson, Klamath, Lake, Malheur, Morrow, Sherman, Union,
Wallowa and Wheeler counties. The Oregon relocation area may be expanded to include other
Oregon counties that in the future take nonbinding votes to secede from  the State of Oregon
and to join the State of Idaho.
(2) There is created the Move Oregon-Idaho Border Task Force.
(3) The purposes of the task force are to:
(a) Document the Oregon and Idaho legal  and legislative processes that must take place
to relocate the state boundaries of the Oregon  relocation area so that the Oregon relocation
area is entirely within the state boundaries of the State of Idaho.
(b) Document the federal legal and legislative processes that must take  place to relocate
the state boundaries of the Oregon relocation area so that the Oregon relocation area  is
entirely within the state boundaries of the State of Idaho.
(c) Study, gather information  and document the impacts of a relocation to Idaho of the
Oregon relocation area on residents, businesses, public entities,  other private entities and
nonprofit entities located within the Oregon relocation area, including but not limited to:
(A) Taxes, fees and other charges;
(B) Educational resources and  requirements applicable to prekindergarten through grade
12 education;
(C) The applicability of rules, regulations and other legal requirements that may  apply
to activities engaged in by persons and entities described in this paragraph;
(D) The operation and ownership of public utilities and infrastructure located in the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3992
HB 3488
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Oregon relocation area; and
(E) Any other matters that the  task force determines may have a bearing on the viability
or prudence of relocating the Oregon relocation area to within the  boundaries of the State
of Idaho.
(4) The task force shall consist of:
(a) 
 members of county governing bodies of counties within  the Oregon relocation
area that are appointed by the Association of Oregon Counties;
(b)  members of city governing bodies of cities that are located within  the Oregon
relocation area that are appointed by the League of Oregon Cities;
(c)  members of tribal governments of those federally recognized tribes  in Oregon
that have territory located in the  Oregon relocation area, and that are appointed by the
Commission on Indian Services;
(d)  members of  school districts within the Oregon relocation area that are ap-
pointed by the Oregon School Boards Association;
(e)  members of special districts within the Oregon relocation area  that are ap-
pointed by the Special Districts Association of Oregon;
(f)  members who are appointed by the Eastern Oregon Counties Association;
(g)  members of the Senate who are appointed by the President of the Senate;
(h)  members of the House of Representatives  who are appointed by the Speaker
of the House of Representatives; and
(i) The following individuals who are  appointed by the Governor, the President and the
Speaker acting jointly:
(A)  individuals who have expertise in agriculture in the Oregon relocation area;
(B)  individuals who have expertise in ranching in the Oregon relocation area;
(C)  individuals who have expertise in forestry or forest products manufacturing
in the Oregon relocation area;
(D)  individuals who own and operate small businesses located in the Oregon  re-
location area;
(E)  individuals with a demonstrated history  of advocating for the Oregon relo-
cation area to become a part of the State of Idaho; and
(F)  individuals who are appointed as  public members of the task force and who
are residents of the Oregon relocation area.
(5) The Governor,  or the designee of the Governor, shall be a member of the task force
and shall serve as the chair of the task force.
(6) In addition to the members listed in subsection (4) of this section, the  Governor,
President and Speaker shall jointly solicit one individual each  representing the Governor of
Idaho, the President of the Idaho Senate and the Speaker of the  Idaho House of Represen-
tatives to serve as nonvoting members of the task force.
(7) Appointments described under subsection (4) of this  section shall be made on or be-
fore December 1, 2025. The task force shall meet at the call of the  chair, which must first
occur on or before January 15, 2026, and the  task force must meet at least monthly there-
after.
(8) A majority of the voting members  of the task force shall constitute a quorum of the
task force.
(9) The task force shall gather public comments and input on the matters  described in
[2]
HB 3488
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
subsection (3) of this section  and shall prepare a report to the Legislative Assembly making
recommendations on the  matters described in subsection (3) of this section on or before
January 15, 2027.
(10) A  legislator appointed to the task force is entitled to per diem and other expenses
as authorized under ORS 171.072. Other members of  the task force are entitled to compen-
sation and expenses as provided in ORS 292.495.
(11) The Legislative Policy and Research Director  shall provide staff and administrative
support to the task force.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]