Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall study the ben-
efit packages available to school  employees in this state, including health and retirement
benefits. The study must analyze trends in costs of premiums, coverage and  the ratio of
salary to benefits as part of total compensation.
(2) No later than September 15, 2026, the department shall report the findings  and rec-
ommendations from the study, in the manner provided in ORS  192.245, to the interim com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related to education.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 945