Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of this 2025 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
chapter 458.
SECTION 2. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall purchase  from
a local government the right to collect a past-due debt  from a developer, if the debt is based
on a deferred system development charge as  described in subsection (2) of this section. In
purchasing a debt under this  section, the department shall pay the unpaid balance of the
debt.
(2) For a debt to  be eligible for purchase by the department under this section, it must
arise from an agreement between a local government and a developer,  in a form required by
the department, in which the parties agree that:
(a) The developer will construct one or more dwelling units.
(b) The local government will defer the  collection of a system development charge, as
defined in ORS 223.299, from the developer until:
(A) The date 180 days after  the date that any dwelling unit in the development project
has been certified for occupancy; or
(B) If the development project will  be affordable housing, as defined in ORS 197A.445, a
date between  180 days and one year following the date that any dwelling unit in the devel-
opment project has been certified for occupancy.
(c) Except as provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection,  the developer will not pay any
interest or fees on the system development charge based on the charge’s deferral.
(d) If the debt becomes owed to the department under this section, the department  will
assess:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 151
HB 2968
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) A 20 percent civil penalty on the past-due balance of the debt; and
(B) Interest, at the rate specified in ORS 82.010, on the balance of the debt and penalty.
(3) Upon purchasing a debt under this section, the department shall assess the  civil
penalty and interest allowed under  subsection (2)(d) of this section and make reasonable ef-
forts to collect the debt. Such  efforts may include assigning the debt to the Department of
Revenue for collection under ORS 293.250.
(4) Payments made by the Housing and Community Services  Department to purchase and
collect the debt under this section must be paid from available moneys in the  Municipal De-
velopment Protection Fund established  under section 3 of this 2025 Act. The net amount of
moneys collected under this section must be credited to the fund.
(5) Moneys received by a local government under this section must be treated as pay-
ments of the  system development charge and used for the purposes allowed under ORS
223.307.
(6) As used in this section, “local government” means any local government  as defined
in ORS 174.116 that is authorized  to impose or collect a system development charge under
ORS 223.297 to 223.316.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Municipal Development Protection Fund is  established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The Municipal Development  Protection Fund consists of moneys collected by the
Housing and Community Services Department under section 2 of this  2025 Act and moneys
appropriated, allocated, deposited or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or
otherwise. Interest earned by the fund is credited to the fund.
(3) Moneys  in the fund are continuously appropriated to the department to administer
the fund and the program  described in section 2 of this 2025 Act. In each biennium, the de-
partment may not use more than four percent of the moneys in the fund at the  beginning
of the biennium for the costs of administering the fund and of implementing section 2  of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for  the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the  General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for deposit into the Municipal
Development Protection Fund established under section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. (1) Section 2 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Housing and Community Services Department may  take any action before the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section  that is necessary to enable the de-
partment to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this sec-
tion, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the department by  sections 2 and
3 of this 2025 Act.
(3) On or before January 1, 2026, the  department shall adopt rules and model forms of
agreements to implement section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(4) Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies  only to agreements between a local government and
a developer entered into on or after January 1, 2026.
(5) Notwithstanding section 3 (3) of this 2025 Act,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
the department may spend  not more than $200,000 from the Municipal Development Pro-
tection Fund established under section 3 of this 2025 Act for the costs of administering the
fund and the program described in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
[2]
HB 2968
1
2
3
4
SECTION 6.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]