Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Department of Agriculture shall study animal cruelty. The de-
partment shall submit a report on the study in  the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the committees or interim committees of
the Legislative Assembly related to natural resources no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2833