Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) To obtain a child care impact statement described in this section, one
member of the Legislative  Assembly from each major political party must sign a written
request. Upon receipt of the written request, the Department of Early  Learning and Care
shall prepare a child care impact  statement that describes the effects of proposed legislation
on child care.
(2) A child care impact statement must be impartial, simple and understandable and must
include:
(a) An estimate of how the  proposed legislation would impact the availability of child care
in the affected regions of this state; and
(b) A statement of the methodologies and assumptions used in preparing the estimate.
(3) The Early Learning Council shall adopt rules to carry out the  provisions of this sec-
tion.
SECTION 2.
(1) To obtain a child care impact statement described in this section, one
member of the Legislative  Assembly from each major political party must sign a written
request. Upon receipt of the written request, the Department of Early  Learning and Care
shall prepare a child care impact statement that describes the effects of a  state measure on
child care.
(2) The child care impact statement must be impartial, simple  and understandable and
must include the information described in section 1 (2) of this 2025 Act.
(3) If the department has prepared a child care impact statement  for a state measure,
not later than the 99th day before a special election  held on the date of a primary election
or any general election at which the state measure is to be submitted to the  people, the de-
partment shall file the statement with the Secretary of State.
(4) Not later than the 95th day before the  election, the Secretary of State shall hold a
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1063
HB 2450
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
hearing in Salem upon reasonable statewide notice to receive suggestions  for changes to the
statement or to receive other information. At the hearing, any person  may submit suggested
changes or other information  orally or in writing. Written suggestions and any other infor-
mation also may be submitted at any time before the hearing.
(5) The department shall consider  suggestions and any other information submitted un-
der subsection (4) of this section and may file a revised statement with the  Secretary of
State not later than the 90th day before the election at which the measure  is to be voted
upon.
(6) The Secretary of  State shall certify the statement not later than the 90th day before
the election at which the measure is to be voted upon.
(7) All statements prepared under this section shall be made available to the public.
(8) A failure to prepare, file or certify a  statement does not prevent inclusion of the
measure in the voters’ pamphlet.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 251.185 is amended to read:
251.185. (1) The Secretary of State shall have printed in  the voters’ pamphlet for a general
election or any special election a copy of the title and text of each state measure to be  submitted
to the people at the election for which the pamphlet was prepared. The pamphlet must  include the
procedures for filing  a complaint under ORS 260.345. Each measure shall be printed in the pamphlet
with:
(a) The number and ballot title of the measure;
(b) The financial estimates and any statement prepared for the measure under ORS 250.125;
(c) The explanatory statement prepared for the measure;
(d) Arguments relating to the measure and filed with the Secretary of State;
(e) Any racial and ethnic impact statement prepared for the measure under ORS 137.685;
(f) Any child care impact  statement prepared for the measure under section 2 of this 2025
Act; and
[(f)] (g)  Any statement submitted for the measure by a citizen panel under ORS 250.141.
(2) A community college district measure relating to bonding, a county measure  or a measure
of a  metropolitan service district organized under ORS chapter 268, and the ballot title, explanatory
statement and arguments relating to the measure,  filed by the county, metropolitan service district
or community college district under ORS 251.285 shall be included in the voters’ pamphlet described
in subsection (1) of this section if required under ORS 251.067.
(3) As used in  this section, “community college district” has the meaning given that term in ORS
341.005.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 251.170, as amended by section 3, chapter  55, Oregon Laws 2024, and section
1, chapter 56, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
251.170. (1) The translation of a state  voters’ pamphlet or county voters’ pamphlet required un-
der ORS 251.167 shall be made in the manner described in this section.
(2) For each state voters’ pamphlet and county voters’ pamphlet mailed to residents of a county,
the Secretary of State shall have the following  portions of the voters’ pamphlet professionally
translated into each language for which a translation is required under ORS 251.167:
(a) Any official statement or  communication made by the Secretary of State, county clerk, filing
office or other public  elections official, including any information described in ORS 251.026 or
251.315 (1)(a) to (d) and (g) and any other information regarding services offered by  elections offices,
how to cast a ballot and key dates for the election;
[2]
HB 2450
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The ballot title for each measure;
(c) The explanatory statement for each measure;
(d) The financial estimate for each measure and  any statement prepared for a measure under
ORS 250.125;
(e) Any racial and ethnic impact statement prepared for a measure under ORS 137.685;
(f) Any statement submitted for a measure by a citizen panel under ORS 250.141;
(g) Any child care  impact statement prepared for the measure under section 2 of this
2025 Act;  and
[(g)] (h)  Except an argument for a measure  prepared by the Legislative Assembly under ORS
251.245, any other statement for a measure created by a public body as defined in ORS 174.109.
(3) In addition to the materials that the Secretary of State  is required to have professionally
translated under  subsection (2) of this section, the Secretary of State shall allow to be included in
the translated version of each state voters’ pamphlet that is made  available on the website of the
Secretary of State or of a county under ORS 251.167:
(a) Translations of a candidate statement submitted under ORS 251.065, provided that:
(A) The candidate is a candidate for federal or statewide office;
(B) The translation is filed by a candidate  or the agent of a candidate described in subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph;
(C) Neither the translation nor the candidate statement submitted under  ORS 251.065 is rejected
under ORS 251.055;
(D) The candidate statement meets the requirements of a candidate statement set  forth in this
chapter; and
(E) Any translation filed under this paragraph is in one of the 10 most commonly  spoken lan-
guages in this  state or of any county the office represents, other than English, as listed by the
Secretary of State under ORS 251.167.
(b) Translations of an argument in support of  or in opposition to a state measure filed under
ORS 251.255, provided that:
(A) The translation is filed by the person who filed the argument in support of or in  opposition
to a state measure under ORS 251.255;
(B) Neither the translation nor the argument in support of or in opposition to  a state measure
filed under ORS 251.255 is rejected under ORS 251.055;
(C) The statement in support of or in opposition to a state measure meets the  requirements of
a statement in support of or in opposition to a state measure set forth in this chapter; and
(D) Any translation filed under this paragraph is in one of the 10  most commonly spoken lan-
guages in this state or of any county in which the measure will be  voted on, other than English, as
listed by the Secretary of State under ORS 251.167.
(c) Translations of  any argument for a measure prepared by the Legislative Assembly under ORS
251.245 submitted by the Legislative Assembly, provided that any translation filed under this para-
graph is in one of the 10 most commonly spoken languages  in this state or of any county in which
the measure will be voted on,  other than English, as listed by the Secretary of State under ORS
251.167.
(4)(a) A  translation that is permitted or required under this section is not required to be iden-
tical in words to the original version but must be consistent with the meaning of the original  ver-
sion.
(b) A translation is not subject to any limitations on the number of words allowed set  forth in
[3]
HB 2450
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
this chapter.
(5) A county may at its own expense make or accept for publication on  the county’s website,
as part of a translated voters’ pamphlet required under ORS 251.167, any portion  of a state or
county voters’ pamphlet that is not described in this section.
(6) The Secretary of State:
(a) May adopt any rules necessary to implement this section; and
(b) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, is responsible for all costs  necessary to
comply with this section.
(7) As used in this section, “statewide office”  means Governor, Secretary of State, State Treas-
urer, Attorney General, Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries, or  judge on the
Oregon Supreme Court, the Oregon Court of Appeals or the Oregon Tax Court.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 329A.020 is amended to read:
329A.020. (1) The Department of Early Learning  and Care staff shall provide technical assist-
ance, linkage of local agencies, data collection and monitoring related to child care.
(2) The department shall continually monitor and disseminate information about federal and
charitable child care programs for the purposes of ORS 329A.100 to 329A.135.
(3) The  department shall maintain a website that provides information regarding certified and
registered child care facilities and subsidized care facilities, as defined in ORS 329A.250.
(4) The department shall prepare the  child care impact statements described in sections
1 and 2 of this 2025 Act.
[(4)] (5)  The Early Learning  Council, in consultation with the department, shall adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 6. Section 2 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 251.170 and 251.185
by sections 3 and 4 of this 2025 Act apply to elections held after  the first Tuesday after the
first Monday in November 2026.
[4]