Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 401.204 is amended to read:
401.204. (1) The Governor shall terminate the state of  emergency by proclamation when the
emergency no longer exists, or when the threat of an emergency has passed.
(2) The state of emergency [ proclaimed] declared by the Governor may be terminated at  any
time by joint resolution of the Legislative Assembly.
(3) The state of emergency declared by the Governor  shall terminate 60 days after the
Governor’s proclamation under  ORS 401.165, unless the Legislative Assembly by joint resol-
ution authorizes an extension of the state of emergency. An  extension of a state of emer-
gency under this  subsection may not exceed 60 days’ duration, but an extension may be
reauthorized by passage of a joint resolution so providing in 60-day  increments, until the
Legislative Assembly determines that the emergency no longer exists or the  threat of an
emergency has passed.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4072