Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3, chapter 421, Oregon Laws 2019, are repealed.
SECTION 2.  ORS 187.110 is amended to read:
187.110. (1) The standard of time  for the State of Oregon shall be the United States standard
of time as established by the Congress of the United States for any particular area of the  state un-
der 15 U.S.C. 261[ , except that from 2 a.m. on the second Sunday in March  until 2 a.m. on the first
Sunday in November the standard of time for any area of this state  shall be one hour in advance of
the standard established for that particular area by the Congress  of the United States under 15 U.S.C.
261].
(2) The portion of the State of Oregon that is located  in the Pacific Time Zone is exempt
from 15 U.S.C. 260a, pursuant to the authority set forth in 15 U.S.C. 260a (a)(2).
[(2)] (3) No  department of the state government and no county, city or other political subdivision
shall employ any other time  or adopt any statute, ordinance or order providing for the use of any
other standard of time.
SECTION 3.  ORS 187.110, as amended by section 1, chapter 421, Oregon Laws 2019,  is amended
to read:
187.110. (1) The standard of time for the State of Oregon shall be [ one hour  in advance of ] the
United States standard  of time as established by the Congress of the United States for any partic-
ular area of the state under 15 U.S.C. 261 . [ , except that: ]
[(a) The standard of time for that portion of the State  of Oregon that is in the Mountain Time Zone
shall be the United States standard of time as established by the Congress of the United  States for that
area under 15 U.S.C. 261; and ]
[(b) From 2 a.m. on the second Sunday in March until 2 a.m. on the first Sunday in November the
standard of time for that portion  of the State of Oregon that is in the Mountain Time Zone shall be
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1319
SB 566
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
one hour in advance of the standard established for that area  by the Congress of the United States
under 15 U.S.C. 261. ]
(2) The portion of the State of Oregon that is located  in the Pacific Time Zone is exempt
from 15 U.S.C. 260a, pursuant to the authority set forth in 15 U.S.C. 260a (a)(2).
[(2)] (3) No  department of the state government and no county, city or other political subdivision
shall employ any other time or adopt any statute, ordinance or order providing for  the use of any
other standard of time.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 187.110, as amended by sections 1 and 4, chapter 421, Oregon Laws  2019, is
amended to read:
187.110. (1) The standard of time for the State of Oregon shall  be the United States standard
of time as  established by the Congress of the United States for any particular area of the state un-
der 15 U.S.C. 261[ , except that from  2 a.m. on the second Sunday in March until 2 a.m. on the first
Sunday in November the standard of time for  any area of this state shall be one hour in advance of
the standard established for that particular area by the Congress  of the United States under 15 U.S.C.
261].
(2) The portion of the State of Oregon that is located  in the Pacific Time Zone is exempt
from 15 U.S.C. 260a, pursuant to the authority set forth in 15 U.S.C. 260a (a)(2).
[(2)] (3) No  department of the state government and no county, city or other political subdivision
shall employ any other time or adopt any statute, ordinance or order providing for  the use of any
other standard of time.
SECTION 5. The amendments  to ORS 187.110 by sections 2, 3 and 4 of this 2025 Act be-
come operative at 2 a.m. on the second Sunday  of the first March in which the standard time
in the  States of California and Washington is the United States standard of time for
California and Washington and does not contain a one-hour advancement of the  standard
time in those states.
SECTION 6. If the amendments to ORS 187.110 by sections 2, 3 and 4 of this 2025 Act
have not become operative by March 1, 2035, section 5 of this 2025 Act is repealed on March
1, 2035.
SECTION 7.
 If section  5 of this 2025 Act is repealed by section 6 of this 2025 Act, on March
1, 2035, ORS 187.110, as amended by sections 2, 3 and 4 of this 2025 Act, is amended to read:
187.110. (1) The standard of time for the State of Oregon shall  be the United States standard
of time as  established by the Congress of the United States for any particular area of the state un-
der 15 U.S.C. 261 , except that from 2 a.m. on the second Sunday  in March until 2 a.m. on the
first Sunday in November the standard of time for any area of this state shall  be one hour
in advance of the standard established for that particular area by the Congress of  the United
States under 15 U.S.C. 261 .
[(2) The portion  of the State of Oregon that is located in the Pacific Time Zone is exempt from 15
U.S.C. 260a, pursuant to the authority set forth in 15 U.S.C. 260a (a)(2). ]
[(3)] (2) No  department of the state government and no county, city or other political subdivision
shall employ any other time or adopt any statute, ordinance or order providing for  the use of any
other standard of time.
[2]