Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 801.527 is amended to read:
801.527. “Totaled vehicle” or “totaled” means:
(1) A vehicle that is declared a financial total loss by an insurer that is obligated to  cover the
loss or that the insurer takes possession of or title to.
(2) A vehicle that  is stolen, if it is not recovered within 30 days of the date that it is stolen and
if the loss is not covered by an insurer.
(3) A vehicle that has sustained damage that is not covered by an  insurer and that is such that
the estimated cost to repair the vehicle is equal to at least 80 percent of the retail  market value
of the vehicle prior to the damage. For purposes of this subsection, “retail  market value” shall be
as reflected in publications relied upon by financial institutions doing business in this state.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1031