Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Office of Outdoor Recreation, in collaboration with the Department
of Transportation,  the State Department of Fish and Wildlife, the State Parks and Recre-
ation Department, the State Marine Board and any other state agency that issues  permits
or passes for outdoor recreating,  shall study and make recommendations for legislation re-
garding the development of an Oregon Outdoors Pass to  provide funding for outdoor recre-
ation education and search and rescue activities.
(2) The office shall  submit a report on its findings to an appropriate interim committee
of the Legislative Assembly no later than September 15, 2019.
SECTION 2. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2679