Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 166.122 is amended to read:
166.122. As used in ORS 166.122 to 166.128:
(1) “Critical infrastructure” means a gas, electric or water utility system, an  electric substation,
a pipeline or other conveyance  for carrying gas, natural gas or fuel, a [ fiber optic cable network ]
terrestrial-based cable or wire  communication facility , a base transceiver station or other
wireless communication infrastructure, a data center,  or a dam, bridge, road, airport, marina or rail
line.
(2) “Destructive device” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.382.
(3) “Toxic substance” means any radiological, biological, pathogenic or  chemical substance that
may cause death or serious physical injury if ingested, inhaled, consumed or absorbed by a human
being.
(4) “Widespread” means impacting at least 50 human beings.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 166.122 by section 1 of this 2025 Act  apply to con-
duct occurring on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1165