Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) In addition to any other fee  authorized by law, the Commissioner of the
Bureau of Labor and  Industries shall charge a respondent on a wage claim a fee of 20 percent
of the moneys collected on  civil judgments pursuant to ORS 652.330, or as a result of ad-
ministrative proceedings under ORS 652.332.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 652.400, the moneys collected from the fee under subsection  (1)
of this section shall be paid  into the State Treasury and deposited in the Community Out-
reach and Labor Education Account established under section 2 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 2. The Community Outreach and Labor Education Account is established in the
State Treasury as special  trust account, separate and distinct from the General Fund. In-
terest earned by the account shall be credited to the  account. All moneys in the Community
Outreach and Labor Education Account are continuously appropriated to  the Bureau of La-
bor and Industries  for the purpose of awarding grants in accordance with section 3 of this
2019 Act.
SECTION 3. (1) The Commissioner of the  Bureau of Labor and Industries shall, from the
funds appropriated to the Bureau of Labor and Industries under  section 2 of this 2019 Act,
award grants to nonprofit organizations that provide outreach, education and technical as-
sistance to Oregon workers pertaining to employee rights in the workplace.
(2) Grants awarded under subsection (1) of this section  may be used for the following
activities:
(a) Assisting employees in the enforcement of employee rights;
(b) Outreach;
(c) Community-based education events;
(d) Producing training materials;
(e) Counseling;
(f) Research; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2565
HB 2412
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
(g) Referral services.
(3) When awarding grants,  the commissioner shall give priority to nonprofit organiza-
tions that administer projects that provide services to vulnerable  workers including, but not
limited to:
(a) Low-wage workers;
(b) Immigrant and refugee workers;
(c) Lesbian, gay, bisexual, nonbinary or transgender individuals;
(d) Injured or disabled workers; and
(e) Workers who are under 20 years of age.
SECTION 4.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]