Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Revenue  shall conduct a study of the rate of voluntary
compliance, during the period from January 1, 2020, through June 30, 2022, with the  state
transient lodging tax program established  under ORS 320.305 to 320.340. The department shall
present the results of the study in a report to the interim committees of the  Legislative
Assembly related to revenue, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, on or  before September
15, 2022.
SECTION 2.  Section 1 of this 2019 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Revenue, for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $ , which  may be expended for purposes of the study
conducted pursuant to section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3186