Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Revenue Officer shall  study the feasibility and utility of en-
acting a single statute that uniformly  governs adjustments for inflation in the tax statutes
of this  state. The officer shall submit a report of findings to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to revenue in the manner provided under ORS  192.245 no later
than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2229