Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Paid vacation  time” means an employer-provided benefit allowing employees to take
time off from work without loss of pay for vacation leave.
(b) “Paid vacation time” does not mean an employer-provided benefit  allowing employees
to take time off from work without loss of pay for:
(A) Sick time governed by ORS 653.601  to 653.661, or any other leave that is designated
for, may be used for or is taken for illness or other health-related purposes, including  any
portion of an employer-provided benefit  designated to meet the minimum requirements of
ORS 653.601 to 653.661.
(B) Personal business leave.
(C) Holidays and floating holidays.
(2) If an employer provides employees  with paid vacation time pursuant to an employer
policy or  otherwise, the employer shall, upon the termination of the employment relation-
ship, compensate the employee, at one hundred percent of the employee’s  regular rate of pay
for all earned or accrued but unused paid vacation time,  in accordance with the manner and
timeframe set forth under ORS 652.140 for the payment of final wages.
(3) Nothing in this  section prohibits an employer from adopting a written policy or en-
tering into an employment contract that:
(a) Establishes the method or rate of earning or accrual of paid vacation time;
(b) Establishes requirements for requesting and scheduling paid vacation time; or
(c) Requires employees to use earned or accrued paid vacation time by a  specific date or
that provides for the forfeiture of unused paid vacation time not  used by that date, provided
that:
(A) The employer provides employees with written notice of such requirement at the time
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 240
HB 4094
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of hire and not less than 90 days  before the date on which any unused paid vacation time
would be forfeited under the policy;
(B) Employees are given a reasonable opportunity to  schedule use of the paid vacation
time before any forfeiture occurs; and
(C) Nothing in  the policy permits the forfeiture of paid vacation time that is earned or
accrued and has not been forfeited prior to the termination of employment.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 652.140 is amended to read:
652.140. (1) When an employer discharges an employee or when employment is  terminated by
mutual agreement, all wages earned and unpaid at the time of the discharge  or termination become
due and payable not later than the end of the first business day after the discharge or termination.
(2)(a) When  an employee who does not have a contract for a definite period quits employment,
all wages earned and unpaid at the time of quitting become due  and payable immediately if the
employee has given to the employer not  less than 48 hours’ notice, excluding Saturdays, Sundays
and holidays, of intention to quit employment.
(b) Except as provided in  paragraph (c) of this subsection, if the employee has not given to the
employer the notice  described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the wages become due and payable
within five days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays,  after the employee has quit, or at the
next regularly scheduled payday after the employee has quit, whichever event first occurs.
(c) If the employee has not given to the employer the notice described in paragraph  (a) of this
subsection  and  if the employee is regularly required to submit time records to the employer to en-
able the employer to determine the wages due the employee, within five days  after the employee has
quit the employer shall  pay the employee the wages the employer estimates are due and payable.
Within five days after the employee has submitted the time records, all wages  earned and unpaid
become due and payable.
(3) For the purpose of  this section, if employment termination occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or
holiday, all wages earned and unpaid shall be paid no later  than the end of the first business day
after the employment termination, except that if the employment is related to activities  authorized
under ORS chapter 565, all wages earned and unpaid shall be paid no later  than the end of the
second business day after the employment termination.
(4) The employer shall forward such wages by mail to any address designated  by the employee
if the employee requests the employer so to do. An employer may  deposit such wages without dis-
count  in  the employee’s account in a financial institution, as defined in ORS 706.008, in this state,
provided the employee and the employer have agreed to such deposit.
(5) This section does not apply to employment for which a collective bargaining agreement oth-
erwise provides for the payment of wages upon termination of employment.
(6) When a  termination of employment results from the sale of a business or business property
and the purchaser employs or continues the  employment of an individual employed at the business,
this section does not apply to the payment to such an individual  of wages for earned but unused
accrued holiday leave, sick leave, vacation  leave or other leave benefits payable upon termination
of employment pursuant to a collective bargaining or other employment agreement or employer
policy, if the following conditions are met:
(a) On the first day of such an individual’s continued employment the  purchaser of the business
credits the individual with all such earned but unused accrued leave; and
(b) The leave, when used,  is paid at a rate not less than the rate at which the leave was earned
or, if paid at a lesser rate, the number of hours credited is increased  to compensate the individual
[2]
HB 4094
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
for any difference.
(7) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, all  wages earned and unpaid, as
described in this section, include compensation  for earned or accrued but unused paid vaca-
tion time, as defined in section 1 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 3.
Section 1 of this 2026 Act applies to:
(1) Paid vacation time, as defined in section 1 of this 2026 Act, earned or accrued on or
after the effective date of this 2026 Act.
(2) Contracts entered into, renewed or extended on or after the effective  date of this 2026
Act.
SECTION 4. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]