Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The State Board of Education, in  coordination with Eastern Oregon
University, shall develop a pilot program to provide resources and support  for students to
learn about, apply for and enroll  in post-secondary education or training programs. The pilot
program shall offer resources and support to students enrolled in grades 6 through 12 in
school districts located in eastern Oregon.
(2) Resources and support offered under the  pilot program may include, but need not be
limited to:
(a) General information about post-secondary education and training opportunities;
(b) Strategies and resources for researching post-secondary education and training op-
portunities;
(c) Support with applying to a post-secondary institution of education; and
(d) Support with applying for financial aid and scholarships.
SECTION 2.
(1) No later than December 15, 2026, the Department of Education shall
submit a report on the  pilot program established under section 1 of this 2025 Act to the in-
terim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education in the manner provided
by ORS 192.245.
(2) The report shall include the number of  hours of support provided to students under
the pilot program and the number of students who participated in the pilot program.
(3) The report may include recommendations for legislation, including recommendations
for expanding the pilot program to additional areas of the state.
SECTION 3.
Sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 4. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning  July 1,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $ , for distribution to  Eastern Oregon
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1341
HB 2404
1
2
3
4
University to implement the pilot program established under section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]