Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Early Learning  and Care, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount of  $3,000,000, to expand or sustain Healthy Families
Oregon home visiting services.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3351