Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 279C.810 is amended to read:
279C.810. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Funds of a public agency” does not include:
(A) Funds provided in the form of a government grant to a nonprofit  organization, unless the
government grant is issued for the purpose of construction,  reconstruction, major renovation or
painting;
(B) Building and development permit fees paid or waived by the public agency;
[(C) Tax credits or tax abatements; ]
[(D)] (C) Land that a public agency sells to a private entity at fair market value;
[(E)] (D) The difference between:
(i) The value of land that a public agency sells to a private entity as determined at the time  of
the sale  after taking into account any plan, requirement, covenant, condition, restriction or other
limitation, exclusive of zoning or land  use regulations, that the public agency imposes on the de-
velopment or use of the land; and
(ii) The fair market value of the land if the land  is not subject to the limitations described in
sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph;
[(F)] (E) Staff resources of the public agency used to manage a project or to provide a principal
source of supervision, coordination or oversight of a project;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1457
HB 2324
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(G)] (F) Staff resources of the public  agency used to design or inspect one or more components
of a project;
[(H)] (G) Moneys derived from the sale of bonds that are loaned by a state agency to a  private
entity, unless the moneys will be used for a public improvement;
[(I)] (H) Value added to land as a consequence of a public  agency’s site preparation, demolition
of real property or remediation or removal  of environmental contamination, except for value added
in excess of  the expenses the public agency incurred in the site preparation, demolition or remedi-
ation or removal when the land is sold for use in a project otherwise  subject to ORS 279C.800 to
279C.870; or
[(J)] (I) Bonds, or loans from  the proceeds of bonds, issued in accordance with ORS chapter 289
or ORS 441.525 to 441.595, unless the bonds or loans will be used for a public improvement.
(b) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization or group of organizations described in  sec-
tion 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that is exempt from income tax  under section 501(a) of
the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) ORS 279C.800 to 279C.870 do not apply to:
(a) Projects for which the contract price does not exceed $50,000. In determining the price of  a
project, a public agency:
(A) May not include the value of  donated materials or work performed on the project by indi-
viduals volunteering to the public agency without pay; and
(B) Shall include the value of work performed by  every person paid by a contractor or subcon-
tractor in any manner for the person’s work on the project.
(b) Projects for which  no funds of a public agency are directly or indirectly used. In accordance
with ORS chapter 183, the Commissioner of the Bureau  of Labor and Industries shall adopt rules to
carry out the provisions of this paragraph.
(c) Projects:
(A) That are privately owned;
(B) That use funds of a private entity;
(C) In which less than 25 percent of the square footage of a completed project will be occupied
or used by a public agency; and
(D) For which less than $750,000 of funds of a public agency are used.
(d) Projects for residential construction that are privately owned and that predominantly provide
affordable housing. As used in this paragraph:
(A) “Affordable housing”  means housing that serves occupants whose incomes are no greater
than 60 percent of the area median income or, if the occupants are owners, whose incomes are  no
greater than 80 percent of the area median income.
(B) “Predominantly” means 60 percent or more.
(C) “Privately owned” includes:
(i) Affordable housing provided on  real property owned by a public agency if the real property
and related structures are leased to a private entity for 50 or more years; and
(ii) Affordable housing owned by a partnership,  nonprofit corporation or limited liability com-
pany in which a housing authority, as defined in ORS 456.005, is a general partner,  director or
managing member and the housing authority is  not a majority owner in the partnership, nonprofit
corporation or limited liability company.
(D) “Residential construction” includes the construction, reconstruction, major  renovation or
painting of single-family  houses or apartment buildings not more than four stories in height and all
[2]
HB 2324
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
incidental items, such as site work, parking areas,  utilities, streets and sidewalks, pursuant to the
United States Department  of Labor’s “All Agency Memorandum No. 130: Application of the Standard
of Comparison “Projects of a Character Similar” Under Davis-Bacon  and Related Acts,” dated
March 17, 1978. However, the commissioner may consider different definitions  of residential con-
struction  in  determining whether a project is a residential construction project for purposes of this
paragraph, including definitions that:
(i) Exist in local ordinances or codes; or
(ii) Differ, in the prevailing practice of a particular trade  or occupation, from the United States
Department of Labor’s description of residential construction.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 285C.066 is amended to read:
285C.066. The Oregon Business Development Department :
(1) May adopt rules related to:
[(1)] (a) The consent  required by resolution of the governing body of a city, county or port under
ORS 285C.065 (1) in order for a city, county or port to designate an enterprise zone.
[(2)] (b) The number of  enterprise zones that may be designated within a city or other jurisdic-
tion.
(2) Shall adopt rules under which the sponsor of an enterprise zone designated under ORS
285C.065 or 285C.250 may promote  manufacturing related to renewable and clean energy
technology by business firms in the enterprise zone.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 285C.050 to
285C.250.
SECTION 4. (1) A responsible business firm is a business firm that:
(a) Demonstrates a  history of compliance with state and federal laws relating to labor
or employment; and
(b) Makes a commitment with respect  to the business firm’s current and proposed busi-
ness operations within the boundary of an enterprise zone that the business firm:
(A) Will not require employees employed by, or  other workers who contract with, the
business firm to  enter into an agreement that includes a mandatory arbitration clause or
any other  provision that requires the employees or workers to submit to arbitration all or
certain disputes that may arise between the business firm  and employees or workers of the
business firm;
(B) Will determine whether the business  firm’s workers have been correctly classified
under the criteria set forth in ORS 670.600;
(C) Will not use  an employment agency, as defined in ORS 658.005, or any other agency
to procure temporary workers except as necessary  to respond to a short-term labor short-
age;
(D) Will not prevent, disrupt or otherwise interfere with the employees’  right to organize
for the purposes of collective bargaining; and
(E) Will adopt a hiring  policy that is made in accordance with the provisions of ORS
659A.360.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department may require an  eligible business firm
to provide any  documentation or other information the department considers necessary for
determining whether the eligible business firm is a responsible business firm.
SECTION 5.  ORS 285C.140 is amended to read:
285C.140. (1)(a) Any eligible business firm seeking to have  property exempt from property taxa-
[3]
HB 2324
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tion under ORS 285C.175 shall, before  the commencement of direct site preparation activities or the
construction, addition, modification or installation of qualified property in an enterprise  zone, and
before the hiring of eligible employees, apply for authorization under this section.
(b) The application  shall be made on a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue and the
Oregon Business Development Department.
(c) The application shall be filed with the sponsor of the zone.  A sponsor may require that the
application filed with the sponsor be accompanied by a filing fee. If required, the filing fee  may not
exceed the greater of $200  or one-tenth of one percent of the value of the investment in qualified
property  that  is proposed in the application for authorization. The filing fee may be required for the
filing of applications only after the sponsor adopts a  policy, consistent with Oregon Business De-
velopment Department rules, authorizing the imposition of the filing fee.
(2) The application shall contain the following information:
(a) A description of  the nature of the firm’s current and proposed business operations inside the
boundary of the enterprise zone;
(b) A description and estimated value of the qualified property to be constructed,  added, modi-
fied or installed inside the boundary of the enterprise zone;
(c) The number of employees of the firm that the firm  employs within the enterprise zone, av-
eraged over the previous 12 months, and an estimate of the number of employees that the  firm will
hire;
(d) A showing that the eligible business  firm is a responsible business firm under section
4 of this 2021 Act;
[(d)] (e) A commitment  to meet all requirements of ORS 285C.200 and 285C.215, and to verify
compliance with these requirements;
[(e)] (f) A commitment to satisfy all additional conditions for authorization that  are imposed by
the enterprise zone sponsor under ORS  285C.150, 285C.155 or 285C.205 or pursuant to an agreement
entered into under ORS 285C.160, and to verify compliance with these additional conditions;
[(f)] (g) A commitment to renew the application, consistent  with ORS 285C.165, every two years
while the zone exists if the firm has not filed  a claim under ORS 285C.220 that is based on the ap-
plication; and
[(g)] (h) Any  other information considered necessary by the Department of Revenue and the
Oregon Business Development Department.
(3) After an application is submitted to a sponsor, the business firm may revise or amend the
application. An amendment or revision may not be made on or  after January 1 of the first assess-
ment year for which the  qualified property associated with the application is exempt under ORS
285C.175.
(4) If an application for authorization appears to be complete  and the proposed investment ap-
pears to be eligible for authorization, the sponsor and the business firm shall conduct a preauthori-
zation conference. The assessor of the  county in which the property will be located shall be timely
notified and have the option to participate in the conference. The conference shall:
(a) Identify issues with the potential to affect compliance with relevant exemption requirements,
including but not limited to enterprise zone boundary amendments;
(b) Arrange for methods and procedures to establish  and verify compliance with applicable re-
quirements; and
(c) Identify the person who is obligated to notify  the county assessor if requirements are not
satisfied.
[4]
HB 2324
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) Upon completion of the preauthorization conference required under subsection (4) of this
section, the sponsor shall  prepare a written summary of the conference, attach the summary to the
application and forward the application to the county assessor for review.
(6) Following the preauthorization  conference under subsection (4) of this section, the sponsor
and the county assessor shall authorize  the business firm by approving the application, if the spon-
sor and county assessor determine that:
(a) The current or proposed operations of the business firm in the enterprise zone  result in the
firm being eligible under ORS 285C.135; and
(b) The firm  has made the commitments and provided the other information required under
subsection (2) of this section.
(7) If the business firm seeking authorization is  an eligible business firm described in ORS
285C.135 (5)(b), the sponsor must,  as a condition of approving the application, make a formal finding
that the business firm  is an eligible business firm under ORS 285C.135 and that the size of the pro-
posed investment, the employment at the facility of the  firm or the nature of the activities to be
undertaken by the firm within  the enterprise zone will significantly enhance the local economy,
promote the purposes for which the zone was created and increase employment within the zone.
(8) The approval of both the sponsor and the county assessor  under this section shall be prima
facie evidence that the qualified property of the  business firm will receive the property tax ex-
emption under ORS 285C.175. In approving the application, the sponsor  and county assessor shall
provide proof of approval as directed by the Oregon Business Development Department.
(9) If the sponsor or  county assessor fails or refuses to authorize the business firm, the business
firm may appeal to the Oregon Tax Court under ORS 305.404 to 305.560. The  business firm shall
provide copies of the firm’s appeal to the sponsor, county assessor, the Department of Revenue and
the Oregon Business Development Department.
(10) Authorization  under this section does not ensure that property constructed, added, modified
or installed by the authorized business firm will receive property tax exemption under ORS 285C.175.
The sponsor and the county assessor are  not liable in any way if the Department of Revenue or the
county assessor later determines that an authorized business firm does not satisfy  the requirements
for an exemption on qualified property.
(11) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, if an eligible business firm has  begun or
completed the construction, addition, modification or installation of property that meets  the quali-
fications of ORS 285C.180, and the property has  not yet been subject to property tax after having
been placed in service, then, for purposes of ORS 285C.050  to 285C.250, the firm shall be authorized
under this section if the firm files an  application that is allowed under subsection (12) of this section
and is otherwise authorized under this section.
(12) Late submission of an application under this section is allowed if:
(a) A rule permits late submissions of applications under this section; or
(b) The Department of Revenue waives filing deadline requirements under this  section. The de-
partment shall issue a letter to the eligible business firm and zone sponsor setting forth the waiver
under this paragraph.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 285C.403 is amended to read:
285C.403. (1) Any business firm proposing to apply for the tax exemption provided under ORS
285C.409 shall,  before the commencement of construction or installation of property or improvements
at a location in a rural enterprise zone and  before the hiring of employees, apply for certification
with the sponsor of the zone and with the county assessor of the  county or counties in which the
[5]
HB 2324
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
zone is located. The application shall be made on a form prescribed by the Department of  Revenue.
(2) The application shall contain the following information:
(a) A description of the firm’s proposed business operations and facility in the  rural enterprise
zone;
(b) A description and estimated cost or value of the property or improvements to  be constructed
or installed at the facility;
(c) An estimate of the number of employees at the facility that will be hired by the firm;
(d) A showing that the business firm is a responsible business firm under section 4 of this
2021 Act;
[(d)] (e) A commitment to meet the applicable requirements of ORS 285C.412;
[(e)] (f) A commitment to satisfy all additional conditions agreed to pursuant  to the written
agreement between  the rural enterprise zone sponsor and the business firm under subsection (3)(c)
of this section; and
[(f)] (g) Any other information considered necessary by the Department of Revenue.
(3) The sponsor and the county assessor shall certify the business firm by approving the  appli-
cation if the sponsor and the county assessor determine that all of the following  requirements have
been met:
(a) The governing body of  the county and city in which the facility is located has adopted a
resolution approving the property tax exemption for the facility.
(b) The business firm has committed to meet the applicable requirements of ORS 285C.412.
(c) The  business firm has entered into a written agreement with the sponsor of the rural enter-
prise zone that may include any additional requirements that  the sponsor may reasonably request,
including but not limited to contributions for local services or infrastructure benefiting the  facility.
The written agreement shall state the number of consecutive tax years for which the facility, fol-
lowing commencement of operations, is to be exempt from  property tax under ORS 285C.409. The
agreement may not provide for a period  of exemption that is less than seven consecutive tax years
or more than 15 consecutive tax years. If the agreement is silent on the number  of tax years for
which the facility is to be exempt following placement in service, the exemption  shall be for seven
consecutive tax years.
(d) When the  written agreement required under paragraph (c) of this subsection is executed, the
facility is located in:
(A) A qualified rural county; or
(B) A county  with chronically low income or chronic unemployment, based on the most recently
revised annual data available.
(4) The approval of an application by both the sponsor  and the county assessor under subsection
(3) of this section shall be prima facie  evidence that the business firm will qualify for the property
tax exemption under ORS 285C.409.
(5) The sponsor and the county assessor shall provide copies of  an approved application to the
applicant, the Department of Revenue and the Oregon Business Development Department.
(6) If the sponsor or  the county assessor fails or refuses to certify the business firm, the business
firm may appeal to  the Oregon Tax Court under ORS 305.404 to 305.560. The business firm shall
provide copies of the firm’s  appeal to the sponsor, the county assessor, the Oregon Business Devel-
opment Department and the Department of Revenue.
SECTION 7.
The amendments to ORS 285C.140 and 285C.403 by sections 5 and  6 of this
2021 Act apply to applications filed on or after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
[6]
HB 2324
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 8.
 ORS 285C.240 is amended to read:
285C.240. (1) [ The county assessor of the  county in which a qualified business firm is situated and
the sponsor shall be notified in writing by the ] A qualified business firm or [ by] the owner of  [ the]
qualified property leased by [ the] a qualified business firm shall notify the assessor of the county
in which the qualified business firm is located and the sponsor in  writing of any of the fol-
lowing events,  not later than July  1 following the assessment year for which the exemption is
claimed and in which [ one of the following events ] the event  occurs:
(a) Property granted exemption from taxation under ORS 285C.175 is sold, exchanged,  trans-
ported or otherwise disposed of  for use outside the enterprise zone or for use by an ineligible busi-
ness firm;
(b) The qualified business firm closes or so  reduces eligible operations that the reduction con-
stitutes a substantial  curtailment of operations under ORS 285C.210, unless a substantial curtailment
of operations is permitted under ORS 285C.203;
(c) The qualified business firm fails to meet any of  the qualifications required under ORS
285C.200;
(d) The qualified business firm fails to meet any condition that the firm  is required to satisfy
under ORS 285C.150, 285C.155, 285C.203 or 285C.205 or any term  of an agreement entered into with
the sponsor under ORS 285C.160 with which the firm had agreed to comply;
(e) The qualified business firm is no longer a responsible business firm under section  4
of this 2021 Act;
[(e)] (f)  The qualified business firm uses the property to conduct  activities in the enterprise zone
that are not eligible activities; or
[(f)] (g) Property of the qualified business firm for which exemption under ORS 285C.175 is
claimed ceases to be qualified property under ORS 285C.180.
(2) If the sponsor receives written notice under  subsection (1) of this section, the sponsor shall
immediately send a copy of the notice to the county assessor of the county in which  the enterprise
zone is situated.
(3)(a) When an assessor receives written notice under subsection (1) or  (2) of this section, the
assessor  shall:
(A) Disqualify the property for the assessment years, if any, for which exemption under ORS
285C.175 is otherwise allowable following the disqualifying event; and
(B) Impose 100 percent of the additional  taxes calculated under ORS 285C.175 against the
property for each year for which the property had been granted exemption under ORS 285C.175.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, if a qualified  business firm fails to meet
any of the requirements of an agreement entered into by the  firm under ORS 285C.160 during the
exemption, but meets all other applicable requirements under  ORS 285C.050 to 285C.250 during the
first three years of  the exemption, the qualified property of the firm may not be disqualified during
the first three years of exemption for failure to comply with the requirements  of the agreement en-
tered into under ORS 285C.160.
(c) The additional taxes assessed under this subsection shall be reduced by  the amount, if any,
paid by the qualified business  firm to the sponsor under subsection (6) of this section for the same
property.
(4) If the qualified business firm or owner fails to give the  notice on time or at all as required
by subsection (1) of this section, upon discovering the property no longer  qualifies for the exemption
due to a circumstance described in subsection (1) of this section, the assessor shall:
[7]
HB 2324
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Disqualify the property from exemption;
(b) Compute the amount of additional taxes described  in subsection (3) of this section as though
notice had been  given, and add to that amount a penalty equal to 20 percent of the total amount
so computed; and
(c) Add the property to the assessment and tax  roll without the exemption as if the notice had
been given.
(5) The amount determined to be due under subsections (3) and (4) of this section:
(a) May be paid to the tax collector before completion  of the next general property tax roll
pursuant to ORS 311.370; and
(b) Shall be added to the tax extended against  the property on the next general property tax roll
to be collected and distributed in the same manner as the remainder of the property taxes.
(6)(a) Notwithstanding subsections (3) and (5) of  this section, if an assessor or sponsor receives
notice from a business firm  under subsection (1)(b), (c) or (d) of this section and the qualified busi-
ness firm has not closed  its operations, the sponsor may collect from the qualified business firm an
amount equal to the property taxes for the qualified property in the  assessment year for which the
exemption is claimed in lieu of the amounts otherwise due under subsection (3) of this section.
(b) Moneys collected under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be used by the  sponsor to
benefit the residents of  the enterprise zone and for the development of jobs, skills and training for
residents of the enterprise zone and the zone’s immediate vicinity.
(c) This subsection applies only to the first notice given by the business firm under  subsection
(1)(b), (c) or (d) of this section.
(d) If the sponsor does not receive the full amount to be paid by the qualified business firm  un-
der paragraph (a) of this subsection, the assessor shall disqualify the property and impose the  entire
amount of additional taxes as prescribed under subsection (3) of this section.
(7) An assessor may not disqualify property under this section for failure by a qualified  business
firm or an owner of qualified property leased by the qualified business firm  to notify the assessor
or the enterprise zone sponsor that the qualified  business firm does not meet requirements under
ORS 285C.150, 285C.155, 285C.160 or  285C.205, without having received written communication from
the sponsor that demonstrates that the qualified business firm does not meet the requirements.
(8) Additional taxes collected under this section shall be deemed to have been imposed  in the
year to which the additional taxes relate.
(9) If property is  disqualified from exemption under this section, the assessor shall notify the
qualified business firm, and the  owner of any qualified property that is leased by the firm, of the
disqualification. The notification  shall be made in writing. The assessor shall provide copies of the
disqualification to the sponsor, the Department of Revenue and the Oregon  Business Development
Department. The decision of the assessor to disqualify property under this section may be  appealed
to the Oregon Tax Court under ORS 305.404 to 305.560.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 285C.420 is amended to read:
285C.420. (1) If a  certified business firm does not begin operations or is not reasonably expected
to begin operations, as determined by the county assessor consistent with criteria established by
rule of the Department of Revenue, or is no longer a responsible business firm under section  4
of this 2021 Act  or fails to meet the minimum requirements set forth in ORS 285C.412, while re-
ceiving an exemption under ORS 285C.409, the  assessor shall, as of the next tax year, disqualify the
property from the exemption.
(2)(a) If a certified business firm that  has achieved the minimum applicable full-time hiring re-
[8]
HB 2324
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
quirements and annual average wage  requirements at a facility under ORS 285C.412 subsequently
fails to maintain the applicable minimum number of  full-time employees or the minimum annual av-
erage compensation level at the facility, or is no longer  a responsible business firm under sec-
tion 4 of  this 2021 Act,  the assessor shall disqualify the facility from exemption under ORS
285C.409.
(b) This subsection does not apply if the decrease in  hiring or in annual average compensation
is caused by circumstances beyond the control of the business firm, including force majeure.
(3) Upon disqualification,  there shall be added to the tax extended against the property on the
next general property tax roll, to be collected and distributed  in the same manner as the remainder
of ad valorem property taxes, an  amount equal to the taxes that would otherwise have been assessed
against the property and improvements for each of the tax years for which the property was exempt
under ORS 285C.409.
(4) The additional taxes  described in this section shall be deemed assessed and imposed in the
year to which the additional taxes relate.
SECTION 10.
(1) The amendments to ORS 285C.240 by section 8 of this 2021 Act  apply to
eligible business firms qualified under ORS 285C.200 on or after the effective date  of this 2021
Act.
(2) The amendments to ORS 285C.420 by section 9 of this 2021  Act apply to business firms
certified under ORS 285C.403 on or after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 11. Section 12 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 285C.
SECTION 12. (1) A responsible business firm whose property receives property tax bene-
fits under ORS 285C.050 to 285C.250, 285C.350 to 285C.370 or 285C.400 to 285C.420 with  an es-
timated value of $50,000 or more for a  property tax year with respect to a capital
improvement project shall:
(a) Employ apprentices, in a manner  consistent with the apprentices’ respective appren-
ticeship training programs, to perform at least 15 percent of the work hours that  workers
in apprenticeable occupations performed on the project;
(b) Establish and execute a plan for outreach, recruitment and retention of women,  mi-
nority individuals and veterans to perform work  on the project, with an aspirational goal of
having at least 15 percent of total work hours performed by such individuals;
(c) Provide health insurance and retirement benefits to all workers on the project; and
(d) Require any subcontractor engaged to work on the project under  a contract with an
estimated cost of $200,000 or more to abide by  the requirements of paragraphs (a) to (c) of
this subsection.
(2) On or before June 30  of each property tax year for which the property of a responsible
business firm described in subsection (1) of  this section receives an exemption, the respon-
sible business firm shall submit a report to the Oregon Business Development Department
setting forth:
(a) The amount of work performed by apprentices on the project;
(b) The amount of work performed  by women, minority individuals and veterans on the
project; and
(c) The types and costs  of health insurance and retirement benefits provided by con-
tractors and subcontractors to workers on the project.
(3) The requirements of this section are in  addition to, and not in lieu of, the require-
ments imposed under ORS 350.379.
[9]
HB 2324
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Apprentice” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(b) “Apprenticeable occupation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(c) “Apprenticeship training program” means the total system  of apprenticeship that a
local joint committee,  as defined in ORS 660.010, operates, including the local joint
committee’s  registered standards and all other terms and conditions for qualifying, recruit-
ing, selecting, employing and training apprentices in an apprenticeable occupation.
(d) “Minority individual” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
SECTION 13.
 Section 1, chapter 571, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended by  section 1, chapter 628,
Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1)(a) The governing body of a county and the owner or person in possession or  control
of a solar project located within the county  and outside the boundaries of any incorporated city may
enter into  an agreement that exempts from property taxes the property constituting the solar project
and allows the payment of a fee in lieu of property taxes imposed on  the property. An agreement
may not be entered into for a term longer than 20 consecutive years.
(b) If  any portion of a solar project is located within the boundaries of an incorporated city, the
governing body of the county shall consult with the governing body of the city  before entering into
an agreement  under paragraph (a) of this subsection. An agreement entered into under paragraph
(a) of this subsection with respect to  a solar project located within the boundaries of the incorpo-
rated city is not effective unless the governing body of the city is a party to the agreement.
(c) An agreement entered into under this section must require that  any work performed
on the solar project be performed by a business that:
(A) Demonstrates a history of compliance with state and federal  laws relating to labor
or employment; and
(B) Makes a commitment with respect to the work to be  performed by the business on
the solar project that the business:
(i) Will not require employees employed  by, or other workers who contract with, the
business to  enter into an agreement that includes a mandatory arbitration clause or any
other provision that requires the employees or workers  to submit to arbitration all or cer-
tain disputes that may arise between the business and employees or workers  of the business;
(ii) Will determine whether  the business’ workers have been correctly classified under
the criteria set forth in ORS 670.600;
(iii) Will not use an employment  agency, as defined in ORS 658.005, or any other agency
to procure temporary workers except as necessary to  respond to a short-term labor short-
age;
(iv) Will not prevent, disrupt or otherwise interfere  with the employees’ right to organize
for the purposes of collective bargaining; and
(v) Will adopt a hiring policy  that is made in accordance with the provisions of ORS
659A.360.
(2) The fee in lieu of  property taxes shall be computed at the rate of $7,000 per megawatt of
nameplate capacity of the  solar project for each property tax year. Megawatt of nameplate capacity
shall be carried to the third decimal place.
(3)(a) On or before December 31 preceding the first property tax year to which an  agreement
entered into under this section relates, the  owner or person in possession or control of the solar
project shall file with the assessor of the county in which the solar project is located and the  De-
[10]
HB 2324
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
partment of Revenue a copy of the agreement and the nameplate capacity of the solar project.
(b) For each subsequent property tax year to which the agreement  relates, the owner or person
in possession or control of the solar project shall include with the statement required under  ORS
[308.520] 308.524 the nameplate capacity of the solar project.
(c) A filing made under paragraph (a) of this subsection after December  31 must be accompanied
by a late fee of $200. A filing may not be  made after March 1 preceding the property tax year to
which the filing relates.
(4)(a) For each property tax year to which an  agreement relates, the department, when certify-
ing and transmitting  the assessment roll to the county assessors under ORS 308.505 to [ 308.681]
308.674, shall provide the nameplate capacity of each solar project paying the fee  in lieu of property
taxes to each assessor of a county in which a solar project is located.
(b) As required under ORS 311.255, the county assessors  shall extend upon the tax roll against
all property constituting a solar  project located in the respective counties all fees in lieu of property
taxes for the property tax year. The  fees shall be distributed pursuant to the percentage schedules
prepared under ORS 311.390.
(5)(a) If the  owner or person in possession or control of a solar project that has entered into
an agreement under  this section fails to pay the fee as required under this section, the property
constituting the solar project is not exempt  for the following property tax year and shall be assessed
and taxed as other similar property is assessed and taxed.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the property shall be exempt for the  fol-
lowing property tax year upon payment, within one year after the date of  delinquency, of the de-
linquent fee plus interest at  the rate prescribed in ORS 311.505 (2). Delinquent fees and interest
shall be collected in  the manner provided for collection of delinquent property taxes on personal
property.
(6)(a) If the owner or person in possession or control of the solar project fails to pay the  fee in
lieu of property taxes for more than one year during the term of an agreement entered into  under
this section, or work is  performed on the solar project by a business that does not meet the
requirements of subsection (1)(c) of this section,  notwithstanding the agreement, the property
constituting the solar project shall be disqualified for the exemption and payment of  the fee in lieu
of property taxes.
(b) Property that is disqualified under this subsection shall:
(A) Be assessed and taxed as other similar property is assessed and taxed.
(B) In addition, be assessed  a penalty in an amount equal to one year of the fee in lieu of
property taxes for the property. The penalty assessed under this subparagraph shall  be distributed
in the manner described in subsection (4)(b) of this section.
(7)(a) Property constituting a solar project that has received an exemption under ORS 285C.350
to 285C.370 or 307.123 for any property tax year is not eligible to pay a fee in lieu of  property taxes
under this section.
(b) Paragraph  (a) of this subsection does not apply to property constituting a solar project that
was the subject of  an application filed pursuant to ORS 285C.350 to 285C.370 if the property did not
receive the exemption for any property tax year. The election to pay the  fee in lieu of property
taxes for property described in this paragraph is not a disqualifying event.
SECTION 14.
The amendments to section 1, chapter  571, Oregon Laws 2015, by section
13 of  this 2021 Act apply to agreements entered into under section 1, chapter 571, Oregon
Laws 2015, on or after the effective date of this 2021 Act.
[11]
HB 2324
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 15.
(1) The Oregon Business  Development Department, in consultation with the
State Department  of Energy, shall create a clean energy manufacturing initiative for the
purpose of promoting:
(a) Oregon clean energy manufacturing of products and equipment  used in solar, wind,
geothermal and energy storage technology;
(b) Clean energy manufacturing supply chain opportunities in Oregon; and
(c) The repurposing  and revitalization of closed or dormant facilities for clean energy
manufacturing and clean energy manufacturing supply chain.
(2)(a) The Oregon Business Development Department shall create  a clean jobs workforce
hub within the clean  energy manufacturing initiative to ensure adequate training and
workforce development programs to meet the needs of the clean energy future.
(b) The hub shall include representatives of:
(A) Labor and unions;
(B) Business;
(C) Regional and state workforce investment boards;
(D) The State Department of Energy; and
(E) Counties, cities and ports.
(3)(a) The Oregon Business Development Department  may make loans from the Oregon
Clean Energy Manufacturing Initiative Fund established under section 16 of this 2021  Act to
eligible responsible business firms for the purposes set forth in subsection (1) of  this section.
(b) The department shall adopt rules that establish an application process for loans  made
under this subsection.
(c) Applicants for loans must be responsible business firms  under section 4 of this 2021
Act.
(d) Loans  shall be repayable over a term of 
 years with interest at the rate of
percent.
(4) A recipient of a loan that  is no longer a responsible business firm shall be charged a
penalty in an amount equal to  percent of the face value of the  loan in addition to
the obligation to repay the loan with interest.
(5) The Oregon Business Development  Department may seek appropriate legal remedies
to secure any repayment due the Oregon Clean Energy Manufacturing Initiative Fund.
SECTION 16. (1) There  is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from
the General Fund, the Oregon Clean Energy  Manufacturing Initiative Fund. Interest earned
by the Oregon Clean Energy Manufacturing Initiative Fund shall be credited to the  fund.
Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon  Business Development De-
partment for the purpose of making loans pursuant to section 15 of this 2021 Act.
(2) The Oregon Clean Energy Manufacturing Initiative Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys allocated to the fund under section 17 of this 2021 Act;
(b) Payments of principal and interest on loans made under section 15 of this 2021 Act;
(c) Moneys paid as penalties under section 15 of this 2021 Act;
(d) Moneys appropriated or otherwise deposited into the fund by  the Legislative Assem-
bly; and
(e) Other moneys from any source received for deposit in the fund.
SECTION 17.
There is  allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the Ad-
ministrative Services Economic Development  Fund, to the Oregon Business Development
[12]
HB 2324
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
Department, the amount of $10,000,000 for the purpose of making loans pursuant to section
15 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 18.
(1) Sections 15 and 16 of this 2021 Act are repealed on January 2, 2024.
(2) The repeal under this section of sections 15 and 16 of this 2021 Act  does not affect the
obligation of any recipient of a loan under section 15 of this 2021 Act to repay the loan  under
the terms of the loan agreement or to pay penalties that may be imposed.
(3) Any moneys in the Oregon Clean  Energy Manufacturing Initiative Fund that are un-
spent and unobligated as of the date specified in subsection  (1) of this section shall be
transferred to  the General Fund and may be used for any purpose for which moneys in the
General Fund may be used.
SECTION 19. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[13]