Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Ocean Beach Fund is established in  the State Treasury, separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Ocean Beach  Fund shall be credited
to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts deposited in the fund pursuant to ORS 320.335;
(b) Amounts donated to the fund;
(c) Amounts appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by  the Legislative As-
sembly;
(d) Investment earnings received on moneys in the fund; and
(e) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the State Parks and Recreation
Department for administrative, personnel and other expenses incurred by the  department in
managing state recreation areas along the ocean shore.
(4) For  purposes of subsection (3) of this section, “managing state recreation areas along
the ocean shore” includes, but is not limited to, activities relating to:
(a) Visitor safety, including developing and  erecting signage warning of the natural dan-
gers of ocean beaches;
(b) Emergency responses;
(c) Shoreline armoring and sand management;
(d) Marine debris response and removal;
(e) Increased and expanding recreational use;
(f) Increased tourism;
(g) Growing demand for beachfront development; and
(h) Responses to increasingly severe storm and erosion events.
(5) The department may establish accounts and subaccounts within the fund when  the
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2344
SB 950
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
department determines that accounts or subaccounts are necessary or desirable, and  may
credit any interest or income derived from moneys in the fund to any account  or subaccount
in the fund.
(6) The department may use moneys in the fund to pay the administrative costs associ-
ated with the fund.
(7) As used in  this section, “ocean shore” and “state recreation area” have the meanings
given those terms in ORS 390.605.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 320.335 is amended to read:
320.335. All moneys received by the Department of Revenue pursuant to ORS 320.305 to 320.340,
and interest thereon, shall be paid to the State Treasurer  to be held in a suspense account estab-
lished under ORS 293.445. After the payment of refunds:
(1) Moneys necessary to reimburse the Department of Revenue for the actual costs incurred  by
the department in administering the state transient lodging  tax, not to exceed two percent of state
transient lodging tax collections, are continuously appropriated to the department[ ; and ].
(2) Moneys received from the state transient lodging tax imposed under ORS 320.305 in
an amount equal to one percent of state transient  lodging tax collections at state recreation
areas along the ocean shore shall  be transferred to the Ocean Beach Fund established under
section 1 of this 2023 Act and used to manage state recreation areas along the ocean  shore
as described in section 1 of this 2023 Act. As used in this  subsection, “ocean shore” and
“state recreation area” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 390.605.
[(2)] (3)  The remaining balance of the moneys  received shall be transferred to the account of
the Oregon Tourism Commission established under ORS 284.131. The moneys transferred under this
subsection are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Tourism Commission for  the purposes set
forth in ORS 284.131.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 320.335 by section 2 of this 2023 Act  apply to con-
sideration charged on or after January 1, 2024,  for the sale, service or furnishing of transient
lodging.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]