Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
No later than  December 31, 2019, the Department of Justice shall report to
an appropriate committee  or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly on special legal
assistants and private counsel employed under ORS 180.140 (5). The report must include:
(1) A list of special legal assistants and private counsel  employed under ORS 180.140 (5)
between January 1, 2008, and the date of the report.
(2) The particular case or proceeding for which each special  legal assistant or private
counsel was employed.
(3) The dates during which each special legal assistant or private counsel was employed.
(4) The contractual terms under which any special legal  assistant or private counsel was
employed, if the cost of the special legal assistant  or private counsel was paid from a source
other than a public body of this state.
SECTION 2.
This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2053