Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 459A.860 to
459A.975.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS 459A.860 to 459A.975:
(1) A producer responsibility organization’s obligation to  ensure that covered products
collected for recycling are transferred to responsible end markets applies to covered pro-
ducts collected on or after July 1, 2026.
(2) The Department of Environmental Quality may not require before July 1, 2026,  in a
permit issued to a commingled recycling processing facility pursuant to ORS 459.205  and
459A.955, that the owner or operator of the facility market materials to a  responsible end
market or obtain a certification that an end market meet  standards for environmental and
social sustainability.
SECTION 3.
It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly that section 2 of  this 2025 Act
delay the requirements related to responsible end  markets imposed on any person by ORS
459A.860 to 459A.975 until July 1, 2026.  If this 2025 Act becomes effective after July 1, 2025,
any enforcement action initiated by  the Department of Environmental Quality against any
person for a violation of ORS 459A.860 to  459A.975 related to responsible end markets oc-
curring on or after July 1, 2025, and before  the effective date of this 2025 Act, must be stayed
or dismissed consistent with this section.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4960