Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
CLEAN DIESEL IN PUBLIC CONTRACTS
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2018 Act is added to  and made a part of the Public Con-
tracting Code.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “diesel engine” has  the meaning given that term
in ORS 468A.795.
(2) This section applies only:
(a) To a public improvement contract for a public improvement with a value of $2 million
or more and for which state funds constitute 30  percent of more of the value of the contract;
and
(b) If the contracting agency for the public improvement contract is:
(A) A state contracting agency; or
(B) A local contracting agency located in an area designated by  the United States Office
of Management and Budget as a micropolitan or metropolitan statistical area with a  popu-
lation of 10,000 or more.
(3) Except as provided in  subsection (5) of this section, a public improvement contract
must reserve an amount equal to at least one percent  of the total contract price for the
purpose of performing qualifying replacements, repowers or retrofits, as described  in ORS
468A.797, 468A.799 and 468A.803, of diesel engines that:
(a) Will be used in the course of performing the contract; and
(b) For the three years following  a repower or retrofit, will undergo at least 50 percent
of the diesel engine’s use in Oregon, as measured by miles driven or hours operated.
(4) Any amount reserved  in a public improvement contract under subsection (3) of this
section that remains  unexpended after completion of and final payment for the public im-
provement contract shall be deposited in the Clean Diesel Engine Fund.
(5)(a) The Environmental Quality Commission may adopt  by rule minimum standards for
contract specifications relating to the use of diesel engines  in the course of performing a
public improvement contract.
(b) As an alternative  to meeting the requirements of subsection (3) of this section, a
public improvement contract subject to this section  may include contract specifications that
meet the minimum standards adopted by the commission by rule under this subsection.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this  2018 Act applies to public improvement contracts advertised
or solicited on or after January 1, 2019, or, for public improvement  contracts that are not
advertised or solicited, public  improvement contracts that a contracting agency enters into
on or after January 1, 2019.
INDIRECT SOURCE RULES
SECTION 4. Section 5 of this 2018 Act is added to and made  a part of ORS chapter 468A.
SECTION 5. (1) For purposes of this section,  “indirect source” means a facility, building,
[2]
HB 4003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
structure, installation, real  property, road or highway that attracts, or may attract, mobile
sources of air contaminants.
(2) The Environmental Quality Commission shall adopt by rule an indirect source  review
program. The program adopted under this section  must identify indirect sources subject to
the program and must include, but need not be limited to:
(a) Provisions for the facility-by-facility review of new, modified and  existing indirect
sources of air contaminants; and
(b) Provisions for requiring  measures necessary to ensure, or assist in ensuring, that a
new, modified or existing  indirect source subject to the indirect source review program will
not attract mobile  sources of air contaminants, the emissions from which would cause or
contribute to concentrations  of air contaminants commonly associated with diesel engine
emissions that:
(A) Exceed any national ambient air quality standard; or
(B) Prevent maintenance of any national ambient air quality standard.
(3) Provisions adopted under subsection (2)(b) of this  section must include, but need not
be limited to, requirements for an indirect source subject to the indirect  source review pro-
gram to develop and administer a pollution reduction plan for reducing  mobile source emis-
sions resulting from the use of the indirect source.
SECTION 6.
Section 5 of this 2018 Act applies to:
(1) Indirect sources in existence before, on and after January 1, 2019;
(2) A new indirect source for which construction will commence  on or after January 1,
2019; and
(3) An existing indirect source for  which commencement of a modification will occur on
or after January 1, 2019.
NONROAD DIESEL ENGINE REGISTRATION
SECTION 7.
Sections 8 and 9 of this 2018 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS
468A.795 to 468A.807.
SECTION 8. (1) A person may not operate a nonroad diesel engine in this state without
first registering the engine with the Department of Environmental Quality under section  9
of this 2018 Act.
(2) This section does not apply to:
(a) Motor vehicles registered as farm vehicles under the provisions of ORS 805.300.
(b) Farm tractors, as defined in ORS 801.265.
(c) Implements of husbandry, as defined in ORS 801.310.
(d) Motor trucks, as defined in ORS 801.355, used primarily to transport logs.
SECTION 9.
(1) The Department of  Environmental Quality shall register and provide a
registration renewal for an  increment of one year or less for a nonroad diesel engine owned
or operated by a person who pays the appropriate registration or renewal fee.
(2)(a) The department may appoint agents to register  nonroad diesel engines. Agents
shall register nonroad diesel engines in accordance with procedures prescribed by  the Envi-
ronmental Quality Commission  by rule and shall charge and collect the fees prescribed by
law.
(b) The department may authorize an  agent who is not a department employee to charge
[3]
HB 4003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a service fee of $2, in addition to the registration fee, for the registration service  performed
by the agent.
(c) The department shall supply agents with registration forms for nonroad  diesel en-
gines.
(3) The commission shall establish  by rule a schedule of fees for the issuance and renewal
of nonroad diesel engine registrations. The fees established under  the schedule shall be based
on the costs of the department  in carrying out the provisions of this section and section 8
of this 2018 Act.
(4) The fees collected under this section shall be paid  into the State Treasury for deposit
in the Clean Diesel Engine Fund, to be used only for paying the department’s  expenses in
administering and enforcing this section and section 8 of this 2018 Act.
DIESEL ENGINE EMISSION STANDARDS
SECTION 10. Sections 11 and 12 of this 2018 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
468A.795 to 468A.807.
SECTION 11. (1) The Environmental Quality Commission by rule shall establish diesel
engine emission standards for medium-duty trucks and heavy-duty trucks.
(2) The standards adopted by the commission under this section must require that:
(a) On and after January 1,  2019, a medium-duty truck or heavy-duty truck operating in
Oregon may not be replaced with a truck with a 2006 model year or older engine; and
(b) By January 1,  2029, all medium-duty trucks and heavy-duty trucks operating in
Oregon must have a 2007 model year or newer engine.
(3) Rules adopted under this section must allow for owners and operators of medium-duty
trucks and heavy-duty trucks to meet the diesel engine emission standards  through alter-
native compliance options that may include, but need not be limited to:
(a) A fleet averaging option.
(b) Options that provide flexibility for small fleets.
(c) Provisions that allow owners and operators to obtain compliance credits.
(d) Compliance extensions for individual trucks that meet eligibility requirements adopted
by the commission by rule.
(e) Compliance through retrofitting with exhaust controls that reduce  diesel particulate
emissions by at least 85 percent  when compared with the baseline emissions for the relevant
engine year and application.
(4) Before adopting rules under this section,  the commission shall consider regulations
adopted by the State of California for reducing diesel engine emissions  from in-use medium-
duty trucks and heavy-duty trucks.
(5) The following classes of vehicles are exempt from rules adopted under this section:
(a) Motor vehicles registered as farm vehicles under the provisions of ORS 805.300.
(b) Farm tractors, as defined in ORS 801.265.
(c) Implements of husbandry, as defined in ORS 801.310.
(d) Motor vehicles used exclusively as  training vehicles, as determined by the commission
by rule.
(e) Any  other medium-duty trucks or heavy-duty trucks exempted from the diesel engine
emission standards by the commission by rule.
[4]
HB 4003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 12. (1) The Environmental Quality Commission shall adopt by rule nonroad
diesel engine emission standards.
(2) Except  as may be required by subsection (3) of this section, the standards must in-
clude, but need not be limited to, standards that prohibit,  beginning on January 1, 2019, the
addition to a fleet of a  nonroad piece of equipment that is powered by a nonroad diesel engine
that does not meet or exceed certain tier standards for nonroad diesel exhaust emissions as
adopted by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.
(3) The standards adopted under this section, and implementation and enforcement of the
standards, must be consistent with the requirements of  section 209(e) of the federal Clean
Air Act (P.L. 88-206 as amended).
(4) Before adopting rules under this section,  the commission shall consider regulations
adopted by the State of California for reducing nonroad diesel engine emissions.
ENVIRONMENTAL MITIGATION TRUST
AGREEMENT FUNDS, USES
SECTION 13.
 ORS 468A.805 is amended to read:
468A.805. (1) Subject to and consistent with  ORS 468A.803 (8) and with the terms of the Envi-
ronmental Mitigation Trust Agreement, any moneys received by the State  of Oregon pursuant to the
agreement that  are deposited in the Clean Diesel Engine Fund under ORS 468A.801 must be used
by the Department of Environmental Quality to award grants for the purpose of reducing  nitrogen
oxides emissions from diesel engines.
(2)(a) To  the extent authorized by the agreement, the department shall allocate moneys awarded
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section first to award grants to owners and operators of school
buses to reduce emissions from at least 450 school buses powered by  diesel engines operating in this
state.
(b) In awarding  grants under this subsection, the department shall begin by awarding grants to
owners and operators of school buses powered by diesel engines that are of the  median model year
of school buses powered by diesel engines operating in this state, and shall proceed to award grants
for school buses powered by diesel engines  through the adjoining model years until the requirements
of paragraph (a) of this subsection are met. A  grant may be awarded under this subsection for any
school bus powered  by a diesel engine within the control of an owner or operator that meets the
following conditions:
(A) The school bus has at least three years of remaining useful life;
(B) Use of the school bus has occurred in Oregon during the year preceding the date of the
grant; and
(C) For  the three years following receipt of a grant award, use of the school bus to which the
owner or operator applies the grant will occur in Oregon.
(c) The grant amount per school bus awarded under this paragraph shall be for:
(A) $50,000 or 30 percent of the cost to purchase a school bus that meets  minimum standards
adopted by the State Board of Education under ORS 820.100 for the applicable class  or type of
school bus, whichever is less; or
(B) Up to 100 percent of the cost to retrofit a school bus with  emissions-reducing parts or
technology that results in a  reduction of diesel particulate matter emissions by at least 85 percent
when compared with the baseline emissions for the relevant engine year and application.
[5]
HB 4003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3)(a) After awarding grants  as required by subsection (2) of this section and to the ex-
tent authorized by the agreement, the department shall allocate moneys awarded pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section among owners and  operators of the following categories of
motor vehicles powered by diesel engines, subject to the preferences  for grant awards es-
tablished under 468A.807:
(A) Drayage trucks.
(B) Delivery trucks.
(C) Waste hauling trucks.
(D) Transit buses.
(E) Vehicles owned and operated by a local government.
(F) Airport ground support equipment.
(b) The department may not award a grant under this subsection to the owner or  oper-
ator of a motor vehicle powered by a diesel engine unless the following criteria are met:
(A) Use of the motor vehicle has occurred in Oregon during the  year preceding the date
of the grant.
(B) The motor vehicle is authorized for use in this state.
(C) For the three years following the receipt of a grant award, at least 50 percent  of the
motor vehicle use for which the owner or operator received  the grant will occur in Oregon,
as measured by miles driven or hours operated.
(D) The grant will not exceed  the cost-effectiveness threshold where, notwithstanding
ORS 468A.795, the “cost-effectiveness threshold”  for purposes of this paragraph means the
cost in  dollars per ton of diesel particulate and nitrogen oxides reduced, as established by
rule of the commission.
(E) Any other criteria the department deems necessary to ensure  that a grant award
will result in a reduction in emissions from diesel engines in this state.
[(3)] (4) Except for awarding grants pursuant to [ subsection (2) ] subsections  (2) and (3)  of this
section, the department may not award grants from the  moneys described under subsection (1) of
this section without prior approval by the Legislative Assembly by law.
REPEAL OF STATE PREEMPTION OF LOCAL REGULATION OF
IDLING BY PRIMARY ENGINES IN COMMERCIAL VEHICLES
SECTION 14.
ORS 825.615 is repealed.
OPERATIVE DATE
SECTION 15. (1) Sections 1 to 12 of this 2018 Act become operative January 1, 2019.
(2) The Environmental Quality Commission and  the Department of Environmental Qual-
ity may adopt rules or take any actions  before the operative date specified in subsection (1)
of this section that  are necessary to enable the commission and the department, on and after
the operative date  specified in subsection (1) of this section, to carry out the provisions of
section 1 to 12 of this 2018 Act.
CAPTIONS
[6]
HB 4003
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
SECTION 16. The unit captions used in this 2018 Act are provided only  for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2018 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 17. This 2018 Act takes effect on July 1, 2018.
[7]