Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Justice, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the  Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended for  purposes of a resource
prosecutor position within the  Criminal Justice Division dedicated exclusively to assisting
local district attorneys and law enforcement  in the prosecution of offenses involving a det-
riment or a risk of detriment to  animals, including but not limited to offenses described in
ORS 167.310 to 167.390 and 167.426 to 167.439.
SECTION 2. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1697