Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall  conduct a study
regarding reporting requirements for the public universities listed in  ORS 352.002. The study
must:
(a) Include an inventory of all requirements placed on the public universities  by law and
rule to report specified information to the commission;
(b) Identify any overlapping or duplicative  requirements among the reporting require-
ments inventoried under paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Develop, in consultation with the  presidents of the public universities, a plan to
eliminate any unnecessary or duplicative reporting requirements.
(2) The commission shall submit a report, including the plan required  under subsection
(1)(c) of this section, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the  interim committees of
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1079
HB 2458
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
the Legislative Assembly related to  higher education for review and approval by September
15, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]