Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 316.798 is amended to read:
316.798. (1) Subject  to ORS 316.800, and in addition to the other modifications to federal taxable
income contained in this chapter, there shall be subtracted from federal taxable  income the amount
of funds contributed by  an account holder to the account holder’s first-time home buyer savings
account during the tax year, not to exceed $5,000 for  an account holder who files an individual in-
come tax return or $10,000 for joint account holders who file a joint income tax return.
(2) Earnings, including interest and other income, on the principal in the account  during the tax
year are exempt from taxation until withdrawn by the taxpayer, subject to subsection (3)  of this
section.
(3) An account holder may claim  the subtraction and exemption under subsections (1) and (2)
of this section:
(a) For contributions made into a first-time home buyer savings account opened  before January
1, [2027] 2032;
(b) For a period not to exceed 10 years from the date the account holder first opens any first-
time home buyer savings account; and
(c) For an aggregate total amount of principal and earnings not  to exceed $50,000 during the
10-year period.
(4) A person other than the account holder who deposits funds in a first-time home buyer savings
account is not entitled to the subtraction and exemption provided for in this section.
SECTION 2.  Section 9, chapter 109, Oregon Laws 2018, is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  [ Sections 2 to 8 of this 2018  Act ] ORS 316.796 to 316.803  apply to tax years beginning
on or after January 1, 2019, and before January 1, [ 2037] 2042.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1158