Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program”
means aid provided to individuals and households certified to be in economic  need of and el-
igible to receive such aid for the purchase  of food from retail food outlets, farmer’s markets
and roadside stands through the federal program established under 7 U.S.C. 2011 et seq.
(2) The Food for All  Oregonians Program is established in the Department of Human
Services to provide nutrition assistance to residents of this state  who are under 26 years of
age or 55 years of age or older and who would qualify  for federal Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program benefits but for their immigration status.
(3) The department shall utilize the existing Supplemental Nutrition  Assistance Program
infrastructure and electronic benefit transfer delivery system, to the extent permitted by
federal law, to create one seamless application process for federally funded and  state-funded
nutrition assistance.
(4)(a) The amount of benefits provided to  a household participating in the program shall
be the same amount that is provided to a household of equal size that is eligible for  the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.
(b) The Food for All Oregonians Program benefit amount for an individual who is  a
member of a household receiving Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program  benefits, but
who is excluded from receiving Supplemental Nutrition  Assistance Program benefits due to
the individual’s immigration status, shall be the amount that  would have been the
individual’s share of the household’s Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits  if
the individual had not been excluded.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2183
SB 611
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(5) The following rules  and processes related to the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program shall be used in the Food for All Oregonians  Program except with respect to eligi-
bility or verification requirements related to immigration status:
(a) Eligibility and benefit determination rules;
(b) Reporting and recertification requirements;
(c) Verification requirements;
(d) Application processes; and
(e) Timeliness standards for the issuance of benefits.
(6) To the extent permitted by  federal law, the income, resources and deductible expenses
of an individual described in subsection (4)(b) of this section shall be  excluded when deter-
mining the  amount of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits for the other
members of the household who  qualify for Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program ben-
efits.
(7) The total amount of assistance from the Food  for All Oregonians Program and the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program  received by a household consisting of one or
more members who are eligible for Supplemental Nutrition  Assistance Program benefits and
one or more  members who qualify for Food for All Oregonians Program benefits may not
exceed the Supplemental Nutrition  Assistance Program benefit standard for a household of
that size when all of  the members applying for benefits qualify for Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program benefits.
SECTION 2.
(1) It is the policy of this state that all Oregonians, regardless of the primary
languages they speak, should be treated in a way that is welcoming and with respect, fairness
and dignity.
(2) The Department of Human Services, in coordination with the  Office of Immigrant and
Refugee Advancement, shall convene an advisory group consisting  of members of communi-
ties whose primary language  is not English and representing community-based organizations
that work with the communities to:
(a) Provide oversight of the  Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and the Food for
All Oregonians Program; and
(b) Recommend metrics to be  adopted by the department that ensure that an applicant
for and a recipient of public assistance whose primary language is not English is treated  in
keeping with the state policy expressed in subsection  (1) of this section and in accordance
with the requirements  in ORS 411.093. The department shall apply the metrics no less fre-
quently than once each calendar quarter and  report the results from applying the metrics
on the department’s website.
(3) Members of the  advisory group are entitled to compensation and reimbursement for
actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred  by them in the performance of their
duties on the advisory group in the manner and amounts provided for in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 411.093 is amended to read:
411.093. (1) All applicants for and recipients of public assistance shall be treated in a courteous,
fair and dignified manner by Department of Human Services personnel.
(2) Any applicant or recipient who alleges discourteous, unfair or undignified  treatment by de-
partment personnel or alleges that incorrect or inadequate information regarding public  assistance
programs has been provided by department personnel may file a grievance with the  department. The
department shall publicize the grievance system in each local office.  The department shall provide
[2]
SB 611
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
an option for an applicant or recipient filing a grievance to do so anonymously.
(3) [The] A grievance that is not anonymous  shall be discussed first with the supervisor  of the
employee against whom the grievance is filed. If  the grievance is not resolved, the applicant or re-
cipient may discuss the grievance with the local office manager.
(4) The department shall  compile a monthly report summarizing each grievance filed [ against
department personnel ] and the action taken. The report shall identify each  grievance by local office
and indicate the number of grievances filed against individual  employees. The report shall protect
the anonymity of department personnel. The report shall  be presented [ to the Family Services Review
Commission and] to all county public welfare boards.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 411.806, as amended by section 3, chapter 579, Oregon Laws 2023,  is amended
to read:
411.806. As used in ORS  411.806 to 411.845, unless the context or a specially applicable statutory
definition requires otherwise:
(1) “Administrative costs” means, but is not limited to, costs in connection with:
(a) Distributing supplemental nutrition assistance to recipients under the  Supplemental Nutri-
tion Assistance Program;
(b) The compensation of personnel while employed in carrying out ORS 411.806 to 411.845; and
(c) Reimbursement of the federal government for any loss described in ORS 411.830.
(2) “Graduate assistant” means an extern or a graduate student or fellow at  an institution of
higher education who is paid  to work in teaching, administration or research while the student
completes the academic requirements for an advanced degree at the institution.
(3) “Household” means  two or more related or nonrelated individuals who reside together not
in an institution.
(4) “Issuing agency” means the Department of Human Services.
(5) “Recipient” means an  individual or household determined and certified, pursuant to ORS
411.816 or 411.825, to  be eligible to receive supplemental nutrition assistance under the Supple-
mental Nutrition Assistance Program.
(6) “Supplemental Nutrition Assistance  Program” means [ a program under which the federal
government makes aid available to the state or its agencies for  distribution through electronic benefits
transfer or by check ] aid provided to individuals and households certified to be in economic need
of and eligible to receive such aid for the  purchase of food from retail food outlets , farmer’s
markets and roadside stands through the federal program established under 7 U.S.C. 2011  et
seq. and the Food for All Oregonians Program established in section 1 of this 2025 Act .
SECTION 5.
 ORS 411.816 is amended to read:
411.816. (1) The Department of Human Services shall  adopt rules [ conforming to federal laws and
regulations required to be observed  in maintaining the eligibility of this state to receive from the federal
government, and to issue ] for the issuance of  supplemental  nutrition assistance under the Supple-
mental Nutrition Assistance Program. Rules adopted by the department  pursuant to this section
shall relate to and include, but shall not be limited to:
[(1)] (a) The classifications of and requirements  of eligibility for individuals and households to
receive supplemental nutrition assistance under the program. The limitations upon the  income and
resources  of  individuals and households established as requirements of eligibility under this section
shall not exceed  the maximum limitations on income and resources allowable under federal laws,
rules and regulations;
[(2)] (b) The periods during which individuals and households shall be certified  or recertified to
[3]
SB 611
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
be eligible to receive supplemental nutrition assistance under the program;
[(3)] (c) The amount of supplemental nutrition assistance to be issued or allotted  to recipients,
with respect to any period, under the program;
[(4)] (d) Periodic redetermination  and review of the eligibility of recipients to receive supple-
mental nutrition assistance under the program;
[(5)] (e) Cancellation of certifications issued for, and adjustment of the  numbers of individuals
in any household  eligible to receive supplemental nutrition assistance issued to recipients under the
program for any period in accordance with changes of circumstances in individual cases; and
[(6)] (f) Procedures to review, on the basis of substantial hardship, request  for such adjustments.
(2) Rules adopted under this section must conform to 7 U.S.C. 2011 et seq.  and regu-
lations implementing 7 U.S.C.  2011 et seq. Federal restrictions based on 8 U.S.C. 1611, 1612
and 1613 and 7 U.S.C. 2015(f), and similar restrictions that  are based on immigration status,
may not be applied to applicants  or recipients of aid under the Food for All Oregonians
Program.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 411.825 is amended to read:
411.825. (1) The Department of Human Services shall determine and certify  the eligibility of all
individuals and households to receive supplemental nutrition assistance  under the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program.
(2) The department shall:
(a) Issue to recipients supplemental nutrition assistance [ made available from the federal gov-
ernment under the program ]; and
(b) Account  to the federal government for all [ such] supplemental nutrition assistance  that is
federally funded.
(3)(a) In order to carry out the provisions of ORS 411.806 to 411.845,  the department is author-
ized to contract with any governmental agencies or  private agencies for distribution of supplemental
nutrition assistance.
(b) Any government agency or private agency that administers the  Food for All
Oregonians Program or that contracts with the department under this subsection is  subject
to the same prohibitions on the disclosure of information regarding applicants for and re-
cipients of public assistance as apply to the department under ORS  180.805, 180.810 or
181A.823 or similar provisions that prohibit, for immigration enforcement purposes, the use
or disclosure of information about program applicants or recipients.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 411.827 is amended to read:
411.827. All sums received by the Department of Human  Services from the federal government
to assist in meeting the costs of processing applications from, and of certifying and recertifying, in-
dividuals and households under ORS  411.806 to 411.845 are hereby appropriated to the department
for expenditure in meeting the costs  of processing applications from, and making certifications and
recertifications of, individuals and households for the benefits made available pursuant to  ORS
411.806 to 411.845 that are federally funded .
SECTION 8.
 ORS 413.201 is amended to read:
413.201. (1) The Oregon Health  Authority is responsible for statewide outreach, education and
engagement for  the Cover All People program established in ORS 414.231 [ and administered by the
authority], and the Department of Human Services is responsible for statewide outreach, ed-
ucation and engagement for the Food for All Oregonians Program established in  section 1
of this 2025 Act,  with the goal of enrolling in the [ program] programs all eligible individuals re-
[4]
SB 611
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
siding in this state. The authority  and the department , in  collaboration with the work group de-
scribed in subsection (3) of this section, shall evaluate and implement  the outreach, education and
engagement strategies designed  to most effectively encourage enrollment in the [program]
programs.
(2) To maximize the enrollment  and retention of eligible individuals in the Cover All People
program and the Food for All Oregonians Program , the authority shall , in consultation  with
the department,  develop and administer a grant program to provide funding  to organizations and
community based groups to  deliver culturally specific and targeted outreach, application assistance
and navigation to:
(a) Members of racial, ethnic and language minority communities;
(b) Children and families living in geographic isolation; and
(c) Children and families with additional  barriers to accessing health care, such as cognitive,
mental health or sensory disorders, physical disabilities or chemical dependency or homelessness.
(3) The  authority , in consultation with the department,  shall convene a work group, consist-
ing of individuals with experience in conducting outreach to the  individuals described in subsection
(2)(a) to (c) of this section, to advise and assist the authority in  carrying out its duties under this
section and in developing an implementation plan to ensure that community feedback is  included
from a health equity perspective.
(4) The department shall provide to the  authority guidance and technical assistance as
needed for carrying out the authority’s duties  under this section with respect to the Food
for All Oregonians Program.
SECTION 9.
The Department of Human Services shall implement the Food for All
Oregonians Program established  in section 1 of this 2025 Act to begin accepting applications
and issuing benefits no later than January 1, 2027.
SECTION 10. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[5]