Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 448.420 is amended to read:
448.420. (1) On and  after September 27, 1987, an operator holding a current Oregon sewage
treatment certification issued under a voluntary certification program shall be considered certified
under the program established under ORS 448.410 at the same classification and grade.
(2) Certification of operators  by any state that, as determined by the Director of the Department
of Environmental Quality, accepts certifications made under ORS 448.410  to 448.430 and 448.992,
shall be accorded reciprocal treatment and shall be recognized as valid and sufficient within the
purview of ORS 448.410 to 448.430 and 448.992, if in the judgment of the director, the certification
requirements of such state are substantially equivalent to  the requirements of ORS 448.410 to
448.430 and 448.992 or any rule adopted under ORS 448.410 to 448.430 and 448.992.
(3) In addition to reciprocal certifications under subsection (2) of  this section, the Envi-
ronmental Quality Commission may adopt by rule standards to  provide certification to per-
sons that hold a certification from a program  of any state, province or other certifying
entity, regardless of whether the requirements of the certification program are substantially
equivalent to the requirements of ORS 448.410 to  448.430 and 448.992 or any rule adopted
under ORS 448.410 to 448.430 and 448.992. Standards  for certification provided under this
subsection:
(a) Must ensure that any  person certified pursuant to this subsection is qualified by ed-
ucation and experience for certification at the  classification and grade for which certification
is granted; and
(b) May provide for certification in this state at  a lower classification or grade than the
certification held by the person from another state, province or certifying entity.
(4) The commission shall make information about  reciprocal certification and certifica-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4030
HB 3700
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
tion pursuant to subsection (3) of this section available on its website.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 448.460 is amended to read:
448.460. (1) On and after September 27, 1987, an operator holding  a current Oregon water
treatment certification issued under a voluntary certification program shall be considered certified
under the program established under ORS 448.450 at the same classification and grade.
(2) Certification of operators by any state that, as determined by the Oregon Health  Authority,
accepts certifications made under ORS 448.450  to 448.465, 448.992 and 448.994, shall be accorded
reciprocal treatment and shall  be recognized as valid and sufficient within the purview of ORS
448.450 to 448.465, 448.992 and 448.994, if in the judgment of the  Director of the Oregon Health
Authority, the certification requirements of such state are substantially equivalent to the require-
ments of ORS 448.450 to 448.465, 448.992 and 448.994 or  any rule adopted under ORS 448.450 to
448.465, 448.992 and 448.994.
(3) In addition to reciprocal certifications  under subsection (2) of this section, the Oregon
Health Authority may adopt by  rule standards to provide certification to persons that hold
a certification  from a program of any state, province or other certifying entity, regardless
of whether the requirements of the certification program are substantially  equivalent to the
requirements of ORS 448.410 to 448.430 and 448.992 or any rule adopted under  ORS 448.410 to
448.430 and 448.992. Standards for certification provided under this subsection:
(a) Must ensure that any person certified pursuant to this subsection  is qualified by ed-
ucation and experience for certification at the  classification and grade for which certification
is granted; and
(b) May provide for certification in this state  at a lower classification or grade than the
certification held by the person from another state, province or certifying entity.
(4) The  authority shall make information about reciprocal certification and certification
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section available on its website.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]