Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
OREGON EMPOWERMENT SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 7 of this 2025 Act  may be cited as the Education Equity
Emergency Act.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 2 to 7 of this 2025 Act:
(1) “Enrolled student” means a student  who is a resident of this state and who is enrolled
in the Oregon Empowerment Scholarship Program.
(2) “Parent” means a resident of this state who is a parent or legal guardian  of a student
who is  seeking to enroll, or is already enrolled, in the Oregon Empowerment Scholarship
Program.
(3) “Post-secondary institution of education” means:
(a) A community college operated under ORS chapter 341;
(b) A public university listed in ORS  352.002 or the Oregon Health and Science University;
or
(c) A generally accredited, private post-secondary institution of education located  in
Oregon.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3576
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) “Qualified expenses” means the following expenses of an enrolled student:
(a) Tuition, fees, textbooks and other required course materials  at a private school that
provides a course of study usually taught in kindergarten through grade  12 in the public
schools;
(b) Tuition for instruction provided by a private teacher, as  described in ORS 339.030
(1)(d), including the costs for any course materials;
(c) The costs for any  course materials incurred by a parent for providing instruction as
described in ORS 339.030 (1)(e);
(d) Tuition for instruction provided at a public school or fees for extracurricular  activ-
ities at a public school that are provided to students at the public school free of charge;
(e) Related services, as defined in ORS 343.035;
(f) Educational therapies or educational services provided by  a licensed or accredited
practitioner or provider;
(g) Tutoring  services provided by a person licensed by the Teacher Standards and Prac-
tices Commission or a  person licensed or accredited by any state, regional or national ac-
creditation organization;
(h) Tuition, fees, textbooks or required  course materials for a private online learning
program;
(i) Tuition, fees, textbooks or required course materials at a post-secondary  institution
of education;
(j) Fees for a  nationally normed assessment, an advanced placement examination or any
other assessment or examination related to  admission at, or receipt of credit through, a
post-secondary institution of education;
(k) Contributions to an account in the Oregon 529 Savings Network; and
(L) Fees for management of an  individual account established under the Oregon
Empowerment Scholarship Program.
(5) “Statewide average distribution” means an amount determined by the  Department of
Education each school year that  equals the average per student distribution of the State
School Fund as general purpose grants for all school districts in this state,  as adjusted by
any weights described in ORS 327.013 (1)(c)(A).
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon Empowerment Scholarship  Program is established for the
purpose of providing options in education to the students of this state.
(2)(a) A parent may enroll or reenroll a student in the program by  submitting an appli-
cation to the Department of Education on the form required by the department by April 1
of each year. The student must be a resident of  this state who has not completed high school
and who meets the qualifications of paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection.
(b) In the case of a parent seeking enrollment for a student, the student must have at-
tended a public school in this state during the previous  school year for at least 100 instruc-
tional days and must be:
(A) A child with a disability, as defined in ORS 343.035; or
(B) Eligible to receive free  or reduced price lunches under the United States Department
of Agriculture’s current Income Eligibility Guidelines.
(c) In the case of  a parent seeking reenrollment for a student, the student must have
participated in the program  during the previous school year. Any changes in the qualifica-
tions described in paragraph (b) of this subsection do  not affect the student’s eligibility to
[2]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
reenroll in subsequent school years.
(d) Enrollment in the program is valid for  one school year only and a parent must
reenroll the student in the program for each subsequent school year.
(3) The  Department of Education shall enroll or reenroll the student in the program
upon:
(a) Finding that the student meets the qualifications described in subsection (2) of this
section; and
(b) Receiving acknowledgment from the parent that the parent  accepts the terms of
participation in the program, including:
(A) Restrictions on the use of moneys received under  the program for qualified expenses
only; and
(B) The requirement that the student:
(i) Receive at least an education in language  arts, mathematics, social studies and sci-
ence; and
(ii) Comply with the requirements specified in ORS 339.035 (3) to (5).
(4) An enrolled student may not be required to attend public full-time  schools, as pro-
vided by ORS 339.030, but may receive part-time instruction at a public school  and must pay
tuition for that instruction.
(5)(a) Upon enrolling or reenrolling a student in the  program, the department shall notify
the State Treasurer of the enrollment or reenrollment.
(b) The State Treasurer shall ensure that an account  is established for each enrolled
student as described in section 4 of this 2025 Act. The State Treasurer shall notify  the de-
partment after the State Treasurer:
(A) Verifies that  an account already was established for the enrolled student if the en-
rolled student has participated in the program in a previous school year; or
(B) Establishes  an account for an enrolled student who does not already have an estab-
lished account.
(c) Upon receiving a notice  as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, the depart-
ment shall, for each student enrolled:
(A) Transfer to an account established for the student under section 4  of this 2025 Act
an amount that equals 90 percent of the statewide average distribution.
(B) Transfer to the school district  in which the student is a resident an amount that
equals five percent of the statewide average distribution.
(C) Transfer  to the Department of Education Empowerment Account established by sec-
tion 5 of this 2025 Act an  amount that equals four percent of the statewide average distrib-
ution.
(D) Transfer  to the Treasurer Empowerment Account established by section 6 of this
2025 Act an amount that equals one percent of the statewide average distribution.
(6) A school  or any other provider of services purchased pursuant to the program may
not share  with or refund or rebate to the parent or enrolled student in any manner any
moneys received through the program.
(7) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the  implementation
of this section.
SECTION 4.
(1) For each enrolled student in the Oregon Empowerment Scholarship
Program, the State Treasurer shall ensure  that an individual account is established. The
[3]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
parent of the enrolled student has the right to withdraw funds from the account only  for the
benefit of the enrolled student and only for qualified expenses.
(2) Separate records and reports are required for  each account established as provided
by this section. The State Treasurer shall ensure that, no less frequently  than annually, a
report on the account is made available to the parent.
(3) The State Treasurer may contract with a  financial institution to manage accounts
established as provided by this section with the supervision of the State Treasurer.
(4) Moneys in an account established as provided by this section:
(a) May not  be assigned, pledged or otherwise used to secure or obtain a loan or other
advancement.
(b) Are exempt from garnishment and may  not be subject to execution, attachment or
any other process or to the operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law.
(c) Are not considered income for state tax purposes.
(5) For the purpose of ensuring  that moneys in an individual account are used only for
qualified expenses, the Department of Education shall:
(a) Ensure that an annual audit is made of each account; and
(b) Establish a toll-free  telephone line that is available to members of the public to
anonymously report any fraudulent use of moneys from an account.
(6) A parent, an enrolled  student or a provider of services purchased pursuant to the
program may  be disqualified from program participation if the person is found to have com-
mitted an intentional program violation consisting of any misrepresentation or other act that
materially violates a law or rule governing the  program. The department may remove any
parent or enrolled student from eligibility for participating in the program and  shall notify
the State Treasurer. A parent may appeal the department’s decision pursuant to the con-
tested case process described in ORS chapter 183.
(7) Individual account information, including names, addresses, telephone numbers and
other personal identification information, is confidential and must be  maintained as confi-
dential unless the person who provides the information, or is  the subject of the information,
expressly agrees in writing that the information may be disclosed.
(8) An enrolled student’s account shall be closed and any remaining funds shall  be de-
posited in the State School Fund upon the later of:
(a) The enrolled student’s graduation from a post-secondary institution of education;
(b) A period of six consecutive years after the  student has enrolled in a post-secondary
institution of education;
(c) A period  of four consecutive years after high school completion in which the student
has not enrolled in a post-secondary institution of education; or
(d) A period of four consecutive years after  the student no longer meets the qualifica-
tions described in section 3 (2) of this 2025 Act and has not  enrolled in a post-secondary in-
stitution of education.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Department of Education Empowerment Account is established in
the State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the
account shall be credited to the account. All moneys credited  to the account are contin-
uously appropriated to the Department of Education for  the payment of expenses of the de-
partment under sections 2 to 7 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The Department of Education Empowerment Account consists of:
[4]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Moneys transferred as provided by section 3 (5)(c)(C) of this 2025 Act;
(b) Moneys appropriated to the account by the Legislative Assembly; and
(c) Any other moneys from state or federal sources.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Treasurer  Empowerment Account is established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the  account shall be
credited to the account. All moneys credited to  the account are continuously appropriated
to the State Treasurer for the payment of expenses of the State Treasurer  under sections 2
to 7 of this 2025 Act.
(2) The Treasurer Empowerment Account consists of:
(a) Moneys transferred as provided by section 3 (5)(c)(D) of this 2025 Act;
(b) Moneys appropriated to the account by the Legislative Assembly; and
(c) Any other moneys from state or federal sources.
SECTION 7.
(1) As used in this section,  “participating school” means a private school
that provides  instruction to an enrolled student in a course of study usually taught in
kindergarten through grade 12 in the public schools.
(2) Nothing in sections 2 to 7 of this 2025 Act:
(a) Permits a state or federal government agency  to exercise control or supervision over
any participating school, private teacher, parent or legal guardian.
(b) Makes a participating school, private teacher, parent or legal guardian an  agent of
the state or federal government.
(c)(A) Requires a participating school to change the creed with which the  school is affil-
iated, or  to change its practices, admission policy or curriculum, in order to accept enrolled
students who pay tuition or fees as provided by sections 2 to 7 of this 2025 Act.
(B) Requires a private teacher to change the teacher’s creed, practices or curriculum  in
order to accept  enrolled students who pay tuition or fees as provided by sections 2 to 7 of
this 2025 Act.
(C) Requires a parent or legal  guardian to change the parent’s or guardian’s creed,
practices or curriculum.
(3) In any legal proceeding challenging the application of  sections 2 to 7 of this 2025 Act
to a participating school, private teacher, parent  or legal guardian, the state bears the bur-
den of establishing that the law or  rule is necessary and does not impose any undue burden
on a participating school, private teacher, parent or legal guardian.
SECTION 8.
(1) Sections 2 to 7 of this 2025 Act become operative January 1, 2026.
(2) The State Board of Education, Department of Education and State Treasurer may
take any action before the operative  date specified in subsection (1) of this section to ensure
that students first be  allowed to participate in the Oregon Empowerment Scholarship Pro-
gram during the 2026-2027 school year.
SECTION 9. Section 10 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 327.
SECTION 10. (1) The Oregon Empowerment Scholarship Account is established  within
the State School Fund.
(2) The account shall consist of any moneys transferred as provided by  ORS 327.008 and
any other state or federal moneys available  for the purposes of the Oregon Empowerment
Scholarship Program.
(3) Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the Department of Education
for the purpose of making transfers under section 3 (5)(c) of this 2025 Act.
[5]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(4) If the  amount available in the account is not adequate to meet costs, the Department
of Education shall  submit a revised budget to the Legislative Assembly or, if the Legislative
Assembly is not in session, to the Emergency Board.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 327.008 is amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
(b) The Department of Education, on behalf  of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from public and private sources  for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State School Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by  the Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred from  the Fund for Student Success, moneys transferred from the Education Sta-
bility Fund and the Oregon Marijuana  Account and moneys received as provided in paragraph (b)
of this subsection.
(d) The  State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to 327.077, 327.095, 327.099, 327.101, 327.125,  327.137, 327.348, 327.356 to
327.359, 336.575, 336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961  and sections 2 to 7 of this
2025 Act .
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each school  district a State School
Fund grant,  consisting of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a transportation
grant and a  high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue, computed as provided in ORS 327.011
and 327.013.
(3) For the first school year after a public charter school ceases to  operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of  termination or nonrenewal of a charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund to  each school district that had sponsored a public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount equal to the school district’s  general purpose grant per extended
ADMw multiplied by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year.
(4) There shall be  apportioned from the State School Fund to each education service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All figures used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund shall  be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in average daily membership used in  the distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) Each biennium, the Department of  Education may expend from the State School Fund no
more than $3 million for expenses incurred by the department  in providing support to school dis-
tricts, education service districts and public charter schools at any time before, during or after a
threat or hazard that may affect a school district, an  education service district or a public charter
school and for the purpose of helping to improve the safety and security of students and staff.
(8) Each biennium, the Department of  Education may expend from the State School Fund no
more than $10 million for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities  under ORS 326.125
(1)(b) to (g).
(9) Each  fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer to the Pediatric Nursing Facil-
ity Account established in  ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs of educational ser-
vices provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer the amount of  $55 million from
the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
[6]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(11)(a) Each biennium,  the Department of Education shall transfer $39.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Educator Advancement Fund established under ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The total  amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by $6 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school districts  from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by $16.75 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education service  districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by $16.75 million.
(c) For each biennium, the amounts identified in this subsection shall be  adjusted by the same
percentage  by  which the instructions furnished to state agencies by the Governor under ORS 291.204
direct the state agencies to adjust their agency budget requests for special payments under ORS
291.216 (6)(a)(C).
(12) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Statewide English Language Learner  Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
(13) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from the  State
School  Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this  section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(14) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide administration of and support for the development  of talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend up  to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration of a program to increase the number  of licensed speech-language
pathologists and certified speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.398.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $2 million from  the State School
Fund for deposit to the Healthy School Facilities Fund established under ORS  332.337.
Notwithstanding ORS 332.337, the department may expend moneys received in the Healthy  School
Facilities  Fund  under this subsection only as grants for costs associated with testing for elevated
levels of lead in water used for drinking or food preparation.
(17) Each biennium, the Department  of Education shall transfer an amount not to exceed
$5,595,000 for the purpose  of making tampons and sanitary pads available as provided by ORS
326.545.
(18) Each fiscal year, the  Department of Education shall transfer the amount of $2.5 million from
the State School Fund to the Small School District Supplement Fund established in ORS 327.359.
(19) Each biennium,  the Department of Education shall transfer to the Oregon Military Depart-
ment the amount necessary to pay the costs of  educational services provided to students admitted
to programs operated by the military department for at-risk youth, as described  in ORS 396.360, that
are outstanding after any General Fund appropriations  and the calculation of available federal funds
for the programs.
(20) Each fiscal year, the Department of  Education shall transfer to the Oregon
Empowerment Scholarship Account established in section 10 of this  2025 Act the amount
necessary to make the transfers required by section 3 (5)(c) of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 12.
(1) The  amendments to ORS 327.008 by section 11 of this 2025 Act become
[7]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
operative July 1, 2026.
(2) The amendments to ORS 327.008 by section 11 of this 2025 Act apply to State School
Fund distributions commencing with the 2026-2027 school year distributions.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 339.030 is amended to read:
339.030. (1) In the following  cases, children may not be required to attend public full-time
schools:
(a) Children  being taught in a private or parochial school in the courses of study usually taught
in kindergarten through grade 12 in the public schools and in  attendance for a period equivalent to
that required of children attending public schools in the 1994-1995 school year.
(b) Children proving to the satisfaction of the district school board that they have  acquired
equivalent knowledge to that  acquired in the courses of study taught in kindergarten through grade
12 in the public schools.
(c) Children who have received a high school diploma or a modified diploma.
(d) Children being taught for a period equivalent to that  required of children attending public
schools by a private teacher the courses of study usually taught in kindergarten through grade  12
in the public school.
(e) Children being educated in the children’s home by a parent or legal guardian.
(f) Children who are considered  to be taught by a parent or legal guardian because of
participation in the Oregon Empowerment Scholarship Program.
[(f)] (g) Children whose sixth birthday occurred on or before September 1  immediately preceding
the beginning of the current  school year if the parent or legal guardian of the child notified in
writing the school district of which the child  is a resident that the parent or legal guardian will
delay enrolling the child in a public full-time school for only one school year for  the purpose of
better meeting the child’s needs for cognitive, social or physical development, as determined by the
parent or legal guardian.
[(g)] (h) Children who are present in the United States on a  nonimmigrant visa and who are
attending a private, accredited English language learner program in preparation  for attending a
private high school or college.
[(h)] (i) Children excluded from attendance as provided by law.
(2) The State Board of Education and the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by rule
shall establish procedures whereby, on a semiannual basis,  an exemption from compulsory attend-
ance may be granted to the parent or legal guardian  of any child 16 or 17 years of age who is
lawfully employed full-time or who is lawfully  employed part-time and enrolled in school, a commu-
nity college or an alternative education program as defined  in ORS 336.615. An exemption also may
be granted to any child  who is an emancipated minor or who has initiated the procedure for
emancipation under ORS 419B.550 to 419B.558.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 339.505 is amended to read:
339.505. (1) For purposes of the student accounting system required by ORS 339.515, the  follow-
ing definitions shall be used:
(a) “Graduate” means an individual who has:
(A) Not reached 21 years of age or whose 21st birthday occurs during the current school year;
(B) Met all state requirements and local requirements for attendance, competence and units of
credit for high school; and
(C) Received one of the following:
(i) A high school diploma issued by a school district or a public charter school.
[8]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(ii) A high school diploma issued by an authorized community college.
(iii) A modified diploma issued by a school district or a public charter school.
(iv) An extended diploma issued by a school district or a public charter school.
(b) “School dropout” means an individual who:
(A) Has enrolled for the current school  year, or was enrolled in the previous school year and
did not attend during the current school year;
(B) Is not a high school graduate;
(C) Has not received a certificate for passing an approved high school equivalency test such  as
the General Educational Development (GED) test; and
(D) Has withdrawn from school.
(c) “School dropout” does not include a student described by at least one of the following:
(A) A student who has transferred to another educational system or institution that leads to
graduation and the  school district has received a written request for the transfer of the student’s
records or transcripts.
(B) A student who is deceased.
(C) A student who is participating in home instruction paid for by the district.
(D) A student who is being taught by a private teacher, parent or legal guardian pursuant  to
ORS 339.030 (1)(d) , [ or] (e)  or (f) .
(E) A student who is participating  in a Department of Education approved public or private
education program, an alternative education program  as defined in ORS 336.615 or a hospital edu-
cation program, or is residing in a Department of Human Services or an Oregon Health  Authority
facility.
(F) A student who is temporarily  residing in a shelter care program certified by the Oregon
Youth Authority or in a juvenile detention facility.
(G) A student who is enrolled in a foreign exchange program.
(H) A student who is temporarily absent from school because of suspension, a  family emergency,
or severe health or medical problems that prohibit the student from attending school.
(I) A student who has received a certificate for passing an approved high school equivalency test
such as the General Educational Development (GED) test.
(2) The State Board of Education shall prescribe by rule when  an unexplained absence becomes
withdrawal, when a student is considered enrolled  in school, acceptable alternative education pro-
grams under ORS 336.615 to  336.665 and the standards for excused absences for purposes of ORS
339.065 for family emergencies and health and medical problems.
SECTION 15.
(1) Notwithstanding section 3 of  this 2025 Act, the Department of Education
may not enroll in the Oregon Empowerment Scholarship Program more than 0.5 percent of
the students  who reside in a school district unless the school district provides written con-
sent for the department to enroll a greater percentage.
(2) Notwithstanding section 3 of this 2025 Act, if the number of applications from stu-
dents who reside in the school district exceeds the limit  designated under subsection (1) of
this section,  and the school district has not provided written consent as described in sub-
section (1) of this section, the department  shall select students for enrollment through an
equitable lottery selection process. The department  shall give priority to students who en-
rolled in the  Oregon Empowerment Scholarship Program the previous school year and to
siblings of students who enrolled in the program the previous school year.
(3) The department shall provide timely notice to students who are not allowed to  enroll
[9]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
in the program because of the limit designated under  subsection (1) of this section. The no-
tice must provide an explanation from the school district about  why the school district chose
not to give consent for the department to enroll  a greater percentage of students as allowed
under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 16.
(1) Section 15 of this 2025 Act is repealed on July 1, 2036.
(2) Section 15 of this 2025 Act applies only  to applications submitted for any school year
from the 2026-2027 school year through the 2036-2037 school year.
SECTION 17. (1) A person commits scholarship savings account fraud if the person
knowingly obtains, by means of  a false statement or representation, by impersonation or by
other fraudulent device, any of the following:
(a) Assistance or service in violation of sections 2 to 7 of this 2025 Act;
(b) Assistance or service that is greater than that allowed under sections  2 to 7 of this
2025 Act; or
(c) Assistance or  service that is not a qualified expense as defined in section 2 of this 2025
Act.
(2) Any action that is considered an act of  scholarship savings account fraud under this
section is an act of  theft by deception under ORS 164.085 and is punishable as an act of theft
by deception.
ESSENTIAL LEARNING SKILLS
SECTION 18.
 ORS 329.007 is amended to read:
329.007. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Academic content standards”  means expectations of student knowledge and skills adopted
by the State Board of Education under ORS 329.045.
(2) “Administrator” includes all persons whose duties require an administrative license.
[(3) “Board” or “state board” means the State Board of Education. ]
[(4)] (3) “Community learning center” means a school-based  or school-linked program providing
informal meeting places  and coordination for community activities, adult education, child care, in-
formation and referral and other services as described in  ORS 329.157. “Community  learning
center” includes, but is not limited to, a  community school program as defined in ORS 336.505,
family resource centers as described in ORS 417.725, full service schools, lighted  schools and 21st
century community learning centers.
[(5) “Department” means the Department of Education. ]
(4) “Essential Learning Skills” means process skills,  as identified by the State Board of
Education by rule, that:
(a) Cross academic disciplines;
(b) Can be applied in a variety of courses, subjects and settings; and
(c) Are embedded in academic content standards.
[(6)] (5) “Higher education and career path skills” means  instruction that provides guidance on:
(a) Applying for  jobs, including preparing a resume or filling out a job application and develop-
ing job interview skills;
(b) Applying for admission to a post-secondary institution  of education, including applying for
financial aid and scholarships;
(c) Applying for post-secondary learning and  job training opportunities and programs that do not
[10]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
require a four-year degree, including apprenticeships and how  to meet the prerequisites for those
opportunities and programs;
(d) Developing career-related skills, including improving employability skills, taking  advantage
of community-based experiential learning and gaining knowledge of career opportunities; and
(e) Seeking assistance, including accessing  community resources and acting as a self-advocate
for mental, physical and financial well-being.
[(7)] (6) “History,  geography, economics and civics” includes, but is not limited to, Oregon
Studies.
[(8)] (7) “Language arts” includes reading,  writing and other communications in any language,
including English.
[(9)] (8) “Oregon  Studies” means history, geography, economics and civics specific to the State
of Oregon. Oregon Studies instruction in Oregon government shall include municipal, county, tribal
and state government, as well as the electoral and legislative processes.
[(10)] (9) “Parents” means parents or guardians of students who are covered by this chapter.
[(11)] (10) “Personal financial education” means instruction that provides guidance on:
(a) Credit scores, including how to build credit, the costs  and benefits of borrowing money on
credit and the long-term impacts of high or low credit scores;
(b) Investments, asset building and debt,  including how to open a bank account, different types
of bank accounts, compound  interest, the total cost of loan repayment, comparing investment options
and types of investments and understanding different types of retirement accounts;
(c) Strategies for creating  a budget, tracking and modifying spending patterns and understanding
insurance products, including exploring common costs associated with rentals and home ownership;
(d) Taxes, including accessing tax credits, understanding tax cycles, being familiar  with state
and federal tax forms and being familiar with federal, state, regional and local taxes; and
(e) Building financial well-being, including  evaluating the impact of behavioral economics and
the psychology of money,  explaining trends in financial health and evaluating consumer skills, in-
cluding fraud and identity theft prevention.
[(12)] (11) “Public charter school” has the meaning given that term in ORS 338.005.
[(13)] (12) “School  district” means a school district as defined in ORS 332.002, a state-operated
school or any legally constituted combination of such entities.
[(14)] (13) “Teacher” means any licensed  employee of a school district who has direct responsi-
bility for instruction, coordination of  educational programs or supervision of students and who is
compensated for such services from public funds. “Teacher” does not include a school  nurse, as
defined in ORS 342.455, or a person whose duties require an administrative license.
[(15)] (14) “The  arts” includes, but is not limited to, literary arts, performing arts and visual
arts.
[(16)] (15) “World languages” includes sign language, heritage languages and languages  other
than a student’s primary language.
[(17)] (16) “21st  Century Schools Council” means a council established pursuant to ORS 329.704.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 329.007, as amended by section 6, chapter 253, Oregon Laws 2019, section
3, chapter 178,  Oregon Laws 2021, and section 4, chapter 564, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to
read:
329.007. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Academic content standards”  means expectations of student knowledge and skills adopted
by the State Board of Education under ORS 329.045.
[11]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) “Administrator” includes all persons whose duties require an administrative license.
[(3) “Board” or “state board” means the State Board of Education. ]
[(4)] (3) “Community learning center” means a school-based  or school-linked program providing
informal meeting places  and coordination for community activities, adult education, child care, in-
formation and referral and other services as described in  ORS 329.157. “Community  learning
center” includes, but is not limited to, a  community school program as defined in ORS 336.505,
family resource centers as described in ORS 417.725, full service schools, lighted  schools and 21st
century community learning centers.
[(5) “Department” means the Department of Education. ]
(4) “Essential Learning Skills” means process skills,  as identified by the State Board of
Education by rule, that:
(a) Cross academic disciplines;
(b) Can be applied in a variety of courses, subjects and settings; and
(c) Are embedded in academic content standards.
[(6)] (5) “Higher education and career path skills” means  instruction that provides guidance on:
(a) Applying for  jobs, including preparing a resume or filling out a job application and develop-
ing job interview skills;
(b) Applying for admission to a post-secondary institution  of education, including applying for
financial aid and scholarships;
(c) Applying for post-secondary learning and  job training opportunities and programs that do not
require a four-year degree, including apprenticeships and how  to meet the prerequisites for those
opportunities and programs;
(d) Developing career-related skills, including improving employability skills, taking  advantage
of community-based experiential learning and gaining knowledge of career opportunities; and
(e) Seeking assistance, including accessing  community resources and acting as a self-advocate
for mental, physical and financial well-being.
[(7)] (6) “History, geography,  economics and civics” includes, but is not limited to, Holocaust
and genocide studies and Oregon Studies.
[(8)] (7) “Holocaust  and genocide studies” means studies on the Holocaust, genocide and other
acts of mass violence that comply with the requirements described in ORS 329.494.
[(9)] (8) “Language arts” includes reading, writing and  other communications in any language,
including English.
[(10)] (9) “Oregon Studies” means history, geography, economics and  civics specific to the State
of Oregon. Oregon Studies instruction in Oregon government shall include municipal, county, tribal
and state government, as well as the electoral and legislative processes.
[(11)] (10) “Parents” means parents or guardians of students who are covered by this chapter.
[(12)] (11) “Personal financial education” means instruction that provides guidance on:
(a) Credit scores, including how to build credit, the costs  and benefits of borrowing money on
credit and the long-term impacts of high or low credit scores;
(b) Investments, asset building and debt,  including how to open a bank account, different types
of bank accounts, compound  interest, the total cost of loan repayment, comparing investment options
and types of investments and understanding different types of retirement accounts;
(c) Strategies for creating  a budget, tracking and modifying spending patterns and understanding
insurance products, including exploring common costs associated with rentals and home ownership;
(d) Taxes, including accessing tax credits, understanding tax cycles, being familiar  with state
[12]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
and federal tax forms and being familiar with federal, state, regional and local taxes; and
(e) Building financial well-being, including  evaluating the impact of behavioral economics and
the psychology of money,  explaining trends in financial health and evaluating consumer skills, in-
cluding fraud and identity theft prevention.
[(13)] (12) “Public charter school” has the meaning given that term in ORS 338.005.
[(14)] (13) “School  district” means a school district as defined in ORS 332.002, a state-operated
school or any legally constituted combination of such entities.
[(15)] (14) “Teacher” means any licensed  employee of a school district who has direct responsi-
bility for instruction, coordination of  educational programs or supervision of students and who is
compensated for such services from public funds. “Teacher” does not include a school  nurse, as
defined in ORS 342.455, or a person whose duties require an administrative license.
[(16)] (15) “The  arts” includes, but is not limited to, literary arts, performing arts and visual
arts.
[(17)] (16) “World languages” includes sign language, heritage languages and languages  other
than a student’s primary language.
[(18)] (17) “21st  Century Schools Council” means a council established pursuant to ORS 329.704.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 329.451, as amended by section 1, chapter 4, Oregon Laws 2024, is  amended
to read:
329.451. (1)(a) At or before grade 12, a school district or public charter school shall award a high
school  diploma  to a student who completes the requirements established by [ subsection (2) ] sub-
sections (2) and (3)  of this section.
(b) A school  district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma to a student who
satisfies the requirements established by  [ subsection (7) ] subsections (3) and (7)  of this section, an
extended diploma  to a student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (8) of this
section or a certificate of attendance to a student who satisfies  the requirements established by
subsection (9) of this section.
(c) A school district  or public charter school may not deny a student who has the documented
history described in subsection (7)(b)  or (8)(b) of this section the opportunity to pursue a diploma
with more stringent requirements than a modified diploma or an extended diploma.
(d) A school district or public charter  school may award a modified diploma or extended diploma
to a student only upon receiving consent as provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(2)(a) In order to receive a high school diploma from a  school district or public charter school,
a student must satisfy the requirements established by the State Board  of Education and the school
district or public charter school and, while in grades 9 through 12, must complete at least:
(A) Twenty-four total credits;
(B) Three credits of mathematics; and
(C) Four credits of language arts.
(b) If a school district  or public charter school requires a student to complete more than 24 total
credits, as provided by paragraph (a)(A) of  this subsection, the school district or public charter
school may only require the student to complete additional credits for:
(A) Subjects for which the State Board of Education has established  academic content standards
under ORS 329.045;
(B) Courses provided as part of a career and technical education program; or
(C) Courses  that provide, or qualify to provide, credit at post-secondary institutions of education.
(c)(A) A school district or public charter school that requires students  to satisfy any require-
[13]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ments not specified by paragraph (a) of this subsection or by rule of the State Board of Education
must grant to a student a waiver of the requirements established by  the school district or public
charter school if the student is or, at any time from grade 9 to 12, was:
(i) A foster child, as defined in ORS 30.297;
(ii) Homeless, as determined under rules  adopted by the State Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iii) A runaway, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board  of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iv) A child in a military family covered by the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity
for Military Children, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education;
(v) A child of a migrant worker, as determined under rules adopted by  the State Board of Edu-
cation;
(vi) Enrolled in the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education
Program; or
(vii) Enrolled in an approved recovery school under ORS 336.680.
(B)(i) For any student identified under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, a school district or
public charter school must accept any credits earned by the student in  an educational program in
this state and apply those credits toward requirements specified by paragraph (a) of  this subsection
or by rule of the State Board of Education if the credits satisfied  those requirements in that edu-
cational program in this state.
(ii) As used in this subparagraph, “educational program in this state” means  an educational
program that is:
(I) Provided by a school district, a public charter school, an approved recovery school, the
Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program; or
(II) Funded as  provided by ORS 343.243 for students in a long term care or treatment facility
described in ORS 343.961 or a hospital identified in ORS 343.261.
(d)(A) The State Board of  Education shall adopt rules by which a student who has completed
an International Baccalaureate program may satisfy  the credit requirements prescribed by para-
graph (a) of this subsection and any  or all of the requirements established by rule of the State Board
of Education under paragraph (a) of this subsection. The rules:
(i) Must provide that the student has satisfied those requirements if the student has satisfied:
(I) All of the requirements for an  International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme or an Inter-
national Baccalaureate Career-related Programme; and
(II) Any other requirements prescribed by the board by rule for a student who has  completed
an International Baccalaureate program.
(ii) May provide that, only for the purpose of satisfying requirements as  provided by this para-
graph, a person  who is not an external International Baccalaureate examiner may grade assessments
or examinations for either program.
(B) Nothing in this paragraph  prohibits a school district or public charter school from estab-
lishing requirements that are in addition to the credit requirements prescribed by paragraph  (a) of
this subsection or any requirements established by rule under  paragraph (a) of this subsection or
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) When establishing  requirements under this paragraph, the board or a school district or
public charter school shall attempt  not to establish requirements that may discourage access to or
participation in the International Baccalaureate program.
[14]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3)(a) In addition to the credit requirements described in subsection (2) of this  section
and any other requirements established by the State Board  of Education or by a school dis-
trict or public charter school, the board shall adopt proficiency standards  for Essential
Learning Skills that must be  demonstrated before a student is awarded a high school diploma
or a modified diploma. The proficiency standards must be demonstrated for, at a minimum,
the following:
(A) Reading and comprehending a variety of text;
(B) Writing clearly and accurately; and
(C) Applying mathematics in a variety of settings.
(b) The board shall adopt by rule assessment options for students to demonstrate  profi-
ciency in Essential Learning Skills, as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection.
[(3)] (c) A student providing work samples to  demonstrate proficiency in Essential Learning
Skills [as may be required under subsection (2) of this section ] must be allowed to use accommodations
described in the  student’s individualized education program or the student’s plan developed in ac-
cordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29  U.S.C. 794. As used in this
[subsection] paragraph, the term “accommodations”:
[(a)] (A) Includes, but is not limited to:
[(A)] (i) Additional time to demonstrate proficiency.
[(B)] (ii) The ability to  demonstrate proficiency in an alternative location that is secure and
proctored.
[(C)] (iii) The use of text-to-speech or speech-to-text technology or other assistive technology.
[(b)] (B) Does not include modifications that lower the proficiency standards or that are used
solely to earn modified credit.
(4) A student may satisfy the requirements of [ subsection (2) ] subsections (2) and  (3)  of this
section in less than four years. If a student satisfies the requirements  of [ subsection (2) ] subsections
(2) and (3)  of this section and a school district  or public charter school has received consent as
provided by subsection (6) of this section, the school district or public charter  school shall award
a high school diploma to the student.
(5) If a school district  or public charter school has received consent as provided by subsection
(6) of this  section, the school district or public charter school may advance the student to the next
grade level if the student has satisfied the requirements for the student’s current grade level.
(6)(a) For  the purpose of receiving consent as provided by subsections (1)(d), (4) and (5) of this
section, consent shall be provided by:
(A) The parent or guardian of the student, if the student:
(i) Is under 18 years of age and is not emancipated pursuant to ORS 419B.550 to 419B.558; or
(ii) Has been determined not to have  the ability to give informed consent regarding the student’s
education pursuant to a protective proceeding under ORS chapter 125; or
(B) The student, if the student is 18 years of age  or older or is emancipated pursuant to ORS
419B.550 to 419B.558.
(b) For the purpose of awarding a modified diploma or extended diploma as provided by sub-
section (1)(d) of this section or of awarding a high school diploma as provided by subsection (4) of
this section, consent must be received  during the school year for which the diploma will be awarded.
(7) A school  district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma only to students
who have demonstrated  the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for  a modified di-
[15]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ploma, a student must:
(a) Satisfy the  requirements for a modified diploma established by this section and  the State
Board of Education; and
(b) Have a documented history of an inability  to maintain grade level achievement due to sig-
nificant learning and  instructional barriers or have a documented history of a medical condition that
creates a barrier to achievement.
(8) A school district  or public charter school shall award an extended diploma only to students
who have demonstrated the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for  a high
school diploma with  reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for an extended
diploma, a student must:
(a) While in grade nine  through completion of high school, complete 12 credits, which may not
include more than six credits  earned in a self-contained special education classroom and shall in-
clude:
(A) Two credits of mathematics;
(B) Two credits of language arts;
(C) Two credits of science;
(D) Three credits of history, geography, economics or civics;
(E) One credit of health;
(F) One credit of physical education; and
(G) One credit of the arts or a world language; and
(b) Have a documented history of:
(A) An inability to maintain grade level achievement due to  significant learning and instruc-
tional barriers;
(B) A medical condition that creates a barrier to achievement; or
(C) A change in the student’s ability to participate in  grade level activities as a result of a se-
rious illness or injury that occurred after grade eight.
(9) A school district or public charter  school shall award a certificate of attendance to a student
who does not satisfy the requirements for a  high school diploma, a modified diploma or an extended
diploma if the student has maintained regular full-time attendance for at least four  years beginning
in grade nine  and meets requirements established by the board of the school district or public
charter school.
(10) A student shall have the opportunity to satisfy  the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section by the later of:
(a) Four years after starting grade nine; or
(b) The student reaching the age  of 21 years, if the student is entitled to a public education until
the age of 21 years under state or federal law.
(11)(a) A student may satisfy the requirements described in subsection (7), (8) or  (9) of this sec-
tion in less than four years if consent is  provided in the manner described in subsection (6)(a) of this
section.
(b) The consent provided  under this subsection must be written and must clearly state that the
parent, guardian or student  is waiving the time allowed under subsection (10) of this section. A
consent may not be used to allow a student to satisfy the requirements of subsection (7),  (8) or (9)
of this section in less than three years.
(c) A copy of all consents provided under  this subsection for students in a school district must
be forwarded to the district superintendent.
[16]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Each school  district must provide to the Superintendent of Public Instruction information
about the number of consents provided during a school year.
(12)(a) A student who qualifies to receive or receives a modified diploma, an  extended diploma
or a certificate of attendance shall:
(A) Have the option of participating in a high  school graduation ceremony with the class of the
student; and
(B) Have access to  instructional hours, hours of transition services and hours of other services
that are designed to:
(i) Meet the unique needs of the student; and
(ii) When added together, provide a total number of hours of  instruction and services to the
student that equals at least the total number of  instructional hours that is required to be provided
to students who are attending a public high school.
(b) A school district may not unilaterally decrease the total number of hours of  instruction and
services to which the student has access under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, regardless of the
age of the student.
(c) For purposes  of paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, transition services and other services
designed to meet the unique needs of  the student may be provided to the student through an inter-
agency agreement entered into by the school district if the individualized  education program devel-
oped for the student indicates that the services may be  provided by another agency. A school
district that enters into an interagency agreement as allowed under this  paragraph retains the re-
sponsibility for ensuring that the student has access to  the number of service hours required to be
provided to the student under this subsection. An  agency is not required to change any eligibility
criteria or enrollment standards prior to entering into an interagency agreement  as provided by this
paragraph.
(13) A school district or public charter school shall:
(a) Ensure that all students have on-site access to the appropriate resources and  courses to
achieve high school diplomas, modified diplomas and extended diplomas at each high school  in the
school district or at the public charter school.
(b) Provide literacy instruction to all students until graduation.
(c)(A) Provide to the parents or guardians of a student who has the documented  history de-
scribed in subsection (8)(b) of this section:
(i) Information about the availability of high school diplomas, modified diplomas  and extended
diplomas and the requirements for the diplomas; and
(ii) A disclosure that a student awarded a  certificate of attendance will not be counted as a high
school graduate in any reporting for the state or school district  and that a student awarded a cer-
tificate of attendance may not indicate that the  student received a high school diploma on applica-
tions for employment, military service,  financial aid, admittance to an institution of higher education
or any other purpose.
(B) The information and disclosure required under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph  must be
provided annually:
(i) Beginning in grade five; or
(ii) Beginning after a documented history described in subsection (8)(b) of this section  has been
established.
(14) A school district or public charter school shall allow a  student to participate in the high
school graduation ceremony with the class of the student and to wear:
[17]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Native American items of cultural significance as provided by ORS 332.112; or
(b) A dress uniform issued to the student by  a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States
if the student:
(A) Qualifies to receive a high  school diploma, a modified diploma, an extended diploma or a
certificate of attendance under this section; and
(B) Has completed basic  training for, and is an active member of, a branch of the Armed Forces
of the United States.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 329.451, as amended by section 1, chapter 175, Oregon Laws 2021,  section
6, chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2022, section 3, chapter 202, Oregon Laws 2023,  section 9, chapter 513,
Oregon Laws 2023, and section 2, chapter 4, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
329.451. (1)(a) At or before grade 12, a school district or public charter school shall award a high
school  diploma  to a student who completes the requirements established by [ subsection (2) ] sub-
sections (2) and (3)  of this section.
(b) A school  district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma to a student who
satisfies the requirements established by  [ subsection (7) ] subsections (3) and (7)  of this section, an
extended diploma  to a student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (8) of this
section or a certificate of attendance to a student who satisfies  the requirements established by
subsection (9) of this section.
(c) A school district  or public charter school may not deny a student who has the documented
history described in subsection (7)(b)  or (8)(b) of this section the opportunity to pursue a diploma
with more stringent requirements than a modified diploma or an extended diploma.
(d) A school district or public charter  school may award a modified diploma or extended diploma
to a student only upon receiving consent as provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(2)(a) In order to receive a high school diploma from a  school district or public charter school,
a student must satisfy the requirements established by the State Board  of Education and the school
district or public charter school and, while in grades 9  through 12, must complete at least 24 total
credits, which must include at least:
(A) Three credits of mathematics;
(B) Four credits of language arts; and
(C) One half-credit of civics.
(b) If a school district  or public charter school requires a student to complete more than 24 total
credits, as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection, the school district or public charter  school
may only require the student to complete additional credits for:
(A) Subjects for which the State Board of Education has established  academic content standards
under ORS 329.045;
(B) Courses provided as part of a career and technical education program; or
(C) Courses  that provide, or qualify to provide, credit at post-secondary institutions of education.
(c)(A) A school district or  public charter school that requires students to satisfy any require-
ments not specified by paragraph (a) of this subsection or by rule of the State Board of Education
must grant to a student a  waiver of the requirements established by the school district or public
charter school if the student is or, at any time from grade 9 to 12, was:
(i) A foster child, as defined in ORS 30.297;
(ii) Homeless, as determined under rules adopted by the State  Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iii) A runaway, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board  of Education based on
[18]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iv) A child in a military family covered by the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity
for Military Children, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education;
(v) A child of a migrant worker, as determined under rules adopted by  the State Board of Edu-
cation;
(vi) Enrolled in the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education
Program; or
(vii) Enrolled in an approved recovery school under ORS 336.680.
(B)(i) For any student identified under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, a school district or
public charter school must accept any credits earned by the student in  an educational program in
this state and apply those credits toward requirements specified by paragraph (a) of  this subsection
or by rule of the State Board of Education if the credits satisfied  those requirements in that edu-
cational program in this state.
(ii) As used in this subparagraph, “educational program in this state” means  an educational
program that is:
(I) Provided by a school district, a public charter school, an approved recovery school, the
Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program; or
(II) Funded as  provided by ORS 343.243 for students in a long term care or treatment facility
described in ORS 343.961 or a hospital identified in ORS 343.261.
(d)(A) The State Board of  Education shall adopt rules by which a student who has completed
an International Baccalaureate program may satisfy  the credit requirements prescribed by para-
graph (a) of this subsection and any  or all of the requirements established by rule of the State Board
of Education under paragraph (a) of this subsection. The rules:
(i) Must provide that the student has satisfied those requirements if the student has satisfied:
(I) All of the requirements for an  International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme or an Inter-
national Baccalaureate Career-related Programme; and
(II) Any other requirements prescribed by the board by rule for a student who has  completed
an International Baccalaureate program.
(ii) May provide that, only for the purpose of satisfying requirements as  provided by this para-
graph, a person  who is not an external International Baccalaureate examiner may grade assessments
or examinations for either program.
(B) Nothing in this paragraph  prohibits a school district or public charter school from estab-
lishing requirements that are in addition to the credit requirements prescribed by paragraph  (a) of
this subsection or any requirements established by rule under  paragraph (a) of this subsection or
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) When establishing  requirements under this paragraph, the board or a school district or
public charter school shall attempt  not to establish requirements that may discourage access to or
participation in the International Baccalaureate program.
(3)(a) In addition to the credit requirements described in subsection (2) of this  section
and any other requirements established by the State Board  of Education or by a school dis-
trict or public charter school, the board shall adopt proficiency standards  for Essential
Learning Skills that must be  demonstrated before a student is awarded a high school diploma
or a modified diploma. The proficiency standards must be demonstrated for, at a minimum,
the following:
(A) Reading and comprehending a variety of text;
[19]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Writing clearly and accurately; and
(C) Applying mathematics in a variety of settings.
(b) The board shall adopt by rule assessment options for students to demonstrate  profi-
ciency in Essential Learning Skills, as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection.
[(3)] (c) A student providing work  samples to demonstrate proficiency in Essential Learning
Skills [as may be required under subsection (2) of this section ] must be allowed to use accommodations
described in the student’s individualized education program or the student’s plan developed  in ac-
cordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation  Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794. As used in this
[subsection] paragraph, the term “accommodations”:
[(a)] (A) Includes, but is not limited to:
[(A)] (i) Additional time to demonstrate proficiency.
[(B)] (ii) The ability to demonstrate proficiency in an alternative location  that is secure and
proctored.
[(C)] (iii) The use of text-to-speech or speech-to-text technology or other assistive technology.
[(b)] (B) Does not include modifications that lower the proficiency standards or that are used
solely to earn modified credit.
(4) A student may  satisfy the requirements of [ subsection (2) ] subsections (2) and (3)  of this
section in less than four years. If a student satisfies the requirements  of [ subsection (2) ] subsections
(2) and (3)  of this section and a school  district or public charter school has received consent as
provided by subsection (6)  of this section, the school district or public charter school shall award
a high school diploma to the student.
(5) If a school district or public charter school has received consent  as provided by subsection
(6) of this section, the school district or public charter school may advance the student to  the next
grade level if the student has satisfied the requirements for the student’s current grade level.
(6)(a) For the purpose of receiving consent as provided by subsections (1)(d), (4) and (5) of  this
section, consent shall be provided by:
(A) The parent or guardian of the student, if the student:
(i) Is under 18 years of age and is not emancipated pursuant to ORS 419B.550 to 419B.558; or
(ii) Has been determined not to have  the ability to give informed consent regarding the student’s
education pursuant to a protective proceeding under ORS chapter 125; or
(B) The student, if the student is 18 years  of age or older or is emancipated pursuant to ORS
419B.550 to 419B.558.
(b) For the purpose of awarding a modified diploma or extended diploma as provided by sub-
section (1)(d) of this section or of awarding a high school diploma as provided by subsection (4) of
this section, consent must be received  during the school year for which the diploma will be awarded.
(7) A school district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma only  to students
who have demonstrated the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for  a high
school diploma with reasonable  modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for a modified di-
ploma, a student must:
(a) Satisfy the requirements for a modified diploma established by this section and  the State
Board of Education; and
(b) Have a documented history of an inability to  maintain grade level achievement due to sig-
nificant learning and  instructional barriers or have a documented history of a medical condition that
creates a barrier to achievement.
(8) A school district or public charter school shall award an extended diploma  only to students
[20]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
who have demonstrated  the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for  an extended
diploma, a student must:
(a) While in grade nine through completion of high school, complete 12  credits, which may not
include more than six credits earned in a self-contained special education  classroom and shall in-
clude:
(A) Two credits of mathematics;
(B) Two credits of language arts;
(C) Two credits of science;
(D) Three credits of history, geography, economics or civics;
(E) One credit of health;
(F) One credit of physical education; and
(G) One credit of the arts or a world language; and
(b) Have a documented history of:
(A) An inability to maintain  grade level achievement due to significant learning and instruc-
tional barriers;
(B) A medical condition that creates a barrier to achievement; or
(C) A change in the student’s ability to participate in  grade level activities as a result of a se-
rious illness or injury that occurred after grade eight.
(9) A school district or public charter  school shall award a certificate of attendance to a student
who does not satisfy the requirements for a  high school diploma, a modified diploma or an extended
diploma if the student has maintained regular full-time attendance for at least four  years beginning
in grade nine  and meets requirements established by the board of the school district or public
charter school.
(10) A student shall have the opportunity to satisfy  the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section by the later of:
(a) Four years after starting grade nine; or
(b) The student reaching the age  of 21 years, if the student is entitled to a public education until
the age of 21 years under state or federal law.
(11)(a) A student may satisfy the requirements described in subsection (7), (8) or  (9) of this sec-
tion in less than four years if consent is  provided in the manner described in subsection (6)(a) of this
section.
(b) The consent provided  under this subsection must be written and must clearly state that the
parent, guardian or student  is waiving the time allowed under subsection (10) of this section. A
consent may not be used to allow a student to satisfy the requirements of subsection (7),  (8) or (9)
of this section in less than three years.
(c) A copy of all consents provided under  this subsection for students in a school district must
be forwarded to the district superintendent.
(d) Each school  district must provide to the Superintendent of Public Instruction information
about the number of consents provided during a school year.
(12)(a) A student who qualifies to receive or receives a modified diploma, an  extended diploma
or a certificate of attendance shall:
(A) Have the option of participating in a high  school graduation ceremony with the class of the
student; and
(B) Have access to  instructional hours, hours of transition services and hours of other services
[21]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
that are designed to:
(i) Meet the unique needs of the student; and
(ii) When added together, provide a total number of hours of  instruction and services to the
student that equals at least the total number of  instructional hours that is required to be provided
to students who are attending a public high school.
(b) A school district may not unilaterally decrease the total number of hours of  instruction and
services to which the student has access under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, regardless of the
age of the student.
(c) For purposes  of paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, transition services and other services
designed to meet the unique needs of  the student may be provided to the student through an inter-
agency agreement entered into by the school district if the individualized  education program devel-
oped for the student indicates that the services may be  provided by another agency. A school
district that enters into an interagency agreement as allowed under this  paragraph retains the re-
sponsibility for ensuring that the student has access to  the number of service hours required to be
provided to the student under this subsection. An  agency is not required to change any eligibility
criteria or enrollment standards prior to entering into an interagency agreement  as provided by this
paragraph.
(13) A school district or public charter school shall:
(a) Ensure that all students have on-site access to the appropriate resources and  courses to
achieve high school diplomas, modified diplomas and extended diplomas at each high school  in the
school district or at the public charter school.
(b) Provide literacy instruction to all students until graduation.
(c)(A) Provide to the parents or guardians of a student who has the documented  history de-
scribed in subsection (8)(b) of this section:
(i) Information about the availability of high school diplomas, modified diplomas  and extended
diplomas and the requirements for the diplomas; and
(ii) A disclosure that a student awarded a  certificate of attendance will not be counted as a high
school graduate in any reporting for the state or school district  and that a student awarded a cer-
tificate of attendance may not indicate that the  student received a high school diploma on applica-
tions for employment, military service,  financial aid, admittance to an institution of higher education
or any other purpose.
(B) The information and disclosure required under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph  must be
provided annually:
(i) Beginning in grade five; or
(ii) Beginning after a documented history described in subsection (8)(b) of this section  has been
established.
(14) A school district or public charter school shall allow a  student to participate in the high
school graduation ceremony with the class of the student and to wear:
(a) Native American items of cultural significance as provided by ORS 332.112; or
(b) A dress uniform issued to the student by  a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States
if the student:
(A) Qualifies to receive a high  school diploma, a modified diploma, an extended diploma or a
certificate of attendance under this section; and
(B) Has completed basic  training for, and is an active member of, a branch of the Armed Forces
of the United States.
[22]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 22.
 ORS 329.451, as amended by section 1, chapter 175, Oregon Laws 2021,  section
6, chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2022, section 3, chapter 202, Oregon Laws 2023,  section 9, chapter 513,
Oregon Laws 2023, section 1, chapter 564, Oregon Laws  2023, and section 3, chapter 4, Oregon Laws
2024, is amended to read:
329.451. (1)(a) At or before grade 12, a school district or public charter school shall award a high
school  diploma  to a student who completes the requirements established by [ subsection (2) ] sub-
sections (2) and (3)  of this section.
(b) A school  district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma to a student who
satisfies the requirements established by  [ subsection (7) ] subsections (3) and (7)  of this section, an
extended diploma  to a student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (8) of this
section or a certificate of attendance to a student who satisfies  the requirements established by
subsection (9) of this section.
(c) A school district  or public charter school may not deny a student who has the documented
history described in subsection (7)(b)  or (8)(b) of this section the opportunity to pursue a diploma
with more stringent requirements than a modified diploma or an extended diploma.
(d) A school district or public charter  school may award a modified diploma or extended diploma
to a student only upon receiving consent as provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(2)(a) In order to receive a high  school diploma from a school district or public charter school,
a student must satisfy the requirements established by the State Board  of Education and the school
district or public charter school and, while in grades  9 through 12, must complete at least 24 total
credits, which must include at least:
(A) Three credits of mathematics;
(B) Four credits of language arts;
(C) One half-credit of civics;
(D) One half-credit of higher education and career path skills; and
(E) One half-credit of personal financial education.
(b) If a school district  or public charter school requires a student to complete more than 24 total
credits,  as  provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection, the school district or public charter school
may only require the student to complete additional credits for:
(A) Subjects for which the State Board of Education has established  academic content standards
under ORS 329.045;
(B) Courses provided as part of a career and technical education program; or
(C) Courses  that provide, or qualify to provide, credit at post-secondary institutions of education.
(c)(A) A school district or public charter school that requires students  to satisfy any require-
ments not specified by paragraph (a) of this subsection or by rule of the State Board of Education
must grant to a student a waiver of the requirements established by  the school district or public
charter school if the student is or, at any time from grade 9 to 12, was:
(i) A foster child, as defined in ORS 30.297;
(ii) Homeless, as determined under rules  adopted by the State Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iii) A runaway, as determined  under rules adopted by the State Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iv) A child in a military family covered by the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity
for Military Children, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education;
(v) A child of a migrant  worker, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Edu-
[23]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cation;
(vi) Enrolled in the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education
Program; or
(vii) Enrolled in an approved recovery school under ORS 336.680.
(B)(i) For any student identified under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, a school district or
public charter school must accept  any credits earned by the student in an educational program in
this state and apply those credits toward requirements specified by paragraph (a) of  this subsection
or by rule of the State  Board of Education if the credits satisfied those requirements in that edu-
cational program in this state.
(ii) As used  in this subparagraph, “educational program in this state” means an educational
program that is:
(I) Provided by a school district, a public charter school, an approved recovery school, the
Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program; or
(II) Funded as  provided by ORS 343.243 for students in a long term care or treatment facility
described in ORS 343.961 or a hospital identified in ORS 343.261.
(d) The State  Board of Education may adopt by rule requirements for courses, including teachers
of courses, related to  higher education and career path skills and personal financial education that
allow the courses to satisfy multiple credit requirements for a high school diploma, including  math-
ematics.
(e)(A) The State Board of Education  shall adopt rules by which a student who has completed
an International Baccalaureate program may satisfy  the credit requirements prescribed by para-
graph (a) of this subsection and any  or all of the requirements established by rule of the State Board
of Education under paragraph (a) of this subsection. The rules:
(i) Must provide that the student has satisfied those requirements if the student has satisfied:
(I) All of the requirements for an  International Baccalaureate Diploma Programme or an Inter-
national Baccalaureate Career-related Programme; and
(II) Any other requirements prescribed by the board by rule for a student who has  completed
an International Baccalaureate program.
(ii) May provide that, only for the purpose of satisfying requirements as  provided by this para-
graph, a person  who is not an external International Baccalaureate examiner may grade assessments
or examinations for either program.
(B) Nothing in this paragraph  prohibits a school district or public charter school from estab-
lishing requirements that are in addition to the credit requirements prescribed by paragraph  (a) of
this subsection or any requirements established by rule under  paragraph (a) of this subsection or
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) When establishing  requirements under this paragraph, the board or a school district or
public charter school shall attempt  not to establish requirements that may discourage access to or
participation in the International Baccalaureate program.
(3)(a) In addition to the credit requirements described in subsection (2) of this  section
and any other requirements established by the State Board  of Education or by a school dis-
trict or public charter school, the board shall adopt proficiency standards  for Essential
Learning Skills that must be  demonstrated before a student is awarded a high school diploma
or a modified diploma. The proficiency standards must be demonstrated for, at a minimum,
the following:
(A) Reading and comprehending a variety of text;
[24]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Writing clearly and accurately; and
(C) Applying mathematics in a variety of settings.
(b) The board shall adopt by rule assessment options for students to demonstrate  profi-
ciency in Essential Learning Skills, as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection.
[(3)] (c) A student providing work samples to  demonstrate proficiency in Essential Learning
Skills [as may be required under subsection (2) of this section ] must be allowed to use accommodations
described in the  student’s individualized education program or the student’s plan developed in ac-
cordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29  U.S.C. 794. As used in this
[subsection] paragraph, the term “accommodations”:
[(a)] (A) Includes, but is not limited to:
[(A)] (i) Additional time to demonstrate proficiency.
[(B)] (ii) The ability to  demonstrate proficiency in an alternative location that is secure and
proctored.
[(C)] (iii) The use of text-to-speech or speech-to-text technology or other assistive technology.
[(b)] (B) Does not include modifications that lower the proficiency standards or that are used
solely to earn modified credit.
(4) A student may satisfy the requirements of [ subsection (2) ] subsections (2) and  (3)  of this
section in less than four years. If a student satisfies the requirements  of [ subsection (2) ] subsections
(2) and (3)  of this section and a school district  or public charter school has received consent as
provided by subsection (6) of this section, the school district or public charter  school shall award
a high school diploma to the student.
(5) If a school district or public charter school has received consent  as provided by subsection
(6) of this section, the school district or public charter school may advance the student to  the next
grade level if the student has satisfied the requirements for the student’s current grade level.
(6)(a) For the purpose of receiving consent as provided by subsections (1)(d), (4) and (5) of  this
section, consent shall be provided by:
(A) The parent or guardian of the student, if the student:
(i) Is under 18 years of age and is not emancipated pursuant to ORS 419B.550 to 419B.558; or
(ii) Has been determined not to have  the ability to give informed consent regarding the student’s
education pursuant to a protective proceeding under ORS chapter 125; or
(B) The student, if the student is 18 years  of age or older or is emancipated pursuant to ORS
419B.550 to 419B.558.
(b) For the purpose of awarding a modified diploma or extended diploma as provided by sub-
section (1)(d) of this section or of awarding a high school diploma as provided by subsection (4) of
this section, consent must be received  during the school year for which the diploma will be awarded.
(7) A school district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma only  to students
who have demonstrated the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for  a high
school diploma with reasonable  modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for a modified di-
ploma, a student must:
(a) Satisfy the requirements for a modified diploma established by this section and  the State
Board of Education; and
(b) Have a documented history of an inability to  maintain grade level achievement due to sig-
nificant learning and  instructional barriers or have a documented history of a medical condition that
creates a barrier to achievement.
(8) A school district or public charter school shall award an extended diploma  only to students
[25]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
who have demonstrated  the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for  an extended
diploma, a student must:
(a) While in grade nine through completion of high school, complete 12  credits, which may not
include more than six credits earned in a self-contained special education  classroom and shall in-
clude:
(A) Two credits of mathematics;
(B) Two credits of language arts;
(C) Two credits of science;
(D) Three credits of history, geography, economics or civics;
(E) One credit of health;
(F) One credit of physical education; and
(G) One credit of the arts or a world language; and
(b) Have a documented history of:
(A) An inability to maintain  grade level achievement due to significant learning and instruc-
tional barriers;
(B) A medical condition that creates a barrier to achievement; or
(C) A change in the student’s ability to participate in  grade level activities as a result of a se-
rious illness or injury that occurred after grade eight.
(9) A school district or public charter  school shall award a certificate of attendance to a student
who does not satisfy the requirements for a  high school diploma, a modified diploma or an extended
diploma if the  student has maintained regular full-time attendance for at least four years beginning
in grade nine and meets requirements established by the board of the school district  or public
charter school.
(10) A student shall have the opportunity to satisfy  the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section by the later of:
(a) Four years after starting grade nine; or
(b) The student reaching the age  of 21 years, if the student is entitled to a public education until
the age of 21 years under state or federal law.
(11)(a) A student may satisfy  the requirements described in subsection (7), (8) or (9) of this sec-
tion in less than four years if consent is  provided in the manner described in subsection (6)(a) of this
section.
(b) The consent provided under this subsection must be written and must clearly  state that the
parent, guardian or student is waiving the time allowed under subsection (10) of  this section. A
consent may not be  used to allow a student to satisfy the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section in less than three years.
(c) A copy of all consents provided under this subsection  for students in a school district must
be forwarded to the district superintendent.
(d) Each school district must provide to the Superintendent of Public  Instruction information
about the number of consents provided during a school year.
(12)(a) A student  who qualifies to receive or receives a modified diploma, an extended diploma
or a certificate of attendance shall:
(A) Have the option of participating in a high  school graduation ceremony with the class of the
student; and
(B) Have access to instructional hours, hours of transition services and hours  of other services
[26]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
that are designed to:
(i) Meet the unique needs of the student; and
(ii) When added together, provide a  total number of hours of instruction and services to the
student that equals at least the total number of  instructional hours that is required to be provided
to students who are attending a public high school.
(b) A school district may not unilaterally decrease the total number of hours of  instruction and
services to which the student has access under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, regardless of the
age of the student.
(c) For purposes of paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, transition services and  other services
designed to meet the unique needs of the student may be provided  to the student through an inter-
agency agreement entered into  by the school district if the individualized education program devel-
oped for the student indicates that the  services may be provided by another agency. A school
district that enters into an  interagency agreement as allowed under this paragraph retains the re-
sponsibility for ensuring that the student has access to  the number of service hours required to be
provided to the student under this subsection. An agency  is not required to change any eligibility
criteria or enrollment standards prior to entering into an interagency agreement  as provided by this
paragraph.
(13) A school district or public charter school shall:
(a) Ensure that  all students have on-site access to the appropriate resources and courses to
achieve high school  diplomas, modified diplomas and extended diplomas at each high school in the
school district or at the public charter school.
(b) Provide literacy instruction to all students until graduation.
(c)(A) Provide to  the parents or guardians of a student who has the documented history de-
scribed in subsection (8)(b) of this section:
(i) Information about  the availability of high school diplomas, modified diplomas and extended
diplomas and the requirements for the diplomas; and
(ii) A disclosure that a student awarded a  certificate of attendance will not be counted as a high
school graduate in any reporting for the state  or school district and that a student awarded a cer-
tificate of attendance may not indicate that the student  received a high school diploma on applica-
tions for employment, military service,  financial aid, admittance to an institution of higher education
or any other purpose.
(B) The information  and disclosure required under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph must be
provided  annually:
(i) Beginning in grade five; or
(ii) Beginning after  a documented history described in subsection (8)(b) of this section has been
established.
(14) A school district or public charter  school shall allow a student to participate in the high
school graduation ceremony with the class of the student and to wear:
(a) Native American items of cultural significance as provided by ORS 332.112; or
(b) A dress uniform issued to the student by  a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States
if the student:
(A) Qualifies to receive a high school diploma, a modified diploma,  an extended diploma or a
certificate of attendance under this section; and
(B) Has completed basic  training for, and is an active member of, a branch of the Armed Forces
of the United States.
[27]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 23.
 ORS 327.190 is amended to read:
327.190. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Disaggregated”  means separated based on the student groups identified in ORS 327.180
(2)(b).
(b) “Five-year completion rate” means the percentage of students  who received a high school
diploma, a modified  diploma or an extended diploma or who received a certificate for passing an
approved high school equivalency test such as the General Educational Development test  (GED)
within five years of the student beginning the ninth grade.
(c) “High school diploma” means a diploma that is awarded to a student upon  satisfaction of the
requirements prescribed by ORS 329.451 (2)  and (3) .
(d) “Ninth-grade on-track rates” means the percentage of students who, at the end of the summer
following the year the students began ninth grade, completed one quarter of the credits required for
high school graduation.
(e) “On-time graduation rate” means  the percentage of students who received a high school di-
ploma or a modified diploma within four years of the students beginning the ninth grade.
(f) “Regular attendance rates” means the percentage of students who are absent, as determined
by Department of Education policy, for less than 10 percent of the school  days for which the stu-
dents are enrolled.
(g) “Third-grade reading  proficiency rate” means the percentage of students in the third grade
who are determined to be proficient or above in  English language arts, as determined under rules
adopted by the State Board of Education.
(2) The Department  of Education shall review all applications for grants from the Student In-
vestment Account that comply with the requirements prescribed by ORS 327.185.
(3) If an  application complies with the requirements of ORS 327.185, the department shall col-
laborate with the grant recipient  to develop applicable longitudinal performance growth targets. The
longitudinal performance growth targets must:
(a) Be based on data available for longitudinal analysis;
(b) Be developed based on guidance established by the department; and
(c) Use the following applicable metrics:
(A) On-time graduation rates and five-year completion rates, including:
(i) The overall on-time graduation rate and five-year completion rate.
(ii) Gaps in disaggregated on-time graduation rates and five-year completion rates.
(B) Ninth-grade on-track rates, including:
(i) The overall ninth-grade on-track rate.
(ii) Gaps in disaggregated ninth-grade on-track rates.
(C) Third-grade reading proficiency rates, including:
(i) The overall third-grade reading proficiency rate.
(ii) Gaps in disaggregated third-grade reading proficiency rates.
(D) Regular attendance rates, including:
(i) The overall regular attendance rate.
(ii) Gaps in disaggregated regular attendance rates.
(4) In addition to the metrics identified in subsection (3) of this section, the following may  be
used to develop applicable performance growth targets:
(a) Local metrics; and
(b) Targets related to student mental and  behavioral health needs, as established by the State
[28]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Board of Education by rule.
(5) When developing performance growth targets, the department and grant recipient shall:
(a) Review disaggregated student data;
(b) Apply  a process adopted by the department for the purpose of strategically developing equi-
table policies and programs; and
(c) Identify which student groups identified in ORS 327.180 (2)(b) are most at risk  of not meeting
performance growth targets.
(6)(a) After  developing performance growth targets, the department and grant recipient shall
enter into a grant agreement. The grant agreement must include applicable  performance growth
targets for measuring the academic growth of the students of the grant recipient.
(b) A grant agreement is not valid until approved  by the governing body of the grant recipient
at an open meeting following:
(A) Provision of the plan at the main office of the grant recipient and on the grant recipient’s
website;
(B) Oral presentation of the plan by an  administrator of the grant recipient to the governing
body of the grant recipient; and
(C) Opportunity for the public to comment on the plan at an open meeting.
(7) Any agreements between a  public charter school and a grant recipient that is a school dis-
trict shall become part of the grant agreement.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 336.585 is amended to read:
336.585. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Juvenile Detention Education Program” means the program defined in ORS 326.695.
(b) “Resident district” means the school district in which  the parents or legal guardian, if any,
of a child resided at the time of  the child’s enrollment in the Juvenile Detention Education Program.
If the child has no parents or legal guardian, or none can  be located, the resident district is the
school district in which the child is physically located.
(2)(a) The Department of Education shall provide  or cause to be provided appropriate education
for children enrolled in an educational program under the Juvenile  Detention Education Program.
The Superintendent of Public  Instruction may contract with a school district or education service
district to provide or cause to be provided appropriate education to children enrolled in an  educa-
tional program under the Juvenile Detention Education Program. For  the purpose of this section,
an appropriate education includes transition services from the Juvenile Detention Education  Pro-
gram into school settings and workforce preparation  programs and any necessary ongoing support
for a transition.
(b) An education service district that provides education as provided  by this subsection and that
awards high school diplomas:
(A) May not  impose requirements for a high school diploma that are in addition to the require-
ments prescribed by ORS 329.451 (2)(a) or (3) or by rule of the State Board of Education; and
(B) Must accept any credits previously earned by  children in another school or educational
program in this state and apply those credits toward the requirements prescribed by ORS 329.451
(2)(a) or (3) or by rule of the State Board of Education.
(3) The superintendent shall pay the costs of providing education to children  enrolled in an ed-
ucational program under the Juvenile Detention Education Program from the State School  Fund
grant allocated for that purpose under ORS 327.026.
(4) The State Board of Education shall adopt  by rule standards to be applied to the operation
[29]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of the Juvenile Detention Education  Program, including standards that allow a school district or an
education service district under contract with the superintendent to:
(a) Implement an assessment system as provided by ORS 329.485.
(b) Administer a nationally normed assessment as provided by ORS 329.488.
(c) Participate in the beginning teacher and administrator mentorship  program established by
ORS 329.788 to 329.820.
(d) Receive funds under ORS chapter 329.
(5) The superintendent shall ensure that the resident district of  each child enrolled in an edu-
cational program under the Juvenile  Detention Education Program is notified, if the resident district
can be reasonably identified. The purposes of the notification include, but are not limited to:
(a) Removing the child from the resident district’s census;
(b) Facilitating transfers of the child’s educational records; and
(c) Facilitating planning for the child’s possible return to the resident district.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 336.590 is amended to read:
336.590. (1) As used in this section, “Youth Corrections Education Program” means the program
defined in ORS 326.695.
(2) The Department of Education  shall provide or cause to be provided appropriate education
for children enrolled in an  educational program under the Youth Corrections Education
Program. The Superintendent of Public  Instruction may contract with a school district or education
service district to provide  or cause to be provided appropriate education to children enrolled in an
educational program under the  Youth Corrections Education Program. For the purpose of this sec-
tion, an appropriate education includes transition services from the Youth Corrections  Education
Program into school settings and workforce  preparation programs and any necessary ongoing sup-
port for a transition.
(3) The superintendent shall pay  the costs of providing education to children enrolled in an ed-
ucational program under the Youth Corrections Education Program  from the State School Fund
grant allocated for that purpose under ORS 327.026.
(4) The State Board of Education shall adopt by rule  standards to be applied to the operation
of the Youth Corrections Education Program, including standards that allow a  school district or an
education service district under contract with the superintendent to:
(a) Award high school diplomas, modified diplomas, extended diplomas and certificates of  at-
tendance as provided  by ORS 329.451 and 339.877. An education service district that awards high
school diplomas as provided by this paragraph:
(A) May not impose requirements for a high school diploma that are in addition to  the require-
ments prescribed by ORS 329.451 (2)(a) or (3) or by rule of the State Board of Education; and
(B) Must accept any credits previously earned  by children in another school or educational
program in this state and apply those credits toward the requirements prescribed by ORS 329.451
(2)(a) or (3) or by rule of the State Board of Education.
(b) Implement an assessment system as provided by ORS 329.485.
(c) Administer a nationally normed assessment as provided by ORS 329.488.
(d) Participate in the beginning teacher and administrator  mentorship program established by
ORS 329.788 to 329.820.
(e) Receive funds under ORS chapter 329.
SECTION 26.
 ORS 336.680, as amended by  section 45, chapter 95, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
[30]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
336.680. (1) As used  in this section, “approved recovery school” means a school that is under
an agreement with the Department of Education to provide students  enrolled in the school with a
holistic approach to:
(a) Educational services for grades 9 through 12; and
(b) Health care services related to recovery from substance use disorders.
(2) The department shall provide or cause to be provided appropriate  education for students
enrolled in an approved  recovery school. For the purpose of paying the costs of providing education
to students enrolled in an approved recovery  school, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
make the following:
(a) Payments from amounts available from the State School Fund under ORS 327.029.
(b) Payments from  the Statewide Education Initiatives Account, as provided by rule adopted by
the State Board of Education in collaboration with  the advisory committee convened under ORS
336.685. The rules adopted as provided  by this paragraph may include a minimum amount, a maxi-
mum amount or both for approved recovery schools.
(3) The Superintendent of Public Instruction may contract with  a school district, an education
service district or a public charter school to provide or cause to be  provided appropriate education
to students enrolled in  an approved recovery school. Unless otherwise specified, any educational
services provided under a contract entered into under this  subsection shall be paid as described in
this section and not by any other state moneys distributed based on average daily membership  that
are available  to the school district, education service district or public charter school for the pur-
pose of providing educational services.
(4) The State Board of  Education shall adopt by rule the standards for a recovery school to
become and operate as an approved recovery school. The standards must provide that:
(a) The recovery school must align, to the extent identified by the board,  with standards for
accreditation established by  a nonprofit accrediting organization composed of representatives of re-
covery schools and individuals who support the growth of recovery schools. The standards must  in-
clude requirements that:
(A) The  recovery school, in compliance with timelines established by the department, be ac-
credited by a nonprofit  accrediting organization that establishes standards for recovery schools.
Nothing in this subparagraph requires the recovery  school to be accredited at the time the super-
intendent first enters into a contract with the recovery school.
(B) Student enrollment in the recovery school is voluntary. No school district or  state or local
agency may compel or otherwise require a student to enroll in a recovery school. Students enrolled
in an approved recovery school may not be counted in determining the  number of pupils in average
daily membership for purposes of ORS 334.175 (5).
(C) All students who reside in this state and who meet the eligibility criteria established  under
subsection (8) of this section may enroll in an approved  recovery school if space is available. If
space is not available, the approved recovery school may prioritize  for enrollment student groups
identified in ORS 327.180 (2)(b).
(D) The school  district, education service district or public charter school with which the de-
partment has entered into a contract for a  recovery school must agree to award high school diplo-
mas, modified diplomas, extended  diplomas and alternative certificates as provided by ORS 329.451
and 339.877. An entity that awards high school diplomas as provided by this subparagraph:
(i) May not impose requirements for a high school diploma that are in addition to the require-
ments prescribed by ORS 329.451 (2)(a) or (3) or by rule of the State Board of Education; and
[31]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(ii) Must accept any credits previously earned  by students in another school or educational
program in this state and apply those credits toward the requirements prescribed by ORS 329.451
(2)(a) or (3) or by rule of the State Board of Education.
(E) Except as provided by subparagraphs  (F) and (G) of this paragraph, the recovery school must
satisfy the same laws that apply to public charter schools under ORS 338.115.
(F) All  administrators and teachers at the recovery school must be licensed by the Teacher
Standards and Practices Commission.
(G) An approved recovery school is  not required to comply with the enrollment requirements
prescribed by ORS 338.115 (1)(bb) or (5).
(H) An approved recovery school must comply with the requirements  of the uniform budget and
accounting system adopted by rule of the State Board of Education under ORS 327.511.
(b) Recovery schools will be approved, to the greatest extent practicable, in a manner that:
(A) Represents a geographic distribution across this state; and
(B) Takes into consideration the needs  for services by the community in which the recovery
school would be located.
(5) Any school that provides the services of a recovery  school may enter into a contract with
the superintendent  to become an approved recovery school, including schools already providing the
services of a recovery school and schools that are proposing to provide the services of a recovery
school.
(6) An approved recovery  school may enter into agreements with other entities, including
community-based organizations and federally recognized tribes of this state,  for the purposes of
providing educational and health care services to students enrolled  in the approved recovery school.
(7)(a) The department shall be responsible for:
(A) Identifying, locating and evaluating students enrolled in an approved recovery  school who
may be in need of special education and related services; and
(B) Ensuring that eligible students receive special education and related services.
(b) For the purpose of this subsection,  the department may enter into a contract with a school
district or an education service district.
(8) The  department shall establish eligibility criteria for students to enroll in an approved re-
covery school, based on input from the advisory  committee convened under ORS 336.685 and based
on research from a nonprofit  organization composed of representatives of recovery schools and in-
dividuals who support the growth of recovery schools and other relevant organizations.
(9) For the purposes of administering this section:
(a) The State Board of Education shall adopt any necessary rules.
(b) The  department shall collaborate with the Oregon Health Authority, the Youth Development
Division,  the  Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission, the Oregon Youth Authority, the Department
of Human Services and local public  health and mental health authorities or providers and shall co-
ordinate, to the greatest extent  practicable, funding of services provided in relation to approved
recovery schools.
(10) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall prepare a report on the progress,  suc-
cesses and challenges of approved recovery schools and submit that report to:
(a) The interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education; and
(b) The advisory committee convened under ORS 336.685.
SECTION 27.
 ORS 343.331, as amended by section 1, chapter 59, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
[32]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
343.331. ORS 343.322, 343.324, 343.326 and 343.328 do not apply to any of the following:
(1) Any abbreviated school days that are a component of discipline imposed in  compliance with
ORS 339.250, 339.252 or 343.155 (5) or that are  the result of a placement made as provided by ORS
343.177.
(2) A student’s exclusion from schools due to the student’s immunization  status or due to the
student’s exposure to a restrictable disease, as provided by ORS 433.235 to 433.284.
(3) The exclusion of a student from schools or the closure or  restriction of access to schools due
to actions taken under a public health emergency authorized under ORS 433.441 to 433.452.
(4) A  student who has fulfilled all state requirements for graduation with a high school diploma,
as described in ORS 329.451 (2)  and (3) , when  the parent or foster parent has agreed to the abbre-
viated school day program.
(5) A student enrolled in a program described in  ORS 336.585, 336.590, 339.129, 343.261, 343.961
(1)(c)(A)(i) or 346.010, if the student has meaningful access to  the same number of hours of instruc-
tion and educational services as the majority of other  students enrolled in the same program as the
student.
(6) A student whose parent or foster parent has notified an education  service district that the
student is being taught by a parent, legal guardian or private teacher under ORS 339.035.
(7) A student who is excluded from, or limited access to, school due to a court order.
(8) A  high school student who is voluntarily enrolled in an alternative education program in
compliance with ORS 336.635, the Expanded  Options Program under ORS 340.005 to 340.090 or an
accelerated college credit program as defined in ORS 340.300, when:
(a) The majority of the students of the program are not students with disabilities;
(b) The student is not restricted  to attending fewer hours of instruction and educational services
than the number of hours of instruction and educational services attended by the majority of  stu-
dents without disabilities who are in the same grade and who attend the same program; and
(c) For  an alternative education program in which the student is enrolled under ORS 336.635,
the school district informs the  parent or foster parent, in writing and in a language and format ac-
cessible to the parent or foster parent, that  upon written request of the parent or foster parent, the
student will be immediately restored to a school that allows  the student to access the same number
of hours of instruction and educational services that are provided to the majority of other  students
who are in the same grade within the student’s resident school district.
(9) A student who, when registering for classes for a term  or semester of a school year, volun-
tarily does not schedule a class for one or more class periods.  The provisions of this subsection
apply only if the student is:
(a) In grade 11 or 12 and is on track to fulfill all state requirements  for graduation with a high
school diploma, as described in ORS 329.451 (2)  and (3), or a modified diploma, as described in ORS
329.451 (3) and (7), within four years of starting grade 9; or
(b) On track to fulfill all state requirements for  graduation with a high school diploma, as de-
scribed in ORS 329.451 (2)  and (3) , or  a modified diploma, as described in ORS 329.451 (3) and (7),
by the end of the school year in which the student voluntarily does not schedule a class for one  or
more class periods.
(10) Asynchronous instruction if the instruction:
(a) Is for only one class per term or semester;
(b) Satisfies a  credit requirement for a high school diploma, as described in ORS 329.451 (2)  and
(3), or a modified diploma, as described in ORS 329.451 (3) and (7);
[33]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Is a credit recovery class or is a class not otherwise available to the student;
(d) Is offered to  students on a voluntary basis and is not restricted to only students with a dis-
ability; and
(e) Is accessible to a student while the student is at  school and while staff of the school are
immediately available to the student.
SECTION 28.
(1) The amendments to ORS 327.190, 329.451,  336.585, 336.590, 336.680 and
343.331 by sections 20 to 27 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The amendments to ORS 327.190, 329.451, 336.585, 336.590, 336.680 and 343.331 by
sections 20 to 27 of this 2025 Act apply to diplomas awarded on or after January 1, 2026.
(3) Notwithstanding the operative date set forth in subsection (1)  of this section, the
State Board of Education, the Department of Education and any  entity that awards high
school diplomas and modified diplomas may take any action before the operative  date set
forth in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary for the board, department or  entity
to exercise, on and after the operative date set forth in subsection  (1) of this section, all of
the duties, functions and powers necessary to award diplomas as provided by ORS 329.451.
VIRTUAL PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL CAP
SECTION 29.  ORS 338.125 is amended to read:
338.125. (1) Student enrollment in a public charter school is voluntary.
(2)(a) All students who reside in the school district in which the public charter  school is located
are eligible for enrollment in the public charter school if space is available.
(b) Students  who do not reside in the school district in which the public charter school is lo-
cated are eligible for enrollment in the public charter school if  space is available [ and subject to
subsection (5) of this section ].
(c) A public charter  school may not limit student enrollment based on race, religion, sex, sexual
orientation, gender identity, ethnicity, national origin, disability, the terms of an  individualized ed-
ucation  program,  income level, proficiency in the English language or athletic ability. A public
charter school may implement a weighted lottery  that favors historically underserved students as
provided by subsection (3)(a) of this section.
(3)(a) Except as provided by paragraphs (b) and (c)  of this subsection, if the number of applica-
tions from students exceeds the capacity  of a program, class, grade level or building, the public
charter school shall select  students through an equitable lottery selection process. For the purpose
of ameliorating the impact of discrimination against  historically underserved students, an equitable
lottery selection process may include weights that  favor historically underserved students. As used
in this  paragraph, “historically underserved students” are students who are at risk because of any
combination of their race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ethnicity, disability, income  level,
proficiency in the English language, socioeconomic status or geographic location.
(b)(A) A  public charter school may give priority for admission to students who reside within the
attendance boundaries that were in effect at  the time a school district closed a nonchartered public
school  if:
(i) The public charter school began to operate  not more than two years after the nonchartered
public school was closed;
(ii) The school district that closed the nonchartered  public school is the sponsor of the public
charter school;
[34]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(iii) The public charter school  is physically located within the attendance boundaries of the
closed nonchartered public school; and
(iv) The school district board, through board action, approved the public charter school  giving
priority as described in this paragraph.
(B) Nothing in this paragraph requires an amendment to a charter.  A school district board may
take an action described in subparagraph (A)(iv) of this  paragraph at any time during the term of
a charter.
(c) After a public charter school has been in operation for one or more  years, the public charter
school may give priority for admission to students who:
(A) Were enrolled in the prior year in the public charter school;
(B) Were enrolled  in a public preschool or prekindergarten program operated by the public
charter school;
(C) Have siblings who are presently enrolled in the school and who were  enrolled in the school
in the prior year;
(D) Are at risk because the student has an economic  or academic disadvantage that requires
special services or assistance, including students who:
(i) Are from economically disadvantaged families;
(ii) Are identified as having special educational needs;
(iii) Are limited in proficiency in the English language;
(iv) Are at risk of dropping out of high school; or
(v) Do not meet minimum standards of academic proficiency; or
(E) If the public charter school is  a party to a cooperative agreement described in ORS 338.080,
reside in the school  district that is the sponsor of the public charter school or in a school district
that is a party to the cooperative agreement.
(4) A student who wishes to enroll in a virtual public charter school does not need the approval
of the school district where the  student is a resident before the student enrolls in the virtual public
charter school. If a student wishes  to enroll in a virtual public charter school, the parent, legal
guardian or person in parental relationship with the student must provide the following  notices to
the school district where the student is a resident:
(a) Intent to enroll the student in a virtual public charter school; and
(b) Enrollment of the student in a virtual public charter school.
[(5)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this section and ORS 339.133,  if more than three percent
of the students who reside in  a school district are enrolled in virtual public charter schools that are
not sponsored by the  school district, a student who is a resident of the school district must receive
approval from the school district before enrolling in a virtual public charter school.  A school district
is not required to give approval if more than three  percent of the students who reside in the school
district are enrolled in virtual public charter schools that are not sponsored by  the school district. A
school district must provide notice of the decision to not give approval within 10  calendar days of re-
ceiving notice of intent for the student to enroll in a virtual public charter school. ]
[(b) For the purpose of determining whether more than three percent of the students who  reside in
the school district are enrolled in virtual public charter schools  that are not sponsored by the school
district, the school district board shall: ]
[(A) Include any students who: ]
[(i) Reside in the school district, regardless of  whether the students are considered residents of
different school districts as provided by ORS 339.133 (5); and ]
[35]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(ii) Are enrolled in virtual public charter schools that are not sponsored by the school district. ]
[(B) Calculate, at least twice each  year, the school district’s percentage of students attending virtual
public charter schools that are not sponsored by the school district. ]
[(c)(A) Except as provided by subparagraph  (B) of this paragraph, students who reside in the
school district, regardless of whether the students  are considered residents of different school districts
as provided by  ORS 339.133 (5), must receive approval from the school district before enrolling in a
virtual public charter school if the limit described in paragraph (a) of this subsection has been met. ]
[(B) A student is not required to receive approval from the school district in which the  student
resides if the student: ]
[(i) Previously lived in another school district; ]
[(ii) While living in the other school district, was enrolled in a virtual public charter school; and ]
[(iii) Has maintained  continuous enrollment in the virtual public charter school since moving into
the school district where the student currently resides. ]
[(d) If the school district does not give approval under paragraph (a)  of this subsection, the school
district must provide to the parent, legal guardian or  person in parental relationship with the student
information about: ]
[(A) The percentage of students in the resident district that attend virtual public  charter schools
that are not sponsored by the school district, based on the most recent calculation; ]
[(B) The right to appeal the decision to the State Board of Education; and ]
[(C) Other online options available to the student. ]
[(e) If an appeal is  made to the State Board of Education as described in paragraph (d) of this
subsection, the board must issue a decision within 14 days of the submission of the appeal. ]
[(6)] (5) Within 10 days of  a student’s enrollment in a public charter school, the public charter
school  shall  provide written notice of the student’s enrollment to the school district in which the
public charter school is located if the student does not reside in the school  district where the public
charter school is located.
[(7)] (6) Within 10 days of receiving the notice described in subsection [ (6)] (5) of this section,
the school district  in which the public charter school is located shall provide to the student’s parent,
legal guardian or person in parental relationship written information about:
(a) The school district’s responsibility to identify, locate and  evaluate students enrolled in the
public charter school to determine which students  may be in need of special education and related
services as provided by ORS 338.165; and
(b) The methods by which the school district may be contacted to  answer questions or provide
information related to special education and related services.
[(8)] (7) When a student described in subsection [ (6)] (5) of this section withdraws from a public
charter school for a reason  other than graduation from high school, the school district in which the
public charter school is located shall:
(a) Provide to the school district in which the student resides written notice that the student
has withdrawn.
(b) Provide to the student’s parent,  legal guardian or person in parental relationship written
information about:
(A) The responsibility of the school district in which the student  resides to identify, locate and
evaluate students  who reside in the school district to determine which students may be in need of
special education and related services as provided by ORS 338.165; and
(B) The methods by which the school district in which the student resides may  be contacted to
[36]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
answer questions or provide information related to special education and related services.
[(9)(a)] (8)(a) If a student described in subsection [ (6)] (5)  of this section enrolls in  a public
charter school and has an individualized education program, the school district in which the  public
charter school is  located must implement the individualized education program and follow the terms
of the individualized education program until a new individualized education program is developed.
(b) If a student described  in subsection [ (6)] (5) of this section withdraws from a public charter
school and has  an individualized education program, the school district in which the student resides
must implement the individualized education program and follow the terms of the  individualized ed-
ucation program until a new individualized education program is developed.
[(10)] (9) When a virtual public charter school enrolls a student or a student no longer  is en-
rolled in a virtual public charter school, the virtual public charter school shall  provide the written
notices described in ORS 338.120 (1)(m) and (n)  to the school district where the student is a resident.
[(11)] (10) A public charter  school may conduct fund-raising activities but may not require a
student to participate in fund-raising activities as a  condition of admission to the public charter
school.
SECTION 30.
 ORS 338.025 is amended to read:
338.025. (1) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for  the implementation
of this chapter. The rules shall follow the intent of this chapter.
(2) Upon application by a public charter school, the State  Board of Education may grant a
waiver of any provision of this chapter if the waiver promotes the  development of programs by
providers, enhances the equitable access by underserved families to the public education of  their
choice, extends the equitable access to  public support by all students or permits high quality pro-
grams of unusual cost.  The State Board of Education may not waive any appeal provision in this
chapter or any provision under ORS  338.115 (1)(a) to (aa), 338.120, [ 338.125 (5),] 338.135 (2)(b) or
339.122.
SECTION 31. (1) The amendments to ORS 338.025 and  338.125 by sections 29 and 30 of this
2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2025.
(2) The amendments to  ORS 338.125 by section 29 of this 2025 Act first apply to the
2025-2026 school year.
(3) Notwithstanding the  operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, a stu-
dent is not required  to receive approval from the student’s resident school district before
enrolling in a virtual public charter school that is  not sponsored by the student’s resident
school district before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section if the  en-
rollment is for the 2025-2026 school year or any other subsequent school year.
OPEN ENROLLMENT
SECTION 32.  ORS 339.133 is amended to read:
339.133. (1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Foster care” means substitute care for children placed by the Department of Human
Services or a tribal child welfare agency away  from their parents and for whom the department or
agency has placement and care  responsibility, including placements in foster family homes, foster
homes of  relatives, group homes, emergency shelters, residential facilities, child care institutions and
preadoptive homes.
(B) “Foster care” does  not mean care for children whose parent or guardian voluntarily placed
[37]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the child outside the child’s home with a public  or private agency and for whom the child’s parent
or guardian retains legal guardianship.
(b)(A) “Person in parental relationship” means an adult who has physical custody of an indi-
vidual or resides in the  same household as the individual, interacts with the individual daily, pro-
vides the individual with food, clothing, shelter and incidental necessaries and provides the
individual with necessary care, education and discipline.
(B) “Person in parental relationship” does not  mean a person with a power of attorney or other
written delegation of parental responsibilities if the person does not have other evidence  of a par-
ental relationship.
(c) “School district of origin” means the school district where an individual was a  resident be-
fore:
(A) The individual was placed into foster care; or
(B) The foster care placement of the individual changed.
(d) “School of origin” means the school that an individual attended before:
(A) The individual was placed into foster care; or
(B) The foster care placement of the individual changed.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subsections (3) to  (5) of this section, individuals between the ages
of 4 and 18 shall be considered resident for  school purposes in the school district in which their
parents, their guardians or persons in parental relationship to them reside.
(b) Nonemancipated individuals between the ages  of 4 and 18 living outside the geographic area
of the school district  for such reasons as attending college, military service, hospital confinement
or employment away from home  shall be considered resident in the district in which their parents,
their guardians or persons in parental relationship to them reside.
(c) Individuals living temporarily in a school district for the primary purpose of  attending a
district school may not be considered resident in the district in which they are living temporarily,
but shall be considered  resident in the district in which they, their parents, their guardians or per-
sons in parental relationship to them reside.
(3) Individuals considered legally  emancipated from their parents shall be considered resident
in the district in which they actually reside,  irrespective of the residence of their parents, their
guardians or persons in parental relationship.
(4)(a) An individual who is between the ages of 4 and 21 and who is placed  in foster care shall
be considered a resident of:
(A) The school district of origin; or
(B) The school district where  the individual resides due to placement by the Department of
Human Services or a tribal child welfare agency if a juvenile court determines it is not in  the best
interest of the individual to  continue attending the school of origin or any other school in the school
district of origin, based on consideration of all factors relating to the individual’s best interests.
(b) If a juvenile court makes a determination that it is not in the  best interest of the individual
to continue attending  the school of origin, the individual shall be immediately enrolled in a new
school, even if the individual is unable to produce records normally required for enrollment.
(c) Individuals who  are residents of their school district of origin pursuant to paragraph (a)(A)
of this subsection shall:
(A) Remain in the individual’s school district of origin and, if applicable,  the individual’s school
of origin for the duration of the individual’s time in foster care; and
(B) Be provided, free of  charge, transportation between the individual’s home and the
[38]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
individual’s school district of origin or, if applicable, the individual’s school of origin.
(d) The Department of Education, the Department of Human Services, tribal child  welfare
agencies and school districts shall collaborate to ensure  that the provisions of this subsection are
implemented.
(5)(a) Except  as provided in ORS 327.006 (6) and 335.090, an individual whose legal residence is
not within the district but who attends school in the district is  considered a resident in the district
in which the individual attends school if the individual receives written consent from :
(A) Both of the affected district school boards as provided by policies adopted by the boards[ .];
or
(B) The district school  board for the district in which the school is located as provided
by section 33 of this 2025 Act.
(b) An  individual whose legal residence is not within the district but who attends school in the
district is considered a resident in the district in which the individual attends school if:
(A) The legal residence of the individual had been in the district in which  the individual attends
school before a boundary change was made to the district;
(B) The legal residence of the individual is no longer in  the district in which the individual at-
tends school because of the boundary change; and
(C) The individual has had the same legal residence and has continuously been  enrolled in a
school in the district since the boundary change.
(6)(a) Individuals who are foreign exchange students and who are residing  in Oregon in a
dormitory operated by a school district are considered to  be residents of the school district in which
the dormitory is located.
(b) For the purpose of this subsection:
(A) An individual may not  be considered to be a foreign exchange student for more than one
school year.
(B) An individual may be considered to be a  resident of a school district as provided by this
subsection only if,  for the 2010-2011 school year, the school district had foreign exchange students
who would have been considered residents under the provisions of this subsection.
(C) The number of  individuals who may be considered residents under the provisions of this
subsection may not increase  relative to the number who would have been considered residents under
the provisions of this subsection for the 2010-2011 school year.
(c) As used in this subsection, “foreign exchange student”  means an individual who attends
school in Oregon under a cultural exchange program and whose  parent, guardian or person in par-
ental relationship resides in another country.
SECTION 33.
(1) For purposes of ORS 339.133 (5)(a)(B), a person whose legal  residence is
not within a school district but  who attends a school in the district is considered a resident
of the district in which the person attends the school if the person receives written consent
to attend the  school from the district school board where the school is located, as provided
by this section.
(2)(a) By March 1 of each year, a district school board shall determine whether the school
district will participate in open enrollment as provided by this section. When a school district
participates in open enrollment, the district  school board shall give consent to persons whose
legal residence is not within the school district as provided by this section.
(b) If the district school board will give consent, the board shall  establish standards by
which consent will be given. The standards must:
[39]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) Identify the number of persons to whom consent will be  given for the school year.
The district school board may limit the number of persons to whom  consent will be given
based on school, grade or a combination of school and grade.
(B) Allow persons who live within the boundaries of the school district the first oppor-
tunity to change to a different school in the district if the district school board will  be giving
consent to attend that school to persons who do not reside within the district.
(3) A person seeking consent as provided  by this section must request consent no later
than April 1 prior to  the beginning of the school year for which consent is being requested.
Requests may be submitted before the district school  board makes the determination and
establishes the standards as described in subsection (2) of  this section, but may not be con-
sidered by the board when the board makes the determination and establishes the  standards.
(4)(a) A district school board must give consent to a  person who requests consent unless:
(A) The board decides  to not give consent to any person as allowed by subsection (2) of
this section;
(B) The board decides to limit the number of persons to whom consent will be given  and
does not give consent to the person based on the selection process described in subsection
(5) of this section; or
(C) The board is not required to admit the person, as provided by ORS 339.115 (8).
(b) A district school board may not deny consent or  give priority based on race, religion,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,  ethnicity, national origin, disability, health, terms
of an individualized education program, income level, proficiency in the English  language,
athletic ability, academic records or residence.
(5) If the number of persons seeking consent  exceeds the number of persons to whom the
district school board has  determined will be given consent, the board shall give consent based
on an equitable lottery selection process.  The process may give priority to persons who have
siblings currently enrolled in a  school of the school district, but in no event may a sibling
be given priority to any open spot in  the schools of the school district over any person who
resides within the school district.
(6)(a) If a person is  considered a resident of the school district as provided by this section
and the person has expressed an  interest in attending the schools of another school district
before the end  of the school year, the school district shall meet with the person and en-
courage the person to continue to attend the schools of the school district for the  remainder
of the school year.
(b) If a  person is considered a resident of the school district as provided by this section,
the school district may not encourage or require the person to attend the schools of another
school district as a condition of avoiding a disciplinary measure, including suspension  or ex-
pulsion.
(7)(a) Except as provided by paragraphs  (b) and (c) of this subsection, a person who re-
ceives consent  and who is considered a resident of a district as provided by this section shall
be considered a resident  of the district for all educational purposes. A person who is con-
sidered a resident of the district as provided by this section shall continue  to be considered
a resident of the district until the person:
(A) Graduates from high school;
(B) Is no longer required to be admitted to the schools  of the school district under ORS
339.115; or
[40]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Enrolls in a school in a different school district.
(b) A school district is not  required to provide transportation outside the boundaries of
the district to  a person who is considered a resident of the district as provided by this sec-
tion, except that a district:
(A) Must allow persons who are considered residents of the  district as provided by this
section to use existing bus routes and transportation services of the  district. Costs incurred
for transportation provided under this subparagraph are considered approved transportation
costs for  purposes of ORS 327.013, except for costs incurred for providing transportation
solely to persons who are considered residents of the district as  provided by this section if
the transportation is provided:
(i) Outside the boundaries of the district; and
(ii) For the purpose of transporting the persons between home and school.
(B) May provide a stipend for a person who is a member of a  low-income family, as de-
fined in ORS 339.147, in an amount that does not  exceed the district’s average cost per stu-
dent for transportation.
(C) Must provide transportation if required by federal  law.  Costs  incurred for transpor-
tation provided under  this subparagraph are considered approved transportation costs for
purposes of ORS 327.013.
(c) After the first year that a person is considered  a resident of a district as provided
by this section, the district school board may transfer the person to a different school in the
district. Any transfers must be made consistent with district policy and do  not affect the
status of the person as a resident of the district.
(8) A district school board shall provide  written notification of the attendance of a person
who receives consent as provided by this section to the school  district where the legal resi-
dence of the person is  located. The written notification required by this subsection must be
provided no later than May 1 prior to the beginning of the school year  for which consent was
given.
(9) Nothing in this section:
(a) Requires a district school board to give  consent to siblings if the board determines
that consent will not be given to any students for a school year.
(b) Prevents a school district from entering into interagency  agreements to provide ser-
vices to persons who do not reside in  the school district or are not considered residents of
the school district.
(c) Prevents  or otherwise limits a district school board from giving consent to a person
who has received consent  from the district school board for the school district in which the
person resides, as provided by ORS 339.133 (5)(a)(A).
SECTION 34.
 ORS 339.127 is amended to read:
339.127. (1) A district school board that  admits nonresident students by giving consent as de-
scribed in ORS 339.133 [ (5)(a)] (5)(a)(A)  may not consider race, religion, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, ethnicity, national origin, disability, health, whether a student has an individualized
education program, the terms of an individualized education program, income level,  residence, pro-
ficiency in the English language, athletic ability or academic records when:
(a) Determining whether to give consent; or
(b) Establishing any terms of consent.
(2) A district school board that is  considering whether to admit a nonresident student by giving
[41]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
consent may require only the following information prior to deciding whether to give consent:
(a) The name, contact information, date of birth and grade level of the student;
(b) Information about whether  the school district may be prevented or otherwise limited from
providing consent as provided by ORS 339.115 (8);
(c) Information about whether the student may be  given priority as provided by subsection (4)
of this section; and
(d) Information about which schools the student prefers to attend.
(3)(a) A district school board that is considering whether to admit a nonresident student by
giving consent may not:
(A) Request or require any person to provide or have provided  any of the following information
related to a student prior to the district school board deciding whether to  give consent to the stu-
dent:
(i) Information about the  student’s race, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
ethnicity, national origin, disability, health, whether a student has an  individualized education pro-
gram, the terms  of an individualized education program, income level, residence, proficiency in the
English language or athletic ability; or
(ii) Academic records, including eligibility  for or participation in a talented and gifted program
or special education and related services.
(B) Request or require the student to participate in an interview, to  tour any of the schools or
facilities of the school district or to otherwise meet with any representatives of a  school or a school
district prior to the district school board deciding whether to give consent to the student.
(C) Request any information used to supplement the information described in  subsection (2) of
this section prior to deciding whether to give consent to the student.
(b) Nothing in this subsection prevents a student from voluntarily touring  any of the schools or
facilities of a school district or from requesting or receiving any information from  a school or the
school district.
(4)(a) A district  school board that gives consent as described in ORS 339.133 [ (5)(a)] (5)(a)(A)
may limit  the number of students to whom consent is given. The district school board must make
the determination whether to limit the number of students to whom consent is given by an  annual
date established by the board.
(b) If the number of students  seeking consent exceeds any limitations imposed by the district
school board, the board  must give consent to students based on an equitable lottery selection pro-
cess. The process may give priority to students who:
(A) Have siblings currently  enrolled in a school of the same school district for which the student
seeks admission;
(B) Previously had received consent as provided  by subsection (10) of this section because of a
change in legal residence; or
(C) Attended a public  charter school located in the same district for which the student seeks
admission for at least  three consecutive years, completed the highest grade offered by the public
charter  school  and did not enroll in and attend school in another district following completion of
the highest grade offered by the public charter school.
(c) A district school board may revise the  maximum number of students to whom consent will
be given at a time other than the annual date  established by the board if there are no pending ap-
plications for consent.
(5) A district school board that is requested  to give consent to allow a resident student to be
[42]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
admitted by another school district as described in ORS 339.133 [ (5)(a)] (5)(a)(A) may not  consider
race,  religion,  sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ethnicity, national origin, disability, health,
whether a student has an individualized education program, the terms  of an individualized education
program, income level, residence, proficiency in the English language,  athletic ability or academic
records when determining whether to give consent.
(6) If a district school board decides to not  give consent to a student, the board must provide
a written explanation to the student.
(7)(a) For a  nonresident student who receives consent to be admitted to a school district as de-
scribed in ORS 339.133 [ (5)(a)] (5)(a)(A) , a district school board may:
(A) Determine the length of time for which consent is given; and
(B) Revoke  consent for failure to comply with minimum standards for behavior or attendance,
but may not revoke consent for failure to meet standards for academics.
(b) Any limitations in length of time for consent, as allowed under paragraph  (a) of this sub-
section, must be applied consistently among all students to whom consent  is given. The length of
time for which consent is given shall  not be affected by any changes in the legal residence of the
student if the student wishes to continue to attend the schools of the school district.
(c) If consent is revoked as provided by  paragraph (a) of this subsection, a student may not re-
quest consent from the same school district  that revoked the consent for the school year following
the school year in which the consent was revoked.
(8) For a resident student who receives  consent to be admitted to another school district as
described in ORS 339.133  [ (5)(a)] (5)(a)(A) , a district school board may not impose any limitations
on the length of time for which  consent is given to the student. The board may not require the
student to receive consent more than one time to be admitted to the  same school district, regardless
of any time limitations imposed by the district school board under (7)(a)(A) of this section.
(9)(a) A school district that provides consent to nonresident students to  attend the schools of
the school district may not expend moneys received from the State School Fund or as Local Re-
venues, as described in ORS 327.011, to advertise openings for nonresident students if the  adver-
tisements are:
(A) Located outside the boundaries of the school district, including advertisements that are
made by signage or billboards; or
(B) Directed to nonresident students, including:
(i) Advertisements that are targeted to nonresident students through direct  mail or online mar-
keting;
(ii) Television or radio advertisements; or
(iii) Newspaper advertisements, unless the advertisement is  in a newspaper that primarily serves
the residents of the school district.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)(A) of  this subsection, if a school is located outside the
boundaries of the school district, the school district  may advertise openings for nonresident students
on the property of the school.
(c) Nothing in this subsection:
(A) Prohibits a school district from providing information or advertisements  to nonresident stu-
dents if the parents of the students request the information or advertisements.
(B) Prohibits a public charter school from advertising openings.
(10) Notwithstanding any other  provision of this section, a district school board that is re-
quested to give consent as described in ORS 339.133 [ (5)(a)] (5)(a)(A) must give consent  to a student
[43]
HB 3217
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
whose legal residence changes to a different school district:
(a) During the school year, to enable the student to complete the school year in the school dis-
trict; or
(b) During the summer prior to the school year, to enable the student to complete the  school
year following the summer in the school district.
(11) Nothing in this section:
(a) Requires a district school board to admit students for whom priority may be given under
subsection (4)(b) of this section if the board imposes limitations on the number  of students admitted
by consent.
(b) Prevents a district school board from  denying admission to a nonresident student as provided
by ORS 339.115 (8).
(c) Prevents a district school board  from requesting information or giving consent to a student
in the event of:
(A) An emergency to protect the health, safety or welfare of the student; or
(B) A hardship of the student, as determined based on rules adopted  by the State Board of Ed-
ucation.
(d) Prevents  a district school board from establishing minimum standards for behavior and at-
tendance that a student must maintain to remain enrolled in the schools of the school district.
SECTION 35.
(1) Section 33 of this 2025 Act  and the amendments to ORS 339.133 by sec-
tion 32 of this 2025 Act first apply to persons who seek consent for the 2026-2027 school  year.
(2) Nothing in section 33 of this 2025 Act or  the amendments to ORS 339.133 by section
32 of this 2025 Act affects the status  of a person who was considered a resident as provided
by ORS 339.133 (5)(a) prior to the 2026-2027 school year.
UNIT CAPTIONS
SECTION 36. The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this  state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 37. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of  the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[44]