Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 25.020 is amended to read:
25.020. (1) Support payments for or on behalf of any person that are  ordered, registered or filed
under ORS  25.501 to 25.556 or this chapter or ORS chapter 107, 108, 109, 110, 419B or 419C, unless
otherwise authorized by ORS 25.030, shall be made to the Department of Justice as the  state dis-
bursement unit:
(a) During periods for which support is assigned under ORS 412.024, 418.032 or 419B.406;
(b) As provided by rules adopted under ORS 180.345, when public  assistance is provided to a
person who receives or has a right to receive  support payments on the person’s own behalf or on
behalf of another person;
(c) After the assignment of support terminates for as long as amounts assigned remain owing;
(d) For any period during which support enforcement services are provided under ORS 25.080;
(e) When ordered by the court under ORS 419B.400;
(f) When a  support order that is entered or modified on or after January 1, 1994, includes a
provision requiring the obligor to pay support by income withholding; or
(g) When ordered by the court under any other applicable provision of law.
(2)(a) The Department of Justice shall disburse payments, after lawful deduction of fees and in
accordance with applicable statutes and rules, to those persons and entities that are lawfully enti-
tled to receive such payments.
(b) During a period for which support is assigned under  ORS 412.024, for an obligee described
in subsection (1)(b) of this  section, the department shall disburse to the obligee[ , from child support
collected each  month, $50 for each child up to a maximum of $200 per family ] all support collected
each month that is assigned pursuant to ORS 412.024 .
(3)(a) When the administrator is providing support enforcement services under ORS 25.080, the
obligee may enter into an agreement with a collection  agency, as defined in ORS 697.005, for as-
sistance in collecting child support payments.
(b) The collection agency:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 497
HB 3347
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) May provide investigative and location services to the obligee  and disclose relevant infor-
mation from those services to  the administrator for purposes of providing support enforcement ser-
vices under ORS 25.080;
(B) May not charge interest or a  fee for its services exceeding 29 percent of each support pay-
ment received unless the collection agency, if  allowed by the terms of the agreement between the
collection agency and the  obligee, hires an attorney to perform legal services on behalf of the
obligee;
(C) May not  initiate, without written authorization from the administrator, any enforcement
action  relating  to support payments on which support enforcement services are provided by the ad-
ministrator under ORS 25.080; and
(D) Shall include in  the agreement with the obligee a notice printed in type size equal to at least
12-point type that provides information on the fees, penalties,  termination and duration of the
agreement.
(c) The  administrator may use information disclosed by the collection agency to provide support
enforcement services under ORS 25.080.
(4) The Department of Justice may immediately transmit to the obligee payments received  from
any obligor without waiting for payment or clearance of the check or instrument received if the
obligor has not previously tendered any payment by a check or instrument that was not  paid or was
dishonored.
(5) The Department of Justice shall notify each obligor and obligee by mail when support  pay-
ments shall be made to the  department and when the obligation to make payments in this manner
shall cease.
(6)(a) The administrator shall provide information about a child  support account directly to a
party to the support  order regardless of whether the party is represented by an attorney. As used
in this subsection, “information about a child support account” means the:
(A) Date of issuance of the support order.
(B) Amount of the support order.
(C) Dates and amounts of payments.
(D) Dates and amounts of disbursements.
(E) Payee of any disbursements.
(F) Amount of any arrearage.
(G) Source of any collection, to the extent allowed by federal law.
(b) Nothing in this subsection limits the information the administrator may provide by law to  a
party who is not represented by an attorney.
(7) Any pleading for the entry or modification of a support order  must contain a statement that
payment of support under a new or modified order will be by income withholding unless an excep-
tion to payment by income withholding is granted under ORS 25.396.
(8)(a) Except as  provided in paragraphs (d) and (e) of this subsection, a judgment or order es-
tablishing parentage or including a provision concerning support must contain:
(A) The  residence, mailing or contact address, final four digits of the Social Security number,
telephone number and final four digits of the driver license number of each party;
(B) The name, address and telephone number of all employers of each party;
(C) The names and dates of birth of the joint children of the parties; and
(D) Any other information required  by rule adopted by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court
under ORS 1.002.
[2]
HB 3347
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) The judgment or order shall also include notice that the obligor and obligee:
(A) Must inform the court and the administrator in writing  of any change in the information
required by this subsection within 10 days after the change; and
(B) May request that the administrator review the amount of  support ordered after three years,
or such shorter cycle as determined by rule of the Department of Justice, or  at any time upon a
substantial change of circumstances.
(c) The administrator may require of the parties any additional information  that is necessary for
the provision of support enforcement services under ORS 25.080.
(d)(A) Upon a finding, which may be made ex parte, that the health, safety  or liberty of a party
or child would unreasonably be put at risk by  the disclosure of information specified in this sub-
section  or  by the disclosure of other information concerning a child or party to a parentage or
support proceeding or if an existing  order so requires, a court or administrator or administrative
law judge, when the proceeding is administrative, shall order that the information not be  contained
in any document provided to another party or otherwise disclosed to a party other than the state.
(B) The Department of Justice shall adopt rules providing for similar confidentiality for infor-
mation described in  subparagraph (A) of this paragraph that is maintained by an entity providing
support enforcement services under ORS 25.080.
(e) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court may, in consultation with the  Department of Justice,
adopt rules under ORS 1.002 to designate information  specified in this subsection as confidential and
require that the information be submitted through an alternate procedure to ensure that the  infor-
mation is exempt from public disclosure under ORS 192.355.
(9)(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, in  any subsequent child
support enforcement  action, the court or administrator, upon a showing of diligent effort made to
locate the obligor or obligee, may deem due process requirements to be met by  mailing notice to the
last-known residential, mailing or employer address or contact address as provided in ORS 25.085.
(b) Service of an order directing an  obligor to appear in a contempt proceeding is subject to
ORS 33.015 to 33.155.
(10) Subject to ORS  25.030, this section, to the extent it imposes any duty or function upon the
Department of Justice, shall  be deemed to supersede any provisions of ORS 25.501 to 25.556 and ORS
chapters  107, 108, 109, 110, 419A, 419B and 419C that would otherwise impose the same duties or
functions upon the county clerk or the Department of Human Services.
(11) Except as provided for in subsections (12),  (13) and (14) of this section, credit may not be
given for payments  not made to the Department of Justice as required under subsection (1) of this
section.
(12)(a) The Department of Justice shall give credit for payments not made to the department:
(A) When payments are  not assigned to this or another state and the party to whom unpaid
support is owed and the obligor agree in writing  that specific payments were made and should be
credited;
(B) When payments are assigned to another  state and that state verifies that payments not paid
to the department were received by the other state; or
(C) As provided by rule adopted under ORS 180.345.
(b) The credit under this subsection may not exceed the current unpaid balance of  support owed
to the party that has agreed in writing that payments were made and should be credited.
(13) An obligor may apply to the Department of Justice for credit for payments made other  than
to the Department of Justice. If the party to whom unpaid support is owed does not provide  the
[3]
HB 3347
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
agreement or verification required by subsection (12) of this section, credit may be given pursuant
to order of an administrative law judge assigned from the Office of Administrative Hearings  after
notice and opportunity to object and be heard are given to both the obligor and the party  to whom
unpaid support is owed.  Notice shall be served upon the party to whom unpaid support is owed as
provided by ORS 25.085. Notice to the obligor may be by regular mail at  the address provided in the
application  for  credit. A hearing conducted under this subsection is a contested case hearing and
ORS 183.413 to 183.470 apply. Any party may seek a hearing de novo in the circuit court.
(14) Nothing in this section precludes the Department of Justice from  giving credit for payments
not made to the department when there has been a judicially determined credit or satisfaction  or
when there has been a satisfaction of support executed by the person to whom support is owed.
(15) The Department of Justice shall adopt rules that:
(a) Direct how  support payments that are made through or credited by the department are to
be applied and, if applicable, disbursed; and
(b) Are consistent with federal regulations.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 412.007 is amended to read:
412.007. (1) The eligibility for and amount  of aid to be granted for any dependent child or rela-
tive pursuant to ORS 412.006 shall be determined, in accordance with the rules of the  Department
of Human Services, taking into account:
(a) The  income, resources and maintenance available to such child and relative from whatever
source derived, allowable deductions and the statewide income and payment standards.
(b) The income and financial condition of the stepparent, if any,  of the child for whom aid is
sought.
(2) Subsection (1)(b) of this section is not intended to relieve any parent of any legal obligation
with respect to the support of the natural or adopted children of the parent.
(3) In determining the eligibility for and amount of aid to be granted under  subsection (1) of this
section and under ORS 411.070, the department shall disregard:
(a) From income, [ no less than $50 of the amount of child support  received for each child per
month, up to a total of $200 or the maximum established by federal law, for the  family ] all child and
spousal support that is paid to the family ;
(b) As resources, moneys held in a pension or retirement account; and
(c) Any earnings or other income or resources of the family as the department may prescribe
by rule.
(4) As used in this section, “pension and retirement account” includes:
(a) Benefits employees receive only when they retire or leave employment;
(b) Pension, profit-sharing and stock bonus plans exempt from  taxation by section 401 of the
Internal Revenue Code;
(c) Qualified annuities exempt  from taxation by section 403(a) or (b) of the Internal Revenue
Code;
(d) Accounts or annuities  exempt from taxation by section 408(a), (b), (c), (k), (p) or (q) of the
Internal Revenue Code;
(e) Roth individual retirement plans authorized by section 408A of the Internal Revenue Code;
(f) Retirement plans offered by governments, nonprofit organizations or unions that are:
(A) Exempt from taxation under section 457(b) or 501(c)(18) of the Internal Revenue Code; or
(B) Contributions to the Thrift Savings Fund authorized by 5 U.S.C. 8439; and
(g) Defined contribution plan accounts described in ORS 178.210.
[4]
HB 3347
1
[5]