Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Cost of compliance” means the economic impact on members  of the public and
businesses calculated in accordance with ORS 183.335 (2)(b)(E).
(b) “State agency” means any state board, commission, department or division authorized
by law to adopt rules except those in the legislative or judicial branches.
(2) A state agency shall include in its request budget under ORS 291.208 and shall  report
to the Legislative Fiscal Officer the total cost of compliance  of the agency’s rules that are
expected to be in effect  on January 1 of the next calendar year. The Governor shall include
the cost of compliance reported for each agency in the  Governor’s budget under ORS 291.216.
(3) A  state agency may not adopt, amend or repeal a rule during the biennium that begins
on July 1 of the year following the  release of the Governor’s budget report if the adoption,
amendment or  repeal of the rule will increase the total cost of compliance above the amount
reported in the Governor’s budget report unless:
(a) The state agency has offset the excess cost by reducing the cost of compliance with
respect to other specifically identified rules or regulatory requirements; or
(b) An  amount equal to the amount of the excess cost is included in the legislatively ap-
proved budget as defined in ORS 291.002.
SECTION 2. (1) Any person may challenge an agency’s  fiscal impact statement described
in ORS  183.335 (2)(b)(E) or the statement of cost of compliance effect on small businesses
described in ORS 183.336 by filing a petition as provided in ORS 183.484.
(2) If the court finds, based on a preponderance of the evidence, that  the actual fiscal
impact or cost  of compliance on the public or small businesses exceeds the fiscal impact or
cost of compliance reported in ORS 183.335 (2)(b)(E)  or 183.336 the court shall award the
petitioner:
(a) An amount equal to 50 percent of the difference between the actual fiscal impact or
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1787
SB 628
1
2
3
cost of compliance and the fiscal impact or cost of compliance reported by the agency; and
(b) The petitioner’s reasonable costs and attorney fees.
[2]