Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon State Board of Nursing shall convene an advisory committee
to provide advice and specific  recommendations for legislation and policy development on
nursing education.
(2) The advisory committee shall study, identify and  describe the challenges regarding
staff shortages in the  nursing education field and make specific recommendations to address
those challenges.
(3) The board shall appoint to the advisory committee 13 members who include at least:
(a) One member who has a background in academia related to nursing education;
(b) One member who represents the Oregon Health and Science University;
(c) One member who is employed by a hospital as a nurse;
(d) One member who is a nursing home administrator licensed under ORS 678.710  to
678.820;
(e) One member who represents a statewide association that represents nurses;
(f) One member who is a faculty member at a public  university listed in ORS 352.002 and
who has experience in nursing education;
(g) One member who is a faculty member  at an Oregon-based, generally accredited,
nonprofit private institution of higher education and who has experience in  nursing educa-
tion; and
(h) One member  who is a faculty member at an Oregon-based community college and who
has experience in nursing education.
(4)(a) All members  appointed under subsection (3) of this section must be knowledgeable
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4119
HB 3902
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
about the field of nursing education.
(b) The members  of the advisory committee appointed under subsection (3) of this section
who are nurses must be licensed under ORS 678.010 to 678.410 and in good standing.
(5) The advisory committee appointed under subsection (3) of this section shall:
(a) Study and investigate the challenges regarding staff shortages in the nursing educa-
tion field, including compensation of nursing educators.
(b) Make  findings and develop specific recommendations for legislation and policy devel-
opment to address staff  shortages in the nursing education field, including recommendations
on nurse educator compensation.
(c) Submit, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, a report with the advisory
committee’s findings and specific recommendations developed under this subsection to the
board and to the interim committees  of the Legislative Assembly related to health care no
later than March 15, 2026.
(6) The board shall provide the support staff necessary for the  advisory committee to
accomplish its duties under this section.
(7) The board shall dissolve the advisory committee convened under subsection (3)  of this
section no later than  March 31, 2026. If there is a vacancy for any cause, the board shall
make an appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
SECTION 2.
(1) After the advisory committee convened under section 1 of this 2025 Act
has been dissolved pursuant to section 1 (7)  of this 2025 Act, the Oregon State Board of
Nursing shall convene an advisory committee to provide advice and  specific recommen-
dations for legislation and policy development on nursing workforce  recruitment and re-
tention.
(2) The advisory committee shall  study, identify and describe the challenges regarding
nursing workforce recruitment and retention and make specific recommendations to address
those challenges.
(3) The board shall appoint to the advisory committee 13 members who include at least:
(a) One member who is employed by a hospital as a nurse;
(b) One member who is employed by an urgent care center as a nurse;
(c) One member who is employed by an outpatient clinic as a nurse;
(d) One member who is employed by a long term care facility as a nurse;
(e) One member who is employed as a licensed practical nurse;
(f) One member who is employed as a certified nursing assistant;
(g) One member who represents a statewide association that represents nurses;
(h) One  member who represents a statewide association that represents emergency
nurses;
(i) One member who is a faculty member at a public university listed  in ORS 352.002 and
who has experience in nursing education;
(j) One member who is a faculty member at an  Oregon-based, generally accredited,
nonprofit private institution  of higher education and who has experience in nursing educa-
tion; and
(k) One member  who is a faculty member at an Oregon-based community college and who
has experience in nursing education.
(4) A member appointed under section 1 of this 2025  Act is eligible for appointment to the
advisory committee convened under this section.
[2]
HB 3902
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
(5) The members of the  advisory committee appointed under subsection (3) of this section
who are nurses must be licensed under ORS 678.010 to 678.410 and in good standing.
(6) The advisory committee appointed under subsection (3) of this section shall:
(a) Study  and investigate the challenges regarding nursing workforce recruitment and
retention, including compensation for nurses.
(b) Make  findings and develop specific recommendations for legislation and policy devel-
opment to address recruitment and retention challenges in the nursing workforce, including
recommendations on nurse compensation.
(c) Submit, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, a report with the advisory
committee’s findings and specific recommendations developed under this subsection to the
board and to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to health care no
later than December 15, 2026.
(7) In fulfilling its duties under this section, the advisory  committee shall consider the
issues raised in the 2022 report on addressing staff shortages in the nursing field  that was
submitted to the Legislative Assembly pursuant  to section 10, chapter 38, Oregon Laws 2022,
and provide specific recommendations for legislation and policy development to address those
issues.
(8) The board shall  provide the support staff necessary for the advisory committee to
accomplish its duties under this section.
(9) If there is a vacancy to  the advisory committee convened under subsection (3) of this
section for any cause, the  board shall make an appointment to become immediately effective
for the unexpired term.
SECTION 3.
Sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act are repealed on June 2, 2027.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]