Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of  Early Learning and Care shall study the policies and
practices in this state for the suspension or expulsion of children in early childhood  care.
The department shall submit a report in the manner provided by  ORS 192.245, and may in-
clude recommendations for  legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assem-
bly related to child care no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4497