Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of State Lands shall conduct a  study of funding options for
marine cleanup, including removal of abandoned and derelict vessels. The department  shall
submit a report of its findings to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related
to the use of the state’s public waterways in  the manner provided under ORS 192.245 no later
than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 295