Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a  part of ORS 443.400 to
443.455.
SECTION 2. (1) From October 1 through March 1 of each year, a residential care facility,
including a facility with a memory care  endorsement under ORS 443.886 and an assisted liv-
ing facility, shall make available to residents  at least one on-site vaccine clinic. The clinic
shall administer vaccines for at least the following diseases:
(a) Influenza;
(b) COVID-19; and
(c) Pneumonia.
(2) A resident has a right, but is not required, to participate in a vaccine clinic.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4022