Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 197.
SECTION 2. A local government may not adopt  or enforce any land use regulation or
other ordinance, and a state  agency may not adopt any rule other than regulations adopted
pursuant to the  state building code for the purposes provided in ORS 455.020, that has the
effect of:
(1) Prohibiting the installation or use of natural gas in existing or  new residential or
commercial buildings;
(2) Prohibiting the installation of natural gas infrastructure serving  lands zoned to allow
for residential or commercial uses; or
(3) Otherwise limiting the access, installation or use of any energy  options in existing or
new residential or commercial buildings.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1022