Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “pilot  program airports” means Burns Municipal
Airport and La Grande/Union County Airport.
(2) The Oregon  Department of Emergency Management shall maintain the following ve-
hicle fleets for use at pilot program airports:
(a) A fleet of vehicles capable of transporting aviation fuel, including  Jet A and low lead
fuels, to and between pilot program airports;
(b) A fleet of vehicles appropriate for transporting aviation personnel, including  pilots
and crew members, to and between pilot program airports; and
(c) A fleet of airport refuel trucks capable of transferring aviation  fuel from storage to
aircraft.
(3) The department shall  identify and procure vehicles appropriate for the functions de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section. The department shall stage  the vehicles at appro-
priate locations throughout this state such that the department can deploy the vehicles when
necessary to augment existing  resources at pilot program airports for firefighting purposes.
The department shall retain ownership of the vehicles and shall be responsible for ongoing
maintenance of the vehicles.
(4) As soon as practicable  after procurement of the vehicles, the department shall enter
into contracts, memoranda of understanding  or other agreements with owners or operators
of pilot program airports that govern the use of the vehicles.
(5) The department may adopt rules necessary for the administration of this section.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1639
HB 3132
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ated to the Oregon Department of  Emergency Management, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $___ to carry out the provisions of section
1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 823.012 is amended to read:
823.012. (1) If the Director of Transportation determines that an emergency, as defined  in ORS
401.025, has occurred or is imminent, or when authority  relating to a conflagration is exercised
pursuant to ORS 476.510 to 476.610,  the director may suspend operation of one or more of the
following statutes involving motor carriers for the purpose of expediting the  movement of persons
or property:
(a) ORS 818.400, compliance with commercial vehicle enforcement  requirements related to com-
mercial vehicle weight, size, load, conformation or equipment.
(b) ORS 825.100, certificate or permit  requirement for commercial transportation of persons or
property.
(c) ORS  825.104, registration requirement for for-hire or private carrier engaged in interstate
operations.
(d) ORS 825.160,  requirement for person operating as motor carrier to have policy of public li-
ability and property damage insurance.
(e) ORS 825.162, requirement for person operating as for-hire carrier of freight or  express to
have cargo insurance.
(f) ORS 825.250, requirement to stop and submit to an inspection of the  driver, the cargo or the
vehicle or combination of vehicles.
(g) ORS 825.252, safety regulations for for-hire and private carriers.
(h) ORS 825.258, rules for transportation of hazardous waste, hazardous material and PCB.
(i) ORS 825.450, weight identifiers issued by Department of Transportation.
(j) ORS 825.470, temporary pass for single trip or short-time operation of vehicle.
(k) ORS 825.474, assessment of tax for use of highways.
(L) ORS 826.031, registration of certain vehicles not already registered with state.
(2) A suspension under this section  may occur prior to a declaration of a state of emergency
under ORS 401.165, but may not exceed 72 hours unless a state of emergency is declared under  ORS
401.165. If a state of emergency is declared under  ORS 401.165, the suspension shall last until the
state of emergency is terminated as provided under ORS 401.204.
(3) The director may designate by rule a  line of succession of deputy directors or other em-
ployees of the department who may suspend operations of  statutes under this section in the event
the director is not available.  Any suspension by a person designated by the director under this
subsection has the  same force and effect as if issued by the director, except that, if the director can
be reached, the  suspension must be affirmed by the director when the director is reached. If the
director does not set aside  a suspension within 24 hours of being reached, the suspension shall be
considered affirmed by the director.
(4) A  suspension under this section may apply to geographic areas other than the area
in which the emergency or  conflagration occurs if the suspension applying to such areas is
reasonably necessary to address the emergency or conflagration.
SECTION 4.
(1) Members  of the Oregon National Guard, as described in ORS 396.105, and
the Oregon Civil Defense Force, as described in ORS 399.035,  are authorized to transport
aviation fuel to and between airports in  this state for firefighting purposes if the Director
of the Oregon Department of Emergency Management determines  that such transportation
[2]
HB 3132
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
is necessary due to an insufficiency of commercial carriers.
(2) Nothing in this section suspends or nullifies generally applicable statutes, rules  or
regulations relating to transportation of aviation fuel.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Oregon Department of Emergency Management shall issue grants
to owners or operators of pilot program airports to be used for capital  projects to increase
the capacity of the airports  to store aviation fuel, including Jet A and low lead fuels, or other
infrastructure projects to improve the firefighting capacity of the airports.
(2) Owners or operators of pilot  program airports shall submit plans to the department
for projects funded under this section. The department must  approve a recipient’s plans be-
fore issuing a grant to the recipient under this section.
(3) As used in  this section, “pilot program airports” has the meaning given that term in
section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 6. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Emergency Management, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $___ to carry out the provisions of section
5 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7. Section 5 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2029.
SECTION 8. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[3]