Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “eligible project” means a project for which  a
school district would  be entitled to a tax credit described in section 6417(b) of the Internal
Revenue Code.
(2) The Department of Education shall  provide technical support to school districts to
plan and develop eligible projects. Technical support may  include, but need not be limited
to:
(a) Identifying potential eligible projects within school districts;
(b) Ensuring that a school district  meets all requirements for the tax credit applicable
to the eligible project;
(c) Assistance with prefiling registration and otherwise ensuring that  the school district
is able to  make the elective payment election described in section 6417(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code; and
(d) Assistance with any applicable tax schedules or forms.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2030.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $ , which may be expended  for the purpose of carrying
out section 1 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2238