Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section,  “high-quality child care” means child care that
meets the minimum standards established under the tiered quality rating and  improvement
system developed by the Office of Child Care under ORS 329A.261.
(2) The Early Learning Division shall develop a pilot program in a rural area  of this state
experiencing child care provider shortages. Notwithstanding ORS 329A.500  (2), the pilot pro-
gram shall reimburse child care providers for the cost of providing high-quality child care,
as determined by the division under subsection (3) of this section.  The purpose of the pilot
program is to determine whether paying  child care providers based on the cost of providing
high quality child care rather than a percentage of the market rate will  provide incentives
for more child care providers to offer child care to employment-related child care subsidy
recipients.
(3) No later than January 1, 2020, the division shall  develop a cost modeling system to
determine the cost of providing  high-quality child care for purposes of determining re-
imbursement rates under this section.
(4) The division shall submit an annual report on the outcomes  of the pilot program to
an appropriate interim committee of the Legislative Assembly no later than January 1.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 329A.500 is amended to read:
329A.500. (1) The  Department of Human Services, in consultation with the Early Learning Di-
vision and  the Office of Child Care, shall adopt rules for the operation of subsidy programs for
employment-related child care administered by  the department. At a minimum, and taking into ac-
count the availability of funds, the rules must provide the following:
(a) Subsidy recipients may  be entitled to receive the subsidy for at least one year, regardless
of changes in employment. Rules adopted by the department may provide for termination  of subsidy
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2317
HB 2348
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
eligibility for reasons other than changes in employment during the one-year period. Exit eligibility
and copays must  be structured to mitigate the financial impact of reduced subsidy support due to
increased income.
(b) Subsidy recipients who are enrolled in coursework, as defined by the department  by rule,
may be entitled to receive the subsidy to enable the subsidy recipient to attend and  participate in
the coursework provided all other eligibility requirements are met.
(c) Persons who are self-employed may qualify for subsidy programs provided  all other eligibility
requirements are met.
(d) Subsidy recipients who voluntarily choose child care providers that meet minimum  standards
established under the tiered quality rating and improvement system  implemented under ORS
329A.261 may qualify for lower copayments. A fair  representation of the subsidy recipients who
qualify for lower copayments must be persons with children who are  from underserved racial, ethnic
or minority populations. [ In addition, child care providers  that meet specified minimum standards es-
tablished under the tiered quality rating and improvement system may receive an  enhanced reimburse-
ment under the subsidy programs. ]
(e) Subsidy recipients must report a change of child care provider  to the department during the
period a subsidy is being received.
(2) The department shall :
(a) Work to  meet federal recommendations for income eligibility and market access in regard
to employment-related child care administered by the department[ .];
(b) Set reimbursement rates for child care providers at 75 percent of  the department’s
most recent market rate study;
(c) Contract  with child care providers to provide off-hour child care in counties in this
state where no more than 10 percent  of children zero to three years of age have access to
child care; and
(d) Reduce subsidy recipient copayments to no more than  10 percent of household income
with a copayment target of seven percent of household income.
SECTION 3.
There is appropriated to the Early  Learning Division, for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $_______ for the purpose  of
carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated to the Department of  Human Services, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund,  the amount of $_______ for the
purpose of carrying out the provisions of ORS 329A.500, as  amended by section 2 of this 2019
Act.
SECTION 5. The initial report described in section  1 of this 2019 Act is due no later than
January 1, 2020.
SECTION 6. Section 1 of this 2019 Act is repealed on January 2, 2022.
SECTION 7. (1) Section 1 of this 2019 Act and the amendments to ORS 329A.500 by  sec-
tion 2 of this 2019 Act become operative on January 1, 2020.
(2) The Department  of Human Services and the Early Learning Division may take any
action before the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary
for the department and the division to  exercise, on and after the operative date specified in
subsection (1) of this section, all of the functions and powers conferred on  the department
and the division by section 1  of this 2019 Act and the amendments to ORS 329A.500 by section
2 of this 2019 Act.
[2]
HB 2348
1
2
3
4
SECTION 8. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2019.
[3]