Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used  in this section, “Willamette River Channel Maintenance Group”
means the intergovernmental entity established under ORS chapter 190  by Linn County, Polk
County, Yamhill County and other public bodies, as defined in ORS 174.109.
(2) The Legislative Assembly finds that the  Willamette River between river mile 50 and
river mile 187 has not been maintained since 1976. However, an analysis  of the benefits of
maintenance of the Willamette River between river mile  50 and river mile 165 was authorized
by section 1, chapter 1068, Oregon Laws 1999.
(3) The State  Parks and Recreation Department may enter into an agreement with the
Willamette River Channel Maintenance Group  for maintenance on the Willamette River from
river mile 50 to river mile 187 for the purposes of improving  river navigability and safety,
improving marine access to public parks, landings and other  accesses and encouraging
tourism and transportation.
(4) In addition to any  powers of the Willamette River Channel Maintenance Group es-
tablished under the intergovernmental agreement creating  the group, the group may con-
tract with any person or public body, as defined in ORS 174.109, to perform maintenance for
the purposes described in subsection (3) of  this section. The group shall ensure that any
person or public body engaged in  performing maintenance for those purposes obtains all re-
quired local, state and federal authorizations, permits or approvals.
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding ORS 390.134, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2017, the
State Parks and Recreation Department may allocate up  to $3 million from the State Parks
and Recreation Department Fund to the Willamette River Channel Maintenance  Group to
perform maintenance for the purposes described in section 1 of this 2017 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1058