Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) A unit  of local government may not adopt or enforce any ordinance, rule
or regulation or take any other actions that prohibit or limit the  residential use of natural
gas as an energy source.
(2) Nothing in subsection (1) of  this section shall limit the authority of a local govern-
ment to adopt or enforce a local ordinance, rule or  regulation or take other actions strictly
necessary to comply with:
(a) The Uniform Building Code published by  the International Conference of Building
Officials, as amended and adopted  by the Director of the Department of Consumer and
Business Services;
(b) A uniform fire code; or
(c) Any requirement of a state or federal statute or regulation.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3984