Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “technology  support structure” means a struc-
ture situated above ground that is  necessary for the support and function of cellular, satel-
lite or radio technology.
(2) The  Department of Land Conservation and Development shall conduct a study on
methods to mitigate the impact of technology support  structures on the aesthetics of certain
areas. The study shall:
(a) Identify areas where technology support structures impact the  aesthetics of
waterways, areas zoned for farm or forest use or areas associated with tourism;
(b) Evaluate how the impact of technology support structures  on the aesthetics of the
identified areas affects quality of life and tourism;
(c) Evaluate standards  or processes adopted by other states’ legislatures or judicial de-
cisions that relate to the management of technology support structures  as visual imped-
iments to national and statewide tourism goals;
(d) Develop suggested standards for adoption by  planning commissions and local govern-
ments to mitigate the impact of technology support structures on the aesthetics of the
identified areas; and
(e) Establish a schedule for planning commissions and local  governments to implement
and enforce the standards developed under paragraph (d) of this  subsection no later than
January 1, 2033.
SECTION 2.
The Department of Land Conservation  and Development shall submit a re-
port in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 on the progress of the  study described in section
1 of  this 2025 Act to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to land use
no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1977
HB 2883
1
2
3
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]