Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 243.877, as amended by section 11, chapter 17, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
243.877. Benefit plans offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board that reimburse the  cost
of medical and other health services and supplies must comply with  the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810;
(10) ORS 743A.325; [ and]
(11) ORS 743A.051 (2)(c)[ .]; and
(12) Section 2, chapter 35, Oregon Laws 2024.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 243.877, as amended by sections 11 and 12, chapter 17, Oregon Laws  2024, is
amended to read:
243.877. Benefit plans offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board that reimburse the  cost
of medical and other health services and supplies must comply with  the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3433
HB 3092
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810; [ and]
(10) ORS 743A.325[ .]; and
(11) Section 2, chapter 35, Oregon Laws 2024.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to  ORS 243.877 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to benefit
plans issued, renewed or extended on or after October 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]