Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
CURRICULUM REQUIREMENTS RELATED TO ORAL HEALTH
SECTION 1.
As an integral part  of the health education curriculum for students in
kindergarten through grade 12, each school district must provide age-appropriate  instruction
in oral health.
SECTION 2. (1) Section 1 of this 2020 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2025.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding the operative date set forth  in subsection (1) of this section, the
State Board of Education, no later than September 1, 2024, shall adopt  any health education
content standards necessary to enable  school district compliance with the requirements of
section 1 of this 2020 Act.
(b) For the purpose of adopting health education content  standards as provided by para-
graph (a) of this subsection, the board shall consult with:
(A) Dental health professionals who have experience  working in public health and with
children; and
(B) The dental director appointed by the Oregon Health  Authority, or the director’s
designee.
(3)(a) A school district  must first offer instruction that meets the health education con-
tent standards adopted under subsection (2) of this section no later than the  2025-2026 school
year.
(b) Nothing in paragraph (a) of this subsection prevents a school district from first  of-
fering instruction that meets the requirements of section 1  of this 2020 Act at any time be-
fore the school year set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 22
HB 4127
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
COMMUNITY DENTAL HEALTH COORDINATOR PILOT PROGRAM
SECTION 3.
(1) As used in this section, “community dental health coordinator” means a
dental care team member who:
(a) Focuses on the prevention of dental disease;
(b) Uses  community health worker skills to increase awareness of the importance of oral
health;
(c) May provide oral health services, including sealants and dental screening services;
and
(d) May refer patients to other dental health  care providers and other licensed health
care providers as necessary.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority  shall establish and maintain a Community Dental
Health Coordinator Pilot Program to support school-based  oral health programs through the
deployment of community dental health coordinators.
(3) The pilot program must focus on  the provision of school-based oral health care to
students who are of ethnic or racial minorities and students who  are English language
learners, as defined in ORS 336.079.
(4) The pilot program shall place up to four community  dental health coordinators
throughout the state. The pilot program may place up to two  community dental health co-
ordinators in urban areas of this state and up to two community  dental health coordinators
in rural areas of  this state. The community dental health coordinators may be based at
nonprofit organizations, county health departments or local public health authorities,  as de-
fined in ORS 431.003.
(5) The Oregon Health  Authority shall apply to the United States Health Resources and
Services Administration for funding to support the  pilot program. The authority may seek
additional sources of funding as necessary from public and private entities  and may accept
gifts, grants and contributions for  the purposes of carrying out the pilot program described
in this section. Funds received under this subsection shall be deposited in the  Community
Dental Health Coordinator Pilot Program Fund established under section 4 of this 2020 Act.
(6) The Oregon Health Authority may adopt rules as necessary  to carry out this section.
SECTION 4.
The Community Dental Health Coordinator  Pilot Program Fund is estab-
lished in the State Treasury, separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Interest earned
by the Community Dental Health  Coordinator Pilot Program Fund shall be credited to the
fund. The moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated  to the Oregon Health Authority
for the purposes described in section 3 of this 2020 Act.
SECTION 5. Sections 3 and 4 of this 2020 Act are repealed on January 2, 2022.
SECTION 6. (1) Sections 3 and 4 of this 2020 Act become operative on January 1, 2021.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may take any  action before the operative date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable the authority to exercise, on and
after the operative date specified in  subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the authority by sections 3 and 4 of this 2020 Act.
SCHOOL-BASED ORAL HEALTH CARE COORDINATION
BY COORDINATED CARE ORGANIZATIONS
[2]
HB 4127
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
SECTION 7.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Coordinated care organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(b) “Global budget” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority may not  reduce a global budget or deny reimbursement
for the costs claimed by a coordinated care organization to provide care coordination or
other social services relating to improving access for students to school-based oral  health
services.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 8.
The unit captions used in this 2020 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader  and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2020 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 9. This 2020 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2020 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[3]