Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 352.002 is amended to read:
352.002. The following are established as public universities in the State of Oregon:
(1) University of Oregon.
(2) Oregon State University.
(3) Portland State University.
(4) Oregon Institute of Technology.
(5) Western Oregon University.
(6) Southern Oregon University.
(7) Eastern Oregon University.
(8) Central Oregon University.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 352.011 is amended to read:
352.011. (1) As used in this  section, “professional doctoral degree” means a first professional
degree, excluding a Doctor of Philosophy degree, that:
(a) Represents a category of qualifications in a professional subject  area that requires students
to have previously completed specified undergraduate coursework or obtained previous undergradu-
ate degrees before enrolling in the professional doctoral degree granting program; and
(b) Is  awarded upon completion of a program that provides the knowledge and skills for the re-
cognition, credential or license required for professional practice.
(2) Western Oregon University, Southern Oregon University , [ and] Eastern  Oregon University
and Central Oregon University  are established as comprehensive universities that offer a full
range of baccalaureate programs and graduate programs through  the master’s degree and the pro-
fessional doctoral degree.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 352.054 is amended to read:
352.054. (1) A governing board is established for each of the following public universities:
(a) University of Oregon;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3166
HB 2665
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Portland State University;
(c) Oregon State University;
(d) Eastern Oregon University;
(e) Oregon Institute of Technology;
(f) Southern Oregon University; [ and]
(g) Western Oregon University ; and
(h) Central Oregon University .
(2)(a) The University  of Oregon governing board shall be known as the Board of Trustees of the
University of Oregon.
(b) The Portland State University governing board shall be known as the Board of Trustees  of
Portland State University.
(c) The Oregon State University governing board shall be known as the  Board of Trustees of
Oregon State University.
(d) The Eastern Oregon University governing board shall  be known as the Board of Trustees
of Eastern Oregon University.
(e) The  Oregon Institute of Technology governing board shall be known as the Board of Trustees
of the Oregon Institute of Technology.
(f) The Southern Oregon University  governing board shall be known as the Board of Trustees
of Southern Oregon University.
(g) The Western Oregon University governing board shall be known as the Board of Trustees
of Western Oregon University.
(h) The Central  Oregon University governing board shall be known as the Board of
Trustees of Central Oregon University.
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding the operative date set forth in section 7 of this 2025 Act,
not later than November  30, 2025, the Governor shall appoint all of the members of the Board
of Trustees of Central Oregon University in the manner set forth  in ORS 352.076 so that the
appointees may be confirmed by the Senate in the manner provided in ORS 171.562 and
171.565 by March 1, 2026.
SECTION 5.
The Board of Trustees of Oregon  State University shall continue to have
jurisdiction over the operations of Oregon State University - Cascades through June  30, 2026.
However, the Board of Trustees of  Central Oregon University shall propose funding requests
pursuant to ORS 350.090  and 352.089, and shall prepare budgets, in cooperation with the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2027.
SECTION 6. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, all persons employed by
Oregon State University on the operative date specified in section 7 of this  2025 Act and
whose job functions pertain  to Oregon State University - Cascades shall continue their em-
ployment with Central Oregon University and shall retain any seniority, contractual rights
or tenure granted prior to the  operative date specified in section 7 of this 2025 Act. Nothing
in this section shall affect any term or condition of  any collective bargaining agreement in
effect on the operative date specified in section 7 of this 2025 Act.
(2) All of the duties, functions, powers and lawfully incurred rights and obligations of the
Board of Trustees of Oregon State University that  pertain to Oregon State University -Cas-
cades are  transferred to and vested in the Board of Trustees of Central Oregon University.
The transfer shall include all applicable contractual rights and obligations and title to all
applicable records, property, supplies and materials, including equipment,  books and papers.
[2]
HB 2665
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
For the purpose  of succession to these rights and obligations, the Board of Trustees of
Central Oregon University is considered to be a continuation of the Board  of Trustees of
Oregon State University and not a new authority, and the  Board of Trustees of Central
Oregon University  must exercise such rights and fulfill such obligations as if they had not
been assigned or transferred, except as otherwise provided by law.
(3) All unexpended moneys, including General Fund appropriations, gifts,  bequests, other
funds, assessments, liability and workers’ compensation reserves and  premiums that are
appropriated or allocated to, held, managed or invested by or on behalf of or  otherwise
available to Oregon State University - Cascades, are  appropriated, allocated and transferred
to Central Oregon University.
(4) Central Oregon University shall conduct and complete any proceeding,  prosecution
or other matter that Oregon State University -  Cascades commenced before, and is pending
on, the operative date specified in section 7 of this 2025 Act.
(5) The transfer of duties, functions and powers to the Board of Trustees of Central
Oregon University or to Central Oregon University does not affect any action, suit or  pro-
ceeding relating to Oregon State University - Cascades, except that Central Oregon Univer-
sity shall be substituted for Oregon State University in any such action, suit or proceeding.
(6) Any action, proceeding or other  matter that pertains to Oregon State University -
Cascades, that was commenced by a state agency, a state  officer, the Board of Trustees of
Oregon State University or an officer  or employee of Oregon State University before the
operative date specified in section 7 of this 2025 Act and relates to the  Board of Trustees of
Oregon State University or to Oregon State  University - Cascades and is still pending on the
operative date specified in section 7 of this 2025 Act shall be conducted and completed by the
Board of Trustees of Central Oregon University or by Central Oregon University.
(7) Nothing in sections 4 to 6 of this 2025 Act or  the amendments to ORS 352.002, 352.011
and 352.054 by  sections 1 to 3 of this 2025 Act relieves any person, public entity or private
entity of any obligation with respect to a tax, fee, fine or  other charge, interest, penalty,
forfeiture, rule, policy, document, record or proceeding.
(8)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the lawfully adopted standards
and policies of Oregon State University pertaining to Oregon State University - Cascades that
are in effect on the operative date specified in section 7 of this  2025 Act continue in effect
until lawfully superseded or repealed by the standards or policies of the Board of  Trustees
of Central Oregon University.
(b) References in standards or policies described in paragraph (a)  of this subsection to
Oregon State University, the Board of Trustees of  Oregon State University or an employee
of Oregon State University are considered to be references  to Central Oregon University, the
Board of Trustees  of Central Oregon University or an employee of Central Oregon Univer-
sity.
SECTION 7.
(1) Section 6 of this 2025 Act and the  amendments to ORS 352.002, 352.011
and 352.054 by sections 1 to 3 of this 2025 Act become operative on July 1, 2026.
(2) The Board  of Trustees of Oregon State University, the Board of Trustees of Central
Oregon University and Central Oregon University may take any action before the operative
date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is  necessary for the Board of Trustees
of Oregon State University, the Board of Trustees of Central Oregon University and  Central
Oregon University to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of
[3]
HB 2665
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
this section, all of the  duties, functions and powers conferred on the Board of Trustees of
Oregon State University, the Board of Trustees  of Central Oregon University and Central
Oregon University by section  6 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 352.002, 352.011
and 352.054 by sections 1 to 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[4]