Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $8,337,637 to be expended for the CASA Vol-
unteer Program, as defined in ORS 419A.004, to recruit, train and supervise a larger  and
more diverse group of court appointed special advocates, as defined in ORS 419A.004.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2162