Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 90.425 is amended to read:
90.425. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Current market value” means the amount in cash, as  determined by the county assessor,
that could reasonably be expected to be paid for a manufactured dwelling or floating home  by an
informed buyer  to an informed seller, each acting without compulsion in an arm’s-length transaction
occurring on the assessment  date for the tax year or on the date of a subsequent reappraisal by the
county  assessor.
(b) “Dispose of the personal property” means that, if reasonably appropriate, the  landlord may
throw away the property or may give it without consideration to  a nonprofit organization or to a
person unrelated to the landlord. The landlord may not  retain the property for personal use or
benefit.
(c) “Goods” includes those goods  left inside a recreational vehicle, manufactured dwelling or
floating home or left upon the rental  space outside a recreational vehicle, manufactured dwelling
or floating home,  whether the recreational vehicle, dwelling or home is located inside or outside of
a facility.
(d) “Lienholder” means any lienholder  of an abandoned  vehicle, including a  recreational vehi-
cle, manufactured dwelling or floating home, if the  [ lien is of record or the ] lienholder is actually
known to the landlord[ .] or the lien takes the form of:
[(e) “Of record” means: ]
(A) For  a [ recreational] vehicle , [that is not more than eight and one-half feet wide, that ] a security
interest that has been properly recorded  with the Department of Transportation pursuant to ORS
802.200 (1)(a)(A) and 803.097.
(B) For a  manufactured dwelling or recreational vehicle , [that is more than eight and one-half feet
wide, that ] a  security interest that has been properly recorded for the manufactured dwelling or
recreational vehicle in the records of the  Department of Consumer and Business Services pursuant
to ORS 446.611 or on a certificate of title issued by the Department of Transportation.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3129
HB 3371
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) For a  floating home, [ that] a security interest that has been properly recorded with the State
Marine Board pursuant to ORS 830.740  to 830.755 for a home registered and titled with the board
pursuant to ORS 830.715.
[(f)] (e) “Owner” means  any owner of an abandoned [ recreational] vehicle, manufactured dwelling
or floating home, if different from the tenant and either of record or actually known  to the landlord.
[(g)] (f)(A)  “Personal property” means goods,  vehicles and recreational vehicles and includes
manufactured dwellings and floating homes not located in a facility.
(B) “Personal property” does not include manufactured dwellings and floating homes  located in
a facility and therefore subject to being stored, sold or disposed of as provided under ORS 90.675.
(2) A  landlord is responsible for abandoned personal property and shall store, sell or dispose of
abandoned personal property as provided by this section. This section governs  the rights and obli-
gations of landlords, tenants and any lienholders or  owners in any personal property abandoned or
left upon the premises by the tenant or any lienholder or owner in the following circumstances:
(a) The tenancy has ended by termination or expiration of a rental agreement  or by
relinquishment or abandonment of  the premises and the landlord reasonably believes under all the
circumstances that the tenant has left the personal property upon the  premises with no intention
of asserting any further claim to the premises or to the personal property;
(b) The tenant has been absent from the premises continuously  for seven days after termination
of a tenancy by a court order that has not been executed; or
(c) The landlord receives possession of the premises from the sheriff following  restitution pur-
suant to ORS 105.161.
(3) Prior  to storing, selling or disposing of the tenant’s personal property under this section, the
landlord must give a written notice to the tenant that must be:
(a) Personally delivered to the tenant; or
(b) Sent by first class mail addressed and mailed to the tenant at:
(A) The premises;
(B) Any post-office box held by the tenant and actually known to the landlord; and
(C) The most recent forwarding address if provided by the tenant  or actually known to the
landlord.
(4)(a) In addition to the notice required by subsection (3) of this  section, in the case of an
abandoned [ recreational] vehicle, manufactured dwelling or floating home, a landlord shall also  give
a copy of the notice described in subsection (3) of this section to:
(A) Any lienholder of the [ recreational] vehicle, manufactured dwelling or floating home;
(B) Any owner of the [ recreational] vehicle, manufactured dwelling or floating home;
(C) The tax collector of  the county where the manufactured dwelling or floating home is located;
and
(D) The assessor of the county where the manufactured dwelling or floating home is located.
(b) The landlord shall give the notice copy required by this subsection by personal delivery or
first class mail, except that for any lienholder, mail service must be both by first class mail and  by
certified mail with return receipt requested.
(c) A notice to lienholders under paragraph (a)(A) of this  subsection must be sent to each
lienholder at each address:
(A) Actually known to the landlord;
(B) Of record; and
(C) Provided to the landlord by the lienholder in a written notice that  identifies the personal
[2]
HB 3371
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
property subject to the lien and that was sent  to the landlord by certified mail with return receipt
requested within the preceding five years. The notice  must identify the personal property by de-
scribing the physical address of the property.
(5) The notice required under subsection (3) of this section must state that:
(a) The personal property left upon the premises is considered abandoned;
(b) The tenant or any lienholder or owner must contact  the landlord by a specified date, as
provided in subsection (6)  of this section, to arrange for the removal of the abandoned personal
property;
(c) The personal property is  stored at a place of safekeeping, except that if the property includes
a manufactured dwelling or floating home, the dwelling or home must be stored  on the rented space;
(d) The tenant or any lienholder or  owner, except as provided by subsection (18) of this section,
may arrange for removal of the personal property by  contacting the landlord at a described tele-
phone number or address on or before the specified date;
(e) The landlord shall make the personal property available for removal by the tenant  or any
lienholder or owner, except as  provided by subsection (18) of this section, by appointment at rea-
sonable times;
(f) If the personal property is  considered to be abandoned pursuant to subsection (2)(a) or (b)
of this  section, the landlord may require payment of removal and storage charges, as provided by
subsection  (7)(d)  of this section, prior to releasing the personal property to the tenant or any
lienholder or owner;
(g) If the personal property is considered to be abandoned pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of  this
section, the landlord may not require payment of storage charges prior to releasing  the personal
property;
(h) If the tenant or any lienholder  or owner fails to contact the landlord by the specified date,
or after that contact, fails to remove the personal property  within 30 days for manufactured
dwellings and floating homes or 15 days for all other  personal property, the landlord may sell or
dispose of the personal property. If the landlord reasonably believes that the personal  property will
be eligible for disposal pursuant to subsection (10)(b) of this section  and the landlord intends to
dispose of the property if the property is not claimed, the notice shall state that belief and  intent;
and
(i) If the personal property includes a [ recreational] vehicle, manufactured dwelling  or floating
home and if applicable, there is a lienholder or owner that has a right to claim  the [ recreational]
vehicle, dwelling or home, except as provided by subsection (18) of this section.
(6) For purposes of subsection (5)  of this section, the specified date by which a tenant, lienholder
or owner must contact a landlord to arrange for the disposition of abandoned personal property is:
(a) For abandoned manufactured dwellings or floating homes,  not less than 45 days after per-
sonal delivery or mailing of the notice; or
(b) For  all other abandoned personal property, including  vehicles or  recreational vehicles, not
less than five days after personal delivery or eight days after mailing of the notice.
(7) After notifying the tenant as required by subsection (3) of this section, the landlord:
(a) Shall store any abandoned manufactured  dwelling or floating home on the rented space and
shall exercise reasonable care for the dwelling or home;
(b) Shall store all other abandoned personal property of the tenant, including  goods left inside
a recreational vehicle, manufactured dwelling or floating home or left upon the  rented space outside
a recreational  vehicle, dwelling or home, in a place of safekeeping and shall exercise reasonable
[3]
HB 3371
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
care for the personal property, except that the landlord may:
(A) Promptly dispose of rotting food; and
(B) Allow an animal control agency to  remove any abandoned pets or livestock. If an animal
control  agency  will not remove the abandoned pets or livestock, the landlord shall exercise reason-
able care for the animals given all the circumstances, including the type  and condition of the ani-
mals, and may give the animals to an agency  that is willing and able to care for the animals, such
as a humane society or similar organization;
(c) Except  for manufactured dwellings and floating homes, may store the abandoned personal
property at the dwelling unit, move and store it elsewhere on the premises or move  and store it at
a commercial storage company or other place of safekeeping; and
(d) Is entitled to reasonable or actual storage charges and costs incidental  to storage or dis-
posal, including any cost of removal  to a place of storage. In the case of an abandoned manufactured
dwelling or floating home, the storage charge may be no greater than the monthly  space rent last
payable by the tenant.
(8) If a tenant, lienholder  or owner, upon the receipt of the notice provided by subsection (3)
or (4) of this section or otherwise, responds by actual notice to  the landlord on or before the spec-
ified date in the landlord’s notice that the tenant, lienholder or owner intends to remove  the per-
sonal property from the premises or from  the place of safekeeping, the landlord must make that
personal property available for removal by  the tenant, lienholder or owner by appointment at rea-
sonable times during the 15 days or, in the case of a manufactured dwelling  or floating home, 30
days following the date of the response, subject to  subsection (18) of this section. If the personal
property is considered to be abandoned pursuant to subsection (2)(a) or (b) of this section, but  not
pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of this section, the landlord may require payment of removal and stor-
age charges, as provided in subsection (7)(d) of this section, prior to allowing  the tenant, lienholder
or owner to remove the personal property. Acceptance by a landlord  of such payment does not op-
erate to create or reinstate a tenancy or create a waiver pursuant to ORS 90.412 or 90.417.
(9) Except as provided in subsections (18) to  (20) of this section, if the tenant, lienholder or
owner of a [ recreational] vehicle, manufactured dwelling or floating home does not respond  within
the time provided by  the landlord’s notice, or the tenant, lienholder or owner does not remove the
personal property within the time  required by subsection (8) of this section or by any date agreed
to with the landlord, whichever is later, the tenant’s, lienholder’s or owner’s  personal property is
conclusively presumed to be abandoned.  The tenant and any lienholder or owner that have been
given notice pursuant to subsection (3) or (4) of this  section shall, except with regard to the dis-
tribution of sale proceeds pursuant to  subsection (13) of this section, have no further right, title or
interest to the personal property and may not claim or sell the property.
(10) If the personal property is presumed to be abandoned under subsection (9)  of this section,
the landlord then may:
(a) Sell  the personal property at a public or private sale, provided that prior to the sale of a
recreational vehicle, manufactured dwelling or floating home:
(A) The landlord may seek to transfer ownership of record  of the personal property by comply-
ing with the requirements of the appropriate state agency; and
(B) The landlord shall:
(i) Place a notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in  which the recreational
vehicle, manufactured dwelling or floating home is located. The notice shall state:
(I) That the recreational vehicle, manufactured dwelling or floating home is abandoned;
[4]
HB 3371
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(II) The tenant’s and owner’s name, if of record or actually known to the landlord;
(III) The address and any space number where the recreational vehicle,  manufactured dwelling
or floating home is located, and any  plate, registration or other identification number for a recre-
ational vehicle or floating home noted on the certificate of title, if actually known to the landlord;
(IV) Whether the sale is by private bidding or public auction;
(V) Whether the landlord is accepting sealed bids and, if so, the last date  on which bids will be
accepted;  and
(VI) The name and telephone number of the person  to contact to inspect the recreational vehi-
cle, manufactured dwelling or floating home;
(ii) At a reasonable time prior to the sale, give a copy of the notice  required by sub-
subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph to the tenant and to any lienholder and  owner, by personal
delivery  or  first class mail, except that for any lienholder, mail service must be by first class mail
with certificate of mailing;
(iii) Obtain an affidavit of publication from  the newspaper to show that the notice required un-
der sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph ran in the newspaper at least one day in each of  two
consecutive weeks prior to the date scheduled for the sale or the last date bids will be accepted;
and
(iv) Obtain written proof from the county that all property taxes and assessments on the manu-
factured dwelling or floating home have been paid or, if not paid,  that the county has authorized the
sale, with the sale proceeds to be distributed pursuant to subsection (13) of this section;
(b) Destroy or otherwise dispose of the personal property if the landlord determines that:
(A) For a manufactured dwelling or floating home, the current market value of  the property is
$8,000 or less as determined by the county assessor;
(B) For a recreational vehicle, the current market value of the vehicle is $4,000 or less; or
(C) For all other personal property,  the reasonable current fair market value is $1,000 or less
or so low that the cost of storage and  conducting a public sale probably exceeds the amount that
would be realized from the sale; or
(c) Consistent with paragraphs (a) and (b) of  this subsection, sell certain items and destroy or
otherwise dispose of the remaining personal property.
(11)(a) A public or private sale authorized by this section must:
(A) For a recreational  vehicle, manufactured dwelling or floating home, be conducted consistent
with the terms listed in subsection (10)(a)(B)(i) of this section. Every aspect of the  sale including the
method, manner, time, place and terms must be commercially reasonable; or
(B) For all other personal property, be conducted under the provisions of ORS 79.0610.
(b) If there is no buyer at a sale of a  manufactured dwelling or floating home, the personal
property is considered to be worth $8,000 or less, regardless of current market value, and the  land-
lord shall destroy or otherwise dispose of the personal property.
(12) Notwithstanding  ORS 446.155 (1) and (2), unless a landlord intentionally misrepresents the
condition of a manufactured dwelling or floating home, the landlord  is not liable for the condition
of the dwelling or home to:
(a) A buyer  of the dwelling or home at a sale pursuant to subsection (10)(a) of this section, with
or without consideration; or
(b) A person or nonprofit organization to  whom the landlord gives the dwelling or home pursu-
ant to subsection (1)(b), (10)(b) or (11)(b) of this section.
(13)(a) The landlord may deduct from the proceeds of the sale:
[5]
HB 3371
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(A) The reasonable or actual cost of notice, storage and sale; and
(B) Unpaid rent.
(b) If the sale was  of a manufactured dwelling or floating home, after deducting the amounts
listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the landlord  shall remit the remaining proceeds, if any, to
the county tax collector to the extent of any unpaid property taxes and assessments owed on  the
dwelling or home.
(c) If the sale was of a [ recreational] vehicle, manufactured dwelling  or floating home, after de-
ducting the amounts listed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, if  applicable, the landlord
shall remit the remaining proceeds, if any, to any  lienholder to the extent of any unpaid balance
owed on the lien on the [ recreational] vehicle, dwelling or home.
(d) After deducting the amounts  listed in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection, if appli-
cable, the landlord shall remit to the tenant or owner the remaining proceeds,  if any, together with
an itemized accounting.
(e) If the tenant or owner cannot after due diligence be  found, the landlord shall deposit the
remaining proceeds with the county treasurer of the county in which the sale occurred.  If not
claimed within three years, the deposited proceeds revert to the  general fund of the county and are
available for general purposes.
(14) The county tax collector shall cancel all unpaid property taxes and assessments owed on
a manufactured dwelling or floating home, as provided  under ORS 311.790, only under one of the
following circumstances:
(a) The landlord disposes of the manufactured dwelling or  floating home after a determination
described in subsection (10)(b) of this section.
(b) There  is no buyer of the manufactured dwelling or floating home at a sale described under
subsection (11) of this section.
(c)(A) There is a buyer of the  manufactured dwelling or floating home at a sale described under
subsection (11) of this section;
(B) The current market value of the manufactured dwelling or  floating home is $8,000 or less;
and
(C) The proceeds of the sale are insufficient to satisfy the unpaid property taxes and assessments
owed on the dwelling or home after distribution of  the proceeds pursuant to subsection (13) of this
section.
(d)(A) The landlord buys the manufactured dwelling or floating home  at a sale described under
subsection (11) of this section;
(B) The current  market value of the manufactured dwelling or floating home is more than $8,000;
(C) The proceeds of the sale are insufficient to satisfy the unpaid property taxes and assessments
owed on the manufactured dwelling  or floating home after distribution of the proceeds pursuant to
subsection (13) of this section; and
(D) The landlord disposes of the manufactured dwelling or floating home.
(15) The landlord is not responsible for any loss to the tenant, lienholder or owner resulting
from storage of personal property in compliance  with this section unless the loss was caused by the
landlord’s deliberate or negligent act. In the  event of a deliberate and malicious violation, the
landlord is liable for twice the actual damages sustained by the tenant, lienholder or owner.
(16) Complete compliance in good faith with this section shall constitute  a complete defense in
any action brought by a  tenant, lienholder or owner against a landlord for loss or damage to such
personal property disposed of pursuant to this section.
[6]
HB 3371
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(17) If a landlord does not comply with this section:
(a) The tenant is relieved of any liability  for damage to the premises caused by conduct that
was not deliberate, intentional or grossly negligent and for unpaid  rent and may recover from the
landlord up to twice the actual damages sustained by the tenant;
(b) A lienholder or owner aggrieved by the noncompliance may recover from the landlord the
actual damages sustained by the lienholder or owner. ORS 90.255 does not authorize an  award of
attorney fees to the prevailing party in any action arising under this paragraph; and
(c) A county tax collector aggrieved by the noncompliance may  recover from the landlord the
actual damages sustained by the tax  collector, if the noncompliance is part of an effort by the
landlord to defraud the tax collector. ORS 90.255 does not authorize an award  of attorney fees to
the prevailing party in any action arising under this paragraph.
(18) In the case of an abandoned [ recreational] vehicle, manufactured dwelling or floating  home,
the provisions of this section regarding the rights and responsibilities of a tenant to the  abandoned
vehicle, dwelling or home also apply to any lienholder except that the  lienholder may not sell or
remove the vehicle, dwelling or home unless:
(a) The lienholder has foreclosed its lien on the [ recreational] vehicle, manufactured dwelling or
floating  home;
(b) The tenant or a personal representative or designated person described  in subsection (20)
of this section has waived all rights under this section  pursuant to subsection (26) of this section;
or
(c) The notice and response periods provided by  subsections (6) and (8) of this section have ex-
pired.
(19)(a) In the case of an abandoned manufactured dwelling or floating home but not including
a dwelling or home abandoned following a termination pursuant to  ORS 90.429 and except as pro-
vided by subsection (20)(d) and (e) of this section, if  a lienholder makes a timely response to a notice
of abandoned  personal property pursuant to subsections (6) and (8) of this section and so requests,
a landlord shall enter into a written storage agreement with the  lienholder providing that the
dwelling or home may not be sold or disposed of by  the landlord for up to 12 months. A storage
agreement entitles the lienholder to store the personal property on  the previously rented space
during the term of the agreement, but does not entitle anyone to occupy the personal property.
(b) The lienholder’s right to a storage agreement arises upon the failure of the tenant,  owner
or, in the case of a deceased tenant, the personal representative, designated  person, heir or devisee
to remove or sell the dwelling or home within the allotted time.
(c) To  exercise the right to a storage agreement under this subsection, in addition to contacting
the landlord with a timely response as described in  paragraph (a) of this subsection, the lienholder
must enter into the proposed  storage agreement within 60 days after the landlord gives a copy of
the agreement to the lienholder. The landlord shall give a copy of  the proposed storage agreement
to the  lienholder in the same manner as provided by subsection (4)(b) of this section. The landlord
may include a copy of the  proposed storage agreement with the notice of abandoned property re-
quired by subsection (4) of this section. A lienholder enters into a storage agreement  by signing a
copy of the agreement provided by the landlord and personally  delivering or mailing the signed copy
to the landlord within the 60-day period.
(d) The storage agreement may require, in addition  to other provisions agreed to by the landlord
and the lienholder, that:
(A) The lienholder  make timely periodic payment of all storage charges, as described in sub-
[7]
HB 3371
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section (7)(d) of this section,  accruing from the commencement of the 45-day period described in
subsection  (6) of this section. A storage charge may include a utility or service charge, as described
in ORS 90.562, if  limited to charges for electricity, water, sewer service and natural gas and if in-
cidental to the storage of personal property. A storage charge  may not be due more frequently than
monthly;
(B) The  lienholder pay a late charge or fee for failure to pay a storage charge by the date re-
quired in the agreement, if the amount of  the late charge is no greater than for late charges de-
scribed in the rental agreement between the landlord and the tenant; and
(C) The lienholder maintain the personal property and the space on which  the personal property
is stored  in a manner consistent with the rights and obligations described in the rental agreement
between the landlord and the tenant.
(e) During the term of an agreement described under this subsection, the lienholder has the right
to remove or sell the property, subject to the provisions of the lien. Selling the property includes a
sale to a  purchaser who wishes to leave the dwelling or home on the rented space and become a
tenant, subject  to any conditions previously agreed to by the landlord and tenant regarding the
landlord’s approval of a purchaser or, if there  was no such agreement, any reasonable conditions
by the landlord regarding approval of any purchaser who wishes to leave the dwelling  or home on
the rented space and become a tenant. The landlord also may condition approval for occupancy  of
any purchaser of the property upon payment of all unpaid storage charges and maintenance costs.
(f)(A) If the  lienholder violates the storage agreement, the landlord may terminate the agreement
by giving at least 90  days’ written notice to the lienholder stating facts sufficient to notify the
lienholder of the reason for the termination. Unless the lienholder corrects the violation within  the
notice period, the agreement terminates as provided  and the landlord may sell or dispose of the
dwelling or home without further notice to the lienholder.
(B) After a landlord gives a termination notice  pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph
for failure of the lienholder to pay a storage  charge and the lienholder corrects the violation, if the
lienholder again violates the storage agreement by failing to pay a subsequent storage charge, the
landlord may terminate the agreement by giving at least 30 days’ written notice  to the lienholder
stating facts sufficient to notify the lienholder of the reason for termination. Unless the lienholder
corrects the violation within the  notice period, the agreement terminates as provided and the land-
lord may sell or dispose of the property without further notice to the lienholder.
(C) A lienholder may terminate a storage agreement at any time upon at least  14 days’ written
notice to the landlord and may remove the property from the rented space if the lienholder has  paid
all storage charges and other charges as provided in the agreement.
(g) Upon the failure of a lienholder to enter into a storage agreement as provided by this  sub-
section or upon termination of  an agreement, unless the parties otherwise agree or the lienholder
has sold or removed the manufactured dwelling or  floating home, the landlord may sell or dispose
of the property pursuant to this section without further notice to the lienholder.
(20) If the personal property is a manufactured dwelling or  floating home and is considered
abandoned as a result of the death of a tenant  who was the only tenant and who owned the dwelling
or home, this section applies, except as follows:
(a) The following persons have the same rights and responsibilities regarding the  abandoned
dwelling or home as a tenant:
(A) Any personal representative named in a will or appointed by a court to act for the  deceased
tenant.
[8]
HB 3371
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Any person designated  in writing by the tenant to be contacted by the landlord in the event
of the tenant’s death.
(b) The notice required by subsection (3) of this section must be:
(A) Sent by first class mail to the deceased tenant at the premises; and
(B) Personally delivered or sent by first class mail  to any personal representative or designated
person, if actually known to the landlord.
(c) The notice described in subsection (5) of this section must refer to any  personal represen-
tative or designated person, instead of the deceased tenant,  and must incorporate the provisions of
this subsection.
(d) If a personal representative, designated person or other person entitled  to possession of the
property, such as an heir or devisee, responds by actual notice to a landlord within the 45-day period
provided by subsection (6) of this section  and so requests, the landlord shall enter into a written
storage agreement with the representative or person providing that the dwelling or  home may not
be sold or disposed of by  the landlord for up to 90 days or until conclusion of any probate pro-
ceedings, whichever is later. A storage agreement entitles the representative or  person to store the
personal property on the previously rented space during the  term of the agreement, but does not
entitle anyone to  occupy the personal property. If such an agreement is entered, the landlord may
not enter a similar agreement with a lienholder pursuant to subsection (19)  of this section until the
agreement with the personal representative or designated person ends.
(e) If a personal representative or other person requests that a  landlord enter into a storage
agreement, subsection (19)(c), (d) and (f)(C)  of this section applies, with the representative or person
having the rights and responsibilities of a lienholder with regard to the storage agreement.
(f) During the term of an agreement described under paragraph  (d) of this subsection, the rep-
resentative or person has  the right to remove or sell the dwelling or home, including a sale to a
purchaser or a transfer to an heir  or devisee where the purchaser, heir or devisee wishes to leave
the dwelling or home on the rented space and become a tenant, subject to any conditions  previously
agreed to  by the landlord and tenant regarding the landlord’s approval for occupancy of a purchaser,
heir or devisee or, if there was no such agreement, any reasonable conditions by the landlord re-
garding approval for occupancy of any purchaser, heir or devisee who wishes to leave  the dwelling
or home on the rented space and become a  tenant. The landlord also may condition approval for
occupancy of any purchaser, heir or devisee of the dwelling  or home upon payment of all unpaid
storage charges and maintenance costs.
(g) If the representative or person violates the  storage agreement, the landlord may terminate
the agreement by giving at least 30  days’ written notice to the representative or person stating facts
sufficient to notify the representative or  person of the reason for the termination. Unless the rep-
resentative or person corrects the violation within the notice  period, the agreement terminates as
provided and the landlord may sell or dispose of the  dwelling or home without further notice to the
representative or person.
(h) Upon the failure of a representative or person to enter into a storage agreement as  provided
by this subsection or upon termination of an agreement, unless the  parties otherwise agree or the
representative or person has sold or removed the manufactured dwelling or floating home,  the
landlord may sell or dispose of the property pursuant to this section without further  notice to the
representative or person.
(21) If  the personal property is other than a manufactured dwelling or floating home and is
considered abandoned as a result of the death of a tenant who was the only tenant  and who owned
[9]
HB 3371
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
the personal property, this section applies except as follows:
(a) The  following persons have the same rights and responsibilities regarding the abandoned
personal property as a tenant:
(A) An heir or devisee.
(B) Any  personal representative named in a will or appointed by a court to act for the deceased
tenant.
(C) Any person designated  in writing by the tenant to be contacted by the landlord in the event
of the tenant’s death.
(b) The notice required by subsection (3) of this section must be:
(A) Sent by first class mail to the deceased tenant at the premises;
(B) Personally delivered or sent by first class mail to any heir, devisee, personal  representative
or designated person, if actually known to the landlord; and
(C) Sent by first class mail to the attention of an estate administrator of the State Treasurer.
(c) The notice described in subsection (5) of this section must  refer to the heir, devisee, personal
representative, designated person or estate administrator of the State Treasurer, instead of  the de-
ceased tenant, and must incorporate the provisions of this subsection.
(d) The landlord  shall allow a person that is an heir, devisee or personal representative of the
tenant, or an estate administrator of the State Treasurer, to remove the  personal property if the
person contacts the landlord within the period provided  by subsection (6) of this section, complies
with the requirements of this section and provides the landlord  with reasonable evidence that the
person is an heir, devisee or personal representative, or an estate  administrator of the State
Treasurer.
(e) If no heir,  devisee or personal representative of the tenant, or no estate administrator of the
State Treasurer, contacts the landlord within the time  period provided by subsection (6) of this
section, the landlord shall allow removal of the personal  property by the designated person of the
tenant, if the designated person contacts the landlord within that period and complies with  the re-
quirements of this section and provides the landlord with reasonable evidence that the person is  the
designated person.
(f) A landlord who allows  removal of personal property under this subsection is not liable to
another person that has a claim or interest in the personal property.
(22) If a governmental agency  determines that the condition of a manufactured dwelling or
floating home abandoned under this section constitutes an  extreme health or safety hazard under
state or local law and the agency determines that the hazard endangers others in  the immediate
vicinity and requires quick removal of the property, the landlord may sell or dispose of the  property
pursuant to this subsection. The landlord shall comply with all provisions of this section,  except as
follows:
(a) The date provided in subsection (6) of this section by which a  tenant, lienholder, owner,
personal representative or designated person must contact a landlord to arrange for the  disposition
of the property must be not less than 15 days after personal delivery or mailing of the notice  re-
quired by subsection (3) of this section.
(b) The date provided in subsections (8) and  (9) of this section by which a tenant, lienholder,
owner, personal representative or designated  person must remove the property must be not less than
seven days after the tenant, lienholder, owner, personal representative or designated person contacts
the landlord.
(c) The notice  required by subsection (3) of this section must be as provided in subsection (5)
[10]
HB 3371
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of this section, except that:
(A) The dates and deadlines in the notice for contacting the landlord and removing the  property
must be consistent with this subsection;
(B) The notice must state  that a governmental agency has determined that the property consti-
tutes an extreme health or safety hazard and must be removed quickly; and
(C) The landlord shall attach a copy of the agency’s determination to the notice.
(d) If the tenant, a lienholder, owner, personal representative or designated person does  not re-
move the property within the time allowed, the landlord or a buyer at a sale by the landlord  under
subsection (11) of this section shall promptly remove the property from the facility.
(e) A landlord is not required to enter into a storage agreement with a lienholder, owner,  per-
sonal representative or designated person pursuant to subsection (19) of this section.
(23)(a) If an  official or agency referred to in ORS 453.876 notifies the landlord that the official
or agency has determined that all or part of the premises is unfit for use as a result of the  presence
of an illegal drug manufacturing site involving methamphetamine, and the  landlord complies with
this subsection, the landlord is not required to comply with subsections (1)  to (22) and (24) to (27)
of this section  with regard to personal property left on the portion of the premises that the official
or agency has determined to be unfit for use.
(b) Upon receiving  notice from an official or agency determining the premises to be unfit for use,
the landlord shall promptly give written notice to the tenant as provided in subsection (3) of this
section. The landlord shall also attach a copy of the notice in a  secure manner to the main entrance
of the dwelling unit. The notice to the tenant shall include a copy of  the official’s or agency’s notice
and state:
(A) That the premises,  or a portion of the premises, has been determined by an official or agency
to be unfit for use due to contamination  from the manufacture of methamphetamine and that as a
result subsections (1) to (22) and (24) to (27) of  this section do not apply to personal property left
on any portion of the premises determined to be unfit for use;
(B) That the landlord has hired, or will hire, a contractor to assess the level of contamination
of the site and to decontaminate the site;
(C) That  upon hiring the contractor, the landlord will provide to the tenant the name, address
and telephone number of the contractor; and
(D) That the tenant may contact the contractor to  determine whether any of the tenant’s per-
sonal property may be removed from the premises or  may be decontaminated at the tenant’s expense
and then removed.
(c) To the extent consistent with rules of the Department of Human Services, the contractor
may release personal property to the tenant.
(d) If the contractor and the department determine that the premises or the tenant’s personal
property is not unfit for use, upon notification by the department  of the determination, the landlord
shall comply with subsections (1) to (22) and  (24) to (27) of this section for any personal property left
on the premises.
(e) Except as provided in paragraph (d) of this  subsection, the landlord is not responsible for
storing or returning any personal property left on the portion of the premises that is unfit for use.
(24) In the case of an abandoned recreational vehicle,  manufactured dwelling or floating home
that is owned  by someone other than the tenant, the provisions of this section regarding the rights
and responsibilities of a tenant to the  abandoned vehicle, dwelling or home also apply to that owner,
with regard only to the vehicle, dwelling or home, and not  to any goods left inside or outside the
[11]
HB 3371
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
vehicle, dwelling or home.
(25) In the case of an  abandoned motor vehicle, including a recreational vehicle, the procedure
authorized by ORS 98.830 for removal of abandoned motor  vehicles from private property may be
used by a landlord as an alternative to the procedures required in this section.
(26)(a) A landlord may sell or dispose of a tenant’s  abandoned personal property without com-
plying with subsections (1) to (25) and (27) of this section if, after termination of the  tenancy or no
more than seven days prior to the termination of the tenancy, the following parties  so agree in a
writing entered into in good faith:
(A) The landlord;
(B) The tenant, or  for an abandonment as the result of the death of a tenant who was the only
tenant, the personal representative, designated person or other  person entitled to possession of the
personal property, such as an heir or devisee, as described in subsection  (20) or (21) of this section;
and
(C) In the case of a manufactured dwelling, floating home or [ recreational] vehicle, any  owner
and any lienholder.
(b) A landlord may not, as part of a  rental agreement, require a tenant, a personal represen-
tative, a designated person or any lienholder or owner to waive any right provided by this section.
(27) Until personal property is conclusively presumed to be abandoned under  subsection (9) of
this section, a landlord does  not have a lien pursuant to ORS 87.152 for storing the personal prop-
erty.
[12]