Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 377.735 is amended to read:
377.735. (1) The permit requirements of ORS 377.700 to 377.844 do not apply to:
(a) Signs of a governmental unit, including but not limited  to traffic control signs or devices,
legal notices or warnings.
(b) A temporary sign on private property if:
(A) The sign does not exceed [ 12] 32 square feet;
(B) The sign is not on a permanent base;
(C) The sign does not remain in place for a period of more  than 60 days in a calendar year,
except that a sign erected by a resident on the  resident’s residential property may remain in place
for longer than 60 days in a calendar year;
(D) No person receives compensation or anything of value  as defined by the Department of
Transportation by rule for displaying the sign; and
(E) The sign complies with ORS 377.720.
(2) The Department of Transportation may adopt rules that, for good cause shown, allow a  per-
son displaying a temporary sign to obtain a variance  from the restrictions in subsection (1)(b) of this
section. The department shall not consider the content of the sign  in deciding whether to allow a
variance.
(3) The department shall adopt rules for the approval and preservation of historic  signs. Rules
adopted under this subsection may not be based  on or allow consideration of the content of the
signs.
(4) The department shall adopt rules  for the erection and maintenance of permanent signs that
do not exceed six  square feet and that provide messages for the safety or convenience of the public.
(5) ORS 377.700 to 377.844  do not apply to a sign erected or maintained within a city more than
660 feet from the nearest edge of the right of way  of a state highway, unless the sign is designed
to be viewed primarily from the state highway.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3871