Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the Oregon Business  Development Department, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,000,000 for
the purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 2 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Innovation district” means a district that  embodies an innovation ecosystem con-
sisting of the following economic, physical and networking assets:
(A) Public and private firms, institutions and organizations with the goal of driving, cul-
tivating and accelerating economic innovation;
(B) Neighborhood-building amenities;
(C) Public and private infrastructure designed and organized to stimulate connectivity,
collaboration and innovation and to tie the district to the city in which it is located; and
(D) Relationships among individuals, firms,  institutions and organizations that have the
potential to advance knowledge-based  innovation for both traditional and electronic sectors
of the economy.
(b) “Nonprofit corporation” means:
(A) A corporation organized under ORS chapter 65 or any predecessor  of ORS chapter
65; or
(B) A corporation described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code as defined
in ORS 305.842 (1) that is exempt from income tax under section  501(a) of the Internal Re-
venue Code.
(2)(a) The moneys  appropriated under section 1 of this 2019 Act are continuously appro-
priated to the Oregon Business  Development Department for the purpose of making grants
to nonprofit corporations dedicated to the organization, administration and programming of
innovation districts, subject to the criteria set forth in subsection (3) of this section.
(b) Grant moneys received by a nonprofit corporation under this section  may be used
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3073
HB 2934
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
solely to hire employees and agents to coordinate activities for the innovation district.
(c) The total amount of grants made in a year may not exceed $1,000,000.
(d) A grant may not be  made to a nonprofit corporation under this section with respect
to:
(A) More than one innovation district per city.
(B) An innovation district unless all the  property constituting the innovation district is
contiguous. For purposes of this subparagraph, two parcels of  property shall also be consid-
ered contiguous if they are connected by a bridge for  pedestrians and bicyclists or another
such crossing of any kind.
(3) A grant may not be made to a nonprofit corporation under this section unless  the
innovation district to which the corporation’s grant application relates:
(a) Is located, in whole or in part,  within five miles of a university described in paragraph
(d) of this subsection;
(b) Was established before September 1, 2019;
(c) Has an opportunity zone within the district’s boundaries; and
(d) Involves partnership with:
(A) A public institution of higher education as defined in ORS 352.002 that is an  R1 re-
search university according to the Carnegie Classification of Institutions of Higher Education
with a student population of at least 2,000 full-time students; or
(B) Oregon Health and Science University established under ORS 353.020.
SECTION 3.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]