Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1011
HB 2074
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this  2019 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 327.006 to
327.133.
SECTION 2. (1) Each even-numbered  year, the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services shall prepare a tentative budget for funding the State  School Fund for the next
biennium.
(2) For  the purpose of preparing the tentative budget, the department shall form a com-
mittee. The committee must include:
(a) Representatives from the Department of Education, the Legislative Fiscal Office, the
Legislative Revenue Officer and the Governor’s office;
(b) Representatives of school districts, school budget committees and education  labor
unions; and
(c) The cochairs of the Joint Committee on Ways and Means, who shall serve as  non-
voting members on the committee formed under this subsection.
(3) The  tentative budget prepared under this section must be based on the calculations
made by the committee formed under subsection (2) of this  section. The committee must
consider different methodologies for calculating  the tentative budget and must base the
tentative budget on the projected costs of continuing currently authorized operating revenue
per weighted average daily membership, as calculated under ORS  327.013 (1)(c)(A), including:
(a) Projected changes in the cost of  personal services, other services, supplies and capital
expenditures, based on anticipated expenses;
(b) Forecasted local revenues, as described in ORS 327.011 and as calculated by  the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the Legislative  Fiscal Officer, the Legislative
Revenue Officer and the Department of Revenue; and
(c) Projected cost factors that may arise from new laws and administrative rules.
(4) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall present the tentative  budget
prepared under this section to the Governor and  to the Legislative Assembly in conjunction
with the report issued by the Quality Education Commission under ORS 327.506 (4).
(5) The tentative budget prepared under this section shall become part of the agency re-
quest budget for the Department of Education for the purpose of ORS 291.208.
[2]