Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Policy and Research Office shall study strategies to promote
recovery from the 2020 wildfire season and present  the results of the study in a report to
an appropriate committee or interim committee of the  Legislative Assembly, in the manner
provided in ORS 192.245, on or before September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3601