Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon Military Department shall  end any suspension of the Oregon
Civil Defense Force organized under ORS 399.035.
(2) On or before July 1, 2020, the  Adjutant General shall report to the standing or interim
committees of the  Legislative Assembly with subject matter jurisdiction over the state or-
ganized militia on the status of the Oregon Civil Defense Force.
SECTION 2. The Oregon Military Department shall institute  an ongoing basic training
program for members of the Oregon Civil Defense Force. The  training program shall include,
at a minimum, training in:
(1) Survival skills;
(2) Medical assistance; and
(3) Firearm use, maintenance and safety.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Military Department, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $______ for the purpose of carrying out the  provisions of
sections 1 and 2 of this 2019 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2427