Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Office of Emergency Management shall, in  its administration of
grants issued by the State Homeland Security Grant Program established by 6 U.S.C. 605:
(a) Eliminate restrictions on the use of grant moneys by  recipients, to the extent allow-
able under federal law governing the use of grant moneys; and
(b) Distribute grant moneys to applicants using a formula grant instead  of a competitive
process.
(2) Nothing in this section requires the office to administer the grant program in a
manner that the office determines may jeopardize  the ability of the state to receive grant
moneys from the federal government.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2019 Act applies to administration of the State  Homeland
Security Grant Program for federal fiscal years beginning on or after October 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2056