Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 171.130 is amended to read:
171.130. (1) At any time in advance of any regular or  special session of the Legislative Assembly
fixed by the Legislative Counsel Committee, or at any time in advance of a  special session as may
be fixed by joint rules  of both houses of the Legislative Assembly, the following may file a proposed
legislative measure with the Legislative Counsel:
(a) Members who will serve in the session and members-elect.
(b) Interim and statutory committees of the Legislative Assembly.
[(2) On or before December 15 of an even-numbered  year, or at any time in advance of a special
session as may be fixed by joint rules of both houses of  the Legislative Assembly, the following may
file a proposed legislative measure with the Legislative Counsel: ]
[(a) The Oregon Department  of Administrative Services, to implement the fiscal recommendations
of the Governor contained in the Governor’s budget. ]
[(b) The person who will serve as Governor during the session. ]
[(c) The Secretary of State, the  State Treasurer, the Attorney General and the Commissioner of the
Bureau of Labor and Industries. ]
[(d) The Judicial Department. ]
[(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, a statewide elected  official who initially assumes
office in January of an odd-numbered year may submit proposed measures  for introduction by members
or committees of the Legislative Assembly until the calendar day designated by rules of  either house
of the Legislative Assembly. The exemption granted  by this subsection to a newly elected Governor does
not apply to state agencies in the executive branch. ]
[(4)] (2) On or before December 15 of an  even-numbered year, a state agency may file a proposed
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3761
SB 1006
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
legislative measure with the Legislative Counsel through a member or committee of the Legislative
Assembly. A proposed legislative measure  that is filed under this subsection must state that
the measure is filed at the request of the state agency.
[(5)] (3)  The [ Legislative Counsel ] Secretary of the  Senate or the Chief Clerk of the House
of Representatives shall order each measure filed pursuant  to subsections (1) [ to (4)] and (2) of this
section prepared for printing and may order the  measure printed. [ If the person filing a measure
specifically requests in writing that  the measure be made available for distribution, the Legislative
Counsel shall order the measure printed and shall make copies  of the printed measure available for
distribution before the beginning of the session  to members and members-elect and to others upon re-
quest.]
[(6) Copies of  all measures filed and prepared for printing or printed pursuant to this section shall
be forwarded by the Legislative Counsel to the chief clerk of the house designated by the person filing
the measure for introduction. ]
[(7)] (4)  The  costs of carrying out this section shall be paid out of the money appropriated for
the expenses of that session of the Legislative Assembly for which the measure is to be printed.
[(8)] (5) The Legislative Counsel Committee may adopt rules or policies to accomplish the pur-
pose of this section.
[(9)] (6) This section does not affect any [ law or any ] rule of the  Legislative Assembly or either
house thereof relating to the introduction of legislative measures.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 173.130 is amended to read:
173.130. (1) The Legislative Counsel shall prepare or assist in the  preparation of legislative
measures when requested to do so by a member or committee of the Legislative Assembly.
[(2) Upon the written request of  a state agency, the Legislative Counsel may prepare or assist in
the preparation of  legislative measures that have been approved for preparation in writing by the
Governor or the Governor’s designated representative. The Legislative  Counsel may also prepare or
assist in the preparation of legislative measures that are requested in writing by the Judicial Depart-
ment, the Governor, the Secretary of State, the State Treasurer, the Attorney General  or the Commis-
sioner of the Bureau of Labor  and Industries. In accordance with ORS 283.110, the Legislative Counsel
may charge the agency or officer for the services performed. ]
[(3)] (2)  The Legislative Counsel shall give such consideration to and service concerning  any
measure or  other legislative matter before the Legislative Assembly as is requested by the House
of Representatives, the Senate or any committee of the Legislative Assembly that has the  measure
or other matter under consideration.
[(4)] (3)  The Legislative  Counsel, pursuant to the policies and directions of the Legislative
Counsel Committee and in conformity with  any applicable rules of the House of Representatives or
Senate, shall  perform or cause to be performed research service requested by any member or com-
mittee of the Legislative Assembly in connection with the performance of legislative  functions. Re-
search assignments made by joint or concurrent resolution of  the Legislative Assembly shall be
given priority over other research requests  received by the Legislative Counsel. The research ser-
vice to be performed includes the administrative services incident  to the accomplishment of the re-
search requests or assignments.
[(5)] (4)  The Legislative Counsel shall give an opinion in writing upon any question of law in
which the Legislative Assembly or any member or committee of the  Legislative Assembly may have
an interest when the Legislative Assembly or any member or committee of the Legislative Assembly
requests the opinion. Except as provided in  [ subsection (2) of this section and ] ORS 173.135, the
[2]
SB 1006
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
Legislative  Counsel  shall not give opinions or provide other legal services to persons or agencies
other than the Legislative Assembly and members and committees of the Legislative Assembly.
[(6)] (5)  The Legislative Counsel may enter into contracts to carry  out the functions of the
Legislative Counsel.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 94.536 is amended to read:
94.536. As used in this section and ORS 94.538:
(1) “Conservation easement” has the meaning given that term in ORS 271.715.
(2) “Governmental unit” means a city, county, metropolitan service district  [ or], state agency
as defined in ORS [ 171.133] 183.310 or the Judicial Department .
(3) “Holder” has the meaning given that term in ORS 271.715.
(4) “Lot” has the meaning given that term in ORS 92.010.
(5) “Parcel” has the meaning given that term in ORS 92.010.
(6) “Receiving area” means a designated area of land to  which a holder of development credits
generated from a sending area may transfer the development credits and in  which additional uses
or development, not otherwise allowed, are allowed by reason of the transfer.
(7) “Resource land” means:
(a) Lands outside an  urban growth boundary planned and zoned for farm use, forest use or mixed
farm and forest use.
(b) Lands inside or outside urban growth boundaries identified:
(A) In an acknowledged local or regional government inventory as containing  significant
wetland, riparian, wildlife habitat, historic, scenic or open space resources; or
(B) As containing important natural resources, estuaries,  coastal shorelands, beaches and dunes
or other resources described in the statewide land use planning goals.
(c) “Conservation Opportunity Areas”  identified in the “Oregon Conservation Strategy” adopted
by the State Fish and Wildlife Commission and published by the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife in September of 2006.
(8) “Sending area” means a designated  area of resource land from which development credits
generated from forgone development are transferable, for uses or development  not otherwise al-
lowed, to a receiving area.
(9) “Tract” has the meaning given that term in ORS 215.010.
(10) “Transferable development credit” means a severable development interest  in real property
that can be transferred from a lot, parcel or tract in a  sending area to a lot, parcel or tract in a
receiving area.
(11) “Transferable development credit system” means a land use planning tool that  allows the
record owner of a lot, parcel or tract  of resource land in a sending area to voluntarily sever and
sell development interests from the lot,  parcel or tract for purchase and use by a potential developer
to develop a lot, parcel or tract in a receiving area at a higher intensity than otherwise allowed.
(12) “Urban growth boundary” has the meaning given that term in ORS 197.015.
(13) “Urban reserve” has the meaning given that term in ORS 197A.230.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 184.843 is amended to read:
184.843. (1) There is created the Road User Fee Task Force.
(2) The purpose of the  task force is to develop a design for revenue collection for Oregon’s roads
and highways that will replace  the current system for revenue collection. The task force shall con-
sider all potential revenue sources.
(3) The task force shall consist of 12 members, as follows:
[3]
SB 1006
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(a) Two members shall be members of the House of Representatives, appointed  by the Speaker
of the House of Representatives.
(b) Two members shall be members of the Senate, appointed by the President of the Senate.
(c) Four members shall be appointed by the Governor, the  Speaker and the President acting
jointly. In making appointments under this paragraph, the  appointing authorities shall consider in-
dividuals who are representative  of the telecommunications industry, of highway user groups, of the
Oregon transportation research community and of national research  and policy-making bodies such
as the Transportation Research Board and the American Association of State Highway  and Trans-
portation Officials.
(d) One member shall be an elected city  official, appointed by the Governor, the Speaker and the
President acting jointly.
(e) One member shall be an elected county  official, appointed by the Governor, the Speaker and
the President acting jointly.
(f) Two members shall be members  of the Oregon Transportation Commission, appointed by the
chairperson of the commission.
(4)(a) The term of a legislator appointed to the task force  is four years except that the legislator
ceases  to  be a member of the task force when the legislator ceases to be a legislator. A legislator
may be reappointed to the task force.
(b) The term of  a member of the task force appointed under subsection (3)(c) of this section is
four years and the member may be reappointed.
(c) The term of a member of the task force appointed under subsection (3)(d) or (e) of this section
is four years except that the member ceases to  be a member of the task force when the member
ceases  to  be a city or county elected official. A city or county elected official may be reappointed
to the task force.
(d) The term of a member  of the Oregon Transportation Commission appointed to the task force
is four years except that the member ceases to  be a member of the task force when the member
ceases to be a member of the commission. A member of the commission may  be reappointed to the
task force.
(5) A legislator appointed to the task force is entitled  to per diem and other expense payments
as authorized by ORS 171.072 from funds  appropriated to the Legislative Assembly. Other members
of the task force are entitled to compensation and expenses as provided in ORS 292.495.
(6) The Department of Transportation shall provide staff to the task force.
(7) The task force shall study alternatives to the current system of taxing highway  use through
motor vehicle fuel taxes. The task force shall gather  public comment on alternative approaches and
shall make recommendations to the Department of  Transportation and the Oregon Transportation
Commission on the  design of pilot programs to be used to test alternative approaches. The task force
may also make recommendations to the department and  the commission on criteria to be used to
evaluate pilot programs. The  task force may evaluate any pilot program implemented by the de-
partment and report the results of the evaluation to the Legislative Assembly, the department and
the commission.
(8) When the task force is studying  alternatives to the current system of taxing highway use
through motor vehicle fuel taxes and developing  recommendations on the design of pilot programs
to test alternative approaches under subsection (7) of this section, the task force shall:
(a) Take into consideration the availability, adaptability, reliability and security of  methods that
might be used in recording and reporting highway use.
[4]
SB 1006
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Take into consideration the protection of any personally identifiable information  used in re-
porting highway use.
(c) Take into consideration the ease and cost of recording and reporting highway use.
(d) Take into consideration the  ease and cost of administering the collection of taxes and fees
as an alternative to the current system of taxing highway use through motor vehicle fuel taxes.
(e) Take into consideration effective methods of maintaining compliance.
(f) Consult with highway users and transportation stakeholders, including  representatives of
vehicle users, vehicle manufacturers and fuel distributors.
(9) The task force shall report to each odd-numbered year regular  session of the Legislative
Assembly on the work of the task force, the department and the commission in designing,  imple-
menting and evaluating pilot programs.
(10) Official action by the task force  requires the approval of a majority of the members of the
task force.
[(11) Notwithstanding ORS 171.130 and 171.133, the task force  by official action may recommend
legislation. Legislation recommended  by the task force must indicate that it is introduced at the request
of the  task force. Legislative measures proposed by the task force shall be prepared in time for preses-
sion filing with the Legislative Counsel by December 15 of an even-numbered year. ]
SECTION 5.
 ORS 197.012 is amended to read:
197.012. In  areas of the state that are growing rapidly, state agencies, as defined in ORS
[171.133] 183.310, cities and  counties should, within constraints of applicable federal law and regu-
lations, state law and rules and local ordinances:
(1) Consider directing major public infrastructure investments, including  major transportation
investments, to reinforce compact urban development; and
(2) Consider giving priority to investments that promote infill or redevelopment of existing urban
areas to encourage the density necessary to support alternative modes of transportation.
SECTION 6.  ORS 197.652 is amended to read:
197.652. (1) At the request of a county and at least one other local government in a  region, the
Department of Land Conservation and Development, other state agencies, as defined in ORS
[171.133] 183.310, metropolitan planning  organizations, special districts and advisory committees on
transportation may participate with  the local governments in a collaborative regional problem-
solving process.
(2) If requested to participate, the department shall assist the county with the process and  en-
courage  regional  efforts to resolve land use planning problems using the authorities described in
ORS 197.652 to 197.658.
(3) The county, in cooperation with the other local governments, shall identify the  land use
planning problems to be addressed and the  participants whose actions are necessary to resolve the
land use planning problems.
(4) The county shall submit a proposed work scope and a proposed list of participants  as a
proposal  to  the Land Conservation and Development Commission for review. The commission shall
review:
(a) The proposed  work scope to determine whether it can reasonably be completed within the
time allowed;
(b) The proposed participant list to determine whether  it includes, at a minimum, all local gov-
ernments that will need to amend a comprehensive plan provision or a land use regulation, or adopt
a new  provision or regulation, in order to resolve the land use planning problems identified in the
[5]
SB 1006
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
work scope; and
(c) The proposed work scope and the proposed participant list for consistency.
(5) A county may  initiate amendments of a comprehensive plan or land use regulation under
ORS 197.652 to 197.658 only if the commission approves the work scope, the  list of participants and
a schedule for completion of the process. The schedule for completion of the process may:
(a) Not exceed three years except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) Be extended by the commission for up to one year for good cause shown.
(6) The decision of a county  to submit a proposal under this section, and the decision of the
commission to approve a proposal, are not final actions subject to judicial review.
(7) If the commission approves a  proposal under this section, the county must periodically report
on the progress in carrying out the proposal, as specified by the commission.
(8) For purposes of ORS 197.654 and 197.656, the participants in a collaborative regional
problem-solving process include all participants on the list of  participants approved by the commis-
sion unless the commission subsequently approves the addition or removal of a participant.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 279.855 is amended to read:
279.855. The following may purchase equipment, materials, supplies and services through  the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services in the same  manner as state agencies as provided in
ORS 279A.140 to 279A.161 and 279A.250 to 279A.290:
(1) Qualified nonprofit agencies for individuals with disabilities  participating in the program set
forth in ORS 279.835 to 279.855, 279A.025 (4) and 279C.335.
(2) Residential programs when under contract with  the Department of Human Services to pro-
vide services to youth in the custody of the state.
(3) Public  benefit corporations, as defined in ORS 65.001, that provide public services either
under contract with a state agency, as defined in  ORS [ 171.133] 183.310, or under contract with a
unit of  local government, as defined in ORS 190.003, that funds the contract, in whole or in part,
with state funds.
SECTION 8.  ORS 413.011 is amended to read:
413.011. (1) The duties of the Oregon Health Policy Board are to:
(a) Be the policy-making and  oversight body for the Oregon Health Authority established in ORS
413.032 and all of the authority’s departmental divisions.
(b) Develop and submit a plan to the Legislative Assembly to provide and fund access  to af-
fordable, quality health care for all Oregonians.
(c) Develop a  program to provide health insurance premium assistance to all low and moderate
income individuals who are legal residents of Oregon.
(d) Publish health outcome and quality measure data collected by the  Oregon Health Authority
at aggregate  levels that do not disclose information otherwise protected by law. The information
published must report, for each coordinated care organization and each health  benefit plan sold
through the health insurance exchange or offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit  Board or the
Public Employees’ Benefit Board:
(A) Quality measures;
(B) Costs;
(C) Health outcomes; and
(D) Other information that is necessary for members of the public to evaluate the value of health
services delivered by each coordinated care organization and by each health benefit plan.
(e) Establish evidence-based clinical standards and practice  guidelines that may be used by
[6]
SB 1006
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
providers.
(f) Approve and monitor  community-centered health initiatives described in ORS 413.032 (1)(h)
that are consistent with public health goals, strategies, programs and  performance standards
adopted by the Oregon Health Policy Board to improve the  health of all Oregonians, and to regu-
larly report to the Legislative Assembly on the accomplishments and needed changes  to the initi-
atives.
(g) Establish cost containment mechanisms to reduce health care costs.
(h) Ensure that Oregon’s health care workforce is sufficient  in numbers and training to meet the
demand that will be created by the expansion  in health coverage, health care system transforma-
tions, an increasingly diverse population and an aging workforce.
(i) Work with the Oregon  congressional delegation to advance the adoption of changes in federal
law or policy to promote Oregon’s comprehensive health reform plan.
(j) Establish a health benefit package in accordance with ORS  741.340 to be used as the baseline
for all health benefit plans offered through the health insurance exchange.
(k) Investigate and report annually to the Legislative Assembly on the feasibility  and advis-
ability of future changes to the health insurance market in Oregon,  including but not limited to the
following:
(A) A requirement for every resident to have health insurance coverage.
(B) A payroll tax as a means to encourage employers to continue providing  health insurance to
their employees.
(L) Meet cost-containment goals by  structuring reimbursement rates to reward comprehensive
management of diseases,  quality outcomes and the efficient use of resources by promoting cost-
effective procedures, services  and programs including, without limitation, preventive health, dental
and primary care services, web-based office visits,  telephone consultations and telemedicine consul-
tations.
(m) Oversee the expenditure  of moneys from the Health Care Provider Incentive Fund to support
grants to primary care providers and rural health practitioners,  to increase the number of primary
care educators and to support efforts to create and develop career ladder opportunities.
(n) Work with the Public Health Benefit Purchasers Committee, administrators of the  medical
assistance program and  the Department of Corrections to identify uniform contracting standards for
health benefit plans that  achieve maximum quality and cost outcomes and align the contracting
standards for all state programs to the greatest extent practicable.
(o) Work with the  Health Information Technology Oversight Council to foster health information
technology systems and practices that promote the  Oregon Integrated and Coordinated Health Care
Delivery System established by ORS 414.570 and  align health information technology systems and
practices across this state.
(2) Subject to the approval of the Governor,  the Oregon Health Policy Board  is authorized
to[:]
[(a) Subject to the approval of the Governor, ] organize and reorganize the authority  as the board
considers necessary to properly conduct the work of the authority.
[(b) Submit directly to the Legislative Counsel, no later than  October 1 of each even-numbered year,
requests for measures necessary to provide statutory authorization to carry  out any of the board’s du-
ties or to implement any of the board’s  recommendations. The measures may be filed prior to the be-
ginning of the legislative session in accordance with the rules of the House of Representatives and the
Senate.]
[7]
SB 1006
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(3) If the board or  the authority is unable to perform, in whole or in part, any of the duties
described  in ORS 413.006 to 413.042 and 741.340 without federal approval, the authority is authorized
to request,  in accordance with ORS 413.072, waivers or other approval necessary to perform those
duties. The authority shall implement any portions of  those duties not requiring legislative authority
or federal approval, to the extent practicable.
(4) The enumeration of duties, functions and powers in this section is not  intended to be exclu-
sive nor to limit the duties, functions and powers imposed on the board by ORS 413.006  to 413.042
and 741.340 and by other statutes.
(5) The board shall consult  with the Department of Consumer and Business Services in com-
pleting the tasks set forth in subsection (1)(j) and (k)(A) of this section.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 418.979 is amended to read:
418.979. (1) The purpose of the System of Care Advisory Council is to  improve the effectiveness
and efficacy of  state and local systems of care that provide services to youth by providing a cen-
tralized and impartial forum for statewide policy development and planning.
(2) The primary duty of the council is to develop and maintain a state system of care policy and
a comprehensive, long-range plan for a coordinated state system of care that encompasses public
health, health systems, child welfare, education, juvenile justice and services and  supports for men-
tal and behavioral health and people with intellectual or developmental disabilities. The plan  must
include, but need not be limited to, recommendations regarding:
(a) Capacity, utilization and types of state and local systems of care and services and supports;
(b) Implementation of in-home behavioral health services, crisis  and transition services,
therapeutic foster care, in-home family support services and  the integration of those services with
existing programs of residential  services for individuals with behavioral health needs and intellec-
tual developmental disabilities;
(c) Appropriate use of existing systems of care and services and supports;
(d) Whether additional services and supports are necessary to address gaps in coverage;
(e) Methods for assessing the effectiveness  of systems of care and services and supports in re-
ducing juvenile dependency or delinquency;
(f) Methods of reducing risk of future juvenile dependency or delinquency;
(g) The effective utilization of the local system of care governance structure;
(h) Guidelines for partner agency core values and guiding principles; and
(i) Guidelines that ensure cultural competence in the provision of services and supports by:
(A) Implementing uniform standards to allow local  system of care teams to describe the cul-
turally responsive services and supports available in a system of care.
(B) Providing youth and families with understandable and effective system of care services in a
manner compatible with their disabilities, cultural beliefs  and practices, literacy skills and language.
(C) Developing  and implementing a process to review practices accepted by diverse communities.
(D) Identifying ways to continually improve culturally competent system of care services  and
implementing a statewide system of care that reflects culturally competent practices.
(3) Other duties of the council are to:
(a) Conduct  joint studies on any matter within the jurisdiction of the council by agreement with
the Oregon Youth Authority, the Department of Human Services, the Oregon Health  Authority, the
Department of Education, coordinated care organizations  and any other state agencies, boards or
commissions;
(b) Provide oversight of the implementation of the services described in subsection (2)(b)  of this
[8]
SB 1006
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section by the Oregon Health Authority, the Oregon  Youth Authority and the Department of Human
Services  and  to provide periodic updates on the agencies’ implementation to the Legislative Assem-
bly;
(c) Provide recommendations to the Director of the Oregon  Health Authority, the Director of
the Oregon Youth Authority, the Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction and  the Director of
Human Services as necessary for the agencies to maintain and strengthen the systems of care;
(d) Make recommendations to the Director of the Oregon Health Authority, the Director of  the
Oregon Youth Authority, the Deputy Superintendent  of Public Instruction and the Director of Hu-
man Services to reduce barriers to implementation of systems of care;
(e) Continually monitor and update the Children’s System Data Dashboard described in ORS
418.981, with a specific focus on the number  of youth placed in hotels, out-of-state placements,
emergency department boarding, congregate care facilities, shelter care  or Oregon Youth Authority
custody;  and
(f) Award grants from funds appropriated by the Legislative Assembly to  the council or from
funds otherwise available from any other source, for the purpose of supporting local system of  care
governance  and  for carrying out the recommendations in the council’s plan developed under sub-
section (2) of this section.
(4)(a) On or before January 1 of  every fourth year, the council shall update its plan under sub-
section (2) of this section and submit the plan to an interim  committee of the Legislative Assembly
related to youth, and to the Governor.
(b) On or before September 15 of each year, the council shall  submit a report in the manner
provided in ORS 192.245 to an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related  to youth, and
to the Governor, describing how the council is meeting its  goals and any remaining barriers to ac-
cess to services and supports. The report may include  recommendations for legislation, including
recommendations for changes to the council structure, composition and operating processes.
(c) On or before December 31 of each odd-numbered  year, the council, the Department of Human
Services and the Oregon Health  Authority shall submit a joint report in the manner described in
ORS 192.245 to an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related  to youth, describing mon-
eys appropriated to or otherwise made available to the  department, the authority or the council in
the preceding biennium for the purpose of  providing, or providing access to, the services and sup-
ports described in subsection (2)(b) of this section. The report must include an accounting  of the
expenditures made by the department, the authority and the council  and of any moneys remaining
unspent at the close of the biennium.
(5) The council may:
(a) Apply for and receive gifts and grants from any public or private source.
[(b) Submit proposals  for legislative measures at the time and in the manner prescribed in ORS
171.130 and 171.133.]
[(c)] (b) Adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
(6) The council shall submit  an agency request budget at the time and in the manner prescribed
under ORS 291.208.
(7)(a) All agencies of state government are  directed to assist the council in the performance of
the duties of the council and,  to the extent permitted by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish
information and advice that the members of  the council consider necessary to perform the duties
of the council.
(b) At the council’s request, a participating state  agency shall provide the council with the
[9]
SB 1006
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
agency’s proposed budget form, prior to the agency’s submission  of the form to the Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services under  ORS 291.208, for the council’s review. The council may make
recommendations  to  the agency or, if appropriate, the department regarding the agency’s proposed
expenditures for services and supports necessary to implement the council’s  policy recommendations
under this section.
(8) The council  and participating state agencies shall, where applicable, enter into interagency
agreements to:
(a) Provide staff and resources to assist the council in carrying out the council’s duties;
(b) Share computer systems and technologies, to the extent allowed by law;
(c) Collect and analyze data related to the state system of care and the performance  of the
council’s duties; or
(d) Investigate the effectiveness of the council’s proposals and recommendations  under this sec-
tion.
(9) Moneys  that are appropriated to or otherwise made available to the council or the Oregon
Health Authority for the purpose of  supporting the duties of the council may not be expended except
as directed by the council.
SECTION 10.
 Section 14, chapter 516, Oregon Laws 2001, is amended to read:
Sec. 14.  If, after assuming  authority to administer permits for the discharge of dredge or fill
materials under section 404 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (P.L.  92-500, as amended),
the Department of State Lands seeks to relinquish the authority granted to the department by  the
federal government, the department shall, [ in compliance with ORS 171.130 and ] at least two years
prior to the anticipated date for relinquishing  the authority, submit to the Legislative Assembly a
proposed legislative measure designed to implement a state permitting program for the  dredging and
filling of materials in the waters of this state.
SECTION 11. ORS 171.127 and 171.133 are repealed.
SECTION 12. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which  the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[10]