Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 339.866 is amended to read:
339.866. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Asthma”  means a chronic inflammatory disorder of the airways that requires ongoing med-
ical intervention.
(b) “Medication” means any prescription  for bronchodilators or [ autoinjectable] any premeas-
ured doses of  epinephrine prescribed by a  student’s Oregon licensed health care professional for
asthma or severe allergies.
(c) “Severe allergy” means a life-threatening  hypersensitivity to a specific substance such as
food, pollen or dust.
(2) A school district board shall adopt policies  and procedures that provide for self-
administration of medication by kindergarten  through grade 12 students with asthma or severe
allergies:
(a) In school;
(b) At a school-sponsored activity;
(c) While under the supervision of school personnel;
(d) In before-school or after-school care programs on school-owned property; and
(e) In transit to or from school or school-sponsored activities.
(3) The policies and procedures shall:
(a) Require that an Oregon licensed health  care professional prescribe the medication to be used
by the student during school hours and instruct the student in the correct and responsible  use of
the medication;
(b) Require that  an Oregon licensed health care professional, acting within the scope of the
person’s license, formulate a written treatment plan for managing the student’s asthma  or severe
allergy and for the use of medication by the student during school hours;
(c) Require that  the parent or guardian of the student submit to the school any written doc-
umentation required by the school, including any documents related to liability;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4805
SB 1
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(d) Require that backup medication, if provided by a student’s  parent or guardian, be kept at the
student’s school in a location to which the student has  immediate access in the event the student
has an asthma or severe allergy emergency;
(e) Require the establishment of a process by which the parent or  guardian of a student may
request in writing that backup prescribed [ autoinjectable] epinephrine be kept at a reasonably secure
location in a student’s classroom if:
(A) The  location identified under paragraph (d) of this subsection is not the student’s classroom;
and
(B) A licensed health care professional verifies in writing that lack of immediate access to
[autoinjectable] epinephrine may be life threatening to the student;
(f) Require that a school request from the  student’s parent or guardian that the parent or
guardian provide medication for emergency use by the student; and
(g) Allow a  school to revoke its permission for a student to self-administer medication if the
student does not responsibly self-administer the medication or abuses the use of the medication.
(4) A school district board may impose other policies and procedures that the  board determines
are necessary to protect a student with asthma or a severe allergy.
(5) A school district board may not  require school personnel who have not received appropriate
training to assist a student with asthma or a severe allergy with self-administration of medication.
(6) This section does not apply to youth correction facilities.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 339.867 is amended to read:
339.867. As used in ORS 339.869 and 339.870:
(1)(a) “Medication” means:
(A) Medication that is not injected;
(B) Premeasured doses of epinephrine [ that are injected ];
(C) Medication that is available for treating adrenal insufficiency; and
(D) Naloxone or any similar medication that is in any form available for  safe administration and
that is designed to rapidly reverse an overdose of an opioid drug.
(b) “Medication” does not include nonprescription sunscreen.
(2) “Opioid overdose” has the meaning given that term in ORS 689.800.
(3) “Short-acting opioid antagonist” has the meaning given that term in ORS 689.800.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 339.871 is amended to read:
339.871. (1) A school administrator, school nurse,  teacher or other school employee designated
by the school administrator is not  liable in a criminal action or for civil damages as a result of a
student’s self-administration of medication, as described in ORS 339.866, if the  school administrator,
school nurse, teacher or other school employee,  in compliance with the instructions of the student’s
Oregon licensed health care  professional, in good faith assists the student’s self-administration of the
medication, if the medication is available  to the student pursuant to written permission and in-
structions of the student’s parent, guardian or Oregon licensed health care professional.
(2) A school administrator, school nurse, teacher or other school employee designated  by the
school administrator is not liable in a criminal action or for civil damages as a result of the use of
medication if the school administrator, school  nurse, teacher or other school employee in good faith
administers [ autoinjectable] a premeasured dose of  epinephrine to a student or other individual
with a severe allergy who is unable to self-administer the medication,  regardless of whether the
student or individual has a prescription for epinephrine.
(3) A school district and the members of a school district board are not  liable in a criminal
[2]
SB 1
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
action or for civil damages as a result of the use of medication if:
(a) Any person in good faith administers [ autoinjectable] a premeasured dose of  epinephrine to
a student or other  individual with a severe allergy who is unable to self-administer the medication,
regardless of whether the student or individual has a prescription for epinephrine; and
(b) The  person administered the [ autoinjectable] premeasured dose of  epinephrine on school
premises, including at a school, on school property  under the jurisdiction of the district or at an
activity under the jurisdiction of the school district.
(4) The  civil and criminal immunities imposed by this section do not apply to an act or omission
amounting to gross negligence or willful and wanton misconduct.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 433.815, as amended by section 83, chapter 73, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
433.815. (1) Educational  training on the treatment of allergic responses, as required by ORS
433.800 to 433.830, shall be conducted  by a physician, physician associate or nurse practitioner. The
training may be conducted by any other health care professional licensed under ORS  chapter 678
as assigned by a physician, physician associate  or nurse practitioner, or by an emergency medical
services provider meeting the requirements established by  the Oregon Health Authority by rule. The
curricula shall include, at a minimum, the following subjects:
(a) Recognition of the symptoms of systemic allergic  responses to insect stings and other
allergens;
(b) Familiarity with common factors that are likely to elicit systemic allergic responses;
(c) Proper administration of [ an intramuscular or subcutaneous injection of ] premeasured doses
of epinephrine, including administration by intramuscular or subcutaneous injection,  for se-
vere allergic responses to insect stings and other specific allergens; and
(d) Necessary follow-up treatment.
(2) Educational training on the treatment  of hypoglycemia, as required by ORS 433.800 to
433.830, shall be conducted by a physician, physician associate, nurse practitioner or  any other
health care professional licensed under ORS chapter 678. The curricula shall include, at a  minimum,
the following subjects:
(a) Recognition of the symptoms of hypoglycemia;
(b) Familiarity with common factors that may induce hypoglycemia;
(c) Proper  administration of a subcutaneous injection of glucagon for severe hypoglycemia when
other treatment has failed or cannot be initiated; and
(d) Necessary follow-up treatment.
(3) Educational training on the treatment of  adrenal insufficiency, as required by ORS 433.800
to 433.830, shall be conducted by a physician,  physician associate, nurse practitioner or any other
health care professional licensed under ORS chapter 678. The curricula shall include, at a  minimum,
the following subjects:
(a) General information about adrenal insufficiency and the dangers associated with adrenal  in-
sufficiency;
(b) Recognition of the symptoms of a person who is experiencing an adrenal crisis;
(c) The types of medications that are available for treating adrenal insufficiency; and
(d) Proper administration of medications that treat adrenal insufficiency.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 433.817 is amended to read:
433.817. Educational training on the treatment of allergic responses, as required by ORS  433.800
to 433.830, may be conducted  by a public health authority or organization or by any other entity
[3]
SB 1
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
or individual approved by the  Oregon Health Authority by rule. The training curricula under this
section must include the following subjects:
(1) Recognition of the symptoms of systemic allergic  responses to insect stings and other
allergens;
(2) Familiarity with common factors that are likely to elicit systemic allergic responses;
(3) Proper administration of [ an intramuscular or subcutaneous injection of ] premeasured doses
of epinephrine , including administration by intramuscular or subcutaneous injection,  for  se-
vere allergic responses to insect stings and other specific allergens; and
(4) Necessary follow-up treatment.
[4]