Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Latino Health System” means a culturally specific network  of health care providers
and agencies that address the social determinants of health for Latino individuals who qual-
ify for medical assistance.
(b) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(2) The Latino Health System Task Force is established.
(3) The task force consists of 19 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall  appoint one member from among members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one member from  among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint 17 members, as follows:
(A) Six representatives of health care provider organizations that  specialize in serving
Latino patients, as follows:
(i) One primary care provider employed by a federally qualified health center;
(ii) One behavioral health care provider;
(iii) One oral health care provider;
(iv) One maternal health care provider;
(v) One complementary or alternative medicine provider, such as a naturopathic physi-
cian licensed under ORS chapter 685 or an acupuncturist licensed under ORS chapter 677;
and
(vi) One traditional health worker, as defined in ORS 414.665;
(B) Two representatives of coordinated care organizations;
(C) Two representatives of organizations that advocate for Latinos;
(D) One qualified health care interpreter or  certified health care interpreter, as those
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3788
HB 3650
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
terms are defined in ORS 413.550, who specializes in  Spanish and indigenous languages spo-
ken in Latin America;
(E) One representative of a community-based  organization that specializes in providing
to Latino individuals services that address one or more social determinants of health;
(F) Two consumer representatives who receive medical assistance;
(G) Two representatives of institutions of higher education that train health care pro-
fessionals; and
(H) One representative  of a local workforce development board, as defined in ORS 660.300,
who has expertise in the health care workforce.
(4) The task force shall develop proposals for the  creation of a Latino Health System that
will:
(a) Be open to any medical assistance recipient on a self-selecting basis;
(b) Use Spanish as the primary language, with translation services available in other
languages, including English; and
(c) Address the cultural health care  values of Latino patients, including mobile health
services, household care management, naturopathic services,  whole-person care and
community-embedded health infrastructure.
(5) A  majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority  of the voting
members of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(8) If there  is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call of  the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The task force shall submit a report in the  manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim  committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to health care no later than December 15, 2026.
(12) The Oregon Health Authority shall provide staff support to the task force.
(13) Members of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force  are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the Legislative  Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on the  task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined in  ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance of  the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]