Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
HIGH COST DISABILITY ACCOUNT
SECTION 1.
 ORS 327.348 is amended to read:
327.348. (1) There is established within the State  School Fund a High Cost Disabilities Account.
(2) Each fiscal year, the  Department of Education shall distribute moneys from the account to
school districts as high cost disabilities grants. A school district may receive  moneys from the ac-
count if the school district :
(a) Has a resident pupil with  a disability for whom the approved costs to the school district of
providing special education and related services, as determined under subsection (4) of this  section,
exceed  $30,000.
(b) Has a community impact that causes disproportionately  high costs associated with
the provision of special education and related services, as determined by  the department
based on identified and quantifiable factors that are beyond the control of the school district
and that result in a significantly increased number of  pupils qualifying for special education
and related services.
(3) The amount of moneys received  by a school district under this section [ for each resident pupil
with a disability ] shall equal :
(a) For distributions made  as provided by subsection (2)(a) of this section,  the approved
costs, as determined under subsection (4) of this section, incurred by the school district in  providing
special education and related services to [ the pupil ] each resident  pupil described in subsection
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 230
HB 4077
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2)(a) of this section  minus $30,000.
(b) For distributions  made as provided by subsection (2)(b) of this section, the approved
costs, as determined under subsection (4) of  this section, incurred by the school district in
providing special education and related services to the resident pupils minus any amounts
distributed to the school district as provided by ORS 327.013 (1)(c)(A)(i).
(4) The department shall determine the approved costs incurred by a school  district in providing
special education and related services to [ a pupil ] pupils with a disability. The approved costs in-
curred by a school district may include costs incurred by an education service district of providing
special education and  related services to the school district through the resolution process described
in ORS 334.175. In determining the approved costs for which a school district may receive moneys
under this section, the department shall consider:
(a) How efficiently the  special education and related services are provided by the school district;
and
(b) The use of available resources by the school district.
(5) If the total approved costs for which school districts  are seeking moneys from the account
exceed the amount in the account in  any fiscal year, the department shall prorate the amount of
moneys available  for distribution in the account among those school districts that are eligible for
moneys from the account.
(6) The department shall distribute any moneys  in the account that are not distributed under
this section in any fiscal year to school districts based on ORS 327.008 and 327.013.
(7) The  State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the administration of this
section.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 327.348 by section  1 of this 2024 Act apply to dis-
tributions of the High Cost Disabilities Account commencing  with the 2024-2025 distributions.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department  of Education, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of  $_______, which shall be transferred to the High Cost Disabili-
ties Account for purposes of distributions made under ORS 327.348 (3)(b).
SCHOOL MEDICAID TECHNICAL ADVISORY COMMITTEE
SECTION 4. (1) The School Medicaid Technical Advisory Committee is established.
(2) The committee shall:
(a) Conduct regular reviews of this state’s and other states’ Medicaid state plans, reviews
of federal laws and guidance related to Medicaid and reviews of this state’s statutes and ad-
ministrative rules related to Medicaid with the goals of:
(A) Expanding billable services and provider types that are available  to school districts
to the greatest extent allowable under federal law;
(B) Maximizing the ability of the school districts to bill Medicaid;
(C) Removing barriers to Medicaid billing for school districts;
(D) Analyzing the state’s Medicaid billing methodology to ensure that the needs of  school
districts are best met; and
(E) Ensuring that, whenever possible, the state takes advantage of federal  expansions
related to Medicaid that may impact school districts, including making timely amendments
to the state’s Medicaid state plan.
[2]
HB 4077
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(b) Recommend statutory or administrative rule changes related to Medicaid  and school
districts.
(c) Advise the Oregon Health Authority and the Department of Education on  needs and
opportunities for technical assistance  to, and types of support for, school districts that would
improve and increase Medicaid billing by school districts.
(d) Coordinate efforts with any state-level committees or organizations that address
Medicaid billing by school districts.
(e) Communicate the activities of the  committee after each meeting by posting audio
recordings and meeting minutes online.
(3) The committee consists of 22 members appointed by the Governor as follows:
(a) A representative of the Oregon Health Authority;
(b) A representative of the Department of Education;
(c) A representative of a statewide  organization that represents education service dis-
tricts;
(d) A representative of a statewide organization that represents school administrators;
(e) A representative of a statewide organization of school business officials in this state;
(f) A representative of a statewide organization  that primarily represents licensed
teachers;
(g) A representative of a statewide organization that primarily  represents classified ed-
ucators and educator staff;
(h) A representative of a statewide organization that represents school boards;
(i) A representative of a youth behavioral health professional preparation program;
(j) A school nurse;
(k) A school psychologist;
(L) Two school health providers not described in paragraph (j) or (k) of this subsection;
(m) Seven employees  of school districts or education service districts who have expertise
in Medicaid billing, technology or policy;
(n) One parent of a student who attends a  public school and who has a physical disability;
and
(o) One parent of a student who attends a public school and who has a developmental
disability.
(4) The term of office of each member of the  committee is four years, but a member
serves at the pleasure of the Governor. Before the expiration of the term  of a member, the
Governor shall appoint a successor whose term begins on  January 1 next following. A
member is eligible for reappointment. If there is a vacancy for any cause,  the Governor shall
make an appointment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(5) A majority of the members of the committee constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(6) Official action by the committee requires the approval of a majority  of the members
of the committee.
(7) The members who  represent the Oregon Health Authority and the Department of
Education shall be cochairs of the committee.
(8) The committee shall meet at times and places specified by the call of the cochairs  or
of a majority  of the members of the committee, provided that the committee meets at least
twice a year.
[3]
HB 4077
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(9) The committee may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the committee.
(10) The Oregon Health Authority and the Department of Education shall  jointly provide
staff support to the committee.
(11) Members of the committee  are not entitled to compensation, but may be reimbursed
for actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred by them  in the performance of
their official duties in the manner and amounts provided for in ORS 292.495.
(12) All agencies of state government, as  defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the committee in the performance of the  duties of the committee and, to the extent per-
mitted by law relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and  advice the members of
the committee consider necessary to perform their duties.
RECOVERY SCHOOLS
SECTION 5.
 ORS 336.680 is amended to read:
336.680. (1) As used  in this section, “approved recovery school” means a school that is under
an agreement with the Department of Education to provide students  enrolled in the school with a
holistic approach to:
(a) Educational services for grades 9 through 12; and
(b) Health care services related to recovery from substance use disorders.
(2) The department shall provide or cause to be provided appropriate  education for students
enrolled in an approved  recovery school. For the purpose of paying the costs of providing education
to students enrolled in an approved recovery  school, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
make the following:
(a) Payments from amounts available from the State School Fund under ORS 327.029.
(b) Payments from  the Statewide Education Initiatives Account, as provided by rule adopted by
the State Board of Education in collaboration with  the advisory committee convened under ORS
336.685. The rules adopted as provided  by this paragraph may include a minimum amount, a maxi-
mum amount or both for approved recovery schools.
(3) The Superintendent of Public Instruction may contract with  a school district, an education
service district or a public charter school to provide or cause to be  provided appropriate education
to students enrolled in an approved recovery  school. Unless otherwise specified, any educational
services provided under a contract entered into under this  subsection shall be paid as described in
this section and not by any other state moneys distributed based on average daily membership  that
are available  to the school district, education service district or public charter school for the pur-
pose of providing educational services.
(4) The State Board of Education shall adopt by rule the standards for  a recovery school to
become and operate as an approved recovery school. The standards must provide that:
(a) The recovery school  must align, to the extent identified by the board, with standards for
accreditation established by a nonprofit accrediting organization composed of representatives  of re-
covery  schools  and individuals who support the growth of recovery schools. The standards must in-
clude requirements that:
(A) The recovery school, in compliance with timelines established by the department, be  ac-
credited by a nonprofit accrediting organization that establishes standards  for recovery schools.
Nothing in this subparagraph requires the recovery school to be  accredited at the time the super-
intendent first enters into a contract with the recovery school.
[4]
HB 4077
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(B) Student enrollment in the recovery school  is voluntary. No school district or state or local
agency may compel or otherwise require  a student to enroll in a recovery school. Students enrolled
in an approved recovery school may not be counted in determining the  number of pupils in average
daily membership for purposes of ORS 334.175 (5).
(C) All students who reside in this state and who meet the eligibility criteria established  under
subsection (8) of this section may enroll in an approved  recovery school if space is available. If
space is not available, the approved recovery school may prioritize  for enrollment student groups
identified in ORS 327.180 (2)(b).
(D) The school  district, education service district or public charter school with which the de-
partment has entered into a contract for a  recovery school must agree to award high school diplo-
mas, modified diplomas, extended  diplomas and alternative certificates as provided by ORS 329.451
and 339.877. An entity that awards high school diplomas as provided by this subparagraph:
(i) May not impose requirements for a high school diploma that are in addition to the require-
ments prescribed by ORS 329.451 (2)(a) or by rule of the State Board of Education; and
(ii) Must accept any credits previously earned  by students in another school or educational
program in this state and apply those credits toward the requirements prescribed by ORS 329.451
(2)(a) or by rule of the State Board of Education.
[(E) Except as provided by subparagraph (F) of this paragraph, the recovery school  must satisfy
the same laws that apply to public charter schools under ORS 338.115. ]
(E) Statutes and rules that apply only to school district boards, school districts or  other
public schools do not apply to approved recovery  schools, except that the following laws do
apply to approved recovery schools:
(i) Federal law;
(ii) ORS 30.260 to 30.300 (tort claims);
(iii) ORS 192.311 to 192.478 (public records law);
(iv) ORS 192.610 to 192.705 (public meetings law);
(v) ORS chapters 279A, 279B and 279C (Public Contracting Code);
(vi) ORS 297.405 to 297.555 and 297.990 (Municipal Audit Law);
(vii) ORS 326.565, 326.575 and 326.580 (student records);
(viii) ORS 181A.195, 326.603, 326.607 and 342.223 (criminal records checks);
(ix) ORS 329.045 (academic content standards and instruction);
(x) ORS 329.451 (high school diploma,  modified diploma, extended diploma and certificate
of attendance);
(xi) ORS 329.496 (physical education);
(xii) The  statewide assessment system developed by the Department of Education for
mathematics, science and language arts under ORS 329.485 (2);
(xiii) ORS 336.840 (use of personal electronic devices);
(xiv) ORS 337.150 (textbooks);
(xv) ORS 339.119 (consideration for educational services);
(xvi) ORS 339.141, 339.147 and 339.155 (tuition and fees);
(xvii) ORS 339.250 (9) (prohibition on infliction of corporal punishment);
(xviii) ORS 339.326 (notice concerning students subject to juvenile court petitions);
(xix) ORS 339.370 to 339.400 (reporting of suspected abuse  and suspected sexual conduct);
(xx) ORS 342.856 (core teaching standards);
(xxi) ORS chapter 657 (Employment Department Law);
[5]
HB 4077
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(xxii) ORS 332.505 (2), 659.850, 659.855 and 659.860 (discrimination);
(xxiii) Any  statute or rule that establishes requirements for instructional time provided
by a school during each day or during a year;
(xxiv) Statutes and rules that expressly apply to recovery schools;
(xxv) Health and safety statutes and rules; and
(xxvi) Statutes and rules that expressly apply  only to school district boards, school dis-
tricts and other public  schools but that apply to an approved recovery school under the
contract for the approved recovery school.
(F) All administrators and teachers at the recovery school must be licensed by the  Teacher
Standards and Practices Commission.
(G) An approved recovery school may:
(i) Enter into contracts and lease facilities and services from a school district, an  edu-
cation service district, a public university listed in  ORS 352.002, a governmental unit or any
person or legal entity.
(ii) Receive and  accept gifts, grants and donations from any source for expenditure to
carry out the lawful functions of the school.
(iii) Receive services from an  education service district in the same manner as other
public schools in the school district in which the approved recovery school is located.
(H) An approved recovery school must comply with the  requirements of the uniform
budget and accounting system adopted by rule of the State Board of Education under  ORS
327.511.
(b) Recovery schools will be approved, to the greatest extent practicable, in a manner that:
(A) Represents a geographic distribution across this state; and
(B) Takes into consideration the needs for services by the  community in which the recovery
school would be located.
(5) Any school that provides the services of  a recovery school may enter into a contract with
the superintendent to become an approved recovery school, including schools already providing  the
services of a recovery school and schools that are proposing to provide the services of a recovery
school.
(6) An approved recovery school may enter into agreements with  other entities, including
community-based organizations and federally recognized  tribes of this state, for the purposes of
providing educational and health care services to students enrolled  in the approved recovery school.
(7)(a) The department shall be responsible for:
(A) Identifying, locating  and evaluating students enrolled in an approved recovery school who
may be in need of special education and related services; and
(B) Ensuring that eligible students receive special education and related services.
(b) For the purpose of this subsection, the department may enter  into a contract with a school
district or an education service district.
(8) The department shall establish eligibility criteria for students to enroll in an approved  re-
covery school, based on input from the advisory  committee convened under ORS 336.685 and based
on research from a nonprofit organization composed of representatives of  recovery schools and in-
dividuals who support the growth of recovery schools and other relevant organizations.
(9) For the purposes of administering this section:
(a) The State Board of Education shall adopt any necessary rules.
(b) The  department shall collaborate with the Oregon Health Authority, the Youth Development
[6]
HB 4077
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
Division, the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission, the Oregon Youth Authority, the  Department
of Human Services and local public health and mental health authorities  or providers and shall co-
ordinate, to the greatest extent practicable, funding of services provided  in relation to approved
recovery schools.
(10) Each  biennium, the Department of Education shall prepare a report on the progress, suc-
cesses and challenges of approved recovery schools and submit that report to:
(a) The interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education; and
(b) The advisory committee convened under ORS 336.685.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 6.
The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader  and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 7. This 2024 Act takes effect July 1, 2024.
[7]