Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Department of Environmental  Quality shall contract with an independ-
ent third-party entity to provide technical assistance to municipalities on  matters related to
state and federal wastewater permitting requirements.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the Department  of Environmental Quality, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019,
out of the General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended for  the purposes
described in section 1 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3935