Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Legislative Policy and Research Office shall study issues related  to
granting license reciprocity in this state for skilled trade  workers, including the feasibility
of extending reciprocity to workers  from other states and accepting education and training
that workers receive in  other countries. The office shall present the results of the study in
a report  to an appropriate committee or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly in
the manner provided under ORS 192.245 on or before September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3085