Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 and 3 of  this 2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 183.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “permit” has the meaning given that term in ORS
183.700.
(2) An agency shall establish efficient deadlines within which the agency intends  to pro-
cess applications for each permit issued by the agency. The agency shall make the  deadlines
available to the public.
(3) To the greatest extent possible, an agency that fails to process an application for a
permit before the deadline established under this section shall refund the application fee for
the permit and finish processing the application.
(4) This section does not confer any right to challenge a rule, order, outcome of a permit
application or other action or inaction of an agency.
SECTION 3. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Complete application” means an application for which the applicant has properly and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 4746
HB 3918
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
timely submitted all information required by an agency to act upon the application.
(b) “Permit” has the meaning given that term in ORS 183.700.
(2) No  later than 60 days following the effective date of this 2025 Act, an agency shall
publish a catalog of permits issued by  the agency. For each permit issued by the agency, the
catalog must include:
(a) A description of the permit.
(b) The duration of the permit.
(c) The statutory authority, regulatory authority or other authority  for issuing the per-
mit.
(d) The method by which the agency receives  applications for the permit and, if readily
available, the date the method was last significantly updated.
(e) Any statutory, regulatory  or other authority governing the time within which the
agency must process applications for the permit.
(f) The application fee for  the permit, the statutory, regulatory or other authority for the
application fee and when the amount of the application fee was last changed.
(g) An analysis of the time in which,  with existing resources, the agency could consist-
ently process complete applications for the permit.
(h) A description of  the steps in the current approval process, as well as any post-
approval steps that must be completed before a person can use the permit.
(i) For the year 2024:
(A) The number of applications received for the permit.
(B) The average processing time for all applications for the  permit, including applications
that were initially incomplete.
(C) The average processing time for complete applications for the permit.
(D) The average time between approval of the permit and any necessary post-approval
step.
(j) An analysis identifying opportunities to streamline the approval  process for the per-
mit, eliminate any  unnecessary steps or barriers, reduce the incidence of incomplete appli-
cations and eliminate any obsolete or unnecessary approval processes.
(k) The approximate  number of applications for the permit currently pending at the
agency and a statement of whether a backlog exists.
SECTION 4.
Section 3 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
[2]