Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission  shall work with Portland
State University and community colleges  operated under ORS chapter 341 to establish a
program that provides a full post-secondary educational experience for youth with  intellec-
tual and developmental disabilities.
(2) The program established under subsection (1) of this section shall:
(a) Establish and plan for the expansion  of an individualized model of support that pro-
vides the opportunity to  learn and succeed within a community college experience to youth
with intellectual and developmental disabilities who  enroll in a two-year program at partic-
ipating community colleges;
(b) Ensure that youth with intellectual and  developmental disabilities who complete a
two-year program at participating community colleges have  the option to complete their
studies in the nondegree  prebaccalaureate Career and Community Studies program at
Portland State University;
(c) Provide individualized support for youth with intellectual and  developmental disabili-
ties across inclusive academic,  employment and social engagement activities at the campus
of each participating community college and at Portland State University;
(d) Include, to  the degree possible, partnership with community stakeholders and
nonprofit organizations to provide needed employment and community living supports  to
youth with intellectual and developmental disabilities;
(e) Prepare youth with  intellectual and developmental disabilities for post-graduation
outcomes, including pathways  to employment that are aligned with career goals and that
promote independent living and engagement within neighborhoods and communities;
(f) Support the commitment  of community college and public university faculty to es-
tablish instructional routines that serve a full range of  learners through a focused universal
design for learning; and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 783
SB 572
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
(g) Support equitable access  to an inclusive college experience for youth with intellectual
and developmental disabilities by encouraging undergraduate students and graduate students
to serve as academic coaches, peer navigators and career counselors for  youth with intel-
lectual and developmental disabilities.
(3) As used in this section,  “youth with intellectual and developmental disabilities” means
individuals between 16 and 26 years of age with an intellectual  or developmental disability
who:
(a) Require modifications  to the standard academic curriculum in order to successfully
engage in coursework, integrated supported employment and social activities; and
(b)(A) Enroll in the nondegree prebaccalaureate Career and  Community Studies program
at Portland State University; or
(B) Enroll at a community college in a two-year program that is developed  under this
section.
SECTION 2.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $600,000, to be allocated to Portland  State
University for the support of the Career and Community  Studies program, including the ac-
ademic support, job development and employment services components of the program.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there  is appropri-
ated to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $900,000, to be allocated to community colleges
that participate in establishing  the program for youth with intellectual and developmental
disabilities described in section 1 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2023.
[2]