Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Housing and Community Services Department shall study issues related
to building in areas affected by wildfires and present the results of the study  in a report to
an appropriate committee or interim committee of the  Legislative Assembly in the manner
provided under ORS 192.245 on or before September 15, 2022.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on December 31, 2022.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2181