Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “executive department” has the meaning given
that term in ORS 174.112, except that “executive department” does not include  the Secretary
of State in performing the duties of the constitutional office  of Secretary of State or the
State Treasurer in performing the duties of the constitutional office of State Treasurer.
(2) The State Chief  Information Officer shall contract with a third party to conduct an
independent assessment of the information technology  environment within the executive
department.
(3) The assessment shall:
(a) Examine the current:
(A) Information technology governance programs used  within the executive department;
and
(B) Organizational and operational  environments that are affecting performance, oper-
ations and resources within the executive department;
(b) Identify and describe alternative information  technology governance programs and
organizational and operational models for consideration to be  used by or within the executive
department;
(c) Recommend  an information technology governance program and organizational and
operational models that may be adopted and used by or within the executive department  to
improve performance, operations and resources;
(d) Conduct a gap analysis  to compare the current information technology environment
with the recommended information technology environment; and
(e) Provide a plan to implement the recommendations, including estimated costs and time
frames.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1381
HB 3230
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
(4) The assessment must be completed no later than 
, 2026.
(5) The State Chief Information Officer shall submit a  report in the manner provided by
ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the Governor and to the
Joint Legislative Committee on Information Management  and Technology and any other ap-
propriate legislative committee no  later than 
, 2026. The report submitted under
this subsection shall provide the results of the  assessment and include a budget request to
carry out the plan to implement the recommendations.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]