Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “child-caring agency”  has the meaning given that
term in ORS 418.205.
(2) The Department of Human Services shall administer an  Emergency High Acuity
Youth Initiative program for the provision of care  and services to children with high acuity
needs who are in the protective custody of the department. The department shall enter  into
contracts with no more than 10 child-caring agencies to provide and coordinate the  provision
of services and supports for children with  high acuity needs who are in the protective cus-
tody of the department, including health care, mental health  treatment, behavioral health
and substance use disorder treatment, residential  therapeutic services and post-discharge
community and wraparound services.
(3) Contracts entered into under this section must, at a minimum:
(a) Require that the child-caring agency be able to provide residential  services and sup-
ports for up to 12 children at a time;
(b) Provide that the department shall pay the child-caring agency a flat rate of $1,200  per
day per child the child-caring agency is capable of providing  residential services and supports
to, regardless of whether the child-caring agency  is at maximum capacity, to ensure that
appropriate emergency placement options are available when needed;
(c) Provide that child-caring agency staff may not be paid less than $30 per hour;
(d) Be for an initial two-year  term with an option to extend the term by no more than
two years, during which  time the reimbursement rate described in paragraph (b) of this
subsection must be adjusted for inflation;
(e) Require the child-caring agency to provide quarterly reports to the department  re-
garding, at a minimum, patient outcomes;
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 203
HB 4087
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
(f) Require the child-caring agency to continue  to provide or to coordinate the provision
of services and supports to each child discharged from the  child-caring agency to ensure
continuity of services and wraparound supports for the child and the child’s family; and
(g) Include incentives if the  child-caring agency meets certain benchmarks established
by the department by rule.
(4) No later than September 15  of each year, the department shall submit, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to human services, a report  on the contracts
entered into under this section, including anonymized data on children’s outcomes, and may
include recommendations for legislation.
SECTION 2.
The Department of Human Services shall  contract with a provider associ-
ation that represents no fewer than 25 child-caring agencies,  as defined in ORS 418.205, to
facilitate data  sharing among child-caring agencies and to provide recommendations to the
department regarding best practices, proposals for improvements in the systems  of care for
children in the protective custody of the department and ways to improve outcomes for  such
children and the families of such children.
SECTION 3. (1) The Department  of Human Services shall enter into the contracts de-
scribed in sections 1 and 2 of this 2024 Act  no later than 60 days after the operative date set
forth in section 5 of this 2024 Act.
(2) The report described in section 1 of this 2024 Act is first due on September 15, 2025.
SECTION 4.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Human Services, for the biennium ending June 30,  2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $350,000, which may be expended  for carrying out the purposes
of section 2 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 5. (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this 2024 Act become operative on July 1, 2024.
(2) The Department of Human Services may take any action before the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  to enable to the department to
exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section,  all of the
duties, functions and powers conferred on the department by sections  1 and 2 of this 2024
Act.
SECTION 6. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the  public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is  declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]