Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
DEFINITIONS
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 8 of this 2023 Act:
(1) “Aquaculture” means  the farming of aquatic animals or aquatic plants for the pri-
mary purpose of producing food for humans.
(2) “Aquaculture facility”:
(a) Means a facility that engages in aquaculture by propagating,  rearing, holding, har-
vesting, transporting, receiving the transport of or slaughtering aquatic animals, either on
land or in a natural or artificial body of water.
(b) Does not include:
(A) A business entity that:
(i) Is owned and operated independently from all other businesses; and
(ii) Has annual gross revenues of less than $500,000, as reported on a tax return  submit-
ted to the federal government or the Department of Revenue; or
(B) A fish hatchery, including a facility subject to the provisions of  ORS 497.325, 506.213
or 508.700 to 508.745.
(3) “Aquatic animal” means:
(a) Finfish belonging to the classes  Agnatha (jawless fishes), Chondrichthyes
(cartilaginous fishes) and Osteichthyes (bony fishes);
(b) Mollusks belonging to the class Cephalopoda; and
(c) Any other game fish or food fish that is used as food  for humans or for industrial
purposes, if the State Fish and Wildlife Commission designates the game fish or  food fish as
an aquatic animal under this section.
(4) “Enclosure” means an area in which a group of farmed aquatic  animals is held, in-
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 715
HB 2655
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cluding a tank, laboratory, pen, net, raceway, incubator or pond.
(5) “Environmental enrichment” means materials or other features that:
(a) Add complexity to the environment;
(b) Encourage the expression of natural behaviors such as  hiding, foraging or exploring;
and
(c) Decrease the expression of abnormal or deleterious behaviors such as nipping or
cannibalism.
(6) “Farmed aquatic animal” means an aquatic animal propagated, reared, held,  har-
vested or slaughtered at, or transported to or from, an aquaculture facility,  including an
aquatic animal bred in captivity or  captured in the wild and intended for use in an
aquaculture facility.
(7) “Food fish” has the meaning given that term in ORS 506.011.
(8) “Game fish” has the meaning given that term in ORS 496.009.
(9) “Genetically engineered or transgenic”:
(a) Means produced through the modification, cloning or manipulation of genes using
biotechnology.
(b) Does not include simple selective breeding.
(10) “Slaughter process” means the period of time from the removal of a farmed  aquatic
animal from the habitat of the farmed aquatic animal through any  sedation, stunning and
transport and until slaughter.
FINDINGS ON AQUACULTURE
SECTION 2.
The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(1) Aquaculture may be a growing industry.
(2) The state has a duty to protect the natural resources  and ecosystems of this state,
and a duty to ensure the humane treatment of animals raised for food.
(3) Aquaculture presents risks to the environment  and animal welfare, among other
risks, and the risks may be mitigated through appropriate regulation.
(4) Expert input is required in order  to fully understand the risks associated with
aquaculture and establish appropriate regulation.
(5) To adequately protect this state’s natural resources, aquaculture operations  must
adhere to certain minimum standards related  to preventing pollution and protecting water
quality.
(6) Fish are sentient  beings capable of experiencing pain, stress and fear, but no state
or federal law directly addresses the welfare of fish in aquaculture operations.
(7) To adequately ensure the  humane treatment of animals used in aquaculture,
aquaculture operations must adhere to certain minimum  standards concerning enrichment,
stocking density, transportation and slaughter, among other standards.
(8) The humane treatment of animals used in aquaculture  may benefit producers, work-
ers and consumers.
FINFISH AND CEPHALOPOD AQUACULTURE
SECTION 3.
(1) An aquaculture facility shall apply  for a license from the State Depart-
[2]
HB 2655
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
ment of Fish and Wildlife and submit, as part of the application, a plan for:
(a) Preventing the spread of disease from the aquatic animals at the proposed
aquaculture facility to wild species of game fish or food fish;
(b) Reducing the incidence of disease at the proposed aquaculture facility; and
(c) Remediating disease that occurs at the proposed aquaculture facility.
(2) Before issuing a license under this section, the department shall:
(a) Conduct an environmental review of the proposed  aquaculture facility that includes
assessment of:
(A) The effects of the proposed aquaculture facility on the public interest;
(B) The direct and indirect effects of the proposed aquaculture  facility on the aquatic
habitat and existing populations of game fish or food fish, including:
(i) The impacts of fish waste and fish feed introduced into the aquatic habitat;
(ii) Any proposed use of animal drugs, pesticides or other chemicals; and
(iii) The potential for the escape  of the aquatic animals from the aquaculture facility,
other types of pollution or the spread of disease to wild species of game fish or  food fish; and
(C) The cumulative  effects of the proposed aquaculture facility and any other aquaculture
facilities, and businesses subject to the licensing requirements of ORS 497.252, in the vicinity
of the proposed aquaculture facility; and
(b) Provide the public with notice and  an opportunity to comment on the proposed
aquaculture facility and the environmental review.
(3) The department may not issue a license to a proposed aquaculture facility if:
(a) The environmental review indicates that the  proposed aquaculture facility will ad-
versely affect the aquatic habitat, existing populations of game fish or food fish or the public
interest; or
(b) The proposed  aquaculture facility would be located in marine waters, including the
ocean, an estuary or a bay.
(4) An aquaculture facility licensed under this section:
(a) May not release an aquatic animal from  the aquaculture facility into the waters of
this state.
(b) May not propagate or rear a genetically engineered or transgenic aquatic animal.
(c) Shall eliminate plastic pollution to the greatest extent possible, including by:
(A) Avoiding the use of  plastics in the waters of this state unless there is no alternative;
and
(B) Reducing the use of plastics that may enter the waters of this state as waste or by
other means.
(5) The provisions of ORS 468B.025 and 468B.050 apply to an  aquaculture facility licensed
under this section.
(6) The department may adopt rules to implement  this section, including rules estab-
lishing license application procedures, fees and license renewal requirements.
SECTION 4.
(1) To ensure the humane  treatment of farmed aquatic animals, an
aquaculture facility:
(a) Must address water quality at the aquaculture facility, including by:
(A) Providing adequate fresh water, aeration and oxygen.
(B) Removing or filtering water so water parameters remain within tolerable  limits for
specific species of aquatic animals and the characteristics of the aquaculture facility.
[3]
HB 2655
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Remediating the effects of feed in the water or densely stocked aquatic animals.
(b) May not stock aquatic animals at levels  that exceed the optimal density for specific
species of aquatic animals.
(c) Must provide the aquatic animals with environmental enrichment that is:
(A) Easily accessible by all aquatic animals in an enclosure.
(B) Cleaned and maintained to protect water quality and encourage use of  the environ-
mental enrichment.
(d) Must provide the aquatic animals with an appropriate environment  that includes a
total swimmable volume of water acceptable for specific species of aquatic animals.
(e) May not physically alter an aquatic animal.
(f) May not operate in a  manner that results in average monthly mortality of aquatic
animals exceeding 1 percent.
(g) Must require agents of the aquaculture facility to:
(A) Handle aquatic animals as quickly and gently  as possible, in a manner that reduces
stress and injury;
(B) Promptly treat or humanely euthanize sick or injured aquatic animals;
(C) Promptly and humanely euthanize physically deformed aquatic animals; and
(D) Undertake euthanasia in a  manner that causes rapid insensibility immediately fol-
lowed by, or contemporaneous with, death.
(h) May use equipment that comes into direct contact with aquatic animals, such as
fishing nets or holding containers, only if the equipment  is designed to minimize the risk of
injury to the aquatic animals.
(i) Must tailor feed to:
(A) The stages of development of specific species of aquatic animals; and
(B) The nutrient requirements of specific species  of aquatic animals to promote growth,
the development of a good immune system and stable health.
(j) Must adjust the amount  of feed and feeding frequency as needed to prevent stress
caused by oxygen depletion.
(k) May breed aquatic animals only through appropriate breeding practices.
(L) Notwithstanding ORS 498.012 and 610.105, may not take lethal action against a  pred-
ator.
(m) May only transport live aquatic animals:
(A) In  containers that are suitable for the specific species of the aquatic animals, easy
to clean, able to be disinfected and designed to prevent injuries and reduce stress; and
(B) To minimize water quality deterioration and injury and stress to the  aquatic animals:
(i) For durations as short as possible; and
(ii) With as low a density of aquatic animals as is professionally justifiable.
(n) Must provide persons that transport aquatic animals  from the aquaculture facility
with training and encourage the persons to regularly check water quality  during transport,
to prevent injury or stress to the aquatic animals as much as practicable.
(o) Must require persons that transport aquatic animals from the aquaculture facility to:
(A) Establish a quality assurance system to improve the transport;
(B) Record the death of aquatic animals during transport; and
(C) Regularly evaluate the quality of the transport.
(p) Must comply with any other requirements for humane treatment of aquatic animals
[4]
HB 2655
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
that are established in rule by the State Department of Agriculture.
(2) In consultation  with scientific experts, representatives of the aquaculture industry
and advocates of the  environment and animal welfare, the department shall adopt rules to
implement this section that ensure the humane treatment of farmed aquatic animals.
SECTION 5.
(1) To ensure that the slaughter, and any handling related to the slaughter,
of farmed aquatic animals is humane, an aquaculture facility  that slaughters aquatic ani-
mals:
(a) Must stun the aquatic animals fully and irreversibly before or during slaughter.
(b) May stun and slaughter aquatic animals simultaneously only if the  stunning occurs
instantly, so the aquatic animals do not experience pain, fear or sensation.
(c) Must sedate  or immobilize aquatic animals in a humane manner before stunning, if
necessary to maximize the welfare of the aquatic animals.
(d) Must slaughter aquatic animals promptly  after stunning and before the aquatic ani-
mals regain consciousness.
(e) Must provide a quiet and  nonstimulatory environment during the slaughter process,
including by reducing sound and light intensity for the aquatic animals while maintaining
adequate lighting for persons involved in the slaughter.
(f) Must provide water quality in  the slaughter environment, during the slaughter pro-
cess, that is similar to that of  the environment in which the aquatic animals have been liv-
ing, or that is optimized for the specific species of aquatic animals.
(g) May only use methods, devices and equipment for stunning and slaughter that:
(A) Are humane;
(B) Are specific to the species and life stages of the aquatic animals;
(C) Are tested and proven to be effective before being used;
(D) Are properly calibrated for the species and size of the aquatic animals;
(E) Are checked regularly; and
(F) Are  safe, effective and properly maintained to ensure each animal is receiving an ef-
fective stun.
(h) May not:
(A) Use  gas, including carbon dioxide or another method that blocks oxygen uptake, for
sedation or stunning of aquatic animals;
(B) Use salt, ammonia  or another chemical with a similar effect for sedation or stunning
of aquatic animals;
(C) Thermically shock, by boiling or rapid chilling, a conscious aquatic animal;
(D) Slaughter more aquatic animals per unit of time than is justifiable  with regard to the
welfare of the aquatic animals and worker health and safety; or
(E) Engage in any practice prohibited by rule by the State Department of Agriculture.
(i) Must stun and slaughter an aquatic animal that is transported to the aquaculture fa-
cility for the purpose of  slaughter as soon as possible after the aquatic animal arrives at the
aquaculture facility.
(j) Must  require that agents of the aquaculture facility that slaughter aquatic animals
or operate slaughter equipment:
(A) Have species-specific knowledge of aquatic animals at the aquaculture facility;
(B) Are trained to use the equipment;
(C) Are present during the slaughter process in numbers  sufficient to protect the welfare
[5]
HB 2655
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of the aquatic animals; and
(D) Undertake a documented training program provided by the aquaculture facility.
(2) In consultation  with scientific experts, representatives of the aquaculture industry
and advocates of the environment and animal welfare, the department:
(a) Shall adopt rules to implement this  section that ensure the humane treatment of
farmed aquatic animals during the slaughter process.
(b) May adopt rules that set an upper limit on the slaughter speed for  different slaughter
methods and species of aquatic animals.
SECTION 6.
(1) An aquaculture facility shall keep detailed records of:
(a) Veterinary review or treatment of aquatic animals.
(b) Medications or vaccinations administered to aquatic animals.
(c) Any outbreaks of infectious disease.
(d) Water quality tests.
(e) Equipment checks.
(f) Equipment servicing and maintenance.
(g) Staff trainings related to aquatic animals  and worker health and safety, including
information on which staff members are competent to  perform a vaccination, sedation,
stunning or slaughter.
(h) Any violations of sections 1 to 8 of this 2023 Act.
(i) Any slaughter performed at the aquaculture facility, including records of:
(A) The numbers of aquatic animals slaughtered per day, week, month and year;
(B) Slaughter broken down by species;
(C) Methods of slaughter;
(D) The effectiveness of stunning methods; and
(E) Any problems with stunning methods and any efforts to remediate the problems.
(2) The aquaculture facility shall:
(a) Immediately report any outbreak of infectious disease to the Department of Envi-
ronmental Quality,  the State Department of Agriculture and the State Department of Fish
and Wildlife, as well as any other relevant health and safety entities;
(b) Immediately report to the State Department of Agriculture any technical failure  or
other condition at the aquaculture facility that has the potential to cause significant negative
effects on the welfare of aquatic animals;
(c) Annually submit the records required under subsection (1) of this  section to the de-
partment; and
(d) Make the records publicly available.
(3) The department shall post the records on a department website.
(4) In consultation with scientific experts, representatives of the  aquaculture industry
and advocates of the environment and animal welfare, the department shall  adopt rules to
implement this section.
SECTION 7.
(1) The Aquatic Animals  Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the  General Fund. All moneys in the Aquatic Animals Fund are contin-
uously appropriated to the State Department of Agriculture for:
(a) Carrying out the provisions of sections 1 to 8 of this 2023 Act;
(b) Actions and activities benefiting aquatic animals, including  conducting education re-
garding the humane treatment of aquatic animals; and
[6]
HB 2655
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(c) Making grants available to aquaculture facilities seeking  to transition to more hu-
mane methods of operation, or to aquaculture related to aquatic plants instead of aquatic
animals.
(2) The fund shall consist of any moneys:
(a) Transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or from any other source; and
(b) Received under ORS 616.997 (7).
(3) Interest earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund.
ENFORCEMENT
SECTION 8.
(1) The Attorney General, a state agency, a county  attorney, a district at-
torney, a city attorney or a person residing or doing business in the county where  an
aquaculture facility is located may apply to the circuit  court for the county in which the
aquaculture facility is located for a temporary or  permanent injunction requiring the
aquaculture facility to:
(a) Refrain from any activity or  inactivity constituting a violation of sections 1 to 8 of
this 2023 Act or another applicable law; and
(b) Take any actions necessary to remedy the violation.
(2) The circuit court may award reasonable attorney fees to  a plaintiff prevailing under
this section.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 616.992 is amended to read:
616.992. The violation of any provisions of this chapter or of any rule adopted under this
chapter , or of any provision of sections 1 to 8 of this 2023 Act,  is a Class B misdemeanor for a
first offense, and a Class A misdemeanor for a second or subsequent offense.
SECTION 10.  ORS 616.997 is amended to read:
616.997. (1) In addition to any penalty available under ORS 561.190, 616.992 or 616.994,  the State
Department of Agriculture may impose a civil penalty for a violation of this chapter,  of rules, reg-
ulations or standards adopted [ under this chapter ] thereunder, of sections 1 to 8 of  this 2023 Act
or a rule adopted thereunder  or of an order issued under  ORS 616.713. For the purposes of this
section, each day a violation continues after the period of time  established for compliance shall be
considered a separate violation unless the department finds that a different period of time  is more
appropriate to describe a specific violation event.
(2) The department may adopt rules establishing a schedule of civil penalties that may be im-
posed under this section. Civil penalties imposed under this section , other  than civil penalties
imposed for a violation of sections  1 to 8 of this 2023 Act or rules adopted thereunder,  may
not exceed $10,000 for each violation.
(3) Rules establishing a schedule of penalties for violation of sections 1 to 8 of this  2023
Act or rules adopted thereunder must prioritize the  welfare of farmed aquatic animals, as
defined in section 1 of this 2023 Act, and the water quality of waters of this state.
(4) To establish liability of an aquaculture facility, as  defined in section 1 of this 2023 Act,
for a violation of sections 1 to 8 of this  2023 Act or rules adopted thereunder, the department
shall demonstrate that the  owner or operator of the aquaculture facility knew or should have
known of the violation.
[(3)] (5)  When  the department imposes a civil penalty under subsection (1) of this section, the
department shall impose the penalty in the manner provided  by ORS 183.745, except that the written
[7]
HB 2655
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
application for a  hearing must be received by the department no later than 10 days after the date
of mailing or personal service of the notice of civil penalty.
[(4)] (6) Moneys received by the department from civil  penalties imposed under this section shall
be deposited in the General Fund to the credit of the Department of Agriculture Account.
(7) Notwithstanding subsection (6)  of this section, moneys received by the department
from civil penalties imposed under this section for violation of sections 1  to 8 of this 2023
Act or rules adopted thereunder shall be deposited in  the Aquatic Animals Fund established
by section 7 of this 2023 Act.
RELATED AMENDMENTS
SECTION 11.
 ORS 497.252 is amended to read:
497.252. (1) Except as provided in ORS 508.700 to  508.745 and 622.220, [ no] a person [ shall] may
not engage in the business of propagating game fish  or food fish for sale , other than the business
of operating an aquaculture facility subject to the provisions  of section 3 of this 2023 Act,
unless a fish propagation license is first obtained from the State Department of Fish and Wildlife.
(2) The [ State Fish and Wildlife Commission ] department  may refuse to issue a  license to an
applicant if  the [ commission] department  finds that the conduct of the fish propagation business
would tend to be harmful to existing game fish or food fish populations.
(3) The [ commission] State Fish and Wildlife  Commission, by rule, may prescribe requirements
for the care, inspection, transportation and the sale, taking or other disposition of the game fish  or
food fish, and for such record keeping and reporting procedures as will insure that the propagation
activities are conducted in such manner as will not be harmful to existing game  fish or food fish
populations.
(4) Persons  propagating the following food fish under the license prescribed in subsection (1) of
this section are exempt from the licensing provisions of ORS 508.025 and 508.035:
(a) Food fish raised entirely in, then harvested from facilities which  are enclosed or designed
to prevent escape and from which the fish are not released for natural rearing.
(b) Food fish harvested from the wild under licenses prescribed in ORS 508.025 and 508.035  and
on which the appropriate  fee has been paid at the time holding or rearing commences in the licensed
fish propagation facility.
(5) As used in this section, food fish has the meaning [ as defined ] given that term  in  ORS
506.011.
SHELLFISH AQUACULTURE
SECTION 12.
Section 13 of this  2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 622.
SECTION 13. (1) Before approving an application for shellfish cultivation  under this
chapter, the State Department of  Agriculture shall evaluate the cumulative impact of all
existing shellfish cultivation in the vicinity of the proposed shellfish cultivation.
(2) The department shall adopt rules to implement this chapter that:
(a) Prohibit the use of pesticides in shellfish cultivation.
(b) Require shellfish cultivators to minimize the  use of plastics in shellfish cultivation,
to the maximum extent feasible.
(3) The provisions  of subsection (1) of this section and rules adopted under subsection (2)
[8]
HB 2655
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
of this section do not apply to a business entity that:
(a) Is owned and operated independently from all other businesses; and
(b) Has annual gross  revenues of less than $500,000, as reported on a tax return submit-
ted to the federal government or the Department of Revenue.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 14.
The unit captions used in this 2023 Act  are provided for the convenience
of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express  any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
OPERATIVE DATE
SECTION 15. (1) Sections 1 to 8 and 13 of this 2023 Act  and the amendments to ORS
497.252, 616.992 and 616.997 by sections 9 to 11 of this 2023  Act become operative on January
1, 2024.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the  Department of Environmental
Quality, the State Department of Agriculture and the State Department  of Fish and Wildlife
may take any actions, on or after the effective date of this 2023 Act, that  are necessary to
prepare for  implementation of sections 1 to 8 and 13 of this 2023 Act and the amendments
to ORS 497.252, 616.992 and 616.997 by sections 9 to 11 of this 2023 Act.
[9]