Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Disabled veteran” and  “veteran” have the meanings given those terms in ORS
408.225.
(b) “Institution  of higher education” means a public university listed in ORS 352.002 or
a community college, as defined in ORS 341.005.
(2) There is established in the Department  of Veterans’ Affairs the Oregon Educational
and Workforce  Development Bridge Loan Program. The purpose of the program is to conduct
outreach and provide forgivable loans to veterans and disabled veterans who:
(a) Are pursuing and  enrolled in an approved course of study, approved professional
training, approved workforce development program or  approved apprenticeship in, or in
connection with, any institution of higher education; and
(b) Are eligible to receive educational aid or other financial assistance under any federal
Act based upon prior service in the Armed Forces of the United States, and the  aid or as-
sistance has not yet commenced being paid, has been  delayed, has been suspended or is
otherwise temporarily unavailable.
(3) Loans under this section:
(a) Shall be made pursuant to a written contractual  agreement between the department
and the veteran or disabled  veteran that contains, at a minimum, the requirement that the
veteran or disabled veteran pay to the department the amount of  any loan made under this
section when the veteran or disabled veteran does not complete the course of  study, profes-
sional training, workforce development program or apprenticeship for which the  loan was
made;
(b) May be made for a period of time  not to exceed three months occurring once during
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1316
HB 2690
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
a single period of five consecutive years;
(c) May not exceed $5,000 per veteran or disabled veteran;
(d) Shall be made  only when there are sufficient funds in the Oregon Educational and
Workforce Development Bridge Loan Program Fund established in section 2 of this  2017 Act
to make the loan and shall not constitute a debt of the state or a lending of the credit of the
state within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation; and
(e) May be forgiven by the  department upon completion by the veteran or disabled vet-
eran of the course of study, professional training, workforce development  program or ap-
prenticeship for which the loan was made.
(4) The  department shall adopt rules for the implementation and operation of the pro-
gram, including but not limited to eligibility requirements for loan applicants.
SECTION 2.
(1) There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the
General Fund, the Oregon Educational and Workforce Development Bridge  Loan Program
Fund. Interest earned on the Oregon Educational and Workforce Development Bridge  Loan
Program Fund must be  deposited into the fund. All moneys in the fund are continuously
appropriated to the Department of  Veterans’ Affairs for the purpose of making loans under
section 1 of this 2017 Act and for the payment of actual and necessary expenses incurred  by
the department in administering the fund  and establishing and maintaining the Oregon Ed-
ucational and Workforce Development Bridge Loan Program established under section 1 of
this 2017 Act.
(2) Moneys in the Oregon Educational and Workforce Development Bridge Loan Program
Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys appropriated or transferred to the department by the  Legislative Assembly
for deposit in the fund;
(b) Proceeds from repayment of loans made pursuant to section 1 of this 2017 Act;
(c) Transfers of money to the fund, including but not limited to moneys transferred  from
the Veterans’  Educational Aid Account for the purposes of implementing section 1 of this
2017 Act;
(d) Interest earned on moneys in the fund; and
(e) Moneys from gifts, donations or any other source.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 408.090 is amended to read:
408.090. (1) The Director of Veterans’ Affairs, acting on behalf of the State  of Oregon, is au-
thorized to accept any  donation, gift, grant, bequest or devise made in furtherance of the purposes
of ORS 408.010 to 408.090  and section 1 of this 2017 Act [, and if ]. A donation, gift, grant,  be-
quest or devise that is  made in cash or its equivalent or reduced thereto, under this section,  shall
be promptly paid by the director to the State Treasurer, who shall credit the amount so received
to the Veterans’ Educational Aid Account in the General Fund.  The director shall make such dis-
position of donations, gifts, grants, bequests or devises, not made in cash or its equivalent, as is
specified by the donor thereof, and their earnings and proceeds shall inure to said account. All  such
donations, gifts, grants, bequests or  devises accepted by the director are transfers exempt from taxes
imposed on inheritances under the laws of this state.
(2) All moneys in the Veterans’ Educational Aid Account are continuously appropriated to the
director and may be  used by the director for the purposes authorized in ORS 408.010 to 408.090  and
section 1 of this 2017 Act .
[2]