Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 12.110 is amended to read:
12.110. (1) An action for assault, battery, false imprisonment, or for any injury to the person or
rights of another, not arising on contract, and not especially enumerated in this chapter,  shall be
commenced within two years; provided, that in an action at law based upon fraud  or deceit, the
limitation shall be deemed to commence only from the discovery of the fraud or deceit.
(2) An action upon a statute for a forfeiture or penalty to the state or county shall be com-
menced within two years.
(3) An action for overtime or premium pay or for penalties or liquidated  damages for failure to
pay overtime or premium pay shall be commenced within two years.
(4) An action to recover damages  for injuries to the person arising from any medical, surgical
or dental treatment, omission or operation shall be commenced within  two years from the date when
the injury is first discovered or in the  exercise of reasonable care should have been discovered.
However, notwithstanding the provisions of ORS 12.160, every such  action shall be commenced
within [ five] 10 years from the date of the treatment, omission or operation upon which the  action
is based or, if there has been no action commenced within [ five] 10 years because of fraud, deceit
or misleading representation, then  within two years from the date such fraud, deceit or misleading
representation is discovered or in the exercise of reasonable care should have been discovered.
(5) An action,  arising from a nuclear incident, as defined in 42 U.S.C. 2014(q), that involves the
release of radioactive material, excluding releases from acts of war, that causes bodily  injury, sick-
ness or death, shall be commenced:
(a) Within two  years from the time an injured person discovers or reasonably could have dis-
covered the injury and the causal connection between the injury and the nuclear incident; or
(b) Within two years from  any substantial change in the degree of injury to the person arising
out of a nuclear incident.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3377
SB 233
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 12.110 by section 1 of this  2025 Act apply to claims
arising before, on or after the effective date of this  2025 Act, for which an action has not
been commenced before the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist,  and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
[2]