Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The State Department of Fish and Wildlife shall annually  report to the Ac-
cess and Habitat Board  regarding the grant and contract expenditures during the most re-
cently completed fiscal  year from the Access and Habitat Board Subaccount of the Fish and
Wildlife Account. The report must, at a minimum, include a comparison  of the projects and
programs that received grant moneys and a description of  the board recommendations re-
garding the grants  and contracts, department actions and the status of department con-
tracts and department payments to grantees.
SECTION 2. The Access and Habitat Board shall annually report to the State Fish and
Wildlife Commission. The report must, at a minimum, verify  that the board has reviewed
each grant expenditure of $25,000 or more from  the Access and Habitat Board Subaccount
of the Fish and Wildlife Account during the most recently completed  fiscal year to ensure
that grant applications, board  recommendations, commission approvals of programs and
projects and State Department of Fish and Wildlife contract implementation are meeting  the
expectations and intent of the original  program recommendations made by the board to the
commission.
SECTION 3. (1) If a person charges a fee for access to land anywhere within this  state,
the person may not receive moneys for a program or project from the Access and Habitat
Board Subaccount of the Fish and Wildlife Account.
(2) If a program or project site is closed to the public, a person may not receive  grant
moneys for a program or project from the subaccount to cover any period that  the site is
closed to the public.
(3) When issuing a  report under ORS 496.232 (3), the State Department of Fish and
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2389
SB 655
1
2
3
4
Wildlife shall include the identity of any person prohibited  under subsection (2) of this sec-
tion from  receiving subaccount grant moneys and identify the period for which the program
or project site was closed to the public.
[2]