Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “state agency” means any board, commission,
department, institution, branch  or agency the costs of which are paid in whole or in part
from funds held in the State Treasury.
(2) The Oregon Department of Administrative  Services shall make available to the public
through an online electronic medium budget and  spending information for all state agencies,
including the amount spent by each agency categorized by spending area, recipients of  state
contracts and revenue sources.  The department shall update the information at least quar-
terly.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1250