Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “federal E-Verify employment verification
system” means the Internet-based employment eligibility verification system  administered
by the United States Department of Homeland Security.
(2) All employers in this state shall use the federal E-Verify  employment verification
system to verify the eligibility for employment  in the United States of all employees hired
on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 1904