Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
ORS 526.277 and 526.280 are added to and made a part of ORS chapter 526.
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 309