Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Peer mentor support” means mentoring provided by a peer support specialist.
(b) “Peer support services” means supportive services provided by a peer  support spe-
cialist.
(c) “Peer support specialist” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall operate a peer  managed recovery center in every
city in this state that  has a population of 100,000 or more. Each peer managed recovery
center shall, at a minimum:
(a) Offer culturally specific peer mentor support 24 hours per day;
(b) Maintain a 24-hour telephone advice line;
(c) Offer in-person peer support services for 12 hours each day;
(d) Host  five cognitive behavioral therapy sessions each day using a range of recovery
models; and
(e) Establish a  memorandum of understanding with all residential and outpatient sub-
stance use disorder treatment providers within a 100-mile radius of the center to enable the
center to connect with individuals completing treatment and advise the individuals  of the
services available from the center.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 430.256 is amended to read:
430.256. (1) The Director of  the Oregon Health Authority shall administer alcohol and drug
abuse programs, including but  not limited to programs or components of programs described in ORS
430.397 to 430.401 and 475.225 and section 1 of this 2019 Act  and ORS chapters 430 and [ 801 to
822] 813.
(2) Subject to ORS 417.300 and 417.305, the director shall:
(a) Report to the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission on accomplishments  and issues occurring
during each biennium, and report on a new biennial plan describing  resources, needs and priorities
for all alcohol and drug abuse programs.
(b) Develop within the Oregon Health Authority priorities for alcohol and drug  abuse programs
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3360
HB 2627
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
and activities.
(c) Conduct statewide and special planning processes that provide for participation from  state
and local agencies, groups and individuals.
(d) Identify the needs of special populations  including minorities, elderly, youth, women and in-
dividuals with disabilities.
(e) Subject to ORS chapter 183, adopt such rules as are necessary for the performance of the
duties and functions specified by this section.
(3) The  director may apply for, receive and administer funds, including federal funds and grants,
from sources other than the state. Subject to expenditure limitation  set by the Legislative Assembly,
funds received under this subsection may be expended by the director:
(a) For the study, prevention or treatment of alcohol and drug abuse and dependence in  this
state.
(b) To provide  training, both within this state and in other states, in the prevention and treat-
ment of alcohol and drug abuse and dependence.
(4) The director shall, in  consultation with state agencies and counties, establish guidelines to
coordinate program review and audit activities  by state agencies and counties that provide funds to
alcohol and drug prevention and treatment programs. The purpose of the guidelines is to  minimize
duplication of auditing and  program review requirements imposed by state agencies and counties on
alcohol and drug prevention and  treatment programs that receive state funds, including programs
that receive beer and wine tax revenues under ORS 430.380 and 471.810.
[2]