Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 446.250 is amended to read:
446.250. The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business  Services shall cause in-
spections to be made, approve plans and specifications,  provide technical services and issue permits
for alteration of manufactured dwellings and installation of manufactured dwellings and manufac-
tured structure  accessory buildings and structures on a lot. The director shall appoint or contract
with municipalities that request such appointment or contract  for inspection and issuance of permits
for alteration of manufactured dwellings and installation of manufactured dwellings and manufac-
tured structure accessory buildings and structures and  alterations of installations of plumbing,
heating, illuminating,  cooking or electrical equipment, provided the municipality employs as local
inspectors qualified persons who have been certified  and licensed  by the director under ORS
455.720 or 479.810 or section 19 of this 2019 Act  for inspection and issuance of permits for alter-
ation of manufactured dwellings and installation of manufactured  dwellings and manufactured
structure  accessory  buildings and structures, pursuant to ORS 446.003, 446.111, 446.155, 446.160,
446.176, 446.225 to 446.285 and 446.990. [However, the certification standards  under this section shall
relate to the inspections to be performed and shall not be more stringent for  municipal inspectors than
those applying to state inspectors. ]
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 3720
SB 898
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 2.  ORS 446.255 is amended to read:
446.255. (1) After written notice  and hearing as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
Director of the Department  of Consumer and Business Services may revoke the [ certification] license
of a local inspector [ certified under ORS 446.250, ] or the authority of a  local government to enforce
provisions of ORS 446.003, 446.111, 446.160, 446.176, 446.225 to 446.285 and 446.990, [ when] if  it ap-
pears by competent evidence that the inspector or local government has  consistently failed to act
in the public interest in the enforcement of the provisions of ORS 446.003, 446.111, 446.160,  446.176,
446.225 to 446.285 and 446.990.
(2) Any proceedings under subsection (1) of  this section shall be conducted pursuant to the
provisions of ORS 183.415 to 183.430, 183.440 to  183.460, 183.470 to 183.485 and 183.490 to 183.540,
dealing with contested cases.
SECTION 3.  ORS 447.091 is amended to read:
447.091. The Department of Consumer and Business Services or local government administering
the plumbing specialty code adopted under ORS  447.020 (2) may, upon request of any sanitary dis-
trict formed pursuant to ORS 450.005 to 450.245, sanitary authority established  under ORS 450.600
to 450.989, or county service district established under ORS 451.410  to 451.610, contract for the in-
spection of building sewers  constructed to connect a district sewage system if inspectors employed
by such district are [ certified] licensed for sewer inspections under ORS 455.715 to 455.740.
SECTION 4.  ORS 455.030 is amended to read:
455.030. (1) Subject to any requirement for approval by the appropriate advisory boards,  the
Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services may adopt, amend or repeal rules
for carrying out the responsibilities of the Department of Consumer and  Business Services to de-
velop, implement, administer  and enforce a program that relates to the state building code or a
specialty code. Except as otherwise provided by this section, the director shall  be subject to ORS
chapter 183 in the adoption, amendment or repeal of regulations authorized by, and in the  issuance
of orders in contested cases arising under, this chapter.
(2)(a) In addition to the notice requirements  of ORS 183.335, notice of a public hearing on
adoption, amendment or repeal  of a specialty code shall be given to the governing bodies of all
municipalities and the  notice shall state that copies of the proposed action may be obtained from
the department.
(b) The notice of proposed rule change shall include a finding by the advisory board  that the
added cost, if any, is necessary to the  health and safety of the occupants or the public or necessary
to conserve scarce resources.
(c) The director shall maintain a roster of individuals who wish to be  notified of any changes
to or interpretations of the Low-Rise Residential  Dwelling Code. Subscribers to the list may be
charged a reasonable amount necessary to defray the cost of maintaining the list and advising  the
subscribers of changes in the code.
(d) Notwithstanding ORS 183.335, unless the department finds that an imminent and  se-
rious danger to the public health or  safety makes delay unsafe, and sets forth specific facts
to support that finding, prior to adopting or amending  a temporary rule the department shall
send notice to the appropriate advisory boards and to  persons described in ORS 183.335 (1),
and allow a period of at  least 49 days following the sending of notice for the receipt of com-
ments regarding the proposed rule or amendment.
(3) The director is not required to publish or distribute those parts of  a specialty code of regu-
lations adopted by reference. However, the director shall publish with a specialty code  and annually
[2]
SB 898
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
thereafter a list of places where copies of those  parts of the specialty code adopted by reference
may be obtained together with the approximate cost thereof. The director shall file one copy  of the
rule with the Secretary of State. All standards referred to in any specialty code or any of the mod-
ifications thereto need not be so filed.  All standards and specialty codes referred to in the specialty
code shall be kept on file and available for inspection in the offices of the department.
(4) Any interested person may propose amendments to the state building code, which  proposed
amendments may be either applicable to all municipalities or, where  it is alleged and established
that conditions exist within a municipality or some  municipalities that are not generally found
within other municipalities, amendments may be restricted in  application to such municipalities.
Amendments proposed to the state building code under this subsection shall be in  conformity with
the policy and purpose prescribed by ORS 455.020. The justification and the particular circumstances
requiring the  proposed amendments shall be fully stated in the proposal. The director shall submit
all proposed amendments to the appropriate advisory board. The board shall review  and report its
recommendations to the  director on the amendments within 180 days after the date of submission
by the director.
(5) The director, with the approval of the advisory board,  may adopt or modify and adopt any
amendments proposed to the director under subsection (4) of this section. The  director shall, within
30 days after the date of receipt of the recommendations of the advisory board, notify the  person
proposing the amendments of the adoption, modification and adoption or denial of  the proposed
amendments. Upon adoption, a copy of  each amendment shall be distributed to the governing bodies
of all municipalities affected thereby.
(6) The director shall from time to time make or cause to be made investigations, or may accept
authenticated  reports  from authoritative sources, concerning new materials or modes of construction
intended for use in the construction of buildings or structures, or intended for use in  other activity
regulated by the state building code, and shall,  where necessary, propose amendments to the code
setting forth the conditions under which the materials or modes may be used, in accordance  with
the standards and procedures of this chapter.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 455.046 is amended to read:
455.046. (1) The Department of Consumer and Business Services shall:
(a) Develop and administer an installation label program for minor installations  under the state
building code, including but not limited to electrical  installations under ORS 455.627, 479.540 and
479.570 and plumbing installations under ORS 447.076;
(b) Develop standard  application forms and procedures for use by municipalities in Clackamas,
Multnomah and Washington Counties when issuing  structural, mechanical, electrical, plumbing and
other permits when those permits do not require a review of building plans;
(c) Develop standard application forms and procedures for issuing building permits and record-
ing inspections;
(d) Develop standard forms and procedures for reviewing building plans;
(e) Establish standardized criteria and methodology for  determining fee amounts for permits that
are required under the state building code established under ORS 455.030;
(f) Maintain and make available to the public the names of persons [ certified] licensed to review
building plans;
(g) Maintain and make available to the public the names of persons [ certified] licensed to per-
form technical inspections; and
(h) Administer prepaid building permit cost accounts.
[3]
SB 898
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(2) The department may use the resources of the Tri-County Building Industry Service  Center
to:
(a) Assist local building  officials in the administration and enforcement of the state building
code; and
(b) Establish a process to facilitate the consistent application of the state  building code
throughout the state.
SECTION 6.  ORS 455.055 is amended to read:
455.055. The Director  of the Department of Consumer and Business Services [ may] shall  adopt
rules establishing uniform  plan review,  permit, inspection standards and procedures  and certif-
icate of occupancy requirements under the state building code. [ The rules may include, but need  not
be limited to, rules establishing standards for building inspections and inspection procedures and rules
establishing uniform forms for certificates  of occupancy. ] In adopting rules under this section, the di-
rector may establish a process for a municipality to address  conditions that are unique to the
municipality’s enforcement  of the state building code or that are not addressed by the rules estab-
lishing uniform permit, inspection and certificate of occupancy requirements.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 455.140 is amended to read:
455.140. (1) There is established a Mechanical Board consisting of  10 members appointed by the
Governor.
(2) The members of the board shall assist the Director  of the Department of Consumer and
Business Services in administering the  code adopted pursuant to ORS 455.020 for mechanical devices
and equipment.
(3) The board must consist of:
(a) One representative of the plumbing industry;
(b) One sheet metal and air conditioner contractor;
(c) One municipal mechanical inspector possessing the  highest level of mechanical inspector
[certification] licensure issued by the Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(d) One heating, venting and air conditioning contractor;
(e) One heating, venting and air conditioning installer;
(f) One sheet metal and air conditioner installer;
(g) One representative of a natural gas company or other utility;
(h) One building official;
(i) One insulation craftsperson who has experience with heat and frost insulation; and
(j) One public member who does not  receive compensation from any interest represented under
paragraphs (a) to (i) of this subsection.
(4) At least one of the board members described in subsection (3)(b) or (d) of  this section must
be an owner or operator of a contracting business employing  10 or fewer persons at the time of the
member’s appointment to the term.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 455.420 is amended to read:
455.420. (1) Each individual dwelling unit in a multifamily residential building constructed after
October 4, 1977, shall have installed a separate, individual electrical meter for  each such dwelling
unit except where  a building inspector [ certified] licensed under ORS 455.715 to 455.740 determines
that pursuant to standards adopted by the Director of the  Department of Consumer and Business
Services the installation of a single, central  electrical meter for all the dwelling units in such
building would facilitate an overall reduction in electrical consumption by such units.
(2) For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of subsection (1) of this section,  the director,
[4]
SB 898
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
based on recommendations of the Residential and Manufactured Structures Board, shall adopt by
rule standards for determining whether the installation of a  single electrical meter for all dwelling
units in a multifamily residential building  facilitates an overall reduction in electrical consumption
by such units.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 455.457 is amended to read:
455.457. In accordance with the applicable provisions of ORS chapter 183, the Director of the
Department of  Consumer and Business Services by rule shall establish a licensing system for persons
that perform specialty code inspections or  plan reviews and for businesses that employ persons that
perform specialty code inspections or plan reviews. Such a system shall include but not  be limited
to the following provisions:
(1) Prescribing the form and content of and the times and procedures for submitting an  appli-
cation for the issuance or renewal of a license.
(2) Prescribing the terms of the  licenses and the fees for the original issue and renewal in
amounts that do not exceed the cost to  the Department of Consumer and Business Services of ad-
ministering the licensing system.
[(3) Prescribing the requirements for and the manner of testing  the competency of applicants for the
protection of the public health and safety. ]
(3) Selecting one or more independent accrediting entities with the  advice of the appro-
priate advisory boards to test and evaluate an applicant  in comparison to nationwide or
multistate standards for persons who exercise the duties,  functions and powers of a specialty
code inspector or plan reviewer.
(4) Prescribing the amounts and conditions of bonds and liability insurance.
(5) Setting forth those actions or circumstances that constitute failure to achieve or  maintain
licensing competency or that otherwise constitute a danger to the public health or safety and for
which the director  may refuse to issue or renew or may suspend or revoke a license or impose a
civil penalty.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 455.459 is amended to read:
455.459. (1) As  used in this section, “relative” has the meaning given that term in ORS
95.200.
[(1)] (2)  A person [ shall] may  not inspect or review any project  or installation in which the
person, employer of the person or relative of the person has any financial interest  or business af-
filiation. A person designated under  ORS 455.465 (1)(a) may not perform both the inspection and plan
review for the same project or installation. A municipality  or the state shall perform either the in-
spection, the plan review, or both.
[(2) For purposes of this section, “relative” has the meaning given that term in ORS 95.200. ]
(3) A person employed by the Department of Consumer and Business Services as a  plan
reviewer or inspector may not render services of any type to a business engaged in  con-
struction or property development. Except as provided in this section, a person  employed by
a municipality as a building official or  employed by or providing services to a municipality
as a plan reviewer or  inspector, may not render services to a business engaged in con-
struction or property development within the municipality, but may render any lawful ser-
vices within other jurisdictions. This subsection does not prohibit a  person from rendering
services without remuneration to a nonprofit organization.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 455.467 is amended to read:
455.467. (1) Except as provided  in subsection (2) of this section, for specialty code plan reviews
[5]
SB 898
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
of simple low-rise residential dwellings, the Department  of Consumer and Business Services or a
municipality that administers a building inspection  program under ORS 455.148 or 455.150 shall ap-
prove or disapprove the specialty code building plan:
(a) For a jurisdiction with a population that is less than 300,000, within  10 business days of re-
ceiving a complete application, or shall implement the process described in ORS 455.465.
(b) For a jurisdiction with  a population that is 300,000 or more, within 15 business days of re-
ceiving a complete application, or shall implement the process described in ORS 455.465.
(2) The 10-day and 15-day requirements in subsection (1) of this section do not apply if:
(a) The plan requires approval by federal, state or local agencies outside the jurisdiction of  the
issuing agency;
(b) The plan is for a complex structure that requires additional review as determined by the
department or municipality; or
(c) Based  on conditions that exist in the affected municipality, the Director of the Department
of Consumer  and Business Services authorizes a different plan review schedule as described in a
building inspection program submitted under ORS 455.148 or 455.150.
(3) For specialty code plan reviews of commercial structures, a municipality shall include in  its
building inspection program submitted under ORS 455.148 or 455.150  a process for plan review ser-
vices. The municipality shall include in its  program detailed reasons supporting the proposed plan
review process. The plan review services provided by the municipality shall:
(a) Allow an applicant to defer  the submittal of plans for one or more construction phases for
a commercial construction project in accordance with the state building code; and
(b) Allow an applicant to receive permits for  each of the phases of a commercial construction
project as described in the state building code when the plan review for that phase is approved.
(4) For a phased commercial construction project as described in  subsection (3) of this section,
the municipality shall inform the applicant of the detailed plans necessary for each phase  of the
project  and  the estimated time for initial and phased review of the building plans for conformance
with the state building code.
(5) An applicant submitting  plans under subsection (3) of this section is responsible for ensuring
that the project meets  all specialty code requirements and that the project does not proceed beyond
the level of approval authorized by the building official.
(6) If the department or  a municipality [ that] repeatedly fails to meet the plan  review period
described in this section or otherwise authorized in [ its] a building inspection  program submitted
under ORS 455.148 or 455.150 , the department or the municipality  shall be considered to be en-
gaging in a pattern of conduct of failing to provide timely plan reviews under ORS 455.160.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 455.469 is amended to read:
455.469. [ A] The Department of Consumer and Business Services, and a  municipality [ shall
add to and make a part of its ] conducting a  building inspection program under ORS 455.148 or
455.150, shall  include in its building inspection program the policies [ and], rules or  ordinances
adopted by the department or  the municipality to implement ORS 455.465 and 455.467.
SECTION 13.  ORS 455.628 is amended to read:
455.628. (1) The Department of Consumer and  Business Services or a municipality administering
and enforcing a building inspection program under ORS 455.148 or 455.150 may not  require a plan
review for one and  two family dwellings that are of conventional light frame construction, as defined
by the department by rule, if:
(a) The plans for the dwelling are designed and stamped  by a professional engineer registered
[6]
SB 898
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
under ORS 672.002 to 672.325 or an architect registered under ORS 671.060; and
(b) The engineer or architect is certified by the Director of the Department of Consumer  and
Business Services  and licensed  under ORS [ 455.720] 455.457 as being qualified to examine one and
two family dwelling plans.
(2) The department or municipality  is exempt from liability for any damages arising from the
nonperformance of a plan review pursuant to this section.
SECTION 14.  ORS 455.630 is amended to read:
455.630. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,  the Low-Rise Residential
Dwelling Code shall be enforced by  inspectors and building officials qualified pursuant to ORS
455.715 to 455.740.
[(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section,  enforcement of electrical specialty code, permit
and licensing provisions shall be under the sole authority  of the Electrical and Elevator Board in the
Department of Consumer and Business Services. ]
(2) Except as  provided under section 19 of this 2019 Act, inspections for compliance with
the electrical specialty code shall be conducted by electrical inspectors  appointed or licensed
under ORS 479.810.
SECTION 15.  ORS 455.705 is amended to read:
455.705. (1) A manufacturer of prefabricated structures or manufacturer  of prefabricated struc-
ture components may not contract  with a municipality or a person to perform prefabricated struc-
ture plan approvals or inspections unless  the person providing the plan approvals or inspections is
[certified or approved under subsection (2) of this section ] licensed  under ORS 455.720 or 479.810
or section 19 of this 2019 Act  or is providing plan approvals or inspections for a residential pre-
fabricated structure that is intended for delivery in another state.
(2)(a) A person may  not engage in prefabricated structure plan approvals or inspections without
being [ certified] licensed  under ORS [ 455.715 to 455.740 ] 455.720 or 479.810 or section 19 of this
2019 Act unless the person is providing plan approvals or inspections for a residential  prefabricated
structure that is intended for delivery in another state.
(b) A person may not engage in the business of providing prefabricated structure plan approvals
or inspections without an approval issued by the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(3) In accordance with any applicable provisions of ORS  chapter 183, the Director of the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services shall  establish by rule a system for approval and reg-
ulation of businesses [ and persons who perform ] that provide prefabricated structure  plan approvals
or inspections. The system shall include but not be limited to the following provisions:
(a) Prescribing the  form and content of and the times and procedures for submitting an appli-
cation for the issuance or renewal of an approval.
(b) Prescribing the term of the approval and the  fee for the original issue and renewal in an
amount that does not exceed  the cost of administering the approval system. The charge for review
and approval of a third party inspection service shall not exceed, for the original  issue, $400 and for
the renewal, $200.
(c) Prescribing the conditions for initial  issuance, renewal and maintenance of the approval for
a person  [ certified] licensed under ORS 455.457, 455.715 to 455.740 or 479.810, including but not
limited to the following provisions:
(A) Procedures and reports for plan approvals and inspections;
(B) Ethical practices and prohibitions of conflicts of interests with  manufacturers of prefabri-
cated structures and manufacturers and suppliers of parts and services;
[7]
SB 898
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(C) Insurance compliance requirements;
(D) Procedures for use and application of insignia of compliance; and
(E) Fees for and procedures for use and application of certification stamps.
(d) Prescribing  other actions or circumstances that constitute failure to achieve or maintain
approval competency or that  otherwise constitute a danger to the public health or safety and for
which the director may refuse to  issue or renew or may suspend or revoke a certification, permit
or certificate.
(e) Prescribing the authority of  the department to perform oversight monitoring including but
not limited to:
(A) Right of entry and access to third party records and information;
(B) Frequency, type and extent of the oversight monitoring and inspection of third party agen-
cies and manufacturing facilities; and
(C) Frequency and description of information to be submitted as  part of the monitoring process.
(f) Prescribing fees for monitoring conducted by the department at the manufacturing  plant site
or at third party inspection service locations, which fees shall not exceed $60 per hour.
(4)(a) The  department shall establish by rule a manufacturer compliance program to allow for
plan approvals or inspections of prefabricated  structures or prefabricated structure components at
the facility at which  the prefabrication takes place, including but not limited to the following pro-
visions:
(A) Quality assurance programs;
(B) Procedures for use and application of insignia of compliance; and
(C) Fees for and procedures for use and application of certification stamps.
(b) A manufacturer of prefabricated structures shall  provide the department with written notice
at least  60 days before a manufacturer may provide for plan approval or inspection service as al-
lowed under subsection (2) of this section.
(c) The department is not required to provide plan approval for or inspection of any prefabri-
cated structure or prefabricated structure components unless  the department has been notified in
writing by the manufacturer of the  prefabricated structure 180 days in advance of the proposed as-
sumption of department inspections.
(5) A person may not rent, lease, sell, exchange, install or offer  for rent, lease, sale, exchange
or installation within this state a  prefabricated structure constructed on or after July 1, 1991, unless
it bears an insignia of compliance or certification stamp issued by the  department or a third party
indicating compliance with  this state’s building regulations and standards for prefabricated struc-
tures. The  prohibition in this subsection does not apply to a residential prefabricated structure in-
tended for delivery  in another state unless the residential prefabricated structure is installed or
offered for installation in  this state. A prefabricated structure with an insignia of compliance or
certification stamp shall be acceptable to municipalities as meeting the state  building code regu-
lations. Prefabricated structures constructed prior to July 1, 1991, are subject to  the building code
regulations in effect at the time of original construction.
(6) The provisions  of this section do not apply to employees of the Department of Consumer and
Business Services and testing laboratories approved under ORS chapters 447 and 479.
(7) For purposes of this section, “insignia of compliance” means the plate affixed to a  structure
by the Department of Consumer and Business Services or a third party to signify  compliance with
all state building code requirements for which the structure was inspected.
(8) Prefabricated structures or components found by the department or  a third party to repre-
[8]
SB 898
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
sent a danger to public health or safety shall be brought into compliance with building code  regu-
lations or removed from the state.
(9) All plan approvals and inspections of prefabricated structures and  prefabricated components
constructed at manufacturing plants  outside of Oregon but intended for delivery into Oregon shall
be performed by the department or conducted under ORS 455.430.
SECTION 16.  ORS 455.715 is amended to read:
455.715. As used in ORS 455.715 to 455.740, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Building official” means  a person charged by a municipality with responsibility for admin-
istration and enforcement of the state building code in the municipality.
(2) “Business of providing prefabricated structure plan approvals and inspections” means  an in-
dependent contractor providing prefabricated structure plan approval or inspection services, or both,
under the following specialty codes[ , as provided in ORS 455.020, 455.705 and 455.715 ]:
(a) Structural;
(b) Mechanical;
(c) Plumbing;
(d) Electrical; and
(e) Low-rise residential dwelling.
(3) “Inspector” means:
(a) A person, including a plans examiner, acting under the authority  and direction of a building
official and charged with the responsibility of routine enforcement of one or  more specialty codes
or parts of specialty codes;
(b) A person, including a plans examiner,  who provides enforcement of one or more specialty
codes or parts of specialty codes and who is personally in the business  of providing prefabricated
structure plan approvals or inspections or is employed by such a business;
(c) A specialized building inspector [ certified under ORS 455.723 ] licensed under section 19 of
this 2019 Act  who  [ is employed by ] provides services to  a municipality or [ by] through  the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services;
(d) A person employed by [ a municipality or ] the department , or  employed by or contracting
with a municipality,  who is [ certified under ORS 455.732 ] licensed under  ORS 455.720 and au-
thorized by the department or municipality to perform inspections under one or more  specialty
codes throughout a building code administrative region; or
(e) A person designated by the Director of the Department of Consumer  and Business Services
to ensure compliance with a specialty code or with any requirement for a license, registration, cer-
tification, endorsement or other authorization  to perform work related to the administration and
enforcement of the state building code.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 455.720 is amended to read:
455.720. (1) In accordance with applicable provisions of ORS chapter 183,  to promote effective
and uniform enforcement of the state  building code by improving the competence of building officials
and inspectors, the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business  Services, with the advice
of the appropriate advisory boards, shall select one or more independent accrediting entities
that the director determines  to be competent to test and evaluate an applicant in comparison
to nationwide or multistate standards for persons  who exercise the duties, functions and
powers of a building official or inspector. [:]
[(a) Establish for building officials  and inspectors reasonable minimum training and experience
standards, including but  not limited to courses or subjects for instruction, facilities for instruction,
[9]
SB 898
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
qualification of  instructors and methods of instruction. The standards shall include provisions for de-
termining a practical experience equivalent. ]
[(b) Establish a procedure to be used  by municipalities to determine whether a person meets mini-
mum standards or has minimum training to be  appointed or employed as a building official or in-
spector. The procedure shall allow for a field examination  of a person to determine if the person meets
the practical experience equivalent of a minimum standard. ]
[(c) Subject to such terms, conditions and classifications  as the director may impose, certify build-
ing officials as being qualified, and revoke such certifications in the manner provided in ORS
455.740.]
[(d) Require an applicant for a certificate  as a building official or inspector to demonstrate
knowledge of the laws governing accessibility to buildings by persons with  disabilities by passing an
examination prescribed by the director. ]
[(2) The director shall maintain and, upon  request of municipalities, furnish information on appli-
cants for appointment or employment as building officials or inspectors. ]
(2)(a) A determination by an accrediting entity selected by the  director under subsection
(1) of this section that an applicant meets or  exceeds nationwide or multistate standards for
persons who exercise the duties, functions and powers of a building  official is prima facie
evidence that  the applicant possesses the minimum education, training and skills required
for certification by the director and licensure as a building official.
(b) A determination by an accrediting entity selected by the director  under subsection (1)
of this section that an applicant  meets or exceeds nationwide or multistate standards for
persons who exercise the duties, functions and powers of an inspector with regard  to one or
more specialty codes  is prima facie evidence that the applicant possesses the minimum edu-
cation, training and skills required for certification by the director and licensure as  an in-
spector with regard to those specialty codes.
(c) Except as provided in ORS 455.740 or for other good  cause set forth by the director
in writing, the director  shall certify the qualification of the applicant and issue or cause is-
suance of an appropriate license as a building official or inspector if the applicant meets  or
exceeds nationwide or multistate standards for persons who exercise the  duties, functions
and powers of a building official or an inspector.
(3) The director shall maintain and, upon request  of municipalities, furnish information
regarding whether a candidate for  appointment or employment as a building official or in-
spector possesses a license under subsection (2) of this section.
[(3)] (4)  Pursuant to ORS chapter 183, the director shall adopt rules necessary to carry out the
certification and licensure programs [ provided by subsection (1) of ] described in this section.
[(4)] (5) The director, by rule, may require evidence of completion  of relevant continuing edu-
cation [ covering any  certification created under this section ] as a condition of maintaining [ the certi-
fication] a license issued under this  section . When establishing continuing education
requirements, the director shall give consideration to any relevant  continuing education re-
quirements in nationwide or multistate use.  Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the director
from delegating [ any of this power ] the verification of continuing education  to a municipality.
[(5) The director, with the advice of the appropriate advisory  boards, may adopt rules for certifying
inspectors as being qualified to enforce one or more particular specialty codes,  subject to any terms,
conditions and classifications the director may impose, and for revoking those certifications in  the
manner provided in ORS 455.740. ]
[10]
SB 898
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
SECTION 18. Section 19 of this 2019 Act is added  to and made a part of ORS 455.715 to
455.740.
SECTION 19. (1)(a) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services,
with the advice of the appropriate advisory boards, shall select one or more independent  ac-
crediting entities that the director determines to be competent to  test and evaluate an ap-
plicant in comparison to nationwide or multistate standards  for inspectors with regard to
one or more specialty code parts identified by the director.
(b) The director  shall consult with the appropriate advisory board prior to identifying
specialty code  parts for which an accrediting entity is to conduct testing and evaluations
under this section.
(2)(a) A determination by an accrediting entity described under subsection (1) of  this
section that an applicant meets or exceeds nationwide  or multistate standards for a specialty
code inspector with  regard to those specialty code parts identified by the director is prima
facie evidence that the applicant possesses the minimum education, training and  skills re-
quired for certification by the director and licensure as a specialized building  inspector
qualified to conduct inspections with regard to those specialty code parts.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS 446.250, 455.630, 455.720, 479.810 and 479.855, except as provided
under ORS 455.740 or for other  good cause set forth by the director in writing, the director
shall certify the qualification of the applicant and issue or cause  issuance of an appropriate
license as a specialized building inspector  if the applicant meets or exceeds nationwide or
multistate standards for a specialty code inspector with regard to  one or more specialty code
parts identified by the director.
(3) An individual licensed as  a specialized building inspector under this section may con-
duct inspections and enforce parts of specialty  codes under ORS 479.510 to 479.945 and 479.950
and this chapter and ORS chapters 446, 447 and 693 as identified by the director.
(4) The director, in consultation with the State Plumbing  Board, shall identify parts of
the plumbing specialty  code appropriate for inspection by specialized building inspectors and
make certification and licensure as a specialized building  inspector available with regard to
the identified plumbing specialty code parts.
(5) Notwithstanding ORS 479.630, the director, in consultation  with the Electrical and
Elevator Board under ORS 479.810,  shall identify parts of the electrical specialty code ap-
propriate for inspection by specialized building inspectors and make certification and
licensure as a specialized building inspector available with regard to the identified electrical
specialty code parts.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 455.730 is amended to read:
455.730. [No] A person [ shall] may not  be appointed or employed as a building official  [ or in-
spector by any municipality ], be employed as an inspector by the Department of Consumer and
Business Services or be employed by or contract with a  municipality as an inspector unless
the person has been certified as  being qualified  and issued a license  under ORS 455.715 to 455.740,
and the [ certification] license has not lapsed or been revoked.
SECTION 21.  ORS 455.732 is amended to read:
455.732. (1) As used in this section, “building code administrative region” means a region  es-
tablished by the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services under ORS  455.042
for the uniform administration of the state building code.
(2) The authority of the director  under ORS 455.720 and [ 455.723 to specify terms, conditions and
[11]
SB 898
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
classifications] section 19 of this 2019 Act to identify specialty code parts  for  the certification
and licensure of inspectors includes the authority to certify and license an inspector  to perform
inspections under multiple specialty codes or parts of [ a specialty code ] multiple specialty codes .
[(3) The director may provide for an inspector who is likely to be employed within a  specific
building code administrative region to be certified to perform inspections throughout a building  code
administrative region, whether within or outside  of a municipality. The director may recognize any
training program certified by the director under  ORS 455.723 or 455.725 for purposes of certifying an
inspector to perform inspections throughout a building code administrative region. ]
(3) The certification and licensure of an  individual under ORS 455.720 as a building official
authorizes the employment of the  individual as a building official under ORS 455.148 or
455.150 without any additional approval from the director.
(4)(a) The certification and  licensure of an individual under ORS 455.720 as a specialty
code inspector or under section 19 of this 2019 Act  as a specialized building inspector au-
thorizes the employment of, or contracting with, the individual by a municipality as an  in-
spector under ORS 455.148 or 455.150 without any additional approval from  the director. An
individual employed by the Department of Consumer and  Business Services or employed by
or contracting with a municipality as an  inspector may perform any inspections within the
scope of the  license held by the individual. If the individual is employed by the department,
or is employed by or contracts with a municipality that is located within a building code  ad-
ministrative region, except as provided in  paragraph (b) of this subsection, the individual
may perform inspections throughout the building code administrative region, whether inside
or outside of a municipality.
(b) Paragraph (a) of  this subsection does not require  a municipality administering and enforc-
ing a building inspection program under ORS 455.148  or 455.150 to allow an inspector [ certified un-
der] described in paragraph (a) of this subsection who is not employed by or contracting with
the municipality to perform [ building] inspections on behalf of the municipality.
[(4) In determining  the appropriate experience, training or other qualifications for an inspector
under ORS 455.720 or 455.723, the director shall  consult with the appropriate advisory boards. The
factors to be considered by the director may include, but need not be limited to: ]
[(a) Any  factors specific to, or of particular relevance to, a specialty code or to the types of
buildings, structures, systems or equipment in a geographic area  that are inspected under the specialty
code;]
[(b) Staffing levels or other specific criteria for building inspection programs established  by a
municipality where the inspector is likely to be employed or for building  inspection programs estab-
lished by the director; and ]
[(c) Any  factors specific to, or of particular relevance to, the building code administrative region
within which the inspector is likely to be employed. ]
[(5) In determining the scope  of certifications and qualifications for an inspector, the director may
utilize field training equivalency, independent evaluations or other methods  the director deems appro-
priate.]
SECTION 22.
 ORS 455.735 is amended to read:
455.735. (1) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services may issue  cer-
tificates  of qualification  and licenses  for building officials and [ building] inspectors under ORS
455.715 to 455.740.
(2) Any person desiring issuance of  an initial [ certificate] license  as a building official or in-
[12]
SB 898
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
spector shall make application to the director  upon such forms as the director may prescribe for
such purpose and pay an application fee.
[(3) If the director requires,  by rule, an applicant for a particular certification to pass an exam-
ination prepared by a national organization, the applicant shall pay in  addition to the fee required in
subsection (2) of this section, the cost  of the examination. If the director requires an applicant for cer-
tification to pass an examination administered by the Department of Consumer and Business Services,
the department may charge the applicant an examination administration fee. ]
[(4) Upon determining that the applicant is qualified under ORS 455.715 to 455.740, the  director
shall issue a certificate or cause a certificate to be issued to the applicant. ]
(3) The applicant shall pay an accrediting entity described  in ORS 455.720 or 455.737 or
section 19 of this 2019 Act for any testing and evaluation of the applicant by the entity.
[(5)] (4) A [ certificate] license issued under [ this section ] ORS 455.720 or section 19  of this 2019
Act shall be valid for a term established by the Department of Consumer and Business Services
by rule. An applicant for renewal  of a [ certificate] license  shall submit an application on a form
approved by the director and pay a renewal application fee.
[(6)] (5) The  department may adopt rules establishing [ certificate] continuing education or
other renewal requirements and establishing reasonable fees under this section.
[(7)] (6) The department may charge fees for participation in training programs approved  or es-
tablished by the department under ORS 455.220 or 455.715 to 455.740.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 455.737 is amended to read:
455.737. [(1) Notwithstanding ORS 455.720 (1),  the Director of the Department of Consumer and
Business  Services,  by rule, shall adopt criteria for review of the experience and training in building
inspection and building  plan review acquired by a person outside the State of Oregon. The criteria
shall be adopted in a manner  that facilitates review of a person’s qualifications by a local building
official.]
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 455.720  or section 19 of this 2019 Act, the Director of the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services, by rule, shall allow a  person who is employed
outside this state in  a position substantially equivalent to that of a building official or an
inspector to submit  the results of testing and evaluation by an independent accrediting entity
that is not described in ORS 455.720 or section 19 of this 2019 Act  when filing an application
under ORS 455.735. In addition to any other fees,  the director may charge a fee to cover any
additional cost incurred by the director in processing an application under this section. Ex-
cept as provided  under ORS 455.740 or for other good cause set forth by the director in
writing, the director shall certify the qualification of the person and issue  or cause issuance
of a license under ORS 455.720 as a building official or inspector or under section 19 of  this
2019 Act as a specialized building inspector if the director determines that:
(a) The accrediting entity applied nationwide or multistate standards  to test and evaluate
the applicant;
(b) The nationwide or multistate standards are  as reliable as the standards employed by
independent accrediting entities described in ORS 455.720 or section 19 of this 2019 Act; and
(c) The accrediting entity found that the applicant meets or exceeds nationwide or
multistate standards for persons who exercise the duties, functions  and powers of a building
official or an inspector.
[(2)(a)] (2) A local building official who  wishes to employ  or contract with  a person who is not
certified and licensed under ORS [ 455.735] 455.720 or section 19 of this  2019 Act  as an inspector
[13]
SB 898
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[shall] may submit the person’s [ qualifications] testing and evaluation information  to the director
on behalf of the person  for processing under subsection (1) of this section . [ The director shall
review the stated qualifications against the  criteria adopted under subsection (1) of this section, in-
cluding verification of experience and training ]. The director  shall respond to the local building offi-
cial in writing within 10 working days  of receiving the [ applicant’s qualifications ] information ,
stating whether the person [ meets the applicable criteria ] qualifies for certification and licensure .
[(b) Upon application and payment  of the required fee, the director shall allow a person whose
qualifications meet the criteria adopted under subsection (1) of this section to sit for any  examination
necessary for the required certification. ]
(3) This section does not prohibit a person who is employed outside  this state from ap-
plying for a license as described in ORS 455.720 or section 19 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 24.  ORS 455.740 is amended to read:
455.740. (1) Subject to ORS chapter 183, the Director of the Department of  Consumer and Busi-
ness Services may deny, condition, suspend, revoke or refuse to  renew [ a certificate ] the license  of
a building official or inspector if the director finds that the building official or inspector has:
(a) Consistently failed to act in the public interest in the performance of duties;
(b) Failed to complete [ the] continuing education  requirements [ as required under ORS 455.720
(4)] established by the director ;
(c) Provided false information to the Department  of Consumer and Business Services ; or
(d) Committed an act described in ORS 455.125 , 455.127 or 455.129.
(2) In any revocation proceeding under this section, the municipality  that employs the building
official or inspector shall be entitled to appear as a party in interest, either for or  against the re-
vocation.
(3) When a [ certification] license  is suspended or revoked under  this section, the director may
also suspend, deny or place conditions on  that person’s right to reapply for [ certification] licensing
under ORS 455.735 for a period not to exceed 12 months.
(4) This section does not limit or otherwise affect the authority  of a municipality to dismiss or
suspend a building official or inspector at the discretion of the municipality.
(5) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (1) to (4) of this  section, the director may
adopt rules that:
(a) Allow [ certifications] licenses  to be placed on inactive status; and
(b) Extend continuing education compliance requirements in case of illness or hardship.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 455.770 is amended to read:
455.770. (1) In addition to any  other authority and power granted to the Director of the De-
partment of Consumer and Business Services  under ORS 446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to 446.285,
446.395 to 446.420, 479.510 to 479.945, 479.995 and 480.510 to 480.670  and this chapter and ORS
chapters 447, 460 and 693, with respect to municipalities, building officials and inspectors, if the di-
rector has reason to believe that there is a failure to enforce or a violation of any provision of  the
state building code or ORS 446.003 to 446.200,  446.225 to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510 to
479.945, 479.995 or  480.510 to 480.670 or this chapter or ORS chapter 447, 460 or 693 or any rule
adopted under those statutes, the director may:
(a) Examine building code activities of the municipality;
(b) Take sworn testimony; and
(c) With the authorization of the Office of the Attorney General, subpoena  persons and records
to obtain testimony on official actions  that were taken or omitted or to obtain documents otherwise
[14]
SB 898
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
subject to public inspection under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(2) The investigative authority authorized in  subsection (1) of this section covers the violation
or omission by a municipality related to enforcement of codes or administrative rules,  [ certification]
licensing of inspectors or financial transactions dealing with permit fees and surcharges  under any
of the following circumstances when:
(a) The duties are clearly established by law, rule or agreement;
(b) The duty involves procedures for which the means and methods are clearly established by
law, rule or agreement; or
(c) The duty is described by clear performance standards.
(3) Prior to starting an investigation under subsection (1) of this section, the director shall notify
the municipality in writing setting  forth the allegation and the rules or statutes pertaining to the
allegation and give the municipality 30 days to respond to the  allegation. If the municipality does
not satisfy the director’s concerns, the director may then commence an investigation.
(4) If the Department of Consumer and Business Services or the director directs  corrective
action, the following shall be done:
(a) The corrective action  shall be in writing and served on the building official and the chief
executive officers of all municipalities affected;
(b) The corrective action shall identify  the facts and law relied upon for the required action; and
(c) A reasonable time shall be provided to the municipality for compliance.
(5) The director  may revoke any authority of the municipality to administer any part of the state
building code or ORS  446.003 to 446.200, 446.225 to 446.285, 446.395 to 446.420, 479.510 to 479.945,
479.995 or  480.510 to 480.670 or this chapter or ORS chapter 447, 460 or 693 or any rule adopted
under those statutes if the director determines after a hearing conducted  under ORS 183.413 to
183.497 that:
(a) All of the requirements of this section and ORS 455.775 and 455.895 were met; and
(b) The municipality did not comply with the corrective action required.
SECTION 26.
 ORS 479.530 is amended to read:
479.530. As used in ORS 479.510 to 479.945 and 479.995, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Approved testing laboratory” means a testing laboratory  that meets criteria for electrical
product evaluation established by the  Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Ser-
vices with the approval of the Electrical and Elevator Board under ORS 479.730.
(2) “Board” means the Electrical and Elevator Board established under ORS 455.138.
(3) “Certified electrical product” means an electrical  product that is certified under ORS 479.760
and that is not decertified.
[(4) “Competent inspection service” means an electrical  inspection service of a city or county ad-
ministered under ORS 455.148 or 455.150 that  employs electrical inspectors who are certified to meet
standards under ORS 479.810. ]
[(5)] (4)  “Commercial electrical air conditioning  equipment” means heating, cooling, refriger-
ation, dehumidifying, humidifying and filtering equipment used for climatizing or moving  of air if
used in commerce, industry or government and if installed in a place not  accessible to the general
public other than the switches regulating the operation of the equipment.
[(6)] (5)  “Demarcation point” means the place of interconnection between  the communications
cabling, terminal equipment or protective apparatus of  the telecommunications service provider and
the customer’s premises.
[(7)] (6) “Department” means the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
[15]
SB 898
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
[(8)] (7) “Director” means the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
[(9)] (8)  “Dwelling unit” means one or more rooms for the use of  one or more persons as a
housekeeping unit with space for eating, living and sleeping and permanent  provisions for cooking
and sanitation.
[(10)] (9)  “Electrical installations” means the construction or  installation of electrical wiring
and the permanent attachment or installation of electrical  products in or on any structure that is
not itself an electrical product. “Electrical installation” also means the maintenance  or repair of
installed electrical wiring and  permanently attached electrical products. “Electrical installation”
does not include an oil module.
[(11)] (10)  “Electrical product” means any electrical equipment, material, device or  apparatus
that, except as provided in ORS 479.540, requires a license or permit to install and either  conveys
or is operated by electrical current.
[(12)] (11)  “Equipment”  means any material, fittings, devices, appliances, fixtures, apparatus or
the like that are used as part of or in connection with an electrical installation.
[(13)] (12) “Field evaluation firm” means an independent organization that provides:
(a) Evaluations or testing, or both; and
(b) Documentation regarding compliance with electrical product safety  standards and with the
electrical installation safety code.
[(14)] (13) “Industrial electrical  equipment” means electrical products used in industry or gov-
ernment that utilize electric energy for mechanical,  chemical, heating, lighting or similar purposes,
that are designed to service  or produce a product and that are used directly in the production of
the service or product.
[(15)] (14) “Installation label” means an adhesive tag issued by governmental agencies that ad-
minister the Electrical Safety Law  to licensed electrical contractors for application to those minor
electrical installations for which the board by  rule determines to be appropriate for random in-
spections.
[(16)] (15)  “License” means a permit issued by the department  under ORS 479.630 authorizing
the person whose name appears  as licensee thereon to act as an electrical contractor, supervising
electrician, journeyman electrician, electrical apprentice or limited elevator journeyman as indicated
thereon.
[(17)] (16) “Minimum safety standards” means safety standards prescribed by concurrence of the
board and the director under ORS 479.730.
[(18)] (17) “Multifamily dwelling” means a building containing more than one dwelling unit.
([19)] (18)  “Oil module” means a prefabricated structure manufactured to the  specifications of
the purchaser and used outside this state in the  exploration for or processing or extraction of pe-
troleum products.
[(20)] (19)  “Permit” means an official document or card issued by the enforcing agency to  au-
thorize performance of a specified electrical installation.
[(21)] (20) “Single family dwelling” means a building consisting solely of one dwelling unit.
[(22)] (21)  “Telecommunications  service provider” means a telecommunications carrier as de-
fined in ORS 133.721  or a telecommunications utility or competitive telecommunications provider,
both as defined in ORS 759.005.
[(23)] (22) “Uncertified product” means any electrical product that is not an electrical product
certified under ORS 479.760.
SECTION 27.
 ORS 479.810 is amended to read:
[16]
SB 898
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
479.810. (1) The  Electrical and Elevator Board shall administer and enforce ORS 479.510 to
479.945 and 479.995. The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services shall  ap-
point an adequate staff of competent persons  experienced and trained to serve as electrical inspec-
tors for the Department of Consumer and Business Services . The director shall also make
licensure available to persons qualifying under this section to perform electrical specialty
code inspections on behalf of municipalities under ORS 455.148  or 455.150. The board shall as-
sist the director in reviewing determinations made by the staff involving electrical installations  or
products and to assist in formulating rules under ORS 479.730.
(2) The director, in consultation with the board, shall appoint a  representative of the
department’s staff of electrical inspectors appointed under subsection (1) of this section  who
shall serve [ ex officio ] as secretary of the board. This person shall  be known as the Chief Electrical
Inspector.
(3) The director shall [ certify] appoint or license  a person as an electrical inspector if:
(a) The person:
(A) Completes a general journeyman electrical apprenticeship program in Oregon;
(B) Has two years’ experience as a licensed electrician in Oregon; and
(C) Passes the examination required for certification as a supervising electrician; or
(b) For a person with experience outside the State of Oregon, the person:
(A)(i) Has five years’ experience in commercial or industrial electrical inspection; and
(ii) Passes the examination required for certification as a general supervising electrician; or
(B) Has six years of out-of-state experience as an electrician  and passes the examination re-
quired for certification as a general supervising electrician.
(4) The board may,  by rule, allow [ certification] appointment or licensure  of persons as elec-
trical inspectors with experience or  training that does not meet the requirements specified in sub-
section (3) of this section.  However, experience and training requirements for licensure under
this subsection must be based on a comparison to  nationwide or multistate standards for
electrical inspector experience and training and must  require that the licensee meet or ex-
ceed those nationwide or multistate standards.
(5) Rules adopted under this section shall  provide for the recognition of equivalent experience
acquired by a person outside the State of Oregon.
(6) An examination taken for purposes of applying for [ certification] appointment or  licensing
as an electrical inspector under this section shall not be valid for use in  an application to become
licensed as a supervising electrician.
(7) The licensure of an individual under this section as an  electrical inspector authorizes
the employment of, or contracting with, the individual  as an electrical inspector under ORS
455.148 or 455.150 without any  additional approval from the director or the board. If the in-
dividual is  employed by the department or is employed by or contracts with a municipality
that is located within a building code administrative  region, except as provided in this sub-
section, the  individual may perform electrical inspections throughout the building codes ad-
ministrative region, whether inside or outside of a municipality. This subsection does  not
require a municipality administering and  enforcing a building inspection program under ORS
455.148 or 455.150 to allow an electrical inspector who is not employed by or contracting with
the municipality to perform inspections on behalf of the municipality.
(8) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the  board shall identify electrical spe-
cialty code parts appropriate for inspection by specialized building inspectors  qualified under
[17]
SB 898
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
section 19 of this 2019 Act and report the information to the director.
SECTION 28. Notwithstanding ORS 455.630 and 479.810 and section 19 of this 2019 Act,
an individual holding a lapsed authorization to  conduct inspections as a specialized building
inspector with regard to plumbing specialty code parts  or electrical specialty code parts may,
upon payment of a license fee,  obtain a license under section 19 of this 2019 Act as a spe-
cialized building inspector to  conduct inspections with regard to plumbing specialty code
parts or electrical specialty code parts. This section does not require the Director of the
Department of Consumer  and Business Services to issue a license if the lapsed authorization
was at any  time denied, conditioned, suspended or revoked under ORS 455.740. An applicant
for licensure under this section must apply for  the license before January 1, 2022. Upon is-
suance, a specialized building inspector license issued under this section shall for all purposes
be treated as a  specialized building inspector license issued under section 19 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 29.
 ORS 480.525 is amended to read:
480.525. (1) ORS 480.510 to 480.670 do not apply to:
(a) Boilers and pressure vessels under federal safety regulations or control.
(b) Domestic  water heaters designed for heating potable water, equipped with an approved
pressure-relieving device, containing only water and that do not exceed a:
(A) Capacity of 120 gallons;
(B) Water temperature of 210 degrees Fahrenheit;
(C) Pressure of 150 pounds per square inch gauge pressure; or
(D) Heat input of 200,000 BTU per hour.
(c) Domestic water heaters designed to create hot water instantaneously on demand without  the
use of a storage tank.
(d) Pressure vessels containing liquefied petroleum gas that are under  the jurisdiction of the
State Fire  Marshal. However, the construction and repair of the vessels must comply with ORS
480.510 to 480.670 and are under the jurisdiction of the Board of Boiler Rules.
(e) Air tanks used in the operation of  brakes on self-propelled vehicles and trailers that are used
for transporting freight or passengers.
(f) Medical sterilizers that do not exceed one and one-half cubic feet in volume.
(g) Pressure vessels that do not exceed one and one-half cubic feet in volume and:
(A) Are not operated at gauge pressure of more than 150 pounds per square inch;
(B) Are equipped with a relief valve;
(C) Are approved under  the American Society of Mechanical Engineers code adopted by the
board;
(D) Are set at a maximum pressure of 150 pounds per square inch or less; and
(E) Are located in a place of public assembly.
(h) Pressure vessels that do not exceed five cubic feet in volume and:
(A) Are not operated at gauge pressure of more than 150 pounds per square inch;
(B) Are equipped with a relief valve;
(C) Are approved under the American Society of Mechanical Engineers code  adopted by the
board; and
(D) Are set at a maximum pressure of 150 pounds per square inch or less.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1)  of this section, if the board, upon presentation of satisfactory
evidence, determines that danger to health or safety is evident in any pressure  vessel or class of
pressure vessels exempted under subsection (1)(g) of this section,  the board may require the in-
[18]
SB 898
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
spection or reinspection of the pressure vessel or  class of pressure vessels and make the pressure
vessel or  class of pressure vessels subject to the fee, construction or other requirements of ORS
480.510 to 480.670.
(3) The following boilers and pressure vessels are  exempt from ORS 480.510 to 480.670, except
as to all provisions relating to construction, installation, alteration or repair and to installation
permits:
(a) Boilers that are not operated at gauge pressures of  more than 15 pounds per square inch and
that are located on farms and used solely for agricultural purposes except  when used in connection
with a greenhouse.
(b) Air tanks located on farms and used solely for agricultural purposes.
(c) Boilers and pressure vessels that  are located in private residences and may be inspected only
by a boiler inspector.
(d) Pressure vessels being operated at gauge pressures  of less than 15 pounds per square inch
and equipped with a pressure relief device  set to open at a pressure that does not exceed the lesser
of the pressure vessel’s maximum allowed working  pressure or 15 pounds per square inch gauge
pressure.
(4)(a) Beverage service  tanks that have a product volume of five cubic feet or less are exempt
from ORS 480.510 to 480.670.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of  this subsection, beverage service tanks that have a
product  volume  of more than five cubic feet are exempt from ORS 480.510 to 480.670, except as to
provisions relating to installation  permits and installation inspections. The installation permit fee
for a beverage service tank is $50.
(c) All portable beverage tanks are exempt from ORS 480.510 to 480.670.
(5) The Director of the Department of Consumer and  Business Services may adopt rules identi-
fying boilers  and pressure vessels used in single family dwellings or other structures that may be
inspected by an inspector  [certified] licensed under ORS 455.715 to 455.740 for a specialty code other
than the code adopted under ORS 480.545. The boilers and pressure  vessels identified in the rules
shall be subject to inspection upon  installation, alteration or repair, but be exempt from periodic
inspection under ORS 480.560 and from the operating permit requirements of ORS 480.585.
(6) Notwithstanding any requirement of ORS 480.510  to 480.670 or the state building code, the
Department of  Consumer and Business Services may adopt rules granting partial or complete ex-
emption from ORS 480.510 to 480.670 for a boiler or pressure vessel if the board determines that the
boiler or pressure vessel does not present a danger to public health or safety within this state.
SECTION 30.
 ORS 480.565 is amended to read:
480.565. The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services shall:
(1) Appoint a chief boiler inspector who has had  practical experience in the construction,
maintenance, repair or operation of  high pressure boilers and pressure vessels as a mechanical en-
gineer, practical steam operating engineer, boilermaker or boiler inspector and who:
(a) Has passed a written examination, which  shall be confined to questions the answers to which
will aid in determining the fitness and competency of the applicant to inspect  boilers and pressure
vessels; or
(b) Holds a certificate of competency as an inspector of boilers and pressure  vessels issued by
a state that has standards of examination equal to  those of the State of Oregon and that recognizes
[certificates of competency ] inspector licenses  issued by the State of Oregon, and has passed an ex-
amination that assesses the applicant’s  knowledge of ORS 480.510 to 480.670 and the rules adopted
[19]
SB 898
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
thereunder.
(2) Appoint deputy  inspectors who shall be responsible to the chief boiler inspector and who
shall have qualified as provided in  subsection (1) of this section, except that less practical experi-
ence shall be required.
(3) Issue a certificate  of competency as a special inspector to any individual who qualifies as
provided in subsection (1) of this section, except that no more practical experience shall  be required
than is required of a deputy inspector, and who is continuously employed by:
(a) An insurer who may and  does write policies of boiler and pressure vessel insurance in
Oregon; or
(b) Any person operating pressure vessels in this state  whose service, personnel, equipment and
supervision meet the requirements prescribed by the Board of Boiler Rules.
SECTION 31.  ORS 480.605 is amended to read:
480.605. The Department of Consumer and Business Services may:
(1) Collect fees for shop inspections, or for  inspections, testing, consultations, site visits or other
services for which no fee is otherwise specified, in the amount of $75 per hour of travel and  in-
spection time.
(2) Collect a fee for  welding and inspectors’ examinations and for the issuance and renewal of
[inspectors’] inspector licenses and specialty inspector  certifications. The Board of Boiler Rules
shall fix the amount of the fee.
SECTION 32.
ORS 455.622, 455.723 and 455.725 are repealed.
SECTION 33.  (1) Section 19 of this 2019 Act, the amendments  to ORS 455.457, 455.720,
455.735, 455.737 and 479.810 by sections 9, 17,  22, 23 and 27 of this 2019 Act and the repeal of
ORS 455.622, 455.723 and 455.725 by section 32 of this 2019 Act apply  to building official and
inspector applications filed on or after January 1, 2021.
(2) Section 19 of this 2019 Act, the amendments to ORS 446.250, 446.255, 447.091, 455.046,
455.055, 455.140, 455.420, 455.457, 455.459,  455.467, 455.469, 455.628, 455.630, 455.705, 455.715,
455.720, 455.730, 455.732, 455.735, 455.737, 455.740, 455.770, 479.530,  479.810, 480.525, 480.565 and
480.605 by sections 1 to 3, 5 to 17, 20 to 27 and 29 to 31 of this 2019 Act and the repeal  of ORS
455.622, 455.723 and 455.725 by section 32 of this 2019 Act do not restrict, invalidate or ter-
minate any certification issued under ORS 455.622, 455.715 to 455.740 or 479.810  in response
to an application filed before January 1, 2021, or  affect the ability of a certificate holder to
be a  building official or inspector. The holder of a certificate issued under ORS 455.622,
455.715 to 455.740 or  479.810 in response to an application filed before January 1, 2021, may
exercise the same duties,  functions, powers and privileges, and is subject to the same con-
ditions, terms and requirements, as the holder of a  license issued under ORS 455.715 to
455.740 or 479.810 on or after January 1, 2021.
(3) The holder of a  specialized building inspector certificate issued under ORS 455.723
(2017 Edition) that is active on the effective date of this  2019 Act may exercise the same
duties, functions, powers and privileges, and is subject  to the same conditions, terms and
requirements, as the holder  of a specialized building inspector license issued under section
19 of this 2019 Act for the same specialty code parts.
(4) If the Department of Consumer and Business Services approves  the renewal of a
certificate described in subsection  (2) or (3) of this section, the department shall convert the
certificate to an equivalent building official or inspector license.
[20]