Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 244.020 is amended to read:
244.020. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Actual conflict of interest”  means any action or any decision or recommendation by a per-
son acting  in a capacity as a public official, the effect of which would be to the private pecuniary
benefit or detriment of the person or the person’s relative or any business with which  the person
or a relative of the person is associated unless the pecuniary benefit or detriment arises out of cir-
cumstances described in subsection (13) of this section.
(2) “Business” means any corporation, partnership, proprietorship, firm, enterprise,  franchise,
association, organization, self-employed individual  and any other legal entity operated for economic
gain but excluding any income-producing not-for-profit corporation that is tax exempt under  section
501(c) of the Internal  Revenue Code with which a public official or a relative of the public official
is associated only as a member or board director or in a nonremunerative capacity.
(3) “Business with which the person is associated” means:
(a) Any private business or closely held corporation of which the person or  the person’s relative
is a director, officer, owner or employee, or agent or any private business or  closely held corpo-
ration in which the person or the person’s relative owns or has owned stock, another form of equity
interest, stock options or debt instruments worth $1,000  or more at any point in the preceding cal-
endar year;
(b) Any publicly held corporation in which the person  or the person’s relative owns or has
owned $100,000 or more in stock or another form of equity interest,  stock options or debt instru-
ments at any point in the preceding calendar year;
(c) Any publicly held corporation of which  the person or the person’s relative is a director or
officer;  or
(d) For public officials required to file a statement of  economic interest under ORS 244.050, any
business listed as a source of income as required under ORS 244.060 (3).
(4) “Candidate” means an  individual for whom a declaration of candidacy, nominating petition
NOTE: Matter in  boldfaced type in an amended section is new;  matter [ italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in  boldfaced type.
LC 2379
HB 2821
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
or certificate of nomination to public office has been filed or whose name  is printed on a ballot or
is expected to be or has been presented,  with the individual’s consent, for nomination or election to
public office.
(5) “Development commission” means any entity that has  the authority to purchase, develop,
improve or lease land or the authority to  operate or direct the use of land. This authority must be
more than ministerial.
(6) “First Partner” means the spouse or  domestic partner of the Governor, or an individual who
primarily has a personal relationship with the Governor as determined by the Oregon Government
Ethics Commission by rule. “First  Partner” encompasses any alternative title that the Governor may
publicly substitute for “First Partner,” including, but not limited  to, “First Lady,” “First Husband”
or “First Spouse.”
(7)(a) “Gift”  means something of economic value given to a public official, a candidate or a rel-
ative or member of the household of the public official or candidate:
(A) Without valuable consideration of equivalent value, including the full or  partial forgiveness
of indebtedness, which is not extended to others who are not public officials or  candidates or the
relatives or members of the household  of public officials or candidates on the same terms and con-
ditions; or
(B) For  valuable consideration less than that required from others who are not public officials
or candidates.
(b) “Gift” does not mean:
(A) Contributions as defined in ORS 260.005.
(B) Gifts from relatives or members of the household of the public official or candidate.
(C) An unsolicited token or award of appreciation in the form of a plaque,  trophy, desk item,
wall memento or similar item, with a resale value reasonably expected to be less than $25.
(D) Informational or program material, publications or subscriptions  related to the recipient’s
performance of official duties.
(E) Admission  provided to or the cost of food or beverage consumed by a public official, a rel-
ative of the public official accompanying the public official, a member of the household of the  public
official accompanying the public official or a staff member of  the public official accompanying the
public official, at  a reception, meal or meeting held by an organization when the public official re-
presents state government as defined in ORS 174.111, a local government as  defined in ORS 174.116
or a special government body as defined in ORS 174.117.
(F) Reasonable expenses paid by any unit of the federal government, a state or local government,
a Native American tribe that is recognized by federal law  or formally acknowledged by a state, a
membership organization to which a  public body as defined in ORS 174.109 pays membership dues
or a not-for-profit corporation that  is tax exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code, for attendance at a convention, fact-finding mission or trip, conference or other meeting if  the
public official is scheduled to deliver  a speech, make a presentation, participate on a panel or rep-
resent state government as defined in ORS 174.111, a local government as defined  in ORS 174.116
or a special government body as defined in ORS 174.117.
(G) Contributions made to a legal expense trust fund established under ORS 244.209  for the
benefit of the public official.
(H) Reasonable food, travel or lodging expenses provided to a public official, a  relative of the
public official accompanying the public official, a member of the household of the public official ac-
companying the public official or a staff member of the public official accompanying the public offi-
[2]
HB 2821
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
cial, when the public official  is representing state government as defined in ORS 174.111, a local
government as defined in ORS 174.116 or a special government body as defined in ORS 174.117:
(i) On an officially sanctioned trade-promotion or fact-finding mission; or
(ii) In officially designated negotiations, or economic development activities, where receipt of the
expenses is approved in advance.
(I) Food or beverage consumed by a public official acting in an official capacity:
(i) In association with the review, approval, execution of documents or closing of a borrowing,
investment or other financial transaction, including  any business agreement between state govern-
ment as defined in ORS 174.111, a  local government as defined in ORS 174.116 or a special govern-
ment body as defined in ORS 174.117 and a private entity or  public body as defined in ORS 174.109;
(ii) While engaged  in due diligence research or presentations by the office of the State Treasurer
related to an existing or proposed investment or borrowing; or
(iii) While engaged in a meeting of an  advisory, governance or policy-making body of a corpo-
ration, partnership or other entity in which the office of the State Treasurer has invested moneys.
(J) Waiver or discount of registration expenses  or materials provided to a public official or
candidate at a  continuing education event that the public official or candidate may attend to satisfy
a professional licensing requirement.
(K) Expenses provided by one public official to another public official for travel  inside this state
to or from an event that bears a  relationship to the receiving public official’s office and at which
the official participates in an official capacity.
(L) Food or beverage consumed by a public official or candidate at  a reception where the food
or beverage is provided as an incidental part of the reception and  no cost is placed on the food or
beverage.
(M) Entertainment provided to a public official or candidate or a relative or member  of the
household of the public official or candidate that is incidental to the main purpose of another event.
(N) Entertainment provided to a public official or a relative or member of the  household of the
public official where  the public official is acting in an official capacity while representing state
government as defined in ORS 174.111,  a local government as defined in ORS 174.116 or a special
government body as defined in ORS 174.117 for a ceremonial purpose.
(O) Anything of economic  value offered to or solicited or received by a public official or candi-
date, or a relative or member of the household of the public official or candidate:
(i) As part of the usual and customary practice of the person’s private  business, or the person’s
employment or position as a volunteer with a private business,  corporation, partnership,
proprietorship, firm, enterprise, franchise, association, organization, not-for-profit corporation  or
other legal entity operated for economic value; and
(ii) That  bears no relationship to the public official’s or candidate’s holding of, or candidacy for,
the official position or public office.
(P) Reasonable expenses paid to a public school  employee for accompanying students on an ed-
ucational  trip.
(8) “Honorarium” means a payment or something of economic value given  to a public official in
exchange for services upon which custom  or propriety prevents the setting of a price. Services in-
clude, but are not limited to, speeches or other services rendered in connection with an event.
(9) “Income”  means income of any nature derived from any source, including, but not limited to,
any salary, wage,  advance, payment, dividend, interest, rent, honorarium, return of capital,
forgiveness of indebtedness, or anything of economic value.
[3]
HB 2821
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(10) “Legislative or administrative  interest” means an economic interest, distinct from that of
the general public, in:
(a) Any matter subject to the decision or vote of the public official acting in the public official’s
capacity as a public official; or
(b) Any matter that would be  subject to the decision or vote of the candidate who, if elected,
would be acting in the capacity of a public official.
(11) “Member of the household”  means any person who resides with the public official or can-
didate.
(12) “Planning  commission” means a county planning commission created under ORS chapter 215
or a city planning commission created under ORS chapter 227.
(13) “Potential conflict of interest” means any action  or any decision or recommendation by a
person acting in a capacity as a public official, the effect of which could be  to the private pecuniary
benefit or detriment of the  person or the person’s relative, or a business with which the person or
the person’s relative is associated, unless the pecuniary benefit or detriment arises out of  the fol-
lowing:
(a) An interest or membership in a  particular business, industry, occupation or other class re-
quired by law as a prerequisite to the holding by the person of the office or position.
(b) Any action in the person’s official capacity which would affect to the  same degree a class
consisting of all inhabitants of the state, or a smaller class consisting of an  industry, occupation or
other group including one of which or in which the person, or the person’s relative or business with
which the person or the person’s relative is associated, is a member or is engaged.
(c) Membership in or membership on the board of directors of a nonprofit corporation  that is
tax-exempt under section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(14) “Public office” has the meaning given that term in ORS 260.005.
(15) “Public official” means the First Partner and any person  who, when an alleged violation
of this chapter occurs,  is serving the State of Oregon or any of its political subdivisions or any other
public body as defined in ORS 174.109 as an elected official, appointed  official, employee or agent,
irrespective of whether the person is compensated for the services.
(16)(a) “Public partner” means any business or income-producing  not-for-profit corpo-
ration that is  tax exempt under section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code that has re-
ceived, over the previous five years, $10 million or more in payment of public moneys.
(b) As used in this subsection, “payment of public moneys” includes:
(A) Payments for work performed on behalf of a public body as defined in ORS 174.109;
(B) Grants awarded by a public body;
(C) Loans from a public body that were received at below market rate; or
(D) Any other expenditure  of public moneys that benefited the business or not-for-profit
corporation.
[(16)] (17) “Relative” means:
(a) The spouse, parent, stepparent, child, sibling, stepsibling, son-in-law or daughter-in-law of  the
public official or candidate;
(b) The parent, stepparent, child, sibling, stepsibling, son-in-law  or daughter-in-law of the spouse
of the public official or candidate;
(c) Any individual for whom the public official or candidate has a legal support obligation;
(d) Any individual for whom the public official provides benefits arising  from the public official’s
public employment  or from whom the public official receives benefits arising from that individual’s
[4]
HB 2821
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
employment; or
(e) Any individual from whom  the candidate receives benefits arising from that individual’s em-
ployment.
[(17)] (18) “Statement of economic interest” means  a statement as described by ORS 244.060 or
244.070.
[(18)] (19) “Zoning commission” means an entity to which is  delegated at least some of the dis-
cretionary authority of a planning commission or governing  body relating to zoning and land use
matters.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 244.050 is amended to read:
244.050. (1) On or  before April 15 of each year the following persons shall file with the Oregon
Government Ethics Commission a verified statement of economic interest as required  under this
chapter:
(a) The Governor, Secretary of State, State Treasurer, Attorney General, Commissioner  of the
Bureau of Labor and Industries, district attorneys and members of the Legislative Assembly.
(b) Any judicial officer, including justices of the peace and municipal judges,  except any pro tem
judicial officer who does not otherwise serve as a judicial officer.
(c) Any candidate for a public office designated in paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(d) The Deputy Attorney General.
(e) The Deputy Secretary of State.
(f) The Legislative Administrator, the Legislative Counsel, the Legislative Fiscal Officer, the
Legislative Policy and Research Director, the  Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the House
of Representatives and the Legislative Equity Officer.
(g) The president and vice presidents, or their administrative equivalents, in each public  uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002.
(h) The following state officers:
(A) Adjutant General.
(B) Director of Agriculture.
(C) Manager of State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(D) Water Resources Director.
(E) Director of the Department of Environmental Quality.
(F) Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(G) State Fish and Wildlife Director.
(H) State Forester.
(I) State Geologist.
(J) Director of Human Services.
(K) Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(L) Director of the Department of State Lands.
(M) State Librarian.
(N) Administrator of the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
(O) Superintendent of State Police.
(P) Director of the Public Employees Retirement System.
(Q) Director of Department of Revenue.
(R) Director of Transportation.
(S) Public Utility Commissioner.
(T) Director of Veterans’ Affairs.
[5]
HB 2821
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(U) Executive director of Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(V) Director of the State Department of Energy.
(W) Director and each assistant director of the Oregon State Lottery.
(X) Director of the Department of Corrections.
(Y) Director of the Oregon Department of Aviation.
(Z) Executive director of the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(AA) Director of the Oregon Business Development Department.
(BB) Director of the Oregon Department of Emergency Management.
(CC) Director of the Employment Department.
(DD) State Fire Marshal.
(EE) Chief of staff for the Governor.
(FF) Director of the Housing and Community Services Department.
(GG) State Court Administrator.
(HH) Director of the Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(II) Board chairperson of the Land Use Board of Appeals.
(JJ) State Marine Director.
(KK) Executive director of the Oregon Racing Commission.
(LL) State Parks and Recreation Director.
(MM) Executive director of the Oregon Public Defense Commission.
(NN) Chairperson of the Public Employees’ Benefit Board.
(OO) Director of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
(PP) Executive director of the Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(QQ) Executive director of the Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board.
(RR) Director of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(SS) Director of the Oregon Health Authority.
(TT) Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(i) The First Partner, the legal counsel, the deputy  legal counsel and all policy advisors within
the Governor’s office.
(j) Every elected city or county official.
(k) Every member of a city or county planning, zoning or development commission.
(L) The chief executive officer of a city or county who performs  the duties of manager or prin-
cipal administrator of the city or county.
(m) Members of local government boundary commissions formed under ORS 199.410 to 199.519.
(n) Every member of a governing body of a metropolitan service  district and the auditor and
executive officer thereof.
(o) Each member of the board of directors of the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation.
(p) The chief administrative officer and the financial  officer of each common and union high
school district, education service district and community college district.
(q) Every member of the following state boards, commissions and councils:
(A) Governing board of the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries.
(B) Oregon Business Development Commission.
(C) State Board of Education.
(D) Environmental Quality Commission.
(E) Fish and Wildlife Commission of the State of Oregon.
(F) State Board of Forestry.
[6]
HB 2821
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
(G) Oregon Government Ethics Commission.
(H) Oregon Health Policy Board.
(I) Oregon Investment Council.
(J) Land Conservation and Development Commission.
(K) Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission.
(L) Oregon Short Term Fund Board.
(M) State Marine Board.
(N) Mass transit district boards.
(O) Energy Facility Siting Council.
(P) Board of Commissioners of the Port of Portland.
(Q) Employment Relations Board.
(R) Public Employees Retirement Board.
(S) Oregon Racing Commission.
(T) Oregon Transportation Commission.
(U) Water Resources Commission.
(V) Workers’ Compensation Board.
(W) Oregon Facilities Authority.
(X) Oregon State Lottery Commission.
(Y) Pacific Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council.
(Z) Columbia River Gorge Commission.
(AA) Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors.
(BB) Capitol Planning Commission.
(CC) Higher Education Coordinating Commission.
(DD) Oregon Growth Board.
(EE) Early Learning Council.
(FF) The Oversight and Accountability Council.
(r) The following officers of the State Treasurer:
(A) Deputy State Treasurer.
(B) Chief of staff for the office of the State Treasurer.
(C) Director of the Investment Division.
(s) Every member of the board of commissioners of a port governed by ORS 777.005 to 777.725
or 777.915 to 777.953.
(t) Every member of the  board of directors of an authority created under ORS 441.525 to 441.595.
(u) Every member of a governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(v) Every member of the district school board of a common school district or union  high school
district.
(w) Every member of the board  of directors of an authority created under ORS 465.600 to
465.621.
(x) Every director and senior executive of a public partner.
(2) By April 15 next after the date an appointment takes effect, every appointed public official
on a  board or commission listed in subsection (1) of this section and every director or senior
executive of a public partner  shall file with the  Oregon Government Ethics Commission a state-
ment of economic interest as required under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(3) By April 15 next after the filing deadline for the primary election, each candidate  described
in subsection  (1) of this section shall file with the commission a statement of economic interest as
[7]
HB 2821
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
required under ORS 244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(4) Not later than the 40th day before the date of the statewide general election,  each candidate
described in subsection (1)  of this section who will appear on the statewide general election ballot
and who was not required to file a statement  of economic interest under subsections (1) to (3) of this
section  shall  file with the commission a statement of economic interest as required under ORS
244.060, 244.070 and 244.090.
(5) Subsections (1) to (3)  of this section apply only to persons who are incumbent, elected or
appointed public officials  or who are directors or senior executives  of a public partner  as of
April 15 and to persons who are candidates on April 15.
(6) If a statement required to be filed under this section has not been received by  the commis-
sion within five days after the date the statement is  due, the commission shall notify the public of-
ficial , director or senior executive of a public partner  or candidate  and give the public official ,
director or senior executive of a public  partner  or candidate not less than 15 days to comply
with the requirements of this section. If the public official , director or senior executive of a public
partner or candidate fails to comply by the date set by the commission, the commission  may impose
a civil penalty as provided in ORS 244.350.
NOTE:
 Section 3 was deleted. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 4.  ORS 244.060 is amended to read:
244.060. The statement of economic interest filed under ORS  244.050 shall be on a form pre-
scribed by the Oregon Government Ethics Commission. The public official , director or senior
executive of a public partner  or candidate filing the statement shall supply the information re-
quired by this section and ORS 244.090, as follows:
(1) The names  of all positions as officer of a business and business directorships held by the
public official , director or senior  executive of a public partner  or candidate or a member of the
household of the public official or candidate during the preceding calendar year, and  the principal
address and a brief description of each business.
(2) All names under which the public official , director or senior executive of a public partner
or candidate and members  of the household of the public official or candidate do business and the
principal address and a brief description of each business.
(3) The names, principal addresses and brief descriptions of the sources of  income received
during the preceding calendar year by the  public official , director or senior executive of a public
partner or candidate or a member of the household of the public official or  candidate that produce
10 percent or more of the total annual household income.
(4)(a) A list of all real property in which the public official , director or senior executive of a
public partner or candidate or a member of the household of the public official  or candidate has
or has had any personal, beneficial ownership interest during the preceding calendar year,  any
options to purchase or sell real property, including a land sales contract, and any other rights  of
any kind in real property located within the geographic boundaries of the governmental  agency of
which the public official holds, or the candidate if elected would hold,  an official position or over
which the public official exercises, or the candidate if elected would exercise, any authority.
(b) This subsection does not require  the listing of the principal residence of the public official ,
director or senior executive of a public partner  or candidate.
(5) All expenses with an aggregate value  exceeding $50 received by the public official during the
preceding calendar year when participating  in a convention, mission, trip or other meeting described
in ORS 244.020 (7)(b)(F), including the name and address of the organization,  unit of government,
[8]
HB 2821
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
tribe or corporation paying the expenses, the nature  of the event and the date and amount of the
expense.
(6) All expenses with an aggregate value  exceeding $50 received by the public official during the
preceding calendar year when participating  in a mission, negotiations or economic development ac-
tivities described in ORS 244.020 (7)(b)(H), including the name and address of the  person paying the
expenses, the nature of the event and the date and amount of the expenditure.
(7) All honoraria and other  items allowed under ORS 244.042 with a value exceeding $15 that
are received  by the public official, candidate or member of the household of the public official or
candidate during the preceding calendar year, the provider of each honorarium or item and  the date
and time of the event for which the honorarium or item was received.
(8) The name, principal address and brief description  of each source of income exceeding an
aggregate amount of  $1,000, whether or not taxable, received by the public official or candidate, or
a member of the household of the public official or candidate, during  the preceding calendar year,
if the source of that  income is derived from an individual or business that has a legislative or ad-
ministrative interest or that has been doing business, does business or could reasonably be expected
to do business with the  governmental agency of which the public official holds, or the candidate if
elected would hold, an  official position or over which the public official exercises, or the candidate
if elected would exercise, any authority.
(9)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of  this subsection, the name, principal address and
brief description of each source of  income received during the preceding calendar year by a business
identified under subsections (1) and (2) of this section if:
(A) The source of income has a legislative or administrative interest  or has been doing business,
does business or  could reasonably be expected to do business with the governmental agency of
which the public official holds, or the candidate if elected would hold,  an official position or over
which the public official exercises, or the candidate if elected would exercise, any authority; and
(B) Ten percent or more of the total gross annual income of the business identified under sub-
sections (1) and (2) of this section comes from the source of income.
(b)(A) This  subsection does not require the public official or candidate filing the statement to
supply information that the public  official or candidate has a statutory duty to keep privileged or
confidential if the public official or candidate complies with the procedure set forth  in subparagraph
(B) of this paragraph.
(B) If the  public official or candidate has a statutory duty to keep privileged or confidential in-
formation otherwise required to be disclosed under this subsection, the public official or candidate
shall:
(i) Make a formal request to each source of income  for which the statutory duty exists, asking
if the public official or candidate has the  permission of the source of income to make the disclosure
required under this subsection;
(ii) File a signed statement  with the commission stating that the public official or candidate has
made the formal request described in sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph; and
(iii) Report each  source of income that responds in the affirmative to the request made under
sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph within 10 business days of receiving the request.
(c) A public official or candidate shall be  deemed to be in compliance with supplying the infor-
mation required under this subsection if the public official or candidate:
(A) Accurately submits the information required under this subsection; or
(B)(i) Makes a formal request to each source of income that provided  10 percent or more of the
[9]
HB 2821
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
total gross annual income of the business identified under subsections (1) and (2) of this  section,
asking if that source of income has a legislative or administrative interest or has been doing  busi-
ness, does business or  could reasonably be expected to do business with the governmental agency
of which the public official  holds, or the candidate if elected would hold, an official position or over
which the public official exercises, or the candidate if elected would exercise, any authority; and
(ii) Reports each source of income that responds in the  affirmative to the request made under
sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 244.090 is amended to read:
244.090. (1) Each public official , director or senior executive of a public  partner or candidate
required to file a statement  of economic interest under this chapter shall include on the statement
the name of any compensated lobbyist who, during the preceding calendar year, was  associated with
a business with which the public official , director or senior executive of a  public partner  or
candidate or a member of the household of the public official or candidate was also associated.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if the only relationship between the  public offi-
cial, director or senior executive of a public partner  or candidate and the lobbyist is that the
public official , director or senior executive of  a public partner  or candidate and lobbyist hold
stock in the same publicly traded corporation.
(3) As used in this section, “lobbyist” has the meaning given that term in ORS 171.725.
SECTION 6.
The amendments to ORS 244.020, 244.050,  244.060 and 244.090 by sections 1
to 5 of this 2025 Act first apply to  statements of economic interest that are required to be
filed on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
[10]